label	text0	text1
1	histochemical and autoradiographic studies on the effects of aging on the mucopolysacharides of the periosteum	Histochemical and autoradiographic studies on the effects of aging on the mucopolysacharides of the periosteum.
1	the relationship to age and cerebral vascular accidents of fibrin and fibrinolytic activity	Relationship to age and stroke of the brain; fibrinolytic and fibrinolytic activity.
1	effects of perceptual training at three age levels	The effects of perceptual training at three levels of age.
1	sociocultural aspects of aging medical points of view	Socio-cultural aspects of aging from a medical perspective.
1	the cellular complement of the skeletal system studied autoradiographically with tritiated thymidine h3tdr during growth and aging	The cell complement of the skeletal system was studied autoradiographically with tritiated thymidine h3tdr during growth and aging.
1	biochemistry of aging	Biochemistry of aging.
1	age changes in adenine nucleotides in flight muscle of male house fly	Changes in apo; nucleotide age of apo; adenine in flight muscle of male housefly.
1	following response initiation in ducklings age and sensory stimulation	After age and sensory stimulation in ducklings; initiation of response.
1	analysis of the experimental lesion of connective tissue produced by a complex of c polysaccharide from group a streptococci ii influence of age and hypersensitivity	L' analysis of the experimental lesion of connective tissue produced by a complex of c polysaccharides of group a streptococci ii influences l' age and age; hypersensitivity.
1	age and susceptibility of mice to coxsackie a viruses	Age and susceptibility of mice to Coxsackie a.
1	experimental transmission of influenza virus infection in mice ii some factors affecting the incidence of transmitted infection	Experimental transmission of apo; influenza virus infection in mice ii factors affecting apo; incidence of apo; transmitted infection.
1	galactose metabolism by rat liver tissue influence of age	Age influence of galactose metabolism by rat liver tissue.
1	the microscopical appearances of human peripheral arteries during growth and aging	Microscopic appearance of human peripheral arteries during growth and aging.
1	the controversial and dynamic ovary	L' controversial and dynamic ovary.
1	the fate of mitochondria during aging in tetrahymena pyriformis	The fate of mitochondria during aging in tetrahymena pyriformis.
1	age of weaning in two subspecies of deer mice	L' age of weaning in two under-species of mice.
1	compact bone in chinese and japanese	Compact bone in Chinese and Japanese.
1	skeletal age in subjects with mental retardation	Skeletal age in subjects with mental retardation.
1	enzyme changes in flight muscle correlated with aging and flight ability in the male housefly	Enzymatic changes in flight muscle are related to aging and flight ability in the male houseflies.
1	mitotic rates of rat epidermis during growth maturity senility and regeneration	Mitotic rate of l' rat epidermis during senility and mature regeneration.
1	an electron microscope study of mature and differentiating paneth cells in the rat especially of their endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes	An electron microscopic study of mature and differentiating paneth cells in the rat, in particular their endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes.
1	the pathogenesis of herpes virus encephalitis ii a cellular basis for the development of resistance with age	The pathogenesis of viral encephalitis; a cellular basis for the development of resistance to the disease; age.
1	aromatic induced prevention of fetal toxicity of 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene	Induced aromatic prevention of fetal toxicity of 712 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene.
1	communication in illness the relationship of national origin to symptoms and diagnosis	Communication in disease of the relationship d' national origin with symptoms and diagnosis.
1	redundancy and biological aging	The redundancy and biological aging.
1	the effect of age on normal values of the westergen sedimentation rate	L' effect of age on normal values of Westergen sedimentation rate.
1	peptic ulcer in assam	Gastric ulcer in the assam.
1	induced protection of adrenal cortex against 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene influence of ethionine induction of menadione reductase incorporation of thymidine h3	Induced protection of the adrenal cortex against 712 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene influences lidos; induction by apos; apos ethionine; incorporation of thymidine h3 menadione reductase.
1	nutrition onset of disease and longevity in the rat	Nutrition Early onset of disease and longevity in the rat.
1	colonization of the mouse intestine with escherichia coli	Colonization of the mouse intestine by escherichia coli.
1	surgical treatment of tumours of the eyelids	The surgical treatment of eyelid tumors.
1	age variations in cortical membranes of rotifers	D&apos variations; age in cortical membranes of rotifers.
1	changes in sphingosine and fatty acid components of the gangliosides in developing rat and human brain	Modifications to sphingosine and fatty acids of the ganglioside in developing rat and human brain.
1	activity of peptidase in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence	L' peptidase activity in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence.
1	blood viscosity in healthy subjects and patients with coronary heart disease	Blood viscosity in healthy subjects and patients with coronary heart disease.
1	the influence of endotoxin administration on the nutritional requirements of mice	L' the influence of apos; administration of endotoxins on the nutritional requirements of mice.
1	weaning of young rats effect of time on behavior	The time-dependent effect of time on weaning behaviour of young rats.
1	free ranging rhesus monkeys age and sex differences in individual activity patterns	Free rhesus monkeys differ according to age and sex in individual activity profiles.
1	some characteristics of persons hospitalized in saskatchewan because of heart disease involving the coronary arteries	Certain characteristics of persons hospitalized in Saskatchewan due to coronary heart disease; coronary artery disease.
1	the geographic pathology of coronary atherosclerosis	The geographic pathology of coronary atherosclerosis.
1	relationship of donor age to in vitro production of foot and mouth disease virus by mouse kidney cells	Ratio of donor age to in vitro production of the FMD virus by mouse renal cells.
1	estimation of the low density beta lipoproteins of serum in health and disease using large molecular weight dextran sulphate	Estimation of low-density beta lipoproteins in healthy and diseased serum; aid from the high molecular weight dextran sulfate.
1	visually evoked potentials amplitude changes with age	Changes in visually evoked potentials were observed with increasing age.
1	lentigo maligna and malignant melanoma	L lentigo maligna and malignant melanoma.
1	electroretinogram in newborn human infants	Electroetinogram in new human born @-@.
1	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 1 effect of the age of b truncatus on the development of s haematobium	The host relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in Iran 1 influences l' age of b truncatus on development of l' hematobium s.
1	rash associated with coxsackie a9 infection	Skin rash associated with Coxsackie A9 infection.
1	clinical management of acute myocardial infarction	Clinical management of acute myocardial infarction.
1	ontogeny of the immune response ii correlations between the development of the afferent and efferent limbs	L' ontogeny of the immune response ii correlations between the development of afferent and efferent limbs ii.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver interrelations of propionate and glutamate in aged mitochondria	Propionate metabolism by sheep liver inter-relations of propionate and glutamate in aged mitochondria.
1	incidence and origin of non systemic microdeposits of amyloid	The incidence and origin of micro-@ non-systemic deposits of amyloid.
1	possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism as reflected in the frequency of adrenal cortical adenomas	The frequency of adrenal cortical adenomas reflects the possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism.
1	age personality and somatosensory cerebral evoked responses	The age and somatosensory brain personality caused responses.
1	the relationship of diabetes mellitus and body weight to osteoporosis in elderly females	The relationship between diabetes mellitus and body weight and osteoporosis in elderly women.
1	decreased susceptibility to the mammary tumour agent in mice with advancing age	Decreased susceptibility to the mammary tumorigenic agent in mice as they age.
1	surgical timing in biliary tract disease	The surgical chronology of biliary tract diseases.
1	studies of male survivors of myocardial infarction ix mortality experience and insurability	Studies with physicians; survivors of myocardial infarction x mortality and insurable experience.
1	perforated peptic ulcer	It's called a perforated peptic ulcer.
1	epidemiology of head injuries in children a pilot study	Epidemiology of head injuries in children, pilot study.
1	activity of aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence and to the action of 6 furfurylaminopurine	Ribonucleic synthetase activity of d' aminoacyl action of 6 furfurylaminopurine in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence and l&apos.
1	development of immune tolerance in the chick embryo to borrelia hispanica	Development of immune tolerance in the chicken borrelia hispanica embryo.
1	gonadotrophin releasing activity of the median eminence at different ages	L' gonadotropin-releasing activity of l' median eminence at different ages.
1	oxygen consumption during pouch development of the macropod marsupial setonix brachyurus	Consumption of oxygen during the development of the macropod marsupial setonix brachyurus.
1	dealkylation and loss of capacity for reactivation of cholinesterase inhibited by sarin	Dealkylation and loss of ability to reactivate cholinesterase inhibited by sarin.
1	fat metabolism in higher plants xxxiv development of fatty acid synthetase as a function of protein synthesis in aging potato tuber slices	Fat metabolism in higher plants xxxiv development of fatty acid synthetase as a function of protein synthesis in aging tuber slices.
1	noncollagenous nature of the proteins of shark enamel	Non-collagenic nature of the proteins of l' enamel of shark.
1	effect of hypophysectomy and replacement therapy on fatty acid metabolism in the rat testis	The effect of hypophysectomy and replacement therapy on fatty acid metabolism in rat testis.
1	changes in hepatic lipigenesis during development of the rat	Changes in hepatic lipigenesis during development of the rat.
1	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate enzymes in the mosquito during growth and aging	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate enzymes in the mosquito during growth and aging.
1	serum triglyceride method of estimation and levels in normal humans	Methods used; Estimation of serum triglycerides and levels in normal humans.
1	modern concepts in the management of emphysema in the aged and infirm	Concepts of modern management of apos; emphysema in the elderly and infirm.
1	patterns of water ash and organic matter changes in senescence	Models of changes in water and organic matter during senescence.
1	high level health for the elderly	High-level health for the elderly.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver pathway of propionate metabolism in aged homogenate and mitochondria	Hepatic metabolism of propionate in sheep Propionate metabolism in the aged homogenate and in mitochondria.
1	the effect of platelet age on platelet adherence to collagen	Lapses; effect of apos; platelet age on apos; platelet adhesion to collagen.
1	the phospholipid composition of embryonic chick liver microsomes	The phospholipid composition of chick embryonic chick liver microsomes.
1	phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase in developing rat liver	Phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase in developing rat liver.
1	development of uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity in cultures of chick embryo liver	The development of lapos, uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity in chicken embryo cultures.
1	lipid composition of the vascular system during infancy childhood and young adulthood	The lipid composition of the vascular system during childhood and early adulthood.
1	the release of a bradykinin like pulmonary vasodilator substance in foetal and new born lambs	The release of a bradykinin as a pulmonary vasodilator substance in fetal lambs and new @-@born.
1	changes in the fatty acid composition of cerebrosides and sulfatides of human nervous tissue with age	Changes in the fatty acid composition of cerebrosids and sulfatides of human nervous tissue with age.
1	oxygen poisoning in drosophila	Drosophila poisoning; oxygen poisoning in Drosophila.
1	mice fighting by neonatally androgenized females	And mice fighting with androgenized females in vitro.
1	shift with age in steady state concentrations of androstenedione and testosterone in incubations of guinea pig testis	In incubation of guinea-pig testes, concentrations of androstenedione and testosterone change with age at apos; state of equilibrium.
1	hypnotic age regression and magnitudes of the ponzo and poggendorff illusions	Hypnotic regression of age and age; extent of ponzo and poggendorff illusions.
1	diurnal variation of oral glucose tolerance a possible pointer to the evolution of diabetes mellitus	Diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance may be an index of diabetes mellitus development.
1	structure and significance of metaplastic nodules in the rectal mucosa	Structure and importance of metaplastic nodules in the rectal mucosa.
1	osteoporosis of lumbar vertebrae and calcification of abdominal aorta in women living in durban	Osteoporosis of the lumbar vertebrae and calcification of the abdominal aorta in women living in durban.
1	ontogeny of soluble and mitochondrial tyrosine aminotransferases	L' ontogeny of soluble and mitochondrial tyrosine aminotransferases.
1	release of free fatty acids and loss of hill activity by aging spinach chloroplasts	Release of acid; free fatty acids and loss of acid; hill activity by chloroplasts; aging spinach.
1	effect of oestradiol 3 benzoate on the concentrations of retinal and lipids in cod plasma	Effect of benzoate d'apos; estradiol 3 on cod plasma concentrations of retinal and lipid.
1	the lipid composition of rat brain myelin and subcellular fractions during development	Lipid composition of rat brain myelin and subcellular fractions during development.
1	the localization of proteolytic activity in rat liver mitochondria and its relation to mitochondrial swelling and aging	Localization of l' proteolytic activity in rat liver mitochondria and its relation to mitochondrial swelling and aging.
1	aging and cancerogenesis iv interrelationships among age immune response and tumor incidence in several strains of mice	Cancer and aging iv interrelationships between age- and age-specific immune responses; tumour incidence in several strains of mice.
1	neoplasms occurring in aged fischer rats with special reference to testicular uterine and thyroid tumors	Neoplasms occurring in older Fischer rats, particularly testicular and thyroid tumours, but not in older Fischer rats.
1	effect of ovariectomy at different ages on development of mammary tumors in c3h x r3 f1 mice	Ovariectomy at different ages on the development of breast tumours in c3h x r3 f1 mice.
1	studies on the chromatin of barley leaves during senescence	Studies on the chromatin of the leaves; barley during senescence.
1	the cryptic nature of hepatic microsomal sulphite oxidase	The cryptic nature of hepatic microsomal sulfite oxidase oxidase.
1	effect of second leaf removal or kinetin treatment on the nucleic acid metabolism of senescing first seedling leaf of barley	Effect of apos; second leaf removal or kinetin treatment on nucleic acid metabolism of the first senescent seedling leaf; barley.
1	lipofuscin aging pigment granules of the newborn human liver	The aging lipofuscin pigment granules of human liver new-born.
1	a maturity time representation for cell populations	A representation of the maturity date of cell populations.
1	heterogeneity of rough surfaced liver microsomal membranes of adult phenobarbital treated and newborn rats	Rough hepatic microsomal membrane heterogeneity of phenobarbital-treated adult rats and newborn rats @-@.
1	properties of heparan sulphate and chondroitin sulphate from young and old human aortae	Heparan sulphate and chondroitin sulphate properties of young and old human aorta.
1	bone matrix turnover and balance in vitro ii the effects of aging	Rotation of the bone matrix and balance in vitro ii the effects of aging.
1	calcium transport by skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum in the hypothyroid rat	Calcium transport by skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum in the hypothyroid rat.
1	gastric antigens in health and disease behaviour in early development senescence metaplasia and cancer	Gastric antigen in health and disease behaviour in early development of senescence metaplasia and cancer.
1	mammary cancer induction by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene relation to age	Induction of breast cancer by 712 dimethylbenz a relation anthracene with l' age.
1	aging of alpha crystallins during development of the lens	Ageing of alpha crystals during development of the lens.
1	the effect of age on protein synthesis in mouse liver	L' effect of age on protein synthesis in mouse liver.
1	clinical trial of emepronium bromide in nocturnal frequency of old age	A clinical trial of the bromide d'apos; omeponium at the nocturnal frequency of aging.
1	changes in certain kinetic properties of hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and ethylmorphine demethylase associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats	Changes in certain kinetic properties of hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and ethylmorphine demethylase associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats.
1	phospholipases in arterial tissue iv the role of phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase in the regulation of phospholipid composition in the normal human aorta with age	Phospholipases in arterial tissue iv the role of phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase in the regulation of phospholipid composition in etapos; normal human aorta with age.
1	alteration in microsomal protein synthesis during early development of mouse brain	L' alteration of microsomal protein synthesis during early mouse brain development.
1	inhibition of humab brain pyruvate kinase and hexokinase by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate possible relevance to phenylketonuric brain damage	L' inhibition of pyruvate kinase and apos; apos brain hexokinase; humab by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate could be related to phenylketonuric brain lesions.
1	inhibition of hydroid aging in campanularia flexuosa	L' inhibition of hydroid aging in campanularia flexuosa.
1	ontogeny of adrenergic arousal and cholinergic inhibitory mechanisms in the rat	The ontogeny of the adrenergic and cholinergic inhibitory mechanisms in rats.
1	ozone and vitamin e	Ozone and vitamin e.
1	soluble sulfatase in growing bone of rats	Soluble sulfatase in rat liver; growing bone.
1	the ribosomes of pear fruit their synthesis during the climacteric and the age related compensatory response to ionizing radiation	The pear ribosomes are synthesized during the climacterial and compensatory reaction related to l' ionizing radiation age.
1	glycolytic control of respiration during aging of carrot root tissue	Control of glycolytic respiration during aging of carrot root tissue.
1	energy linked reactions in photosynthetic bacteria v relation of the light induced proton uptake to photophosphorylation in r rubrum chromatophores	The reactions related to l' energy in photosynthetic bacteria v relation of l' absorption of proton induced by light to photophosphorylation in rubrum chromatophores.
1	the prevalence of carbon 13 in respiratory carbon dioxide as an indicator of the types of endogenous substrate the change from lipid to carbohydrate during the respiratory rise in potato slices	The prevalence of carbon-13 in respiratory carbon dioxide as an indicator of endogenous substrate types lipid to carbohydrate transition during the interval; respiratory increase in slices of potatoes.
1	hyperphenylalaninemia disaggregation of brain polyribosomes in young rats	Hyperphenylalaninemia désaggregation of brain polyribosomes in young rats.
1	hormonal effects on ontogeny of swimming ability in the rat assessment of central nervous system development	Hormonal effects on appetite; ontogeny of swimming ability in appetite; assessment of central nervous system development in rats.
1	cataracts produced in rats by yogurt	Cataracts produced in rats by yogurt.
1	decrease in ventilatory capacity between ages of 50 and 54 in representative sample of swedish men	Decreased ventilation capacity between the ages of 50 and 54 in a representative sample of Swedish males.
1	the influence of age on the xylose absorption test	The influence of age on the prognosis test; xylose absorption.
1	improvement of learning in the aged by modification of autonomic nervous system activity	Improvement of skills; learning in the elderly by modifying the autonomic nervous system.
1	sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells to ultraviolet light	The sensitivity of synchronized Chinese hamster cells to ultraviolet light.
1	in vitro protein synthesis and aging in rhizoctania solani	In vitro protein synthesis and aging in rhizoctania solani.
1	association of inorganic pyrophosphatase activity with normal calcification of rat costal cartilage in vivo	L' association of apos; inorganic pyrophosphatase activity with normal calcification of rat costal cartilage in vivo.
1	developmental variation in the isoenzymes of human liver and gastric alchhol dehydrogenase	Variation in the development of the isoenzymes of human liver and of gastric alchhol dehydrogenase.
1	repression of interferon action induced dedifferentiation of embryonic cells	Repression of apos; action of interferon induces dedifferentiation of embryonic cells.
1	eye lens color formation and function	Coloration and function of eye lenses.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy i the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic prostate of man	Dihydrotestosterone in the apos; prostatic hypertrophy i the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic prostate of the apos; man.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy ii the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic canine prostate and the effect of dihydrotestosterone on prostate growth in the dog	Dihydrotestosterone in apos; prostate hypertrophy ii, the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic canine prostate and l' effect of dihydrotestosterone on prostate growth in the dog.
1	changes in the concentration of high affinity oestradiol receptor in rat uterine supernatant preparations during the oestrous ycle pseudopregnancy pregnancy maturation and after ovariectomy	Changes in receptor concentration of high affinity estradiol in rat uterine supernatant preparations during pregnancy maturation of pseudo @-@estrous pregnancy and after ovariectomy.
1	age associated changes in the dna of mouse tissue	Changes associated with apo; age in apo; mouse tissue DNA.
1	neuronal perikarya and astroglia of rat brain chemical composition during myelination	Pericarya and neuronal astroglies of rat brain chemical composition during myelination.
1	effects of long term administration of estrogen on the occurrence of mammary cancer in women	Effects of apo; long-term administration of estrogen on the occurrence of breast cancer in women.
1	control of ribonuclease and acid phosphatase by auxin and abscisic acid during senescence of rhoeo leaf sections	Control of ribonuclease and acid phosphatase by auxin and apos; abscisic acid during senescence of rhoeo leaf sections.
1	composition of cellular membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig 3 enzymatic activities	Composition of cell membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig enzyme 3 activities.
1	further studies on the effect of ageing on beta adrenoceptor activity of rat aorta	Other studies on the effects of aging on ecos; beta activity-adrenoceptors; rat aorta were performed.
1	residues of total mercury and methylmercuric salts in lake trout as a function of age	Residues of total mercury and methylmercuric salts in lake trout as a function of age.
1	intelligence and blood pressure in the aged	Intelligence and blood pressure in the elderly.
1	heart rate and haemodynamics after autonomic blockade in infants and children	Heart rate and hemodynamics following autonomic blockade in infants and children.
1	regression of valvular pulmonary stenosis	Regression of valvular pulmonary stenosis.
1	cytomorphometry of developing rat liver and its application to enzymic differentiation	The cytomorphometry of developing rat liver and its application to differentiation.
1	degenerative changes in the mitochondria of flight muscle from aging blowflies	Degenerative changes in the flight muscle mitochondria of aging flies.
1	chemical change and energy output during muscular contraction	Chemical change and production of drugs; energy during contraction.
1	age changes in cross striated muscle of the rat	Changes in age in crossed striated muscle of rat.
1	selective loss of adipose cell responsiveness to glucagon with growth in the rat	Selective loss of fat cell responsiveness to glucagon with growth in the rat.
1	three forms of cytochrome b 559 and their relation to the photosynthetic activity of chloroplasts	Three forms of cytochrome b 559 and their relation to l' photosynthetic activity of chloroplasts.
1	the toxicity of organophosphorus compounds to mammals	The toxicity of organophosphorus compounds to terrestrial mammals.
1	granular cell myoblastoma an electron microscopic and cytochemical study illustrating the genesis of granules and aging of myoblastoma cells	Granular cell myoblastoma: a cytochemical and electron microscopic study of the genesis of granules and aging of myoblastoma cells.
1	physiological fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig chemical and ultrastructural characterization	Chemical and ultrastructural characterization of fatty liver and liver; guinea pig fetal hyperlipidemia.
1	hmg coa reductase of intestinal mucosa and liver of the rat	Hmg coa reductase of the intestinal mucosa and liver of the rat.
1	decreased rna polymerase activity in mammalian zinc deficiency	Apos reduction; rna polymerase activity in mammalian zinc deficiency.
1	the dynamics of life aging	The dynamics of life ageing.
1	a method for estimating the number of motor units in thenar muscles and the changes in motor unit count with ageing	This method is used to estimate the number of motor units in the thenarian muscles and the changes in the number of motor units with aging.
1	physiological changes in ageing muscles	Well, physiological changes in aging muscles.
1	some properties of the uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity synthesizing thio beta d glucuronides	Some properties of the uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase synthesizing thio beta glucuronides.
1	uptake of orotate and thymidine by normal and regenerating rat livers	Capture of orotate and thymidine by normal and regenerating rat livers.
1	increased liver l serine pyruvate aminotransferase activity under gluconeogenic conditions	Increased liver l' hepatic serine pyruvate aminotransferase activity under gluconeogenic conditions.
1	age changes in the neuronal microenvironment	Changes in age in the neural microenvironment.
1	regular decline in physical working capacity with age	Regular decrease in physical working capacity with age.
1	reversed development and cellular aging in an insect	Reversing cellular development and aging in an insect.
1	inheritance of plasma cholesterol levels in mice	Legacy of plasma cholesterol levels in mice.
1	interrelationship of glutathione cystine transhydrogenase and glutathione reductase in developing rat intestine	L' interrelation of glutathione cystine transhydrogenase and glutathione reductase in developing rat intestine.
1	acetoacetate and brain lipogenesis developmental pattern of acetoacetyl coenzyme a synthetase in the soluble fraction of rat brain	Acetoacetate, brain lipogenesis, apos development profile; acetoacetyl coenzyme a synthetase in the soluble fraction of rat brain.
1	contrasting patterns of memory span decrement in ageing and aphasia	Comparison between the loss of memory during aging and aphasia.
1	studies of nuclei separated by zonal centrifugation from liver of rats treated with thioacetamide	Studies of nuclei separated by zonal centrifugation of the liver of rats treated with thioacetamide.
1	the crisis of middle age	The crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the crisis of age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age of the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age of the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age; the age of the age; the age; the age
1	intestinal transport of antibodies in the newborn rat	Intestinal transport of antibodies in the rat new-born.
1	role of the pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline of minimal o2 consumption with age	The role of the pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline of minimal oxygen consumption with age.
1	age associated changes in fecal excretion patterns of strain 93 chick embryo lethal orphan virus in chicks	Apos-associated changes; age profiles; fecal excretion of lethal orphan chick embryo virus of strain 93 in chicks.
1	presbyopia and the changes with age in the human crystalline lens	Presbyopia and changes with age in the human crystalline lens.
1	changes in the uptake of tritiated estradiol in the hypothalamus and adenohypophysis of old female rats	Changes in the uptake of tritiated estradiol in the apos; hypothalamus and apos; adenohypophysis of aged female rats.
1	inactive enzyme molecules in aging mice liver aldolase	Inactive enzyme molecules in aged mouse hepatic aldolase.
1	functional and morphologic maturation of the superficial nephrons relationship to total kidney function	Functional and morphological maturity of the relationship between the superficial nephrons and the total renal function.
1	the collagenous nature of amianthoid degeneration of human costal cartilage	Collagen nature of amianthoid degeneration of human costal cartilage.
1	a quantitative study of synapses on motor neuron dendritic growth cones in developing mouse spinal cord	A quantitative study of synapses on motor neuron dendritic growth cones in developing mouse spinal cord.
1	aging increases susceptibility of mouse skin to dmba carcinogenesis independent of general immune status	Aging increases susceptibility of mouse skin to dmba carcinogenesis, independent of general immune status.
1	altered heat lability of a fraction of glutathione reductase in aging human lens	L' alteration of the thermostability of, a fraction of glutathione reductase in aging human lentils.
1	a regional survey of myelin development some compositional and metabolic aspects	A regional study of compositional and metabolic aspects of myelin development.
1	alterations in biliary lipids of mice during dehydrocholic acid feeding	Alterations in the bile lipids of mice during apo; ingestion of apo; dehydrocholic acid.
1	the effect of age on adrenoceptor activity in tracheal smooth muscle	L' effect of apos; age on apos; adrenoceptor activity in tracheal smooth muscle.
1	tolerance to the hypothermic effects of 9 tetrahydrocannabinol as a function of age in the chicken	Tolerance to the hypothermic effects of 9 tetrahydrocannabinol as a function of age in the chicken.
1	release phenomena and iterative activities in psychiatric geriatric patients	Release effects and iterative activities in psychiatric geriatric patients.
1	aging in hiroshima and nagasaki atomic bomb survivors speculations based upon the age specific mortality of persons with malignant neoplasms	Ageing among survivors of the hiroshima and nagasaki atomic bombs is based on mortality according to age; people with malignant neoplasms.
1	role of phosphodiesterase in glucagon resistance of large adipocytes	Role of phosphodiesterase in glucagon resistance of large adipocytes.
1	microtubule protein during ciliogenesis in the mouse oviduct	The microtubule protein during ciliogenesis in the mouse oviduct.
1	presbyopia and the water content of the human crystalline lens	Presbytivity and moisture content of the human crystalline lens.
1	the activity of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in nuclei from brain fractionated by zonal centrifugation	L' deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid in brain nuclei fractionated by zonal centrifugation.
1	rna synthesis in the mouse oocyte	Mouse oocyte synthesis in the apos.
1	attenuation of the ventilatory and heart rate responses to hypoxia and hypercapnia with aging in normal men	Mitigation of respiratory and heart rate responses to hypoxia and apo; hypercapnia with apo; age in normal men.
1	myelinated fibres in the human paravertebral sympathetic chain quantitative studies on white rami communicantes	Myelinated fibers in human paravertebral sympathetic chain quantitative studies on white communicating twigs.
1	correlation between deoxyribonucleic acid excision repair and life span in a number of mammalian species	Correlation between deoxyribonucleic acid excision, deoxyribonucleic acid and life span in a number of mammalian species.
1	a serum component related to nonimmunoglobulin amyloid protein as a possible precursor of the fibrils	A serum component related to non-immune amyloid protein as a possible precursor of fibrils.
1	glucose metabolism in the newborn rat temporal studies in vivo	Glucose metabolism in the temporal studies of newborn rats-born in vivo.
1	inhibition of 3 phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase from pisum sativum by purine nucleotides	Inhibition of the 3 phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase of the pisum sativum by purine nucleotides.
1	studies on a murine form of spontaneous lower motor neuron degeneration the wobbler wa mouse	Studies on a murine form of spontaneous degeneration of lower motor neurons, the Wobbler Wa mouse.
1	changes with age in the valvular apparatus of the superficial and deep veins of the leg	The valves of the superficial and deep veins of the leg change with age.
1	amyloid in normal and pathological parathyroid glands	Amyloid in normal and pathological parathyroid glands.
1	the effect of age on the fibrinolytic enzyme system	L' effect of aging on the fibrinolytic enzyme system.
1	electron probe analysis of calcium transport by small intestine	Electron probe analysis of calcium transport by small intestine.
1	age related changes in the thermoregulatory capacity of tryptophan deficient rats	Changes in the age of the thermoregulatory capacity of the tryptophan-deficient rats.
1	pituitary inhibitor of thyroxine	An inhibitor of thyroxine in the pituitary.
1	runwheel activity patterns of mature young and senescent mice the effect of constant lighting conditions	"""Runwheel activity patterns of mature young and senescent mice,"" Effect of constant light conditions."
1	composition of liver histones in aging rat and mouse	The composition of liver histones in aging rats and mice.
1	accumulation of lipofuscin age pigment in aging skeletal connective tissues as revealed by electron microscopy	L' accumulation of lipofuscin pigments; age of lipofuscin in aging skeletal connective tissue was revealed by electron microscopy.
1	aging and the passage of l tyrosine l dopa and inulin into mouse brain slices in vitro	Aging and passage of tyrosine l dopa and inosine into mouse brain slices in vitro.
1	fluid and crystallized intelligence in young adulthood and old age	Fluid and crystallized intelligence in early adulthood and old age.
1	an autopsy study of human axillary lymph node histology	A study of human axillary lymph node (axillary lymph node) necrosis.
1	breast cancer in women as a paradigm for ageing as a hidden syncarcinogenic factor	Breast cancer in women as a paradigm of aging as a hidden syncarcinogenic factor.
1	fate of linoleic arachidonic and docosa 7 10 13 16 tetraenoic acids in rat testicles	Destination of linoleic arachidonic and docosa 7 10,1316 tetraenoic acids in rat testis.
1	dependence of rates of lipolysis esterification and free fatty acid release in isolated fat cells on age cell size and nutritional state	The rates of lipolysis esterification and free fatty acid release in isolated fat cells are dependent on cell size, age and nutritional status.
1	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells ii cholesterol accumulation and distribution in adipose tissue components	Lipid compartmentalization studies in fat cells ii cholesterol accumulation and distribution in the components of adipose tissue.
1	glycosaminoglycans of brain during development	Glycosaminoglycans of the brain during development.
1	a developmental study of the relationship between the protein components of rat cns myelin	A study of the development of the relationship between the protein components of rat cortical myelin.
1	age dependent utilization of phenylalanine for the synthesis of neuronal and glial proteins	Use of phenylalanine as a function of age for the synthesis of both glial and neuronal proteins.
1	the occurrence of two types of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity in the main classes of nuclei obtained from the brains of infant and adult rats	The presence of two types of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity in the major classes of nuclei obtained from the brain of newborn and adult rats.
1	sequential patterns of circulating lh and fsh in female sheep during the early postnatal period effect of gonadectomy	Sequence patterns of circulating lh and fsh in female ewes during the early postnatal gonadectomy period.
1	ultrastructural changes in human prepubertal prostatic epithelium grown in vitro	In vitro cultured ultrastructural changes in the human prepubertal epithelium.
1	effects of nicotine given into the brain of fowls	The effects of nicotine given in the poultry brain.
1	effects of cholinomimetic agents given into the brain of fowls	The effects of cholinomimetic agents in the brain of poultry.
1	the effect of prostaglandin e2 on the arterial blood pressure of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The effect of prostaglandin e2 on the blood pressure of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
1	age related changes in isocitrate lyase from the free living nematode turbatrix aceti	Changes in age of free-living nematode turbatrix aceti isocitrate lyase.
1	aging isometric strength and endurance and cardiovascular responses to static effort	Isometric strength and weight; aging endurance and cardiovascular responses to static effort.
1	evolution of sleep spindles in childhood	Evolution of sleep spindles in childhood.
1	plasma lipid values and lipoprotein patterns during adolescence in boys	Plasma lipid values and lipoprotein profiles during adolescence in males.
1	skeletal muscle lipids ii changes in phospholipid composition in man from fetal to middle age	Skeletal muscle lipids ii modify phospholipid composition in men, from fetus to age; mean age.
1	skeletal muscle lipids 3 changes in fatty acid composition of individual phosphoglycerides in man from fetal to middle age	Skeletal muscle lipids 3 modify the fatty acid composition of individual phosphoglycerides in the fetus-to-foetus-to-foetus, middle-age male.
1	synthesis and turnover of cerebroside sulfate of myelin in adult and developing rat brain	Synthesis and renewal of the cerebroside sulfate of myelin in adult and developing rat brain.
1	age dependent changes on the state of aggregation of cartilage matrix	Changes as a function of age; age; condition; aggregation of cartilage matrix.
1	the effect of age upon the coagulation system	L' effect of age on the clotting system.
1	plasma testosterone and dihydrotestosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and following orchidectomy and experimental bilateral cryptorchidism	Plasma testosterone and dihydrotestosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and following orchidectomy and bilateral cryptorchidism.
1	human muscle fiber fine structure morphometric data on controls	Fine structure morphometric data of human muscle fibers in controls.
1	renal glutaminase in postnatal and adult rats	Renal glutaminase in postnatal and adult rats.
1	surgical sterilization by vasectomy and its effects on the structure and function of the testis in man	Surgical sterilization by vasectomy and its effects on the structure and function of the testis in men.
1	effect of development and aging on the response of canine lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	The effect of development and aging on the response of canine lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
1	identity of maleate stimulated glutaminase with gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in rat kidney	L' identity of maleate stimulated glutaminase with gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in rat kidney.
1	the shape of the dental arch	The shape of the dental arch.
1	comparison of physiological responses of women and men to isometric exercise	Comparison of physiological responses of women and men to isometric exercise.
1	aerobic power of females ages 10 to 68	The aerobic power of women aged 10 to 68.
1	a fine structural study of degenerative changes in the dorsal column nuclei of aging mice lack of protection by vitamin e	A fine structural study of degenerative changes in the dorsal column nuclei of aging mice lacked vitamin e protection.
1	significance of brain reactive antibodies in serum of aged mice	L' importance of brain reactive antibodies in aged mouse serum.
1	changes with age in protein bound iodine pbi and body temperature in the mouse	Changes with age; age of protein binding; protein iodine and body temperature in the mouse.
1	reaction and movement time as a function of age and physical activity level	Reaction time and motion are a function of age and physical activity.
1	similarities and differences between psychological deficit in aging and brain damage	Similarities and differences between psychological aging and brain damage.
1	schwann cell internuclear distances in developing rat unmyelinated nerve fibers	Schwann cell internuclear distances in developing rats nonmyelinated nerve fiber.
1	the effects of age and liver disease on the disposition and elimination of diazepam in adult man	Effect of age and liver disease on disposition and outcome; elimination of diazepam in adults.
1	the effect of b cell immunosuppression on age related resistance of chickens to marek s disease	Marek disease resistance; effect of apo; b cell immunosuppression on chicken Marek disease resistance with age.
1	autoimmune human sperm antibodies and age in males	Auto-immune and l&apos human sperm antibody; age in males.
1	influence of age of ewe and photoperiod on the intervals between parturition and first oestrus in lactating and non lactating ewes at different nutritional levels	L' influence of age; age of ewe and photoperiod on the intervals between parturition and first oestrus in both lactating and non-nursing ewes at different nutritional levels.
1	on the possibility that dna repair is related to age in non dividing cells	On the possibility that DNA repair is related to age in non-divisional cells.
1	influence of age on the formation of 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone by incubated rat testes	L' influence of l' age on the formation of 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone by incubated rat testes.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat after unilateral nephrectomy	Effect of apo; age on renal hyperplasia in the rat after unilateral nephrectomy.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat during cold acclimation	Effect of apo; age on apo; renal hyperplasia in rat during apo; cold acclimation.
1	age changes in the dorsal and ventral lumbar nerve roots of dogs	Age in the dorsal and ventral roots of the lumbar nerves of dogs.
1	cholinesterase che response and related mortality among birds fed che inhibitors	Cholinesterase response and related mortality among birds fed inhibitors.
1	effect of age and long term diet on exocrine pancreas of the rat	The effect of age and long-term diet on the exocrine pancreas of the rat.
1	normal ranges of hip motion in infants six weeks three months and six months of age	Normal range of hip movement in infants six weeks, three months and six months.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 14 c leucine into myofibrillar and sarcoplasmic proteins of red and white muscles of chicks	Apos-related changes; age in apos; leucine incorporation 14 c into myofibrillar and sarcoplasmic proteins of red and white muscle of chicks.
1	abo blood groups age and work in ischaemic heart disease	The abo blood groups age and work in ischemic heart disease.
1	a possible age related decrement in the conduction velocity of aplysia neuron r2	A possible age-related decrease in the conduction velocity of neurons r2 in apothecia may be related to age.
1	lack of increase in dna crosslinking in drosophila melanogaster with age	Lapos; lack of cross-linking of apos; DNA in melanogaster Drosophila increases with age.
1	the effect of age on mitochondrial enzymes and respiration	Effect of age on mitochondrial enzymes and respiration.
1	attitudes toward age an exploration in school age children	Attitudes toward age; exploration in children; school age.
1	circadian oscillations in rodents a systematic increase of their frequency with age	The circadian oscillations in rodents increase systematically with increasing age.
1	variation with age and disease of an amyloid a protein related serum component	Variation with age; age and disease of onset; a protein-bound serum component amyloid.
1	age related activity changes in arginine phosphokinase in the house fly musca domestic l	Changes in apos; activity of apos; arginine phosphokinase in relation to apos; age in stink houseflies.
1	influence of age on size and number of fat cells in the epididymal depot	Influence of abs; age on size and number of fat cells in the epididymal deposit.
1	effects of age and genotype on acquisition of an active avoidance response in mice	Effect of age and genotype on disease; acquisition of diabetes; active response; avoidance in mice.
1	effect of age on liver function	Lactos; effect of age on liver function.
1	being single in old age	You know, being single at an advanced age.
1	age related changes in a spontaneously reassociating fraction of mouse dna	Age in a spontaneously reassociating fraction of the mouse DNA.
1	age dependent micronuclear deterioration in tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1	Deterioration of tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1 as a function of age.
1	studies on the synthesis and degradation of dna in developing and old chick cerebellum	Studies on the synthesis and degradation of DNA in the cerebellum of old and developing chicks.
1	age related peculiarities of acetylation of rat liver nuclear histones	Age of onset; acetylation of rat liver nuclear histones.
1	an estimate of the number of cells arising by division in mouse cerebral hemispheres from age one to 12 months an autoradiographic study of dna synthesis	Estimation of the number of cells from division in the cerebral hemispheres of mouse d'apos; 1 to 12 months autoradiographic study of DNA synthesis.
1	age and sex differences in behaviors mediated by the ventromedial hypothalamus	Differences in age and sex of the ventricle-mediated behaviours; ventromedial hypothalamus.
1	age differences in aversively motivated visual discrimination learning and retention in male sprague dawley rats	The differences in age; learning and retention of visual discrimination motivated by stigma; aversion in male sprague rats-dawley.
1	perceptions of onsets of young adulthood middle age and old age	The changing perceptions of young adults, the average age and the average age.
1	age involution in the normal human adult thymus	L' involution of l' age in the normal human thymus.
1	an electron microscopic investigation of age dependent changes in the flight muscle of musca domestica l	An electron microscopic study of age-related changes in the flight muscle of the musca domestica l.
1	light and electron microscopic studies on human temporal arteries with special reference to alterations related to senescence atherosclerosis and giant cell arteritis	Light and electron microscopic studies of the human temporal arteries, in particular alterations related to l' senescent atherosclerosis and l' giant cell arteritis.
1	engagement with an old theory	Commitment to an old theory.
1	qualitative vocabulary test responses and age	Qualitative vocabulary tests responses and age.
1	studies on immune competence in the rat changes with age sex and strain	The study of the immune competence of the rat changes with age, sex, and strain.
1	age differences in the speed of a spatial cognitive process	It is also important to note that there are differences in the speed of aging and in the spatial cognitive process.
1	macromolecular components of the vitelline membrane of hen s egg i membrane structure and its deterioration with age	Macromolecular components of the yolk membrane of hen egg and its deterioration with age.
1	age dependence of heat induced strand separation of dna in situ in postmitotic cells of rat brain as revealed by acridine orange microfluorimetry	The separation of DNA strands in situ in postmitotic cells of rat brain was age dependent as revealed by acridine orange dolipos microfluorimetry.
1	the influence of age on the distribution metabolism and excretion of methoxyflurane in fischer 344 rats a possible relationship to nephrotoxicity	L' influence of apo; age on distribution metabolism and apo; excretion of methoxyflurane in Fischer 344 rats may be nephrotoxic.
1	comparative studys on ages related changes in collagen structures of achilles and tail tendons in rats	Comparative studies of age-related changes in collagen structure of achilles and tail tendons in rats.
1	changes in proteins of the human lens in development and aging	Changes in the protein of the human lens in development and aging.
1	age changes in the human frontozygomatic suture from 20 to 95 years	Changes in age; age in the human frontozygomatic suture from 20 to 95 years.
1	age related incidence of sclerotic glomeruli in human kidneys	Incidence of sclerotial glomeruli in human kidneys with age.
1	the influence of age on cardiac refractory periods in man	Lapos; influence of age on cardiac refractory periods in men.
1	effects of age and fasting on gluconeogenesis from glycerol in dogs	The effects of age and fasting on gluconeogenesis from glycerol in dogs.
1	the effect of age on arterial alveolar nitrogen difference in normal adults	The effect of age on the difference in arterial alveolar nitrogen levels in normal adults.
1	information processing limits the effects of information load and age	Information processing limits the effects of loading and unloading; age of loading; information.
1	age related changes in free plasma testosterone dihydrotestosterone and oestradiol	Apos-related changes; free plasma testosterone dihydrotestosterone and lacid age; estradiol.
1	age related changes in the affinity of hemoglobin to oxygen in rabbits	L' affinity of apos; hemoglobin for apos; oxygen varies with apos; age in rabbits.
1	age related and seasonal variations in the atpase system of mitochondria of skeletal muscles in rabbit	The seasonal and age-related changes in the atpase system of skeletal muscle mitochondria in rabbits.
1	age peculiarities in the effect of m and n cholinolytics on the activity of the epileptogenic zone in the rabbit hippocampus	Characteristics of the disease; age; effect of cholinolytics m and n on the immune system; epileptogenic zone activity in the immune system; rabbit hippocampus.
1	sleep related penile tumescence as a function of age	Sleeping-related penile tumescence as a function of age.
1	age differences in learning immediate and one week delayed recall	Differences in age, immediate learning and one week delayed recall.
1	serum 5alpha dihydrotestosterone and testosterone changes with age in man	In men, serum 5alpha dihydrotestosterone and testosterone change with age.
1	human adipose tissue in culture vi effect of age on cell size and lipolysis	Human adipose tissue in culture has an effect of age on cell size and lipolysis.
1	age and changes in the thyroid gland of a he mice morphometric and histochemical studies	Age and changes in the thyroid gland of a morphometric and histochemical mouse.
1	immunologic cross reactivity between antisera to group a type 12 streptococcal cell membrane and human glomerular basement membrane the effect of age and carbohydrate content	Immunological cross-reactivity between antisera to group a type 12 streptococcal cell membrane and human glomerular basement membrane (HGLM), l&apos effect; age and carbohydrate content.
1	antipyrine metabolism in man influence of age alcohol caffeine and smoking	Antipyrine in men; influence of men; age of caffeine alcohol and smoking.
1	biochemical variations in the matrix of human tendons in relation to age and pathological conditions	Biochemical changes in the matrix of human tendons as a function of age and pathological conditions.
1	gerontological and geriatric problems in stomatology 1 effects of age related physical changes on prosthetic therapy	Gerontological and geriatric problems in stomatology 1 Effects of physical changes on prosthesis.
1	the effect of age on plasma levels of propranolol and practolol in man	Lapos; effect of age on plasma propranolol and practolol levels in males.
1	rat liver superoxide dismutase purification and age related modifications	Rat liver superoxide dismutase purification and age-related changes.
1	inulin clearance in the newborn infant relationship to gestational and postnatal age	Inulin clearance in the newborn infant relation to gestational and postnatal age.
1	cell types originating from kidney explants of young and old mice	Cells from kidney explants of young and old mice.
1	plasma testosterone levels in c57bl 6j male mice effects of age and disease	Plasma testosterone levels in male mice c57bl 6j Effects of age and disease on male mice.
1	the collagenous and non collagenous protein of the canine intervertebral disc and their variation with age spinal level and breed	Collagen and non-collagen protein of the canine intervertebral disc and its variation with age, spine level and race.
1	changes in drug metabolism with increasing age 1 warfarin binding and plasma proteins	Changes in drug metabolism with apo; increased warfarin binding; age 1 and plasma protein.
1	influence of age and starvation on po2 pco2 and haematocrit values in the rat	The influence of weight; age and fasting on po2 pco2 and hematocrit values in the rat.
1	effect of sex age and cultivation time on number of satellites and acrocentric associations in man	Age of sex and culture time on number of satellites and apo; acrocentric associations in men.
1	changes in the pituitary testicular system with age	Changes in the pituitary system of testes with age.
1	the lipids of human sciatic nerve by age group	Lipids of the human sciatic nerve by age group of individuals.
1	pituitary gonadal relations in infancy 2 patterns of serum gonadal steroid concentrations in man from birth to two years of age	Gonadal pituitary relations in infancy 2 patterns of gonadal serum steroid concentrations in l'apos; man from birth to age 2 years.
1	the influence of age and sex on the metabolism of testosterone	Lapos; influence of age and sex on the metabolism of testosterone.
1	median age at onset of asthma and allergic rhinitis in tecumseh michigan	Median age at onset of asthma and allergic rhinitis in tecumseh michigan.
1	human intelligence sex differences	The human intelligence sex differences sexual differences.
1	age related changes in hepatic fine structure a quantitative analysis	Changes related to liver weakness; age in hepatic fine structure.
1	the effect of age on creatinine clearance in men a cross sectional and longitudinal study	Effect of age on creatinine clearance in men, cross-sectional and longitudinal study.
1	age differences in central perceptual processing a dichoptic backward masking investigation	Age in central perceptual processing; a retrogressive dichoptic investigation masking a dichoptic investigation.
1	paired associate learning in young and old adults as related to stimulus concreteness and presentation method	Pair learning in young adults and older adults is related to stimulus concreteness and presentation method.
1	attitudinal predictors of devaluation of old age in a multigenerational sample	Attitudinal predictors of devaluation of old age in a multigenerational sample.
1	social class and association membership an analysis of age graded and non age graded voluntary participation	Analysis of voluntary participation by age and not by age; social class and age; membership in an association.
1	age related secretion of androstenedione testosterone and dihydrotestosterone by the human testis	Emission of androstenedione testosterone and dihydrotestosterone from human testes.
1	methodological problems in the determination of biological age	Methodological issues in the determination of biological age.
1	sexual behavior in higher age	You know, sexual behavior at an older age.
1	chronobiologic and inbred strain differences in blood hemoglobin of the mouse	Chronobiological and inbreeding differences in the blood hemoglobin of the mouse.
1	age dependent changes in juvenile hormone esterase and general carboxyesterase activity in the hemolymph of the colorado potato beetle leptinotarsa decemlineata	Changes with age; age of juvenile esterase and lacidosis; general carboxyesterase activity in the apos; hemolymph of the beetle leptinotarsa decemlineata.
1	transcutaneous measurements of age conditioned changes in the elasticity of the human common carotid artery	Transcutaneous measurements of age-dependent changes in the elasticity of the human common carotid artery were performed.
1	age related changes in the glycosidases of chick embryo eye tissues	Changes related to apo; age of ocular tissue glycosidase; chick embryo.
1	relation to osteoporosis of age and hormone induced changes in the metabolism of collagen and bone	The relationship with age and hormone osteoporosis induced changes in the metabolism of collagen and bone.
1	hair cell loss as a function of age in the normal cochlea of the guinea pig	Loss of hair cells as a function of age in the normal cochlea of the guinea pig; India.
1	changes in ethanol consumption by c3h and cf1 mice with age	Changes in ethanol consumption by c3h and cf1 mice with age.
1	age related changes in the intact and sympathetically denervated gerbil pineal gland	Changes in age; age in intact and sympathetically denervated gerbil pineal gland.
1	effect of neonatal thymectomy on experimental subacute sclerosing panencephalitis in adult hamsters	Effect of neonatal thymectomy on experimental subacute sclerosing panencephalitis in adult hamsters.
1	ontogeny of human cell mediated immunity age related variation of in vitro infantile lymphocyte transformation	Apos; ontogeny of apos; age of apos; human cell-mediated immunity is related to the variation of in vitro infant lymphocyte transformation.
1	age anxiety and self reported health	Self-reported anxiety; age and health status.
1	treatment of immature mice with gonadotrophins the influence of mouse age on the response of ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotrophins	Treatment of immature mice with gonadotrophins, the influence of the mouse age on the response of ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotropins.
1	age changes in rat vasomotor reflexes and sympathetic neuron ultrastructure following chemical sympathectomy	Changes in rat vasomotor reflexes and apo; ultrastructure of sympathetic neurons after chemical sympathectomy.
1	age simulation in perceptual and cognitive functioning age progression to 80 years in a college sample	Age in perceptual and cognitive functioning progression of the apos; age at 80 years in a college sample.
1	age differences in backward dichoptic masking	Differences in retrograde dichoptic masking age.
1	age differences in evoked potential correlates of a memory scanning process	The differences in age in the potential correlates evoked by a memory scan process.
1	age trends in human chiasma frequencies and recombination fractions i chiasma frequencies	Age trends in human chiasma frequency and chiasma recombination fractions i frequencies.
1	age related changes in cell surface antigens of preleukemic akr thymocytes	Age in cell surface antigens of preleukemic akr thymocytes.
1	age related chemical changes in human elastins from non atherosclerotic areas of thoracic aorta	Age in human elastins in non-atherosclerotic areas of the apo placentae; thoracic aorta.
1	age related changes in the lipid metabolism of fisher 344 rats	Changes in the lipid metabolism of Fisher rats.
1	lifespan age changes and tumour incidence in an ageing c57bl mouse colony	Lifetime changes and tumour incidence in an aging c57bl mouse colony.
1	partial loss of cytoplasmic incompatibility with age in males of culex fatigans	Partial loss of apos; cytoplasmic incompatibility with apos; age in males of culex fatigans.
1	correlation between age arteriosclerosis and elastinolytic activity of human aorta wall	Age of arteriosclerosis and apos; elastinolytic activity of the cell wall; human aorta.
1	age related changes in ouabain pharmacology ouabain exhibits a different volume of distribution in adult and young dogs	Changes in ouabain pharmacology with age Ouabain has a different volume of distribution in adult and young dogs.
1	effect of age and sex on lung colony forming efficiency of injected mouse tumour cells	Effect of age and sex on immune function; efficacy of injected mouse tumour cell lung colonies.
1	changes in developing behavior following prenatal administration of imipramine	Behavioural changes following prenatal administration of imipramine.
1	an x ray diffraction investigation of age related changes in the crystal structure of bone apatite	An X-ray study of changes in the crystal structure of the apos; bone apatite.
1	serum immunoreactive corticotrophin and response to metyrapone in old age in man	Serum immunoreactive corticotropin and response to metyrapone in old age in men.
1	maturational changes of amino acid concentration in cerebrospinal fluid of the rat	Changes in the maturation of amino acid concentration in rat cerebrospinal fluid.
1	absence of low molecular weight alpha crystallin in nuclear region of old human lenses	Lack of low molecular weight alpha crystals in nuclear region of old human lens.
1	sex ratio sex change and natural selection	Change in sex ratio and natural selection patterns.
1	breast parenchymal patterns and their changes with age	It's called breast parenchyma and its changes with age.
1	age dependence of the biosynthesis of intercellular matrix macromolecules of rabbit aorta in organ culture and cell culture	Biosynthesis of intercellular matrix macromolecules of rabbit aorta in organ culture and cell culture is age dependent.
1	age changes in the structure of adenohypophysical gonadotropocytes and hypothalamic arcuate nucleus neurocytes	Changes in apo; age in the structure of adenohypophysical gonadotropocytes and hypothalamic arcuate neurocytes.
1	age differences in the effects of palatability of diet on regulation of calorie intake and body weight of rats	Differences in age; effects of palatability of diet on diet regulation; caloric intake and body weight of rats.
1	vascular adenylate cyclase role of age and guanine nucleotide activation	The role of age and age; activation of guanine nucleotides in the apos; vascular adenylate cyclase.
1	the significance of age in the colposcopic evaluation of women with atypical apanicolaou smears	L' importance of apo; age in onset; colposcopic evaluation of women with atypical apanicolaou smears.
1	attack like schizophrenia with a progressive course and profound long term remissions in old age	Attack like schizophrenia with a gradual evolution and deep long-term remissions in old age.
1	the effect of age on the ultrastructure of the mid gut cells of the hymenopteran nasonia vitripennis walk hymenoptera pteromalidae	L' effect of the apos; age on the apos; ultrastructure of midgut cells of the apos; hymenopteran nasonia vitripennis walks pteromalid hymenoptera.
1	tachyarrhythmias in old age	Tachyarrhythmia in old people?
1	physiology of aging metabolic changes during the climacteric and menopausal periods	The physiology of aging metabolic changes during the climacterial and menopausal periods.
1	modification of the adrenal stress response by age and prior experience	Change in adrenal stress response with age and previous experience.
1	age differences in learning and memory on a digit symbol substitution task	Differences in age; learning and memory for a digital symbol substitution task.
1	age and tachistoscopic perception	Age and tachistoscopic perception.
1	age related increase of cuticle permeability in the nematode caenorhabditis briggsae	Apos-related increase; age of cuticle permeability in the nematode caenorhabditis briggsae.
1	the effect of age on the speed of sentence formation and incidental learning	The effect of age on the speed of the formation of pain and suffering; ancillary learning.
1	differences in the sequential integration of form as a function of age and interstimulus interval	Dos differences; sequential integration of form as a function of age and age; interstimulus interval.
1	speed and age multiple rates of age decline	The multiple rates of decline in speed and age are decreasing.
1	age associated structural alterations in senescent mouse brain dna	Structural changes associated with apo; age in apo; senescent mouse brain DNA.
1	age related changes in the proteolytic enzymes of mammalian lens	Changes in the proteolytic enzymes of mammalian lens as a function of age.
1	prolactin release in response to blockade of dopaminergic receptors and to trh injection in developing and adult rats role of estrogen in determining sex differences	The release of prolactin in response to blockade of dopaminergic receptors and to l' injection into adult and developing rats plays a role in determining sexual differences.
1	morphological changes in prolactin cells of male rats after testosterone administration	Morphological changes in prolactin cells of male rats following testosterone administration.
1	neonatal treatment with sex steroids relationship between the uterotropic response and the estrogen receptor in prepubertal rats	Neonatal treatment with sex steroids between the uterotropic response and the estrogen receptor in prepubertal rats.
1	effect of a periodic growth retarding diet on changes with age in the hypothalamo hypophyseo adrenal system	The effect of a periodic regimen delaying growth on the changes with the apos; age in the hypothalamo pituitary system @-@adrenal.
1	tail carriage in baboons papio cynocephalus relationship to dominance rank and age	Tail transport in papio cynocephalus is related to dominance rank and age.
1	age and transformation dynamics of rectal vains and their alteration during hemorrhoid development	Age and dynamics transformation of rectal defects and their alteration during hemorrhoid development.
1	age related changes in the flight muscle mitochondria from the blowfly sarcophaga bullata	Changes in apos; age of flight muscle mitochondria of the sarcophaga bullata fly.
1	the effect of practice on age differences in central perceptual processing	L' effect of practice on differences in age in central perceptual treatment.
1	methodologic differences and measurement of cup disc ratio an epidemiologic assessment	Methodological differences and measurement of the disc-cut ratio an epidemiological evaluation.
1	changes in the structure of the wall of the human thoracic duct in relation to atherosclerosis and age	Changes in the structure of the wall of the human thoracic canal in relation to apos; atherosclerosis and apos; age.
1	age related changes in the free amino acid pool of rat lens	Changes related to age; age in the free amino acid pool of the rat lens.
1	changes in the nuclear volume of rat hypothalamic neurons in old age	Changes in the nuclear volume of rat hypothalamic neurons in old age.
1	age related change in pituitary threshold for tsh release during thyroxine replacement therapy for cretinism	Changes related to l' hypophysial threshold age for tsh release during thyroxine replacement therapy for cretinism.
1	enhanced activity of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase during dietary restriction in the rat dependence on age and relation to cell size	Lapos; increased activity of the hormone-sensitive adenylate cyclase during dietary restriction in the rat is dependent on age and cell size.
1	effects of age strain and illumination intensity on activity and self selection of light dark schedules in mice	Effects of age and weight; intensity of weight; light on weight; activity and weight; auto-selection of programs; darkness in mice.
1	pore size measurements and some age related changes in human alveolar bone and rat femur	Pore size measurements and pore-related changes; age in human alveolar bone and rat femur.
1	phosphoglycerate kinase from young and old turbatrix aceti	Phosphoglycerate kinase from young and old aceti turbatrix aceti.
1	primary hyperlipoproteinemia and cardiovascular diseases in relation to age	Primary hyperlipoproteinemia and cardiovascular diseases as age increases.
1	age related changes of ballistocardiogram in healthy persons	Changes in ballistocardiogram related to age in healthy individuals.
1	changes in 80s ribosomes from drosophila melanogaster with age	Modification of ribosomes of the 80's of drosophila melanogaster with l' age.
1	on the age associated presence of immunoglobulin and complement in the renal glomeruli of mice	Age associated with immunoglobulin and complement in the renal glomeruli of mice.
1	the old man as woman detecting stereotypes of aged men with a femininity scale	Well, the old man as a woman detects stereotypes about older men on a femininity scale.
1	allograft rejection in larval and adult xenopus following early thymectomy	Rejection from larval and adult xenoproteins following early thymectomy.
1	chromosomes in old age a six year longitudinal study	The chromosomes in old age a six-year longitudinal study.
1	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin age related effects	Lymphocyte responses to effects related to apos; age of phytohemagglutinin.
1	age related variation in lymphocyte subpopulations	Change related to apo; age in lymphocyte sub@ populations.
1	changes depend on age in electromyogram studies about parameter of motor unit action potentials in normal subjects of different age author s transl	Changes depend on age; age in apo studies; potential parameter electromyograms; action of motor units in normal subjects of different ages.
1	age dependent changes of biosynthesis of proteins author s transl	Changes in the biosynthesis of proteins as a function of age.
1	age related decrement in hearing for speech sampling and longitudinal studies	Lapse-related hearing, age at onset, speech sampling and longitudinal studies.
1	a relationship between functional age and health status in female subjects	The relationship between functional age and functional status; women's health status.
1	cautiousness in adulthood as a function of age and instructions	Caution in adulthood is a function of age and the instructions.
1	age differences in humor comprehension and appreciation in old age	Differences in age; comprehension and understanding; appreciation of others; humour in old age.
1	variations in fluorescence characteristics of intact human crystalline lens segments as a function of age	Variations in the fluorescence characteristics of intact human lens segments as a function of age.
1	attitudes toward aging as a function of in service training and practitioner age	Attitudes toward aging as a function of on-going training; employment; practitioner age.
1	age related change in the neuronal microenvironment penetration of ruthenium red into extracellular space of brain in young adult and senescent rats	Apos-related change; age of penetration of ruthenium red into epos; extracellular space of brain into neural microenvironment in young adult and senescing rats.
1	free radical theory of aging effect of age sex and dietary precursors on rat brain docosahexanoic acid	Free radical theory of apo; effect of aging sex and food precursors on rat brain docosahexaenoic acid.
1	the influence of age and drugs on the thermoregulatory behaviour of rats	L' influence of age and drugs on thermoregulatory behaviour of rats.
1	age related changes in t cell function	Changes in cell function related to age.
1	the relation between physician and patient age in family practice	Relationship between physician and patient age in family practice.
1	cadmium in liver kidney and hair of humans fetal through old age	It is not possible to measure the effects of cadmium in the kidney and hair of the liver.
1	age related changes of accuracy and efficiency of protein synthesis machinery in rat	Changes in accuracy and protein synthesis efficiency of protein synthesis mechanism with age in rat.
1	age changes in the allosteric properties of brain acetylcholinesterase	Changes in age in allosteric properties of brain acetylcholinesterase.
1	the age dependent decrease in creatine kinase and aldolase activities in human striated muscle is not caused by an accumulation of faulty proteins	Decreases in creatine kinase and aldolase activity in human striated muscle as a function of age are not caused by accumulation of defective proteins.
1	epithelial tumor like changes precancerous conditions and skin neoplasms standardization study	Epithelial tumors such as precancerous changes and skin neoplasms skin neoplasm standardization study.
1	induced pku in rats effects of age and melatonin treatment	Pku induces the effects of age and melatonin treatment in rats.
1	age related changes in the hepatic endoplasmic reticulum a quantitative analysis	Changes related to apo; hepatic endoplasmic reticulum age, a quantitative analysis.
1	age dependent differences of distribution and clearance patterns in normal rihsa cisternograms	Differences in distribution and clearance according to age in normal rihsa tanks.
1	active and passive avoidance in rats as a function of age	Both active and passive avoidance in rats as a function of age.
1	biochemical changes in the central nervous system with age in the rat	Biochemical changes in the central nervous system with apos; age in rat.
1	the effect of criterion level on the acquisition and retention of a 1 way avoidance response in young and old rats	The effect of the level of criteria on the acquisition and retention of a one-way avoidance response in young and old rats.
1	influence of age on the plasma hormonal iodine response to thyrotropin injection in young calves	Influence of age on the plasma iodine hormonal response to apo; thyrotropin injection in young calves.
1	age difference of bone collagen in hydrolysis by streptomyces griseus protease	Difference in age of bone collagen in apos; streptomyces griseus protease hydrolysis.
1	histological and electrophysiological changes of the lower motor neurone with aging	Histological and electrophysiological changes of the lower motor neuron with aging.
1	age and changes in the activity of several energy metabolism enzymes in the rabbit aorta	L'apos; age and changes in the apos; activity of several enzymes of energy metabolism in the rabbit aorta.
1	a comparison of fat absorption in young and old subjects	Comparison of fat absorption in young and old subjects.
1	the influence of age onthe sensitivity of the cornea	The cornea's influence on the cornea; the age of the cornea; the influence of the cornea on the cornea; the age of the cornea; the sensitivity of the cornea to the cornea; the cornea.
1	physiological characteristics of a champion runner age 77	It's about the physiological characteristics of a 77-year-old running champion.
1	developmental analysis of human figure drawings in adolescence young adulthood and middle age	Developmental analysis of drawings of human figures in adolescence, early adulthood and middle age.
1	age dependent distribution of isoamylases in human parotid saliva	Distribution of isoamylases in human parotid saliva as a function of age.
1	effect of age of non skin tissues on susceptibility of skin grafts to 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene dmba carcinogenesis in balb c mice and effect of age of skin graft on susceptibility of surrounding recipient skin to dmba	Effect of dose; age of non-derived tissue on susceptibility of skin grafts to 712 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene dmba carcinogenesis in Berber mice and effect of dose; age of skin graft on susceptibility of surrounding skin to dmba.
1	glycemic response to 24 hour fast in normal children iii influence of age	The glycemic response to a 24-hour fast in normal children iii influences age.
1	age related changes in the effect of electroconvulsive shock ecs on the in vivo hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in rat brain	Changes in age; effect of electroconvulsive shock on appetite; in vivo hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in rat brain.
1	influence of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two steroid anesthetics in rats	The influence of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two steroidal anesthetics in rats.
1	alterations in fecal microflora enzymes related to diet age lactobacillus supplements and dimethylhydrazine	Changes in fecal microflora enzymes related to lactobacilli and dimethylhydrazine supplementation; dietary age.
1	influence of gonadal hormones and age on 1 2 dimethylhydrazine induced colon carcinogenesis	L' influence of gonadal hormones and apo; age on 12 dimethylhydrazine induced colon carcinogenesis.
1	age dependence of nuclear rna processing	The treatment of nuclear rna depends on age.
1	relation between smoking and age of natural menopause report from the boston collaborative drug surveillance program boston university medical center	Report on the relationship between smoking and age of natural menopause at Boston University Medical Center, Cooperative Drug Surveillance Program, Boston.
1	immunogenicity of cows milk in man influence of age and of disease on serum antibodies to five cows milk proteins	The immunogenicity of cow's milk to humans influences age and disease on serum antibodies to milk proteins from five cows.
1	hla antigens in different age groups	Antigen hla in different age groups.
1	gamma glutamyltranspeptidase activity in newborn rat kidney brush border	L' gamma glutamyltranspeptidase activity in brush border kidney again-rat born.
1	genetic and non genetic effects on plasma lh concentrations in lambs at 4 and 8 weeks of age	Genetic and non-genetic effects on plasma concentrations of lh in lambs at 4 and 8 weeks of age.
1	functional capability of 68 year old people in the town of jyv skyl	Functional capacity of 68-year-olds in the town of Jyv Skyl.
1	on the problem of so called ulcer in the old age author s transl	On the problem of what are called the ulcer in the translation of old age.
1	perception of exertion in the elderly effects of aging mode of exercise and physical training	The effects of aging, exercise and physical training on seniors' perception of readiness.
1	eye tracking in relation to age sex and illness	Eye monitoring in relation to age, sex and disease.
1	relationship between diazepam dose plasma level age and central nervous system depression	Relationship between dose of diazepam, plasma age and central nervous system depression.
1	interactive effects of age and brain disease on reaction time	The interactive effects of age and brain disease on reaction time.
1	cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity against avian rna myeloblastosis virus in age resistant hosts	Cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity to avian rna myeloblastosis virus in resistant hosts; age.
1	motion sickness susceptibility and related behavioral characteristics in men and women	Motion sickness sensitivity and related behavioural characteristics in men and women.
1	age and the perception of incomplete figures	L' age and the perception of incomplete figures.
1	growing up and growing old the politics of age exclusion	Growing up and getting older, the policy of exclusion of older people has become more and more pronounced.
1	age changes in alcian blue staining of glycosaminoglycans in sheep articular cartilage	Age changes in alcian blue colour of glycosaminoglycans in sheep articular cartilage.
1	gene expression of a region of chromosome 17 during murine spermatogenesis	Gene expression of a region of chromosome 17 during spermatogenesis in the mouse.
1	neutrophilic turnover rate in human age groups evaluated by serum lysozyme activity	Neutrophil turnover rates in dose groups; human age evaluated by serum lysozyme activity.
1	changes of dna ligase in developing rat brain	Modifications to ligase in apo; DNA in developing rat brain.
1	replication of age and physical activity effects on reaction and movement time	Reproduction of age and weight effects; physical activity on reaction and movement time.
1	age related changes in the motor nerve conduction velocity in dogs	Changes in age; age of motor nerve conduction velocity in dogs.
1	factors influencing sexual performance in male rhesus monkeys	Factors influencing sexual performance in male rhesus monkeys.
1	gout in the age author s transl	L' gout à l'apos; the author's translation age.
1	systolic periods in dependence of age	The time of systolic periods in the dependence of the apos; age depends on the age.
1	on molecular biology of aging 11th communication enzyme adaptation age author s transl	On the molecular biology of aging 11th adaptation of communication enzymes age s transl.
1	longitudinal force and stress of rat s esophagus age related changes	The longitudinal force and stress of rat esophagus vary with age.
1	interactive effects of age and cerebral disease on cognitive performances	The interactive effects of age and brain disease on cognitive performance.
1	age associated glycopeptide pigment in human costal cartilage	Glycopeptide pigment associated with age in human costal cartilage.
1	dependence of diverticulosis on age author s transl	Dependence of diverticulosis vis-to-vis de l' authors' age s s translations.
1	age changes of the human optic nerve head a neurohistologic study	Changes in apos; age of human optic nerve head a neurohistological study.
1	age dependent change in the ability of protein synthesis by rat liver microsomes significance of 2 associated factors	The apo-dependent change in the age of protein synthesis by rat liver microsomes signifies 2 associated factors.
1	age related changes in responsiveness of rat leydig cells to hcg	Changes in responsiveness of rat leydig cells to hcg as a function of age.
1	effect of age on thickness of adult patellar articular cartilage	Effects of age on age; thickness of adult patellar articular cartilage.
1	lupus erythematodes visceralis and age part 1 lupus erythematodes visceralis as model of an autoimmune process and its relationship to age with special reference to antinuclear factors in different age groups	Lupus erythematodes visceralis and lupus erythematodes visceralis from part 1 of l' age as d&apos models; auto-immune process and its relationship to l' age, with special reference to anti-nuclear factors in different groups of ages.
1	tbg dependency of age related variations of thyroxine and triiodothyronine	Tbg dependence of thyroxine and triiodothyronine changes related to apos; age.
1	effect of age on collagen fibril formation	Effect of age on collagen fibril formation.
1	collagen age and platelet aggregation	Collagen age and platelet aggregation.
1	age differences in personality structure revisited studies in validity stability and change	Age differences in personality structure have re-examined stability and change of validity studies.
1	comparison by autoradiography of macromolecular biosynthesis in young and old human diploid fibroblast cultures a brief note	Comparison of macromolecular biosynthesis in young and old human diploid fibroblast cultures by autoradiography, a brief note.
1	age related changes in protein turnover and ribonucleic acid of the diaphragm muscle of normal and dystrophic hamsters	Changes related to apo; protein turnover age and apo; ribonucleic acid of the diaphragm in normal and dystrophic hamsters.
1	immunosurveillance and cancer epidemiologic observations	Immunologic surveillance and cancer epidemiological observation.
1	age related changes in chromatin of liver cell nuclei of different ploidity	Apos-related changes; chromatin age of liver cell nuclei of different ploidy.
1	dependence of age and cell mediated immunity by newborn and adult children author s transl	Dependence of birth weight; age and age; cell-mediated immunity in newborn and adult children.
1	image processing in pathology iv age dependent changes of morphometric features of liver cell nuclei in biopsies	Treatment of apo; apo-dependent pathology iv image; age changes in morphometric characteristics of liver cell nuclei in biopsies.
1	effects of age sex and starvation on the turnover of plasma liver and breast muscle proteins in the japanese quail	Effects of sex and fasting on the turnover of liver and breast muscle plasma proteins in Japanese quail.
1	historical aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	Translation of the historical aspects of suicide among older perpetrators.
1	causes motivations and tendencies of suicidal acts in old age author s transl	Causes of motivations and tendencies of suicidal acts among translated perpetrators of old age.
1	social psychological aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	The psychosocial aspects of suicide in the elderly.
1	physiological age of the fleas and the analysis of age structure of natural population of xenopsylla gerbilli wagn	L' physiological age of fleas and leaflets; analysis of age structure of natural population of xenopsylla gererbilli wagnagnagn.
1	age dependent distribution of acidic glycosaminoglycans in human kidney tissue	Distribution of acidic glycosaminoglycans by age in human renal tissue.
1	effect of age on nodule induction by azaserine and dna synthesis in rat pancreas	Apos effect; age on apos; nodule induction by synthesis of apos; azoserin and apos; DNA in rat pancreas.
1	age related decline in receptivity in normal neonatally androgenized female and male hamsters	Decreased receptivity due to apo; age in normal male and female androgenated hamsters neonatally.
1	the effect of age on the safety factor in neuromuscular transmission in the isolated diaphragm of the rat	The effect of age on the safety factor of neuromuscular transmission in the isolated rat diaphragm.
1	age related changes in the lipids of the microsomal and the mitochondrial membranes of rat liver and kidney	Age-related changes in the lipids of microsomal and mitochondrial membranes of rat liver and kidney are related to age.
1	gross histomorphological and histochemical changes in thyroid gland of goat with age ii occurrence of ultimobranchial follicles	Significant histomorphological and histochemical changes in the thyroid gland of goat with age ii occur in the ultimobranchial follicles.
1	karyometric changes in human muscle with age	Karyometric changes in human muscle with age.
1	tolerance induction as an index of age related changes	L' tolerance induction as an index of age-related changes.
1	age related differences in binding of concanavalin a to plasma membranes of isolated neurons	Age-related differences in the binding of concanavalin a to plasma membranes of isolated neurons were observed.
1	age and sexual behavior of japanese macaques macaca fuscata	L' age and sexual behavior of macaques macaca fuscata.
1	the age dependence of bile acid metabolism in rats	L' influence of l' age of bile acid metabolism in rats.
1	age dependent changes of the protein synthetic machinery of liver cell cytoplasm as revealed by electron microscopic morphometry	L'apos-dependent changes; age of the hepatic cell cytoplasmic protein synthesis machinery, as revealed by electron microscopic morphometry.
1	age dependent metabolism and polymerisation of collagen author s transl	Metabolism and polymerization as a function of age of collagen authors.
1	warfarin sodium steady state plasma levels and patient age	Stable warfarin sodium plasma levels and patient age.
1	development of plasma cortisol in calves from birth to 14 days of age	The development of plasma cortisol in calves from birth to 14 days of age.
1	age at puberty in relation to age at marriage and parenthood a national longitudinal study	The age at puberty in relation to age at marriage and age at paternity or maternity is a national longitudinal study.
1	variations in melanin content with age in the human substantia nigra	In the human substance, the melanin content varies with age.
1	age dependent changes in the activities of atpase and some pyridine nucleotide linked enzymes in the chick testis	In chicken testis, the activities of enzymes related to the apos; atpase and certain pyridine nucleotides change with age.
1	prolactin cells of the human pituitary gland in old age	The prolactin cells of the human pituitary in old age.
1	persistence of complementary afterimages as a function of adult age and exposure duration	The effect of the dose on the mortality of adult patients. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
1	differences in unconspicuous word identification as a function of age and reversible figure training	Differences in language; identification of discrete words as a function of age and reversible form.
1	aging and semantic memory structural age differences	Aging and semantic memory structural differences in age.
1	the possible use of sociological onsets in theory on the problem of age and surroundings author s transl	L' possible use of sociological sets on the problem of age and environment were translated by the authors.
1	factors influencing diazepam pharmacokinetics age sex and liver disease	Factors influencing sex and liver disease pharmacokinetics of diazepam.
1	thyroid hormone concentrations in a large scale community survey effect of age sex illness and medication	Levels of thyroid hormones in pregnancy; a large-scale community survey on the effects of gender-related diseases; age and medications.
1	the effects of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats	The effects of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats.
1	age changes in the quantity of hematopoietic tissue	Age changes in amount of hematopoietic tissue.
1	age differences in short term memory and cell loss in the cortex of the rat	Differences in age in short-term memory and cell loss in the rat cortex.
1	tissue specificity and age changes for the pattern of the h1 group of histones in chromatin from mouse tissues	Tissue specificity and changes in age for the pattern of the h1 group of mouse tissue changes.
1	distribution of monoamine oxidase in hippocampal region of the rat	Distribution of monoamine oxidase in the hippocampal region of the rat.
1	age differences in verbal mediation a structural and functional analysis	The age differences in verbal mediation a structural and functional analysis.
1	age differences in a controlled lag recognition memory task	Differences in age in a time-controlled recognition memory task.
1	instrumentality terminality values in relation to age	Values of l' instrumentality terminality in relation to age.
1	interactions between age and the neuroendocrine and immune systems	Age and the neuroendocrine and immune systems.
1	a comparison of general and age specific factors associated with political behavior	Comparison of general and specific factors; age associated with political behaviour.
1	age rate and instructional conditions empirical support against the pacing variable	Rates; age and conditions; empirical support against the stimulus variable.
1	adult age differences in cognitive abilities and educational background	Differences in age among adults in cognitive abilities and educational attainment.
1	age characteristics of dna replication in regenerating rat liver	Characteristics of regenerating rat liver DNA; age of replication.
1	effects of age and stimulus intensity of the far field auditory brain stem potentials in the laboratory mouse	Long-field effects of age and age; intensity of stimulation of auditory brain potentials in laboratory mice.
1	changes in the plasma clearance and protein binding of carbenoxolone with age and their possible relationship with adverse drug effects	Changes in the plasma clearance and protein binding of carbenoxolone with age and their possible relationship to adverse drug reactions.
1	trials of influenza a new jersey 76 virus vaccine in normal children an overview of age related antigenicity and reactogenicity	Assays of a New Jersey 76 influenza vaccine in normal children; overview of apo; antigenicity and reactogenicity related to apo; age.
1	age changes in the perception of comfortable mandibular occlusal positions	Changes in apo; age perception of comfortable mandibular occlusal positions.
1	the significance of age changes in human alveolar mucosa and bone	L' significance of changes in age in alveolar mucosa and human bones.
1	histochemical and biochemical changes in human skeletal muscle with age in sedentary males age 22 65 years	Histochemical and biochemical changes in human skeletal muscle with lacid; age in sedentary males aged 22-65.
1	work capacity in women in relation to age as judged from a maximal work performance test	Women's work capacity in relation to age was assessed using maximum work performance testing.
1	creative productivity age and stress a biographical time series analysis of 10 classical composers	Creative productivity age and emphasis on a biographical time series analysis of 10 classical composers.
1	vitamin d hydroxylation in youth and old age	Vitamin d hydroxylation in young and old people.
1	age dependent increase in the non specific cholinesterase activity of the capillaries in the rat neostriatum	In addition, there was a significant increase in cholinesterase activity in the rat neostriatum.
1	hair analysis of trace minerals in human subjects as influenced by age sex and contraceptive drugs	Analysis of trace minerals in human hair is influenced by age, gender and birth control.
1	the role of memory in the age decline in digit symbol substitution performance	The role of memory in the decline of the age in the numerical symbol substitution performance.
1	orienting task effects on edr and free recall in three age groups	Focus of task effects on er and free recall in three age groups.
1	hepatitis b virus infections among danish dentists	Lipos virus infections; hepatitis B in Danish dentists.
1	age related differences in the disposition of acetanilide	Differences related to apos; age in the layout of apos; acetanilide.
1	effects of age diet and lactation on lipogenesis in rat adipose liver and mammary tissues	The effects of diet and lactation on lipogenesis in rat adipose liver and breast tissue.
1	the effect of age on neuromuscular transmission	Symptoms; effect of age on neuromuscular transmission.
1	structural and replicative forms of mitochondrial dna from human leukocytes in relation to age	Structural and replicative forms of human leukocyte mitochondrial DNA as a function of age.
1	age dependent alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity changes in mutant and wild type drosophila melanogaster	Changes in apos; alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity as a function of apos; age in mutant and wild type drosophila melanogaster.
1	influence of age on the immunological activity and capacity of the cba mouse	Influence of disease; age of onset; immunologic activity and capacity of mouse.
1	limits of several cell nucleus reactions in old age and in the presence of a pathological process	Limits of several cell nucleus reactions in old age and in the presence of a pathological process.
1	burned out schizophrenia evidence for age effects on schizophrenic symptomatology	Schizophrenia evidence for the effects of age on schizophrenic symptomatology has disappeared.
1	cardiovascular disease and changes in intellectual functioning from middle to old age	Cardiovascular diseases and changes in intellectual functioning mid- to late-life.
1	endogenous steroid levels in the human prostate from birth to old age a comparison of normal and diseased tissues	Endogenous steroid levels in the human prostate from birth to old age; comparison of normal and diseased tissue.
1	description of age depending cellular changes in the human tonsil	Age in relation to cellular changes in the human amygdala.
1	sex and generational differences in senior apperception technique projections	Gender and generational differences in elders' perceptions of elders.
1	metacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic elderly twins	Metacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic elderly twins.
1	subsynaptic plate perforations changes with age and experience in the rat	The perforation of the subsynaptic plaques changes with age and with age; experience in the rat.
1	effect of age on acute morphine response in the rat	Effect of apo; age on acute morphine response in rat.
1	visual short term memory response delay and age	Short-term, short-term, and age-specific, visual memory response time.
1	serum magnesium circadian rhythm in human adults with respect to age sex and mental status	Serum magnesium circadian rhythm in adults with respect to age, sex and mental status.
1	the role of the adenohypophysis in connection with changes in the thyroid caused by old age author s transl	The role of the adenohypophysis in relation to the changes in the thyroid caused by the aging of the body; transl.
1	a modification of the gompertz plot resulting from the age index by ries and an approximation of the survivorship curve author s transl	A modification of the gompertz graph resulting from the apos; index d'apos; age by ries and an approximation of the translation of the survival curve by the authors.
1	prenatal diagnosis a psychological study ii pregnancy after the age of 40 author s transl	Antenatal diagnosis, psychological study ii pregnancy after birth; age of 40 years.
1	age related dynamics of outpatient forms of schizophrenia on the age related dynamics of so called latent schizophrenia in light of late catamneses in senescence	Dynamics related to apos; age of external forms of schizophrenia on the dynamics related to apos; age of what are called latent schizophrenia in the light of late catamneses of senescence.
1	a quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibres in the mouse following the administration of drugs 1 age changes in untreated cba mice from 3 to 21 months of age	A quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibers in mice following dosing; drug administration 1 change in age in untreated cba mice 3 to 21 months of age.
1	age related changes in the composition and structure of human articular cartilage proteoglycans	Changes in age; age in composition and structure of human articular cartilage proteoglycans.
1	effect of age on amnesia and sedation induced by flunitrazepam during local anaesthesia for bronchoscopy	Effect of flunitrazepam; age; amnesia and sedation induced by flunitrazepam during flunitrazepam; local anesthesia for bronchoscopy.
1	age associated changes in microvasculature of human adult testis	Changes associated with apo; age in microvasculature of adult human testes.
1	an unusual sex steroid binding protein in mature male rat liver cytosol	An unusual sex steroid binding protein in mature male rat liver cytosol.
1	lipolytic response of rat adipocytes to epinephrine effect of age and cell size	The lipolytic response of rat adipocytes to apos; effect of apos; epinephrine according to apos; age and cell size.
1	problem solving as a function of age sex and the role appropriateness of the problem content	It is important to understand the nature of the problem and the nature of the problem.
1	genitourinary disorders of old age therapeutic considerations including counseling for sexual dysfunction	Genital Disorders-urinary de l'apos; age ripe therapeutic considerations, including counseling for sexual dysfunction.
1	some age related changes in pituitary adrenal function in the male laboratory rat	Changes in pituitary adrenal function related to apos; age in the male laboratory rat.
1	changes in coagulation effects by venoms of crotalus atrox as snakes age	Modification of the effects of coagulation by the venom of crotalus atrox as the snakes age.
1	colonization of teeth in humans by streptococcus mutans as related to its concentration in saliva and host age	The colonization of teeth in humans by streptococcus mutans is related to its concentration in saliva and to the age of the host.
1	age related susceptibility to pseudomonas aeruginosa ocular infections in mice	Pseudomonas aeruginosa eye infections in mice as a function of age.
1	endothelial cell population changes of human cornea during life	Changes in endothelial cell population of the human cornea throughout life.
1	age changes in the triangular fibrocartilage of the wrist joint	Changes in apos; age in triangular fibrocartilage of the apos; wrist joint.
1	the relationship between brain weight and head circumference from birth to age 18 years	Relationship between brain weight and head circumference from birth to age 18.
1	the motor activity as an age parameter of the rat authors transl	L' motor activity as a parameter; age of the translator rat.
1	the effect of age on the distensibility of the abdominal aorta of man	The effect of age on the distensibility of the abdominal aorta; male.
1	the tensile strength of human zonule and its alteration with age author s transl	The tensile strength of the human zonule and its alteration with age of translation of l&apos.
1	structural basis for the changing physical properties of human pulmonary vessels with age	Structural basis; evolution of the physical properties of human pulmonary vessels with age.
1	perinatal methadone exposure and its influence on the behavioral ontogeny of rats	Perinatal exposure to methadone and its influence on the behavioral ontogeny of rats.
1	variation of chemical composition with age in human femoral head cartilage	Changes in chemical composition with age in the femoral cartilage of the human head.
1	age related changes in cholesterol and bile acid metabolism in rats	Changes in cholesterol and bile acid metabolism in rats.
1	isoelectric spectra of liver tissue and blood serum albumin for rabbits of different age	Blood isoelectric spectrum of liver tissue and serum albumin in rabbits of different ages.
1	are loss of glistening of normal colour and increased friability normal aspects of the oesophagus in old age author s transl	Loss of voice; brightness of normal color and increased friability normal aspects of voice; esophagus in translation by older authors.
1	an investigation into the variation of human contrast sensitivity with age and ocular pathology	A study of human contrast sensitivity as a function of age and ocular pathology.
1	a histologic study of age changes in the adult human periodontal joint ligament	A histological study of age changes in the adult human periodontal articular ligament.
1	dystrophic mice show age related muscle fibre and myelinated axon losses	Dystrophic mice showed muscle fiber and myelinated axon losses associated with age.
1	influence of age on metal metabolism and toxicity	The influence of age on metal metabolism and toxicity.
1	changes in igg2 levels with age in british cattle	Changes in the levels of igg2 with age in British cattle.
1	effect of age cardiovascular disease and vasomotor changes on transmission of arterial pressure waves through the lower extremities	The effects of cardiovascular disease and vasomotor changes in the limbs; age on the transmission of arterial pressure waves through the lower limbs.
1	age associated pathological changes in male rats	Age associated pathological changes in male rats.
1	age related changes of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Age-related changes in glomerular basement membrane in normal rats.
1	quantitative estimation of age related thickening of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Quantitative estimation of apos; mucosal thickening; age of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats.
1	brake reaction time effects of age sex and carbon monoxide	Sex braking reaction time effects of age and carbon monoxide.
1	autoradiographic demonstration of dna repair synthesis in ganglion cells of aquarium fish at various age in vivo	Autoradiography demonstrates the synthesis of repair of DNA in ganglion cells of fishes at various ages in vivo.
1	preparing for old age necessity possibilities contents limits	Preparing for old age limits the content of possibilities.
1	age and familiarity in memory scanning	L'apos; age and familiarity in memory analysis.
1	differences and changes with age in the benton visual retention test	Differences and changes with age; age in the benton lens; visual retention test.
1	eeg changes in old age normal and pathological	These are eeg changes in normal and pathological aging.
1	changes in the sensitivity of dopamine receptors in the nucleus accumbens and in the striatum induced by chronic ethanol administration	Changes in the sensitivity of dopaminergic receptors in the nucleus accumbens and in the striatum induced by apos; chronic administration of ethanol.
1	lead and cadmium in hair as an indicator of body burden in rats of different age	Lead and cadmium in hair as an indicator of body burden in rats of different ages.
1	hyaluronate in articular cartilage age related changes	Hyaluronate in changes related to articular cartilage age.
1	age related changes in penile erections and circulating testosterone in middle aged male rats	Apos-related changes; age of penile erections and circulating testosterone in male rats; mean age.
1	change in taste preference related to aging of taste cells in rat	Change in taste preference related to the aging of gustatory cells in the rat.
1	influence of age on the renal renin response to a high salt intake in the rat	The influence of age on the renal renin response to high salt absorption in the rat.
1	influence of age on the modifications of cerebral electrogenesis in the curarized rat induced by acute and repeated asphyxic anoxia	Influence of the apos; age on changes in the apos; cerebral electrogenesis in the curated rat induced by acute and repeated asphyxiation.
1	age differences in perceptual style selective attention and perceptual motor reaction time	Perceptual-style age differences attract attention, selective attention and perceptual motor reaction time.
1	age isometric knee extension strength and fractionated resisted response time	Isometric knee extension and response time fractionation resisted apo; age.
1	associative symmetry and item availability evidence for qualitative age differences in acquisition strategies	Associative symmetry and the availability of objects demonstrate the existence of qualitative differences in acquisition strategies.
1	age related differences in serial binary classification	Differences related to age in serial binary classification.
1	microhardness measurement of the cartilage of the human femur head	Measurement of the microhardness of the cartilage of the human femur head.
1	polycardiographic researches on over 90 years old subjects author s transl	Polycardiographic research studies on subjects over 90 years of age.
1	age related changes in the colonic blood supply their relevance to ischaemic colitis	The changes in the colonic blood supply related to age are related to ischemic colitis.
1	conservatism innovation and old age	Conservative innovation and old age.
1	performance on tests of power and speed as related to age among male job applicants	Performance in power and speed tests according to age of male job applicants.
1	age and social composition factors as explanations for cleavages in socio political values	Age and social composition factors explain the divisions in socio-political values.
1	evidence for an endocrine function of the human pineal gland chairman s introduction	Proof of birth; existence of an endocrine function in the human pineal gland; introduction of the human pineal gland.
1	quantitative age dependent variations in dendritic spines in the hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata of the albino mouse	Lapos-dependent quantitative variation; age of dendritic spines; hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata of the albino mouse.
1	age related pharmacokinetics of high dose methotrexate in patients with osteosarcoma	Pharmacokinetics of high dose methotrexate vs. age in patients with osteosarcoma.
1	levels of the serum amyloid a protein saa in normal persons of different age groups	Levels of apo; serum amyloid a protein saa in normal people of different age groups.
1	sex related differences in diurnal activities and development of hepatic microsomal 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase	Gender differences in diurnal activities and development of hepatic microsomal reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase 7alpha hydroxylase; hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme 7alpha hydroxylase.
1	higher corticosterone values at a fixed single timepoint in serum from mice trained by prior handling	Pre-handled, higher corticosterone values at a fixed time point in the serum of trained mice.
1	effects of age on brain oxidative metabolism in vivo	Effects of apo; age on brain oxidative metabolism in vivo.
1	the distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugally separated lipoproteins of young and old rat plasma	Distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugally separated lipoproteins in young and old rat plasma.
1	age dependent changes in the excretion of urinary proteins by the rat	Changes with age; age in onset; urinary protein excretion by the rat.
1	age related changes in purkinje fiber action potentials of adult dogs	Changes related to age; age of potential; action of adult dog purkinid fibers.
1	age differences in peripheral perceptual processing a monoptic backward masking investigation	The age differences in peripheral perception deal with a retrogressive single-stage survey masking the reality.
1	change with age of anisotropic properties of collagen bundles	The anisotropic properties of collagen beams change with age.
1	quantitative age related histologic changes in the human vas deferens	Quantitative histological changes associated with apo; age in the human vas deferens.
1	histocompatibility linked genetic control of susceptibility to age dependent polioencephalomyelitis in mice	Histocompatibility linked genetic control of susceptibility to apo-dependent polioencephalomyelitis; age in mice.
1	stereological analysis of hepatic fine structure in the fischer 344 rat influence of sublobular location and animal age	L' stereological analysis of hepatic fine structure in Fischer 344 rat influences sublobular localization and age of animals.
1	dihydropteridine reductase activity of adult fetal and neoplastic tissues	Dihydropteridin reductase activity in adult fetal and neoplastic tissues.
1	influence of age on results of vestibular function tests review of literature and presentation of caloric test results	Influence of apo; age on results of vestibular function tests Review of literature and presentation of calorific test results.
1	hepatic lipid metabolism age related changes in triglyceride metabolism	Words-key: hepatic lipid metabolism, age, changes in triglyceride metabolism.
1	the interaction between age and list length in free recall	L' interaction between list length and age; a free reminder.
1	age effects on event related potentials in a selective attention task	Apo effects; age on apo-related potentials; event in a task; selective attention.
1	age differences in relationships between crystallized and fluid intelligences and problem solving	Differences in age in relationships between crystallized and fluid intelligences and problem solving.
1	urinary glycopeptides and glycosaminoglycans in children and adults as affected by age	Urinary glycopeptides and glycosaminoglycans in children and adults as appropriate; age.
1	age dependent structural changes in human neuronal chromatin	Structural changes in human neuronal chromatin according to age.
1	some observations in the fine structure of age changes of the mouse retinal pigment epithelium	Some observations in the fine structure of changes in the age of the mouse retinal pigment epithelium.
1	regional differences in the timing of synapse elimination in skeletal muscles of the neonatal rabbit	Regional differences in timing; elimination of synapses in the skeletal muscles of the neonatal rabbit.
1	pharmacological analysis of the functional ontogeny of the nigrostriatal dopaminergic neurons	Pharmacological analysis of the functional ontogeny of nigrostriatal dopaminergic neurons.
1	effects of age strain and dietary carbohydrate on the hepatic metabolism of male rats	Effects of the strain d'apos; age and dietary carbohydrate on the hepatic metabolism of male rats.
1	age related changes in the content of the collagen crosslink pyridinoline	Age in the content of the pyridinoline cross-linked collagen.
1	deficiency of calcitonin in age related osteoporoses	Insufficient amounts of calcitonin in osteoporosis related to osteoporosis; age.
1	age related susceptibility of mice to staphylococcal infection	Staphylococcal infection: age-specific susceptibility of mice to disease.
1	resolution of age dependent reference intervals polynomial regression methodology with applicability to plasma zinc levels in a childhood population	Resolution of age-dependent reference intervals; polynomial regression method with applicability to plasma zinc levels in a population of children.
1	studies of age related changes in the metabolism of eosin in the rat	Study of changes in the metabolism of eosin and eosin in rats.
1	adaptive physiopathology of advanced age	Adaptive Physiopathology of advanced age.
1	age dependence of mechanical parameters in rat skin following repeated strain	The effects of apo; age on mechanical parameters of rat skin following apo; a repeated strain depends on age.
1	the role of the physician in the preparation of adults for old age	The role of the physician in preparing adults for old age.
1	digoxin in the elderly pharmacokinetic consequences of old age	Digoxin in the pharmacokinetic consequences of aging in seniors.
1	secretion of prostatic binding protein by rat ventral prostate influence of age and androgen	The secretion of prostate binding protein by the rat ventral prostate influences age and age and and androgen.
1	human pharmacokinetics of nitrazepam effect of age and diseases	Human pharmacokinetics of apo; effect of nitrazepam on age and disease.
1	low serum triiodothyronine and high serum reverse triiodothyronine in old age an effect of disease not age	Weak serum triiodothyronine and high serum reverse triiodothyronine in the elderly, an effect of disease that is not age-related.
1	age related response of plasma testosterone delta 4 androstenedione and cortisol to adrenocorticotropin in infants children and adults	Testosterone plasma delta 4 androstenedione and cortisol response to adrenocorticotropin, Journal of Adrenocorticotropin, Vol.
1	regional differences of neuron loss of rat brain in old age	Regional differences of neuron loss of rat brain in old age.
1	age related changes of the pattern of non histone chromatin proteins from rat and mouse liver chromatin	Changes in rat and mouse liver chromatin nonhistone chromatin protein profile age.
1	kinetic parameters of calcium metabolism and femur morphometry in rats i influence of sex and age	The kinetic parameters of calcium metabolism and femoral morphometry in rats influence sex and age.
1	age related changes in the nigrostriatum a behavioral and biochemical analysis	Apos-related changes; nigrostriatum age a behavioral and apos; biochemical analysis.
1	the relationship of age and level of physical activity with the fractionated components of patellar reflex time	The relationship between age and level of physical activity and fractionated components of patellar reflex time.
1	age related differences in binocular backward masking with visual noise	Differences related to age; age in binocular masking to and fro; rear masking with visual noise.
1	age changes cohort differences and cultural change on the guilford zimmerman temperament survey	Changes in age, cohort differences and cultural changes in the Guilford zimmerman temperament.
1	changes in the specific activity of n acetyl beta d hexosaminidase in the rat epididymis with age	Modifications of the apos; specific activity of nacetyl beta d hexosaminidase in the apos; epididyme of the rat with the apos; age.
1	effect of sex and sex role in later life report of a seminar by prof margaret hellie huyck april 1978	Effects of sex and role of sex in later life report d'apos; a seminar by Professor Margaret Hellie huyck April 1978.
1	the effect of age on the absorption and excretion of lead	Effects of age on weight; absorption and weight; lead excretion.
1	body fat at puberty in rats alteration by changes in diet	Changes in diet alter body fat at puberty in rats.
1	the hand in diabetes study of 97 diabetics compared to a control group	The hand-in-the-hand study of diabetes among 97 diabetics compared to a control group.
1	palatal sensitivity to touch correlation with age	Palatal sensitivity to tactile correlation with age.
1	age and aerobic power in women a longitudinal study	L' age and aerobic power in women, longitudinal study.
1	age differences in resolving power and decision strategies in a weight discrimination task	Differences in age in the resolution of power and decision strategies in a weight discrimination task.
1	effects of varying irrelevant information on adult age differences in problem solving	Effects of variation; irrelevant information on differences in age; age of adults in problem solving.
1	respective influence of extrinsic and intrinsic factors on the age related decrease of thymic secretion	L' influence of extrinsic and intrinsic factors on the decrease in thymic secretion related to l' age decreased.
1	age related changes in sebaceous gland activity	Changes in apo; sebaceous gland activity vs. apo; age.
1	age related changes in the mechanical properties of human skin	Changes in the mechanical properties of human skin.
1	ontogeny of maternal behavior in the laboratory rat early origins in 18 to 27 day old young	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that maternal behaviour in the laboratory rat is related to birth defects.
1	effect of a saccharose diet on the enzymatic activity and the metabolite content from carbohydrate metabolism in the saliva of rats of varying age	The effect of a sucrose-based diet on glucose levels; enzymatic activity and the content of metabolites of carbohydrate metabolism in the saliva of rats of different ages.
1	cyclophosphamide eliminates suppressor t cells in age associated central regulation of delayed hypersensitivity in mice	Cyclophosphamide eliminates suppressive t cells associated with apos; age of central regulation of apos; delayed hypersensitivity in mice.
1	age dependent gene induction in the quail oviduct viii a survey of experimental data	Gene induction as a function of leaf age; quail oviduct viii age, study of experimental data.
1	effect of an episode of severe malnutrition and age on lactose absorption by recovered infants and children	Effect of an episode of severe malnutrition and vomiting; age; absorption of lactose by recovered infants and children.
1	influence of age on bronchial mucociliary transport	Moose influence; age on bronchial mucociliary transport.
1	depth and elaboration of processing in relation to age	Depth and timing; elaboration of treatment in relation to age.
1	spiral ganglion cell counts in an age graded series of rat cochleas	Spiral ganglion cell counts in a series of random rat cochleas; different ages.
1	effect of age on axoplasmic transport of cholinesterase in rat sciatic nerves	Effect of age on axoplasmic transport of cholinesterase in rat sciatic nerves.
1	mouse erythropoietic stem cell lines function normally 100 months loss related to number of transplantations	Mice erythropoietic stem cell lines function normally for 100 months, loss related to transplant number.
1	age related changes in glycerolipid formation in lean and obese zucker rats	Changes related to apos; age in glycerolipid formation in lean and obese zucker rats.
1	plasma lipoprotein changes in suckling and weanling rabbits fed semipurified diets	Plasma lipoprotein changes in suckled and weaned rabbits fed semiprotein-purified diets.
1	influence of sex and age on febrile responses to peripheral and central administration of pyrogens in the rabbit	Influence of sex and age on febrile responses to apos; peripheral and central administration of pyrogens in rabbit.
1	changes with age in copper and superoxide dismutase levels in brains of c57bl 6j mice	Changes in age of copper and superoxide dismutase levels in brain of c57bl 6j mice.
1	combined effects of hla matching and age in renal transplantation	The combined effects of apo; hla and apo pairing; age in renal transplantation.
1	serum cholesterol levels of males and females in different age groups in south india	Male and female serum cholesterol levels in different age groups in southern India.
1	changes with age in cadmium and copper levels in c57bl 6j mice	Change with age; age of cadmium and copper levels in c57bl 6j mice.
1	prolyl 3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase activities in certain rat and chick embryo tissues and age related changes in their activities in the rat	Prolyl-3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase activities in certain rat and chick embryo tissues and associated changes in rat activity; age.
1	aging and conservatism cohort changes in attitudes about legalized abortion	The aging and conservatism cohort changed attitudes toward legalization of abortion.
1	peripheral autonomic changes accompanying learning and reaction time performance in older people	Peripheral autonomous changes accompanying learning and reaction time in seniors.
1	normal values of total serum ige in children from birth to 16 years of age	Normal serum count in children from birth to 16 years of age.
1	analysis of ribosomal proteins from adult drosophila melanogaster in relation to age	Analysis of ribosomal proteins of the adult Drosophila melanogaster in relation to age.
1	some remarks on assessing morphologic changes in old demented people	A few remarks on os; assessment of morphological changes in elderly demented individuals.
1	effect of age on arden grating acuity	Effect of age on age; acuity of the arden network.
1	severe hypernatremia caused by age isolation and obstructive uropathy	Severe hypernatremia caused by isolation of the elderly and obstructive uropathy.
1	endocrine function of the ovaries of blue foxes alopex ladopus during postnatal ontogenesis	Endocrine functions of the ovaries of blue fox alopex ladopus during postnatal ontogenesis.
1	age dependent changes in the specificity of trna methyltransferases in the cerebellum of the icteric and nonicteric gunn rat	Changes in the specificity of trna methyltransferases in the cerebellum of icteric and non-dicteric gunn rats as a function of age.
1	bipolar affective disorder in old age	"""Bipolar affective disposition disorder in old age."""
1	influence of the age of the recipient on the manifestation of the effect of allogeneic inhibition	It is not possible to determine the age of the recipient; it is necessary to determine the age of the recipient; the effect of the apo is allogenic.
1	secretion of growth hormone in men and women during the reproductive age in aged men and menopausal women with or without estrogens or progesterone	Apos secretion; growth hormone in men and women of reproductive age with or without estrogen or progesterone in older men and women.
1	maturational changes in adrenal xenobiotic metabolism in male and female guinea pigs	Stimulation of adrenal xenobiotic metabolism in male and female guinea guinea guinea pigs.
1	age related changes resembling fibrocystic disease in iodine blocked rat breasts	Age-related changes resembling fibrocystic disease in the apos; iodine blocked the breasts of rats.
1	effect of hydrocortisone on the state of liver chromatin in rats of different age	Effect of the drug; effect of the drug; effect of hydrocortisone on the liver; effect of the drug on liver chromatin in rats of different ages.
1	age related degenerative changes in the mouse mandibular joint	Apos-related degenerative changes; age in the mouse; mandibular articulation.
1	age related changes in rat muscle collagen	Changes in rat muscle collagen age.
1	effect of age and short term cold stress on sdh activity and oxygen consumption of lizard brain	Effect of age and short-term cold on appetite; sdh activity and food consumption; lizard brain oxygen.
1	analysis and exploration of age related changes in mammalian structure and function	Analysis and exploration of changes in mammalian structure and function.
1	age related changes in function of transfer ribonucleic acid of rat livers	Changes related to apo; age in transfer function of rat liver; ribonucleic acid.
1	human articular cartilage in relation to age a morphometric study	Human articular cartilage in relation to age a morphometric study.
1	changes in renal function in middle and old age established by isotopic nephrography	Changes in renal function at baseline; mean and advanced age as determined by isotopic nephrography.
1	gender differences in open field behavior as a function of age	Gender differences in field behaviour as a function of age.
1	developmental changes in visual orienting behavior to featural versus structural information in the human infant	Developmental changes in the behaviour of infants; visual orientation vs. vision; nature vs. structure information in human infant.
1	change in response with age of human articular cartilage to plasma somatomedin activity	Modification of the response of human articular cartilage to apos; plasma somatomedin activity with age.
1	a clinico pathological survey of thyroid glands in old age	Clinical pathological study of thyroid glands in elderly people.
1	developmental changes in malpighian tubule cell structure	Changes in squamous cell structure during development.
1	age related variations in the testes and prostate of beagle dogs	Testicular and prostate changes as a function of age in beagle dogs.
1	changes in pituitary and thyroid function with increasing age in young male rats	Changes in pituitary and thyroid function with apos; age in young male rats.
1	effect of age on testicular function in patients with klinefelter s syndrome	Effects of age on testicular function in patients with klinefelter syndrome.
1	age related variations in cortical bone remodeling measurements in male beagles 10 to 26 months of age	It is not possible to determine the age of remodeling in males from 10 to 26 months of age.
1	morphological and biochemical studies on the development of cholinergic properties in cultured sympathetic neurons ii dependence on postnatal age	Morphological and biochemical studies on the development of cholinergic properties in cultured sympathetic neurons ii dependence on l' postnatal age.
1	age related changes of calcitonin secretion in females	Changes in calcitonin secretion related to age in females.
1	thymic changes in muscular dystrophy and evidence for an abnormality related to prostaglandin synthesis or action	Thymic changes in muscular dystrophy and evidence of an abnormality related to synthesis or synthesis; prostaglandin action.
1	effect of age on immune function in terms of chemically induced cancers	The effect of age on immune function in terms of chemically induced cancers.
1	the influence of stimulus age and sex on person perception	L' influence of stimulus age and gender on individual perception.
1	differences in the magnitude of the delboeuf illusion and usnadze effect during adulthood	Differences in age; extent of onset; illusion of onset; usnadze effect of onset; adult age.
1	age related differences in two stages of central perceptual processes the effects of short duration targets and criterion differences	Age at two stages of central perceptual processes, effects of short-term targets and differences in criteria.
1	intracellular distribution of copper and zinc in sheep effect of age and dietary levels of the metals	Intracellular distribution of copper and zinc in sheep Effect of age and food levels of metals.
1	iodoamino acid distribution and weight of the thyroid gland t4 serum level and t4 metabolism in relation to diet body fat content and age of rats	Iodoamino acid distribution and thyroid gland weight, t4 serum level and t4 metabolism in relation to diet, body fat content and age of rats.
1	fine structural changes in the liver of young and old rats as influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers	Mild structural changes in the liver of young and old rats are influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers.
1	maturation of nerve conduction velocity from birth to 5 years of age	Maturity of nerve conduction velocity from birth to age 5 years.
1	age related effects on the incorporation of acetate into rat liver histones	Dosage-related effects; age; incorporation of acetate into rat liver histones.
1	generational and other differences between males and females in problem drinking and its treatment	Generational and other differences between men and women regarding problematic alcohol consumption and its treatment.
1	age dependent changes in the latency of the pattern visual evoked potential	Changes in the latency of the profile as a function of age evoked visual potential.
1	hearing and age research challenges and the national institute on aging	The challenges of research on hearing and hearing; age and age; and the National Institute of Aging.
1	age pigments cell loss and hippocampal function	Loss of pigment cells; age and hippocampal function.
1	involution of genital function with age studied as an index aging in drosophila melanogaster	L' involution of genital function with age was studied as an index of melanogaster Drosophila aging.
1	age related differences in salt taste acuity	Differences related to age; salt taste acuity.
1	age associated changes in activities of rat hepatocytes i protein synthesis	Changes associated with apo; age in apo; rat hepatocyte activity i protein synthesis.
1	intraperitoneal systemic anaphylaxis in the mouse i age dependence of fatal anaphylactic shock	Intraperitoneal systemic anaphylaxis in the mouse gland; age of fatal anaphylactic shock.
1	age related and thymus dependent rejection of adenovirus 2 transformed cell tumors in the syrian hamster	Thymus-dependent and age-related rejection of apos; adenovirus 2 transformed cell tumors in the Syrian hamster.
1	changes of dna ligases in chick neural retina as a function of age	Modification of apo ligases; DNA in the chicken neural retina as a function of age.
1	circadian changes in adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase activity dependency of change at darkness onset and the effect of pinealectomy on animal strain and age	Circadian changes in adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase activity are dependent on changes early in the apo and darkness; effect of pinealectomy on animal strain and age.
1	processing by the thymus is not required for cells that cure and populate w wv recipients	Thymus therapy is not required for cells that heal and populate blood recipients.
1	age related changes of renal osteodystrophy	Changes related to apo; age of onset; renal osteodystrophy.
1	gonadotropin binding and testicular function in old rats	Determination of gonadotropin binding and testicular function in old rats.
1	age related changes in the testicular and antler cycles of reindeer rangifer tarandus	Apos-related changes; age in testis and antler cycles of reindeer of rangifer tarandus.
1	biochemical studies on collagen and connectin from human skeletal muscle age related changes in the properties of elasticity author s transl	Biochemical studies on collagen and connectin of human skeletal muscle related to apos; age of skeletal muscles changes in properties of apos; author of d' translastic elasticity.
1	the cholinergic system in old age and alzheimer s disease	The cholinergic system in old age and Alzheimer's.
1	aminazine distribution in the organs and tissues of rats depending on the routes of administration and the age of the animals	Distributions of apos; aminazine in organs and tissues of rats according to the routes of administration and administration; age of animals.
1	the touch corpuscles of the plantar surface of the big toe histological and histometrical investigations with respect to age	The tactile bodies of the plant surface of histological and histometric studies of the big toes as a function of age.
1	age changes in the livers of costa ricans	Age in the liver of Costa Ricans.
1	changes in the activity and distribution of the ribosomal dissociation factor of rat liver during growth	Changes in the activity and distribution of the ribosomal dissociation factor of rat liver during growth.
1	corticotroph cells of the human pituitary in old age	Corticotrophic cells of the human pituitary in old age.
1	age related changes in the immune system of mice of eight medium and long lived strains and hybrids ii short and long term effects of natural infection with parainfluenza type 1 virus sendai	Changes related to apo; age in the immune system of mice from eight strains and hybrids with long- and medium-lived life histories ii Short- and long-term effects of apo; natural infection with parainfluenza type 1 sentai virus.
1	the effect of age on the protein degradation system in the nematode turbatrix aceti	L' effect of age on the protein degradation system in the turbatrix aceti nematode.
1	testosterone and testosterone precursors in the spermatic vein and in the testicular tissue of old men reduced oxygen supply may explain the relative increase of testicular progesterone and 17 alpha hydroxyprogesterone content and production in old age	The precursors of testosterone and testosterone in the spermatic vein and testicular tissue of older men may explain the relative increase in the content of testicular progesterone and 17 alpha-hydroxyprogesterone and production in old age.
1	comparative ultrastructural study of the optic nerves and visual cortices of young 2 5 months and old 17 months mice	A comparative study of the ultrastructure of the optic nerves and visual cortices in two- to five-month-old, 17-month-old mice.
1	age related differences in lactate distribution kinetics following maximal exercise	Differences related to age; age of lactate distribution kinetics following maximal exercise.
1	effect of age on contractility of guinea pig ureter	Effect of apo; age on contractility of guinea pig ureter.
1	age related changes of the mineral component content in the hemolymph of 2d and 3d stage larvae of the reindeer warble fly hypodermatidae	Changes in the age of the mineral content of the apos; hemolymph of the instar 2d and 3d larvae of the reindeer fly hypodermatidae.
1	age differences in the effects of perceptual noise	Differences in age in effects of perceptual noise.
1	postnatal changes in urinary prostaglandin e excretion in premature infants	Postnatal changes in urinary prostaglandins and excretion in premature infants.
1	age dependent constitution of chondroitin sulfate isomers in cartilage proteoglycans under associative conditions	Composition of chondroitin sulfate isomers as a function of age in associative cartilage proteoglycans.
1	changes in rat gastric proteases with age effect of hydrocortisone	Changes in rat gastric proteases with apos; effect of apos; effect of hydrocortisone on age.
1	age related changes in the transmembrane potential of isolated rabbit sino atrial nodes and atria	Lapos-related changes; age of transmembrane potential of isolated rabbit atrial ganglia and sinus atria.
1	acoustically evoked potential dependence upon age	Acoustics have allowed us to talk about the potential for dependence on-vis-à-vis age.
1	the effects of age upon the visual perception of speech	The effects of age on the visual perception of speech.
1	the first night effect revisited with age as a variable	The first nocturnal effect came back with age as a variable.
1	achievement aggression and perceived adult age stages	Aggressiveness and perception of stages of development; adulthood.
1	the effects of age and sex on the factor structure of the wechsler memory scale	Effects of age and sex on the factor structure of the Wechsler memory scale.
1	age changes in bone mineralization cortical thickness and haversian canal area	Changes in age, bone mineralization thickness and haversian channel area.
1	lipids in accessory sex glands of immature mature and castrated male rats	Lipids in the accessory sex glands of immature, mature and castrated male rats.
1	psychological problems of incurable patients in old age author s transl	Translation of psychological problems of incurable patients in elderly people.
1	effects of age and frequency of ejaculation on sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves in stallions	Effect of age and frequency of ejaculation on sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves in stallions.
1	age and sex differences on preferred listening rates for speech	Differences according to age and sex on voice rates; preferred listening.
1	variation with age in the volumes of grey and white matter in the cerebral hemispheres of man measurements with an image analyser	Age of the volumes of grey and white matter in the cerebral hemispheres of the apos; man at the apos; a dapos analyzer; images.
1	methadone exposure in utero developmental status at one and two years of age	Exposure to methadone in utero at birth; one year and two years of age.
1	conditioned taste aversion as a function of age in mature male rats	Conditioned l' taste aversion as a function of age; age in mature male rats.
1	shifts toward risk in adults at three age levels	Changes in risk in adults at three levels of age.
1	effect of age on levels of diazepam in plasma and brain of rats	Effect of lacidosis; age on levels of diazepam in rat plasma and brain.
1	effects of age on the metabolism of thyroid hormones by rat brain tissue in vitro	The effects of glucose; age on the metabolism of thyroid hormones by rat brain tissue in vitro.
1	effect of starvation and refeeding a high protein or high carbohydrate diet on lipid composition and glycogen content of rat livers in relation to age	Effect of fasting and recharging of high protein or high carbohydrate diets on the lipid composition and glycogen content of rat liver as a function of age.
1	influence of adult age on the skeletal response to phosphate and estrogen in rats	Influence of liposis; adult age on skeletal response to phosphate and estrogen in rats.
1	age related histochemical and histological changes in the knee joint cartilage of c57b1 mice and their significance for the pathogenesis of osteoarthrosis i oxidative enzymes	Histochemical and histological changes associated with osteoarthritis; age in joint knee cartilage of c57b1 mice and their significance for the pathogenesis of osteoarthritis oxidative enzymes i.
1	intimal thickening of human femoral arteries with special regard to elastin part 1 diffuse intimal thickening due to growth and age	The intimal thickening of human femoral arteries with special attention to the apos; diffuse intimal thickening of part 1 of the apos; elastin due to growth and apos; age.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption and the sdh activity of liver homogenate of male garden lizards effect of malonate and short term cold stress	Changes in age; age of consumption of oxygen and oxygen; sdh activity of adults; liver homogenate in male garden lizards; effect of malonate and short-term cold stress.
1	age associated changes in deoxyglucose uptake in whole brain	Changes associated with apo; age of deoxyglucose uptake in whole brain.
1	urate excretion in old age	Urinary excretion in the elderly.
1	the structure of the spongy bone in lumbar vertebrae and the neck of the femur a comparative analysis of the age dependent remodelling process author s transl	The structure of the spongy bones in the lumbar vertebrae and the neck of the femur is the subject of a comparative analysis of the remodeling process in relation to age.
1	changes in form and structure of vertebrae as a manifestation of mechanical loading author s transl	Changes in the shape and structure of the vertebrae as a manifestation of mechanical loading.
1	atherosclerosis in the pediatric age with special reference to initiation progression and regression of atherosclerotic lesions	Pediatric age, particularly with respect to the initial progression and regression of atherosclerotic lesions.
1	adrenal reactivity to acth age changes in silver foxes inheriting different defensive behaviors	Adrenal responsiveness to changes in age in silver foxes inheriting different defensive behaviors.
1	fertility in women after age forty five	Fecundity of women after age 45 years.
1	vitamin d dependent calcium binding protein changes during gestation prenatal and postnatal development in rats	Changes in vitamin d-dependent calcium binding proteins during prenatal and postnatal development of gestation in rats.
1	pattern of age related bone loss in mandibles	Model of bone loss associated with osteoporosis; age in mandibles.
1	the influence of sex age and strain of chicken on liver biotin content	L' influence of apos; age of sex and strain of chicken on liver biotin content.
1	age differences on raven s coloured progressive matrices	Age differences on raven-colored progressive matrices were observed.
1	thyroxin binding globulin tbg radioimmunoassay normal patients results according to age and sex and in the cases of dysthyroidisms author s transl	Normal patients receiving thyroxine-binding tbg-globulin radioimmunoassay receive results according to age and sex and, in cases of dysthyroidism, the results are reported.
1	discrimination learning in horses effects of breed age and social dominance	Learning about discrimination in horses has the effects of age, race and social dominance.
1	normal cardiac output in relation to age and body size	Normal cardiac output dependent on age and body size.
1	age related response to tryptophan pyrrolase to 17 beta estradiol in the liver of female rats	The response to tryptophan pyrrolase in the presence of 17 beta-estradiol in the liver of female rats was related to age.
1	maturational changes related to dopamine in the effects of d amphetamine cocaine nicotine and strychnine on seizure susceptibility	Changes in maturation due to dopamine in the effects of d-amphetamine, cocaine, nicotine and strychnine on seizure susceptibility.
1	age differences in the effect of glucagon on the metabolism of glucose precursors in perfused rat liver	Differences in age; the effect of glucagon on the metabolism of glucose precursors in perfused rat liver.
1	a method for estimating the age of field collected female simulium damnosum s l diptera simuliidae	A method for estimating the age of simuliid female simulium damnosum s l diptera in the field was used.
1	age sex and hemisphrere asymmetry differences induced by a concurrent memory processing task	"""Age Sex and Hemisphere Asymetry Differences induced by a concurrent memory processing task."""
1	dimensional preferences in middle and old age	Dimensional preferences in people of advanced or middle age.
1	stimulus persistence and age	The persistence and age of the stimuli.
1	hypothalamic pituitary function in the old irregularly cycling rat	Hypothalamic pituitary functions in the old irregular cycle rat.
1	age dependent changes in the sperm population and fertility in the male rat	Changes in the male rat sperm population and fertility as a function of age.
1	age differences in dark interval threshold across the life span	It is also important to note that there are differences in the age at which people live and work.
1	effects of age and other drugs on benzodiazepine kinetics	The effects of age and other drugs on benzodiazepine kinetics.
1	diagnostic problems of tuberculosis in old age	Diagnosis problems of tuberculosis in elderly people.
1	age related decrease in prostacyclin biosynthetic activity in rat aortic smooth muscle cells	Apos-related decrease; age of onset; prostacyclin biosynthetic activity in rat aorta; smooth muscle cells.
1	an analysis of blood transfusion of surgical patients by sex a question for the transfusion trigger	Analysis of blood transfusion of surgical patients by gender is a question for triggering transfusion.
1	critical aortic coarctation patch aortoplasty in infants less than age 3 months	Acute aortic coarction patch aortoplasty in infants less than 3 months of age.
1	dyspnea in 70 year old people	She's got Dyspnea in 70-year-olds.
1	clinical features of schizophrenia with a malignant course in patients surviving into old age	Clinical characteristics of schizophrenia with malignant progression in patients surviving to an advanced age.
1	age related changes in the carbohydrate and fat metabolic indices of female rats	In addition, there were no changes in the metabolic indices of fat and carbohydrate in female rats.
1	age dependent avidin induction v changes on the level of post transcriptional modification	Age of onset; induction of apos; avidine v at the level of post transcriptional modification.
1	interaction of age and sex in sympathetic axon ingrowth into the hippocampus following septal afferent damage	Interaction of age and sex in internal growth; sympathetic axon in the apos; seahorse; septal afferent lesion.
1	food restriction as a modulator of age related changes in serum lipids	Dietary restriction as a modulator of lipids; age changes in serum lipids related to lipids; age.
1	iris heterochromia variations in form age changes sex dimorphism	The variations in age; age of the forms; heterochromia of the apos; iris change sexual dimorphism.
1	serum lipid and lipoprotein fractions in 2 age groups of male rabbits	Serum lipid and lipoprotein fractions in 2 groups of rabbits; age of males.
1	age differences in p3 reaction time associations	Age differences in p3 reaction time associations were observed.
1	age related changes in auditory event related potentials	Changes related to apo; age in hearing-related potentials; auditory event.
1	age related auditory loss in the mongolian gerbil	Hearing loss related to apos; age in the Mongolian gerbil.
1	age related changes in the auditory evoked brainstem potentials of albino and pigmented guinea pigs	Cerebral stem potentials in albino and pigmented guinea pigs were evoked by age-related changes in hearing.
1	age effect on dopamine and serotonin metabolite levels in cerebrospinal fluid	Effect of apo; age on dopamine and serotonin metabolite levels in cerebrospinal fluid.
1	immunoglobulin levels in children with celiac disease variations with age and diet	Dapos; immunoglobulin levels in children with CD vary with age and diet.
1	age related changes in neuronal rna content in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	L'apos-related changes; age of rna neuronal content in cynomolgus macaca mulatta monkeys.
1	age related distribution of serum immunoglobulin concentration in 1003 healthy children and adults	Distribution by age of serum immunoglobulin concentration in 1,003 healthy children and adults.
1	age associated changes in initiation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in isolated rat liver nuclei	Changes associated with age; initiation of liver synthesis; ribonucleic acid (RNA) in isolated rat liver nuclei are associated with age.
1	age differences in the hormonal reaction of the adrenals and testes to stress exposure in monkeys	It is important to note, however, that there are differences in the hormonal response of the adrenals and testes to apo placentae; exposure to stress in monkeys.
1	ontogenic drug studies in calves i age dependent salicylate levels and metabolism	Ontogenic studies in calves as a function of age, salicylate concentration and metabolism.
1	role of age related serum factors in the mechanism of interferon production	The role of serologic factors related to diabetes mellitus; age in the mechanism of production; interferon.
1	influence of age cigarette smoking and the oral contraceptive on plasma concentrations of clomipramine	L' influence of cigarette and oral contraceptive on plasma levels of clomipramine.
1	age related alterations of the proximal axon segment in lamina iiiab pyramidal cells of the human isocortex a golgi and fine structural study	Apos-related alterations; age of proximal axonal segment in lamina iiiab pyramidal cells of l' human isocortex a golgi and a fine structural study.
1	comparative roentgenographical study on the incidence of ossification of the posterior longitudinal ligament and other degenerative changes of the cervical spine among japanese koreans americans and germans author s transl	Comparative roentgenographic study on apos; incidence of apos; ossification of the posterior longitudinal ligament and apos; other degenerative changes of the cervical spine in American men; Japanese origin and the German authors.
1	control of gill reflex habituation and the rate of epsp decrement of l7 by a common source in the cns of aplysia	Control of gill habit and of the rate of epsp decrement of l7 by a common source in the cns of l' aplysia.
1	effect of age on the detection rate in duchenne muscular dystrophy	Effect of lacidosis; age on the detection rate of duchenne muscular dystrophy.
1	histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of m vastus lateralis in sedentary old people age 65 89 years	Histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of m vastus lateralis in sedentary persons aged 65-89.
1	changes with age in the peripheral nerves of the rat an ultrastructural study	Changes with l' age in the peripheral nerves of the rat an ultrastructural study.
1	effect of host age on the transplantation growth and radiation response of emt6 tumors	Effect of implantation; age of implantation; host on graft growth and radiation response of emt6 tumours.
1	reflex oral activity in decerebrate rats of different age	Reflex oral activity in decerebrate rats of different ages.
1	sex difference in serum calcitonin level in rats as related to feeding fasting and age	Sexual difference in serum calcitonin levels in rats as a function of fasting and fasting; age.
1	capacity of old versus young male rats to release thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 and triiodothyronine t3 in response to different stimuli	The ability of old and young male rats to release thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 and triiodothyronine t3 in response to different stimuli.
1	mouse c57bl ksj liver phosphofructokinase allosteric kinetics and age related changes in the genetically diabetic state	Allosteric kinetics of mouse c57bl ksj liver phosphofructokinase and changes related to apos; age in apos; genetic diabetes status.
1	regulation of three forms of cytochrome p 450 and epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes effects of age sex and induction	Regulation of three forms of cytochrome p 450 and d' epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes effects of sex; age and age; induction.
1	sexual differences in the development of plasma thyroxine levels in the embryo and young chick	Sexual differences in the development of plasma levels of thyroxine in the embryo and young chick.
1	changes with age characterize circadian rhythm in telemetered core temperature of stroke prone rats	The changes with age characterize the circadian rhythm of the core temperature measured by telemetry in rats prone to stroke.
1	familial and individualized longitudinal autorhythmometry for 5 to 12 years and human age effects	Individualized family and longitudinal self-healing for 5 to 12 years and human age effects.
1	adult age differences in memory for sex of voice	Differences in age and sex of voice in adult memory.
1	relationship of serum somatomedin like activity and fibroblast proliferative activity with age and growth in the rat	Serum somatosedin activity vs. apos; fibroblast proliferative activity vs. apos; age and growth in the rat.
1	identification of lactate dehydrogenase elevating virus as the etiological agent of genetically restricted age dependent polioencephalomyelitis of mice	Identification of the virus responsible for lacidosis; elevation of lactate dehydrogenase as etiological agent of polio,-lacid-dependent encephalomyelitis; genetically restricted age in mice.
1	age related changes in the concentrations of cytosol receptors for sex steroid hormones in the hypothalamus and pituitary gland of the rat	Changes related to apos; age of cytosolic receptors for sex steroid hormones in the apos; hypothalamus and l' rat pituitary.
1	resting heartrate variability in man declines with age	Resting heart variability in men decreases with age.
1	pharmacokinetic characteristics of salicylates in old animals	Pharmacokinetic characteristics of salicylates in old animals.
1	acetylation and urinary excretion of norsulfazole in gastrointestinal disease patients of different age groups	L' acetylation and l' urinary excretion of norsulfazole in patients with gastro-intestinal illness of different age groups.
1	age and sex related variations of serum thyroxine binding globulin	Changes in serum thyroxine binding globulin age and sex.
1	age related changes in central nervous system beta endorphin and acth	Age of beta endorphin and lacidosis; acth in central nervous system.
1	morphological immunochemical and biochemical study of rabbit achilles tendon at various ages	Morphological, immunochemical, and biochemical study of rabbit achilles at different ages.
1	urinary polyamine excretion in man i influence of sex and age	Lapos; urinary polyamine excretion in adults; male is influenced by sex and sex; age.
1	interaction of age and thyroid hormone status on na k atpase in rat renal cortex and liver	Dosage interaction; age and thyroid hormone status on na k atpase in rat renal cortex and liver.
1	age dependent immunological parameters	Immunological parameters dependent on age.
1	a strain survey of age dependent changes in antigen elimination antibody formation and tolerance	A strain study of age-related changes in the formation of antigenic antibodies; elimination and tolerance.
1	sex related variations in the frequency and characteristics of adverse drug reactions	Gender-related changes in the frequency and characteristics of adverse drug reactions.
1	age changes at cerebral artery bifurcations and the pathogenesis of berry aneurysms	Changes in age at bifurcations; cerebral artery and pathogenicity of berry aneurysms.
1	sex difference of mercuric chloride induced renal tubular necrosis in rats from the aspect of sex differences in renal mercury concentration and sulfhydryl levels	The sexual difference in mercuric chloride induced renal tubular necrosis in rats at the angle of sexual differences in renal mercury concentration and sulfhydryl levels.
1	ultrastructural morphometric investigations on rat liver of young and adult rats after treatment with technical pentachlorophenol pcp	Ultrastructural morphometric studies in the liver of young and adult rats after treatment with the pcp pentachlorophenol technique.
1	age and susceptibility of swiss mice for mouse adenovirus strain fl	The age and susceptibility of Swiss mice to the mouse adenovirus fl. strain fl.
1	influence of age on the vitamin e requirement for resolution of necrotizing myopathy	Influence of apo; age on vitamin requirement for resolution of necrotizing myopathy.
1	age dependent changes in rat liver steroid hormone receptor proteins	Changes in age-related changes in rat liver steroid hormone receptor proteins.
1	changes i superoxide dismutase activity and copper during development and ageing in the fruit fly drosophila melanogaster	Modifies l' superoxide dismutase i and copper activity during development and aging in the fruit fly drosophila melanogaster.
1	molecular basis of age dependent changes in the activity of adenine nucleotide translocase	The molecular basis of changes in the apos; activity of the apos; adenine nucleotide translocase depends on the apos; age.
1	stereological changes in the capillary network and nerve cells of the aging human brain	Stereological changes in the hair network and nerve cells of the aging human brain.
1	morphometric studies on synapses of the cerebellar glomerulus the effect of centrophenoxine treatment in old rats	Morphometric studies of synapses of the cerebellar glomerulus, the apos effect, centrophenoxin treatment in old rats.
1	age dependent gene induction in quail oviduct x alterations on the post transcriptional level enzymic aspect	Apos-dependent gene-induced age; quail oviduct x alterations in the liver; enzymatic aspect of the post transcriptional level.
1	models of the biological age of the rat i a factor model of age parameters	Models of age; biological age of rat a factorial model of parameters; age.
1	the effect of age and pentobarbitone tolerance on pentobarbitone depression of calcium 45 uptake by mouse brain synaptosomes	L' effect of age and pentobarbitone tolerance on the decrease in calcium 45 uptake by mouse brain synaptosomes.
1	age related changes in the kinetic properties of the acetyl coa carboxylase and phospholipid content of rat liver	Changes in apo; age of kinetic properties of apo; acetyl coa carboxylase and phospholipid content of rat liver.
1	the influence of age alcohol consumption and body build on gonadal function in men	L' influence of alcohol and body consumption according to age; age is based on gonadal function in men.
1	the effect of age on the pharmacokinetics of diazepam	Effect of age on the pharmacokinetics of diazepam.
1	survival under hypoxia age dependence and effect of cholinergic drugs	Survival in diabetic conditions; age- and age-dependent hypoxia; effect of cholinergic drugs.
1	lymphocyte subpopulations in the thymus of sjl j mice age related alterations and the effect of spontaneous reticulum cell sarcoma development	Under-lymphocyte populations in mouse thymus sjl j, alterations due to age and age; and the effect of spontaneous reticulum cell sarcoma development.
1	age related changes in the sensitivity to vibration	Changes related to vibration; age in sensitivity to vibration.
1	age and changes in vocal jitter	L' age and changes in vocal vibration.
1	intellectual differences of adult men related to age and physical fitness before and after an exercise program	Adult men's intellectual differences are related to age and physical fitness before and after an exercise program.
1	age related characteristics of thyroxine action on the cytochrome content in rat liver mitochondria and on body weight	Dos-related characteristics; age of onset; thyroxine action on cytochrome content in rat liver mitochondria and on body weight.
1	altered hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione as a function of age in mice	Change in hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione as a function of age in mice.
1	is weakness in old age due to muscle wasting	C' is the weakness of old age due to muscle loss.
1	age related changes in extracellular materials in the inner wall of schlemm s canal	Changes related to apos; age of extracellular material in the inner wall of schlemm s canal.
1	orthopaedic findings of the foot as related to age and body weight among women author s transl	Orthopedic findings of the foot in relation to age and body weight among female translators.
1	at prophylaxis of disturbance of the electrolyte and water metabolism age author s transl	The prophylaxis of the disturbance of the apos; electrolyte and metabolism of the apos; age of the authors transl.
1	starvation in the rat ii effect of age and obesity on protein sparing and fuel metabolism	Fasting in the rat; effects of age and weight; obesity on appetite; protein savings and energy metabolism.
1	effects of age and alcohol on psychomotor performance of men	The effects of age and alcohol on the psychomotor performance of men.
1	age related radio morphologic changes in the extremity muscles	Radio-induced morphological changes in the apos; age in the extremity muscles.
1	psychological changes from midlife to early old age implications for the maintenance of mental health	The psychological changes of the early forties have implications for the maintenance of mental health.
1	mental health characteristics and acceptance rejection of old age	Mental health characteristics and acceptance of rejection of old age.
1	sex differences in the response to apomorphine in rats	There were sex differences in the response to apos; apomorphine.
1	age related decrease in repair of oxidative damage to surface sulfhydryl groups on rat adipocytes	Apos-related decrease; age of repair of oxidative damage to surface sulfhydryl groups on rat adipocytes.
1	age related changes in dopamine lhrh and somatostatin in the rat hypothalamus	Changes in liver function; age of dopamine lhrh and somatostatin in the rat hypothalamus.
1	localization of cellular changes within multimodal sensory regions in aged monkey brain possible implications for age related cognitive loss	The localization of cellular changes in multimodal sensory regions of older monkey brain may have implications for age-related cognitive loss.
1	memory for verbal and spatial information as a function of age	Memory of verbal and spatial information as it relates to a person's age.
1	the meaning and measurement of age identity	The meaning and measurement of identity; age.
1	the effect of age on the ability of oocytes to synthesize rna and proteins during in vitro maturation	The effect of age on the ability of oocytes to synthesize nana and proteins during in vitro maturation.
1	age dependent variations in choline and ethanolamine phosphorylating activities of rodents	Changes in age; phosphorylating activity of choline and apos; ethanolamine in rodents.
1	age related changes in the cornea	Age-related changes in the cornea.
1	changes in vagal activity and response to muscarinic receptor agonists with age	Changes in vagal activity and response to muscarinic receptor agonists with age.
1	dynamics of changes in the estradiol receptor content in the nuclear fraction of the hypothalamus of female rats during ontogenesis	The dynamics of changes in receptor content of estradiol in the nuclear fraction of the apos; hypothalamus of female rats during apos; ontogenesis.
1	antibodies against mycobacterium leprae antigen 7 from birth to 18 months of age an indicator of intra uterine infection in leprosy	Antigen 7 of mycobacterium leprae from birth to 18 months of age is an indicator of apos; intra-@ uterine infection in leprosy.
1	causes of age dependency of mammary tumour induction by carcinogens in rats	Causes of breast cancer dependence; age; breast tumour induction by carcinogens in rats.
1	the effect of age on the activity and molecular properties of human brain monoamine oxidase	The effect of age on the activity and molecular properties of human brain monoamine oxidase.
1	influence of ration physical form ruminal degradable nitrogen and age on rumen epithelial propionate and acetate transport and some enzymatic activities	Influence of physical form of rations, oil; degradable nitrogen of rumen and oil; age on propionate and oil transport; epithelial acetate of rumen and certain enzymatic activities.
1	hematology of beta thalassemia trait age related developmental aspects and intrafamilial correlations	L' hematology of beta thalassemia related to age; age was related to developmental aspects and intrafamilial correlations.
1	kindling in developing rats variability of afterdischarge thresholds with age	Burning in developing rats variability of post thresholds-dump with age.
1	increased ototoxicity in both young and old mice	Increased liver function; ototoxicity in both young and old mice.
1	comparative study on age related changes and atherosclerotic involvement of the coronary arteries of male and female subjects up to 40 years of age	Comparative study of changes in age and weight; atherosclerotic involvement in coronary arteries of male and female subjects under 40 years of age.
1	relation between age and respiratory response to inhaled carbon dioxide in healthy nigerians	Relationship of age and respiratory response to inhaled carbon dioxide in healthy Nigerians.
1	age peculiarities of the citrate pyruvate system functional in rat liver	Age of the functional citrate pyruvate system in rat liver.
1	a morphological study of the mouse subependymal layer from embryonic life to old age	A morphological study of the mouse ependymal layer under-from embryonic life to old age.
1	correlation analysis of free mammary gland stroma cells during age associated reorganization and spontaneous tumor development	Correlation analysis of free mammary gland stromal cells during age-related reorganization and spontaneous development of tumours.
1	age dependent synthesis of nucleic acids and proteins in the livers of different lines of rats	Synthesis of nucleic acids and proteins as a function of age in the liver of different strains of rats.
1	metabolic studies of n bases of phospholipids and long chain bases of sphingolipids in two weeks old mouse brain tissue in comparison with one month old mouse visceral tissues	Metabolic studies of the n-bases of phospholipids and long-chain bases of sphingolipids in brain tissue from 2-week-old mice compared with visceral tissues from 1-month-old mice.
1	circulating levels of pregnancy zone protein normal range and the influence of age and gender	Protein levels in the circulating pregnancy zone are within normal range and influence of age and sex.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 35s sulfate into two proteoglycan populations from human cartilage	Apos-related changes; age in onset; sulfate incorporation of 35s into two proteoglycan populations of human cartilage.
1	the effect of age and sex on bone density bone mineral content and cortical index	The effect of age and sex on bone density, bone mineral content and cortical index.
1	nucleus raphe dorsalis a morphometric golgi study in rats of three age groups	Nucleus vulgaris, morphometric study golgi in rats of three groups; age.
1	the geometry of diarthrodial joints its physiologic maintenance and the possible significance of age related changes in geometry to load distribution and the development of osteoarthritis	The geometry of the joints diarthrodiales its physiological maintenance and possible importance of changes in geometry as a function of age; age for the distribution of loads and the development of osteo; osteoarthritis.
1	comparison of specific activities of enzymes from young and old dogs and mice	Comparison of the specific activities of enzymes in young and old dogs and mice.
1	age related glycogen changes in bruchids	Glycogen changes as a function of age; changes in age of bruchids.
1	energy and protein metabolism in ewes as influenced by age and dietary protein calorie ratio	Ewes' energy and protein metabolism is influenced by age and the ratio of protein to calories in food.
1	comparative effects of age and sedation on sinus node automaticity and atrioventricular conduction	Comparative effects of apo; age and sedation on apo; sinus node automaticity and atrioventricular conduction.
1	age related differences for motion sickness in the rat	Disability-related differences; age for motion sickness in rats.
1	age differences in acoustic and semantic recognition memory	Differences in acoustic and semantic recognition memory systems.
1	age differences in memory as a function of depth of processing	Age in memory as a function of processing depth.
1	effect of age on visual functions	Effect of age on visual functions.
1	age differences in the duration of mating period of female rhesus monkeys	Differences in age during the breeding period; mating of female rhesus monkeys.
1	effects of age and dietary restriction on the kidney glomeruli of mice observations by scanning electron microscopy	The effects of age and dietary restriction on mouse renal glomeruli observed by scanning electron microscopy.
1	thyroid hormone carbohydrate interaction in the rat correlation between age related reductions in the inducibility of hepatic malic enzyme by triiodo l thyronine and a high carbohydrate fat free diet	Interaction of apo carbohydrates; thyroid hormone in correlation between apo-related reductions; apo age; apo indutibility; hepatic malic enzyme by thyronine triiodo l and a high carbohydrate free-fat diet.
1	age dependent changes in fsh responsive adenylyl cyclase and fsh binding in rat testes	Apos-dependent changes; age in apos fsh response; adenylyl cyclase and fsh binding in rat testis.
1	specific and nonspecific immune factors in dental plaque fluid and saliva from young and old populations	Specific and non-specific-immune factors in dental plaque fluid and saliva in young and old populations.
1	a comparative morphometric analysis of the component tissues of the urethra in young and old female c57bl icrfat mice	A comparative morphometric analysis of the constitutive tissues of the urethra in young and old female mice.
1	age changes on bone size and mass in two strains of senescent rats	Age changes in size and bone mass in two strains of senescing rats.
1	a primate model for age and host response to genital herpetic infection determinants of latency	A primate model for age and response of the host to genital herpes infection latency determinants.
1	age related changes in processing explicit and implicit language	Changes related to language; age in explicit and implicit language treatment.
1	effects of age on long term memory retention of fixed interval responding	Effects of age on long-term memory retention of reactive fixed intervals.
1	age related facilitation in recall following semantic processing	Easy recall related to apos; age following semantic treatment.
1	on the locus of age differences in visual information processing	On the locus of differences in age; visual information.
1	age related pigmentation changes in the coats of allophenic mice	Pigmentation changes due to changes in age in the coats of allophenic mice.
1	lack of age associated immune dysfunction in mucosal associated lymph nodes	Immune dysfunction associated with lack of apo; age in mucosal associated lymph nodes.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption by guinea pig paramedian cortex	The effect of age related changes in oxygen consumption on the guinea pig paramedian cortex.
1	influence of age on the discrimination of barium in comparison with strontium during their incorporation into compact bone	The influence of age on the discrimination of barium against strontium during their incorporation into compact bones.
1	age dependent changes in esterases of callosobruchus maculatus fab bruchidae coleoptera	Changes in esterases of callosobruchus maculatus fabuchidae coleoptera with respect to age.
1	serum digoxin concentration and age	Serum digoxin concentration and age.
1	life span age trends in laterality	Laterality trends by age and lifespan.
1	influence of sex and age on the biological half life of cadmium in mice	The influence of sex and age on the half-life of cadmium in mice.
1	further observations on age induced changes of cerebral arteries in rats an electron microscopic study	Other observations on age induced changes in cerebral arteries in rats, an electron microscopic study.
1	changes in the content of riboflavin and its coenzyme in tissues during the aging of rats	Changes in the content of riboflavin and its coenzyme in tissues during aging of rats.
1	results of operation for obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in the elderly septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients 65 years of age or older	Procedure for obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in elderly patients with septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients 65 years of age or older.
1	age related progress among children with severe learning difficulties	Age of children with severe learning difficulties.
1	age related changes of serum 5alpha androstane 3alpha 17beta diol in normal men	Apos-related changes; age of serum 5alpha androstane 3alpha 17beta diol in normal males.
1	the influence of age height and weight on the bone mineral content of lumbar vertebrae	L' influence of height and weight of l' age of l&apos on the bone mineral content of lumbar vertebrae.
1	age related changes in the degradation of thyrotrophin releasing hormone by human and rat serum	Changes related to apo; age in degradation of thyrotrophin release hormone from human serum and rat serum.
1	age strain interrelations in lipid metabolism of rats	Interrelations between d&apos strains; age in lipid metabolism in rats.
1	postnatal development and sex differences in hepatic phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity in the rat	Postnatal development and sexual differences in hepatic phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity in rats.
1	differences in mitogenic responses of murine t cells to two distinct phytohemagglutinin pha subcomponents	Differences in mitogenic responses of two-membered murine t cells under distinct phytohemagglutinin pha components.
1	reasons for eliminating the age 60 regulation for airline pilots	Reasons for delay; elimination of the airline pilots 60-year rule.
1	age dependence of social learning processes author s transl	L' influence of language; age on processes; social learning Authors' translations.
1	age related quantitative changes in enzyme activities of rat brain	Quantitative, age-related changes in enzyme activities of rat brain.
1	the influence of age on the hypothalamo neurohypophyseal system of the mouse a quantitative ultrastructural analysis of the posterior pituitary	L' influence of age on the hypothalamo neurohypophysial system of the mouse has a quantitative ultrastructural analysis of the posterior pituitary.
1	susceptibility of mice to rotavirus infection effects of age and administration of corticosteroids	Infection with rotavirus: susceptibility of mice to the effects of the disease; age and age; administration of corticosteroids to rotavirus infections.
1	longitudinal changes in rigidity in old age	Longitudinal changes in old age rigidity.
1	intelligence or relevant knowledge as a prerequisite for strategies in environmental management in old age	L' intelligence or relevant knowledge as a prerequisite for environment in old age management strategies.
1	the nervous system and old age	It's called the nervous system and old age.
1	age related changes in very low density lipoprotein metabolism in normal rats	Age@ related changes in very low density lipoprotein metabolism in normal rats.
1	creatine kinase isozyme transition in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy	Creine kinase isozyme transition in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy.
1	blood pressure in the child and the adolescent effect of age sex height weight and heart rate	The effect of sex on height, weight and heart rate in children and adolescents.
1	regional changes in phenylethanolamine n methyltransferase of rat brain during development	Regional changes in the phenylethanolamine n methyltransferase of rat brain during development.
2	studies on the fine structure of the mammalian testis i differentiation of the spermatids in the cat felis domestica	Studies on the fine structure of mammalian testes, differentiation i of spermatids in the cat felis domestica.
2	convulsant drug action on neuronally isolated cerebral cortex	Convulsant drug action on neuronally isolated cerebral cortical tissue.
2	estrogen sensitive neurons and sexual behavior in female cats	Estrogen-sensitive neurons and sexual behavior in female cats.
2	postsynaptic potentials and spike patterns during augmenting responses in cat s motor cortex	Potential post @-synaptic and peak profiles during responses d' increase in motor cortex of cat.
2	the effects of choline and other factors on the release of acetylcholine from the stimulated perfused superior cervical ganglion of the cat	The effects of choline and d*apos; other factors on the release of acetylcholine from the stimulated perfused cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	visual motion detection in the cat	Visual motion detection in the cat.
2	reduction of dimethylsulfoxide to dimethylsulfide in the cat	Reduction of dimethylsulfoxide to dimethylsulfide in the cat.
2	post tetanic repetitive activity in the cat soleus nerve its origin course and mechanism of generation	L' post-tetanic repetitive activity in the cat soleus nerve follows its course; origin and generation mechanism.
2	attack elicited by stimulation of the thalamus of cats	Attack caused by stimulation of the thalamus of cats.
2	midbrain hemisection effect on cortical acetylcholine in the cat	Effect of spinal cord injury; midbrain hemisection on the spinal cord; cortical acetylcholine in the cat.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord i action potentials of the motoneuron	The electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord i potential d' action of motor neuron.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord ii interaction among peripheral inputs and recurrent inhibition	Electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord ii interaction between peripheral inputs and l' recurrent inhibition.
2	the responses to tyramine of the normal and denervated nictitating membrane of the cat analysis of the mechanisms and sites of action	The responses to tyramine of the normal and denervated nictitating membrane; analysis of the cat of the mechanisms and sites; action.
2	activating and synchronizing centers in cat brain electroencephalograms after lesions	Activation and synchronization of centers in cat brain electroencephalograms after lesion.
2	prolonged excitation in the visual cortex of the cat	Prolonged excitement in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	nicotine effect on the sleep cycle of the cat	Effect of nicotine on the sleep cycle of the cat.
2	histological evidence against the view that the cat s optic nerve contains centrifugal fibres	Histological evidence against the idea that the cat optic nerve contains centrifugal fibers.
2	somatic sensory cortical projection areas excited y tactile stimulation of the cat a triple representation	The somatic sensory cortical projection zones excite y tactile stimulation of the cat a triple representation.
2	the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat carotid body	Distribution of cholinesterases in the body of the cat.
2	background and evoked activity in the auditory pathway effects of noise shock pairing	History and activity evoked in the effects of the auditory pathway of l' pairing of acoustic shocks.
2	anteroventral cochlear nucleus wave forms of extracellularly recorded spike potentials	Forms; peak wave potentials of the anteroventral cochlear nucleus recorded extracellularly.
2	the reflex response to sinusoidal stretching of soleus in the decerebrate cat	The reflex response to sinusoidal stretching of the soleus in the decerebrated cat.
2	organization of neurones in the cat cerebral cortex that are influenced from group i muscle afferents	Organization of neurons in the cat cerebral cortex that are influenced by muscle afferents in group i.
2	asphyxial potentials of spinal grey matter and of ventral and dorsal roots	Asphyxiated potential of spinal gray matter and of ventral and dorsal roots.
2	vesico somatic reflexes in the chronic spinal cat	Sesomatic vesico reflexes in the chronic spinal cat.
2	intracellular recording from cat spinal motoneurones during acute asphyxia	Intracellular recording of cat spinal motoneurons during acute asphyxiation.
2	intracellular recording from spinal motoneurones in cats with post asphyxial rigidity	Spinal motoneuron intracellular recording in cats with post-asphyxial rigidity @-@.
2	excretion of the glucuronide of thyroxine in cat bile	L' excretion of thyroxine glucuronide in the bile of the cat.
2	facilitation electrical response enhanced by conditional excitation of cerebral cortex	Facilitation of electrical response stimulated by apos; conditional excitation of the cerebral cortex.
2	synaptic noise as a source of variability in the interval between action potentials	Synaptic noise as a source of variability in the interval between potentials.
2	excitation of afferent cardiac sympathetic nerve fibres during myocardial ischaemia	L' excitation of afferent cardiac sympathetic nerve fibres during myocardial ischemia.
2	acetylcholine sensitivity of cerebellar neurones in the cat	The acetylcholine sensitivity of cerebellar neurons in cats.
2	learning set formation by mink ferrets skunks and cats	Learning by mink ferrets, skunks and cats.
2	input resistance electrical excitability and size of ventral horn cells in cat spinal cord	Electrical excitability and size of ventral horn cells in cat spinal cord.
2	specialized receptive fields of the cat s retina	Specialized receptive fields of the cat retina.
2	the action of dopamine on neurones of the caudate nucleus	L' action of dopamine on the neurons of the caudate nucleus.
2	an analysis of spontaneous impulse activity of units in the striate cortex of unrestrained cats	An analysis of the epos; spontaneous activity of impulses; units in the cortex of unbridled cats.
2	the effects of suxamethonium and acetylcholine on the behaviour of cat muscle spindles during dynamics stretching and during fusimotor stimulation	The effects of suxamethonium and l' acetylcholine on the behaviour of cat muscle spindles during apos; dynamic stretching and during fusimotor stimulation.
2	the release of acetylcholine from the spinal cord of the cat by antidromic stimulation of motor nerves	The release of acetylcholine from the spinal cord of cats by antidromic stimulation of the motor nerves.
2	the effects of acute haemorrhage on respiration in the cat	The effects of acute hemorrhage on the cat's breathing.
2	algebraical summation in synaptic activation of motoneurones firing within the primary range to injected currents	Algebraic summit of l' synaptic activation of motor neurons unloading in the primary range to the currents injected.
2	the effect of thyrocalcitonin on blood bone calcium equilibrium in the perfused tibia of the cat	Lapos; effect of thyrocalcitonin on apos; calcium balance of blood bones in the perfused tibia of the cat.
2	visual receptive fields in the cat s retina complications	Visual reception fields in the cat's retina complications.
2	glial responses to degenerating cerebellar cortico nuclear pathways in the cat	Degenerating glial responses to nuclear pathways in the cat cerebellar cortico.
2	sleep suppression of rapid eye movement phase in the cat after electroconvulsive shock	Sleep suppression of the rapid eye movement phase in the cat following electroconvulsive shock.
2	a study of cholinoceptive cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus	A study of cholinoceptive cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus.
2	receptive fields in the cat retina a new type	Receptive fields in the cat retina a new guy.
2	control of somatosensory input by cerebral cortex	Control of the apos; entry of somatosensory by the cerebral cortex.
2	control of sensory fields by stimulation of hypothalamus	Control of sensory fields by stimulation of the hypothalamus.
2	effects of changes in po2 pco2 and ph on the total vascular resistance of perfused cat kidneys	Effects of changes in po2 pco2 and ph on the total vascular resistance of perfused cat kidneys.
2	ascending and descending cholinergic fibers in cat spinal cord histochemical evidence	Up and down cholinergic fibers in cat spinal cord, histochemical evidence.
2	interaction of cortex and superior colliculus in mediation of visually guided behavior in the cat	Interaction of cortex and superior colliculus in mediating visually guided behavior in the cat.
2	inferior olive of the cat intracellular recording	Lower olive of l' intracellular recording of the cat.
2	origin of synaptic noise	L' origin of synaptic noise.
2	cilia formation in the adult cat brain after pargyline treatment	Cilia formation in the adult cat brain after pargyline treatment.
2	oxygen tension changes evoked in the brain by visual stimulation	Pressure changes evoked in the brain by visual stimulation.
2	binocularly driven neurons in visual cortex of split chiasm cats	Binoculated suckers in the visual cortex of separated chiasmata cats.
2	an inhibitory process in the cerebral cortex	Uh, an inhibitory process in the cerebral cortex.
2	dissociation of the visual placing response into elicited and guided components	Dissociation of the visual placement response into the desired and guided visual placement components.
2	responses in the inferior olive to stimulation of the cerebellar and cerebral cortices in the cat	Reactions of the olive; olive inferior to stimulation of the cerebellar and cerebral cortices in the cat.
2	the laminar organization of dorsal horn and effects of descending impulses	L' laminar organization of the dorsal horn and effects of descending impulses.
2	somatic afferent input to posterior thalamic neurones and their axon projection to the cerebral cortex in the cat	Somatic input to posterior thalamic neurons and axonal projection to the cerebral cortex in the cat.
2	activity of cells in the lateral vestibular nucleus as a function of head position	Activity of cells in the lateral vestibular nucleus as a function of head position.
2	thalamic projection of muscle nerve afferents in the cat	Thalamic projection of muscle nerve afferents in the cat.
2	disuse in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	Deactivation in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat.
2	release by tubocurarine of dopamine and homovanillic acid from the superfused caudate nucleus	Tubocurarine release of dopamine and d' homovanillic acid from the superfused caudate nucleus.
2	thin layer chromatography of 1 dimethylaminonaphthalene 5 sulphonyl derivatives of amino acids present in superfusates of cat cerebral cortex	Chromatography in thin layer d'apos; a derivative dimethylaminonaphthalene 5 sulfonyl d'apos; amino acids present in superfusates of cerebral cortex of cats.
2	effect on temperature of 5 hydroxytryptamine injected into the cerebral ventricles of cats	The temperature effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine injected into the cerebral ventricles of cats.
2	site of origin of the abnormal discharge in the electrocorticogram produced by tubocurarine perfused through the anterior horn of a lateral ventricle	The origin of the abnormal discharge in the apos; electrocorticogram produced by tubocurarine perfused through the anterior horn of apos; lateral ventricle.
2	an afferent pathway for the selective release of vasopressin in response to carotid occlusion and haemorrhage in the cat	The mechanism of selective release of vasopressin in response to carotid occlusion and hemorrhage in the cat.
2	vestibular cochlear and trigeminal projections to the cortex in the anterior suprasylvian sulcus of the cat	Cochlear, vestibular, and trigeminal projections to the cortex in the anterior suprasylvian groove of the cat.
2	responses of the pyramidal tract to stimulation of the baboon s motor cortex	Reactions of the pyramidal tract to stimulation of the baboon motor cortex.
2	cerebral synaptic transmission and behavioral effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine a potential psychotogen	Cerebral synaptic transmission and behavioral effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine, a potential psychotogen.
2	temporal relation between long lasting aftercontractions and action potentials in cat papillary muscles	Temporal relationship between long-term post-contractions and d&apos potentials; action in cat papillary muscles.
2	somatosensory thalamic neurons effects of cortical depression	The effects of cortical depression on somatosensory thalamic neurons.
2	visual form discrimination after removal of the visual cortex in cats	Discrimination of visual form after l'apos; ablation of the visual cortex in cats.
2	dna content of neurons in the cat hippocampus	DNA content of neurons in cats; hippocampus of cats.
2	termination and functional organization of the dorsal spino olivocerebellar path	Completion and functional organization of the path spino olivocerebellar dorsal.
2	three factors limiting the reliable detection of light by retinal ganglion cells of the cat	Three factors limit the reliable detection of light by retinal ganglion cells in cats.
2	effects of nicotine on electrocortical activity and acetylcholine release from the cat cerebral cortex	The effects of nicotine on the apos; electrocortical activity and release of apos; acetylcholine from cat cerebral cortex.
2	gallamine flaxedil and synaptic transmission in the spinal cord	Gallamine flaxedil and synaptic transmission in the spinal cord.
2	projection to cerebral cortex of group i muscle afferents from the cat s hind limb	Projection of i-group muscle afferents from the hind limb of the cat to the cerebral cortex.
2	the projection of splanchnic afferents on the cerebellum of the cat	The projection of splanchnic afferents on the cerebellum of the cat.
2	visual area of the lateral suprasylvian gyrus clare bishop area of the cat	Visual area of the lateral suprasylvian gyrus clare of l' bishop of the cat.
2	motor effects of copper in the caudate nucleus reversible lesions with ion exchange resin beads	Motor effects of copper in reversible caudate core lesions with ion exchange resin beads.
2	a quantitative analysis of the responses of certain dorsal horn neurones to mechanical stimulation of the large foot pad in cats	A quantitative analysis of the responses of certain dorsal horn neurons to mechanical stimulation of the pedal cushion in cats.
2	extraocular muscle afferents to the cerebellum of the cat	Extraocular muscle connects to the cerebellum of the cat.
2	responses evoked in the cerebellar cortex by stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Reactions evoked in the cerebellar cortex by stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat.
2	a reappraisal of reflex stepping in the cat	A reassessment of the walking reflex in the cat.
2	quantitative aspects of sensitivity and summation in the cat retina	Quantitative aspects of sensitivity and summation in the cat retina.
2	kinins beta adrenergic receptors and functional vasodilatation in the submaxillary gland of the cat	Adrenergic beta receptor kinins and functional vasodilatation in the gland under-maxillary of the cat.
2	3h nicotine in cat superior cervical and nodose ganglia after close arterial injection in vivo	Three hours nicotine in the cat's superior cervical ganglia and nodulate after narrow arterial injection in vivo.
2	group ia synaptic input to fast and slow twitch motor units of cat triceps surae	Synaptic influx of group ia to fast and slow twitch motor units of triceps surae cat.
2	athetoid and choreiform hyperkinesias produced by caudate lesions in the cat	Athetoid and choreiform hyperkinesis caused by caudate lesions in the cat.
2	acetylcholine facilitation atropine block of synaptic excitation of cortical neurons	Apos facilitation; acetylcholine atropine blockade of apos; synaptic excitation of cortical neurons.
2	preserved vagal visceromotor function following destruction of the dorsal motor nucleus	The vagal visceromotor function was preserved after destruction of the dorsal motor nucleus.
2	dorsal column projection of fibres from the cat knee joint	Dorsal column projection of the fibers of the spinal cord; articulation of the cat's knee.
2	effect of barbiturates on quantal synaptic transmission in spinal motoneurones	The effect of barbiturates on quantum synaptic transmission in spinal motoneurons.
2	glycine in the spinal cord of cats with local tetanus rigidity	Glycine in the spinal cord of cats with local tetanic rigidity.
2	opponent color cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Staining of adversary cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat.
2	non linear summation of unit synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones of the cat	Nonlinear summation of unit synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurons of the cat.
2	analysis of synaptic efficacy in spinal motoneurones from quantum aspects	L&apos analysis; synaptic efficiency of spinal motoneurons under quantum angle.
2	neuromuscular contacts in intracranial arteries of the cat	Neuromuscular contacts in intracranial arteries of cats.
2	the spatial selectivity of the visual cells of the cat	Spatial selectivity of the visual cells of the cat.
2	excitatory postsynaptic potential and monosynaptic reflex discharge of spinal motoneurons during anoxic insult	Exciting postsynaptic potentials and monosynaptic reflex discharge of spinal motoneurons during anoxic aggression.
2	properties of cholinoceptive neurones in the medial geniculate nucleus	Properties of cholinoceptor neurons in the median geniculate nucleus.
2	studies on cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus	Studies of cholinergic transmission in the median geniculate nucleus.
2	mephenesin methocarbamol chlordiazepoxide and diazepam actions on spinal reflexes and ventral root potentials	Mephenesin methocarbamol chlordiazepoxide and diazepam actions on spinal reflexes and ventral root potentials.
2	release to the cerebral ventricles of substances with possible transmitter function in the caudate nucleus	Release into the cerebral ventricles of substances with possible transmitter function in the caudate nucleus.
2	thermosensitivity of neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of the cat	Thermosensitivity of neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of the cat.
2	cat colour vision one cone process or several	The colour vision of d' a cat is made by a cone or several cones.
2	the nature and location of certain phasic mechanoreceptors in the cat s foot	Nature and the location of certain phasic mechanoreceptors in the foot of the cat.
2	the mechanical properties of cat soleus muscle during controlled lengthening and shortening movements	The mechanical properties of cat soleus muscle during controlled elongation and shortening movements.
2	correlation of prostaglandin release from the cerebral cortex of cats with the electrocorticogram following stimulation of the reticular formation	Correlation between prostaglandin release from the cerebral cortex of cats and l' electrocorticogram upon stimulation of reticular formation.
2	effect of monoamineoxidase inhibitors on 5 hydroxytryptamine output from perfused cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized cats	Effect of monoamine inhibitors-oxidase on release of 5 hydroxytryptamine from perfused cerebral ventricles of anesthetized cats.
2	cat brain mucopolysaccharides and their in vivo hyaluronidase digestion	Cat brain mucopolysaccharides and their in vivo hyaluronidase digestion.
2	electrophysiological evidence for binocular disparity detectors in human visual system	Electrophysiological evidence for binocular disparity detectors in the human visual system.
2	somatovisceral pathway rapidly conducting fibers in the spinal cord	Somatoviscal tract, rapidly conducting fibers in the spinal cord.
2	effects of nicotine and tobacco smoke on the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and olfactory bulb	Effects of nicotine and tobacco smoke on electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and olfactory bulb.
2	visual experience modifies distribution of horizontally and vertically oriented receptive fields in cats	Visual experience alters the distribution of horizontally and vertically oriented receptive fields in cats.
2	number coding in association cortex of the cat	D&apos is a digital code in the cortex of the d&apos.
2	behavioral discrimination of click intensity in cat	Behavioural discrimination of click intensity in cats.
2	afferent connexions to group i activated cells in the main cuneate nucleus of the cat	Connections to group i activate the cells in the main cuneate nucleus of the cat.
2	central nervous system activity associated with the pain evoked by bradykinin and its alteration by morphine and aspirin	An activity of the central nervous system associated with pain evoked by bradykinin and its alteration by morphine and l' aspirin.
2	superior colliculus single unit responses to stimulation of visual cortex in the cat	Higher unitary responses of the colliculus to stimulation of the visual cortex in the cat.
2	a method of stimulating different segments of the autonomic outflow from the spinal column to various organs in the pithed cat and rat	A method to stimulate different segments of the autonomous flow of the vertebral column to various organs in the decerebrate cat and rat.
2	histochemical and functional correlations in anterior horn neurons of the cat spinal cord	Histochemical and functional correlations in anterior horn neurons of the cat spinal cord.
2	unilateral ablation of the auditory cortex in the cat impairs complex sound localization	L' unilateral ablation of the auditory cortex in the cat prevents a complex sound localization.
2	effects of general depressant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	The effects of general depressants on the electrical responses of isolated patches of cat cerebral cortex.
2	effects of general stimulant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	Effects of general stimulants on the electrical responses of isolated patches of cat cerebral cortex.
2	a study in vivo of adrenergic receptors in the rectum and in the internal and sphincter of the cat	An in vivo study of adrenergic receptors in the rectum and in the inner sphincter and sphincter of the cat.
2	neural pathways associated with hypothalamically elicited attach behavior in cats	Neural pathways associated with behavioral d' hypothalamic attachments in cats.
2	visual patterned reflex present during hypothalamically elicited attack	Visual reflex present during apo; attack triggered hypothalamously.
2	the effects of dimethothiazine on muscle spindle activity in the decerebrate cat	The effects of dimethothiazine on muscle spindle activity in the brain.
2	geometrical illusions and the response of neurones in the cat s visual cortex to angle patterns	The geometric illusions and the response of the neurons in the cat's visual cortex to d' angle.
2	microinjections of tubocurarine leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin into the cerebral cortex of anaesthetized cats	Microinjections of leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin tubocurarine into the cerebral cortex of anesthetized cats.
2	superior colliculus some receptive field properties of bimodally responsive cells	Upper colliculus some receptive field properties of bimodal-response cells.
2	how does the striate cortex begin the reconstruction of the visual world	How does the striated cortex start-t-it the reconstruction of the visual world?
2	somatosensory responses of bulboreticular units in awake cat relation to escape producing stimuli	Somatosensory responses of bulboreticular units in relation to flight-awakening cats producing stimuli.
2	functional specializations of the vascular bed of soleus	Functional specializations of the vascular bed of the soleus.
2	the extraneuronal uptake and localization of noradrenaline in the cat spleen and the effect on this of some drugs of cold and of denervation	The extraneuronal uptake and localization of noradrenaline in the cat spleen and l' effect of certain drugs of cold and denervation on the one-ci.
2	responses of cat retinal ganglion cells to brief flashes of light	Reactions of cat retinal ganglion cells to brief flashes of light.
2	the form and distribution of the surface evoked responses in cerebellar cortex from intercostal nerves in the cat	The shape and distribution of the surface suggest responses in the cerebellar cortex of intercostal nerves in the cat.
2	perfusion from cerebral ventricle to cisterna magna in the unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on body temperature	Perfusion of the cerebral ventricle to the magna cistern in the unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on body temperature.
2	the representation of three dimensional visual space in the cat s striate cortex	The representation of the apos; three-dimensional visual space in the cat's striated cortex.
2	cervico lumbar reflex interactions involving a proprioceptive receiving area of the cerebral cortex	Lumbar reflex interactions involving a proprioceptive receptive area of the cerebral cortex.
2	mesopic increment threshold spectral sensitivity of single optic tract fibres in the cat cone rod interaction	Thresholds; mesopic enhancement; spectral sensitivity of leaf fibers; a single optical tract in the cell; interaction of cat cone rods.
2	differences in the distribution of catecholamine varicosities in cat and rat reticular formation	Differences in the distribution of catecholamine varicosities in cat and rat reticular formation.
2	field potentials evoked in the brain stem of the cat by stimulation of the carotid sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Field potentials evoked in the brain stem of the cat by stimulation of the lip; glossopharyngeal aorta of the carotid sinus and upper laryngeal nerves.
2	responses of cells in the brain stem of the cat to stimulation of the sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Cells of the brain stem of the cat respond to stimulation of the glossopharyngeal aorta of the sinus and upper laryngeal nerves.
2	ouabain sensitive carrier mediated transport of glucose from the cerebral ventricles to surrounding tissues in the cat	A ouabain-sensitive carrier mediates the transport of glucose from the cerebral ventricles to surrounding tissues in the cat.
2	the afferent innervation of two infrahyoid muscles of the cat	L' afferent innervation of two infrahyoid muscles of the cat.
2	impedance changes across the footpad of the cat in relation to action and secretion in sweat glands	L' impedance changes on the mat of the cat as a function of the action and secretion in sweat glands.
2	spontaneous activity of neurones of nucleus reticularis thalami in freely moving cats	Spontaneous activity of nucleus reticularis thalami neurons in free-ranging cats.
2	centrifugal inhibitory processes affecting neurones in the cat cochlear nucleus	D&apos process; centrifugal inhibition of cat cochlear nucleus neurons.
2	acetylcholine liberation from cerebral cortex during paradoxical rem sleep	Release of apos; acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex during REM sleep.
2	the release of gamma aminobutyric acid during inhibition in the cat visual cortex	Release of apos; aminobutyric gamma acid during apos; inhibition in the cat visual cortex.
2	the mechanism of the cardio acceleration elicited by electrical stimulation of the parahypoglossal area in the cat	The mechanism of cardio acceleration elicited by electrical stimulation of the parahypoglossal region in cats.
2	recurrent inhibition of interneurones monosynaptically activated from group ia afferents	Recurrent inhibition of monosynaptically activated interneurons by ia group afferents.
2	spino spinal mechanisms in the chloralose anaesthetized cat	Spinal spinal mechanisms in the chloralose anesthetized cat.
2	cat colour vision evidence for more than one cone process	The cat's colour vision shows the existence of more than a dozen; a cone process.
2	responses to visual contours spatio temporal aspects of excitation in the receptive fields of simple striate neurones	The responses to visual spatial contours-time of the apos; excitation in the receiving fields of single striated neurons.
2	presynaptic and post synaptic inhibition elicited in the cat s dorsal column nuclei by mechanical stimulation of skin	Presynaptic and post-synaptic inhibition was induced in the cat's dorsal column nuclei by mechanical stimulation of the cat skin.
2	variations of the visual responses of the superior colliculus in relation to body roll	Variations in the visual responses of the superior colliculus to its body roll.
2	identification of prostaglandins in prevertebral venous blood after preganglionic stimulation of the cat superior cervical ganglion	Identification of prostaglandins in prevertebral venous blood after preganglionic stimulation of the cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	acetylcholine in adrenergic terminals of the cat iris	L' acetylcholine in the adrenergic terminals of the apos; iris of the cat.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of cat visual cortical cells cone rod interaction	Chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of the apos; cat visual cortical cell cone rod interaction.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes initiated by coronary receptors	Spinal sympathetic reflexes initiated by coronary receptors.
2	neuronal correlates of eye movements in the visual cortex of the cat	Neuronal correlations of eye movements in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	spontaneous activity of cerebellar purkinje cells and their responses to impulses in climbing fibres	L' spontaneous activity of cerebellar purkin cells and their responses to impulses in climbing fibers.
2	vasoactive hormones in endotoxin shock a comparative study in cats and dogs	Vasoactive hormones endotoxin shock a comparative study in cats and dogs.
2	effects of some sympathomimetic drugs and their antagonists on afterdischarges elicited in chronically isolated slabs of cerebral cortex	The effects of some sympathomimetic drugs and their antagonists on posts-discharges were elicited in chronically isolated slices of the cerebral cortex.
2	anomalous retinal pathways in the siamese cat an inadequate substrate for normal bioncular vision	Abnormal retinal pathways in the Siamese cat are an inadequate substrate for normal bioncular vision.
2	fusimotor innervation in the cat	We have a fusimotor innervation in the cat.
2	the parasympathetic secretory nerves of the lacrimal gland of the cat	It's called the parasympathetic secretory nerves of the cat's lacrimal gland.
2	rod dependent intracellular responses to light recorded from the pigment epithelium of the cat retina	Rod-dependent intracellular responses to light recorded in the apos; pigment epithelium of the cat retina.
2	binocular interaction fields of single units in the cat striate cortex	Fields; binocular interaction of single units in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat after reinnervation by vagus fibres	Synaptic transmission in the upper cervical ganglion of the cat after reinnervation by vaginal fibers.
2	the purkinje shift in cat extent of the mesopic range	The purkinje movement in the cat range of the mesopic range.
2	aberrant visual projections in the siamese cat	I've got aberrant visual projections in the Siamese cat.
2	the flow of juice from the pancreatic gland of the cat in response to vagal stimulation	The flow of juice from the pancreatic gland of the cat in response to vagal stimulation.
2	recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurones exhibiting background discharges in the decerebrate and the spinal cat	Recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurons with background discharge in the decerebrate and the spinal cat.
2	the paramedian reticular nucleus a site of inhibitory interaction between projections from fastigial nucleus and carotid sinus nerve acting on blood pressure	The paramedic reticular nucleus is a d&apos site; inhibitory interaction between fastigial nucleus and carotid sinus nerve projections acting on blood pressure.
2	modification of the reflex response to stimulation of carotid sinus baroreceptors during and following stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area in the cat	Modification of the reflex response to stimulation of carotid sinus baroreceptors during and after stimulation of the hypothalamic defense zone in the cat.
2	sex difference in the number of the sympathetic neurons in the spinal cord of the cat	Sexual difference in the number of sympathetic neurons in the spinal cord of cats.
2	a neuron model with spatially distributed synaptic input	Neural model with distributed synaptic input in space.
2	radiofrequency cordotomy for the relief of spasticity in decerebrate cats	Radiofrequency cordotomy for the relief of spasticity in decerebrated cats.
2	spatial synaptic distribution of recurrent and group ia inhibitory systems in cat spinal motoneurones	Spatial synaptic distribution of periodic and group inhibition systems in cat spinal motoneurons.
2	visual and auditory inputs into the cuneate nucleus	Both visual and auditory inputs into the cuneate kernel.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on afferent transmission in the dorsal column lemniscal system	L' action of carbon dioxide on afferent transmission in dorsal column lemniscal system.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on synaptic transmission in the cuneate nucleus	L' the action of carbon dioxide on synaptic transmission in the dune nucleus.
2	specialized membrane junctions between neurons in the vertebrate cerebellar cortex	Specialized membrane junctions between neurons in the vertebrate cerebellar cortex.
2	physiological and structural changes in the cat s soleus muscle due to immobilization at different lengths by plaster casts	Physiological and structural changes in the cat soleus muscle due to immobilization of different lengths by plaster.
2	spontaneous and evoked activity of neurones in the somatosensory thalamus of the waking cat	Spontaneous and evoked activity of neurons in the somatosensory thalamus of the awake cat.
2	sustained and transient neurones in the cat s retina and lateral geniculate nucleus	Neurons transient and sustained in the cat retina and lateral genital nucleus.
2	the form and distribution of the receptive fields of pacinian corpuscles found in and around the cat s large foot pad	The shape and distribution of the receptive fields of the pacinian corpuscles found in and around the cat's great paw.
2	selective inhibition by glycine of some somatic reflexes in the cat	Selective glycine inhibition of some somatic reflexes in the cat.
2	effects of dopamine on the conductance of perfused vascular beds of the chloralosed cat	Effects of dopamine on the conductance of perfused vascular beds of the chloralose cat.
2	responses of neurones in the cat s visual cerebral cortex to relative movement of patterns	Neuronal responses of the cat's visual cerebral cortex to the relative movement of patterns.
2	cholinergic and non cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus of the cat	Noncholinergic and cholinergic transmission in the median genicular nucleus of the cat.
2	a study of stretch and vibration reflexes of the cat by intracellular recording from motoneurones	A study of the reflexes of stretch and vibration of the cat by intracellular recording of motoneurons.
2	the vasomotor component of the carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex in the cat during stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area	The vasomotor component of the carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex in the cat during stimulation of the hypothalamic defense zone.
2	image quality of the cat eye measured during retinal ganglion cell experiments	Quality of the apos; image of the apos; cat's eye measured during retinal ganglion cells experiments.
2	morphologic alterations of synapses in electrically stimulated superior cervical ganglia of the cat	Morphological alterations of synapses in the electrically stimulated superior cervical ganglia of the cat.
2	the time course of minimal excitory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones by group ia afferent fibres	L' temporal evolution of post-minimum excitatory synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurons by group ia afferents.
2	spinal integration of segmental cortical and breathing inputs to thoracic respiratory motoneurones	Spinal integration of segmental cortical and respiratory inputs to chest ventilatory motoneurons.
2	columnar organization of visually driven neurons in the superior colliculus of the cat	Organize visually controlled neurons in the upper colliculus of the cat into columns.
2	effects of cingulate cortex lesions on emotional behavior and delayed responses in cats	Effects of cingulate cortical lesions on emotional behavior and delayed responses in cats.
2	antagonism of gaba by picrotoxin in the feline cerebral cortex	L' antagonism of the gaba by picrotoxin in the feline cerebral cortex.
2	effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on the in vivo release of acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex of the cat	Effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on the in vivo release of acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex of cats.
2	the mechanism of the facilitatory action of edrophonium in cat skeletal muscle	The facilitative action of edrophonium in the cat skeletal muscle.
2	modifications of dorsal horn cell activities in the spinal cord after intra arterial injection of bradykinin	Modification of the dorsal horn cell activity in the spinal cord after intra-arterial injection of bradykinin.
2	influence of adaptation level on response pattern and sensitivity of ganglion cells in the cat s retina	L' influence level; adaptation on response pattern and sensitivity of the cat retina ganglion cells.
2	cat hemoglobin ph dependent cooperativity of oxygen binding	L' cat hemoglobin depends on the cooperativity of oxygen binding.
2	visual input to the pontine nuclei	It's a visual entry into the pontic nuclei.
2	unit responses to moving visual stimuli in the motor cortex of the cat	Unit reactions to moving visual stimuli in the motor cortex of the cat.
2	release of 5 hydroxytryptamine from caudate nucleus and septum	Release 5 hydroxytryptamine from caudate nucleus and septum.
2	release of transmitters on stimulation of the nucleus linearis raphe in the cat	D&apos release; emitters by stimulation of the nucleus linearis raphe in the cat.
2	effects of denervation and reinnervation on the responses of kitten muscles to acetylcholine and suxamethonium	Effects of denervation and reinnervation on the responses of kitten muscles to acetylcholine and suxamethonium.
2	an electrophysiological demonstration of the axonal projections of single spinal interneurones in the cat	An electrophysiological demonstration of the axonal projections of simple spinal interneurons in cats.
2	facilitation of monosynaptic excitatory synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones evoked by internuncial impulses	The facilitation of monosynaptic excitatory synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurons evoked by interuncial impulses.
2	quantal components of the inhibitory synaptic potential in spinal mononeurones of the cat	Quantum components of the inhibitory synaptic potential in spinal mononurons of the cat.
2	comparison of receptive field organization of the superior colliculus in siamese and normal cats	Comparison of the receptive field organization of the superior colliculus in normal and Siamese cats.
2	the contrast sensitivity of the cat	The contrast sensitivity of the cat.
2	contrasts in spatial organization of receptive fields at geniculate and retinal levels centre surround and outer surround	Contrasts in the apos; spatial organization of receptive fields at geniculate and retinal levels surround the centre and exterior.
2	the effect of chronic duct ligation on the vascular and secretory responses of the cat s submaxillary gland	The effect of chronic ligation of the channels on the vascular and secretory responses of the gland is described below.
2	morphology of interneurones mediating ia reciprocal inhibition of motoneurones in the spinal cord of the cat	Morphology of medically mediating epithelials; reciprocal inhibition of motor neurons in the spinal cord of cats.
2	sarcocystis in mice inoculated with toxoplasma like oocysts from cat feces	The sarcocyst resembles oocysts of cat feces in mice inoculated with toxoplasm.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of lgn neurone receptive fields in cat cone rod interaction	Chromatic sensitivity and l' spatial organization of lgn neuronal receptor fields in the apos; cat cone rod interaction.
2	sensitivity of the nictitating membrane of the cat to succinylcholine after decentralization and denervation	Sensitivity of the nictitating membrane of the cat to succinylcholine after decentralization and denervation.
2	anaesthetic cardiovascular and respiratory effects of a new steroidal agent ct 1341 a comparison with other intravenous anaesthetic drugs in the unrestrained cat	Anesthetic cardiovascular and respiratory effects; a new steroidal agent ct 1341 a comparison with other anesthetic intravenous drugs in the cat without restraint.
2	the behavior of chronic cats with lesions in the frontal association cortex	The behavior of chronic cats with lesions in the frontal association.
2	determination of the frequency response of isometric soleus muscle in the cat using random nerve stimulation	Determination of the frequency response of isometric soleus muscle in the cat by random nerve stimulation.
2	cats reared in stroboscopic illumination effects on receptive fields in visual cortex	Cats raised in strobe lighting had effects on receptive fields in visual cortex.
2	differential transport of protein in axons comparison between the sciatic nerve and dorsal columns of cats	Differential protein transport in comparative axons between the sciatic nerve and dorsal columns of cats.
2	effects of adrenaline isoprenaline and histamine on transsinusoidal fluid filtration in the cat liver	Apos, adrenaline, isoprenaline and apos; histamine on transsinusoidal fluid filtration in cat liver.
2	synchronization of discharge spontaneous and evoked between inspiratory neurons	Synchronization of spontaneous and evoked discharge between inspiring neurons.
2	neuronal organization of the central respiratory mechanisms in the brain stem of the cat	Neuronal organization of the central respiratory mechanisms in the cat brain stem.
2	anatomical and functional heterogeneity of the medullary respiratory neurons	Functional and anatomical heterogeneity of the medullary respiratory neurons.
2	isolation of rd 114 like oncornavirus from a cat cell line	Isolate rd 114 as oncornavirus from a cat cell line.
2	receptive field organization of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells which subserve different function roles	Receptive field organization of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells with different functional roles.
2	release of transmitters into the perfused third cerebral ventrical of the cat	Release of transmitters into the third perfused cerebral ventricle of the cat.
2	the visual areas in the splenial sulcus of the cat	You know, the visual areas in the cat's spleen groove.
2	visual resolution and experience acuity deficits in cats following early selective visual deprivation	Visual resolution and lapos; experience of deficiency; acuity in cats following apo; early selective visual deprivation.
2	visual experience without lines effect on developing cortical neurons	Visual experience without lines of motion; effect on cortical neuron development.
2	predatory attack grooming and consummatory behaviors evoked by electrical stimulation of cat cerebellar nuclei	Predatory attack, grooming and consumption behaviors evoked by electrical stimulation of the cat cerebellar nuclei.
2	flux not retinal illumination is what cat retinal ganglion cells really care about	Flux and not retinal illumination is what cat retinal ganglion cells are really interested in.
2	the organization of visual receptive fields or neurons in the cat colliculus superior	L' organization of visual fields or neurons in the cat superior colliculus.
2	receptive fields of simple cells in the cat striate cortex	Receptive areas of simple cells in the cat striated cortex.
2	electron microscopy of cat spinal cord subject to circulatory arrest and deep local hypothermia 15 c	Electronic microscopy of the cat spinal cord subject to circulatory arrest and severe local hypothermia 15 c.
2	morphometry of an ischemic lesion of cat spinal cord	Morphometry of cat spinal cord ischemic lesion.
2	evidence from the use of vibration during procaine nerve block that the spindle group ii fibres contribute excitation to the tonic stretch reflex of the decerebrate cat	L' use of vibration during procaine nerve blockage shows that spindle group ii fibers contribute to apos; d&apos reflex excitation; decerebrated cat tonic stretch.
2	gamma aminobutyric acid antagonism in visual cortex different effects on simple complex and hypercomplex neurons	L' visual cortical gamma antagonism; aminobutyric acid had different effects on simple complex and hypercomplex neurons.
2	on the pharmacology of the gamma aminobutyric acid receptors on the cuneo thalamic relay cells of the cat	On the pharmacology of gamma receptors of l' aminobutyric acid on cuneo thalamic relay cells of the cat.
2	the amplitude time course and charge of unitary excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurone dendrites	L' temporal evolution of the apos; amplitude and charge of unit excitatory post synaptic potentials were evoked in spinal motoneuron dendrites.
2	physiological types and histochemical profiles in motor units of the cat gastrocnemius	Physiological types and histochemical profiles in motor units of the gastrocnemius cat.
2	anatomy and innervation ratios in motor units of cat gastrocnemius	Anatomy and rate; innervation in motor units of cat gastrocnemius.
2	actions of morphine on the segmental reflex of the decerebrate spinal cat	Effects of morphine on the segmental reflex of the spinal cat.
2	excitability changes in cat lateral geniculate cells during saccadic eye movements	Dapos changes; excitability in cat lateral geniculate cells during jerky eye movements.
2	the projection of the posterior knee joint nerve to the cerebellar cortex	The projection of the posterior knee joint nerve into the cerebellar cortex.
2	receptive field analysis responses to moving visual contours by single lateral geniculate neurones in the cat	L' receptive field analysis responds to moving visual contours by simple lateral genicular neurons in the cat.
2	kitten visual cortex short term stimulus induced changes in connectivity	Kitten visual cortex short-term stimulus induced changes in connectivity.
2	interaction between picrotoxin and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	An interaction between picrotoxin and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the upper cervical ganglion of the cat.
2	synaptic vesicle depletion and recovery in cat sympathetic ganglia electrically stimulated in vivo evidence for transmitter secretion by exocytosis	Synaptic vesicle depletion and recovery in cat sympathetic ganglia were electrically stimulated in vivo, indicating exocytosis transmitter secretion.
2	central projection of tooth pulp primary afferents in the cat	Central projection of primary tooth tissue afferents in the cat.
2	conditioned blink reflex and neuronal activity in the auditory cortex of the cat	Conditioned flashing reflex and neural activity in the auditory cortex of the cat.
2	dynamic properties of denervated fast and slow twitch muscle of the cat	The dynamic properties of the slow, fast twitching muscles of the cat.
2	relationships between motor nerve conduction velocities and motor unit contraction characteristics in a slow twitch muscle of the cat	Relationship between motor nerve conduction velocities and contraction characteristics of the motor unit in a slow twitch muscle of the cat.
2	electrical activity of cerebral cortex in the cat during closure of simple form of a temporary connection	Cerebral cortical electrical activity in the cat during closure of apos; a simple form of temporary connection.
2	functional significance of ventral descending tracts of the spinal cord in the cat	Functional importance of ventral descending pathways of the spinal cord in cats.
2	5 hydroxyindoleacetic acid in the lumbar fluid a specific indicator of spinal cord injury	Five hydroxyindole acetic acid in the lumbar fluid, a specific indicator of spinal cord injury.
2	macroelectrodic activity of the facial nucleus of the cat	Macroelectrode activity of the facial nucleus of the cat.
2	operant conditioning of single unit response patterns in visual cortex	Operational conditioning of single unit response patterns in visual cortex.
2	influence of eye movements on geniculo striate excitability in the cat	L' influence of eye movements on apos; excitability of striate geniculo in cats.
2	normal contractile state of hypertrophied myocardium after pulmonary artery constriction in the cat	Normal contractile state of hypertrophied myocardium after stroke constriction; pulmonary artery in cat.
2	mechanical studies on the retractor bulbi muscle and its motor units in the cat	Mechanical studies of the retractor bulb and of its motor units in the cat.
2	the detection of differential beta adrenoceptor blockade in the cat	The detection of apos; a differential blockade of beta-adrenergic receptors in the cat.
2	the bleaching and regeneration of rhodopsin in the cat	The bleaching and regeneration of rhodopsin in the cat.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells size and shape of receptive field centres	The size and shape of cat retinal ganglion cells are receptive field centres.
2	temperature sensitivity of the paw of the cat a behavioural study	The temperature sensitivity of the paw of the cat, a study of the behavior.
2	the afferent discharge pattern of atrial mechanoreceptors in the cat during sinusoidal stretch of atrial strips in situ	The afferent discharge pattern of atrial mechanoreceptors in the cat during sinusoidal stretch of atrial strips in situ.
2	the projection of the vestibular nerve to the cerebral cortex in the cat	The projection of the vestibular nerve to the cerebral cortex in the cat.
2	antigenicity of serum albumin in allergy against cat or dog epithelium significance of the radioallergosorbens test in the diagnosis of allergies	Antigenicity of the drug; serum albumin in allergy to the drug; epithelium of the cat or dog, meaning of the radioallergosorbens test in the diagnosis of allergies.
2	types of synapses in the claustrum of the cat	Type of synapses in the claustrum of the cat.
2	the structure of the first auditory cortex a i in the cat i light microscopic observations on its organization	The structure of the first auditory cortex a i in the cat i light microscopic observations on its organization.
2	manganese ions and synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Manganese ions and synaptic transmission in the upper cervical ganglion of the cat.
2	reconstruction of axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord using golgi stained serial sections	Reconstruction of the axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord with golgi-stained serial sections.
2	fine structure and distribution of axon terminals from the cochlear nucleus on neurons in the medial superior olivary nucleus of the cat	Fine structure and distribution of axonal terminals of the cochlear nucleus on neurons in the middle upper olivary nucleus of the cat.
2	projections of extraocular neck muscle and retinal afferents to superior colliculus in the cat their connections to cells of origin of tectospinal tract	Projections of extraocular neck muscle and retinal afferents to the superior colliculus in the cat their connections to d&apos cells; origin of the tectospinal tract.
2	enlargement of synaptic vesicles in degenerating nerve endings a comparison between cat and monkey	Augmentation of synaptic vesicles in degenerating nerve endings; comparison between cat and monkey.
2	effect of delayed local cooling on experimental spinal cord injury	Effect of delayed local cooling on experimental spinal cord injury syndrome.
2	behavioural contrast sensitivity of the cat in various visual meridians	The behavioral contrast sensitivity of the cat in various visual meridians.
2	the effect of indomethacin on the cardiovascular and metabolic responses to e coli endotoxin in the cat	Lapos; effect of apos; indomethacin on the cardiovascular and metabolic responses to apos; endotoxin; e coli in cats.
2	organization of corticofugal neurones in somatosensory area ii of the cat	Organizing corticofugal neurons in somatosensory zone ii of the cat.
2	the effect of visual experience on the development of stimulus specificity by kitten cortical neurones	L' effect of apos; visual experience on the development of stimulus specificity by kitten cortical neurons.
2	contradiction of auditory and visual information by brain stimulation	Contradiction of the apos; auditory and visual information through brain stimulation.
2	abolition of electrically induced cortical seizures by stereotactic thalamic lesions evidence for descending thalamopontine medullar spinal connections in the centrencephalic epileptic system of the cat	Abandonment of electrically induced cortical seizures by stereotactic thalamic lesions indicates the existence of descending thalamopontin medullary connections in the centrainphalic epileptic system of the cat.
2	the activity of respiratory neurons before and during panting in the cat	L' activity of respiratory neurons before and during panting in the cat.
2	treatment of ethylene glycol toxicosis in cats	Treatment of ethylene glycol toxicosis in cats.
2	cns site of antiarrhythmic action of diphenylhydantoin dph in the cat	Site of infection; antiarrhythmic action of diphenylhydantoin dph in the cat.
2	the mode of action of 5 hydroxytryptophan in facilitating a stretch reflex in the spinal cat	The mode of action of 5 hydroxytryptophan to facilitate a spinal cat's reflex.
2	vestibular and somatosensory inflow to the vestibular projection area in the post cruciate dimple region of the cat cerebral cortex	vestibular and somatosensory entry in the vestibular projection area of the cat cerebral cortex post-crossed.
2	evoked activity of cat association cortex neurons in different sleep stages	We talked about the activity of cortical neurons in cats at different stages of sleep.
2	evoked automatism repeated responses of cat cardiac ventricular fibers	Evoked automated repeated reactions of cat cardiac ventricular fibers.
2	corticofugal influences of somatosensory areas of the cortex on signal transmission in the posterior ventral nucleus	Corticofugal influences of the somatosensory regions of the cortex on signal transmission in the posterior ventral nucleus.
2	quantitative aspects of the shift effect in cat retinal ganglion cells	Quantitative aspects of the apos; displacement effect in cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	the synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axon varicosities in the dorso medial portion of the nucleus tractus solitarius of the cat possible roles in the regulation of cardiovascular reflexes	The synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axonal varicosities in the dorso-middle portion of the nucleus of the cat solitary bundle may play a role in the regulation of cardiovascular reflexes.
2	effects of co 2 and extracellular h iontophoresis on single cell activity in the cat brainstem	Effects of apo; ionophoresis co 2 and apo; extracellular ionophoresis h on apo; monocyto-cellular activity in the cat brain stem.
2	cardiovascular chemoreflexes from the perfused innervated ileum of the cat	Cardiovascular chemoreflexes from the cat's innervated ileum.
2	effect of nitrogen narcosis on cortical and subcortical evoked responses in the cat	L' effect of nitrogen narcosis on cortical and cortical responses has been reported in cat.
2	projections from the nucleus and tractus solitarius in the cat	Projections of the nucleus and tractus solitarius in the cat.
2	olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of the feline brain stem their location morphology and number determined by retrograde axonal transport and acetylcholinesterase histochemistry	The olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of the feline brain have a localization morphology and number determined by retrograde axonal transport and l' l&apos histochemistry; acetylcholinesterase.
2	projections of the dorsal column nuclei and the spinal cord on the inferior olive in the cat	Projections of the nuclei of the dorsal column and the spinal cord on the apos; lower olive of the cat.
2	variability of the relative preference for stimulus orientation and direction of movement in some units of the cat visual cortex areas 17 and 18	Variability of relative preference for stimulus orientation and direction of motion in certain units of zones 17 and 18 of the visual cortex of the cat.
2	the effect of a chronic lesion in cortical area 17 on the visual responses of units in area 18 of the cat	L' effect of a chronic lesion in cortical area 17 on visual responses of units in area 18 of cat.
2	climbing fibre inputs to cerebellar purkinje cells from trigeminal cutaneous afferents and the si face area of the cerebral cortex in the cat	Rising fiber inputs into cerebellar purkinje cells from trigeminal skin afferents and from the face if of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	responses of fastigial nucleus neurones to stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Reactions of fastigial nucleus neurons to stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat.
2	periodic excitability changes across the receptive fields of complex cells in the striate and parastriate cortex of the cat	The excitability varies periodically through the receptor fields of complex cells in the striated and parastriate cortex of the cat.
2	corticofugal effects from sensorimotor area i and somatosensory area ii on neurones of the pontine nuclei in the cat	Corticofugal effects of sensorimotor region i and somatosensory region ii on neurons in pontic nuclei of cats.
2	visual receptive fields and their images in superior colliculus of the cat	Visual receptive fields and their images in superior colliculus of the cat.
2	representation of cochlea within primary auditory cortex in the cat	Representation of cochlea in the primary auditory cortex of cats.
2	abnormal neuronal responses during evolution of a penicillin epileptic focus in cat visual cortex	Abnormal neural responses during apo; evolution of epileptic penicillin in the visual cortex of cats.
2	disinhibition in cat motor cortex by ammonia	Disinhibition in the cat motor cortex by ammonia.
2	spatial limits of epileptogenic cortex its relationship to ectopic spike generation	Spatial limits of epileptogenic cortex its relationship to ectopic epileptic generation.
2	reticulospinal neurons with and without monosynaptic inputs from cerebellar nuclei	Reticulospinal neurons with and without monosynaptic inputs from cerebellar nuclei.
2	medial recticular neurons projecting rostrally	Median recticular neurons projecting to the rostral region.
2	viruslike inclusions in the cecal epithelial cells of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae	Virus-like inclusions in the cecal epithelial cells of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae.
2	eye movement related activity in the visual cortex of dark reared kittens	Eye movement activity in the visual cortex of black-bred kittens.
2	single unit activity in the lateral amygdala of the cat during sleep and waking	Unitary activity in the lateral amygdala of the cat during sleep and awakening.
2	receptive field characteristics and plastic properties of visual cortical cells in kittens reared with or without visual experience	Receptive field characteristics and plastic properties of visual cortical cells in kittens reared with or without a visual experience.
2	modification of single neurons in the kitten s visual cortex after brief periods of monocular visual experience	Modification of single neurons in kitten visual cortex after brief periods of d' monocular visual experience.
2	labyrinthine influence on cat forelimb motoneurons	The labyrinthine influence on the motoneurons of the cat's forelimbs.
2	thalamo cortical projections for recruiting responses and spindling like responses in the parietal cortex	Thalamo cortical projections for recruitment responses and spindle responses in the parietal cortex.
2	receptive fields in cat superior colliculus after visual cortex lesions	Receptive fields in cat superior colliculus after visual cortical lesions.
2	unusual arrangement of agranular endoplasmic reticulum in the interstitial cells of the cat ovary	Unusual arrangement of the agranular endoplasmic reticulum in the interstitial cells of the cat ovary.
2	nonhematopoietic neoplasms in cats	Nematopoietic neoplasms in cats.
2	effect of constant currents on orthodontic tooth movement in the cat	Effect of constant currents on orthodontic tooth movement in cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord i analysis of amino acids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic of monosynaptic reflexes in the spinal cord of a cat i analysis of amino acids at maximum potentiation.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord ii determination of phospholipids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanus potentiation post-tetanus of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord ii determination of phospholipids at maximum potentiation.
2	vagal responses to vestibular stimulation in the cat	Vaginal responses to vestibular stimulation in the cat.
2	influence of dendritic location and membrane properties on the effectiveness of synapses on cat motoneurones	The influence of dendritic localization and membrane properties on the apos; efficiency of synapses on cat motoneurons.
2	hypoxia induced tachypnea in carotid deafferented cats	L' hypoxia induced tachypnea in carotid deafferent cats.
2	distribution of latencies in the receptive fields of superior colliculus neurons in cats	Distribution of latencies in the receptor fields of superior colliculus neurons in cats.
2	neural plasticity in visual cortex of adult cats after exposure to visual patterns	Neural plasticity in visual cortex of adult cats after exposure to visual patterns.
2	far field acoustic response origins in the cat	The acoustic response in the far field came from the cat.
2	a re evaluation of the effects of lesions of the pontine tegmentum and locus coeruleus on phenomena of paradoxical sleep in the cat	A reassessment of the effects of lesions of the pontic tegmentum and locus coeruleus on cat REM sleep phenomena.
2	effect of phenoxybenzamine on experimental cerebral arterial spasm in cats	The effect of phenoxybenzamine on experimental cerebral arterial spasms in cats.
2	quantitative changes in proteins in the cat parietal zone large pyramids in various sleep stages and during wakefulness	Quantitative changes in proteins in the cat wall zone of large pyramids at various stages of sleep and awakening.
2	grouping of neurons according to their rna content during different functional states of the cerebral cortex	The grouping of neurons according to their rna content during different functional states of the cerebral cortex.
2	glycogen content in the brain stem neurons during hyperthermia in cats	Glycogen content of brainstem neurons during hyperthermia in cats.
2	mesencephalic porjections of the rectus lateralis muscle afferents in the cat	The mesencephalic porjections of the rectus lateralis afferent muscle in the cat.
2	local specialization at ileocecal junction of the cat and opossum	Local specialization @-@cæcale of the cat and l' opossum.
2	density of distribution of nerve cells in the nuclei of the cat s trigeminal complex	Density of distribution of nerve cells in the nuclei of the cat trigeminal complex.
2	neuronal organization of the large cell segment of the cat s red nucleus	Neural organization of the large cell segment of the cat's red nucleus.
2	method of live microscopy of the neurons of the cat brain	A method of live microscopy of cat brain neurons.
2	ultrastructural characteristics of axon terminals of the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus in the cat	Ultrastructural characteristics of the axonal terminals of the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus in the cat.
2	epidemiological pattern of chagas disease in an endemic area of costa rica	Epidemiological pattern of chagas disease in an endemic region of Costa Rica.
2	cell structure and function in the visual cortex of the cat	Cell structure and function in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	effects of anesthetics on ponto geniculo occipital waves from the oculomotor nucleus of the cat	Effects of anesthetics on ponto geniculo occipital waves in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat.
2	projection of the vestibular nerve to the si arm field in the cerebral cortex of the cat	Exposure of the vestibular nerve to the arm field into the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	a fluorescence and electron microscopic study of the adrenergic innervation in the vestibular ganglion and sensory areas	An electron microscopic and fluorescence study of the adrenergic innervation in the vestibular ganglion and sensory regions.
2	effects on the ventral spinocerebellar tract neurones from deiters nucleus and the medial longitudinal fascicle in the cat	Effects on neurons in the ventral spinocerebellar tract of the diter nucleus and on the median longitudinal fascicle of the cat.
2	detection of natural complex sounds by cells in the primary auditory cortex of the cat	Detection of complex natural sounds by cells in the primary auditory cortex of the cat.
2	visual suppression of vestibular nystagmus after cerebellar lesions	Visual suppression of vestibular nystagmus after cerebellar lesions.
2	study of the protection on afforded by nicergoline against the effects of cerebral ischemia in the cat	A study of the protection offered by nicergoline against the effects of ischaemia in the brain in cats.
2	specific membrane properties of cat motoneurones	Specific membrane properties of cat motoneurons.
2	method for the morphological identification of individual brain neurons intravitally and after fixation	Procedure; morphological identification of individual brain neurons intravital and post-fixation.
2	chemosensitive neurons on the ventral medullary surface	Uh, chemosensitive neurons on the ventral medullary surface.
2	leukocytic pyrogen and sodium acetylsalicylate on hypothalamic neurons in the cat	Leukocyte Pyrogen and sodium acetylsalicylate on hypothalamic neurons in the cat.
2	an electron microscope study of synaptic organization in the lateral reticular nucleus of the medulla oblongata in the cat	An electron microscopic study of the synaptic organization in the lateral reticular nucleus of the medulla oblongata in the cat.
2	diversity of mossy fibres in the cerebellar cortex in relation to different afferent systems an experimental electron microscopic study in the cat	The diversity of mossy fibers in the cerebellar cortex in relation to different afferent systems has been studied experimentally by cat electron microscopy.
2	diencephalic projections from the midbrain reticular formation	Diencephalic projections of reticular formation of the midbrain.
2	demonstration of a somatotopically organized projection onto the paramedian lobule and the anterior lobe from the lateral reticular nucleus an experimental study with the horseradish peroxidase method	Demonstration of apos; a somatotopic projection of the paramedian lobule and anterior lobe from the lateral reticular nucleus (LRC), experimental study using horseradish peroxidase method.
2	transganglionic degeneration in trigeminal primary sensory neurons	Transganglionic degeneration in trigeminal primary sensory neurons.
2	the pontocerebellar projection onto the paramedian lobule in the cat an experimental study with the use of horseradish peroxidase as a tracer	The projection of the cerebellar pontocephalus onto the paramedian lobule in the cat was the subject of an experimental study using horseradish peroxidase as a tracer.
2	the pontine projection from the inferior colliculus in the cat an experimental anatomical study	The pontine projection of the inferior colliculus in the cat was an experimental anatomical study.
2	macular input to neurons of the spinoreticulocerebellar pathway	Macular entry into neurons of the spinoreticulocerebellar pathway.
2	studies on the cerebellar projections from the main and external cuneate nuclei in the cat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	L' study of the cerebellar projections of the main and outer cuneate nuclei in the cat by retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	a golgi and electron microscopical study of nerve cells in layer i of the cat auditory cortex	A Golgi- and electron-microscopic study of nerve cells in the i-layer of the auditory cortex of the cat.
2	sustained and transient discharges of retinal ganglion cells during spontaneous eye movements of cat	Transient sustained discharge of retinal ganglion cells during spontaneous eye movements in the cat.
2	visual discrimination of flux equated figures by cats with brain lesions	The flow visual discrimination was equivalent to figures by cats with brain damage.
2	the auditory cortical projections onto the medial geniculate body in the cat an experimental anatomical study with silver and autoradiographic methods	The auditory cortical projections on the median geniculate body in the cat an experimental anatomical study with silver and autoradiographic methods.
2	analysis of various factors involved in eeg synchronization during milk drinking in the cat	L' analysis of various factors involved in eeg synchronization during milk consumption in cats.
2	normal critical bands in the cat	Critical tapes in the cat normal.
2	endogenous primate and feline type c viruses	Endogenous primate and feline c-viruses.
2	integrated somatomotor cardiovascular and gastrointestinal adjustments induced from the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Somatomotor, cardiovascular and gastro-intestinal integrated adjustments induced by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus.
2	reflexogenic contraction of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat following small or large intestinal distension	Reflexogenic contraction of the ileo sphincter-cecal in the cat following a cat's distension of the small or large intestine.
2	effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam on neuronal activities of the lateral vestibular nucleus in cats	Effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam on neuronal activities of the lateral vestibular nucleus in cats.
2	the effect of background illumination on the responses of the neurons of the cat s superior colliculus to moving stimuli	L' effect of l' background illumination on the responses of neurons of the cat superior colliculus to moving stimuli.
2	dipropylacetic acid depakine in experimental epilepsy in the alert cat	L&apos depakin; dipropylacetic acid in the apos; experimental epilepsy in the alert cat.
2	motor nerve terminal response to edrophonium in delayed dfp neuropathy	The motor nerve's terminal response to edrophonium in delayed DPF neuropathy.
2	influence of vestibular and afferent impulses on the spontaneous activity of interneurons in the spinal cord of cats	Influence of the vestibular and afferent impulses on the apos; spontaneous activity of interneurons in the spinal cord of cats.
2	variability of neuronal activity of the parastriate cortex before and after callosotomy	Variability of the neuronal activity of the parastrized cortex before and after callosotomy.
2	motoneuron dendrites role in synaptic integration	Role of dendrite motoneurons in synaptic integration.
2	impariment by 6 hydroxydopamine of locus coeruleus induced monosynaptic potential in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	L' impairment by 6 hydroxydopamine of locus coeruleus induced monosynaptic potential in the spinal trigeminal nucleus.
2	electromyography in the localization of spinal cord and nerve root neoplasia in dogs and cats	Electromyography of the localization of spinal cord and nerve root neoplasia in dogs and cats.
2	retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase in peripheral autonomic nerves	Axonal retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase in peripheral autonomic nerves.
2	salmonellosis in a human infant a cat and two parakeets in the same household	Salmonella in a human infant, a cat and two parakeets in the same home.
2	binocular interaction in the cat s superior colliculus	Binocular interaction in the cat superior colliculus.
2	the spinal course and distribution of fore and hind limb muscle afferent projections to the superior colliculus of the cat	L' evolution of the spine and afferent projections of the fore and hind limb muscle to the superior colliculus of the cat.
2	venous drainage of the heart with special references to the excito conduction system	Venous drying of the heart with special reference to conduction system d' excito.
2	adrenergic innervation of the extramedullary arteries of the spinal cord of cats	Adrenergic innervation of the extramedullary arteries of the spinal cord of cats.
2	neuronal organization of the inspiratory center baumgarten s nucleus	Neural organization of the center d' inspiration baumgarten s nucleus.
2	e coli endotoxin shock in the cat treatment with indomethacin	E coli endotoxin shock in the cat treatment with indomethacin.
2	horner s syndrome in the dog and cat as an aid to diagnosis	Horn syndrome in the dog and cat to aid diagnosis.
2	delayed alternation learning under electrical blocking stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	L' delayed alternative learning under electrical blockade stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat.
2	the effects of acetylcholine and dopamine on the caudate nucleus depleted of biogenic amines	The effects of acetylcholine and dopamine on the caudate nucleus are free of biogenic amines.
2	a quantitative analysis of the cat retinal ganglion cell topography	Quantitative analysis of the topography of the cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	the projections of different morphological types of ganglion cells in the cat retina	The projections of different morphological types of ganglion cells in the cat retina.
2	the projections of cells in different layers of the cat s visual cortex	Projections of cells in different layers of the cat's visual cortex.
2	an electron microscope study of the red nucleus in the cat with special reference to the quantitative analysis of the axosomatic synapses	An electron microscopic study of the red nucleus in the cat with special attention to quantitative analysis of axosomatic synapses.
2	disorder and recovery of somatic sensitivity in cats with destruction of the afferent pathways of the spinal cord	Disorder and restoration of somatic sensitivity in cats with destruction of the afferent pathways of the spinal cord.
2	an analysis of the interaction of the parietal and visual regions of the cortex with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	An analysis of the interaction of the wall and visual regions of the cortex with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus.
2	the effect of stimulation of the deep layers of somatosensory zones ci and cii on the activity of motor zone mi of the cat cortex	L' effect of stimulation of the deep layers of the here and here somatosensory zones on the apos; activity of the motor zone mi of the cat cortex.
2	substance p and spinal neurones	Substance p and spinal neurons.
2	an immunoprecipitin study of the incidence of influenza a antibodies in animal sera in the ottawa area	Immunoprecipitin-based study of the immune system; incidence of influenza in animal serum in the Ottawa region.
2	the effect of neurotropic agents on evoked potentials of the association and projection regions of the cat neocortex	Effects of neurotropic agents on evoked potentials in the neocortex association and projection regions of cats.
2	an analysis of interneuronal connections in the auditory cortex of awake cats	Analysis of internaluronal connections in the auditory cortex of awake cats.
2	determinants of experimental neurosis in cats	The determinants of experimental neurosis in cats.
2	visual stimulation effects on vestibular habituation	Visual stimulation effects on vestibular habituation.
2	metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process in the brains of cats following spinal cord injuries	Metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process in the brains of cats following spinal cord injury.
2	cortical diffusion characteristics of seizure induced in the horm of ammoni ii chemical stimulation	Cortical diffusion characteristics of convulsions induced in the hormones d' ammonia ii chemical stimulation.
2	effect of quinidine together with antibiotics on contractility of cat papillary muscle	The effect of quinidine and antibiotics on the contractility of cat papillary muscle.
2	electron microscopy of the arcuate nucleus of normal and 5 hydroxydopamine treated cats	Electron microscopy of the arcuate nucleus of normal and 5 cats treated with etapos; hydroxydopamine.
2	d amphetamine induced release of newly synthesized and stored dopamine from the caudate nucleus in vivo	Amphetamine induces release of newly synthesized dopamine from the caudate nucleus in vivo.
2	a calcium ionophore stimulating the secretion of catecholamines from the cat adrenal	A calcium ionophore stimulates catecholamine secretion from the cat adrenal gland.
2	stimulus generalization between differentiated visual auditory and central stimuli	Stimulus generalization between differentiated visual auditory and central stimuli.
2	visual receptive field properties of cells in area 18 of cat s cerebral cortex before and after acute lesions in area 17	Receptive visual field properties of cells in area 18 of the cat cerebral cortex before and after acute lesions in area 17.
2	discharge patterns of cat pontine brain stem neurons during desynchronized sleep	The firing patterns of cat bridgehead neurons during unsynchronized sleep.
2	unit activity in posterior association cortex of cat	Unital activity in cortex d' posterior association of cat.
2	afferent efferent linkages in motor cortex for single forelimb muscles	Afferent efferent links in the motor cortex for single forelimb muscles.
2	on the mechanism of the relaxing adrenaline effect on cat jejunum	On the mechanism of the l' relaxing effect of the l' adrenaline on the cat jejunum.
2	extrinsic nervous control of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat	Extrinsic nerve control of the ileo sphincter in cats.
2	motor control of nuclear bag and nuclear chain intrafusal fibres in isolated living muscle spindles from the cat	Engine control of nuclear bag and nuclear-chain intrafusal fibers in living muscle spindles isolated from the cat.
2	discharge frequency of tendon organs evoked by the contraction of motor units in the cat	Frequency of discharge of tendon organs evoked by contraction of motor units in the cat.
2	uptake and transport of exogenous peroxidase in the masticatory muscles of the cat localization of motor neurons	Capture and transport of exogenous peroxidase in the masticatory muscles of the localization of motor neurons in cats.
2	acquired and inherent trace processes in the neuronally isolated cortex	Acquired and intrinsic processes; trace state in the neuronally isolated cortex.
2	from attentiveness to sleep a topographical analysis of localized synchronized activities on the cortex of normal cat and monkey	From the apos; watch for sleep, a topographical analysis of synchronized activities localized on the cortex of normal cats and monkeys.
2	the biological significance of pgo spikes in the sleeping cat	This is the biological significance of pgo peaks in the sleeping cat.
2	temperature and behavioural responses induced in the unanaesthetized cat by the central administration of rx72601 a new anticholinesterase	Temperature and behavioral responses induced in the cat not anesthetized by the central administration of rx72601 a novel anticholinesterase.
2	feline oncornavirus associated cell membrane antigen ii antibody titers in healthy cats from household and laboratory colony environments	Oncornavirus feline associated with apo; cell membrane antigen ii titre; antibodies in healthy cats from apo; domestic and laboratory colony environments.
2	depressive effects of morphine upon lamina v cells activities in the dorsal horn of the spinal cat	Depressive effects of morphine on cell activity lamina v in the dorsal horn of the spinal cat.
2	a late component of flash evoked potentials in the cat s optic chiasma and superior colliculus its appearance due to background illumination	A late component of flash evoked potentials in the cat optic chiasma and superior colliculus is due to l' illumination of the background.
2	intracellular postsynaptic potentials of cat lateral geniculate cells and the effects of degeneration of the optic terminals	Intracellular synaptic potentials of cat lateral genital cells and effects of degeneration of optical terminals.
2	barbiturate spindle activity in the thalamic lateral ventro posterior nucleus and the second somato sensory area of the cortex	L' barbituric spindle activity in the thalamic lateral posterior ventro nucleus and the second somato sensory region of the cortex.
2	sleep cycle control and cholinergic mechanisms differential effects of carbachol injections at pontine brain stem sites	Cholinergic mechanisms and sleep cycle control Differential effects of carbachol injections at pontine brain stem sites.
2	effects of elevated magnesium on discharge of myenteric neurons of cat small bowel	Effects of elevated magnesium on discharge of myenteric neurons in cat's small intestine.
2	preliminary data on the origin of splanchnic nerve afferent fibers with respiratory influence	Preliminary data on the apos; origin of splanchnic nerve afferent fibers having a respiratory influence.
2	cytoimmunological and histochemical study of cat adenohypophyseal cells made fluorescent by the falck and hillarp technic	L&apos, a cytoimmunological and histochemical study of cat adenohypophysial cells, was made fluorescent by the hawk and mountain lion.
2	electrospinogram and spinal and cortical evoked potentials in experimental spinal cord trauma	Electrospinogram and spinal and cortical evoked potentials in experimental spinal cord trauma.
2	the depressant effect of halothane and sodium thiopental on the spontaneous and evoked activity of dorsal horn cells lamina specificity time course and dose dependence	L' depressant effect of sodium halothane and sodium thiopental on the intestine; spontaneous and evoked activity of dorsal horn blade specificity and dosage dependence.
2	oculomotor outflow and its relation to electrical activity of suprasylvian gyrus and pulvinar during paradoxical sleep in the cat	L' oculomotor flow and its relation to l' electrical activity of suprasylvian gyrus and pulvinar during paradoxical sleep in the cat.
2	electroencephalographic signs of ethanol tolerance and physical dependence in the cat	Electroencephalographic signs of ethanol tolerance and physical dependence in cats.
2	chloralose induced alteration of visually evoked response from specific and non specific regions of cat neocortex	Chloralose induced an alteration of visually evoked response to specific and nonspecific regions of the cat neocortex.
2	effects of taurine on kindled amygdaloid seizures in rats cats and photosensitive baboons	Effects of taurine on seizures; amygdala burning in cats and photosensitive baboons of rats.
2	dantrolene effects on neuromuscular function in cat soleus muscle	Dantrolene effects on neuromuscular function of cat soleus muscle.
2	the positive inotropic effect of glucagon in the chronically failed right ventricle as demonstrated in the isolated cat heart	L' positive inotropic effect of glucagon in the chronically defective right ventricle was demonstrated in the isolated cat heart.
2	microcirculation of traumatized spinal cord a correlation of microangiography and blood flow patterns in transitory and permanent paraplegia	Microcirculation of traumatized spinal cord a correlation of microangiography and blood flow patterns in temporary and permanent paraplegia.
2	dorsal column nuclei afferents in the lateral funiculus of the cat distribution pattern and absence of sprouting after chronic deafferentation	The dorsal column nuclei have afferents in the lateral funicule of the distribution pattern of the cat and l' no rejections after chronic deafferentiation.
2	the pharmacology of the inhibition of dorsal horn neurones by impulses in myelinated cutaneous afferents in the cat	The pharmacology of the inhibition of dorsal horn neurones by impulses in myelinated cutaneous afferents in the cat.
2	electrophysiological studies of the projections from the parietal association area to the cerebellar cortex	Electrophysiological studies of the projections of the d&apos zone; wall association to the cerebellar cortex.
2	suppression of cerebellar evoked potentials by a peripheral action of diphenylhydantoin	The suppression of the cerebellar potentials evoked by a peripheral action of diphenylhydantoin.
2	development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behavior in kittens effects of superior colliculus and lateral geniculate lesions	Development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behaviors in kittens effects of superior colliculus and lateral geniculate lesions.
2	anatomical and physiological evidence for a cerebellar nucleo cortical projection in the cat	Anatomical and physiological evidence of a cerebellar nucleo cortical projection in the cat.
2	electron microscopic investigation of the vestibular projection to the cat trochlear nuclei	Electron microscopic examination of the vestibular projection to the cat trochlear nuclei.
2	the effects of stimulating the cerebellar nodulus in the cat on the responses of vestibular neurons	The effects of stimulation of the cerebellar nodule in the cat on the responses of vestibular neurons.
2	neurochemical changes in the cat s spinal cord due to orthodromic tetanic stimuli i phospholipids	Neurochemical changes in the cat spinal cord due to orthodromic i phospholipid tetanus stimuli.
2	localization of laryngeal motor neurons in the kitten	Location of motor neurons in the larynx of kittens.
2	epileptogenic properties of folic acid and n5 methyltetrahydrofolate in cat	Epileptogenic properties of folic acid and n5 methyltetrahydrofolate in cat.
2	retinal degeneration associated with taurine deficiency in the cat	Retinal degeneration associated with taurine deficiency in the cat.
2	horizontal cells in cat retina with independent dendritic systems	Horizontal cells in cat retina with independent dendritic systems.
2	feedback training of 36 44 hz eeg activity in the visual cortex and hippocampus of cats evidence for sensory and motor involvement	L' feedback training d' 36 to 44 hours of activity in the visual cortex and l' cat seahorse demonstrates sensory and motor involvement.
2	receptive field mechanisms of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells in the cat	Receptive field mechanisms of sustained and transient cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	effects of visual cortex lesions following recovery from monocular deprivation in the cat	Effects of visual cortical lesions following recovery from monocular deprivation in cats.
2	a direct input from amygdaloid complex to caudate nucleus of the rat	A direct contribution from the amygdaloid complex to the caudate nucleus of the rat.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius problem of their categorisation on the basis of mechanical properties	The motor units of cat median gastrocnemius problem of their categorization on the basis of mechanical properties.
2	patterns of projection and braching of reticulospinal neurons	Schematics of reticulospinal neuron projection and reticulospinal steering.
2	neurons in the cochlear nucleus investigated with tone and noise stimuli	The neurons in the cochlear nucleus were examined at baseline using tonic and sonic stimuli.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation descending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of the projections of reticular formation of the midbrain, descending projections of the cuneiformis nucleus.
2	translaminar growth of axons in the kitten dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following removal of one eye	Translaminar growth of axons in the lateral genicular dorsal nucleus of kitten after apos; removal of one eye.
2	synaptic relationships of golgi type ii cells in the medial geniculate body of the cat	Type ii synaptic relationships of Golgi cells in the median geniculate body of the cat.
2	caliber spectra of fibers in the fasciculus gracilis of the cat cervical spinal cord a quantitative electron microscopic study	Spectre of fiber size in the fasciculus gracilis of the cat cervical spinal cord, quantitative electron microscopic study.
2	single unit activity in the posteroventral cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unital activity in the posteroventral cochlear nucleus of the cat.
2	single unit activity in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unital activity in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of the cat.
2	spindle wave synchrony in the somatosensory cortex of the cat	Spore wave synchronization in the somatosensory cortex of the cat.
2	golgi studies in the substantia gelatinosa neurons in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	Golgi studies in the substantia gelatinosa neurons of the spinal trigeminal nucleus.
2	brbiturate spindle activity in the association cortex of the cat and its relation to spindle activity in the somatosensory system	L' spindle activity in the cortex d' association of the cat and its relation to the spindle; spindle activity in the somatosensory system.
2	the dorsal column nuclear projections to the nucleus ventralis posterior lateralis thalami and the inferior olive in the cat an autoradiographic study	Nuclear projections from the dorsal column to the nucleus ventralis posterior lateralis thalami and to the inferior olive in the cat were investigated autoradiographically.
2	character of neuronal functional associations according to the content of rna and sh groups in the cat cerebral cortex	Characterization of neuronal functional associations according to the content of rna and sh groups in the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	comparison of the dimensions of synaptic vesicles in axon profiles forming synapses on the bodies and dendrites of cat motor cortex neurons	Comparison of the dimensions of synaptic vesicles in axonal profiles forming synapses on the bodies and dendrites of cat motor cortical neurons.
2	demonstration of direct projections between the ponto mesencephalic tegmentum and the visual cortex of the cat using a peroxidase technique	Demonstration of direct projections between the tegmentum ponto-mesencephalic and the visual cortex of the cat at l'apos; a technique of peroxidase.
2	histochemical fiber typing and staining intensity in cat and rat muscles	Histochemical fiber type and intensity of staining in cat and rat muscles.
2	microionophoretic study of the cholinoceptor neurons of the visual cortex of cats	A microionophoretic study of the cholinoceptor neurons of the visual cortex of cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord iii analysis of amino acids after long term potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic of monosynaptic reflexes in the spinal cord of cats iii analysis of amino acids after long-term potentiation.
2	influence of phenamin on the reaction of cortical neurons evoked by stimulation of mesodiencephalic structures	L' influence of phenamine on response of cortical neurons evoked by stimulation of mesodiencephalic structures.
2	an electron microscopic study of the intermediolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord	An electron microscopic study of the intermediolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord.
2	convergence and interaction of visceral somatic and visual excitations in individual neurons of the cat lateral geniculate bodies	Convergence and interaction of visceral somatic and visual excitations in individual neurons of cat lateral geniculate bodies.
2	interhemispheric relations of the cat visual cortex following unilateral polarization of the secondary visual area	Hemispherical relations of the visual cortex following unilateral polarization of the secondary visual area.
2	the effects of noise upon the electrical activity of the cat cortex	Noise effects on l' electrical activity of the cat cortex.
2	spinal evoked response in the cat	Spinal response in the cat.
2	morphologic and cytophotometric indices of the state of the neurons of the spinal cord and spinal cord ganglia following exposure to gravitational stress	Morphological and cytophotometric indices of spinal cord neurons and spinal cord ganglia following exposure to gravitational stress.
2	dorsal raphe stimulation produces inhibitory effect on trigeminal nucleus neurons	Dorsal raphe stimulation produces an inhibitory effect on trigeminal nucleus neurons.
2	fine structure of growth cones in medullary raphe nuclei in the postnatal cat	The fine structure of growth cones in medullary raphe nuclei in the postnatal cat.
2	visual receptive fields in the lateral suprasylvian area clare bishop area of the cat	The receptive visual fields in the lateral suprasylvian region clare bishop zone of the cat.
2	the fluorescent catecholamine reaction in neurons of the intervertebral sensory ganglion	Fluorescent catecholamine reaction in neurons of the intervertebral sensory ganglion.
2	projections of the somatosensory areas of the cerebral cortex into the thalamic nuclei	Projections of somatosensory areas of the cerebral cortex into thalamic nuclei.
2	neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of the cat v topographical distribution of inhibitory effects mediated by the spino olivocerebellar pathway	Neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of the cat topographic v distribution of spino olivocerebellar-mediated inhibitory effects.
2	feline infectious peritonitis with spinal cord involvement in two cats	Feline infectious peritonitis with spinal cord in two cats.
2	leiomyosarcoma of the urinary bladder in a cat	Leiomyosarcoma of the urinary bladder in a cat.
2	sensorimotor cortical representation in the rat and the role of the cortex in the production of sensory myoclonic jerks	Cortical sensorimotor representation in the rat and the role of the cortex in the production of sensory myoclonic twitches.
2	physiological identification of a morphological class of cat retinal ganglion cells	Physiological identification of a morphological class of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the esophagus in the cat and the rhesus monkey	Ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the etapos; esophagus in the cat and the rhesus monkey.
2	innate and environmental factors in the development of the kitten s visual cortex	Natural and environmental factors in the development of the visual cortex of kitten.
2	depression in the excitability of relay cells of lateral geniculate nucleus following saccadic eye movements in the cat	Decreased l' excitability of lateral geniculate nucleus relay cells following jerky eye movements in cat.
2	single unit responses to natural objects in area 19 of cats with different early visual experiences	Unit reactions to natural objects in area 19 of cats with different early visual experiences.
2	histochemical and neurophysiological studies of autotransplanted cat muscle	Histochemical and neurophysiological studies of autotransplanted cat muscle.
2	effect of analgestics and narcotics on the potentials of the posterior roots evoked by stimulation of the sensorimotor cortex	The effect of painkillers and narcotic drugs on the potentials of the posterior roots evoked by stimulation of the sensorimotor cortex.
2	distribution and properties of commissural and other neurons in cat sensorimotor cortex	Distribution and properties of commissural and other neurons in cat sensorimotor cortex.
2	electrophysiologic effects of stimulating the vestibular nuclei on the sensomotor cortex of cats	Electrophysiological effects of stimulation of vestibular nuclei on the sensomotor cortex of cats.
2	two levels of restriction by mouse or cat cells of murine sarcoma virus coated by endogenous xenotropic oncornavirus	Two levels of restriction by mouse or cat cells of the murine sarcoma virus coated with an endogenous, xenotropic oncornavirus.
2	changes of epidural pressures after experimental occlusion of one middle cerebral artery in cats	Changes in epidural pressures after birth; experimental occlusion of mid-cerebral artery in cats.
2	electron microscopic observations on preterminal fibers in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat with special reference to the relation between axon diameter and myelin thickness in mammalian gray matter	Electron microscopic observations of preterminal fibers in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat with particular attention to the relationship between l&apos diameter; axon and l' myelin thickness in mammalian gray matter.
2	central functional changes after facial spinal accessory anastomosis in man and facial hypoglossal anastomosis in the cat	Central functional changes after facial medullary accessory anastomosis in men and facial hypoglossal anastomosis in cats.
2	hydrocephalus iii reconstitution of the cerebral cortical mantle following ventricular shunting	Hydrocephalus iii reconstitution of the cerebral cortical mantle following a ventricular shunt.
2	the sinus nerve and baroreceptor input to the medulla of the cat	The sinus nerve and baroreceptor enter the spinal cord of the cat.
2	autonomic nerve stimulation kallikrein content anc acinar cell granules of the cat s submandibular gland	Autonomous nerve stimulation content of anchored kallikrein acinar cell granules of the gland under-mandibular cat s.
2	labyrinthine and extralabryinethine influences on the background activity of the spinal interneurons of cats during swaying	Labyrinthine and l' extralabryinethine influence the apos; the background activity of the spinal interneurons of cats during swirling.
2	reflex mechanisms of interlimb interrelationships displayed in lumbar flexor centers of the cat spinal cord	Reflex mechanisms of limb interrelationships in lumbar flexor centers of the cat spinal cord.
2	afferent impulse of fibers of the vagus nerve of cats using the method of coincidence of outgoing action potentials	Afferent impulse of fibers of the vagus nerve of cats using the method of coincidence of potentials d' outward action.
2	medullary relay neurons in the carotid body chemoreceptor pathway of cats	Medullary relay neurons in the carotid body chemoreceptor pathway of cats.
2	brain microvascular hemodynamic responses to induced seizures	Epilepsy-induced microvascular hemodynamic responses to seizures.
2	spasmogenic qualities of prostaglandin f2alpha in the cat	Spasmogenic qualities of prostaglandin f2alpha in the cat.
2	effects of opiate agonists and antagonists on central neurons of the cat	Effects of opiate agonists and antagonists on central neurons of cats.
2	actions of methoxamine and tryptamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on cat spinal cord segmental reflexes	The actions of methoxamine and tryptamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on cat spinal cord segmental reflexes.
2	response of generalized penicillin epilepsy in the cat to ethosuximide and diphenylhydantoin	Ethosuximide and diphenylhydantoin response of generalized penicillin epilepsy in the cat.
2	immunofluorescence study of lrf producing neurons in the cat and the dog	Study of apos; immunofluorescence in cat and dog producing neurons; RFID.
2	feline infectious peritonitis proteins of plasma and ascitic fluid	Infectious feline peritonitis proteins of plasma and ascitic fluid.
2	bulbo spinal neurons activated by baroreceptor afferents and their possible role in inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons	Bulbo spinal neurons activated by baroreceptor afferents and their possible role in inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius twitch potentiation and twitch tetanus ratio	The motor units of cat median gastrocnemius twitch potentiation and the cat twitch tetanus ratio.
2	remyelination after transient compression of the spinal cord	Remyelination after transient compression of the spinal cord.
2	clare bishop area in the cat location and retinotopical projection	Crazy zone in the apos; cat location and retinotopic projection.
2	visual responses of neurons in the clare bishop area of the cat	Visual reactions of neurons in the key area of the cat bishop.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound i influence of drugs on responses of single units	The response of the cat cerebellar worm is induced by the influence of drugs on the responses of individual units.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound ii the role of the mossy and climbing fibers in acoustic transmission to the cerebellar cortex and influence of stimuli parameters	The cat cerebellar-verm response induced by sound ii the role of mossy and climbing fibers in acoustic transmission to the cerebellar cortex and l&apos influences stimulus parameters.
2	effect of clonidine on the excitability of vasomotor loci in the cat	Effect of clonidine on the apos; excitability of vasomotor loci in the cat.
2	serotonin in the lateral geniculate	Uh, serotonin in the lateral geniculate.
2	mechanical transduction in the golgi tendon organ a hypothesis	Mechanical transduction in the golgi tendon organ a hypothesis.
2	evidence and meaning of monophasic potentials in the electromyogram of extraocular muscles of rabbits and cats author s transl	Evidence and significance of monophasic potentials in the electromyogram of extraocular muscles of rabbits and cats.
2	hypersomnia by isthmic lesion in cat ii neurophysiological and pharmacological study	Hypersomnia by isthmic lesion in cat ii pharmacological and neurophysiological study.
2	projection of tooth pulp afferents to the cat trigeminal nucleus caudalis	Dental pulp afferents on the trigeminal nucleus of the cat caudalis.
2	unit responses to moving stimuli in area 18 of the cat	Unit responses to moving stimuli in area 18 of cat.
2	bilateral effects of vestibular nerve stimulation on activity in the lumbar spinal cord	Two-way effects of vestibular nerve stimulation on the apos; lumbar spinal cord activity.
2	a study of inhibitory antagonism in cat visual cortex	A study of inhibitory antagonism in the visual cortex of the cat.
2	observation of injected fluorescein diffusion after laser treatment of cat fundi an experimental study with angiography and microscopy	L' observation of injected fluorescein diffusion after laser treatment of cat fungus, experimental study with angiography and microscopy.
2	tracing axons and axon collaterals of spinal neurons using intracellular injection of horseradish peroxidase	Plot the axons and axonal collaterals of spinal neurons at the help of an intracellular injection of horseradish peroxidase.
2	effect of coronal plane tilt on cat caloric nystagmus responses	The apo effect; coronal plane tilt on the cat caloric nystagmus responses.
2	carotid arterial supply of the feline brain applications to the study of regional cerebral ischemia	Carotid arterial intake of feline brain applications to apo; apo study; regional cerebral ischemia.
2	influence of anesthetics on metabolic functional and pathological responses to regional cerebral ischemia	The influence of anesthetics on metabolic, functional and pathological responses to regional cerebral ischemia.
2	cortical and subcortical projected foci in cats inhibitory action of taurine	Projected cortical and under-cortical in cats inhibiting l'apos; action of taurine.
2	frequency following response to cochlear nuclei in cats to polycomponent sonic signals	Frequency following response to cochlear nuclei in cats to multicomponent sound signals.
2	the role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the mechanism of enzyme secretion from the cat pancreas	The role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the mechanism of enzyme secretion in the cat pancreas.
2	influences on colonic and small intestinal motility by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Influences of the cerebellar fastigial nucleus on motility of colon and small intestine.
2	influences on the defecation and micturition reflexes by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Influences of the cerebellar fastigial nucleus on the cerebellar defecation and micturition reflexes.
2	release of gastrin on vagal stimulation in the cat	Release of gastrin on vagal stimulation in cats.
2	effect of anticoagulants and inhibitors of platelet aggregation on thrombotic occlusion of endarterectomized cat carotid arteries	Effect of anticoagulants and inhibitors platelet aggregation on apos; thrombotic occlusion of endarterectomized carotid arteries of cats.
2	postsynaptic potentials in cat abducens motoneurons evoked by stimulation of cortical eye fields	Synaptic post-potentials in the cat remove motoneurons evoked by stimulation of cortical eye fields.
2	the effect of methoxyflurane on pulmonary vascular resistance and hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in the isolated perfused cat lung	The effect of methoxyflurane on pulmonary vascular resistance and hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in the perfused isolated cat lung.
2	epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of different lesions in cat cortex ultrastructural study	Epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of different lesions in the apos; ultrastructural study of cat cortex.
2	firing mechanisms in the single vestibular neurons in the cat	Single vestibular neuronal firing mechanisms in the cat.
2	effects of cholinergic agonists and antagonists of nucleus vestibularis lateralis unit discharge to vestibular nerve stimulation in the cat	Effects of cholinergic agonists and antagonists of nucleus vestibularis lateralis unit discharge on vestibular nerve stimulation in cat.
2	medial forebrain bundle projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Projections of the median forebrain bundle to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca.
2	central vestibular compensation effect of the bilateral labyrinthectomy on neural activity in the medial vestibular nucleus	The effect of the central vestibular compensation effect of bilateral labyrinthectomy on the apos; neural activity in the medial vestibular nucleus.
2	specialized contacts of astrocytes with astrocytes and with other cell types in the spinal cord of the cat	Specialized contacts of astrocytes with astrocytes and with other types of cells in the spinal cord of cats.
2	the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex	Topography of functional inter-hemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex.
2	the neuronal organization of a focus of conditioned excitation in the cat sensory motor cortex	Apos neuronal organization; a locus of apos; conditioned excitation in the cat sensory motor cortex.
2	the activity of cat motor cortex neurons during performance of a conditoned response of placing the forepaw on a support	L' activity of the cat motor cortex neurons during apos; execution of a conditoned response consisting of placing the front leg on a support.
2	the effect of ablation of the caudate nucleus on the alimentary zone of the lateral hypothalamus	Effect of the apos; ablation of the caudate nucleus on the alimentary zone of the apos; lateral hypothalamus.
2	post tetanic strengthening of evoked electrical responses of the sensomotor cortex	Tetanic post-tetanic reinforcement of evoked electrical responses of the sensomotor cortex.
2	functional maturation of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Functional maturity of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	effect of callosotomy on frequency characteristics of neuronal activity in the parastriate cortex	Effect of callosotomy on frequency characteristics of neuronal activity in the parastriate cortex.
2	an analysis of the depressor responses to histamine in the cat and dog involvement of both h1 and h2 receptors	Analysis of depressor responses to histamine in apos; involvement of h1 and h2 receptors in cat and dog.
2	the effects of lysergic acid diethylamide on the response to field stimulation of the rat vas deferens and the rat and cat anococcygeus muscles	Effects of lysergic acid diethylamide on field stimulation response of rat vas deferens and rat and cat anococcygeus muscles.
2	anatomical asymmetry of the cerebral hemispheres of the cat brain	Anatomical asymmetry of the cerebral hemispheres of the cat brain.
2	cerebellar contributions to the papez circuit	Contributed cerebellar to the papez circuit.
2	receptive field properties of single units in the opossum striate cortex	Receptive field properties of individual units in the striated opossum cortex.
2	notes on the hypothesis of columnar organization in somatosensory cerebral cortex	Notes on apos; hypothesis of apos; column organization in somatosensory cerebral cortex.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius speed size relations and their significance for the recruitment order of mortor units	The relative importance of the central gastrocnemius velocity ratios and their importance to the recruitment order of the mortar units.
2	movements of the forelimbs of the cat during stepping on a treadmill	Movement of the forelimbs of the cat when walking on a conveyor belt.
2	temperature effects on the inflation reflex during expiratory time in the cat	Effects of temperature on the reflex d' inflation during expiratory time in the cat.
2	the origin of impulses recorded from dentinal cavities in the tooth of the cat	L' origin of impulses recorded in the teeth cavities of the cat.
2	photogenic epilepsy with localization of the generator of excitation in the lateral geniculate body the phenomenon of a determining dispatch station	Photonic epilepsy with localization of the generator d' excitation in the lateral geniculate body the d&apos phenomenon; a controlling control station.
2	electrographic manifestations of falling asleep in isolated cat cortex	Electrographic manifestations of s' to sleep in isolated cat cortex.
2	rhythmic firing of deiters neurons and synchronization by cerebellar inhibition in lidocaine treated cats	Rhythmic firing of deiter neurons and synchronization by cerebellar inhibition in lidocaine-treated cats.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the lateral aspect of the prefrontal cortex upon attack behavior in cats	Effects of electrical stimulation of the apos; lateral aspect of the prefrontal cortex on the behavior of cats.
2	effect of stimulation of prefrontal cortex and amygdala on diencephalic neurons	Effect of stimulation of the prefrontal cortex and amygdala on diencephalic neurons.
2	response properties and anatomical organization of pontine and medullary units responsive to vaginal stimulation in the cat	Properties of response and anatomical organization of pontic and medullary units responsive to vaginal stimulation in the cat.
2	recruitment and firing rate modulation of motor unit tension in a small muscle of the cat s foot	Modification of recruitment and voltage discharge rate of the motor unit in a small muscle of the cat's foot.
2	functional significance of projection from the cerebellar nuclei to the motor cortex in the cat	Functional importance of cerebellar nuclei to the motor cortex in the cat.
2	studies of connections between locus coeruleus and cerebral cortex	Study of connections between locus coeruleus and cerebral cortex.
2	relationship between carotid chemoreceptor activity and ventilation in the cat	The relationship between carotid chemoreceptor activity and ventilation in the cat.
2	synaptic actions of tectofugal pathways on abducens motoneurons in the cat	Synaptic action of tectofugal pathways on kidnapped motoneurons in the cat.
2	somatotopic localization in cat motor cortex	Somatotopic localization in cat motor cortex.
2	descending influences of periaqueductal gray matter and somatosensory cerebral cortex on neurones in trigeminal brain stem nuclei	Downward influences of periaqueductal gray matter and somatosensory cerebral cortex on trigeminal brain stem neurons.
2	activation of left ventricular receptors with nonmedullated vagal afferent fibers during occlusion of a coronary artery in the cat	Activation of left ventricular receptors with non-medullated vagal afferent fibers during apos occlusion; a coronary artery in the cat.
2	classification of neurons of the cat neocortex	The classification of neurons in the neocortex of the cat.
2	catecholaminergic axo axonic synapses in the nucleus of the tractus solitarius pars commissuralis of the cat possible relation to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes	Catecholaminergic axon synapses in the nucleus solitarius pars commissuralis of the cat tract in relation to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes.
2	the effects of the pathogenic influence of botulin toxin on different types of spinal motor neurons	The effects of the apos; pathogenic influence of botulinum toxin on different types of spinal motor neurons.
2	evaluation of fecal technics for the diagnosis of cat liver fluke infection	Evaluation of fecal techniques for diagnosis of cat liver infection.
2	modification of cortical orientation selectivity in the cat by restricted visual experience a reexamination	Modification of l&apos selectivity; cortical orientation in the cat by a limited visual experience reexamination.
2	nature of the distribution of synapses in the neurons of the reticular formation and some afferent nuclei	Nature of the distribution of synapses in the neurons of reticular formation and some afferent nuclei.
2	the postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibres in the visual cortex of the cat a stereological and electron microscopical investigation	The postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibers in the visual cortex of the cat was studied by stereological and electron microscopy.
2	different organization of cat lateral geniculate neurons in binocular inhibitory interaction	Different organization of cat lateral geniculate neurons in the apos; binocular inhibitory interaction.
2	interaction of psychotropic agents with central neurotransmitters as revealed by their effects on pgo waves in the cat	L' interaction of psychotropic agents with central neurotransmitters is revealed by their effects on pgo waves in the cat.
2	effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on the cardiovascular system of anesthetized cats	The effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on the cardiovascular system of anesthetized cats.
2	the interaction of impulses evoked by stimuli of different modality in neurons of the parietal association cortex	L' interaction of impulses evoked by stimuli of different modalities in neurons of the cortex d' parietal association.
2	centrifugal and centripetal connections of the cat visual cortex	Centrifugal and centripetal connections of the cat visual cortex.
2	reproduction of delayed evoked potentials during amygdaloid complex stimulation	Reproduction of delayed evoked potentials during amygdaloid complex stimulation.
2	antidromal and synaptic potentials of motoneurons of the cat accessory nerve nucleus	Anti-romal and synaptic potentials of the cat accessory nerve nucleus motoneurons.
2	the ultrastructure of portions of the cat spinal cord gray matter connected to fibers of different descending tracts	L' ultrastructure of portions of gray matter from the spinal cord of the cat connected to fibers of different descending pathways.
2	amygdala and masseteric reflex ii mechanism of the diphasic modifications of the reflex elicited from the defence reaction area role of the spinal trigeminal nucleus pars oralis	Amygdala and masseter reflex ii mechanism of the diphasic modifications of the reflex induced by the role of the defense zone of the spinal trigeminal nucleus pars oralis.
2	correlation analysis of units recorded in the cat dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus	Correlation analysis of units recorded in the cat dorsal lateral genicular nucleus.
2	a quantitative study of the projection area of the central and the paracentral visual field in area 17 of the cat i the precision of the topography	A quantitative study of the projection surface of the central and paracentral visual field in the zone 17 of the cat i the accuracy of the topography.
2	flexion extension sensitivity of elbow joint afferents in cat	Sensitivity to elongation; flexion extension of elongation afferents in cat.
2	effects of diphenylhydantoin on cardiac arrhythmias induced by carotid occlusion in the cat	Effects of diphenylhydantoin on cardiac arrhythmias induced by carotid occlusion in the cat.
2	hyperaemic responses in two vascular beds of the anaesthetised cat	Hyperaemic reactions in two vascular beds of the cat anesthetized.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat i pgo wave activity induced by ro 43284 and by p chlorophenylalanine pcpa as a basis for neuropharmacological studies	Medications and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of l' curated activity of l' wave i pgo induced by ro 43284 and by p chlorophenylalanine pcpa as a basis for neuropharmacological studies.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat ii pgo wave activity and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine	The drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curved cat ii l' pgo wave activity and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iii pgo wave activity and brain catecholamines	Medications and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curated cat iii brain pgo and catecholamine wave activity.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iv the effects of acetylcholine gaba and benzodiazepines on pgo wave activity	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curated cat iv the effects of acetylcholine gaba and benzodiazepines on the apos; pgo wave activity.
2	anatomical organization of the phasic activity produced by reserpine at the level of the oculomotor system	Anatomical organization of l' phase activity produced by reserpine at the level of the oculomotor system.
2	management of acute spine and spinal cord injuries old and new concepts	Treatment of acute spinal cord and spinal cord injuries old and new concepts.
2	adaptation and dynamics in x cells and y cells of the cat retina	Adaptation and dynamics in the x and y cells of the cat retina.
2	a note on the method of retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase as a tool in studies of afferent cerebellar connections particularly those from the inferior olive with comments on the orthograde transport in purkinje cell axons	A note on the method of retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase as a tool in the study of afferent cerebellar connections, particularly those of the lower olive; with comments on orthograde transport in purkinje cell axons.
2	projections from the lateral reticular nucleus to the cerebellar cortex and nuclei in the cat	Projections of the lateral reticular nucleus to the cerebellar cortex and nuclei in the cat.
2	deep temporal lobe projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Deep projections from the temporal lobe to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca.
2	histamine receptors in the cat mesenteric circulation	Histamine receptors in the cat mesenteric circulation.
2	responses of cortical vestibular center produced by stimulation of vestibular nuclei and visual association area in the cat	Cortical vestibular center reactions produced by stimulation of vestibular nuclei and l' area d' visual association in cat.
2	discharge patterns of bulbo pontine respiratory unit populations in cat	Discharge pattern of bulbo breathing units-pontine in cats.
2	afferent projections to the locus coeruleus nucleus in the cat study by the horseradish peroxidase technic	Projections related to the locus locus coeruleus nucleus in the cat study by technical horseradish peroxidase.
2	morphology and distribution of muscle spindles in dorsal muscles of the cat neck	Morphology and distribution of muscle spindles in the dorsal muscles of the cat's neck.
2	receptive field characteristics of single neurons in lateral suprasylvian visual area of the cat	Receptor field characteristics of single neurons in the apos; suprasylvian lateral visual area of the cat.
2	properties of projections from vestibular nuclei to medial reticular formation in the cat	Properties of projections from vestibular nuclei to the median reticular formation in the cat.
2	slowly adapting receptors in cat knee joint can they signal joint angle	Receptors that slowly adapt to the cat's knee joint can signal a distal angle; articulation.
2	stereopsis in normal domestic cat siamese cat and cat raised with alternating monocular occlusion	Stereopsis in the normal Siamese domestic cat and raised cat with alternating monocular occlusion.
2	the postnatal development of some twitch and fatigue properties of single motor units in the ankle muscles of the kitten	Postnatal development of some twitching and fatigue properties of individual motor units in the ankle muscles of kittens.
2	limb coordinations during locomotion in amygdalar rubral and funicular cats	Limb coordination during locomotion in rubral and funicular amygdalar cats.
2	visual discrimination learning in cats with different early visual experiences	Learn visual discrimination in cats with different early visual experiences.
2	a cytochemical study of binaurally converging connections in the nuclei of the cat superior olive	A cytochemical study of the binural converging connections in the nuclei of the olive superior cat.
2	quantitative histological studies of the variability of golgi impregnated cortical neurons in rats and cats	Quantitative histological studies of the variability of golgi-impregnated cortical neurons in rats and cats.
2	eye movements evoked by superior colliculus stimulation in the alert cat	Eye movements caused by superior colliculus stimulation in the cat's eye.
2	effects of respiratory gases on cytochrome a in intact cerebral cortex is there a critical po2	The effects of respiratory gases on cytochrome a in intact cerebral cortex are a critical po2.
2	specific angiotensin ii receptive neurons in the cat subfornical organ	Angiotensin ii specific receptor neurons in the cat subfornical organ.
2	cerebellar corticonuclear projection in the cat the vermis of the anterior and posterior lobes	Cerebellar corticonuclear projection in the vermeil cat of the anterior and posterior lobes.
2	brainstem loci for activation of electrodermal response in the cat	Brain stem sites for activation of electrodermal response in cats.
2	control of depth and frequency of breathing during baroreceptor stimulation in cats	Control of depth and frequency of breathing during baroreceptor stimulation in cats.
2	demonstration of the tuberoinfundibular tract of the cat fluorescence histochemistry and electron microscopy	Demonstration of the tuberoinfundibular tract of the apos; cat fluorescence histochemistry and electron microscopy.
2	melatonin content of cat cerebrospinal fluid and blood following intravenous injection of melatonin as measured by xenopus laevis skin melanophore test	Melatonin content of cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord and cat blood following intravenous injection of melatonin as measured by Xenopus laevis skin test.
2	on the role of catecholamines in the humoral modulation of the electrocortical activity in the cat	On the role of catecholamines in the humoral modulation of l' electrocortical activity in the cat.
2	specific patterns of neuron arrangement and of synaptic articulation in the medial geniculate body	Specific patterns of neural arrangement and apos; synaptic articulation in the middle geniculate body.
2	types of interneurons and their participation in the neuronal network of the medial geniculate body	The types of interneurons and their participation in the neural network of the median geniculate body.
2	the length of parallel fibers in the cat cerebellar cortex an experimental light and electron microscopic study	The length of parallel fibers in the cat cerebellar cortex was studied experimentally by light and electron microscopy.
2	effect of sulfated and non sulfated gastrin and octapeptide cholecystokinin on cat gall bladder in vitro	Effect of gastrin and lapos; sulfated and nonsulfated cholecystokinin octapeptide on cat gallbladder in vitro.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation ascending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of the projections of reticular formation of the midbrain, ascending projections of the cuneiformis nucleus.
2	organization of retinocollicular pathways in the cat	Organization of retinocollicular pathways in the cat.
2	effects of adrenergic blockade on adipose tissue lipolysis provoked in cats and humans by intravenous perfusion of isoprenaline	Effects of adrenergic blockade on adipose tissue lipolysis in cats and humans following isoprenaline infusion therapy.
2	influence of cholinergic drugs on the lateral geniculate phasic waves	The influence of cholinergic drugs on the lateral geniculate phasic waves.
2	analgesia induced by electrical stimulation of the inferior centralis nucleus of the raphe in the cat	Analgesia induced by electrical stimulation of the lower central nucleus of the raphe in the cat.
2	different targets of different neurons in nucleus gracilis of the cat	Different targets of different neurons in the cat gracilis nucleus.
2	neuroplasticity of primary afferents in the neo natal cat and some results of early deafferentation of the trigeminal spinal nucleus	Neuroplasticity of primary afferents in the neonatal cat and some results of early deafferentiation of the trigeminal spinal nucleus.
2	axonal projections and connections of the principal sensory trigeminal nucleus in the monkey	Axonal projections and connections of the main sensory trigeminal nucleus in the monkey.
2	the patterns of projection of cortical areas 17 18 and 19 onto the laminae of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus in the cat	Patterns of projection of cortical zones 17-18 and 19 on the laminae of the lateral geniculate dorsal nucleus in the cat.
2	localization of masticatory motoneurons in the cat and rat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Localization of masticating motoneurons in cat and rat by retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	dorsal column nuclei projections to the cerebellar cortex in cats as revealed by the use of the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	The dorsal column nucleus projections to the cerebellar cortex in cats were revealed by the use of retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport.
2	comparative anatomical studies of the sml face cortex with special reference to the occurrence of barrels in layer iv	Anatomical comparative studies of the sml face cortex, particularly on the presence of barrels in layer IV.
2	effect of auditory neocortex ablation on pitch perception in the cat	Effects of auditory neocortex ablation on cat tone perception.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells i steady frequency tone bursts	Synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells i steady-frequency tone emerges.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells ii frequency modulated tones	Synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear cells ii frequency modulated tones.
2	effects of static tilt on cervical spinoreticular tract neurons	Apos effects; static tilt on cervical spinoreticular tract neurons.
2	the transmission of reflexes in the spinal cord of cats during direct irradiation with microwaves	The transmission of reflexes in the spinal cord of cats during direct irradiation with micro@-@ waves.
2	synapsoarchitechtonics of the parietal and acoustic regions of the cerebral cortex of cats	Synapsoarchitechtonics of the parietal and acoustic regions of the cerebral cortex of cats.
2	the association connexions of the suprasylvian fringe sf and other areas of the cat auditory cortex	The association of the suprasylvian fringe sf and d' other regions of the cat auditory cortex.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat i responses in the brachium pontis	The mode of synaptic binding in the cerebellar pathway of the cerebro-ponto of the cat i responses in the brachium pontis.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat ii responses of single cells in the pontine nuclei	The mode of synaptic binding in the cerebellar-pontotic pathway of the cat ii responses of individual cells in pontic nuclei.
2	columnar distribution of u fibres from the postcruciate cerebral projection area of the cat s group i muscle afferents	Column distribution of u fibers from the post-cranial brain projection region of cat muscle group i afferent fibers.
2	functional organization of vestibulofastigial projection in the horizontal semicircular canal system in the cat	Functional organization of vestibulofastigial projection in the horizontal circular-semi channel system in the cat.
2	preventive anti epileptic action of taurine administered by direct cortical perfusion	Anti-preventive-epileptic action of taurine administered by direct cortical infusion.
2	transendothelial vesicular transport of protein following compression injury to the spinal cord	Transendothelial vesicular transport of proteins following aposes; a compression injury to the spinal cord.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 in the cerebral cortex of the cat	Regulation of local tissue po2 in the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	effect of the hypothalamus and reticular formation on the cerebral cortex in hypoxic brain states	Effect of the hypothalamus and reticular formation on the cerebral cortex in hypoxic cerebral states.
2	the heterosensory interaction of neurons in the cat frontal association cortex	L' heterosensory interaction of neurons in the cortex d' cat frontal association.
2	effects of early binocular deprivation on visual input to cat superior colliculus	Effects of early binocular deprivation on appetite; visual contribution to the cat superior colliculus.
2	responses of spinal cord neurons to systematic changes in hindlimb skin temperatures in cats and primates	The responses of spinal cord neurons to systematic changes in hindlimb skin temperatures in cats and primates.
2	organization of cat striate cortex a correlation of receptive field properties with afferent and efferent connections	Organization of the cat striated cortex a correlation of receptive field properties with afferent and efferent connections.
2	cat parastriate cortex a primary or secondary visual area	Cat parastriate cortex a primary or secondary visual zone.
2	modification of auditory and somatosensory system activity during pupillary conditioning in the paralyzed cat	Alteration of voice; auditory and somatosensory system activity during pupillary conditioning in paralysed cats.
2	unit activity in vestibular nucleus of the alert monkey during horizontal angular acceleration and eye movement	Unital activity in the vestibular nucleus of the alarmed monkey during horizontal angular acceleration and eye movement.
2	intracellular recordings from different types of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Intracellular recordings of different types of medullary respiratory neurons in the cat.
2	accommodative reactions of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Flexible reactions of the medullary breathing neurons of the cat.
2	inferior colliculus i comparison of response properties of neurons in central pericentral and external nuclei of adult cat	Lower colliculus i of the response properties of neurons in central and outer pericentraous nuclei of adult cat.
2	inferior colliculus ii development of tuning characteristics and tonotopic organization in central nucleus of the neonatal cat	Lower colliculus ii development of syntonization and d&apos characteristics; tonotopic organization in the central nucleus of the neonatal cat.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat i response plane determination and resting discharge characteristics	Physiological characteristics of first-order duct vestibular neurons in determining cat i response plane and resting discharge characteristics.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat ii response to constant angular acceleration	Physiological characteristics of first-order vestibular duct neurons in the cat ii in response to constant angular acceleration.
2	laminar analysis of evoked potentials of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Laminar analysis of evoked potentials of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	the velocity tuning of single units in cat striate cortex	L' speed adjustment of single units in cat's striated cortex.
2	the effectiveness of bicuculline as an antagonist of gaba and visually evoked inhibition in the cat s striate cortex	The effectiveness of bicuculline as an antagonist of gaba and apos; visually evoked inhibition in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to the receptive field properties of neurones in the striate cortex of the cat	The contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to the receptive field properties of neurons in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the tendon organs of cat medial gastrocnemius significance of motor unit type and size for the activation of ib afferents	The median gastrocnemius organs of the cat mean the type and size of the spinal cord; the motor unit for the spinal cord; the activation of the afferents.
2	discharges of relay cells in lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat during spontaneous eye movements in light and darkness	Lateral genicular cell release in the lateral nucleus of the cat during spontaneous eye movements in light and light; darkness.
2	evidence for the presence of eye movement potentials during paradoxical sleep in cats	Evidence for the presence of eye movement potentials during a cat's REM sleep.
2	effects of ponto mesencephalic lesions and electrical stimulation upon pgo waves and emps in unanesthetized cats	Effects of ponto-mesencephalic lesions and electrical stimulation on pgo waves and emps in unanesthetized cats.
2	parameters of the reflex responses of cat spinal cord neurons during ontogenesis	The parameters of the reflex responses of cat spinal cord neurons during ontogenesis.
2	the growing conceptus of the domestic cat	The growing concept of the domestic cat.
2	behavioural repertory of cats without cerebral cortex from infancy	Behavioural directory of cats without cerebral cortex from infancy.
2	early versus late visual cortex lesions effects on receptive fields in cat superior colliculus	Effects of early and late visual cortical lesions on receptor fields in cat upper colliculus.
2	synaptosomal fractions of cat cerebral cortex after hypo osmotic and detergent treatment	Synaptosomal fractions of cat cerebral cortex after hypoosmotic treatment with detergent.
2	modulation of the photically evoked potentials in the motor cortex of cats by influences of the somatosensory system and the reticular formation	The modulation of photically evoked potentials in the motor cortex of cats by influences of the somatosensory system and reticular formation.
2	technical note about simultaneous recording of oxygen partial pressure and neuronal activity in cat cortex	Technical note on apo; simultaneous recording of partial pressure of apo; oxygen and apo; neuronal activity in cat cortex.
2	respiratory rhythmicity in the cat	Acute respiratory rhythm in the cat.
2	changes in the activity of the cat sensomotor cortex under heterosensory stimulation	Changes of l' activity of the sensomotor cortex of the cat under heterosensory stimulation.
2	the interaction of symmetrical cortical descending influences on lumbar motoneurons	L' interaction of symmetrical cortical descending influences on lumbar motorcycles.
2	the effect of microiontophoretic administration of acetylcholine on evoked activity of visual cortex neurons subjected to direct cortical stimulation	Effects of apos; microiontophoretic administration of apos; acetylcholine on apos; evoked activity of visual cortical neurons subjected to direct cortical stimulation.
2	transformation of neuronal activity in the cat lateral geniculate body	L&apos transformation; neuronal activity in the cat lateral geniculate body.
2	extra and intra cranial blood supply to brains of dog and cat	Extra- and intra--cranial blood supply of dog and cat brains.
2	descending inputs to caudal cochlear nucleus in cats a horseradish peroxidase hrp study	In addition, a study of the effects of horseradish peroxidase on the caudal cochlear nucleus in cats was conducted.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iii the projection to the vermal visual area	The olivocerebellar projection in the cat was studied by the retrograde axonal transport method of horseradish peroxidase iii, the projection to the visible vermic zone.
2	marginal and extramarginal cortical lesions and visual discrimination by cats	Both marginal and extramarginal cortical injury and visual discrimination by cats.
2	performance on the visual cliff by cats with marginal gyrus lesions	Performance on the visual cliff by cats with gyrus marginal lesions.
2	a histochemical study of acetylcholinesterase in intact and deafferented cat auditory cortex	Histochemical study of acetylcholinesterase in intact and deafferented cat auditory cortex.
2	comparative characteristics of the background activity of neurons from several regions of the cerebral cortex of unanesthetized cats	Comparative characteristics of the apos; background activity of neurons from several regions of the cerebral cortex of unanesthetized cats.
2	reactions of medial geniculate body neurons to stimulation of the auditory cortex	Reactions of middle genicular body neurons to stimulation of the auditory cortex.
2	effect of diphenylhydantoin on a developed epileptogenic focus in cats with split cerebral hemispheres	Effect of diphenylhydantoin on a developed epileptogenic focus in cats with divided cerebral hemispheres.
2	the peri angular masseteropterygoid belt in the cat felis catus l	The peri-masseteropterygoid belt-angular in the cat felis catus l.
2	the effect of atropine upon acetylcholine release from cat superior cervical ganglia and rat cortical slices measurement by a radio enzymic method	Apos; effect of apos; atropine on apos release; acetylcholine from cat superior cervical ganglia and rat cortical slice measurement by a radio-enzymatic method.
2	acquired retinal folds in the cat	Acquired retinal folds in the cat.
2	binocular interaction in strabismic kittens deprived of vision	L' binocular interaction in strabismic kittens deprived of vision.
2	destruction of the endolymphatic sac in the cat	The destruction of the endolymphatic sac in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	The cat olivocerebellar projection was studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase method.
2	signs of plasticity and reconnection in spinal cord damage	Evidence of plasticity and reconnection in spinal cord lesions.
2	experimental immunohistochemical studies on the localization and distribution of substance p in cat primary sensory neurons	Experimental immunohistochemical studies on the localization and distribution of p-substance in cat primary sensory neurons.
2	visual discrimination between spatially separated stimuli by cats with lesions of the superior colliculus pretectum	Visual discrimination between spatially separated stimuli of cats with lesions of the superior colliculus pretectum.
2	effects of vagotomy on the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat medulla oblongata	Effects of vagotomy on the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat medulla oblongata.
2	effect of beta adrenergic blockaders on the bioelectrical activity of the mesenchephalic reticular formation	Effect of beta-adrenergic blockers on the bioelectrical activity of mesencephalic reticular formation.
2	individual epsps produced by single triceps surae ia afferent fibers in homonymous and heteronymous motoneurons	Individual epspspsps produced in homonymous and heteronymous motoneurons by a single triceps surae ia fibers afferents.
2	analysis of passive and active electrophysiologic properties of neurons in mammalian nodose ganglia maintained in vitro	Analysis of passive and active electrophysiological properties of neurons in mammalian nodule ganglia maintained in vitro.
2	activation of neurons in the cerebellar nuclei and ascending reticular formation by stimulation of the cerebellar surface	Activation of neurons in cerebellar nuclei and ascending reticular formation by stimulation of the cerebellar surface.
2	effect of succinylcholine on responses of neurons in the motor cortex to natural activation of muscle spindle primary endings	The effect of succinylcholine on the responses of neurons in the motor cortex to apos; natural activation of the primary terminals of the muscle spindle.
2	the cat as a possible source of toxoplasma infection for man	The cat as a possible source of toxoplasmic infection for humans.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes in the cat and the pathogenesis of arterial hypertension	Spinal sympathetic reflexes in the cat and pathogenicity of the apos; hypertension.
2	a study of geniculate unit activity during cryogenic blockade of the primary visual cortex in the cat	A study of spinal cord activity during cryogenic blockade of the primary visual cortex in cats.
2	micro electrophoretic studies in the cat pulvinar region effect of acetylcholine	Microelectrophoretic studies of apos; effect of acetylcholine on cat pulvinar region.
2	autoradiographic tracing of the cerebellar projections from the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat	It's a autoradiographic trace of the cerebellar projections of the lateral reticular nucleus of the cat.
2	cats raised in a one directional world effects on receptive fields in visual cortex and superior colliculus	Cats raised in one direction global effects on receptive fields in visual cortex and superior colliculus.
2	in vivo activation of synthetic hormonogens of lysine vasopressin na glycyl glycyl glycyl 8 lysine vassopressin in the cat	In vivo activation of synthetic hormonogens of lysine vasopressin na glycyl glycyl glycyl 8 lysine vassopressin in cats.
2	dendroaxonic synapses in the substantia gelatinosa glomeruli of the spinal trigeminal nucleus of the cat	Dendroaxonic synapses in the substantia gelatinosa glomeruli of the spinal trigeminal nucleus of the cat.
2	the influence of secretin on the secretion of pepsin in response to acid stimulants in the anaesthetized cat	L' influence of secretin on secretion of pepsin in response to acidic stimulants in anesthetized cats.
2	size and duration of inhibition in the medial geniculate body in unanesthetized cats	The size and duration of the apos; inhibition in the median geniculate body in unanesthetized cats.
2	allergens of mammalian origin iv evidence for common allergens in cat and dog serum	Allergenic reactions; mammalian origin demonstrated from common allergens in cat and dog serum.
2	motor unit responses in the lateral rectus muscle of the cat intracellular current injection of abducens nucleus neurons	Lapos reactions; motor unit in the lateral rectal muscle of cats; intracellular current injection of neurons from cat nuclei.
2	junctions in the central nervous system of the cat v the junctional complex of the pia arachnoid membrane	The junctions in the central nervous system of the cat v the junctional complex of the arachnoid pia membrane.
2	experimental salivary mucoceles in cat a histochemical study	Experimental salivary mucoceles in cat has histochemical study.
2	response plasticity of lateral geniculate neurons during and after pairing of auditory and visual stimuli	Response of lateral genicular neurons during and after implantation; pairing of auditory and visual stimuli.
2	unit activity in somatosensory area ii sii and tooth pulp stimulation in a cat	Somatosensory unitary activity ii sii and tooth pulp stimulation in a cat.
2	the bony tentorium of the cat stereotaxic coordinates	The bony tentorium of the cat stereotactic coordinates.
2	monoamine oxidase inhibition and the induction of ponto geniculo occipital wave activity by reserpine in the cat	L' monoamine oxidase inhibition and induction of apos; apos activity; ponto geniculo occipital wave by reserpine in cat.
2	an analysis of the subsynaptic site of action of theophylline on isolated cat tenuissimus muscle	An analysis of the subsynaptic action of theophylline on isolated cat tenuissimus muscle was performed.
2	dopamine evoked inhibition of single cells of the feline putamen and basolateral amygdala	Dopamine produced apos; inhibition of the individual cells of the feline putamen and basolateral amygdala.
2	synaptic transmission in parasympathetic ganglia in the urinary bladder of the cat	Synaptic transmission in parasympathetic ganglia of cat bladder.
2	regulation of unit activity in nucleus reticularis thalami by the mesencephalic reticular formation and the frontal granular cortex	Regulation of l' unit activity in nucleus reticularis thalami by formation of mesencephalic reticulum and frontal granular cortex.
2	impedance and spontaneous electrical activity as a localizing method in percutaneous spinal surgery	L' impedance and apos; spontaneous electrical activity as a localization method in percutaneous spinal surgery.
2	cortico cortical connections of the orbito frontal cortex	Cortico cortical connections-cortical connections of the frontal cortex orbital.
2	fentanyl and tooth pulp evoked responses in the spinal trigeminal nucleus caudalis region	Both fentanyl and tooth pulp evoked responses in the trigeminal spinal region of the caudalis nucleus.
2	receptive field types in the lateral geniculate body and their frequency characteristics	The types of receptive fields in the lateral geniculated body and their frequency characteristics.
2	antagonism of gamma aminobutyric acid and glycine by convulsants in the cuneate nucleus of cat	L' antagonism of gamma aminobutyric acid and glycine by the convulsions in the cadenced nucleus of the cat.
2	sensitization and habituation of the plantar cushion reflex in cats	Sensitization and habituation to the plantar cushion reflex in cats.
2	electrophysiological identification of pontomedullary reticular neurons directly projecting into dorsal column nuclei	Electrophysiological identification of pontomedullary reticular neurons projecting directly into dorsal column nuclei.
2	effects of thinner fibers on spinal neurones in the cat author s transl	Effects of thinner fibers on spinal neurons in cat translator.
2	crossing axons in the third nerve nucleus	Crossed axons in the third nerve nucleus.
2	peptide and acetylcholine action on neurones of the cat subfornical organ	Acetylcholine and peptide action on l&apos neurons; organ-fornical of the cat.
2	energy state of the cerebral cortex of the cat during hyperventilation author s transl	D'apos state; energy of the cerebral cortex of the cat during the apos; hyperventilation translations.
2	statistical characteristics of the background and evoked activity of cat superior colliculus neurons	Statistical features of the background and evoked activity of the cat superior colliculus neurons.
2	correlation of potentials evoked by tones and clicks during simultaneous recording from many points in the auditory cortex of awake cats	Correlation of potentials evoked by sounds and clicks during speech; simultaneous recording from multiple points in the auditory cortex of awake cats.
2	efferent connections of the caudate nucleus in cats	Efferent connections of the caudate nucleus in cats.
2	background impulse activity of cat pericruciate cortex neurons	Basal impulse activity of cat pericruciated cortical neurons.
2	reflection of temporal parameters of an optic stimulus in neuronal responses of the senso motor and visual cortex in cats	Reflection of temporal parameters; optical stimulus in neuronal responses of sensory and visual cortex in cats.
2	synaptic processes in neurons of the cat pericruciate cortex evoked by pyramidal tract stimulation	Synaptic processes in neurons of the pericruciated cat cortex evoked by pyramidal tract stimulation.
2	generation and propagation of direct responses of intact and chronically isolated strips of cortex	The generation and propagation of direct responses of intact and chronically isolated cortical strips.
2	electrical characteristics of neurons in the motor region of the cat cerebral cortex	Electrical characteristics of neurons in the motor region of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	functional organization of pathways transmitting auditory signals in the somatosensory zone of the cat cerebral cortex	Functional organization of auditory signaling pathways in the somatosensory zone of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	changes in the receptive fields of cat lateral geniculate body neurons following removal of corticofugal influence	Changes in lateral geniculate receptor fields of cat body neurons after apo; elimination of apo; corticofugal influence.
2	connections between the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus and the cortex of the cat suprasylvian gyrus	Connections between the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus and the cortex of suprasylvian cat gyrus.
2	the possibility of different effects of primary afferent depolarization on spinal reflexes	The possibility of different effects of primary afferent depolarization on spinal reflexes.
2	rubrofugal influences on the spike activity of neurons of the medial reticulo spinal tract	Effects of rubrofugality on the apos; peak activity of neurons in the reticulo medial spinal tract.
2	reactions of the neurons of the reticular and ventral anterior nuclei of the optic thalamus to afferent stimulation of different modalities	Reactions of neurons in the ventral and reticular anterior nuclei of the optic thalamus to afferent stimulation of different modalities.
2	the relationship between the second zone of the auditory cortex and the medial geniculate body and first auditory zone	The relationship between the second zone of the auditory cortex and the median geniculate body and first auditory zone.
2	formation of a generator of excitation in the gigantocellular nucleus of the medulla oblongata during disruption of inhibitory processes	Formation of a generator of excitation in the gigantocellular nucleus of the oblongata medulla during the rupture of inhibitory processes.
2	classification of the vestibulospinal neurons of the cat deiter s nucleus	Classification of the vestibulospinal neurons of the cat nucleus.
2	changes in the synaptic vesicles of cat motor cortex axon terminals upon stimulation	Changes in the synaptic vesicles of the axonal terminals of the cat motor cortex during stimulation.
2	brain stem reticular units synaptic responses to stimulation within the ascending reticular pathways	Brain stem reticular units respond synaptically to stimulation in ascending reticular pathways.
2	intracellular study of synaptic events related to phase locking responses of cat cochlear nucleus cells to low frequency tones	Intracellular study of synaptic events related to phase locking responses of cat cochlear cells to low-frequency sounds.
2	laminar patterns of geniculocortical projection in the cat	Laminar models of geniculocortical projection in the cat.
2	visual cortical neurons influenced by the oculomotor input characterization of their receptive field properties	Visual cortical neurons influenced by the motor oculo characterization of their receptive field properties.
2	the raphe nuclei of the cat brain stem a topographical atlas of their efferent projections as revealed by autoradiography	The raphe nuclei of the cat brain form a topographic atlas of their efferent projections as revealed by autoradiography.
2	bilateral projection of the canine tooth pulp to bulbar trigeminal neurons	Bilateral projection of the canine dental pulp into bulbar trigeminal neurons.
2	the myelinated parallel fibers of the cerebellar cortex and their regional distribution	The parallel myelinated fibers of the cerebellar cortex and their regional distribution.
2	postnatal growth of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	Cat lateral genicular growth of the dorsal genicular nucleus.
2	on the variability of form and vascularization of the cat carotid body	About the variability of shape and vascularization of the cat's carotid body.
2	cyclic nucleotides in spinal cells	Cyclic nucleotides in spinal cells.
2	nature of rhythmic discharges in ventral spinal cord roots	The nature of rhythmic discharges in ventral spinal cord roots.
2	electrophysiological investigations on the projections from the cerebral cortex to the vermal posterior lobe of the cerebellum	Electrophysiological studies of the projections from the cerebral cortex to the posterior lobe of the cerebellum.
2	autonomic nervous system of the cat middle ear mucosa	Autonomic nervous system of the cat's middle ear.
2	a method of quantitating injury inflicted in acute spinal cord studies	Method of quantifying the lesions inflicted in acute spinal cord studies.
2	electron microscopy of stages of isospora felis of the cat in the mesenteric lymph node of the mouse	Microoscopy of the isospora felis of the cat in the mesenteric ganglion of the mouse.
2	informational characteristics of the impulse activity of cat sensomotor cortex neurons during elaboration of a defensive conditioned reflex	Informative characteristics of cats; activity of cat sensomotor cortical neurons; impulse of cat sensomotor cortical neurons during apos; elaboration of apos; conditioned defensive reflex.
2	comparative characteristics of the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex following exposure to stimuli of different strength	Comparative characteristics of the topography of l' functional inter-hemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex after exposure to stimuli of different force.
2	effect of stimulation of rostral portions of the midbrain reticular formation on the cat motor cortex	Effect of stimulation of rostral portions of midbrain reticular formation on the cat motor cortex.
2	effect of microiontophoretic application of serotonin on the background impulse activity of visual cortex neurons in unanesthetized cats	Effect of apos; microiontophoretic application of serotonin on apos; d&apos activity; background impulse of visual cortical neurons in unanesthetized cats.
2	bandage backfall reaction occurs in infancy hypothalamic damage and catalepsy	Hypothalamic lesions in infancy and catalepsy cause a fall of apos; bandage.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 of the brain cortex at different arterial o2 pressures	Regulation of local po2 tissue of the cerebral cortex at different arterial o2 pressures.
2	transitional cell carcinoma of the urethra in a cat	Transient cellular carcinoma of the urethra in a cat.
2	the effect of hydrocortisone on the impulse activity of cat cerebral cortex neurons	L' effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; activity of apos; impulse of cat cerebral cortical neurons.
2	interaction of capillary and tissue forces in the cat small intestine	Interaction of capillary and tissue forces in the cat's small intestine.
2	united neurons in the cat motor cortex	Unified neurons in the cat motor cortex.
2	reaction of caudate nucleus neurons to direct stimulation	Reaction of caudate nucleus neurons to direct stimulation.
2	effect of vestibular somatic and autonomic afferent impulsation on the activity of individual neurons in the nuclei of the cat vestibular complex	D&apos effect; vestibular somatic and autonomic vestibular afferent impulse on the apos; activity of individual neurons in the nuclei of the cat vestibular complex.
2	electrophysiologic study of propagation of excitation in the cat pterygopalatine ganglion	Electrophysiological study of the propagation of excitation in the pterygopalatin ganglion of the cat.
2	evoked potential decrements in auditory cortex i discrete trial and continual stimulation	Potential decreases in auditory cortex i discrete assay and continuous stimulation were evoked.
2	neuromuscular sensitivity to tubocurarine a comparison of 10 parameters	Neuromuscular sensitivity to tubocurarine, a comparison of 10 parameters.
2	sensitivity of calcium binding in cerebral tissue to weak environmental electric fields oscillating at low frequency	Sensitivity of calcium binding in brain tissue to weak environmental electric fields oscillating at low frequency.
2	biological bases for the integration of appetitive and consummatory grooming behaviors in the cat a review	Biological basis for l' integration of appetizing and consuming grooming behaviors in the cat a revision.
2	studies on drug induced neuropathies iii motor nerve deficit in cats with experimental acrylamide neuropathy	Studies of drug-induced neuropathies iii motor nerve deficits in cats with apo; experimental apo neuropathy; acrylamide.
2	projection of thalamic neurons to cat primary vestibular cortical fields studied by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Projection of thalamic neurons into primary cortical vestibular fields of cats studied by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	electrophysiological properties of nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis cells antidromic and synaptic activation	Electrophysiological properties of nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis cells, antidromic and synaptic activators.
2	heterogeneity of motor units activating single golgi tendon organs in cat leg muscles	Heterogeneity of motor units activating single golgi tendon organs in cat leg muscle.
2	ascending long spinal actions on forelimb motoneurons in the acute spinal cat	Long, ascending spinal actions on forelimb motoneurons in the acute spinal cat.
2	study on the intraspinal cord regeneration of sensory fibers sectioned in the posterior root of the cat	Study of the regeneration of the intraspinal cord of the sensory fibers sectioned in the posterior root of the cat.
2	inhibitory innervation of cat sphincter of oddi	Inhibitor innervation of the sphincter of the chat d' Oddi.
2	reflection of visceral signals in the impulse activity of the caudate nucleus	Reflection of visceral signals in the apos; d&apos activity; caudate nucleus impulsion.
2	behavior of microflow and local po2 of the brain cortex during and after direct electrical stimulation a contribution to the problem of metabolic regulation of microcirculation in the brain	The behaviour of the microflux and the local po2 of the cerebral cortex during and after direct electrical stimulation contributes to the problem of metabolic regulation of microcirculation in the brain.
2	dependence of reward contingent positive variation rcpv and cortical synchronization on visual input in the cat	Dependence of conditional positive reward variation rcpv and cortical synchronization to l' visual input in the chat.
2	effect of ablation of the motor cortex or the cerebellum on postural kinetic coordination in the cat	Effect of the apos; ablation of the motor cortex or the cerebellum on the postural kinetic coordination in the cat.
2	strabismus measurements in the siamese cat	Measurement of strabismus in the Siamese cat.
2	role of the carotid chemoreceptors in the hyperpnea of exercise in the cat	The role of the carotid chemoreceptors in the apos; hyperpnea of the apos; exercise in the cat.
2	brainstem neurons without spontaneous unit discharge	Brain stem neurons without spontaneous unitary discharge.
2	steroid anaesthesia althesin ct 1341 and dorsal horn cell activities in feline spinal cord	Steroidal anesthesia with apos; althesin ct 1341 and dorsal horn cell activities in feline spinal cord.
2	hypotensive responses following oral adminstration of beta adrenoceptor blocking drugs to the conscious cat	Hypotensive reactions following oral administration of beta @-@adrenoceptors blocking drugs to the conscious cat.
2	quantitative studies of intracellular postsynaptic potentials in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat with respect to optic tract stimulus response latencies	Quantitative studies of intracellular synaptic postage potentials in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat with respect to optical tract stimulus latencies.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells projecting to the superior colliculus as shown by the horseradish peroxidase method	Cat retinal ganglion cells projecting onto the superior colliculus, as shown by the peroxidase method of horseradish.
2	the integrative role of the intralaminar system of the thalamus in visual orientation and perception in the cat	The integrative role of the intralaminary system of the thalamus in visual orientation and perception in cats.
2	effects of frontal eye field stimulation upon activities of the lateral geniculate body of the cat	Effects of frontal ocular field stimulation on the activities of the lateral geniculate body of the cat.
2	the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat v does collateral activation from the dorsal spinocerebellar tract occur	Collateral activation of the dorsal spinocerebellar tract is induced by the lateral reticular nucleus of cat v.
2	conduction velocity groupings among axons of cat retinal ganglion cells and their relationship to retinal topography	Conductive velocity groups among axons of cat retinal ganglion cells and their relationship to retinal topography.
2	micropuncture study of pancreatic secretion in the cat	Micropuncture study of pancreatic secretion in the cat.
2	indoleamine accumulating neurons in the retina of rabbit cat and goldfish	Indoleamine accumulates neurons in the retina of rabbit cat and goldfish.
2	occurrence of cilia in the fundus striati of the cat	Presence of lashes in the fundus striati of the cat.
2	effect of isotonic contrast agents on spinal reflexes in the cat	The effect of isotonic contrast agents on spinal reflexes in the cat.
2	characteristics of three strains of feline fibrosarcoma virus grown in cat and marmoset monkey cells	Characteristics of three strains of feline fibrosarcoma virus grown in cat and marmot monkey cells.
2	effects of visual deprivation on polyribosome aggregation in visual cortex of the cat	Effects of visual deprivation on apos; polyribosome aggregation in visual cortex of cat.
2	some contractile and electrophysiologic properties of the periurethral striated muscle of the cat	Some electrophysiological and contractile properties of the periurethral striated muscle of the cat.
2	the extent of the odontoblast process in the cat	L' extent of the odontoblast process in the cat.
2	cellular changes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and monkey after section of the optic tract	Cellular changes in the lateral genicular nucleus (LK) of the cat and monkey after section of the optic tract.
2	further studies on the mechanisms controlling prostaglandin biosynthesis in the cat adrenal cortex the role of calcium and cyclic amp	Other studies on the mechanisms controlling prostaglandin biosynthesis in the cat adrenal cortex have focused on the role of calcium and l' cyclic ampoule.
2	reactions of respiratory center neurons to local cooling of the ventral surface of the medulla oblongata	Responses of central respiratory neurons to local cooling of the ventral surface of the oblongata medulla.
2	a fraction isolated from porcine upper small intestine stimulating pepsin secretion in the cat	An isolated fraction of the upper porcine small intestine stimulates pepsin secretion in the cat.
2	the effects of 5 hydroxytryptophan and l tryptophan on wakefulness and sleep patterns in the cat	Effects of 5 hydroxytryptophan and 1 tryptophan on wakefulness and sleep in cats.
2	basal forebrain and hypothalamic influences upon brain stem neurons	Basal influences on forebrain and brain stem neurons; hypothalamus.
2	integrative versus delay line characteristics of cerebellar cortex	Integration versus delay line of cerebellar cortex.
2	ultrastructural and biochemical evidence for a steroid containing secretory organelle in the perfused cat adrenal gland	Ultrastructural and biochemical evidence for the presence of apos; a steroid containing secretory organelle in the perfused cat adrenal gland.
2	effects of low level x irradiation on cat cerebella at different postnatal intervals i quantitative evaluation of morphological changes	Effects of low irradiation on the cat cerebellum at different postnatal intervals and quantitative assessment of morphological changes.
2	mechanical stimuli exciting type a atrial vagal receptors in the cat	Exciting mechanical stimuli like atrial vagal receptors in the cat.
2	experimental myocardial infarction in the cat i reversible decline in contractility of noninfarcted muscle	Experimental myocardial infarction in the cat i reversible decrease in contractility of the noninfarctus muscle.
2	ultrastructural localization of acid phosphatase and thiamine pyrophosphatase activities and of phosphotungstic staining at low ph in the placental labyrinth of the cat	Ultrastructural localization of acid phosphatase and thiamine pyrophosphatase activities and low-php phosphotungstic staining in the placental labyrinth of the cat.
2	the retinal projection to the ventral part of the lateral geniculate nucleus an experimental study with silver impregnation methods and axoplasmic protein tracing	The retinal projection to the ventral part of the lateral genicular nucleus was the subject of an experimental study using impregnation, silver and axoplasmic protein tracing methods.
2	absence of the gamma spindle loop in the reinnervated hind leg muscles of the cat alpha muscle	Absence of gamma spindle loop in the reinnervated hind leg muscles of the cat alpha muscle.
2	horizontal vestibular nystagmus ii activity patterns of medial vestibular neurones during nystagmus	Horizontal vestibular Nystagmus ii vestibular patterns; activity of medial vestibular neurons during nystagmus.
2	the climbing fibers of the cerebellar cortex their origin and pathways in cat	The climbing fibers of the cerebellar cortex have their origin and pathways in cats.
2	changes in the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex under the combined influence of cl perfringens type a toxin and products of cl butyricum activity	Changes in the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex under these conditions; combined influence of a-type toxin, perfringens and apo products; cl-butyric activity.
2	comparative study of the dorso medial nucleus of the inferior colliculus	Comparative study of the dorso nucleus-median of the inferior colliculus.
2	dendroarchitectonic study of the inferior colliculus in the cat	Dendroarchitectonic study of the inferior colliculus in cats.
2	spatiotemporal organization of cat lateral geniculate receptive fields	Spatial organization of geniculate lateral receptive fields of the cat.
2	interactions between cat lateral geniculate neurons	Interactions between cat lateral geniculate neurons.
2	responses to tones and noise of single cells in dorsal cochlear nucleus of unanesthetized cats	Responses to tone and sound of individual cells in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of unanesthetized cats.
2	mossy fiber neck and second order labyrinthine projections to cat flocculus	Mossy fiber neck and second-order labyrinthine projections of cat flocculus.
2	reversal properties of climbing fiber potential in cat purkinje cells an example of a distributed synapse	An example of a distributed synapse is the d&apos properties; reversal of climbing fiber potential in cat purkinje cells.
2	cortical histopathology following stimulation with metallic and carbon electrodes	Cortical histopathology following stimulation with apo; help from metal and carbon electrodes.
2	responses of single neurons to electrical stimulation of the surface of the visual cortex	Reactions of isolated neurons to electrical stimulation of the surface of the visual cortex.
2	the visual cortex during chronic stimulation	Uh, visual cortex during chronic stimulation.
2	morphine naloxone and the responses of medial thalamic neurones of the cat	Morphine naloxone and the responses of the thalamic neurons of the cat.
2	electrophysiological and horseradish peroxidase studies of precerebellar afferents to the nucleus interpositus anterior i climbing fiber system	Electrophysiological and horseradish peroxidase studies of precerebellar afferents of the climbing fiber system anterior interpositus i.
2	relationship between visual and tactile representations in cat superior colliculus	Relationship between visual and tactile representations in cat superior colliculus.
2	fast and slow pyramidal tract neurons an intracellular analysis of their contrasting repetitive firing properties in the cat	Neurons in fast and slow pyramidal pathways, an intracellular analysis of their contrasting repetitive firing properties in cats.
2	the response of ca mediated action potentials and contractile activity in mammalian ventricular myocardium towards alkalosis	The response of Ca- and L-mediated action potentials; contractile activity in mammalian ventricular myocardium to alkalosis.
2	monocular deprivation morphological effects on different classes of neurons in the lateral geniculate nucleus	Morphological effects d' monocular deprivation on different classes of neurons in the lateral geniculate nucleus.
2	lipids in the proximal convoluted tubule of the cat kidney and the reabsorption of cholesterol	The lipids in the proximal convoluted tubule of the cat kidney and the reabsorption of cholesterol.
2	reconstruction of neurons of dorsal horn proper using golgi stained serial sections	Reconstruction of neurons of the dorsal horn proper to l'apos; aid of serial sections stained with golgi.
2	properties of ganglion cells in the visual streak of the cat s retina	Properties of ganglion cells in the visual band of the cat retina.
2	the effect of l tryptophan on spinal cord c fiber reflexes	L' effect of tryptophan on spinal cord c fiber reflexes.
2	the effects of batrachotoxin on cat papillary muscle	The effects of batrachotoxin on cat papillary muscle.
2	cancellation of rod signals by cones and cone signals by rods in the cat retina	Cancellation of rod signals by cones and cone signals by rods in the cat's retina.
2	fast axoplasmic transport in the fibres of chromatolysed neurones	Rapid axoplasmic transport in the fibers of chromatolyzed neurons.
2	lateral geniculate relay of slowly conducting retinal afferents to cat visual cortex	Lateral geniculate relay of slowly conducting retinal afferents of the cat visual cortex.
2	the physiology and anatomy of long ranging afferent fibres within the spinal cord	The physiology and anatomy of long-range afferent fibers in the spinal cord.
2	visual cells in the pontine nuclei of the cat	It's called visual cells in the pontic nuclei of the cat.
2	visual cortical cells their developmental properties in normal and dark reared kittens	Visual cortical cells have developmental properties in normal and dark-grown kittens.
2	the diastolic viscous properties of cat papillary muscle	Diastolic viscous properties of cat papillary muscle.
2	influence of frequency of splanchnic nerve stimulation on development of habituation in the cat cerebral cortex	Influence of splanchnic nerve stimulation frequency on the development of habituation in the cat cerebral cortex.
2	features of individual sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their axons in the superior thoracic portion of the spinal cord	Characteristics of individual sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their axons in the upper thoracic portion of the spinal cord.
2	purification of kallikrein from cat submaxillary gland	The purification of kallikrein from the gland under-cat maxillary.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the substantia nigra on responses of lateral geniculate body neurons to light	Effects of electrical stimulation of the black substance on the responses of lateral geniculated body neurons to light.
2	comparisons of the immunological properties of two structural polypeptides of type c rna viruses endogenous to old world monkeys	Comparison of the immunological properties of two structural polypeptides of cna-like viruses endogenous to monkeys of l'apos; ancien monde.
2	visual cortex role in object discrimination in cats deprived of pattern vision from birth	Role of visual cortex in object discrimination in cats deprived of sight patterns from birth.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat i motor output during sinusoidal linear accelerations	Dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and l' activity of extensor muscles of the forelimb in the motor flow of the cat decerebrated during d' linear sinusoidal accelerations.
2	discharges of superior colliculus neurons during head and eye movements of the alert cat	Discharge superior colliculus neurons during head and eye movements of alert cat.
2	the effects of cerebral sensory cortical ablation on instrumental conditioned reflex in cats with cerebellar lesions	The effects of cerebral cortical sensory ablation on the mechanical conditioned reflex in cats with cerebellar lesions.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat ii motor output during rotations in the horizontal plane	Dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and l' extensor muscle activity of the forelimb in the decerebrate cat ii motor output during rotations in the horizontal plane.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat iii motor output during rotations in the vertical plane	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and l' forelimb extensor muscle activity in decerebrate cat iii motor output during rotations in the vertical plane.
2	somatosensory properties of spinoreticular neurons in the cat	The somatosensory properties of spinoreticular neurons in cats.
2	activity of some enzymes in the cortex of the cat with pretrigeminal brainstem transection	The activity of certain enzymes in the cerebral cortex of the cat with transection of the brain stem at the pre-semminal stage.
2	ascites associated with intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula in a cat	Ascitis associated with intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula in a cat.
2	relationships between the spike components and the delayed depolarization in cat spinal neurones	Relationships between the spike components and delayed depolarization in cat spinal neurons.
2	strain sensitivity and directionality in cat atrial mechanoreceptors in vitro	The strain sensitivity and directionality in cat atrial mechanoreceptors in vitro.
2	mechanosensitive afferent units in the hypogastric nerve of the cat	Mechanosensitive afferent units in the hypogastric nerve of the cat.
2	statistical fluctuations in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Statistical fluctuations in charge transfer to spinal motoneuron synapses ia.
2	non quantal fluctuations and transmission failures in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Nonquantum fluctuations and transmission failures in charge transfer at spinal motoneuron synapses.
2	the effect of polarizing currents on unitary ia excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones	The effect of polarizing currents on excitatory post synaptic potentials has been evoked in spinal motoneurons.
2	threshold setting by the surround of cat retinal ganglion cells	Threshold determination by apos; surrounds of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	functional adaptation of sarcomere number of normal cat muscle	Functional adaptation of sarcomere number of cat normal muscle.
2	horseradish peroxidase localization of masticatory muscle motoneurons in cat	The localization of masticatory muscle motoneurons in cats by horseradish peroxidase.
2	identification and discharge patterns of spinal sympathetic interneurons	Identification and discharge of spinal sympathetic internalurons.
2	ascending pressor and depressor pathways in the cat spinal cord	Upward pressure and depressive pathways in the cat spinal cord.
2	the effect of activation of central adrenergic receptors by clonidine on the excitability of the solitary tract neurons in cats	L' effect of apos; activation of central adrenergic receptors by clonidine on the aposcle; excitability of solitary tract neurons in cats.
2	the anatomical organization of the cerebello olivary projection in the cat	L' anatomical organization of the cerebello olivary projection in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat as studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase ii the projection to the uvula	The olivocerebellar projection in the cat was studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase ii projection to the apos; uvule.
2	electrophoretic patterns of insoluble proteins in the sensory cerebral cortex of visually deprived and normal kittens	Electrophoretic models of insoluble proteins in the sensory cerebral cortex of normal kittens and visually impaired kittens.
2	effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on centrally evoked electrodermal responses and their interaction with yohimbine	The effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on centrally evoked electrodermal responses and their interaction with yohimbine.
2	neuronal responses to eye muscle stretch in cerebellar lobule vi of the cat	The neuronal responses to the ocular muscle stretch in the cerebellar lobule vi of the cat.
2	dark adaptation and receptive field organisation of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Apos adaptation; darkness and organization of cell receptive field in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus.
2	responses of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus to moving stimuli at various levels of light and dark adaptation	Cells of the cat lateral geniculate nucleus respond to moving stimuli at various levels of time; adaptation to light and light; darkness.
2	commissural projection to the amygdala thourgh the fimbria fornix system in the cat	The commissural projection at the apos; amygdale thourgh the fimbria system fornix in the cat.
2	effects of lsd on the response of single units in cat visual cortex	Effects of lsd on the response of single units in visual cortex cat.
2	time discrimination performance in cats with lesions in prefrontal cortex and caudate nucleus	Time discrimination performance in cats with lesions in the prefrontal cortex and the caudate nucleus.
2	interaction between spindles evoked by electric stimulation of different regions of the cerebral cortex	Interaction between spindles evoked by electrical stimulation of different regions of the cerebral cortex.
2	distribution of gastrin in canine cat and human digestive organs	Distribution of gastrin in canine cat and man's digestive organs.
2	prophylactic effects of phenytoin phenobarbital and carbamazepine examined in kindling cat preparations	The prophylactic effects of phenytoin phenobarbital and carbamazepine were examined in pet preparations.
2	cross sectional area of scala tympani in human and cat	Cross-sectional area of the human and cat eardrums.
2	unmyelinated axons in thoracic ventral roots of the cat	Unmyelinated axons in the ventral roots of the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iv the projection to the anterior lobe	The olivocerebellar projection in the cat was studied by the method of axonal retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase iv, the projection to the anterior lobe.
2	the effect of superior colliculus lesions upon the visual fields of cats with cortical ablations	L' effect of superior colliculus lesions on visual field of cats that have undergone cortical ablation.
2	the effect of cortical and tectal lesions on the visual fields of binocularly deprived cats	L' effect of cortical and tectal lesions on the visual field of cats without binoculars.
2	quantitative studies of cell size in the cat s dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following visual deprivation	Quantitative studies of cell size in the cat lateral dorsal geniculate nucleus following visual deprivation.
2	visual cortical areas mediating form discrimination in the cat	Cortical visual areas mediating form discrimination in the chat.
2	effects of benzodiazepines and pentobarbital on the evoked potentials in the cat brain	The effects of benzodiazepines and pentobarbital on evoked potentials in the cat brain.
2	preterminal and terminal axon arborizations in the substantia gelatinosa of cat s spinal cord	Preterminal and terminal axon arborizations in the gelatinous substance of the cat spinal cord.
2	relay cell classes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and the effects of visual deprivation	Classes of relay cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and the effects of visual deprivation.
2	antagonizing effects of beta adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus induced inhibition of trigeminal nucleus neurons	The antagonistic effects of beta-adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus induced apos; inhibition of trigeminal nucleus neurons.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex to the cerebral cortex and thalamus in the rat and cat	Projections of the amygdaloid complex to the cerebral cortex and thalamus in rat and cat.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex and adjacent olfactory structures to the entorhinal cortex and to the subiculum in the rat and cat	Implications of the amygdaloid complex and adjacent olfactory structures to the entorhinal cortex and subiculum in rats and cats.
2	an autoradiographic identification of purkinje axon terminals in the cat	Autoradiographic identification of the Purkinje axonal terminals in the cat.
2	projections of several intralaminar nuclei of the thalamus to the caudate nucleus in cats	Projections of several nuclei from the thalamus to the caudate nucleus in cats.
2	histological effects of ductal ligation of salivary glands of the cat	Histological effects of ligation of the salivary glands of the cat.
2	structural characteristics of the axons of nerve cells of the cat motor cortex	Structural characteristics of the axons of the nerve cells of the cat motor cortex.
2	comparative morphometric study of sensory neurons of the cerebral and spinal cord ganglia following transection of their processes	Comparative morphometric study of the sensory neurons of cerebral and spinal cord ganglia after the cutting of their processes.
2	efferent projections of the ventral portion of the putamen to the frontal parietal and temporal regions of the cat cerebral cortex	Efferent projections of the ventral portion of the putamen into the frontal parietal and temporal regions of the cat cerebral cortex.
2	associative connections of the visual area of the neuronally isolated cat cortex	Associative connections of the visual area of the cat's neuronally isolated cortical cortex.
2	altered levels of pgf in cat spinal cord tissue following traumatic injury	Changes in cat spinal cord tissue pgf levels as a result of traumatic injury.
2	neuronal activity of the cat visual cortex during the sleep wakefulness cycle	Neural activity of the cat visual cortex during sleep-awakening cycle.
2	mechanisms of transmission of excitation grnerated in the orbito frontal cortex	Mechanisms of transmission of l' grated excitation in the frontal orbital cortex.
2	a standardized model of microembolization in the cat brain	Uh, a standardized model of microembolism in the cat's brain.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat i comparison of responses to moving and stationary stimuli	Single striated neurons in the cat compare responses to mobile and stationary stimuli.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat ii mechanisms underlying directional asymmetry and directional selectivity	Single striated neurons in the cat ii mechanisms at-jacent to directional asymmetry and directional selectivity.
2	antidromic activity in visual radiation during evoked cortical responses	L' antidromic activity in visual radiation during evoked cortical responses.
2	the actions of natural secretin on the small intestinal vasculature of the anaesthetized cat	The actions of natural secretin on the vascular system of anesthetized cat's small intestine.
2	labelled decamethonium in cat muscle	Decamethonium labeled in cat muscle.
2	biotin deficiency in the cat and the effect on hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase	A biotin deficiency in the cat and effect on hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase.
2	the mechanism of inhibition of neuronal activity by opiates in the spinal cord of cat	The mechanism of neuronal activity by opiates in the spinal cord of cats.
2	selective discharge of pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Selective discharge of pontic neurons during the apos; postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat.
2	tonic inhibition of dorsal pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Tonic inhibition of dorsal pontic neurons during the apos; postural atrophy produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat.
2	sequential discharges of phasic activities pgo waves during paradoxical sleep after selective cortical lesions in the cat	Sequential unloading of phasic pgo wave activities during REM sleep after selective cortical lesions in the cat.
2	the uptake of dh ergotoxine by different parts of the cat brain	L' l&apos absorption; ergotoxin dh by different parts of the cat brain.
2	serotonin involvement in the blockade of bulbospinal inhibition of the spinal monosynaptic reflex	L' involvement of serotonin in blockade of the apos; bulbospinal inhibition of the spinal reflex monosynaptic.
2	responses of complex cells in the visual cortex of the cat as a function of the length of moving slits	The responses of complex cells in the visual cortex of the cat are a function of the length of mobile slits.
2	incorporation of tritiated leucine by axotomized rubral neurons	L' incorporation of tritiated leucine by axotomized rubric neurons.
2	convergence of the descending pathways of motor visual and limbic cortex in the cat di and mesencephalon	Convergence of the descending pathways of the motor vision and limbic cortex in the cat di and midbrain.
2	the effect of antifibrinolytic therapy in experimental spinal cord trauma	The effect of antifibrinolytic therapy on experimental spinal cord trauma.
2	spinal projections from the nucleus locus coeruleus and nucleus subcoeruleus in the cat and monkey as demonstrated by the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	Spinal projections of the nucleus locus coeruleus and of the nucleus subcoeruleus in cats and monkeys, as demonstrated by retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	power spectral analysis of eeg activity obtained from cortical and subcortical sites during the vigilance states of the cat	Spectral power analysis of eeg activity obtained from cortical sites and under-cortical during vigilance states of the cat.
2	the mechanism of the vasodilator effects of histamine and 4 methylhistamine in the hindquarters of the cat	The mechanism of vasodilatory effects of histamine and methylhistamine 4 in the hindquarters of the cat.
2	ultrastructure of arterioles in the cat brain	L' ultrastructure of arterioles in the cat brain.
2	allergens of mammalian origin v properties of extracts derived from the domestic cat	D&apos allergens; mammalian origin v properties of extracts derived from the domestic cat.
2	abnormal visual resolution in the siamese cat	An abnormal visual resolution in the Siamese cat.
2	effect of damage to the zone of the medial forebrain bundle and preoptic area on the activiy of a penicillin induced epileptiform focus phenomenon of the hyperactive determinant dispatch station	Effect of apos; alteration of the median forebrain bundle area and preoptic region on apos; d&apos activity; a penicillin-induced epileptiform focusing phenomenon of the hyperactive determinant control station.
2	influence of the somatic region of the cortex on trace inhibitory processes in the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	L' influence of the somatic region of the cortex on inhibitory processes in the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus.
2	epinephrine inhibition of the electrodermal response in the cat	Epinephrine inhibition of the electrodermal response in the cat.
2	the influence of hypothalamically administered reserpine on the sexual behavior of the female cat	The hypothalamic administration of reserpine on the sexual behavior of the female cat.
2	method for reliably recording geniculate spikes during paradoxical sleep in the cat	Reliable method of recording geniculate peaks during a REM sleep in the cat.
2	modification of visual function by early visual experience	Change of visual function by early visual experience.
2	reactions of neurons in the primary and secondary somatosensory zones of the cortex to stimulation of the ventral posterior nucleus of the thalamus	Reactions of neurons in the primary and secondary somatosensory zones of the cortex to stimulation of the ventral posterior nucleus of the thalamus.
2	spatial organization of the direct connections of the sensory motor cortex with the rhombencephalon and spinal cord in cats	Spatial organization of the direct connections of the sensory motor cortex with the rhombencephalon and spinal cord in cats.
2	comparative characteristics of interneuronal dimensions in the cervical segments of the cat spinal cord	Comparative characteristics of the internaluronal dimensions in the cervical segments of the cat spinal cord.
2	cardiovascular actions of prostaglanding f2alpha 15 me f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in the cat	Cardiovascular action of f2alpha 15 me f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in the cat.
2	neuroanatomic projections related to biting attack elicited from ventral midbrain in cats	Neuroanatomical projections related to bites in the ventral midbrain in cats.
3	binding capacity of reductively fragmented antibodies to the 2 4 dinitrophenyl group	The binding capacity of reductively fragmented antibodies to the dinitrophenyl group 4.
3	antigens and enzymes made insoluble by entrapping them into lattices of synthetic polymers	The antigens and enzymes become insoluble by trapping them in networks of synthetic polymers.
3	gamma globulins quantitative relationships in human serum and nonvascular fluids	Quantitative ratio between gamma globulins in human serum and nonvascular fluids.
3	complementary strand association between nucleic acids and nucleic acid gels	Complementary strand association between nucleic acids and gels; nucleic acid.
3	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes lability at low temperature	The lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme lability at low temperature.
3	provitamin a2 from lutein	It's called lutein provitamin a2.
3	mitomycin c chemical and biological studies on alkylation	Mitomycin c chemical and biological studies on apos; alkylation.
3	double stranded ribonucleic acid formation in vitro by ms 2 phage induced rna synthetase	In vitro formation of d' double stranded ribonucleic acid by phage ms 2 induced rna synthetase.
3	production of antirenin to homologous renin and its effect of experimental renal hypertension	The production of antirenine with homologue renin and its effect on the development of experimental renal hypertension.
3	the arrangements of nucleotide sequences in t2 and t5 bacteriophage dna molecules	Organizing nucleotide sequences in t2 and t5 bacteriophage DNA molecules.
3	protein polysaccharide in connective tissue inhibition of phase separation	Protein polysaccharide in connective tissue inhibition of phase separation.
3	microdetermination of calcium and magnesium in biological materials	Micro-determination of calcium and magnesium in biological materials.
3	practical human growth hormone preparation and clinical use	Practical preparation for human growth hormone and clinical use.
3	steric factors in the chemistry of polypeptides poly alphaamino acids and proteins	Steric factors in the chemistry of polyalphaamino polypeptides-acids and proteins.
3	preparation of retine from human urine	Preparation of the retina from human urine aspiration.
3	a stable substrate for the assay of plasma kinin forming enzymes	A stable substrate for the determination of plasma kinin formation enzymes.
3	hybridization of half molecules of rabbit gamma globulin	Half-molecular hybridization of rabbit gamma globulin molecules.
3	circularity of the replicating form of a single stranded dna virus	Circularity of the replicative form of a single DNA-chain virus.
3	hemoglobin solubility and alpha chain structure in crosses between two inbread mouse strains	Apos solubility; hemoglobin and alpha chain structure in crosses between two selfed mouse lines.
3	identity of tarichatoxin and tetrodotoxin	The identity of tarichatoxin and tetrodotoxin.
3	alpha chain of human hemoglobin occurrence in vivo	Alpha chain of human hemoglobin in vivo.
3	actinomycin d as a probe for nucleic acid secondary structure	L' actinomycin d as a probe for the nucleic acid secondary structure.
3	actinomycin correlation of structure and function of its complexes with purines and dna	Correlation of the structure and function of l' actinomycin of its complexes with purines and l' DNA.
3	conversion of leucoanthocyanins into the corresponding anthocyanidins	Conversion of leucoanthocyanines into the corresponding anthocyanidines.
3	thermal denaturation of collagen in the dispersed and solid state	Thermal denaturation of collagen in the solid and dispersed state.
3	group specific carbohydrate of group c variant hemolytic streptococci	Specific group c glucides varying hemolytic streptococci.
3	oxygen stable hemolysins of group a streptococci ii chromatographic and electrophoretic studies	Stable oxygenated hemolysins of the group have streptococci ii Chromatographic and electrophoretic studies.
3	affinity and phosphorylation constants for the inhibition of esterases by organophosphates	Apos; affinity and phosphorylation constants for apos; inhibition of esterases by organophosphates.
3	intercellular macromolecules containing polysaccharides	Intercellular macromolecules containing polysaccharides.
3	the three dimensional structures of proteins	The three-dimensional structures of the proteins.
3	macromolecules origin development significance	Importance of the development of l' macromolecular origin for development.
3	guanine formation during the thermal polymerization of amino acids	Guanine formation during the thermal polymerization of amino acids.
3	insect chemosterilants with low toxicity for mammals	Chimosterilants of apos; low mammalian toxic insects.
3	sonic energy effects in bovine serum albumin solutions	Effects of apos; sonic energy in bovine serum albumin solutions.
3	immunological and toxic differences between mouse virulent and mouse avirulent candida albicans	Immunological and toxic differences between virulent and avirulent candida albicans mice.
3	physical surface features and chemical density of dry bacterial spores	Physical surface characteristics and chemical density of dry bacterial spores.
3	outstanding characteristics of thrombokinase isolated from bovine plasma	Exceptional characteristics of thrombokinase isolated from bovine plasma.
3	new natural growth promoting substances in young citrus fruit	New natural growth promoting substances in young citrus fruits.
3	invertebrate ferritin occurrence in mollusca	Distribution of invertebrate ferritin in molluscs.
3	cesium 134 in alaskan eskimos and in fallout	Cesium 134 in the Eskimo Mountains of Alaska and in fallout areas.
3	measurement of bone mineral in vivo an improved method	In vivo measurement of bone minerals is an improved method of measurement.
3	an investigation of the electrical conductivity of steroids	Study of the electrical conductivity of steroids.
3	linear polymerization of a gastropod hemocyanin	Linear polymerization of the gastropod hemocyanin.
3	cortisol from human nerve	Cortisol from the human nerve.
3	feedback control of purified deoxycytidylate deaminase	Retro-is a control of purified deoxycytidylate deaminase.
3	thiamine a novel conversion from thiochrome	Thiamine is a novel conversion from thiochrome.
3	the cytonucleoproteins of amebae i some chemical properties and intracellular distribution	Amoebic cytonucleoproteins have some chemical properties and an intracellular distribution.
3	antibodies to bradykinin and angiotensin a use of carbodiimides in immunology	Antibodies to bradykinin and angiotensin, a use of carbodiimides in immunology.
3	extracellular polysaccharides of azotobacter vinelandii	Extracellular polysaccharides of azotobacter vinelandii.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea i fatty acid composition of the extractable lipids	The lipids of sarcina lutea i fatty acid composition of extractable lipids.
3	identification of species of actinomyces	It is not possible to determine the species of the species.
3	some characteristics of streptococcal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotidase and streptolysin o	Some characteristics of streptococcal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotidase and streptolysin o.
3	the impurity of radioiodinated triolein	L' impurity of radioiodinated triolein.
3	oxygen atom reactions with condensed olefins	Apos atoms react; oxygen with condensed olefins.
3	heparinic acids determination of equivalent weights and sulfate to carboxyl ratios	Heparinic acids of equivalent weight and sulfate to carboxyl ratios are determined.
3	nucleic acids a nuclear magnetic resonance study	Nucleic acids in nuclear magnetic resonance studies.
3	antigenic structure of the actinomycetales vii chemical and serological similarities of cell walls from 100 actinomycetales strains	Antigenic structure of the actinomycetales vii chemical and serological similarities of the cell walls of 100 d' actinomycetales.
3	alkylation of synthetic polynucleotides	Alkylation of synthetic polynucleotides.
3	hydrogen atom thermal parameters	The thermal parameters of the apos; atom d' hydrogen.
3	creative scientists of today	The creative scientists of today.
3	immunoglobulin structure partial amino acid sequence of a bence jones protein	Structure of apos; partial immunoglobulin sequence of apos amino acids; jones protein bence.
3	dna reaction with chloroquine	Reaction of chloroquine with DNA.
3	mercurial induced transformation of myosin prevented by adenosine triphosphate and pyrophosphate	Mercury induces the transformation of myosin prevented by adenosine triphosphate and pyrophosphate.
3	base specificity in the interaction of polynucleotides with antibiotic drugs	Specificity of base in the interaction of polynucleotides with antibiotics.
3	cesium 137 in alaskan eskimos	Eskimo caesium 137 in Alaska.
3	chemical studies on cellular components of bordetella pertussis iii isolation of highly potent toxin from bordetella pertussis	Chemical studies of cellular components of bordetella pertussis iii isolation of apos, a potent toxin of Bordetella pertussis.
3	immunochemical analysis of human oral strains of fusobacterium and leptotrichia	Immunochemical analysis of human oral strains of fusobacteria and leptotrichies.
3	experimental salmonellosis iii new toxic fraction l obtained from salmonella enteritidis and its immunological properties	Experimental salmonellosis iii new toxic fraction l obtained from Salmonella enteritidis and its immunological properties.
3	classification of microorganisms by analysis of chemical composition i feasibility of utilizing gas chromatography	Micro@-@ organisms classification by analysis of chemical composition; feasibility of use of gas chromatography.
3	fatty acid composition of lipids from streptococcus cremoris and streptococcus lactis var maltigenes	Fatty acid composition of streptococcus cremoris and streptococcus lactis var maltigenes lipids.
3	phenotypic genotypic and chemical changes in starving populations of aerobacter aerogenes	Phenotypic, genotypic and chemical changes in populations of starving aerobic plants.
3	spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in bacteria	A spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in bacteria.
3	dependence of the content of cell envelopes on the growth rate of bacillus megaterium	The content of cell envelopes is dependent on the growth rate of the megaterium bacillus.
3	capsular polysaccharide of azotobacter agilis	Capsular polysaccharide of azotobacter agilis.
3	origin and properties of naturally occurring hapten from escherichia coli	Origins and properties of plants; haptenes; natural origin from Escherichia coli.
3	differentiation of exotoxin and other biologically active substances in pseudomonas pseudomallei filtrates	The differentiation of exotoxin and other biologically active substances in pseudomonas pseudomallei filtrates.
3	evidence for an exocellular site for the acid phosphatase of saccharomyces mellis	Evidence of an exocellular site for the acid phosphatase of saccharomyces mellis.
3	structure and composition of the bacillus anthracis capsule	The structure and composition of the anthracis bacillus capsule.
3	chemical composition and biological properties of the endotoxin of brucella abortus	The chemical composition and biological properties of brucella abortus endotoxin.
3	hypoferremia in mice and its application to the bioassay of endotoxin	Hypoferremia in mice and its application to endotoxin bioassay.
3	mitomycins and porfiromycin chemical mechanism of activation and cross linking of dna	Matiomycin and porfiromycin chemical mechanism of activation and cross-binding of DNA.
3	immunological and biochemical studies on serum haptoglobin	Immunological and biochemical studies on serum haptoglobin.
3	antigenic relationships between groups b and g streptococci	Antigenic relationships between groups b and g Streptococcus.
3	the spectral distribution of firefly light	The spectral distribution of firefly light.
3	nucleic acid homologies of selected bacteria l forms mycoplasma species	The nucleic acid homologies of selected bacteria form species of mycoplasma.
3	lifetime of bacterial messenger ribonucleic acid	Lifespan; ribonucleic acid (RNA), a bacterial messenger.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi i ribonucleic acids	Nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi i ribonucleic acids.
3	autolytic mechanism for spheroplast formation in bacillus cereus and escherichia coli	Autolytic mechanisms of spheroplast formation in cereus and lapos; escherichia coli.
3	myosin substructure isolation of a helical subunit from heavy meromyosin	Isolation of a helical unit under myosin structure of heavy meromyosin.
3	use of a filter paper disk assay in the measurement of lipid biosynthesis	Use of a filter paper test to measure the biosynthesis of lipids.
3	synthesis of fatty acid anhydrides by reaction with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide	D&apos anhydrides; fatty acids by reaction with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide.
3	radiation chemical oxidation of peptides in the solid state	Radiation-induced chemical oxidation of peptides in the solid state.
3	the crystal and molecular structure of 5 fluro 2 deoxy beta uridine	The crystal and molecular structure of 5 fluro 2 deoxy beta uridine.
3	some properties of the rhodanese system of thiobacillus denitrificans	Some properties of the rhodanese system of thiobacillus denitrificans.
3	cysteine in calf thymus histones	Cysteine in calf thymus histones.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l properties of the mucin and of the glycoprotein component	The hypobranchial mucin of the whelk undatum the properties of the mucin and the glycoprotein component.
3	the molecular structure of bacterial walls the size of ribitol teichoic acids and the nature of their linkage to glycosaminopeptides	The molecular structure of bacterial walls, the size of ribitol teichoic acids and the nature of their binding to glycosaminopeptides.
3	purification and properties of coproporphyrinogenase	The purification and properties of coproporphyrinogenase.
3	isolation of a naphthaquinone with partly hydrogenated side chain from corynebacterium diphtheriae	Isolation d' a naphthaquinone with a partially hydrogenated side chain from corynebacterium diphtheria.
3	the origins of tannins and flavonoids in black wattle barks and heartwoods and their associated non tannin components	The origins of tannins and flavonoids in black baleen bark and heartwood and their associated non-tannin components.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group g o 13 22 lipopolysaccharides	L' immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides of the 1322 lipopolysaccharide group of salmonellae.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group n o 30 lipopolysaccharides	L' immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides of the group Salmonella n o 30 lipopolysaccharides lipopolysaccharides.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides	L' immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides of salmonella group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides.
3	isolation of a peroxidatically active product from the peptic digest of ox liver catalase and some of its properties	Isolate a peroxidically active product from the peptic digestion of beef liver catalase and certain of its properties.
3	differences in cattle globins	Differences in cattle globins.
3	catalase kinetics of photooxidation	The kinetics of photooxidation catalase.
3	hybridization experiments evidence of dissociation equilibrium in hemerythrin	Dapos; hybridization experiments revealed a dissociation equilibrium in haemerythrin.
3	comparison of messenger rna in photoperiodically induced and noninduced xanthium buds	Comparison of messenger rna in photoperiod induced and noninduced xanthium buds.
3	variation in density and transformation potential in deoxyribonucleic acid from neisseria meningitidis	Change in density and transformation potential of deoxyribonucleic acid of Neisseria meningitidis.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus i measurement of glyoxylate and enzyme purification	L' ureidoglycolate synthetase from streptococcus allantoicus i measures glyoxylate and purifies the enzyme.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus ii properties of the enzyme and reaction equilibrium	Ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus ii properties of the enzymes; enzyme and reaction; equilibrium.
3	mode of inhibition of diphtheria toxin by ammonium chloride	Methods; ammonia inhibition of diphtheria toxin by d*apos chloride.
3	trehalose as an endogenous reserve in spores of the fungus myrothecium verrucaria	Trehalose as endogenous reserve in spores of the fungus myrothecium verrucaria.
3	use of secondary data in numerical taxonomy of the genus erwinia	The use of secondary data in numerical taxonomy of the genus erwinia.
3	polysaccharide lipid complexes from veillonella parvula	Polysaccharide lipid complexes of veillonella parvula.
3	trehalase from dictyostelium discoideum purification and properties	Trehalase from dictyostelium discoideum purification and properties.
3	clinical evaluation of brinaldix a new oral diuretic	A new oral diuretic of brinal ten.
3	microbial degradation of corrinoids 3 pigments derived from vitamin b12 by pseudomonas rubescens	Microbial degradation of corrinoids 3 pigments derived from vitamin b12 by pseudomonas rubescens.
3	in vitro inhibition of diphtheria toxin action by ammonium salts and amines	In vitro, apo; apo inhibition; diphtheria toxin action by apo salts; ammonia and amines.
3	electrical impedance of isolated amnion	Electrical impedance and electrical impedance of the isolated amnion.
3	changes in fungi with age chemical composition of rhizoctonia solani and sclerotium bataticola	Changes in chemical composition of rhizoctonia solani and sclerotia bataticola as a function of fungal age.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi ii deoxyribonucleic acids	The nucleotide composition of the nucleic acids of fungi ii Deoxyribonucleic acids.
3	thermostability of bacillus cereus penicillinase	Thermostability of bacillus cereus cereus penicillinase.
3	ribonucleic acid and ribosomes of bacillus stearothermophilus	Ribonucleic acid and ribosomes of stearothermophilus bacillus.
3	effect of light intensity on the formation of the photochemical apparatus in the green bacterium chloropseudomonas ethylicum	Effect of light intensity on the formation of apos; photochemical apparatus in the green bacterium chloropseudomonas ethylicum.
3	beta hemolytic gram negative hemophilic bacillus isolated from the genitalia of rabbits	Gram-negative hemophilic bacillus beta-hemolytic Gram isolated from the genital organs of rabbits.
3	amino acid changes provoked by streptomycin in a polypeptide synthesized in vitro	Amino acid changes induced by streptomycin in a polypeptide synthesized in vitro.
3	charge transfer self complex formed by 8 azaguanine	Auto-charge transfer complex formed by 8 azaguanine.
3	prostaglandins in human seminal plasma prostaglandins and related factors 46	Prostaglandins in human seminal plasma prostaglandins and related factors 46.
3	a bacteriological study of non chromogenic variants of serratia marcescens from human sources	A bacteriological study of non chromogenic variants of serratia marcescens from human origin.
3	release of formaldehyde from polynoxylin and noxythiolin	Acute release of formaldehyde from polynoxyline and noxythiolin.
3	serial laboratory reports and records for chemical analyses	Serial laboratory reports and records for chemical analysis.
3	cumulative reporting of chemical pathology	Cumulative chemical pathology report.
3	exchange of carbon bound hydrogen atoms ortho to the hydroxyl group in tyrosine	In the case of hydrogen, it is the hydrogen bonded to the hydroxyl group in tyrosine.
3	sodium sulphomethyl derivatives of polymyxins	Sulfomethylated sodium derivatives of polymyxins.
3	nuclear dna and cytoplasmic dna from tissues of higher plants	Both nuclear and cytoplasmic DNA from tissues of higher plants.
3	the isolation of retinal outer segment fragments	Isolation of outer segment fragments of retina.
3	immunoglobulin structure amino and carboxyl terminal peptides of type i bence jones proteins	Structure of the apos; immunoglobulin amino and carboxyl terminal peptides of type i bence jones proteins.
3	intermolecular forces in association of purines with polybenzenoid hydrocarbons	Intermolecular forces in association of purines with polybenzenoid hydrocarbons.
3	synthesis of block oligonucleotides	Synthesis of block oligonucleotides.
3	the natural history of oxygen	L' the natural history of oxygen.
3	radiolysis of estrone and estradiol	Radiolysis of estrone and estradiol.
3	the linkage between the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Binding between the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei.
3	properties of the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Polysaccharide and mucopeptide properties of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei.
3	tritiated starch granules	D&apos granules; tritiated starch granules.
3	ovoglycoprotein a protein of hen s egg white	Ovoglycoprotein, a protein of white hen egg.
3	a comparison of methods for the isolation and fractionation of reticulocyte ribosomes	Comparison of methods of isolation and fractionation of reticulocyte ribosomes.
3	studies on the metabolism of the protozoa the molecular structure of a starch type polysaccharide from polytoma uvella	Studies on the metabolism of protozoa, the molecular structure of d&apos, a starch-like polysaccharide from polytoma uvella.
3	dehydrogenation of androsterone by purified 3 alpha hydroxy steroid dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenating enzyme of rat liver	Dehydrogenation of androsterone by apos; transhydrogenation enzyme of apos; nicotinamide-dependent adenine dinucleotide phosphate; hydroxy-3 alpha steroid in rat liver.
3	enzymatic action on the capsular material produced by pseudomonas aeruginosa of cystic fibrosis origin	Enzymatic action on the capsular material produced by Pseudomonas aeruginosa d' cystic fibrosis origin.
3	observations on the group c streptococcal bacteriophage and lytic enzyme system	Observations on group c streptococcal bacteriophage and lytic enzyme system.
3	beta hemolytic streptococci with group a and type ii carbohydrate antigens	Hemolytic beta streptococci with group a and type ii carbohydrate antigens.
3	preparation of steroid structural data for the consideration of possible structural functional relationships	Preparation of steroid structural data for the consideration of possible structural functional relationships.
3	the clinical significance of elevated blood lactate	Lapos; clinical importance of diabetes; elevated blood lactate levels.
3	relation between optical configuration and immunogenicity of synthetic polypeptides	Relationship between optical configuration and immunogenicity of synthetic polypeptides.
3	the partial acid hydrolysis of a highly dextrorotatory fragment of the cell wall of aspergillus niger isolation of the alpha 1 3 linked dextrin series	L' partial acid hydrolysis of d' a highly dextrator fragment of the cell wall of d' aspergillus niger isolated from the series of dextrin bound alpha 1.
3	ribonucleic acids from barley leaves	Ribonucleic acids from barley leaves.
3	natural and synthetic diastereoisomeric 3 4 7 trihydroxyflavan 3 4 diols	Natural and synthetic diastereoisomer 3 4 7 trihydroxyflavane 3 4 diols.
3	the isolation of structural components present in the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346	The isolation of structural components present in the cell wall of the bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346.
3	the interaction of collagen and acid mucopolysaccharides a model for connective tissue	L' the interaction of collagen and acid mucopolysaccharides is a model for connective tissue.
3	structural studies of alpha crystallin	Structural studies of crystalline alpha.
3	the mechanism of the periodate thiobarbituric acid reaction of sialic acids	The mechanism of the periodic thiobarbituric acid reaction of sialic acids.
3	the swelling of bovine ligamentum nuchae as a function of ph	Swelling of the bovine ligamentum nuchae as a function of ph.
3	the structure of the glucuronide of sulphadimethoxine formed in man	The structure of the glucuronide of sulfadimethoxine formed in men.
3	the fluorescence of some biphenyl derivatives	Uh, the fluorescence of some biphenyl derivatives.
3	indole compounds isolation from pineal tissue	L' indole compounds are isolated from pineal tissue.
3	histone regulation of lactic dehydrogenase in embryonic chick brain tissue	Histone regulation of lactic dehydrogenase in embryonic brain tissue of chickens.
3	the isolation and properties of epithelial cell ghosts from rat small intestine	Isolation and properties of epithelial cell ghosts in rat's small intestine.
3	peptide synthesis from amino acids in aqueous solution	Peptide synthesis from amino acids in aqueous solution.
3	dicyandiamide possible role in peptide synthesis during chemical evolution	Dicyandiamide may play a role in peptide synthesis during chemical evolution.
3	glycerinated skeletal and smooth muscle calcium and magnesium dependence	Calcium and magnesium dependence of glycerinated skeletal and smooth muscles.
3	peptides attached to thrombin their influence on proteolysis	The peptides attached to thrombin have an influence on proteolysis.
3	hybrid antibody molecules with allotypically different l polypeptide chains	Hybrid antibody molecules with allotypically different chains of polypeptides.
3	phospholipid and nucleic acid gradients in the developing amphibian embryo	Nucleic acid gradients of phospholipids and dolipids in the developing embryo; amphibian.
3	the preparation and properties of bacterial chromatophore fractions	Preparation and properties of bacterial chromatophore fractions.
3	deamination of 4 aminopyrimidine nucleosides by extracts of rye grass lolium perenne	Deamination of 4 aminopyrimidine nucleosides by extracts of lolium perenne from rye.
3	sap concentrations in halophytes and some other plants	Plant sap concentrations in halophytes and some other plants.
3	the phosphorylated intermediate in the phosphoglyceromutase reaction	L' phosphorylated intermediate in the phosphoglyceromutase reaction.
3	purification of beta acetylglucosaminase and beta galactosidase from ram testis	Purification of beta acetylglucosaminase and beta galactosidase from sheep testicles.
3	the chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol 7 dehydro 26 14c cholesterol and 26 hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol	Chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol 7 dehydro 26c cholesterol and 26 hydroxy 26c 14c cholesterol.
3	the preparation and properties of ficin chemically attached to carboxymethylcellulose	The preparation and properties of ficin chemically attached to carboxymethylcellulose.
3	fluorescence studies on some hydroxypyridines including compounds of the vitamin b6 group	Fluorescence studies on some hydroxypyridines including compounds of the vitamin b6 group.
3	a new flavan 3 4 diol from acacia auriculiformis by paper ionophoresis	A new flavan 3,4 diol d' acacia auriculiformis by paper ionophoresis.
3	the determination of the substitution achieved at the alpha amino epsilon amino and imidazole groups of proteins with special reference to derivatives of gelatin	Determination of substitution at the level of the alpha groups-amino-epsilon-amino and imidazole of proteins with special reference to the gelatin derivatives.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l the polysaccharide sulphate component	The hypobranchial mucin of the whelk, buccinum undatum l the polysaccharide component sulfate.
3	characterization of ribonucleases and ribonuclease inhibitor in subcellular fractions from rat adrenals	Characterization of ribonucleases and apos; ribonuclease inhibitor in subcellular fractions of rat adrenals.
3	electrophoretic and other studies on haem pigments from rhodopseudomonas palustris cytochrome 552 and cytochromoid c	Electrophoretic and other studies of rhodopseudomonas palustris cytochrome 552 and cytochromoid c.
3	proteins and disulfide groups in the aggregation of dissociated cells of sea sponges	The proteins and disulfide groups in the apos; aggregation of dissociated cells of sea sponges.
3	the electron microscopic localization of cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of an insect periplaneta americana 1	Electron microscopic localization of cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of apos; an insect, periplaneta americana 1.
3	predicting production in light limited continuous cultures of algae	The prediction of light production has limited the ability of continuous cultures of algae.
3	geosmin an earthly smelling substance isolated from actinomycetes	Geosmin is a soil-smelling substance isolated from actinomycetes.
3	disulfide bond cleavage and formation in proteins	Disulfide bond cleavage and formation in proteins.
3	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis i extraction of antigens	Heat-labile Salmonella antigens enteritidis i extraction of antigens.
3	soluble antigens of vaccinia infected mammalian cells i separation of virus induced soluble antigens into two classes on the basis of physical characteristics	Soluble antigens from vaccinia infected mammalian cells i separation of viruses induced soluble antigens into two classes based on physical characteristics.
3	components required for the formation of ch 4 from methylcobalamin by extracts of methanobacillus omelianskii	Components required for the formation of ch 4 from methylcobalamine by extracts of methanobacillus omelianskii.
3	comparison of two serologically distinct ribonucleic acid bacteriophages ii properties of the nucleic acids and coat proteins	Comparison of two serologically distinct ribonucleic acid bacteriophages ii properties of nucleic acids and coat proteins.
3	isolation and morphology of temperature agrobacterium tumefaciens bacteriophage	Isolation and morphology of temperature bacteriophage agrobacterium tumefaciens.
3	crystal and molecular structure of a phospholipid component l alpha glycerophosphorylcholine cadmium chloride trihydrate	The crystal and molecular structure of d' a phospholipid compound, cadmium chloride trihydrate, l' alpha glycerophosphorylcholine.
3	thymine addition to ethanol induction by gamma irradiation	Thymine addition to apos; apos induction; ethanol gamma irradiation causes apos; thymine addition to apos; ethanol.
3	enzymatic synthesis of tri and tetranucleotides of defined sequence	Enzyme synthesis of sort and tetranucleotides of defined sequence.
3	papain membrane on a collodion matrix preparation and enzymic behavior	Papain membrane on a collodion matrix preparation and enzymatic behavior.
3	the growth of a laboratory	The growth of a laboratory.
3	deamino oxytocin and 1 gamma mercaptobutyric acid oxytocin x ray crystallographic data	X-ray crystallographic data for oxytocin de-amino et l-apos; oxytocin 1 gamma de l-apos; mercaptobutyric acid.
3	purification of a salt requiring enzyme from an obligately halophilic bacterium	Purification of a salt requiring salt; d*apos enzyme; mandatory halophilic bacterium.
3	influence of deoxyribonucleic acid degradation products and orthophosphate on deoxynucleotide kinase activity and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in pneumococcus type 3	Influence of deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, orthophosphate on apos, deoxynucleotide kinase activity and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in type 3 pneumococcus.
3	isolation and characterization of the cyanide resistant and azide resistant catalase of lactobacillus plantarum	Isolation and characterization of the cyanide-resistant and the azide-resistant catalase of lactobacillus plantarum.
3	enzymatic deacylation of s35 benzylpenicillin	Enzyme deacylation of benzylpenicillin s35.
3	conservation of ribosomal and messenger ribonucleic acid cistrons in bacillus species	Conservation of ribosomal cistrons and messengers of l' ribonucleic acid in bacillus species.
3	corroboration of recent models of the gamma g immunoglobulin molecule	Confirmation of recent models of the molecule d' immunoglobulin gamma g.
3	chain initiation and control of protein synthesis	Chain initiation and control of protein synthesis.
3	native and renatured transfer ribonucleic acid	Transfer ribonucleic acid to native or renatable state.
3	the role of carbonium ions in color reception	The role of carbonium ions in color reception.
3	lysis of bacterial cell walls by an enzyme isolated from a myxobacter	Lysis of bacterial cell walls by an enzyme isolated from a myxobacterium.
3	agar gel precipitin inhibition technique for c reactive protein determinations 3 quantitation of c reactive protein in serum specimens	Apos technique; precipitin gel inhibition; agar for determination of c reactive protein 3 quantitation of c reactive protein in serum samples.
3	alpha sarcin a new antitumor agent i isolation purification chemical composition and the identity of a new amino acid	Alpha sarcin, a new anti-tumor agent for purification of apos; isolation and apos; identity of a new amino acid.
3	removal of plant nutrients by means of aerobic stabilization of sludge	L' removal of plant nutrients using aerobic stabilization of sludge.
3	allomorphic forms of bacteriophage phix 174 replicative dna	Allomorphic forms of the bacteriophage phix 174 replicative DNA.
3	physicochemical and biological studies on various preparations of tuberculin purified protein derivative	Physico-chemical and biological studies of various preparations of tuberculin purified protein derivatives.
3	detection of staphylococcal enterotoxin in food	Detection of staphylococcal enterotoxins in foods.
3	chemical composition of cell wall preparations from strains of various form genera of aerobic actinomycetes	A chemical composition of cell wall preparations of strains of various types of aerobic actinomycetes.
3	in vitro and in vivo laboratory evaluation of cephaloglycin and cephaloridine	In vitro and in vivo laboratory evaluation of cephaloglycine and cephaloridine.
3	cytochemical localization of acid phosphatases in euglena gracilis	Cytochemical localization of acid phosphatases in euglena gracilis etapos.
3	lysosomal fractions from transitional epithelium	Lapos lysosomal ends; transitional epithelium.
3	localization of the succinic dehydrogenase system in escherichia coli using combined techniques of cytochemistry and electron microscopy	The localization of the succinic dehydrogenase system in escherichia coli by combined cytochemistry and electron microscopy.
3	the alpha chymotryptic ydrolysis of glycine esters	Chymotryptic alpha ydrolysis of glycine esters.
3	nzymic conversion of 3 hydroxyanthranilic acid into cinnabarinic acid partial purification and properties of ra liver cinnabarinate synthase	Nzymic conversion of l' hydroxyanthranilic acid 3 into cinnabarinic acid partial purification and liver cinnabarinate synthase properties.
3	interactions of calf thymus histone fractions in aqueous solution with 8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonic acid	Histone fraction interactions of calf thymus in aqueous solution with 8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulfonic acid.
3	studies on glycopeptides deried from acidic glycoproteins of guinea pig serum	The glycopeptide studies are derived from the acidic glycoproteins of guinea pig serum.
3	deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase from landsch tz ascites tumour cells	L' deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase from l&apos tumor cells; tz landch ascites.
3	the preparation of adenosine 5 pyrophosphate by a non enzymic method	Preparation of adenosine 5 by a non-enzymatic method.
3	bitter peptide isolated from milk cultures of streptococcus cremoris	Bitter peptide isolated from milk cultures of streptococcus cremoris.
3	sensitivity of mixed populations of staphylococcus aureus and escherichia coli to mercurials	Sensitivity of mixed populations of staphylococcus aureus and escherichia coli to mercury.
3	metabolism of barbital by streptomyces mediterranei	Métabolism of barbital by streptomyces mediterranei.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a mercury activated exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a are known to activate apos; exopolygalacturonase by mercury.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a second exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a second exopolygalacturonase.
3	enzymic hydrolysis of barley and other beta glucans by a beta 1 4 glucan hydrolase	Enzymatic hydrolysis of barley and other beta-based glucans by a beta- 1-4 glucan-based hydrolase.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea 3 composition of the complex lipids	sarcina lutea 3 lipids, composition of complex lipids.
3	nitrogen containing and carbohydrate containing antigen from actinomyces bovis	Antigen containing nitrogen and nitrogen; carbohydrate-containing antigen from actinomyces bovis.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure ii the comparison of bence jones proteins by peptide mapping	A study of the structure of l' immunoglobulin (IG) ii the comparison of bence jones proteins by peptide mapping.
3	c glycosylflavonoids the chemistry of aspalathin	C glycosylflavonoids the chemistry of aspalathin.
3	magnesium ions and the structure of escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acid	Magnesium ions and the structure of apos; escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acid.
3	the biological activity of subfragment 1 prepared from heavy meromyosin	L' biological activity of sub-fragment 1 prepared from heavy meromyosin.
3	the isolation and properties of delta tocotrienol from hevea latex	L' isolation and properties of delta tocotrienol of the latex rubber.
3	the role of shikimic acid in the biosynthesis of vitamin k2	The role of l'apos; shikimic acid in the biosynthesis of vitamin k2.
3	conformational changes in sperm whale metmyoglobin due to combination with antibodies to apomyoglobin	Conformational changes in sperm whale metamyoglobin due to combination of anti-apos, apomyoglobin and dapos antibodies.
3	comparative studies of bile salts myxinol disulphate the principal bile salt of hagfish myxinidae	Bile salt comparative studies Myxinol disulfate is the major bile salt of hagfish myxinids.
3	nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectral study of myxinol tetra acetate	Apos nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectrometry study; tetra acetate-myxinol.
3	amino acid incorporation by cell fractions from the oviduct of the laying hen and the synthesis of egg white proteins	L' amino acid incorporation by cell fractions of the egg; laying hen oviduct and synthesis of white milk proteins; egg.
3	the purification and properties of nitrite reductase from higher plants and its dependence on ferredoxin	The purification and properties of nitrite reductase from higher plants and its dependence on the ferredoxin.
3	the kinetics and mechanism of liver alcohol dehydrogenase with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates	The kinetics and mechanism of the hepatic alcohol dehydrogenase with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates.
3	the antigen binding capacity of the peptide chains of horse antibodies	The antigenic binding capacity of the peptide chains in the antibody of horses.
3	the relation of 3 deoxy 2 oxo octonate to the serological and physical properties of a lipopolysaccharide from a rough strain of escherichia coli	The relationship between 3 deoxy 2 oxo octonate and the serological and physical properties of a lipopolysaccharide from apos; a rough strain of apos; Escherichia coli.
3	the identification of the antimicrobial factors of the stomach contents of sucking rabbits	Identification of the antimicrobial factors in the stomach contents of sucker rabbits.
3	influence of diet on the composition of plasma cholesterol esters in man	L' influence of diet on the composition of plasma cholesterol esters in men.
3	characterization of trisubstituted cholanoic acids in human feces	Characterization of trisubstituted cholanoic acids in human feces.
3	carboxylic ester hydrolases of rat pancreatic juice	D'apos hydrolases; rat pancreatic juice carboxylic esters.
3	simple charring method for determination of lipids	Simple charring method for determination of lipids.
3	sequential primary and secondary shunt metabolism in penicillium chrysogenum	Sequential primary and secondary shunt metabolism in penicillium chrysogenum.
3	a specific sucrose phosphatase from plant tissues	A specific sucrose phosphatase from plant tissue.
3	the glycerol teichoic acid from the cell wall of bacillus stearothermophilus b65	L' glycerol teichoic acid from the cell wall of the stearothermophilus b65.
3	some observations on the behaviour of hypothalamic enzymes during the time of blastocyst implantation in the rabbit	Some observations on the behaviour of hypothalamic enzymes at the time of implantation of the blastocyst in rabbits.
3	the fate of di 3 5 di tert butyl 4 hydroxyphenyl methane ionox 22 in the rat	The fate of di 3-5 di tert @- butyl 4 hydroxyphenyl methane ionox 22 in the rat.
3	adenosine 5 triphosphate arginine phosphotransferase from lobster muscle molecular weight	Adenosine 5 triphosphate arginine phosphotransferase from lobster muscle molecular weight.
3	the biochemistry of aromatic amines 2 formamido 1 naphthyl hydrogen sulphate a metabolite of 2 naphthylamine	The biochemistry of aromatic amines 2 formamido 1 naphthyl sulfate d' hydrogen a metabolite of 2 naphthylamines.
3	a study of the reaction catalysed by the liver branching enzyme	A study of the reaction catalyzed by the liver branching enzyme.
3	some rate constants for the phenazine methosulphate catalysed oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Some rate constants of phenazine methosulfate catalyze oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide.
3	the esterase and depsidase activities of tannase	L' activity esterase and depsidase of tannase.
3	the synthesis of amino acids by methanobacterium omelianskii	The synthesis of amino acids by methanobacterium omelianskii.
3	interactions of proteins with other polyelectrolytes in a two phase system containing phenol and aqueous buffers at various ph values	Protein interactions with other polyelectrolytes in a two-phase system containing phenol and aqueous buffers at various ph values.
3	interaction of aspartate aminotransferase with amino acids	The interaction of aspartate aminotransferase with amino acids.
3	solution photochemistry of thymine and uracil	Solution photochemistry of thymine and uracil.
3	the formation of peptides with uterine activity from ovine human and bovine growth hormones and from bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones	Formation of peptides having uterine activity from human and bovine ovine growth hormones and from bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones.
3	psilocybin reaction with a fraction of rat brain	Psilocybin reaction with a fraction of rat brain.
3	enzyme action comparison on soluble and insoluble substrate	Enzymatic action on soluble and insoluble substrates.
3	stable complex of fibrinogen and fibrin	A stable complex of fibrinogen and fibrinin.
3	naturally occurring anhydrovitamin a2 transformation into retinene	Natural transformation of l' anhydrovitamin a2 into retinene.
3	the kinetics of papain and ficin catalysed hydrolyses in the presence of alcohols	The kinetics of papain and ficin catalyzed hydrolyses in the presence of alcohol.
3	optical and chemical identification of kinetic steps in trypsin and chymotrypsin catalysed reactions	L' optical and chemical identification of kinetic steps in trypsin- and chymotrypsin-catalyzed reactions.
3	urinary screening tests in the prevention of mental deficiency	Urinary screening tests in the prevention of mental disability.
3	drosophila phenol oxidases	Drosophila phenol oxidases.
3	identification of mono and dihydroxy bile acids in human feces by gas liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry	Identification of mono- and dihydroxy acids in human feces by liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry.
3	the lysis of cell walls of group a streptococci by streptomyces albus enzyme treated with diisopropyl fluorophosphate characteristics of the lytic reaction and the soluble cell wall fragments	The lysis of the cell walls of group a streptococci by the albus streptomyces enzyme treated with the diisopropyl fluorophosphate characteristics of the lytic reaction and soluble cell wall fragments.
3	u 21 963 a new antibiotic ii isolation and characterization	U 21-963 a novel antibiotic ii isolation and characterization.
3	thyroxine interaction with actinomycin d and possible biological implications	Interaction of thyroxine with actinomycin d and possible biological implications.
3	partial purification of monoglyceride lipase from adipose tissue	Partial purification of monoglyceride lipase from adipose tissue.
3	lipid monolayers action of phospholipase a of crotalus atrox and naja naja venoms on phosphatidyl choline and phosphatidal choline	L' action of phospholipase lipid monolayers on crotalus atrox and naja naja venoms on phosphatidylcholine and choline phosphatidale.
3	synthesis and characterization of 1 and 2 monoglycerides of anteiso fatty acids	Synthesis and characterization of monoglycerides 1 and 2 of aniso fatty acids.
3	forms of human serum high density lipoprotein protein	High density lipoprotein protein forms of human serum.
3	composition and properties of a cell membrane fraction from the polymorphonuclear leucocyte	Composition and properties of a cellular membrane fraction from the polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
3	nucleotide synthesis under possible primitive earth conditions	Nucleotide synthesis under possible primitive Earth conditions.
3	radiolysis of thymine in aqueous solutions change in site of attack with change in ph	The radiolysis of thymine in aqueous solution changes with the change of ph.
3	chemistry of antibiotics from micromonospora 3 isolation and characterization of everninomicin d and b	Chemistry of antibiotics from apos; micromonospore isolation 3 and characterization of everninomics d and b.
3	physical and topological properties of circular dna	Physical and topological properties of circular DNA.
3	some properties of dna from phage infected bacteria	Certain properties of the bacterium; phage infected DNA.
3	the structure and function of the dna from bacteriophage lambda	The structure and function of the lambda bacteriophage DNA.
3	the enzymatic phosphorylation of nucleic acids and its application to end group analysis	The study of the enzymatic phosphorylation of nucleic acids and its application to end-group analysis.
3	recovery of antibody activity from inactive hybrids of h and l chains	L&apos recovery; antibody activity in inactive hybrids of the h and l chains.
3	c 1 esterase effect on activity and physicochemical properties of the fourth component of complement	Effect of esterase c1 on the protein, activity and physical properties of the fourth component of the complement.
3	the cyst wall of colpoda steinii a substance rich in glutamic acid residues	The cyst wall of colpoda steinii is a substance rich in glutamic acid.
3	a new derivative of vitamin c and its application to the synthesis of labelled ascorbic acid	A new derivative of vitamin c and its application to the synthesis of labelled ascorbic acid.
3	the structure and deposition of human liver glycogens	The structure and deposition of human liver glycogen.
3	toxic fluorine compounds the use of the omega fluorine atom in the study of the metabolism of fatty acids containing ethyl n propyl and isopropyl branches	Compounds toxic fluoride; use of the omega fluorine atom; study of the metabolism of fatty acids containing ethyl n-propyl and isopropyl branches.
3	studies of the proteins peptides and free amino acids of mature bovine enamel	Studies of the peptide proteins and free amino acids of mature bovine enamel.
3	the isolation and partial characterization of glycolipids of normal human leucocytes	Isolation and partial characterization of the glycolipids of normal human leukocytes.
3	the proteolysis of immunoglobulin g with long acting thyroid stimulating activity	The proteolysis of l' immunoglobulin g with stimulating thyroid activity with prolonged action.
3	the hatching factor of the potato root eelworm	Eel from the roots of the potato.
3	dealkylation studies on inhibited acetylcholinesterase	Dealkylation studies on inhibited acetylcholinesterase were performed.
3	lipids of debaryomyces hansenii	The lipids of debaryomyces hansenii.
3	comparision of soluble reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidases from cells and spores of clostridium botulinum	Comparison of soluble nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides oxidases from cells and spores of clostridium botulinum.
3	reoviruses ii structure and composition of the virion	Reovirus ii structure and composition of the virion.
3	fine structure of the coat and nucleoid material of fowlpox virus	The fine structure of the capsule; the shell and nucleoid material of the avian smallpox virus.
3	enzymatic hydrolysis of yeast cell walls i isolation of wall decomposing organisms and separation and purification of lytic enzymes	Enzymatic hydrolysis of yeast cell walls i isolation from wall decomposing organisms and separation and purification of lytic enzymes.
3	solubilization of native and derived forms of cellulose by cell free microbial enzymes	Solubilization of native and cellulose-derived forms by cell-free microbial enzymes.
3	physical properties of single and double stranded coliphage ribonucleic acid	The physical properties of l&apos, single- and double-stranded ribonucleic acid.
3	the formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acid from 1 halogenopropanes in the rat	Formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acid from 1 halogenopropane in the rat.
3	separation of water soluble n 2 4 dinitrophenylamino acids	Separation of water soluble dinitrophenylamino acids no.
3	the metabolism of the isomeric decalones	Metabolism of the isomeric decalones.
3	the metabolism of cis and trans decalin	The metabolism of cis and trans decalin.
3	citrate and the regulation of adipose tissue phosphofructokinase	Citrate and the regulation of adipose tissue phosphofructokinase.
3	vitamin k and oxidative phosphorylation	Vitamin k and oxidative phosphorylation.
3	components of the cell wall of clostridium welchii type a	Components of the cell wall of Clostridium welchii type a.
3	substrate activation and inhibition in coenzyme substrate reactions cyclohexanol oxidation catalysed by liver alcohol dehydrogenase	L' activation and apos; substrate inhibition in coenzyme reactions; cyclohexanol oxidation catalyzed by apos; alcohol dehydrogenase of liver.
3	fibrinogen from human plasma preparation by precipitation with heavy metal coordination complex	Fibrillogen of human plasma preparation by precipitation with complex heavy metal coordination.
3	mechanism of tryptic activation of clostridium botulinum type e toxin	Mechanisms; type e tryptic activation of clostridium botulinum toxin.
3	hydrogen bonded dimers of adenine and uracil derivatives	Hydrogen bonded dimers of l' adenine and uracil derivatives.
3	effect of diet upon intestinal disaccharidases and disaccharide absorption	Effect of diet on intestinal disaccharidases and l' disaccharide absorption.
3	the conversion of c is to c 1 esterase by plasmin and trypsin	The conversion of c to c 1 esterase by plasmin and trypsin.
3	formation and functional significance of a molecular complex derived from the second and the fourth component of human complement	Formation and functional importance of a molecular complex derived from the second and fourth components of human complement.
3	optical rotatory dispersion circular dichroism and far ultraviolet spectra of avidin and streptavidin	Circular rotational optical scattering and remote ultraviolet spectra of avidin and streptavidin.
3	the kinetics of carboxymethylcellulose ficin in packed beds	In crowded beds, the kinetics of carboxymethylcellulose are ficine.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 structure of the dephosphorylated repeating unit	Pneumococcus type specific substance type 10a 34 structure of the dephosphorylated repeating unit.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 the phosphodiester linkages	A specific substance of the type of pneumococcus type 10a 34, the phosphodiester bonds.
3	specificity and mechanism of tetracycline resistance in a multiple drug resistant strain of escherichia coli	The specificity and mechanism of tetracycline resistance in a strain of multidrug-resistant Escherichia coli.
3	heat inactivation of the relaxing site of actomyosin prevention and reversal with dithiothreitol	Inactivation by heat of the relaxing site of prevention and d' reversal of the apos; actomyosin by dithiothreitol.
3	hydrolysis of synthetic esters by the antibacterial agent in serum	Hydrolysis of synthetic esters by the antibacterial agent in the serum.
3	influence of calcium cholesterol and unsaturation on lecithin monolayers	The influence of calcium cholesterol and apos; unsaturation on lecithin monolayers.
3	gas liquid chromatography of 2 chloroethyl esters using a detector specific for halogens	Liquid gas chromatography of 2 chloroethyl esters with a halogen-specific detector.
3	photooxidation of hydrocarbons in the presence of aliphatic aldehydes	Photoxidation of hydrocarbons in the presence of aliphatic aldehydes.
3	ultraviolet irradiation of dna in vitro and in vivo produces a 3d thymine derived product	L' ionizing radiation; ultraviolet radiation; DNA in vitro and in vivo produces a thymine-derived product 3d.
3	oxygenation properties of snake hemoglobin	Properties of plants; oxygenation of plants; snake hemoglobin.
3	aflatoxin production and degradation by aspergillus flavus in 20 liter fermentors	Production and degradation of apos; aflatoxin by aspergillus flavus in 20 litre fermenters.
3	gamma a cold agglutinin importance of disulfide bonds in activity and structure	Gamma-cold agglutinin importance of disulfide bonds in the bios; activity and structure.
3	comparative effects of corticosteroids on host resistance to infection in relation to chemical structure	Comparative effects of corticosteroids on resistance; host to infection in relation to chemical structure.
3	complement as a mediator of inflammation ii biological properties of anaphylatoxin prepared with purified components of human complement	Complement as mediator of apos; inflammation ii The biological properties of anaphylatoxin prepared with purified components of human complement.
3	nonthrombogenic plastic surfaces	The non--hrombogen plastic surfaces are plastic.
3	pathway of cholesterol biosynthesis in the brain of the neonatal rat	Route of cholesterol biosynthesis in the brain of the neonatal rat.
3	role of plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase in the metabolism of high density lipoproteins	Role of plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase in the metabolism of high density lipoproteins.
3	effects of dietary phytol and phytanic acid in animals	The effects of dietary phytol and phytanic acid on animals.
3	starch gel electrophoresis of human tissue enzymes which hydrolyze l leucyl beta naphthylamide	Apos gel electrophoresis; potato starch; human tissue enzymes which hydrolyze leucyl beta naphthylamide.
3	d lactate dehydrogenase in lower fungi	Lactate dehydrogenase in lower fungi.
3	protective action of polycyclic hydrocarbons against induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene	The protective action of polycyclic hydrocarbons against epos; induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene.
3	biologically active metabolite of vitamin d3 from bone liver and blood serum	Biologically active metabolite of vitamin d3 from bone liver and blood serum.
3	automatic titration of plasma fatty acids by photocolorimetry	Automatic titration of plasma fatty acids by photocolorimetry.
3	new partially hydrolyzable synthetic analogues of lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and phosphatidic acid	New partially hydrolysable synthetic analogues of lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and l' phosphatidic acid.
3	chemical and antigenic analysis of the cell walls of neisseria meningitidis group b	Chemical and antigenic analysis of cell walls of neisseria meningitidis group b.
3	the reaction of ribonuclease inhibitor with modified ribonucleases	Reaction of ribonuclease inhibitor with modified ribonucleases.
3	some observations on the periodate oxidation of amino compounds	Some observations on the periodate oxidation of amino compounds.
3	substrate and dilution effects on the inhibition of acetylcholinesterase by carbamates	Effects of substrate and dilution on apos; inhibition of acetylcholinesterase by carbamates.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin	The binding of inhibitors to alpha-chymotrypsin.
3	aspartate carbamoyltransferase from rat liver	Aspartate carbamoyltransferase from rat liver.
3	chemical modification of yeast alanine trna with a radioactive carbodiimide	A chemical modification of the yeast alanine trna with a radioactive carbodiimide.
3	homolanthionine excretion in homocystinuria	Lapses; excretion of apos; homolanthionine in apos; homocystinuria.
3	actin volume change on transformation of g form to f form	Change in volume of actin during transformation of g form to f form.
3	the inhibition of phosphoglucomutase by beryllium	L' inhibition of phosphoglucomutase by beryllium.
3	the chemistry of xanthine oxidase reaction with iodoacetamide	The chemistry of xanthine oxidase reaction with iodoacetamide.
3	3 o methyl d mannose from streptomyces griseus	Identical 3 o methyl mannose streptomyces griseus.
3	absorption spectra of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Spectre d'apos; sperm whale ferrimyoglobin absorption.
3	the purification and properties of a penicillinase whose synthesis is mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	The purification and properties of a penicillinase whose synthesis is mediated by a factor r in escherichia coli.
3	fractionation of deoxyribonucleic acid from phage infected bacteria	The fractionation of deoxyribonucleic acid from phage-infected bacteria.
3	interaction of vi antigen with proteins	Apos interaction; vi antigen with proteins.
3	production purification and composition of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Production, purification and composition of staphylococcal alpha toxin.
3	cholesterol in human semen	Uh, cholesterol in human semen.
3	the isolation and composition of helical protein microfibrils from hevea brasiliensis latex	L' isolation and composition of microfibrils of leaf protein; hevea brasiliensis latex.
3	changes in lipid composition of the maturing rat testis	Changes in lipid composition of maturing rat testes.
3	the acidic amino acids of tulip isolation of gamma ethylideneglutamic acid	The acidic amino acids of l' isolation of tulips; gammaethylideneglutamic acid.
3	isolation of certain oligonucleotides obtained by degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid	Isolate certain oligonucleotides obtained by degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	selective degradation of thymidine and thymine deoxynucleotides	Selective degradation of thymidine and thymine deoxynucleotides.
3	nucleotide sequence of a yeast tyrosine transfer rna	Nucleotide sequence of apos; yeast tyrosine transfer rna.
3	the rate of hydrolysis of the molluscicide n tritylmorpholine	The rate of d' hydrolysis of the molluscicidal n tritylmorpholine.
3	galactosamine glycan of chondrococcus columnaris	Galactosamine glycan of chondrococcus columnaris.
3	rna composition and base pairing	Rna composition and base pairing.
3	lipid films as transducers for detection of antigen antibody and enzyme substrate reactions	Lipid films serve as transducers for detecting antigenic antibody and enzyme substrate reactions.
3	formylmethionine codon aug as an initiator of polypeptide synthesis	Formylmethionine aug codon as the initiator of polypeptide synthesis.
3	action of anionic and cationic nerve blocking agents experiment and interpretation	The action of anionic and cationic agents blocking experimental and interpretative nerves.
3	tritiated thymidine effect of decomposition by self radiolysis on specificity as a tracer for dna synthesis	Tritiated effect of thymidine decomposition by auto-radiolysis on specificity as a tracer for DNA synthesis.
3	deficient complement fixation by aggregated gamma globulin from hypogammaglobulinemic patients	Deficient complement fixation by aggregated gamma globulin from hypogammaglobulinemic patients.
3	serum high density lipoprotein effect of change in structure on activity of chicken adipose tissue lipase	The effect of a change in structure on the lipase activity of chicken adipose tissue, high density lipoprotein serum.
3	nucleic acid guanine reaction with the carcinogen n acetoxy 2 acetylaminofluorene	Nucleic acid guanine reacts with acetoxy acetylaminofluorene, a carcinogen.
3	influence of cobalt on fermentative methylation	The influence of cobalt on fermentative methylation.
3	cyanoacetylene in prebiotic synthesis	Cyanoacetylene in prebiotic synthesis.
3	retention of the biological potency of human pituitary growth hormone after reduction and carbamidomethylation	Retention of the biological potency of human pituitary growth hormone after reduction and carbamidomethylation.
3	nucleotide sequence repetition a rapidly reassociating fraction of mouse dna	Apos nucleotide sequence repetition; a rapidly reassociating fraction of the mouse DNA.
3	studies on the immunochemistry of streptococcal mucopeptide	Studies on apos; immunochemistry of streptococcal mucopeptide.
3	prostaglandins ii an improved synthesis and structural proof of plus or minus 11 deoxyprostaglandin f 1 beta	Prostaglandins ii are better synthesis and structural evidence of plus or minus 11 f1 beta deoxyprostaglandins.
3	inhibition of banana polyphenoloxidase by 2 mercaptobenzothiazole	Inhibition of banana polyphenoloxidase by 2 mercaptobenzothiazole.
3	a m ssbauer study of ferri and ferrocytochrome c	M ssbauer study of ferri and ferrocytochrome c.
3	binuclear ion containing nitrogen as a bridging group	A binuclear ion containing nitrogen as a bridging group.
3	the equilibrium sedimentation of hyaluronic acid and of two synthetic polymers	Sedimentation to l' equilibrium of l' of hyaluronic acid and of two synthetic polymers.
3	partial characterization of protocollagen from embryonic cartilage	Partial characterization of protocollagen from embryonic cartilage.
3	characterization of the hexahydropolyprenols of aspergillus fumigatus fresenius	Characterization of hexahydropolyprenols of aspergillus fumigatus fresenius.
3	the stereochemistry of the hydrogen elimination in the biological conversion of cholest 7 en 3 beta ol into cholesterol	The stereochemistry of cholesterol; the elimination of hydrogen in the biological conversion of cholesterol from 7 to 3 beta ol into cholesterol.
3	periodate oxidation of sperm whale myoglobin and the role of the methionine residues in the antigen antibody reaction	Periodate oxidation of sperm whale myoglobin and the role of methionine residues in the antigenic antibody response.
3	reaction of myoglobin with 3 3 tetramethyleneglutaric anhydride	Reaction of myoglobin with tetramethylenegutaric anhydride 3-3.
3	separation and properties of beta galactosidase beta glucosidase beta glucuronidase and n acetyl beta glucosaminidase from rat kidney	The separation and properties of beta galactosidase beta glucosidase beta glucuronidase and n-acetyl beta glucosaminidase from rat kidney.
3	countercurrent distribution studies on histones	Distribution studies against-current on histones.
3	studies on the proteolytic activity of gamma globulin preparations	Studies on l' proteolytic activity of gamma globulin preparations.
3	a diagonal electrophoretic method for selective purification of methionine peptides	Procedure; diagonal electrophoresis for selective purification of methionic peptides.
3	nucleohistone dissociation by ganglioside micelles	Nucleohistone dissociation by ganglioside micelles.
3	crystal and molecular structure of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate	The crystal and molecular structure of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic phosphate.
3	an improved synthesis of isopentenyl pyrophosphate	Improved synthesis of isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
3	a simple method for the preparation of 5 methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic acid	A simple method for the preparation of l' the preparation of methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic acid 5.
3	the formation of phosphatidylglycerol and other phospholipids by the transferase activity of phospholipase d	The formation of phosphatidylglycerol and d' other phospholipids by etapos; the transferase activity of phospholipase d.
3	the reaction of sulphite ions with an intermolecular disulphide bond in bovine serum non mercaptalbumin	The reaction of sulfite ions with an intermolecular disulfide bond in bovine serum, not mercaptalbumin.
3	the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d upon lysolecithin	L' action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin.
3	the chemical nature of the products obtained by the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin the structure of lysolecithin	The chemical nature of the products obtained by the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin in the structure of lysolecithin.
3	some properties of purified phospholipase d and especially the effect of amphipathic substances	Some properties of purified phospholipase and especially the effect of amphipathic substances.
3	a method for the degradation of radioactive nicotinic acid	Procedure for the degradation of radioactive nicotinic acid.
3	hydroxamic acids in nature	They're hydroxamic acids in nature.
3	acetylation of human serum albumin by acetylsalicylic acid	Apos acetylation; human serum albumin by apos; acetylsalicylic acid.
3	cyclic uridine 3 5 phosphate molecular structure	Molecular structure of l' cyclic uridine 3 @-@5 phosphate.
3	enzyme induction by corticosteroids in embryonic cells steroid structure and inductive effect	Enzyme induction by corticosteroids in steroidal structure of embryonic cells and inductive effect.
3	crystal structure of a complex of acridine cytosine and water 1 1 1	Crystalline structure, a cytosine complex of acridine and apos.
3	the ultrastructure of normal and pathological igm immunoglobulins	L' ultrastructure of normal and pathological immunoglobulins.
3	specificity and stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	Specificity and stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin.
3	reaction of beta propiolactone with amino acids and its specificity for methionine	Reaction of beta propiolactone with amino acids and its specificity for methionine.
3	new method for the reductive ozonolysis of double bonds in monoenoic fatty acid methyl esters	New method for reductive ozonolysis of double bonds in monoenoic fatty acid methyl esters.
3	positional distribution of fatty acids in glycerophosphatides of bovine gray matter	The positional distribution of fatty acids in bovine gray glycerophosphatids.
3	substrate specific inactivation of staphylococcal penicillinase	Specific inactivation of staphylococcal penicillinase substrate.
3	studies on the interaction of homologues of spermine with deoxyribonucleic acid and with bacterial protoplasts	Studies on the interaction of spermine homologs with deoxyribonucleic acid and with bacterial protoplasts.
3	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli phosphatidyl glycerophosphate biosynthesis.
3	separation and size determination of human serum lipoproteins by agarose gel filtration	Separation and size determination of human serum lipoproteins by agarose gel filtration.
3	a simplified preparation of phosphatidyl inositol	This is a simplified preparation of phosphatidyl inositol.
3	internal standards in the estimation of acetyl coa in liver extracts	Internal standards in dosage; estimate of acetyl coa in liver extracts.
3	chemical analysis of acetylated bovine growth hormone a growth hormone inhibitor	Chemical analysis of acetylated bovine growth hormone, an inhibitor of lapos; growth hormone.
3	interaction of polypeptide hormones with lipid monolayers	Interaction of polypeptide hormones with lipid monolayers.
3	specific dimerization of the light chains of human immunoglobulin	Specific dimerization of the light chains of l' human immunoglobulin.
3	the mechanism of the elaboration of ring b in ergosterol biosynthesis	The mechanism of d' elaboration of the b cycle in apos biosynthesis; ergosterol.
3	the metabolism of tetralin	The metabolism of tetralin.
3	the stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	The stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin.
3	the binding of cupric ions to 1 carboxymethylhistidine 119 ribonuclease	Binding of the copper ions to a carboxymethylhistidine 119 ribonuclease.
3	tanned gelatin spheres and granules for exclusion chromatography	Tanned gelatin spheres and granules for apos chromatography excluded.
3	properties of renin substrate in rabbit plasma with a note on its assay	Properties of renin substrate in rabbit plasma with a note on assay.
3	the oxidation of nn dimethyl p phenylenediamine by oxidizing agents and by caeruloplasmin	L' oxidation of nn dimethyl pphenylenediamine by oxidizing agents and by caeruloplasmin.
3	effects of chondroitin sulphates on mineralization in vitro	Effects of chondroitin sulphates on in vitro mineralization.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin at alkaline ph	The binding of inhibitors to l' alpha chymotrypsin at the alkaline phalanx.
3	purification and properties of an acidic protein from chromaffin granules of bovine adrenal medulla	Purification and the properties of an acidic protein from bovine adrenal medulla chromaffin granules.
3	the redox state of free nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in the cytoplasm and mitochondria of rat liver	L' redox state of the free adenine adenine dinucleotide in the cytoplasm and mitochondria of rat liver.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of 5 6 monoepoxyretinoic acid	Preparation properties and metabolism of 5 μ-μ-μ-μ-6 monoepoxyretinoic acid.
3	subunits and their interactions	Units and their-units and their interactions are under @-@units.
3	occurrence of positional isomers of octadecenoic and hexadecenoic acids in human depot fat	Occurrence of apos; positional isomers of octadecenoic and hexadecenoic acids in human fat.
3	synthesis of fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetals new derivatives for the analysis of plasmalogens	Synthesis of fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetals, new derivatives for l' analysis of plasmalogens.
3	improved reagent for trimethylsilylation of sphingolipid bases	An improved reagent for trimethylsilylation of sphingolipid bases.
3	immunological evidence for the presence of b protein apoprotein of beta lipoprotein in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma	Immunological evidence for the presence of lipoprotein beta b protein apoprotein in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma.
3	comparative study of ribosomal ribonucleic acid cistrons in enterobacteria and myxobacteria	Comparative study of ribosomal cistrons in enterobacteria and myxobacteria.
3	physical states of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Physical status of staphylococcal alpha toxin.
3	rna dna hybridization demonstration in a mammalian system of competition by preincubation	Rna dna hybridization demonstration in a mammalian system of competition by preincubation.
3	action of degradative enzymes on the light fraction of bovine septa protein polysaccharide	Action of degradation enzymes on the light fraction of bovine septa protein polysaccharides.
3	the purification and properties of placental histaminase	Purification and properties of placental histaminase.
3	some properties of lactate dehydrogenase found in human urine	Some properties of lactate dehydrogenase are found in human urine.
3	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate mechanism of the inhibition by oxalomalate and gamma hydroxy alpha oxoglutarate	Control of the cycle of the citric acid by the glyoxylate mechanism of the apos; inhibition by the apos; oxalomalate and l' gamma hydroxy oxoglutarate.
3	sedimentation viscosity and partial specific volumes of membrane proteins and lipoproteins	Sedimentation viscosity and partial specific volumes of membrane proteins and lipoproteins.
3	the compartmentation of choline acetyltransferase within the synaptosome	The compartmentalization of choline acetyltransferase in the synaptosome.
3	studies on the nature of the regulation by purine nucleotides of adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and of hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase from ehrlich ascites tumour cells	Studies on the nature of the purine nucleotide regulation of l' adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and l' hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase of ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
3	immunochemistry of sperm whale myoglobins prepared with various modified porphyrins and metalloporphyrins	L' immunochemistry of sperm whale myoglobins prepared with various modified porphyrins and metalloporphyrins.
3	the purification and properties of histidinol dehydrogenase from neurospora crassa	The purification and properties of histidinol dehydrogenase from neurospora crassa.
3	species differences in the inhibition of glutathione s aryltransferase by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids	Specific differences in the inhibition of glutathione s aryltransferase by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids.
3	rat small intestinal beta galactosidases influence of ph on the hydrolysis of different substrates	The beta-galactosidases of the rat's small intestine influence the hydrolysis of different substrates.
3	the estimation of galactose mannose and fucose in glycoproteins by radioisotope dilution	L' estimation of galactose mannose and fucose in glycoproteins by radioisotope dilution.
3	the kinetics of the reversible inhibition of heart lactate dehydrogenase through the formation of the enzyme oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds	The kinetics of l' reversible inhibition of cardiac lactate dehydrogenase by the formation of l' oxidizing enzyme nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds.
3	effect of glutathione on ribonuclease	The effect of glutathione on ribonuclease.
3	structural changes in mitochondria induced by uncoupling reagents the response to proteolytic enzymes	Structural changes in mitochondria induced by uncoupling reagents reacted to proteolytic enzymes.
3	chemical sensing an approach to biological molecular mechanisms unsig difference spectroscopy	Chemical detection of apos; an approach to biological molecular mechanisms unsig difference spectroscopy.
3	quantitative reactions for the chain elongation of aliphatic compounds	Quantitative reactions for the apos; chain elongation of aliphatic compounds.
3	the effect of acid mucopolysaccharides and acid mucopolysaccharide proteins on fibril formation from collagen solutions	L' effect of acid mucopolysaccharides and acid mucopolysaccharide proteins on fibril formation from collagen solutions.
3	aspects of the chemistry of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Aspects of the chemistry of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	some physical and chemical properties of trypsin digested nucleoprotein	Some physical and chemical properties of trypsin digest nucleoproteins.
3	metal binding sites of concanavalin a and their role in the binding of alpha methyl d glucopyranoside	The metal-binding sites of concanavalin a and their role in the binding of l' alpha methyl glucopyranoside.
3	cyanovinyl phosphate a prebiological phosphorylating agent	Cyanovinyl phosphate is a prebiological phosphorylating agent.
3	preparation and analysis of peptide fragments produced by pepsin hydrolysis of human plasma albumin and their relationship to its structure	Preparation and analysis of peptide fragments produced by apos; hydrolysis of human pepsin; human plasma albumin and their relationship to its structure.
3	the effects of inhibitor mixtures and the specific effects of different anions on the oxidase activity of caeruloplasmin	The effects of the mixtures of inhibitors and the specific effects of different anions on the oxidase activity of caeruloplasmin.
3	dimethyl sulfoxide an inhibitor of liver alcohol dehydrogenase	Dimethylsulfoxide is an inhibitor of hepatic alcohol dehydrogenase.
3	correlation of amino acid sequence and conformation in tobacco mosaic virus	Correlation of amino acid sequence and conformation in tobacco mosaic virus.
3	hemoglobin synthesis in beta thalassemia the properties of the free alpha chains	Apos synthesis; hemoglobin in beta thalassemia, properties of the free alpha chains.
3	identification of a macromolecular factor in the ileum which binds intrinsic factor and immunologic identification of intrinsic factor in ileal extracts	Identification of a macromolecular factor in the ileum that binds intrinsic factor and immunological identification of intrinsic factor in ileal extracts.
3	studies on haem alpha methenyl oxygenase isomeric structure of formylbiliverdin a possible precursor of biliverdin	Studies on the isomeric structure of formylbiliverdin heme alpha-methenyloxygenase, a possible precursor of biliverdin.
3	structures of contraceptive agents	Structure of contraceptive agents.
3	a chromatographic and spectrophotometric study of the products of the reaction of osmium tetroxide with unsaturated lipids	A chromatographic and spectrophotometric study of the products of the reaction of d' osmium tetroxide with unsaturated lipids.
3	ultrastructural studies of human and rabbit alpha m globulins	Ultrastructural studies of human and rabbit alpha m globulins.
3	intraphagocytic beta n acetylglucosaminidase properties of the enzyme and its activity on group a streptococcal carbohydrate in comparison with a soil bacillus enzyme	Comparison of the properties of the enzyme and its activity on carbohydrates; a streptococcus and d' a soil bacterium, beta n acetylglucosaminidase, intraphagocyte.
3	studies of chlorophyll lipid water systems	Study of chlorophyllic lipid water systems.
3	a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin and chymotrypsin by using p nitrophenyl n2 acetyl n1 benzylcarbazate	A new method for determining the absolute molarity of trypsin and chymotrypsin solutions using benzyl p-nitrophenyl n2 acetyl n1 benzylcarbazate.
3	the behaviour of trypsin towards alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl l lysine beta naphthyl ester a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin	The behavior of trypsin vis-@-@ vis de l'apos; ester alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl lysine beta naphthyl is a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin.
3	conformation and activity of chymotrypsin the ph dependent substrate induced proton uptake	The conformation and activity of the ph-dependent substrate chymotrypsin induce apos; proton absorption.
3	modification of lofland s colorimetric semiautomated serum triglyceride determination assessed by an enzymatic glycerol determination	Modification of the semi-automatic colorimetric determination of lofland serum triglycerides by enzymatic determination of glycerol.
3	structure and amount of positional isomers of monounsaturated fatty acids in human depot fat	Dosage structure and quantity; positional isomers of monounsaturated fatty acids in human deposit fat.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analyses of 1 2 ethanediol monoethers and monoesters	Analysis by liquid gas chromatography of 12 monoether and monoester d' ethanediols.
3	characterization and synthesis of mono and diphytanyl ethers of glycerol	Characterization and synthesis of mono- and diphytanylic ethers of glycerol.
3	determination of the molecular weight of apoprotein subunits from low density lipoprotein by gel filtration	Determination of the molecular weight of low density lipoprotein apoproteins under-apoproteins by gel filtration.
3	the phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenylic acids by adenylate kinase and adenosine triphosphate	The phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenylic acids by etapos; adenylate kinase and l' adenosine triphosphate.
3	the mechanism of glucose 6 phosphate d myo inositol 1 phosphate cyclase of rat testis the involvement of hydrogen atoms	The mechanism of glucose 6 phosphate d'apos; inositol 1 phosphate cyclase in rat testis involves the involvement of apos; apos; hydrogen.
3	alkaline haematin and nitrogenous ligands	Alkaline hematin and nitrogenous ligands.
3	ll a491 a monazomycin like antibiotic	He has a monazomycin as an antibiotic.
3	mechanism of the bactericidal action produced by electrohydraulic shock	Mechanisms of l' bactericidal action produced by electrohydraulic shock.
3	the comparative toxicity of ddt and analogues to susceptible and resistant houseflies and mosquitos	Comparison of the toxicity of ddt and its analogues to sensitive and resistant houseflies and mosquitoes.
3	partial resolution of dl adenosine by template synthesis	Partial resolution of dl adenosine by template synthesis.
3	total synthesis of natural levo and enantiomeric dextro forms of prostaglandin el	Total synthesis of natural levo and enantiomeric dextro forms of prostaglandin el.
3	purification of the alliin lyase of garlic allium sativum l	Purification of the apos; alliine lyase of the apos; allium sativum ll.
3	the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase by stilboestrol derivatives	L' inhibition of l&apos nucleotidyltransferase; deoxyribonucleic acid by stilboestrol derivatives.
3	the osmotic behaviour of sephadex and its effects on chromatography	The osmotic behavior of sephadex and its effects on chromatography.
3	physical and chemical studies of a low molecular weight form of urease	Physical and chemical studies of a low molecular weight form of urease.
3	purification and properties of molecular weight variants of human placental alkaline phosphatase	Purification and properties of molecular weight variants of human placental alkaline phosphatase.
3	the metabolism of aromatic acids by micro organisms a reassessment of the role of o benzoquinone as a product of protocatechuate metabolism by fungi	The metabolism of aromatic acids by microorganisms reevaluates the role of l' o benzoquinone as a product of protocatechuate metabolism by fungi.
3	the preparation and kinetics of lactate dehydrogenase attached to water insoluble particles and sheets	Preparation and kinetics of lactate dehydrogenase attached to particles and water-insoluble leaves.
3	evidence for histidine in the active site of papain	Evidence of histidine in the active site of papain.
3	the location of the active site histidine residue in the primary sequence of papain	Localization of the active site histidine residue in the primary papain sequence.
3	structural stability and solvent denaturation of myoglobin	Structural stability and solvent denaturation of myoglobin.
3	the inhibition of plasmin plasma kallikrein plasma permeability factor and the c 1r subcomponent of the first component of complement by serum c 1 esterase inhibitor	L' inhibition of plasma permeability factor of plasminic kallikrein and of the sub-@-@ component c1r of the first component of complement by apos; inhibitors of apos; esterase c1 serum.
3	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acd ii characterization of the products resulting from annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Denaturation and renaturation of the apos; viral ribonucleic acd ii characterization of the products resulting from the annealing of the apos; r17 ribonucleic acid in a denatured replicative form or with a denatured replicative intermediate.
3	specificity of ribonuclease ch from chalaropsis species	Specificity of ribonuclease ch in chalaropsis species.
3	specificity of combination between mucopeptide precursors and vancomycin or ristocetin	Specificity of combination between mucopeptide precursors and vancomycin or ristoketin.
3	nondroplet ultrastructural demonstration of cytochrome oxidase activity with a polymerizing osmiophilic reagent diaminobenzidine dab	Ultrastructure not-droplet demonstrates apos; cytochrome oxidase activity at apos; aid of apos; polymeric osmiophilic reagent diaminobenzidine dab.
3	protein aggregation studies of larger aggregates of c phycocyanin	Apos study; protein aggregation; larger aggregates of phycocyanin c.
3	immunogenicity of deoxycholate disrupted endotoxins	The immunogenicity of deoxycholate disrupted endotoxins.
3	the complexing of lysozyme with poly c and other homopolymers	Complexation of lysozyme with polyc and other lysozyme homopolymers.
3	a study of folate absorption and metabolism in man utilizing carbon 14 labeled polyglutamates synthesized by the solid phase method	A study of folate absorption and metabolism in men using carbon-14 labelled polyglutamates synthesized by the solid phase method.
3	fetal hemoglobin variants in mice	Dosage variants; fetal hemoglobin in mouse.
3	studies on the prekallikrein kallikreinogen kallikrein enzyme system of human plasma ii evidence relating the kaolin activated arginine esterase to plasma kallikrein	Studies of the kallikreinogen kallikreinine prekallikreinin enzyme system in human plasma ii showed a link between kaolin-activated and plasma kallikrein arginine esterase.
3	hydrolysis of 125 i labelled thyroglobulin by pancreatin pronase and pepsin	L' hydrolysis of 125 i labelled thyroglobulin by pancreatic pronase and pepsin.
3	the displacement of calcium ions from phospholipid monolayers by pharmacologically active and other organic bases	The displacement of calcium ions from phospholipid monolayers by pharmacologically active and d&apos organic bases.
3	separation of replicative intermediate from single stranded ribonucleic acid by sedimentation at low ionic strength	Segregation of the apos; replicative intermediate of the apos; single-strand ribonucleic acid by sedimentation at low ionic strength.
3	paramyosin molecular length and assembly	The molecular length and assembly of paramyosin.
3	effects of two oral iron preparations on results of the benzidine test for occult blood in stools	Effects of two oral iron preparations on the results of the benzidine test for occult blood in stool.
3	reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and its rna	Reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and its rna.
3	binding of neomycin and analogues by fatty acids in vitro	Binding of neomycin and analogues by fatty acids in vitro.
3	catabolism of human gammag immunoglobulins of different heavy chain subclasses i catabolism of gammag myeloma proteins in man	Catabolism of human immune gammags of different heavy chain subclasses i catabolism of human myeloma proteins.
3	a new hepatic protein inactivating glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	New hepatic inactivating glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase protein.
3	intrachain disulphide bridges in immunoglobulin g heavy chains the fc fragment	Intrachain disulfide bridges in the cell; immunoglobulin g heavy chains the fragment fc.
3	the utilization of some halogenated aromatic acids by nocardia oxidation and metabolism	Use of certain halogenated aromatic acids by nocardia oxidation and metabolism.
3	protein polyelectrolyte interactions the concanavalin a precipitin reaction with polyelectrolytes and polysaccharide derivatives	Protein polyelectrolyte interactions concanavalin a precipitin reaction with polyelectrolytes and polysaccharide derivatives.
3	the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346 composition of the mucopeptide component	Cell wall of the bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346 composition of the mucopeptide component.
3	the determination of oestradiol and oestrone in the plasma of the domestic fowl by method involving the use of labelled derivatives	Determination of estradiol and estradiol; estrone in the plasma of domestic poultry by a method involving estradiol; use of labelled derivatives.
3	lipids produced by epicoccum nigrum in submerged culture	Lipids produced by epicoccum nigrum in submerged culture.
3	study of the methylation and lack of deamination of deoxyribonucleic acid by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	Study of methylation and deacidosis; lack of deamination of deoxyribonucleic acid by n-methyl nitro n nitrosoguanidine.
3	complex formation between triphosphoinositide and experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein	Complex between triphosphoinositide and experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunochemical and biological activity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Effect of formaldehyde on the immunochemical and biological activity of lapos; enterotoxin b of staphylococcus.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunogenicity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b for macaca mulatta	Effect of formaldehyde on the immunogenicity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b in macaca mulatta.
3	activation of hageman factor by l homocystine	Activity of lamb factor by apos; homocystin l.
3	nitrazepam mogadon in blood serum and urine and librium in urine	Nitrazepam megadon in blood serum and urine and librium in urine.
3	dehydration of prostaglandins study by spectroscopic method	The dehydration of prostaglandins is studied spectroscopically.
3	reactions of aromatic and sulfur amino acids in ribonuclease with hydrogen atoms in water solution	Reactions of aromatic and sulfur amino acids in the ribonuclease with hydrogen atoms in aqueous solution.
3	staphylococcal nuclease size and specificity of the active site	Size and specificity of the active site staphylococcal nuclease.
3	hydrolysis at arginylproline in polypeptides by clostridiopeptidase b	L' arginylproline in polypeptides by clostridiopeptidase b.
3	esterases of the polymorphonuclear leukocyte capable of hydrolyzing acetyl dl phenyl alanine beta naphthyl ester relationship to the activatable esterase of chemotaxis	The esterases of the polymorphonuclear leukocyte are capable of hydrolyzing the relationship between apos ester, acetyl phenyl alanine beta naphthyl and apos; activable esterase of chemotaxy.
3	interactions between the lysine rich histone f1 and deoxyribonucleic acid	Lysine-rich histone f1 and deoxyribonucleic acid interactions.
3	the action of digitonin on rat liver mitochondria the effects on enzyme content	L' action of digitonin on rat liver mitochondria effects on enzyme content.
3	ionic interaction of sulfatide with choline lipids	Ionic interaction of sulfatide with choline lipids.
3	evidence for histidine in the active sites of ficin and stem bromelain	The presence of apos; histidine in the active sites of ficin and bromelaine of the stem has been demonstrated.
3	the effect of n bromosuccinimide on the sub unit structure of acidin and its complexes with biotin	Effect of n bromosuccinimide on the structure of the sub-units of acid and its complexes with biotin.
3	current concepts of hyperuricemia and gout	Current concepts of hyperuricemia and gout.
3	a new route to the imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoins implications in the study of ergothioneine	A new pathway; access to the imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoins involves the apos; study of the apos; ergothionein.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of retro 3 dehydroretinyl acetate	Preparation properties and metabolism of dehydroteinyl acetate.
3	reaction of tyrosine oxidation products with proteins of the lens	Reaction of d&apos products; oxidation of tyrosine with proteins of the lens.
3	cellulose refutation of a folded chain structure	The cellulose refutation of a folded chain structure.
3	electron spin resonance evidence for enzymic reduction of oxygen to a free radical the superoxide ion	Electron paramagnetic resonance shows the existence of apos; an enzymatic reduction of apos; oxygen to a free radical; superoxide ion.
3	cleavage by formamide of intercapsomer bonds in adenovirus types 4 and 7 virions and hemagglutinins	The cleavage of intercapsomeric bonds in adenovirus virions 4 and 7 and hemagglutinins by formamide.
3	physical and biological properties of phage phi 29 deoxyribonucleic acid	Physical and biological properties of phage phi 29 deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	morphology of the nucleoprotein component of rabies virus	Morphology of the nucleoprotein component of rabies virus.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure 3 an estimate of the variability of human light chains	An immunoglobulin 3 structure study, an estimate of the variability of human light chains.
3	metabolism of antifertility steroids i norethynodrel	Metabolism of d&apos steroids; antifertility i norethynodrel.
3	the active chemical state of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate in its reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase	L' active chemical state of d glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 in its reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase.
3	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin vii toxin stimulated hydrolysis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in mammalian cell extracts	Studies on the mode of action of vii toxin diphtheria toxin stimulated apos; hydrolysis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in mammalian cell extracts.
3	magnesium sulfate interactions in seawater from solubility measurements	Magnesium sulphate interactions in seawater from solubility measurements.
3	sulfur containing nucleoside from yeast transfer ribonucleic acid 2 thio 5 or 6 uridine acetic acid methyl ester	Yeast sulfur-containing nucleoside transfers l' ribonucleic acid 2 thio 5 or 6 l&apos methyl ester; acetic uridine acid.
3	pyrogenic principle of the ribonucleic acid from the yeast candida utilis	The pyrogenic principle of yeast; ribonucleic acid of yeast.
3	physical heterogeneity among bacillus subtilis deoxyribonucleic acid molecules carrying particular genetic markers	Physical heterogeneity among subtilis bacillus deoxyribonucleic acid molecules with specific genetic markers.
3	complement inactivating proteinase s from clostridium histolyticum	A complement that inactivates clostridium histolyticum s-proteinases.
3	the partial characterization of 1 oxygenated steroids from urine of a hypertensive newborn child	Partial characterization of 1 oxygenated steroids in the urine of a new hypertensive.
3	total synthesis of dl 19 nor 16 17 dehydroprogesterone	The total synthesis of dl 19 or 16,17 dehydroprogesterone.
3	on the mechanism of catalysis by vitamin b12	About the mechanism of catalysis by vitamin b12.
3	stereochemical analysis of the specificity of pancreatic rnase with polyformycin as substrate differentiation of the transphosphorylation and hydrolysis reactions	Stereochemical analysis of the specificity of pancreatic rnase with polyformycin as the substrate for differentiation of the transphosphorylation and d&apos reactions; hydrolysis.
3	deoxyribonuclease iv a new exonuclease from mammalian tissues	Deoxyribonuclease iv is a new exonuclease in mammalian tissues.
3	7 dehydrostigmasterol and ergosterol the major sterols of an amoeba	Dehydrostigmasterol and dehydrostigmasterol, the major sterols of an amoeba.
3	intestinal absorption and lymphatic transport of cholesterol in the rat influence of the fatty acid chain length of the carrier triglyceride	L' intestinal absorption and lymphatic transport of cholesterol in the rat influence the fatty acid chain length of the triglyceride transporter.
3	sphingolipids in bean leaves phaseolus vulgaris	Sphingolipids in bean leaves Phaseolus vulgaris vulgaris.
3	quantitative analysis and comparison of the physical properties of o alkyl and s alkyl monoethers of glycerol	Quantitative analysis and comparison of the physical properties of glycerol alkyl and glycerol alkyl monoether.
3	the mechanism of heparin stimulation of rat adipocyte lipoprotein lipase	Mechanisms of stimulation by rat adipocyte lipoprotein lipase heparin.
3	long chain bases in the sphingolipids of atherosclerotic human aorta	Long-chain bases in the sphingolipids of the human atherosclerotic aorta.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analysis of free long chain aldehydes	Gas chromatographic analysis of free long-chain aldehydes.
3	synthesis and desulfurization decarboxylation of cyclic thionocarbonates of glycerol 1 ethers	Synthesis and decarboxylation of cyclic thionocarbonates of decarboxylated glycerol ether 1.
3	alteration of physical chemical and biological properties of endotoxin by treatment with mild alkali	Modification of the chemical and biological properties of the substance; endotoxin by treatment with mild alkalies.
3	molecular order of participation of inhibitors or activators in biological systems	Molecular order of participation of inhibitors or activators in biological systems.
3	characterization of rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli by deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid hybridization	Characterization of rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli by l&apos hybridization; deoxyribonucleic acid with l' ribonucleic acid.
3	chemical modification of glutamate dehydrogenase by 2 4 6 trinitrobenzenesulphonic acid	Chemical modification of glutamate dehydrogenase by etapos; acid 2,46 trinitrobenzenesulfonic.
3	on the mechanism of pepsin action	On the mechanism of pepsin action.
3	negative cooperativity in regulatory enzymes	Negative cooperativity in regulatory enzymes.
3	the mechanism of action of ribonuclease	The mechanism of d' action of ribonuclease.
3	lipid monolayers interactions with the apoprotein of high density plasma lipoprotein	Lipid monolayers interact with the apos; apoprotein of high density plasma lipoproteins.
3	origin of some derivatives of retinoic acid found in rat bile	The origin of some derivatives of l' retinoic acid found in rat bile.
3	effect of phospholipase a treatment of low density lipoproteins on the dextran sulfate lipoprotein interaction	Effect of phospholipase, a treatment of low density lipoproteins, on the apos; interaction lipoprotein sulfate dextran.
3	probes of dna structure and interactions effects of copper ii on ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimer formation	DNA structure probes and effects of copper ii on pyrimidine dimer formation induced by ultraviolet light.
3	variations in sulfhydryl disulfide and protein content during synchronous and asynchronous growth of hela cells	Changes in sulfhydryl disulfide and protein content during synchronous and asynchronous growth of helical cells.
3	the interaction of cytochrome c with monolayers of phosphatidylethanolamine	L' interaction of cytochrome c with monolayers of phosphatidylethanolamine.
3	the separation prtial purificatio nd some properties of isoenzymes of aldolase from guinea pig cerebral cortex	The prtial purification of certain properties of the aldolase isoenzymes of the guinea pig cerebral cortex.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reactions with amino acids and peptides	The quinones formed in plant extracts react with amino acids and peptides.
3	the use of maleic anhydride for the reversible blocking of amino groups in polypeptide chains	L' use of maleic anhydride for reversible blockade of amino groups in polypeptide chains.
3	mechanism of non enzymic transamination reaction between histidine and alpha oxoglutaric acid	Mechanisms of non-enzymatic transamination reaction between histidine and l&apos alpha oxoglutaric acid.
3	the influence of metal ions on the orthophosphatase and inorganic pyrophosphatase activities of human alkaline phosphatase	The influence of metal ions on the orthophosphatase and inorganic pyrophosphatase activities of human alkaline phosphatase.
3	analogues of ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphate the preparation and properties of ribose 5 phosphorothioate and 5 phosphoribosyl 1 methylenediphosphonate	The ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphate analogs prepared ribose 5 phosphorothioate and 5 phosphoribosyl 1 methylenediphosphonate and their properties.
3	effects of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of d&apos phosphates; adenosine and nicotinamide nucleotides on pyruvate carboxylase of bakers' yeast.
3	comparative studies of bile salts 16 deoxymyxinol a second bile alcohol from hagfish	Comparative studies of bile salts 16 deoxymyxinol a second bile alcohol of hoxin.
3	the structure of an acylated inositol mannoside in the lipids of propionic acid bacteria	The structure of an acylated inositol mannoside in the lipids of propionic bacteria.
3	a shift in the optimum ph of pospholipase d produced by activating long chain anions	A change in the optimal ph of pospholipase d produced by the apos; activation of long chain anions.
3	mechanisms of inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in deoxyribonucleic acid by acridine dyes	Mechanisms; inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in deoxyribonucleic acid by acridinic dyes.
3	the hyperviscosity syndrome i in igg myeloma the role of protein concentration and molecular shape	Dapos syndrome; hyperviscosity i in myeloma igg the role of protein concentration and molecular shape.
3	studies on testosterone metabolism in subjects with testicular feminization syndrome	Studies of testosterone metabolism in subjects with testicular feminization syndrome.
3	adenine nucleotides and magnesium ions in relation to control of mammalian cerebral cortex hexokinase	D&apos nucleotides; adenine and magnesium ions in relation to control of mammalian cerebral cortical hexokinase.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reaction with bovine serum albumin	The quinones formed in plant extracts react with bovine serum albumin.
3	effects of magnesium manganese and adenosine triphosphate ions on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of magnesium manganese and adenosine triphosphate on pyruvate carboxylase of bakers' yeast.
3	inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in dna by cationic molecules role of energy transfer	L' inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in apos; DNA by cationic molecules plays a role in energy transfer.
3	formation of vitamin k2 isoprenologues by staphylococcus aureus	Formation of vitamin k2 isoprenologues by staphylococcus aureus.
3	genetic and molecular properties of an infectious antibiotic resistance r factor isolated from klebsiella	Genetic and molecular properties of an infectious antibiotic resistance factor isolated from Klebsiella.
3	the hydrolysis of monolayers of phosphatidyl me 14c choline by phospholipase d	L' hydrolysis of monolayers of phosphatidyl me 14c choline by phospholipase d.
3	amino acid incorporation by ribosomes and polyribosomes from wheat chloroplasts	Incorporation of amino acids by ribosomes and polyribosomes of wheat chloroplasts.
3	study of carbonic anhydrase using perturbed angular correlations of gamma radiation	Apos study; carbonic anhydrase using perturbed angular correlations of gamma radiation.
3	properties of halves of immunoglobulin light chains	Immunoglobulin properties of halves of the d&apos light chains.
3	some optical properties of diadenosine 5 phosphates	Some optical properties of diadenosine phosphates 5.
3	the nature of general base general acid catalysis in serine proteases	The nature of general base acid catalysis in serine proteases.
3	chemical composition of exosporium from spores of bacillus cereus	The chemical composition of the intestine; exosporium of the cereus bacillus spores.
3	the integrity of the ether linkage during thyroxine metabolism in man	Lapses; integrity of the association with the apos; ether during thyroxine metabolism in men.
3	two distinct groups of immunoglobulin a iga revealed by peptic digestion	Two distinct groups of d' immunoglobulin a iga revealed by peptic digestion.
3	proton magnetic resonance studies of porphyrin iron 3 cyanides	Proton magnetic resonance studies of porphyrin iron cyanide 3.
3	on the mechanism of ribonuclease action	On the mechanism of d' action of ribonuclease.
3	new antibacterial agent isolated from the avocado pear	New antibacterial agent isolated from the apos; avocado pear.
3	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of beta thioguanine deoxyriboside in mice	Microbiological tests and tissue distribution of beta-thioguanine deoxyriboside in mice.
3	irradiation of thymine dimers in aqueous solution	L' irradiation of thymine dimers in aqueous solution.
3	properties of 42s and 26s sindbis viral ribonucleic acid species	D&apos species properties; viral ribonucleic acid sindbis 42s and 26s.
3	electron microscopic observations on the ribonucleic acid of murine leukemia virus	Electron microscopic observations of ribonucleic acid of murine leukemia virus.
3	studies on the nucleocapsid structure of a group a arbovirus	Studies on the structure of the nucleocapsid of a group of arboviruses.
3	trypsin and papain covalently coupled to porous glass preparation and characterization	Trypsin and papain are covalently associated with porous glass preparation and characterization.
3	the effect of the prostaglandin f compounds on the contractility of the pregnant human uterus	The effect of prostaglandin f on the contractility of the pregnant human uterus.
3	stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their constituents ix the conformation of the antibiotic puromycin dihydrochloride pentahydrate	The stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their constituents ix the conformation of the antibiotic puromycin dihydrochloride pentahydrate.
3	photoregulation of biological activity by photocromic reagents ii inhibitors of acetylcholinesterase	Biological activity by photocromic reagents ii inhibitors of apos; acetylcholinesterase.
3	activation of rabbit liver fructose diphosphatase by coenzyme a and acyl carrier protein	Rabbit liver fructose diphosphatase activity by coenzyme a and d' acyl carrier protein.
3	replicative form ii dna of phi x174 resistance to exonucleolytic cleavage by e coli dna polymerase	Replicative form ii dna of phi x174 resistance to exonucleolytic cleavage by e coli dna polymerase.
3	controlled deamidation of peptides and proteins an experimental hazard and a possible biological timer	Controlled deamidation of peptides and proteins is an experimental hazard and may be a biological timer.
3	temporal resolution of individual steps in an enzymic reaction at low temperature	Time resolution of individual steps in an enzyme reaction at low temperature.
3	conversion of bacterial aldolase from vegetative to spore form by a sporulation specific protease	Conversion of bacterial aldolase from vegetative to spore form by a protease specific to sporulation.
3	hemoglobin nyu a delta chain variant alpha 2 delta 2 lys	L' nyu hemoglobin is a variant of delta chain alpha 2 delta 2 lys.
3	very low density lipoproteins in intestinal lymph origin composition and role in lipid transport in the fasting state	Very low density lipoproteins in apo composition; intestinal lymphatic origin and role in lipid transport to apo; fasting state.
3	autoxidation of insect lipids inhibition on the cuticle of the american cockroach	Insect lipid inhibition on the cuticle of the American cockroach.
3	pancreatic ribonuclease poly g complexes complete inhibition of poly u hydrolysis	Pancreatic polyg ribonuclease complexes complete apos; inhibition of apos; hydrolysis of poly u.
3	subunits of tamm horsfall glycoprotein	Under-units of tamm horsfall glycoprotein.
3	a specific complex between a restriction endonuclease and its dna substrate	The specific complex between a restriction endonuclease and its substrate.
3	an analysis of the electron spin resonance of low spin ferric heme compounds	An analysis of the electron spin resonance of low-spin ferric heme compounds has been carried out.
3	warfarin metabolism in man identification of metabolites in urine	Warfarin metabolism in men and women; identification of metabolites in urine.
3	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for acetylcholine receptors	Ratio between chemical structure and l' affinity for l&apos receptors; acetylcholine.
3	heavy and light chain allotypic markers on rabbit homocytotropic antibody	Light and heavy chain allotypic markers on rabbit homocytotropic antibodies.
3	semisynthetic coumermycins structure activity relationships	Synthetic semi-coumermycines structure activity relationships.
3	the heparin protein complex of ox liver capsule isolation and chemical characterization	The protein complex of l' heparin of l' beef liver capsule isolation and chemical characterization.
3	variation in the n terminal sequence of heavy chains of immunoglobulin g from rabbits of different allotype	Variation in the n-terminal sequence of heavy chains of d' immunoglobulin g in rabbits of different allotypes.
3	studies on the reduction of a human 19s immunoglobulin m	Studies on the reduction of human immunoglobulin 19s m.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons formation of radical anions from 7 7 8 8 tetracyanoquinodimethane and tetrachloro 1 4 benzoquinone	Reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of apos; electrons for formation of radical anions from 788 tetracyanoquinodimethane and tetrachloro 14 benzoquinone.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons interactions with iodine and the formation of iodide	Reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of iodine; electron interactions with iodine; iodine and iodine formation.
3	studies on tryptophan synthetases from various strains of bacillus subtilis	Studies on tryptophan synthetases of various strains of bacilli subtilis.
3	competition of two substrates for a single enzyme a simple kinetic theorem exemplified by a hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase reaction	Competition of two substrates for a single enzyme, a simple kinetic theorem illustrated by a hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase reaction.
3	brain arylamidase purfication and characterization of the soluble bovine enzyme	Brain purification; brain arylamidase and characterization of the apos; soluble bovine enzyme.
3	stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin g by papain and isolation of four types of biologically active fc fragments	The stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin g by papain and l' isolation of four types of biologically active fc fragments.
3	conformation changes and dissociation of fc fragments of rabbit immunoglobulin g as a function of ph	Changes in conformation and dissociation of fc fragments of rabbit immunoglobulin as a function of ph.
3	the incorporation of a hydrogen atom at c 15 of cholesterol biosynthesized from squalene	Lapos incorporation of a hydrogen atom at level c 15 of cholesterol biosynthesized from squalene.
3	effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on purine synthesis in cultured human cells	The effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on purine synthesis in cultured human cells.
3	aggregation of gamma g3 proteins relevance to the hyperviscosity syndrome	Aggregation of gamma g3 proteins related to hyperviscosity.
3	immune reactions in polysaccharide media the effect of hyaluronate chondroitin sulphate and chondroitin sulphate protein complex on the precipitin reaction	Immune reactions in the polysaccharide media l‡pos; effect of chondroitin sulfate hyaluronate and chondroitin sulfate protein complex on the precipitin reaction.
3	the preferential loss of the polylysine or polyornithine stimulated activity of clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase during proteolysis	Preferential loss of polylysine or polyornithine stimulated the apos, clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase activity, during proteolysis.
3	the influence of the size and nature of basic activators on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase catalysed polyadenylic acid synthesis	L' the influence of the size and nature of basic activators on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase activity catalyzes the synthesis of l' polyadenylic acid.
3	mode of action of albocycline an inhibitor of nicotinate biosynthesis	Apos modes; action of albocycline, an inhibitor of nicotinate biosynthesis.
3	specificity and evolutionary divergence of the antigenic structure of the polypeptide chain elongation factors	Specificity and evolutionary divergence of the antigenic structure of the d' polypeptide chain elongation.
3	biological studies with alpha dehydrobiotin	Biological studies with alpha-dehydrobiotin, e.g.
3	biochemical decomposition of the herbicide n 3 4 dichlorophenyl 2 methylpentanamide and related compounds	Biochemical decomposition of l' herbicide n° 34 dichlorophenyl 2 methylpentanamide and related compounds.
3	comparative study of responses to neomycins b and c by microbiological and gas liquid chromatographic assay methods	Comparative study of responses to neomycins b and c by gas and microbiological liquid chromatography.
3	loss of rubella antibody from immune globulin treated with kaolin	Loss of rubella antibodies in immunoglobulins treated with kaolin.
3	interactions of desensitized actomyosin with tropomyosin troponin a troponin b and polyanions	Los interactions; desensitized actomyosin with tropomyosin troponin a troponin b and polyanions.
3	relative rates of hydrolysis by rat pancreatic lipase of esters of c2 c18 fatty acids with c1 c18 primary n alcohols	Relative rates of apo; pancreatic lipase hydrolysis of c2 c18 fatty acids with primary c1 c18 alcohols.
3	reaction of acetyl alpha chymotrypsin and other esters with an ionizable nucleophile monoisonitrosoacetone	Other esters with an ionizable nucleophilic monoisonitrosoacetone; acetyl alpha chymotrypsin and d&apos.
3	the recombination of dimers of immunoglobulin peptide chains	Recombination of dimers of the peptide chains of l' immunoglobulin.
3	antibacterial effect of some azaphenanthrene compounds	Antibacterial effect of some azaphenanthrene compounds.
3	preparation of radioactive tay sachs ganglioside labeled in the sialic acid moiety	Preparation of the radioactive tay sachs ganglioside labeled in the sialic acid moiety.
3	gas liquid chromatography mass spectrometry of synthetic ceramides containing 2 hydroxy acids	Gas phase liquid chromatography mass spectrometry of synthetic ceramides containing 2 hydroxylic acids.
3	microbial transformation of 19 hydroxypregnanes	The microbial transformation of 19 hydroxypregnanes.
3	the conformation of cholinergic molecules at nicotinic nerve receptors	The conformation of cholinergic molecules to nicotinic nerve receptors.
3	chemical composition of the cell wall of the h37ra strain of mycobacterium tuberculosis	The chemical composition of the cell wall of the h37ra strain of mycobacterium tuberculosis.
3	terminal cross linking of dna strands by an enzyme system from escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	Terminal cross-linking of DNA strands by an enzyme system of bacteriophage t4 infected escherichia coli.
3	diphenylhydantoin and diazepam molecular structure similarities and steric basis of anticonvulsant activity	Comparison of diphenylhydantoin and diazepam molecular structures and steric basis of l' anticonvulsant activity.
3	specific alkylation of a histidine residue in carnitine acetyltransferase by bromoacetyl l carnitine	Specific alkylation of d' a histidine residue in carnitine acetyltransferase by bromoacetyl l carnitine.
3	products of aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of the cephalosporins	Products of apos; aminolysis and enzymatic hydrolysis of the cephalosporins.
3	changes in proton magnetic resonance spectra during aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of cephalosporins	Changes in the proton magnetic resonance spectra during aminolysis and apos; enzymic hydrolysis of cephalosporins.
3	inhibition of phosphofructokinase by quinone methide and alpha methylene lactone tumor inhibitors	L' inhibition of phosphofructokinase by quinone methide and alpha methylene lactone inhibitors.
3	an approach to conformational analysis of peptides and proteins in solution based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and conformational energy calculations	A l&apos approach; conformational analysis of peptides and proteins in solution based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and conformational energy calculations.
3	conversion of glycogen phosphorylase b to a by non activated phosphorylase b kinase an in vitro model of the mechanism of increase in phosphorylase a activity with muscle contraction	Conversion of glycogen phosphorylase a by non-activated phosphorylase b, an in vitro model of the mechanism of d' increase in apos; phosphorylase a activity with muscle contraction.
3	mechanism of activation by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate of a protein phosphokinase from rabbit reticulocytes	In addition, a protein phosphokinase from rabbit reticulocytes was found to be a protein phosphokinase.
3	steric and electronic relationships among some hallucinogenic compounds	Steric and electronic relationships among certain hallucinogenic compounds.
3	polynucleotide ligase catalyzed joining of deoxyribo oligonucleotides on ribopolynucleotide templates and of ribo oligonucleotides on deoxyribopolynucleotide templates	The polynucleotide ligase catalyzes the union of deoxyribo oligonucleotides on ribopolynucleotide templates and oligonucleotides on deoxyribonucleotide templates.
3	reaction of diethyl pyrocarbonate with nucleic acid components i adenine	Reaction of diethyl pyrocarbonate with i-adenine nucleic acid components.
3	production of rubratoxin b by penicillium purpurogenum stoll	Production of rubratoxin b by penicillium purpurogenum stoll.
3	identification of mycobactins by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	Identification of mycobactins by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
3	a new class of chromophoric organomercurials and their reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	A new class of chromophoric organomercurics and their reactions with glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	structural analysis of colanic acid from escherichia coli by using methylation and base catalysed fragmentation comparison with polysaccharides from other bacterial sources	Structural analysis of apo; colanic acid; escherichia coli methylation and base-catalyzed fragmentation comparison with polysaccharides from other bacterial sources.
3	purification and properties of d 4 deoxy 5 oxoglucarate hydro lyase decarboxylating	Purification and properties of deoxy hydrolysate-4 oxoglucarate decarboxylating lyase by decarboxylation.
3	anaerobic degradation of the benzene nucleus by a facultatively anaerobic microorganism	The anaerobic degradation of the benzene ring by micro-facultative anaerobic organism.
3	yields of hydrogenomonas eutropha from growth on succinate and fumarate	The yields of hydrogenomonas eutropha from growth on succinate and fumarate.
3	contribution of aromatic residue interactions to the stability of myoglobin v enhancement by aromatic compounds of the rate of heat denaturation	Contribution of aromatic residue interactions to the stability of acid; increase of myoglobin v by aromatic compounds of thermal denaturation rate.
3	reactions between singlet oxygen and the constituents of nucleic acids importance of reactions in photodynamic processes	Reactions between singlet oxygen and nucleic acid components Importance of reactions in photodynamic processes.
3	electron microscopic studies on streptococci i m antigen	Electron microscopy studies on Streptococcus antigen i m m.
3	the immunogenicity of dinitrophenyl amino acids	L' immunogenicity of dinitrophenyl amino acids.
3	electron microscopy of the nucleic acid of mouse mammary tumor virus	Electron microscopy of the nucleic acid of mouse mammary tumour virus.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 2 toxicity to adult mosquitos and the physical properties of some new carbamates	Evaluation of compounds for their insecticidal activity against adult mosquitoes 2 toxicity to adult mosquitoes and the physical properties of some new carbamates.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 3 properties of some n methylthiolcarbamates	Evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitoes 3 properties of some n methylthiolcarbamates.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 4 insecticidal activity and physical properties of some halogenated organophosphorus esters	Evaluation of apo; insecticidal activity of certain mosquito-control compounds 4 and physical properties of certain organophosphate halogen esters.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 5 toxicity to adult mosquitos and residual properties of some pyrethroids	Assessment of compounds for insecticidal activity against adult mosquitoes 5 toxicity to adult mosquitoes and residual properties of selected pyrethroids.
3	procedures for the assay of carbenicillin in body fluids	Procedures for the determination of carbenicillin in body fluids.
3	the nature of the antigenic determinant in a genetic control of the antibody response	The nature of the antigenic determinant in a genetic control of the antibody response.
3	physical and chemical changes in isolated chylomicrons prevention by edta	Chemical changes in isolated chylomicrons prevention by edta.
3	subterminal oxidation of aliphatic hydrocarbons	Subterminal oxidation of aliphatic hydrocarbons.
3	evaluation of various substances to prevent adsorption of tuberculin purified protein derivative ppd to glass surfaces	Evaluation of various substances to prevent adsorption of tuberculin purified protein derivative ppd to the glass surface.
3	on the reconstitution of the crystalline components of the sea urchin fertilization membrane	On the reconstitution of the crystalline components of the sea urchin's fertilization membrane.
3	direct isolation of the hyaline layer protein released from the cortical granules of the sea urchin egg at fertilization	Isolate directly the hyaline layer protein released from the cortical granules of the eggs; sea urchin during fertilization.
3	polyacetal carboxylic acids a new group of antiviral polyanions	Polyacetal carboxylic acids, a new group of antiviral polyanions.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation i measurement of oxidation by ultraviolet spectrophotometry and the thiobarbituric acid test	Ascorbic acid and copper in the skin; oxidation of linoleate; oxidation by ultraviolet spectrophotometry and testing; thiobarbituric acid.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation ii ascorbic acid and copper as oxidation catalysts	Ascorbic acid and copper in oil; oxidation of linoleate ii L' ascorbic acid and copper as oxidation catalysts.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation 3 catalysts in combination	L' ascorbic acid and copper in apos; linoleate oxidation catalyzed 3 in combination.
3	mass spectral discrimination between monoenoic and cyclopropanoid and between normal iso and anteiso fatty acid methyl esters	Mass spectral discrimination between monoenoic and cyclopropanoid fatty acid methyl esters and between normal and anteiso iso is a distinction between methyl esters of fatty acids.
3	metabolism of tryptophan by pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 production of substituted pyrrolnitrins from tryptophan analogues	The metabolism of tryptophan by pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 produces substituted pyrrolnitrins from tryptophan analogs.
3	reactive phosphate ester of the carcinogen 2 n hydroxy acetamido fluorene	Reactive phosphoric ester (RPA) of the carcinogen 2 n hydroxy acetamido fluorene.
3	bactericidal action of 2 hydroxy 3 cyclohexylpropyl 1 4 naphthoquinone on bacillus megaterium	The bactericidal action of 2 hydroxy 3 cyclohexylpropyl 14 naphthoquinone on the bacillus megaterium.
3	some physical chemical and insecticidal properties of some o o dialkyl 3 5 6 trichloro 2 pyridyl phosphates and phosphorothioates	Some chemical and insecticidal properties of certain phosphates and phosphorothioates; o dialkyl 3 5 6 trichloro 2 pyridyl.
3	metabolism of benzoic acid by bacteria 3 5 cyclohexadiene 1 2 diol 1 carboxylic acid is an intermediate in the formation of catechol	L&apos metabolism; benzoic acid by the bacterium 3,5 cyclohexadiene 1 2 diol 1 l' carboxylic acid is an intermediate in the formation of catechol.
3	configuration of the c 20 epimer of 7 8 dihydrobatrachotoxinin a	Apos configuration; c 20 epimer of the dihydrobatrachotoxin at 7-8 a.
3	the non enzymic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino 4 hydroxy 6 7 dimethyl 5 6 7 8 tetrahydropteridine	L' non-enzymatic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino 4 hydroxy 6 7 dimethyl 5 6 7 8 tetrahydropteridine.
3	a study of the formation of fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine 3 methoxytyramine and related compounds by reaction with hydrazine in the presence of nitrous acid	Study of the formation of fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine 3 methoxytyramine and related compounds by reaction with l' hydrazine in the presence of apos; nitrous acid.
3	oligothymidylates formation by thermal condensation of o 2 5 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate	Apos formation; oligothymidylates by thermal condensation of o 25 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate.
3	5 fluoro 2 deoxyuridylate covalent complex with thymidylate synthetase	Covalent thymidylate synthetase 5 fluoro 2 deoxyuridylate complex.
3	structure activity relationships in some series of 2 alkyl 1 2 3 benzotriazinium compounds	Relationships d' structure activity in some series of 2 alkyl compounds 1-23 benzotriazinium.
3	on the mechanism of action of vitamin b 12 model studies thermal rearrangement of methyl 3 3 dimethylglycidate to methyl levulinate	The thermal rearrangement of methyl dimethylglycidate 3 to methyl levulinate was studied by a model on the mechanism of the action of vitamin b12.
3	microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino 1 2 3 4 thiatriazole	Microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino 1 2 3 4 thiatriazole.
3	purification and properties of 4 hydroxy 2 ketopimelate aldolase from acinetobacter	The purification and properties of 4 hydroxy 2 ketopimelate aldolase d' acinetobacter.
3	microbial transformation of methyl 5 6 butyl 2 benzimidazolecarbamate	The microbial transformation of methyl benzimidazolecarbamate 5-6 butyle 2.
3	activity of 6 methyl 8 substituted ergolines against the 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary carcinoma	L' activity of 6 methyl 8-substituted ergolines against 712 anthracene dimethylbenz has induced mammary carcinoma.
3	a new antibiotic xk 62 2 iii the structure of xk 62 2 a new gentamicin c complex antibiotic	A new antibiotic xk 62 2 iii the structure of xk 62 2 a new gentamicin complex antibiotic c.
3	microbial reduction of 1 3 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3 0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 beta hydroxy 3 oxo 2beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane an intermediate for steroid total syntheses	Microbial reduction of 1-3 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3 0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 β-hydroxy 3 oxo 2 beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane, intermediate for total steroid synthesis.
3	hydrogen bonding abilities of 2 4 dithiouridine derivatives	The hydrogen bonding capacity of 24 dithiouridine derivatives.
3	2 chloroethanol formation as evidence for a 2 chloroethyl alkylating intermediate during chemical degradation of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 cyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea and 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	Formation of 2 chloroethanol as evidence of l' an alkylating 2-chloroethyl intermediate upon chemical degradation of 12 chloroethyl 3 cyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea and 12 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea.
3	morphometry of endocrine organs 1 karyometry of the chicken thyroid gland following administration of zinc and bismuth complexes of substituted bisthiourea	Endocrine morphometry 1 karyometry of the chicken thyroid gland after administration of substituted bisthiourea zinc and bismuth complexes.
3	metabolic function and properties of 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 hydroxylase from pseudomonas acidovorans	Metabolic functions and properties of 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 hydroxylase of pseudomonas acidovorans.
3	purification and properties of gentisate 1 2 dioxygenase from moraxella osloensis	Purification and properties of gentisate 12 dioxygenase from moraxella osloensis.
3	sulfhydryl reactivity mechanism of action of several antiviral compounds selenocystine 4 2 propinyloxy beta nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin	Mechanisms of sulfhydryl reactivity of several antiviral compounds selenocystin 4 2 propinyloxy beta nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin.
3	metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation binds strongly to dna by intercalation	The metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation binds strongly to l' DNA intercalation.
3	kinetics of drug decomposition part xxxvi stability of 10 1 methyl 4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine derivatives on the grounds of kinetics of thermal degradation and hammett equation	Kinetics of drug decomposition, part xxxvi stability of 10 methyl derivatives-4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine based on the kinetics of thermal degradation and l' hammett equation.
3	accumulation of an intermediate in dna synthesis by hep 2 cells treated with methyl methanesulfonate	The accumulation of apos; an intermediate in apos synthesis; DNA by hepatic cells 2 treated with methyl methanesulfonate.
3	cyclization of 13beta ethyl 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraen 14 one and its 17 acetate derivative	Cyclization of 13beta ethylene 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8 14 sec 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraene 14 1 and its acetate derivative 17.
3	preparation of androsta 2 4 dien 17beta ol	Preparation of androsta 2 4 diene 17beta ol androsta 4 diene 17beta.
3	metabolism of nitrosamines in vivo iv isolation of 3 hydroxy 1 nitrosopyrrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrrolidine	Metabolism of nitrosamines in vivo iv isolation of 3 hydroxy 1 nitrosopyrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrolidine.
3	sulfamic acid cleaning solution for 4 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca	Sulfamic acid cleaning solution for 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca.
3	assay and relationship of ht 2 toxin and t 2 toxin formation in liquid culture	Analysis and relationship of ht 2 toxin and t2 toxin formation in liquid culture.
3	biological proton magnetic resonance and ultraviolet spectroscopic evidence for a molecular complex of actinomycin d and 10 11 dihydro 3h naphth 1 2 g indazol 7 ol	Proton nuclear magnetic resonance and ultraviolet spectroscopy revealed the presence of apos; a molecular complex of d' actinomycin d and 10 dihydro 11h naphth 1 g; indazol 7 ol.
3	the search for new drugs in the group of xanthine derivatives xxxviii 1 3 dimethyl 8 alkyl 6h 7h 10h 1 2 4 triazepino 4 3 f purine 2 4 1h 3h diones and their derivatives	Search for new drugs in the group of xanthine derivatives xxxviii 1 3 dimethyl 8 alkyl 6h 7h 10h 1h 2h 4 triazepino 4 3 f purine 2h 4h 3 h diones and their derivatives.
3	structure of the modified nucleoside q isolated from escherichia coli transfer ribonucleic acid 7 4 5 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopenten 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine	The nucleoside structure of the modified nucleoside q isolated from the apos; ribonucleic acid transfer d'apos; escherichia coli 7 4 5 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopentene 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine.
3	hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates iv the metal ion nucleic base interaction in the cu2 promoted dephosphorylation of the 5 di and 5 triphosphates of cytidine inosine and guanosine and their protection toward hydrolysis by coordination to cu 2 2 bipyridyl 2	L' hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates iv, l' interaction of metal ions with nucleic bases in cu2 promotes the dephosphorylation of the 5 di and 5 triphosphates of cytidine inosine and guanosine and their protection against apos; hydrolysis by coordination with cu 2 bipyridyl 2 cu.
3	dissociation of bovine 6s procarboxypeptidase a by reversible condensation with 2 3 dimethyl maleic anhydride application to the partial characterization of subunit iii	Dissociation of 6s bovine procarboxypeptidase a by reversible condensation with etapos; dimethyl maleic anhydride 2 3 applied to the partial characterization of-unit iii.
3	a new parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962 7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 methyl 1h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid chemistry and structure activity relationships	A new parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962 7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 methyl 1 h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid and relations between l' structural activity and the chemistry.
3	synthesis and biological activity of pyrido 2 3 e 1 4 diazepine and of pyrido 2 3 b 1 4 diazepine	Synthesis and biological activity of pyrido 2 3 and 14 diazepine and pyrido 2 3 b 14 diazepine.
3	new 2 methyldialkylammoniumalkylthio 4 p substituted phenyl 3h 1 5 benzodiazepine iodides with antibacterial activity note i	Two new iodides of methyldialkylammoniumalkylthio 4 p substituted with phenyl 3h15 benzodiazepines with a note d'apos; antibacterial activity i.
3	production of 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 14beta ol 17 ones and 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 17alpha ol 14 ones by microbial enzymes	Production of 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraene 14beta ol 17 uns and 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraene 17alpha ol 14 uns by microbial enzymes.
3	transformation of 2 2 anhydro 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine induced by hydrogen peroxide	Transformation of 2 anhydro 1 beta of arabinofuranosylcytosine induced by hydrogen peroxide.
3	fluorescence reactions of fluorescamine with levodopa and its derivatives fluorescence assay of 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylalanine in levodopa dosage forms	Fluorescence reactions of fluorescamine with levodopa and its test fluorescence derivatives of 3 methoxy-4 hydroxyphenylalanine in levodopa dosage forms.
3	nmr investigations of proline and its derivatives 4 proton magnetic resonance parameters and structure of acetyl proline amide	The nmr of proline and its derivatives allowed us to study proton 4 nuclear magnetic resonance parameters and the structure of l' amide of l' acetyl proline.
3	synthesis of 9 o acetyl and 4 9 di o acetyl derivatives of the methyl ester of n acetyl beta d neuraminic acid methylglycoside their use as models in periodate oxidation studies	The synthesis of 9 o acetyl and 4 di o acetyl derivatives of l' l&apos methyl ester; nacetyl beta neuraminic methylglycoside is being used as a model in periodate oxidation studies.
3	the structure of n 3 phenyl 5 1 2 3 4 oxatriazolio phenylamide at 105 k	The structure of phenylamide n-3 5 1 2 3 4 oxatriazolio phenylamide, at 105 k.
3	identification of the chemical structures of schizoflavins as 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 carboxybutyl isoalloxazine	The chemical structures of the schizoflavins were identified as: 7,8 dimethyl 10, 2, 3, 4 trihydroxy 4 formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7,8 dimethyl 10, 2, 3, 4 trihydroxy 4 carboxybutyl isoalloxazine.
3	metabolism of some ethylenediamine derivatives with antiarrhythmic properties i absorption distribution in tissues and excretion of 14 c labelled n n bis 3 p methoxyphenoxy 2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulphonate mk 142 in rats	Metabolism of some ethylenediamine derivatives with antiarrhythmic properties; absorption into tissues and excretion of 14 c labeled n = 3 p-methoxyphenoxy-2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulfonate mk 142 in the rat.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity	The biological activity of triazole derivatives is planned.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity part iv synthesis of substituted 3 4 5 triaryl 1 2 4 triazoles	At 4:14 a.m., triazole derivatives with expected biological activity, part iv synthesis of 345 substituted triaryl 1,244 triazoles.
3	studies on tocopherol derivatives v intestinal absorption of several d 1 3 4 3h2 alpha tocopheryl esters in the rat	Studies of tocopherol derivatives and l' intestinal absorption of several alpha tocopheryl esters of 1 d 3 h2 in rats.
3	metabolism of 1 3 trifluoromethylphenyl 3 2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2 4 1h 3h dione h 88 i species differences in metabolism	Metabolism of 13 trifluoromethylphenyl 3 2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2 4 1 h 3 h dione h 88 h specific differences in metabolism.
3	synthesis and properties on some 2 4 and 5 aminopyrimidines effect of nh2 and ortho c methylation on protolytic equilibria and electronic absorption spectra	The synthesis and properties of some aminopyrimidines 4 and 5 exert a nh2 and ortho c methylation effect on protolytic equilibria and d' electronic absorption.
3	the molecular structure of 3 methoxy 9 10 leads to 19 abeo 1 3 5 10 estratrien 17 one	The molecular structure of 3 methoxy 9 gives 19 abeo 1310 estratriene 17.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of new pyridine derivatives 2 6 bis diphenyl and dibenzyl hydroxymethyl piperidines	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of new pyridine derivatives 6 bis bis diphenyl and dibenzyl hydroxypiperidines.
3	search for potential amoebicides part iv some hydrazones derivatives of 2 nitro 4 5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and of 1 4 bis alpha o acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine	Look for potential amicides part iv some hydrazones derived from 2 nitro 4 5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and 1 bis alpha o acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine.
3	chemistry of nitrosoureas decomposition of deuterated 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	Chemistry of the nitrosoureas decomposition of 13 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 deuterated nitrosourea.
3	the conversion of benzo alpha pyrene 4 5 oxide into 4 hydroxybenzo alpha pyrene in the presence of polyriboguanylic acid	Transformation of benzo alpha pyrene 4 oxide 5 into 4 hydroxybenzo alpha pyrene in the presence of epos; polyriboguanylic acid.
3	determination of 2 acetamido 2 deoxy d galactose and mechanism of formation of chromogens	Determination of 2 acetamido 2 deoxy d galactose and mechanism of formation of chromogens.
3	treatment of diabetes insipidus with 1 deamino 8 d arginine vasopressin	Treatment of diabetes insipidus with 1 desamino 8 d arginine vasopressin.
3	electron impact induced reactions of n6 3 methyl 2 butenyl adenosine and related cytokinins	L' electron impact induced reactions of n3 methyl 2 butenyl adenosine and related cytokinins.
3	a search for antitumor compounds xi biologic studies antitumor properties of 19 new 9 aminoacridine and 1 or 3 nitro 9 aminoacridine derivatives	Investigation of antitumor compounds xi biological studies of the antitumor properties of 19 new derivatives of l' aminoacridine 9 and 1 or 3 l&apos derivatives; aminoacridine 9 nitro 9.
3	methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and glucosaminyl glucosaminitol disaccharides formation of 2 deoxy 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol derivatives	L' methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and glucosaminyl glucosaminitol disaccharides gave 2 deoxy derivatives 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol.
3	the association of yeast phosphoglycerate kinase ec 2 7 2 3	Association of yeast phosphoglycerate kinase.
3	synthesis of l fucose 2 3 and 4 sulphates	Synthesis of sulfates l sulfose 2 3 and 4 sulfate.
3	the effect of several 2 alkyl and 4 o methylanalogs of pyridoxol on mouse liver pyridoxal kinase activity	L' effect of several 2 alkyl and 4 o methyl pyridoxol analogs on mouse liver pyridoxal kinase activity.
3	antimetabolites produced by microorganisms xv synthesis of 2 methyl l arginine 2 methyl l ornithine and their enantiomers	Antimetabolites produced by xv microorganisms synthesized 2 methyl l arginine 2 methyl l ornithine and their enantiomers.
3	biotransformation of 1 4 chlorophenyl 3 3 dimethyltriazene into 3 chloro 4 hydroxyaniline intramolecular hydroxylation induced chlorine migration during a catabolic degradation of a chemical carcinogen	The biotransformation of 14 chlorophenyl 3 3 dimethyltriazene to 3 chloro 4 hydroxyaniline by intramolecular hydroxylation induces chlorine migration during catabolite degradation of d&apos, a chemical carcinogen.
3	type 1 and 2 synaptic junctions differences in distribution of concanavalin a binding sites and stability of the junctional adhesion	Differences in the distribution of concanavalin a in type 1 and 2 synaptic junctions and in l&apos stability; junctional adhesion.
3	synthesis and some pharmacological properties of 2 tryptophan oxytocin	Synthesis and some pharmacological properties of 2 tryptophan @-@ocytocin.
3	interaction of the carcinogen 3 3 dimethyl 1 phenyltriazene with nucleic acids of various rat tissues and the effect of a protein free diet	L' interaction of carcinogen 3-3 dimethyl 1 phenyltriazene with the nucleic acids of various rat tissues and liver enzymes; a protein-free diet.
3	comparison of the products of the reaction of 7 methylbenz a anthracene 5 6 oxide and rna with those formed in 7 methylbenz a anthracene treated cells	Comparison of the products of the reaction of 7 methylbenz a 56-anthracene oxide and rna with those formed in 7 methylbenz a cells treated with etapos; anthracene.
3	studies on 4 hydroperoxycyclophosphamide nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application for the synthesis of a new class of activated sulfur containing cyclophosphamide nsc 26271 derivatives	Studies on l' hydroperoxycyclophosphamide 4 nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application for the synthesis of d' a new class of activated sulfur derivatives containing cyclophosphamide nsc 26271.
3	fragmentation of 3 oximino 4 chromanone	Fragmentation of 3 oximino @-@, 4 chromanone.
3	synthesis of new derivatives of the 4 5 diphenyloxazole series	Synthesis of new derivatives of the series 4-5 diphenyloxazole.
3	new derivatives of 2 carboxychromanone 4 as potential antiinflammatory drugs i cis and trans beta 2 4 dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids and their derivatives	New carboxychromanone derivatives 2-4 and their derivatives as potential anti-inflammatory i beta 2 cis and trans dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids 4.
3	spectinomycin modification i 7 epi 9 deoxy 4 r dihydrospectinomycin	Spectinomycin modification i 7 epi 9 deoxy 4 r dihydrospectinomycin.
3	some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2 methyl 5h 1 benzopyrano 2 3 b pyrid 5 one	Some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2 methyl 5h 1 benzopyrano 2 3 b pyrid 5 l.
3	formation of ethylenethiourea from 5 6 dihydro 3h imidazo 2 1 c 1 2 4 dithiazole 3 thione by microorganisms and reducing agents	Formation of d' ethylenethiourea from 56 dihydro 3h imidazo 2 1 c 12.4 dithiazole 3 thione by microorganisms and reducing agents.
3	reversed ester analogues of pethidine isomeric 4 acetoxy 1 2 6 trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines	Invert the analogous esters of isomeric pethidine 4 acetoxy 1, 6 trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines.
3	toxicity and mutagenicity of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and its microbial metabolites	Toxicity and mutagenicity of 2,4,6 trinitrotoluene and its microbial metabolites.
3	hydrolysis in 2 chloro 2 deoxy nucleosides nucleotides and polynucleotides to arabinose derivatives	Hydrolysis in 2 chloro nucleosides-2 deoxy and polynucleotides to arabinose derivatives.
3	alternative products in the reaction of 2 nitro 5 thiocyanatobenzoic acid with thiol groups	Alternative products in the reaction of nitro acid-2 thiocyanatobenzoic acid 5 with thiol groups.
3	preparation of fully active ficin from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and characterization of its active centre by using 2 2 depyridyl disulphide as a reactivity probe	Preparation of fully active ficin from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and characterization of its active center, using 2-depyridyl disulfide as a reactivity probe.
3	metabolism of 4c crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate by the sheep	Sheep metabolism of crufomate 4c 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methylphosphoramidate.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate metabolites	Mass spectrometric characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of crufomate 4 tbutyl 2 chlorophenyl methylphosphoramidate metabolites.
3	a search for new anticonvulsant compounds among 3 aryl 5 benzylidene derivatives of 2 thiohydantoin	Search for new anticonvulsant compounds among 3 aryl benzylidene 5 derivatives of 2 thiohydantoin derivatives.
3	synthesis and rearrangements of d glucosyl esters of aspartic acid linked through the 1 or 4 carboxyl group	Synthesis and rearrangements of d glucosyl esters of aspartic acid bound by carboxyl groups 1 and 4.
3	the reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta 10beta epoxy 7 8 9 10 tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with dna	The reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta 10beta epoxy 78,910 tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with the DNA.
3	selective n actylation of gentamicin antibiotics synthesis of 1 n acyl derivatives	N selective actylation of gentamicin antibiotic synthesis of 1 n acyl derivatives.
3	some new congeners of the anticancer agent 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea bcnu synthesis of bifunctional analogs and water soluble derivatives and preliminary evaluation of their chemotherapeutic potential	Some new congeners of l' anticancer agent 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea bcnu synthesis of the bifunctional analogs and the soluble derivatives; water and preliminary evaluation of their chemotherapy potential.
3	a radioimmunoassay method for 1 beta d arabinofuranosyluracil using antibodies directed against 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine	A radioimmunoassay of beta dapos; arabinofuranosyluracil 1 with apos; beta dapos antibodies; arabinofuranosylcytosine 1.
3	coumarins xiv high resolution mass spectra of 3 4 disubstituted 3 4 dihydroseselins	Coumarins xiv high resolution mass spectra of 3-4 disubstituted dihydroseelins 3.
3	anti inflammatory and antiproteolytic properties of 1 1 naphthylacetyl 3 substituted carbamides	Anti-inflammatory and anti-proteolytic properties of naphthylacetyl 3 substituted carbamides and 1-substituted carbamides.
3	microbial transformation of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and other nitroaromatic compounds	The microbial transformation of 2,46, trinitrotoluene and d' other nitroaromatic compounds.
3	a new aminoglycoside antibiotic complex the seldomycins iii the structures of seldomycin factors 1 and 2	A new complex of antibiotics, the seldomycin iii, the structure of seldomycin factors 1 and 2.
3	metabolism of the pancreatic carcinogens n nitroso bis 2 oxopropyl amine and n nitroso bis 2 hydroxypropyl amine in the syrian hamster	Metabolism of the pancreatic carcinogens n nitroso bis 2 oxopropylamine and n nitroso bis 2 hydroxypropylamine in the Syrian hamster.
3	synthesis of 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro 2 4 dioxoquinazoline derivatives for pharmacological study	Synthesis of derivatives 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro 2 4 dioxoquinazoline for pharmacological study.
3	methylation of adenosine in strongly alkaline medium preparation and properties of o methyl derivatives of adenosine and n6 methyladenosine	Methylation of l' adenosine in highly alkaline preparation and properties of methylated derivatives of l' adenosine and n6 methyladenosine.
3	evaluation of 2 benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2 6 bis benzylidene cyclohexanones for antitumor and cytotoxic activity and as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of e 2 benzylidenecyclohexanone	Evaluation of 2 benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2 bis benzylidene cyclohexanones for antitumor and cytotoxic activity and as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of 2-benzylidenecyclohexanone.
3	hypocholesterolemic agents iii inhibition of beta hydroxy beta methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase by half acid esters of 1 4 biphenylyl pentanol	Hypocholesterolemic agents iii inhibition of beta-hydroxybeta methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase by half acid esters-of 14 biphenyl pentanol.
3	new compounds derivatives of methyl 2 aminoacetyl 4 5 dimethoxyphenylacetate	Methyl dimethoxyphenylacetate 5; new compounds derived from aminoacetyl 2, 4, 5.
3	permanganate ion oxidations ix manganese intermediates complexes in the oxidation of 2 4 1h 3h pyrimidinediones	Complex oxidation of the permanganate ion manganese intermediates in the apo placenta; oxidation by 24 h 3 h pyrimidinediones pyrimidiones.
3	antagonists of vitamin b6 simultaneous and stepwise modification of the 2 and 4 positions	The antagonists of vitamin b6 modified positions 2 and 4 simultaneously and stepwise.
3	2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxoquinolyl oxamic acids and 2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxobenzo h quinolyl oxamic acids as antiallergy agents	Carboxy 1-4 dihydro acids 4 oxoquinolyl oxamics and 2 carboxy 1-4 dihydro acids 4 oxobenzo h quinolyl oxamics as the anti-allergic agents.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of some 2 substituted 4 and 7 benzoxazoleacetic and alpha methylacetic acids	Synthesis and anti-inflammatory activity of 2 and 7 substituted benzoxazoleacetic and alpha methylacetic acids.
3	semisynthetic cephalosporins synthesis and structure activity relationships of analogues with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthio acetic acid or 2 2 2 2 trifluoroethyl thio acetic acid and their sulfoxides and sulfones	Semipal-synthetic cephalosporin synthesis and d&apos relationships; structure activity of analogues with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthioacetic acid or 2 2 trifluoroethylthioacetic acid and their sulfoxides and sulfones.
3	effect of sulfur substitution for the noncarbonyl oxygen in hemicholinium 3 and acetyl seco hemicholinium 3 synthesis biological activity and structure toxicity relationships	Effect of sulfur substitution of apos; noncarbonyl oxygen in apos; hemicholinium 3 and synthesis of apos; acetyl seco hemicholinium 3 on apos; biological activity and structural toxicity.
3	5 11 dimethyl 2 9 bis phenylacetyl 5 11 diazatetracyclo 6 2 2 0 2 7 0 4 9 dodecane a potent novel analgesic	Dimethyl 2, 9 bis phenylacetyl 5, 11 diazatetracyclo 6, 2, 2, 7, 4 9 dodecane, a new and powerful pain reliever.
3	synthesis of analogues of n 2 chloroethyl n trans 4 methylcyclohexyl n nitrosourea for evaluation as anticancer agents	Synthesis d' analogues of No 2 chloroethyl n trans 4 methylcyclohexyl n nitrosourea for evaluation as an anti-cancer agent.
3	intrachain reactions of a pair of reactive groups attached to polymer ends 3 intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains having terminal electron donor and terminal electron acceptor groups in chloroform solution	Intrachain reactions d' a pair of reactive groups attached to a polymer terminate in an intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains with chloroform solution; terminal electrons and acceptor groups d&apos.
3	2 3 carbonates in the synthesis of uridine 5 deoxy and 2 5 dideoxy derivatives	Two-three carbonates in the synthesis of uridine derivatives 5 deoxy and 25 dideoxy.
3	reaction of diazoalkanes with 1 substituted 2 4 dioxopyrimidines formation of o2 n 3 and o4 alkyl products	Reaction of diazoalkanes with 1 substituted dioxopyrimidines 4 gave alkylated o2 n 3 and o4 compounds.
3	the metabolism and toxicity of halogenated carbanilides biliary metabolites of 3 4 4 trichlorocarbanilide and 3 trifluoromethyl 4 4 dichlorocarbanilide in the rat	The metabolism and toxicity of halogenated carbanilides biliary metabolites of 3 4 trichlorocarbanilide and 3 trifluoromethyl 4 dichlorocarbanilide in the rat.
3	2 diazo 3 3 3 trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent for photoaffinity labeling	Trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent 2 diazo 3 3 for the photoaffinity labeling.
3	deletion of hinge region of human myeloma igg1 molecule protein lec associated with nonexpression of g1m 3 and km 1 2 allotypes a possible genetic explanation at the dna level	Removal of the hinge region of the human igg1 myeloma protein molecule lec associated with the non--expression of allotypes g1m 3 and km 1, 2, a possible genetic explanation at the DNA level.
3	synthesis of 1 4 naphthoquinones 4 aryl aroyl hydrazones of potential antimicrobial activity	Synthesis of 14 naphthoquinones 4 aryl aroyl hydrazones d' potential antimicrobial activity.
3	reaction of peptide 89 169 of bovine myelin basic protein with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine	Reaction of peptide 89,169 of bovine myelin basic protein with 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine.
3	synthesis and properties of mesoionic pyrimido 1 2 b a1pyridazine 2 4 diones and mesoionic pyridazino 2 3 a a1 s trizine 2 4 diones mesoionic analogs structurally related to fervenulin	Synthesis and properties of mesoionic pyrimido 1-2 b a1pyridazine 2-4 diones and mesoionic pyridazino 2-3 a1 s trizine 2-4 mesoionic analogs structurally related to fervenulin.
3	stereochemistries of geometric isomers of 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenylvinyl phenol 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenyylamine corrections of the literature	Stereochemistry of geometric isomers of 4 bromo 1 2 diphenylvinyl phenol 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenylamine corrections from literature.
3	studies on bovine adrenal estrogen sulfotransferase iii facile synthesis of 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate	Bovine adrenal estrogen sulfotransferase studies iii facile synthesis of 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate.
3	ir spectroscopic characterization of 2 thiohydantoins and 2 thiobarbiturates	The ir spectroscopic characterization of two thiohydantoins and two thiobarbiturates.
3	the isolation and identification of 2 methyl 2 4 thiazolidine dicarboxylate as a by product in the conversion of cysteine to glucose in the perfused rat liver	L' isolation and l' identification of 2 methyl dicarboxylate-2 thiazolidine 4 as a by-product in the conversion of cysteine to glucose in the perfused rat liver.
3	7 2 aminomethylphenylacetamido 3 1 carboxymethyltetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid	Aminomethylphenylacetamido 3 1 carboxymethyltetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid.
3	the reactions of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate with thiols and the holoenzyme of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and of inorganic phosphate with the acyl holoenzyme	The reactions of glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 with thiols and of l' holoenzyme of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and inorganic phosphate with l' holoenzyme of l' acyl.
3	the highly electrophilic character of 4 chloro 7 nitrobenzofurazan and possible consequences for its application as a protein labelling reagent	The highly electrophilic character of the nitrobenzofurazane 4 chloro 7 and its possible consequences for its application as a protein labeling reagent.
3	investigations of the reaction kinetics in the formation of 7 chloro 2n nitrosomethylamino 5 phenyl 3h 1 4 benzodiazepine 4 oxide author s transl	The kinetics of the reaction in the formation of 7 chloro 2n nitrosomethylamino 5 phenyl 3h 1h 4 benzodiazepine 4 oxidizer s transl.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam and diazepam	Kinetics and mechanisms of synthesis; hydrolysis of 14 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam and diazepam.
3	polarographic study of new antibacterial isoxazolium salts 2 3 dialkyl 5 arylisoxazolium perchlorates	Polarographic study of perchlorates d' isoxazolium 2 3 dialkyl 5 arylisoxazolium antibacterials.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new 1 1 diarylacetic acid derivatives	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new 1 derivatives of l' diarylacetic acid.
3	research on nitrogen heterocyclic compounds x new method of synthesis of pyrrolo 1 2 a quinoline and its derivatives	Research on the heterocyclic nitrogen compounds x new method of synthesis of pyrrolo 1 a quinoline and its derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 aminoisoindolin 1 ones with or without 6 substituents	The synthesis of 2 aminoisoindoline 1 with or without 6 substituents.
3	synthesis and pharmacological study of various 2 alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1 3 4 oxadiazoles	Synthesis and pharmacological study of various 2 alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1 3 4 oxadiazoles.
3	synthesis of 1 4 benzodiazepine and 1 5 benzodiazocine through oxidative fission of the double bond of indole derivatives	A synthesis of 14 benzodiazepine and 15 benzodiazocine by oxidative fission of the double bond of l&apos derivatives; indole.
3	chemical and pharmacological research on pyran derivatives vii derivatives of naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 c pyrazole and of 12h naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 d pyrimidine	Chemical and pharmacological research on pyranic derivatives vii derived from naphtho 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 c pyrazole and naphtho 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 d pyrimidine.
3	the crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2 pyrrolidone 5 carboxylic acid lactam of 4 hydroxy 4 isobutylglutamic acid from reseda odorata l	The crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2 pyrrolidone 5 lactam d' carboxylic acid of 4 hydroxy 4 isobutylglutamic reseda odorata l.
3	nucleosides cvi syntheses of 1 n methyl 5 beta d ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n methyl phi uridine and its identity with a metabolite elaborated by streptomyces platensis var clarensis	The nucleosides cvi synthesize 1 n methyl-5 beta d ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n methyl phi uridine and their identity with a metabolite developed by streptomyces platensis var clarensis.
3	synthesis and biological activities of some 7 1 2 4 oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins	Synthesis and biological activities of some 71,12,4 of the oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins.
3	synthesis of certain 4 oxo 1 2 3 4 tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives likely to possess analgesic activity	Synthesis of certain tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives 4 oxo 1 2 3 4 likely to possess analgesic activity.
3	effect of overheating products of wood hydrolysis on 3 4 benzpyrene output	The effect of overheating and hydrolysis of wood on the production of 3-4 benzpyrene.
3	metabolism of quaternary carbon compounds 2 2 dimethylheptane and tertbutylbenzene	Metabolism of quaternary carbon compounds 2 dimethylheptane and tertbutylbenzene 2.
3	microbiological degradation of bile acids metabolites formed from 3 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta methyl 1 5 dioxoindan 4 alpha yl propionic acid by streptomyces rubescens	Microbiological degradation of bile acid metabolites formed from 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta ß-methyl 1-5 dioxoindan 4 alpha-@ yl-propionic acid by streptomyces rubescens.
3	derivatives of 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1 4 diene 3 20 dione and their antiinflammatory activity	Derivatives of 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1 4 diene 3 20 dione and their anti--inflammatory activity.
3	elucidation of the structure of the antineoplastic agents 2 formylpyridine and 1 formylisoquinoline thiosemicarbazones	Elucidation of the structure of the antineoplastic agents 2 formylpyridine and 1 formylisoquinoline thiosemicarbazones.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines iii nitrazepam	Kinetics and mechanisms of synthesis; hydrolysis of 14 benzodiazepines iii nitrazepam.
3	comparative stereochemistry in the aziridine ring openings of n methylmitomycin a and 7 methoxy 1 2 n methylaziridino mitosene	Comparison of stereochemistry of aziridine ring openings of methylmitomycin a and methoxy 712 n methylaziridino mitosene.
3	a proton magnetic resonance investigation on 1 1 cytidine and guanosine silver i complexes	A proton nuclear magnetic resonance study of the i1 complexes of cytidine and guanosine silver 1 was performed.
3	determination of benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in plant materials part i apples red currants grapes kale and sugar beets	Determination of benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in plant materials part i of common red apples, cabbage and sugar beets.
3	fluorescent probe studies of haptoglobin type 2 1	Fluorescent probe studies of haptoglobin type 2 and haptoglobin type 2.
3	monomethylthio analogues of 1 2 4 5 trimethoxyphenyl 2 aminopropane	Monomethylthio analogs of 14.5 trimethoxyphenyl 2 aminopropane.
3	regulation of peroxidation of mitochondrial membrane lipids initiated by fe2 ions by antoxidants of the 1 4 dihydropyridine series in experiments in vitro	The regulation of peroxidation of mitochondrial membrane lipids initiated by Fe2 ions by the 14 series of anoxidants dihydropyridine in in vitro experiments.
3	identification of 2 methyl 3 hydroxydecanoic and 2 methyl 3 hydroxytetradecanoic acids in the lipid x fraction of the bordetella pertussis endotoxin	Identification of 2 methyl 3 hydroxydecanoic acids and 2 methyl 3 hydroxytetradecanoic acids in the lipid fraction x; pertussis bordetella endotoxin.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4 3 a 1 4 benzodiazepines by oxidative cyclization of hydrazones	Quinazolines and 1 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4 to 1 benzodiazepines by oxidative cyclization of the hydrazones.
3	2 formyl 1 4 benzodioxane preparation and reactivity	The preparation and reactivity of 2 formyl 14 benzodioxanes.
3	anticonvulsant activity and selective inhibition of nad dependent oxidations by 1 4 disubstituted piperazines	Anti-vulsant activity and selective inhibition of nad-dependent oxidations by 14 disubstituted piperazines.
3	studies related to the metabolism of ergoline drugs structure determination and spectroscopic properties of 1 6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline derivatives	Studies on the metabolism of structure determination and spectroscopic properties of 1-6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline derivatives.
3	cyclic gaba gabob analogues ii synthesis of new 2 oxo and 2 5 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives	Cyclic bell gabob analogues ii synthesize new 2 oxo and 2 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives.
3	cyclic hydrazides iv synthesis of 2 amino 3 4 dihydroisoquinolin 1 2h one	Cyclic hydrazides iv synthesis of 2 amino 3,4 dihydroisoquinoline 1,2 h 1.
3	2 acetyl 2 methyl 1 phenyl hydrazine a frequently occuring artifact in processing biological material after ingestion of drugs containing antipyrine author s transl	Two acetyl 2 methyl 1 phenyl hydrazine, a common artifact in the treatment of biological material after ingestion of drugs containing the translative antipyrine.
3	potential biologically active agents x synthesis of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methyl and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as excystment and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli	Potential biologically active agents x synthesis of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methylated and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as dekysting and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli.
3	hydroxylated metabolies of r s 1 tetrahydro 2 furanyl 5 fluorouracil ftorafur in rats and rabbits	Hydroxymetabolism of r 1 tetrahydro 2 furanyl 5 fluorouracil ftorafur in rats and rabbits.
3	definition of cytochrome c binding domains by chemical modification ii identification and properties of singly substituted carboxydinitrophenyl cytochromes c at lysines 8 13 22 27 39 60 72 87 and 99	Identification of cytochrome c binding domains by chemical modification ii identification and properties of lysine-containing cytochrome(s) c-monosubstituted carboxydinitrophenyls.
3	synthesis of 2 3 dinor pgfalpha metabolites	Synthesis of pgfalpha metabolites in 2 dinors.
3	synthesis of 6 1 6 tri o mesitylenesulfonyl sucrose further examination of tri o tosylsucrose and the chemistry of 3 6 1 4 3 6 trianhydrosucrose	Synthesis of 616 tri o mesitylenesulfonyl sucrose, further examination of tri o tosylsucrose and chemistry of 3,611,423 trianhydrosucrose.
3	inhibitors of bacillus subtilis dna polymerase iii 6 arylalkylamino uracils and 6 anilinouracils	Inhibitor of bacillus subtilis dna polymerase iii 6 uracils arylalkylamino and 6 anilinouracils.
3	anomalous chemical shifts of methyl groups of 2 4 dimethylbenzo g quinoline	Abnormal chemical shifts of methyl groups of 2,4 dimethylbenzo g quinoline.
3	imidazo 4 5 f quinolines iii antibacterial 7 methyl 9 substituted arylamino imidazo 4 5 f quinolines	Imidazo 4 quinolines 5 f iii antibacterial 7 methyl 9 arylamino imidazo 4 quinolines 5 f quinolines.
3	bicyclic analogs of piperazine xii 1 synthesis of 3 8 diazabicyclo 3 2 1 octanes as potential antiparkinson agents	The bicyclic analogs of piperazine xii 1 syntheses 3-8 diazabicyclo 3-2 octanes as potential antiparkinson agents.
3	non steroid anti inflammatory agents stereoisomers of 2 4 biphenylyl 3 oxybutyric acid	Anti-non-steroidal inflammatory 2,4 biphenylyl 3 oxybutyric acid steroisomers.
3	synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3 and 5 halogen substituted bis 2 aminophenyl disulfides and corresponding n alkyl derivatives	Synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3- and 5-halogen-substituted d' aminophenyl bis disulfides and corresponding n alkyl derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 substituted derivatives of 5h 1 2 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a 1 3 5 triazin 5 one	The synthesis of 2 substituted derivatives from 5:12:4 thiadiazolo 3:2 to 13:5 triazine 5.
3	bufuralol a new beta adrenoceptor blocking agent part 1 synthesis and structure activity studies in a series of benzofuran 2 ethanolamines	Bufuralol, a novel beta-adrenergic receptor blocking agent, has carried out structural part 1 synthesis and d&apos studies in a series of benzofuranes 2 ethanolamines.
3	the possible utilization of the 1 amino 1 deoxy 2 ketose compounds between amino acids and carbohydrates as foodstuff integrators	L' possible use of the 1 amino 1 deoxy 2 ketose compounds between amino acids and carbohydrates as food integrators.
3	biopharmacological investigation of 6 6 methylene bis 2 2 4 trimethyl 1 2 dihydroquinoline mtdq a radical binding antioxidant of secondary amine type	The biopharmacological study of 6 methylene bis 2 4 trimethyl 1 2 dihydroquinoline mtdq, a radical binding antioxidant of secondary amine type.
3	polynitro aromatic compounds in analytical chemistry ii reaction of menadione with 2 4 dinitrophenylhydrazine	Polynitro aromatic compounds in analytical chemistry ii reaction of menadione with 24 dinitrophenylhydrazine.
3	the effect on fungal growth of some 2 5 dihydroxy 1 4 benzoquinones	L' effect on fungal growth of some 25 dihydroxy 14 benzoquinones.
3	interaction of poly 2 methyl 5 vinyl n ethylpyridinium bromide and heparin studied by means of ultraviolet and infrared spectroscopy	L' interaction between polybromide 2 methyl 5 vinyl n ethylpyridinium and l' heparin was studied by means of ultraviolet and infrared spectroscopy.
3	interstrand cross linking of dna by 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea and other 1 2 haloethyl 1 nitrosoureas	Binding between strands of l' DNA by 13 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea and 1 other 2 haloethyl 1 nitrosourea.
3	comparative electrophilicity mutagenicity dna repair induction activity and carcinogenicity of some n and o acyl derivatives of n hydroxy 2 aminoflourene	Comparison of the mutagenicity, potency, induction of repair, DNA and carcinogenicity of certain n and o acyl derivatives of apos; hydroxy-2 aminoflourene.
3	kinetics and mechanism of degradation of some 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives part vi the use of hammett equation for kinetic investigation of 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives hydrolysis	The kinetics and mechanism of degradation of some 2 derivatives of sulfanilamidopyrimidine part vi l' use of l' hammett equation for l' kinetic study of l' hydrolysis of 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives.
3	on the reactivities of the tryptophan residues of human alpha lactalbumin to 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	On the reactivity of the tryptophan residues of l' alpha human lactalbumin to d&apos bromide; hydroxy-2 nitrobenzyl.
3	evidence for bay region activation of chrysene 1 2 dihydrodiol to an ultimate carcinogen	Evidence of leprosy; activation of the area of the bay of chrysene 1 2 dihydrodiol to an ultimate carcinogen.
3	preparation of derivatives of l idose and l iduronic acid from 1 2 o isopropylidene alpha d glucofuranose by way of acetylenic intermediates	Preparation of derivatives of idose and idios; iduronic acid from 1 o isopropylidene alpha of glucofuranose via acetylenic intermediates.
3	some 1 2 diaminobenzene derivatives as reagents for gas chromatographic determination of selenium with an electron capture detector	Some 12 diaminobenzene derivatives as reagents for the determination of selenium by an electron capture detector gas chromatography.
3	the 1h nmr spectra of mixed valence complexes of copper with derivatives of 1 amino 2 2 dimethyl 2 mercaptoethane	The 1h nmr spectra of the mixed-valence complexes of copper with the 1 amino derivatives-2 dimethyl-2 mercaptoethane 2 are obtained by 1h nmr spectroscopy.
3	introduction of antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues into 4 thiouridine n3 3 l amino 3 carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe from e coli	Introduction of d' an antigen determining 24 dinitrophenyl residues in 4 thiouridine n3 l amino 3 carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe of e coli.
3	synthesis of oligonucleotides with sequences identical with or analogous to the 3 end of 16s ribosomal rna of escherichia coli preparation of m 6 2 a c c u c c and a c c u c m 4 2c via phosphotriester intermediates	D&apos synthesis; oligonucleotides whose sequences are identical or analogous to those of the apos; end 3 of the ribosomes 16s of the preparation d' escherichia coli of m 6 a c c c c u c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c 2c by the apos; intermediate d' phosphotriester intermediates.
3	substitution reactions of a water soluble metalloporphyrin with azide and 1 1 3 3 tetramethyl 2 thiourea	Replacement reactions of a metalloporphyrin soluble in the apos; water with the apos; azide and 133 tetramethyl 2 thiourea.
3	enzymic and immunochemical properties of lysozyme accurate definition of the antigenic site around the disulphide bridge 30 115 site 3 by surface simulation synthesis	Enzyme and immunochemical properties of the precise definition of antigenic site lysozyme around the disulfide bridge 30 115 site 3 by surface simulation synthesis.
3	structure elucidation of butyl 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy 16alpha methyl 3 20 dioxo 1 4 pregnadien 21 oate fluocortin butylester author s transl	Structural elucidation of butyl 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy 16alpha methyl 320 dioxo 14 pregnadiene 21 oate fluocortin butylester transl.
3	isolation and structure determination of the metabolites of 2 1 3 dimethyl xanthinyl 7 methyl 4 methyl morpholine a xantinol derivative from rat urine author s transl	Isolation and structure determination of the metabolites of 2,13 dimethyl xanthinyl 7 methyl 4 morpholine, a xantinol derivative of rat urine.
3	sensitivity to a flame retardant tris 2 3 dibromopropyl phosphate firemaster lvt 23 p	Sensitivity to a flame retardant tris 2-3 dibromopropyl phosphate Firemaster lvt 23 pt.
3	base and base sequence specificity of the binding of 4 hydroxyaminoquinoline 1 oxide to dna	Base and base sequence specificity of the binding of l' d&apos oxide; hydroxyaminoquinoline 4-1 to l' DNA.
3	oxidation products of n methyl 2 2 7 8 tetramethyl 6 amino chroman a model compound of n methyl gamma tocopheramine with potassium ferricyanide	The products of apos; oxidation of n methyl 2, 7 8 tetramethyl 6 chromane is a model compound of n methyl gamma tocopheramine with potassium ferricyanide.
3	rac glycerol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase a new soluble phosphodiesterase of mammalian tissues	Glycerol 1-2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase, a new soluble phosphodiesterase of mammalian tissue.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds two catechol 1 2 dioxygenases from a 3 chlorobenzoate grown pseudomonad	Chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds, two catechol 12 dioxygenases, a pseudomonad grown in the presence of chlorobenzoates.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds substituent effects on 1 2 dioxygenation of catechol	Chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds substituent effects on the dioxygenation of catechol.
3	the effect of warfarin and vitamin k 1 on the carboxylation and glycosylation of prothrombin in vivo	L' effect of warfarin and vitamin k 1 on the carboxylation and glycosylation of prothrombin in vivo.
3	reaction of ovine prolactin with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolemine	Reaction of ovine prolactin with 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl-3 methyl-3 bromoindolemin.
3	synthesis and antitumor activity of halogen substituted 4 3 3 dimethyl 1 triazeno quinolines	Synthesis and antitumour activity of the halogen substituted 4 3 dimethyl 1 triazeno quinolines.
3	1 beta mercapto beta beta cyclopentamethylenepropionic acid 4 valine 8 d arginine vasopressin a potent and selective inhibitor of the vasopressor response to arginine vasopressin	A beta mercapto beta beta cyclopentamethylenepropionic acid 4 valine 8 d arginine vasopressin, a potent selective inhibitor of the vasopressin response to l' arginine vasopressin.
3	circular dichroism investigation of the l lysine n cu ii 1 1 systems with n 4 and n 25	Study of the circular dichroism of lysine n cuii 1 systems with n 4 and n 25 systems.
3	synthesis and biological activities of 10 substituted benzo b 1 5 naphthyridines	Synthesis and biological activities of 10 substituted benzo b 115 naphthyridines.
3	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formation of 2 3 dihydro 2 3 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from aflatoxin b1 by hepatic microsomes	Reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent on the formation of 23 dihydro 23 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from l' aflatoxin b1 by liver microsomes.
3	nad p h dehydrogenase and its role in the vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 1 4 naphthaquinone dependent carboxylation reaction	Nad p h dehydrogenase and its role in the naphthaquinone-dependent carboxylation reaction of vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 14 carboxylation.
3	catabolism of 2 4 5 trimethyoxybenzoic acid and 3 methoxycrotonic acid	Trimethyoxybenzoic acid catabolism of 25 and 3 methoxycrotonic acids.
3	glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ixalpha in normal bile compared with post obstructive bile transformation of the 1 o acylglucuronide into 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	Glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ixalpha in normal bile compared to the bile transformation post-obstruction of l' acylglucuronide 1 o to acylglucuronides 2-3 and 4 o.
3	antimalarial 6 aminoquinolines vii 2 and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 4 diethylamino 1 methylbutylamino 5 8 dimethoxyquinoline author s transl	Antipaludean 6 aminoquinolines vii 2 and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 diethylamino 4 methylbutylamino 5 8 dimethoxyquinoline s transl.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of 1 3 and 5 substituted 2 pyrrolidinones	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of substituted pyrrolidinones 1-3 and 5-2.
3	polarographic behaviour of 2 5 nitro 2 furyl 5 2 aminoethoxy pyrimidine derivatives	Polarographic behavior of 2 nitro 2 furyl 5 2 aminoethoxy pyrimidine derivatives.
3	cancerostatics iii synthesis and some chemical transformations of 3 cyano 5 pyridyl 4 pyrid 2 one	Cancer synthesis iii and some chemical transformations of cyano 3 pyridyl 5 pyridyl 4 pyridine 2.
3	acylation of benzoxazolin 2 ones and 3 hydroxy 1 2 benzisoxazoles	Acylation of benzoxazoline 2 ones and 3 hydroxy 1 2 benzisoxazoles.
3	synthesis of some 4 hydroxypiperazine and n n dibenzylhydroxylamine esters with potential local anaesthetic activity	The synthesis of some 4 hydroxypiperazine and n dibenzylhydroxylamine esters with potential local anesthetic activity.
3	synthesis of substituted 7 hydroxy 5h 1 3 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a pyrimidin 5 ones with anticipated antimicrobial activity	Synthesis of 7 hydroxy substituted 5h 1h 3 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a pyrimidin 5 uns with anticipated antimicrobial activity.
3	methoxylation of methyl 3alpha 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 en 24 oate and its 3beta epimer a contribution to chenodeoxycholic acid biogenesis	Methoxylation of methyl 3alpha 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 to 24 oate and its 3beta epimer contributes to l' chenodeoxycholic acid biogenesis.
3	effect of modification on physico chemical and biological properties of haptoglobin reaction with n bromusuccinimide and 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	Effect of modification on physico-chemical and biological properties of reaction of l' haptoglobin with n bromusuccinimide and 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide.
3	in vitro and in vivo evaluation of the toxicity of 1 4 naphthoquinone and 1 2 naphthoquinone derivatives against trypanosoma cruzi	In vitro and in vivo evaluation of the toxicity of 14 naphthoquinone derivatives and 12 naphthoquinone derivatives to trypanosome cruzi.
3	metabolism of 5 isopropyl 1 methyl 2 nitro 1h imidazole identification of some urinary metabolites in the dog	Metabolism of 5 isopropyl 1 methyl 2 nitro 1h imidazole identification of some urinary metabolites in the dog.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of 6 11 dihydro 11 oxodibenzo b e thiepinalkanoic acids and related compounds	Synthesis and anti-inflammatory activity of 6 dihydro acids-11 oxodibenzo b e thiepinalkanoic and related compounds.
3	isolation of a new lipoxygenase metabolite of arachidonic acid 8 11 12 trihydroxy 5 9 14 eicosatrienoic acid from human platelets	Apos isolation; a novel lipoxygenase metabolite of apos; arachidonic acid 8, 11, 12 trihydroxy 5, 9, 14 eicosatrienoic acid from human platelets.
3	cross linking of ribosomal proteins by 4 6 formyl 3 3 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a heterobifunctional cleavable cross linker	Cross-binding of ribosomal proteins by 46 formyl-33 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a heterobifunctional cleavable cross-linker.
3	reaction of ortho ortho dimethylphenacyl halides with formamide formation of 4 5 ortho ortho dimethylbenzoyl imidazoles	Reaction of ortho-dimethylphenacyl halides with formamide formation of 4 ortho-dimethylbenzoyl imidazoles ortho (5) with formamide.
3	bromination of 3 amino 1 2 4 benzothiadiazine 1 1 dioxide	Bromination of 3 amino 1, 2, 4 benzothiadiazine 1 carbon dioxide.
3	the synthesis of methyl 3 alpha 7 alpha diacetoxy 11 oxo 5 beta cholan 24 oate	The synthesis of methyl 3 alpha 7 alpha diacetoxy 11 oxo 5 beta cholan 24 oate.
3	the oxygenation of 3 methyl 3h desacetoxycephalosporin c 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 em 4 carboxylic acid to 3 hydroxymethyl 3h desacetylcephalosporin c by 2 oxoglutarate linked dioxygenases from acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus	L' oxygenation of 3 methyl deacetoxycephalosporin c, 3 h 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 em 4 carboxylic acid to 3 hydroxymethyl 3 h deacetylcephalosporin c by 2 linked oxoglutarate dioxygenases from apos; acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus.
3	the metabolic fate of 2 14c folic acid and a mixture of 2 14c and 3 5 9 3h folic acid in the rat	The metabolic fate of lacid; folic acid 2,14c and dapos; a mixture of 2,14c and 3,59,3h folic acid in rats.
3	treatment of lead poisoning by 2 3 dimercaptosuccinic acid	Treatment of lead poisoning by 2-3 acid dimercaptosuccinique.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids i 7 beta ketoacylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta keto acids i 7 beta cephalosporins-ketoacylamino.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids ii further modifications of 7 3 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta keto acids ii further modifications of 7 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins.
3	synthesis and identification of products derived from the metabolism of the carcinostatic 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea by rat liver microsomes	Synthesis and identification of products derived from rat liver metabolism 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourated by rat liver microsomes.
3	affinity labeling of histamine n methyltransferase by 2 3 dialdehyde derivatives of s adenosylhomocysteine and s adenosylmethionine kinetics of inactivation	Apos labelling; apos affinity; histamine n methyltransferase by 2 dialdehyde derivatives of apos; adenosylhomocysteine and apos; adenosylmethionine kinetics of apos; inactivation.
3	improved preparation and structural elucidation of the tryptophan cleavage reagent 2 2 nitro phenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine bnps skatole	Improvement of preparation and apo; structural elucidation of tryptophan 2 nitro phenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine bnps skatole cleavage reagent.
3	metal ion buffer interactions stability of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino 2 hydroxymethyl 1 3 propanediol tris and adenosine 5 triphosphate atp	Buffer metal ion interactions stability of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino-2 hydroxymethyl 1 3 propanediol tris et l' adenosine 5 triphosphate atp.
3	synthesis of some 2 5 disubstituted anilino 3 6 dichloro 1 4 benzoquinones as antimicrobial agents	The synthesis of some 25 anilino 36 dichloro 14 disubstituted benzoquinones as antimicrobials.
3	synthesis of some 2 styrylquinazoline derivatives structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents	The synthesis of 2 styrylquinazoline derivatives structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents.
3	reaction of trnaphe from yeast with 1 fluoro 2 4 dinitrobenzene attachment sites of the potential antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues	Reaction of yeast trnaphe with 1 site of d' fluoro attachment 2 4 dinitrobenzene of l' potential antigen determining 2 4 residues dinitrophenyl.
3	molecular structure of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	Molecular structure of 12 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea.
3	synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric 6 and 7 acetyl 3 methyl 2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 1 4 dioxides	Synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric dioxins 6 and 7 acetyl 3 methyl-2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 14.
3	formation of an unstable covalent intermediate during the inhibition of electric eel acetylcholinesterase with 1 3 2 dioxaphosphorinane 2 oxides	Formation of an unstable covalent intermediate during apos; inhibition of apos; acetylcholinesterase of apos; electrical eel by 132 dioxaphosphorinane oxides 2.
3	crystal structure of 1 1 complex of barbital with 1 methylimidazole	The crystal structure of complex 1 of barbital with 1 methylimidazole.
3	cis and trans octa 1 5 dien 3 ol new attractants to the cheese mite tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina acaridae idintified in trichothecium roseum fungi imperfecti	Octta 15 diene 3 ol novel trans- and cis-attracting ol for the mite of the cheese Tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina acaridae idintified in trichothecium roseum imperfecti fungi.
3	gamma gamma 4 4 diamino 3 3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine a safer substitute for benzidine type chromogens	Gamma gamma 4 4 diamino 3 3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine, a safer substitute for benzidine-like chromogens.
3	antiallergy agents 1 1 6 dihydro 6 oxo 2 phenylpyrimidine 5 carboxylic acids and esters	Antiallergic agents 1,16 dihydro 6 oxo 2 phenylpyrimidine 5 carboxylic acids and esters.
3	prodrugs of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyl adenine 2 synthesis and evaluation of a number of 2 3 and 3 5 di o acyl derivatives	Prodrogues of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyl adenine 2 synthesis and evaluation of a number of 2,3 and 3 derivatives of acyls.
3	new bronchodilators synthesis and bronchodilating activity of some 3 alkoxymethyl alpha n substituted aminomethyl 4 hydroxybenzyl alcohols	The synthesis of new bronchodilators and l' bronchodilation activity of some 3 l&apos-substituted hydroxybenzyl alcohols; alkoxymethyl alpha n aminomethyl 4 are l&apos-substituted alcohols; hydroxybenzyl.
3	a laser flash photolysis study of the reactivities of the triplet states of 8 methoxypsoralen and 4 5 8 trimethylpsoralen with nucleic acid bases in solution	A laser flash photolysis study of the reactivities of the triplet states of 8-methoxypsoralene and 4-trimethylsoralene with d' nucleic acids in solution was carried out.
3	the metabolism and excretion of curcumin 1 7 bis 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenyl 1 6 heptadiene 3 5 dione in the rat	The metabolism and apos; excretion of curcumin 17 bis 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenyl 1 6 heptadiene 3 5 dione in the rat.
3	1 and 3 deamidino derivatives of dihydrostreptomycin and some 1 n acyl derivatives	Derivatives deamidino 1 and 3 from dihydrostreptomycin and some 1 n acyl derivatives.
3	chloroperoxidase catalysed oxidation of 4 chloroaniline to 4 chloronitrosobenze	Chloroperoxidase catalyzes oxidation of 4 chloroanilines to 4 chloronitrosenes.
3	structure revision of disaccharidic conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in human bile and identification of phenylazo derivatives b4 b5 and b6 as 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	Structural review of disaccharide conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in human bile and identification of phenylazo derivatives b4 b5 and b6 as 2-3 and 4 o acylglucuronides.
3	metabolism of 14c terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and goat	Metabolism of 14c terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and goats.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine metabolites from rats and goat	Mass Spectral Characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 s triazine metabolites from rats and goats.
3	rearranged glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in post obstructive bile structure elucidation of azopigments beta and gamma as ethyl anthranilate n glycosides derived from 2 3 and 4 o acyl glucuronides	Rearranged from the conjugates d' glucuronic acid of the bilirubin ix alpha in the apos; post elucidation-obstruction of the bile structure of the azopigments beta and gamma in the form of glycosides anthranilates d' ethyl derivatives of glucuronides 2 and 4 acyls.
3	the uptake of 6 methoxy 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro beta carboline and its effect on 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake and release in blood platelets	L' absorption of 6 methoxy 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro beta carboline and its effect on apos; absorption and release of 5 blood platelets.
3	chemical and pharmaceutical research on pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1 oxo 2 alkyl 3 dialkylamino 1h naphtho 2 1b pyrans	Chemical and pharmaceutical research on pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1 oxo 2 alkyl 3 dialkylamino 1h naphtho 2 1b pyrans.
3	antiviral action of benzo de isoquinoline 1 3 diones 5 nitro 2 2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro 2 2 1 pyrrolidine ethyl derivatives	Antiviral action of isoquinoline benzo 13 diones 5 nitro 2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro 2 21 ethyl derivatives of pyrrolidine.
3	new daunorubicin analogs 3 amino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha and beta d arabino and 3 6 diamino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha d ribo hexopyranosides of daunomycinone	New analogues of daunorubicin 3 amino 2, 3, 6 trideoxy alpha and beta d arabino and 3, 6 diamino 2, 3, 6 trideoxy alpha of ribo hexopyranosides daunomycinone.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines lxxxix haptens useful in benzodiazepine immunoassay development	Quinazolines and 14 benzodiazepinesxxx haptens are useful in the development of benzodiazepine immunoassays.
3	the metabolism of benzyclane 1 benzyl 1 3 n n dimethylaminopropoxy cycloheptane in rat and man	The metabolism of benzyclane 1 benzyl 1 n dimethylaminopropoxycycloheptane in rats and l'apos; man.
3	chemical and biological studies of 1 2 5 dihydroxy 4 methylphenyl 2 aminopropane an analogue of 6 hydroxydopamine	Chemical and biological studies of 125 dihydroxy 4 methylphenyl 2 aminopropane analog of 6 hydroxydopamine.
3	iso branched 2 and 3 hydroxy fatty acids as characteristic lipid constituents of some gliding bacteria	L' iso branches fatty acids 2 and 3 are characteristic lipid constituents of some slippery bacteria.
3	analysis of some older scandinavian formulations of 2 4 dichlorophenoxy acetic acid and 2 4 5 trichlorophenoxy acetic acid for contents of chlorinated dibenzo p dioxins and dibenzofurans	Analysis of older Scandinavian formulations of 24 dichlorophenoxyacetic acids and 25 trichlorophenoxyacetic acids to determine chlorinated dibenzo p dioxins and dibenzofurans.
3	tumorigenicity of the diastereomeric benz a anthracene 3 4 diol 1 2 epoxides and the and enantiomers of benz a anthracene 3 4 dihydrodiol in newborn mice	The tumorigenic potency of the diastereoisomer benz a anthracene 3,4 diol 1,2 epoxides and the enantiomers of benz a anthracene 3,4 dihydrodiol in the new mice-nées.
3	conformational analogues of dopamine synthesis and pharmacological activity of e and z 2 3 4 dihydroxyphenyl cyclopropylamine hydrochlorides	Conformational analogs of dopamine synthesis and l&apos pharmacological activity of dihydroxyphenylcyclopropylamine hydrochlorides e and z 34.
3	synthesis of fused 1 2 6 thiadiazine 1 1 dioxides as potential transition state analogue inhibitors of xanthine oxidase and guanase	Synthesis of dioxides 1-2-6 thiadiazine 11 fused as potential inhibitors of xanthine oxidase and guanase.
3	synthesis and antiestrogenic activity of 3 4 dihydro 2 4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4 2 1 pyrrolidinyl ethoxy phenyl methanone methanesulfonic acid salt	Synthesis and anti-estrogenic activity of 3 4 salts of l' methanesulfonic acid dihydro 2 4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4 2 1 pyrrolidinyl ethoxy phenyl methanone methanesulfonic.
3	antileukemic activity of derivatives of 1 2 dimethyl 3 4 bis hydroxymethyl 5 phenylpyrrole bis n methylcarbamate	Methyl methyl derivatives-2 dimethyl-3-4 bishydroxymethyl-5 phenylpyrrole bis n methylcarbamate antileukemia activity.
3	the identification of distinctive forms of human alpha 2 macroglobulin by using the numerical relationship between trypsin binding in alpha and beta modes	Identification of distinctive forms of human macroglobulin alpha 2 using the numerical relationship between trypsin binding in alpha mode and beta mode.
3	clobazam chemical aspects of the 1 4 and 1 5 benzodiazepines	Clobazam chemical aspects of the 14 and 15 benzodiazepines.
3	2 aminomethyl 2 decarboxyprostaglandin f2 alpha type analogs	Apos type 2 alpha; aminomethyl 2 decarboxyprostaglandin f2 alpha analogs.
4	evidence of active transfer of certain non electrolytes across the human red cell membrane	In addition, there was evidence of active transfer of some non--electrolytes through the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the adsorption of proteins on erythrocytes treated with tannic acid and subsequent hemagglutination by antiprotein sera	L' adsorption of proteins on erythrocytes treated with l' tannic acid and l' subsequent hemagglutination by anti-protein sera.
4	a microspectrophotometric study of red cell nuclei during pyknosis	A microspectrophotometric study of red cell nuclei during pyknosis.
4	the tonicity volume relations for systems containing human red cells and the chlorides of monovalent cations	Tonicity volume relationships for systems containing human red blood cells and chlorides of monovalent cations.
4	the tonicity volume relations for human red cells subjected to the action of heat with special reference to prolytic k loss	Volume tonicity relationships for human red blood cells subjected to heat action with special reference to prolytic loss of k.
4	age as effecting the osmotic and mechanical fragility of dog erythrocytes tagged with radioactive iron	Age affects osmotic and mechanical fragility of dog erythrocytes labelled with radioactive iron.
4	active transport into the human erythrocyte evidence from comparative kinetics and competition among monosaccharides	Active transport in human erythrocytes was demonstrated by comparative kinetics and competition between monosaccharides.
4	diffractometric measurements of the tonicity volume relations of human red cells in hypotonic systems	Diffractometric measurements of the volume relationships-tonicity of human red blood cells in hypotonic systems.
4	cation exchange in mammalian erythrocytes iii the prolytic effect of x rays on human cells	L' cation exchange in mammalian erythrocytes iii l' prolytic effect of X-rays on human cells.
4	electron microscope study of red cell membranes after experimental infection with the virus of foot and mouth disease	Electron microscopic study of the erythrocyte membranes after experimental infection with the FMD virus.
4	accumulation of potassium by human red cells	Acute accumulation of potassium by human red blood cells.
4	permeability properties of erythrocyte ghosts	Uh, permeability properties of erythrocyte ghosts.
4	an analytical study of in vivo survival of limited populations of animal red blood cells tagged with radio iron	An analytical study of the in vivo survival of limited populations of red blood cells; animals labeled with radioactive iron.
4	the sorption of influenza virus by chicken erythrocytes	Sorption of influenza virus by chicken erythrocytes.
4	quantitative aspects of the spontaneous elution of influenza virus from red cells	Quantitative aspects of the apo; spontaneous elution of influenza virus from red blood cells.
4	the incorporation of n15 glycine by avian erythrocytes and reticulocytes in vitro	Glycine n15 incorporation into avian erythrocytes and reticulocytes in vitro.
4	the specific heat of red cells with special reference to the paracrystalline rat red cell	The specific heat of red blood cells, especially paracrystalline rat red blood cells.
4	volume changes ion exchanges and fragilities of human red cells in solutions of the chlorides of the alkaline earths	The volume modifies the exchange of ions and the fragility of human red blood cells in solutions of alkaline chlorides.
4	the specific heat and the heat of compression of human red cells sickled red cells and paracrystalline rat red cells	The specific heat and heat of compression of human red blood cells damaged red and red blood cells of paracrystalline rats.
4	serological behaviour of influenza viruses i the effect of different fowl erythrocytes on the results of serological tests	Serological behaviour of viruses; influenza infection; effect of different erythrocytes; birds on the results of serological tests.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes i description of method	Method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes i description of the method.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes ii use of the method in the diagnosis of tuberculosis	A method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes ii use of the method in the diagnosis of tuberculosis.
4	the variation in the corpuscular hemoglobin concentration in the human red cell as measured by densitometry	The variation of the concentration of d' corpuscular hemoglobin in the human red blood cells as measured by densitometry.
4	entrance of water into human red cells under an osmotic pressure gradient	Entering water into human red blood cells under an osmotic pressure gradient.
4	the rate of exchange of tritiated water across the human red cell membrane	Dapos level; epos exchange; tritiated water across the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	uphill transport induced by counterflow	It acts as a d' ascending transport, on the other hand, is induced by the current @-@.
4	the birefringence of the human red cell ghosts	The birefringence of human red cell ghosts.
4	iron particles in normal erythroblasts and normal and pathological erythrocytes	Iron particles in normal erythroblasts and normal and pathological erythrocytes.
4	effect of antibody and complement on permeability control in ascites tumor cells and erythrocytes	Effect of antibody and complement on permeability control in ascitic tumor cells and erythrocytes.
4	studies on the hemolysis of red blood cells by mumps virus iv quantitative study of changes in red blood cell lipides and of virus lipides	Studies on apos; hemolysis of red blood cells by mumps virus iv Quantitative study of changes in red blood cell and viral lipid lipids.
4	physiological characteristics of human red blood cell ghosts	Physiological characteristics of human red blood cell ghosts.
4	the rate of uptake of carbon monoxide and of nitric oxide by normal human erythrocytes and experimentally produced spherocytes	The rate of nitrogen uptake by normal human erythrocytes and experimentally produced spherocytes; absorption of carbon monoxide and carbon monoxide.
4	studies in histochemistry lvii determination of the total dry mass of human erythrocytes by interference microscopy and x ray microradiography	Histochemical studies Lvii determination of the total dry mass of human erythrocytes by interference microscopy and X-ray microradiography.
4	determination of equivalent pore radius for human red cells by osmotic pressure measurement	Determination of the equivalent interstitial radius for human red cells by osmotic pressure measurement.
4	efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Absorption and influx of erythrocyte water.
4	selective phagocytosis of nucleated erythrocytes by cytotoxic amebae in cell culture	Selective phagocytosis of nucleated erythrocytes by cytotoxic amoebae in cell culture.
4	efflux of red cell water into buffered hypertonic solutions	Efflux of apo; erythrocyte water in buffered hypertonic solutions.
4	hereditary elliptocytosis in two maltese families	Hereditary Elliptocytosis in two families in Malta.
4	the cation content of phospholipides from swine erythrocytes	The cation content of the pig erythrocyte phospholipids.
4	the entrance of water into beef and dog red cells	L' entry of water into beef and dog red blood cells.
4	the electrophoretic velocity of human red cells of their ghosts and mechanically produced fragments and of certain lipid complexes	The electrophoretic velocity of human red blood cells of phantoms and mechanically produced fragments and of certain lipid complexes.
4	a d like antigen in rhesus red blood cells and in rh positive and rh negative red cells	An antigen similar to d in rhesus red blood cells and in rh positive and rh negative red blood cells.
4	a critical evaluation of red cell and plasma volume techniques in patients with burns	A critical evaluation of globular and plasma volume techniques in patients suffering from burns.
4	inhibition of red cell sequestration by cortisone	L' inhibition of red cell sequestration by cortisone.
4	shape and volume changes in frog erythrocytes following ultraviolet radiation	Changes in shape and volume in frog erythrocytes following ultraviolet radiation.
4	structure in nucleated erythrocytes	The structure of the erythrocytes nucleated.
4	the physics of blood flow in capillaries iii the pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose	Physics of blood flow in capillaries iii the pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose.
4	effects of silicate polymers on erythrocytes in presence and absence of complement	The effects of silicate polymers on erythrocytes in the presence and absence of complement.
4	the surface of the washed human erythrocyte as a polyanion	The surface of the washed polyanion-like human erythrocyte.
4	an electron microscopic study of erythrophagocytosis	An electron microscopic study of erythrophagocytosis.
4	the apparent molecular weight of myelin forms prepared from normal red cells and some of its variations	The apparent molecular weight of myelin is formed from normal red cells and some of their variations.
4	extracellular and metabolic factors affecting the efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Extracellular and metabolic factors affecting the immune system; efflux and apo; efflux; erythrocyte water.
4	observations on the development of erythrocytes in mammalian fetal liver	Observations on the development of erythrocytes in mammalian fetal liver.
4	new genetically determined molecular form of erythrocyte esterase in man	New genetically determined molecular form of erythrocyte esterase in humans.
4	the influence of ph and ionic strength on the electrokinetic stability of the human erythrocyte membrane	The influence of ph and ionic strength on the electrokinetic stability of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the viscosity of erythrocyte suspensions a review of theory	The theory of the viscosity of erythrocyte suspensions is reviewed.
4	erythrocyte automosaicism in some persons of known genotype	Self-induced erythrocyte injury in some people with known genotypes.
4	the life span of erythrocytes in iron deficiency anaemia	The life span of erythrocytes in iron-deficiency anemia.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and detoxification of hydrogen peroxide in human erythrocytes	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and detoxification of hydrogen peroxide in human erythrocytes.
4	variations in the lactic dehydrogenase of vertebrate erythrocytes	Changes in the lactic dehydrogenase of vertebrate erythrocytes.
4	preparation of an inhibitor of viral hemagglutination from human erythrocytes	Preparation of apo; an inhibitor of apo; viral hemagglutination of human erythrocytes.
4	lactic dehydrogenase genetic control in man	The genetic control of lactic dehydrogenase in humans.
4	erythrocyte acid phosphomonesterase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in caucasians	Red cell acid phosphomonesterase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in caucasians.
4	studies on the mode of action of excess of vitamin a vii changes in the fine structure of erythrocytes during haemolysis by vitamin a	Studies on the mode of action of excess vitamin avi modify the fine structure of erythrocytes during apo, and vitamin ai hemolysis.
4	the variation in the structure of erythrocyte nuclei with fixation	The variation in the structure of the fixed erythrocyte nuclei.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane i membrane stiffness and intracellular pressure	The mechanical properties of red cell i-membrane stiffness and intracellular pressure.
4	interaction of mercury with human erythrocytes	Interaction of mercury with human erythrocytes.
4	reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethylsulfoxide from large volumes of frozen blood	Reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethylsulfoxide from large volumes of frozen blood.
4	the action of enzymes from clostridium tertium on the i antigenic determinant of human erythrocytes	L' action of the enzymes of clostridium tertium on the antigenic determinant i of human erythrocytes.
4	studies on lysosomes iii the effects of streptolysins o and s on the release of acid hydrolases from a granular fraction of rabbit liver	Studies on lysosomes iii, the effects of streptolysins o and s on the release of acidic d&apos hydrolases, a granular fraction of rabbit liver.
4	motion picture studies on degranulation of horse eosinophils during phagocytosis	Cinematographic studies on degranulation of horse eosinophils during phagocytosis.
4	relationship of erythrocyte to leukocyte antigens in chickens	Ratio of erythrocyte to leukocyte antigens in chickens.
4	reticulocyte release factor	The reticulocyte release factor.
4	the estimation of red cell volume with 51cr labelled erythrocytes and plasma volume with radioiodinated human serum albumin	Estimation of red blood cell volume with 51cr labelled erythrocytes and plasma volume with radioiodinated human serum albumin.
4	chromosome fibers from an interphase nucleus	Chromosome fibers from d' an interphase nucleus.
4	the thalassaemia trait in an english family	The thalassemia trait in an English family.
4	thalassaemia in scots	Thalassemia in Scots.
4	the chemical constitution of compounds which protect erythrocytes against freezing damage	The chemical composition of compounds which protect erythrocytes from frost damage.
4	phase separation in suspensions flowing through bifurcations a simplified hemodynamic model	Phase separation in suspensions circulating through bifurcations a simplified hemodynamic model.
4	the assay of galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase activity in human erythrocytes a presumed test for heterozygous carriers of the galactosemic defect	Lapos; galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase activity in human erythrocytes is a putative test for heterozygous carriers of the galactosemic defect.
4	phospholipid sugar complexes in relation to cell membrane monosaccharide transport	The phospholipid sugar complexes in relation to cellular membrane monosaccharide transport.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin i kinetics of the lytic reaction	Hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha-I toxin from the lytic reaction.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin ii effects of inhibitors on the hemolytic sequence	Hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin ii effects of inhibitors on the hemolytic sequence.
4	erythrocytes 5 adenylic acid deaminase requirement for ammonia or monovalent metal ion	Errythrocytes 5 adenylate deaminase required for ammonia or lutein; monovalent metal ion.
4	angiotensinase with a high degree of specificity in plasma and red cells	Very specific angiotensinase in plasma and red blood cells.
4	actinomycin d effect on the immune response	The effect of actinomycin d on the immune response.
4	urea apparent carrier mediated transport by facilitated diffusion in dogfish erythrocytes	An apparent transporter, urea, facilitated transport by facilitating diffusion into dogfish erythrocytes.
4	galactosidase action on human blood group b active escherichia coli and on red cell substances	Galactosidase action on human blood type b Escherichia coli active and on erythrocytes.
4	kinetics of water loss from cells at subzero temperatures and the likelihood of intracellular freezing	The kinetics of cell water loss at subzero temperatures and the likelihood of intracellular freezing.
4	phagocytosis in normal and anaemic blood	Both phagocytosis in normal and anemic blood.
4	application of a localized hemolysin reaction for specific detection of individual antibody forming cells	Application of a localized apos reaction; hemolysin for specific detection of individual antibody-forming cells.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in caucasians new inherited variant	The erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in caucasians is a novel heritable variant.
4	sulfate transport in human red cells inhibition by some uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation	Sulfate transport in human erythrocytes was inhibited by some uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation.
4	acid phosphatases of human red cells predicted phenotype conforms to a genetic hypothesis	Predicted acid phosphatases of human erythrocytes conform to a genetic hypothesis.
4	inhibition of specific binding of antibody to the rho d factor of red cells in antibody excess	Inhibition of specific binding of apos; antibody to rho-factor of red cells in the apos; excess of apos; antibody.
4	two cases of thrombohaemolytic thrombocytopenic purpura associated with changes in red cell morphology	Two cases of thrombocytopenic, thrombocytopenic, thrombocytopenic purpura associated with changes in red cell morphology.
4	measurements of some cellular changes during the fixation of amphibian erythrocytes with osmium tetroxide solutions	Measurement of certain cellular changes during the fixation of apos; erythrocytes; amphibians with osmium tetroxide solutions.
4	antiserum to leucocyte lysosomes its cytotoxic granulolytic and hemolytic activities	Antiserum to leukocyte lysosomes, its cytotoxic granulolytic and hemolytic activities.
4	water permeability of the fetal erythrocyte	Permeability of fetal erythrocyte (FE) water.
4	estimation of the life span of red blood cells	Estimation of the lifespan of red blood cells.
4	the occurrence and possible significance of haemoglobin in the chromosomal regions of mature erythrocyte nuclei of the newt triturus cristatus cristatus	Presence and absence of hemoglobin in the chromosomal regions of mature erythrocyte nuclei of triturus cristatus cristatus in triturus triturus cristatus.
4	the role of temperate bacteriophage in the production of erythrogenic toxin by group a streptococci	The role of temperate bacteriophage in the production of erythrogenic toxin by streptococci.
4	preservation of antigen coated sheep erythrocytes by freezing for use in indirect hemagglutination procedure	Preservation of sheep erythrocytes coated with apos; antigen by freezing for apos; indirect hemagglutination.
4	a rapid micro method for recording red cell osmotic fragility by continuous decrease of salt concentration	Micro-rapid method; recording osmotic fragility of red blood cells by continuous decrease in saline concentration.
4	histone and dna in isolated nuclei from chicken brain liver and erythrocytes	Histone and DNA in isolated nuclei from chicken liver and chicken erythrocytes.
4	a micro gel precipitin reaction for hashimoto s thyroiditis	A precipitin microgel reaction for hashimoto s thyroiditis.
4	inherited variant of erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase in micronesians from guam and saipan	Erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase in micronesians from guam and saipan.
4	osmotic properties of human red cells	The osmotic properties of human red blood cells.
4	uric acid transport system apparent absence in erythrocytes of the dalmatian coach hound	The l' uric acid transport system appears to be absent in erythrocytes of car body dalmatian dogs.
4	human erythrocyte lactate dehydrogenase 4 genetically determined variants	Genetically determined human erythrocyte lactate dehydrogenase 4 variants.
4	mosaic hemoglobin types in a pair of cattle twins	Hemoglobin mosaic types in a pair of twin cattle.
4	staphylococcal alpha hemolysin detection on the erythrocyte membrane by immunofluorescence	Staphylococcal alpha hemolysin detection on the erythrocyte membrane by immunofluorescence.
4	function of the reticuloendothelial system i a study on the phenomenon of carbon clearance inhibition	Function of the reticuloendothelial system i a study of the phenomenon of leakage; carbon clearance inhibition.
4	the measurement of antibody in human malaria by a formolized tanned sheep cell haemagglutination test	Measurement of antibodies in human malaria by a hemagglutination test of formalized tanned sheep cells.
4	observations on the resistance in hb e thalassaemia disease to induced infection with plasmodium vivax	Observations on the resistance of thalassemia to apos; infection induced by plasmodium vivax.
4	oxime reactivation of erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited by ethyl p nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate	Reactivation with apos; oxime of erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited by apos; ethyl p-nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate.
4	studies on the oxidation reduction systems of the erythrocyte	Studies of the reduction systems of l'apos; oxidation of red blood cells.
4	active transport and enzymes of the erythrocyte membrane under protein deprivation	The active transport and enzymes of the erythrocyte membrane are deprived of protein.
4	iron kinetics and erythron development	Iron kinetics and erythron development.
4	m ssbauer effect in hemoglobin and some iron containing biological compounds	Ssbauer effect in hemoglobin and some iron-containing biological compounds.
4	the laser as a potential tool for cell research	The laser as a potential tool for cell research.
4	the nature of bands in parasitized bovine erythrocytes	The nature of bands in parasitized bovine erythrocytes.
4	the distribution of parenteral iron haematinics in nonpregnant pregnant and lactating rats	The distribution of parenteral iron haematinics in non-@ pregnant rats and lactating rats.
4	sex linkage of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the horse and donkey	Sexual connection of the glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the horse and l' donkey.
4	enzymatic release of folate activity from the red cells in megaloblastic anaemia of pregnancy	Enzymatic release of the apos; activity of folate by the red cells in the apos; megaloblastic anemia of the pregnancy.
4	sex linkage of erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in two species of wild hares	Sex linkage of erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in two species of wild hares.
4	nucleoside phosphatases of fetal and maternal blood cells electron microscope study	The nucleoside phosphatases of fetal and maternal blood cells were studied by electron microscopy.
4	complement fixation on cell surfaces by 19s and 7s antibodies	Supplement binding to cell surfaces by 19s and 7s antibodies.
4	electronic separation of biological cells by volume	The electronic separation of biological cells by volume.
4	erythrocyte sensitization by blood group specific bacterial antigens	Erythrocyte sensitization by blood group specific bacterial antigens.
4	the intracellular localization of heme by a fluorescence technique	The intracellular localization of the apos; heme by a fluorescence technique.
4	the cell generation cycle of the eleven day mouse embryo	The cell generation cycle of the 11-day-old mouse embryo.
4	an investigation by electron microscopy of the nucleoside phosphatase activity of amphibian and mammalian erythrocytes	An electron microscopic study of the apos, nucleoside phosphatase activity of amphibian and mammalian erythrocytes.
4	polymorphism of human lactate dehydrogenase isozymes	Isozyme polymorphism in human lactate dehydrogenase.
4	electrophoresis of hemoglobin in single erythrocytes	L'apos; electrophoresis of the apos; hemoglobin in simple erythrocytes.
4	method of assay of red cell folate activity and the value of the assay as a test for folate deficiency	Procedure; test for apo; erythrocyte folate activity and apo values; test as folate deficiency test.
4	structural aspects of human erythrocyte autoantibodies i l chain types and electrophoretic dispersion	Structural aspects of human erythrocyte antibodies, chain types and electrophoretic scattering.
4	bilirubin acute effects in newborn rhesus monkeys	Acute bilirubin effects in newborn rhesus monkeys-born.
4	hemolysin of mycoplasma pneumoniae tentative identification as a peroxide	Hemolysin from mycoplasma pneumoniae tentatively identified as a peroxide.
4	the state of hemoglobin in sickled erythrocytes	L'apos; state of l'apos; hemoglobin in falsified erythrocytes.
4	purification of staphylococcal beta hemolysin and its action on staphylococcal and streptococcal cell walls	Purification of staphylococcal hemolysin beta and its action on staphylococcal and streptococcal cell walls.
4	nicotinamide nucleotides in the erythrocytes of patients suffering from pellagra	Nicotinamide nucleotides in the erythrocytes of patients with pellagra.
4	the effect of lead on the fragility of the red cell incubated in vitro	The effect of lead on the fragility of the red blood cells when incubated in vitro.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane ii viscoelastic breakdown of the membrane	Mechanical properties of the erythrocyte membrane ii viscoelastic degradation of the membrane.
4	an antibody against stored blood associated with cirrhosis of the liver and false positive serological tests for syphilis	An antibody to stored blood associated with cirrhosis of the liver and false-positive serological tests for syphilis.
4	blood flow in the microvasculature of the conjunctiva of man	It's called blood flow in the microvasculature of the conjunctiva of men.
4	the kinetics of inhibition of erythrocyte cholinesterase by monomethylcarbamates	Kinetics of apos; inhibition of erythrocyte cholinesterase by monomethylcarbamates.
4	plasma membranes phospholipid and sterol content	Plasma membrane phospholipid and sterol content.
4	immune lysis of normal human and paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria pnh red blood cells 3 the membrane defects caused by complement lysis	Immune lysis of the apos; normal and paroxysmal erythrocyte human nocturnal hemoglobinuria pnh 3 membrane defects caused by the complementary lysis.
4	protein conformations in the plasma membrane	Protein conformations in the plasma membrane.
4	competition of haptens	Contest of hapten.
4	congenital non spherocytic hemolytic anemia	Congenital hemolytic anemia that is not spherocytic.
4	antibodies affecting metabolism of chicken erythrocytes examination of schizophrenic and other subjects	Antibody affecting metabolism of chicken erythrocytes Examination of schizophrenics and d' other subjects.
4	the effect of size of red cells on the kinetics of their oxygen uptake	L' effect of red cell size on the kinetics of their oxygen consumption.
4	homoreactant a naturally occurring autoantibody in rabbits	Homoreactor, a self-help auto-natural antibodies in rabbits.
4	separation and properties of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	Dapos separation and properties, a red cell sensitizing substance of streptococci.
4	nature of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	Nature of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococcus.
4	serological studies of types a b and e botulinal toxins by passive hemagglutination and bentonite flocculation	Serological studies of type a b and e botulinum toxins by passive hemagglutination and bentonite flocculation.
4	heterogenetic antigens of gram positive bacteria	Heterogenetic antigens of gram-positive bacteria.
4	a colorimetric micro method for the determination of glutathione	A micro@-@ colorimetric method for the determination of glutathione.
4	effect of oxidized glutathione on some enzymes of erythrocytes and its relation to erythrocytic enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility	Effect of oxidized glutathione on certain enzymes of erythrocytes and its relation to l' erythrocyte enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility.
4	the nature of transcapillary exchange in the liver	The nature of transcapillary exchange in the liver.
4	the mode of inhibition by calcium of cell membrane adenosine triphosphatase activity	The mode of cell membrane adenosine triphosphatase activity and calcium inhibition.
4	plasma trapping in the centrifuged red cells of children with severe thalassaemia	Plasma trapping in the centrifuged red blood cells of children with severe thalassemia.
4	transient holes in the erythrocyte membrane during hypotonic hemolysis and stable holes in the membrane after lysis by saponin and lysolecithin	Transient holes in the erythrocyte membrane during hypotonic hemolysis and stable holes in the membrane after lysis by saponin and lysolecithin.
4	heme stimulation of globin synthesis in a cell free system	Heme stimulation of globin synthesis in a free cell system.
4	control of haem synthesis by feedback inhibition on human erythrocyte delta aminolaevulate dehydratase	Control of hematoma synthesis by feedback inhibition of human erythrocyte dehydratase delta aminolaevulate.
4	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 7s antibody synthesis	Antibody synthesis at the cellular level induced suppression of 7s antibody synthesis.
4	the production of erythrocyte autoantibodies in chimpanzees	The production of auto-erythrocyte antibodies in chimpanzees and chimpanzees.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes i plaque forming cell and antibody response to single and multiple injections of antigen	The mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to plate-forming sheep erythrocytes and antibody response to single and multiple injections of antigen.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes ii the plaque forming cell and antibody response to multiple injections of antigen begun at birth	The mechanism of tolerance produced in the rat to sheep erythrocytes ii plaque-forming cells and antibodies response to multiple injections of antigen etapos began at birth.
4	cimulative hemagglutination by mycoplasma pneumoniae and other agglutinins	Cemulative hemagglutination by pneumoniae and d' other agglutinins.
4	the fine structure of plasmodium falciparum and its host erythrocytes in natural malarial infections in man	The fine structure of plasmodium falciparum and its host erythrocytes in natural palaean infections in men.
4	studies of cellular proliferation in human leukemia i estimation of growth rates of leukemic and normal hematopoietic cells in two adults with acute leukemia given single injections of tritiated thymidine	Studies of cell proliferation in human leukemia he estimated growth rates of leukemic and normal hematopoietic cells in two adults with acute leukemia who received single injections of tritiated thymidine.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in erythrocytes of experimental animals	L' glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in erythrocytes of laboratory animals.
4	skin grafts delayed rejection between pairs of cattle twins showing erythrocyte chimerism	The skin grafts delayed rejection between pairs of bovine twins showing erythrocyte chimerism.
4	anaphylatoxin in its relation to the complement system	Anaphylatoxin in relation to the complementary system.
4	autoxidation as a cause of altered lipid distribution in extracts from human red cells	L' autoxidation as cause of apo; altered lipid distribution in extracts from human red blood cells.
4	microincision of sickled erythrocytes by a laser beam	Lapos microincision; deformed erythrocytes by a laser beam.
4	glutathione reductase in red blood cells variant associated with gout	Glutathione reductase in erythrocytes is a variant associated with gout.
4	light chain heterogeneity of cold agglutinins	Light chain heterogeneity of cold agglutinins.
4	the inhibitory effect of heme on heme formation in vivo possible mechanism for the regulation of hemoglobin synthesis	In vivo heme could be a mechanism for the regulation of the synthesis of apos; hemoglobin.
4	erythrocyte abnormality in human myopathy	An abnormal erythrocyte in human myopathy.
4	metabolism of doubly labeled chylomicron cholesteryl esters in the rat	Metabolism of doubly labeled cholesteryl esters of chylomicrons in the rat.
4	heterophile reactive antigen in infectious mononucleosis	Heterophilic reactive antigen in infectious mononucleosis.
4	hydroxyethyl starch extracellular cryophylactic agent for erythrocytes	Erythrocyte hydroxyethyl starch extracellular cryophylactic agent.
4	globin composition and synthesis of hemoglobins in developing fetal mice erythroid cells	Composition of globins and synthesis of hemoglobins in erythroid cells of developing fetal mice.
4	red cell slip at a wall in vitro	Glide red blood cells to a wall in vitro.
4	studies on the nonspecific depression of the immune response	Studies on non-specific depression of the immune response.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes association of type ii with fetal hemoglobin	Hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes association type ii with fetal hemoglobin.
4	adjuvant activity of erythrocyte isoantigens	Adjuvant activity of erythrocyte isoantigen.
4	malaria infection plasmodium iophurae changes in free amino acids	Infection palustre plasmodium iophurae changes in free amino acids.
4	peroxidative hemolysis of red blood cells from patients with abetalipoproteinemia acanthocytosis	Peroxidative hemolysis of red blood cells in patients with apo-acanthocytosis; abetalipoproteinemia.
4	quantitative determination of the neutral glycosyl ceramides in human blood	Quantitative determination of neutral glycosyl ceramides in human blood.
4	composition of phospholipids and of phospholipid fatty acids and aldehydes in human red cells	The composition of phospholipids, phospholipid fatty acids and aldehydes in human red blood cells.
4	the production of carbon monoxide from hemoglobin in vivo	Production of carbon monoxide from hemoglobin in vivo.
4	fixed charge in the cell membrane	A fixed charge in the cell membrane.
4	the volume of vascular compartment in rat hind limb muscles	Volume of the vascular compartment in rat hind limb muscles.
4	erythrocyte transfer rna change during chick development	Change of erythrocyte transfer during chick development.
4	the diffraction pattern of dry blood smears	Diffraction pattern of dry blood smears.
4	serum red cell interactions at low ionic strength erythrocyte complement coating and hemolysis of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	Serum erythrocyte interactions at low ionic strength complete the coating and l' hemolysis of paroxysmal cells of l' nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	fatty acid transport and incorporation into human erythrocytes in vitro	Fatty acid incorporation into human erythrocytes in vitro.
4	distribution of chylomicrons and albumin in dog kidney	Distribution of chylomicrons and d' albumin in dog kidney.
4	erythrocyte energy metabolism in hereditary spherocytosis	Energetic erythrocyte metabolism in hereditary spherocytosis.
4	surface area of human erythrocyte lipids reinvestigation of experiments on plasma membrane	The surface of human erythrocyte lipids reexamined plasma membrane experiments.
4	chains of particles in shear flow	Particle chains in the chain; shear flow of the tailings; flow of the tailings; air.
4	red cells and rouleaux in shear flow	Red blood cells and rollers in shear flow.
4	the influence of antibodies on immunologic responses i the effect on the response to particulate antigen in the rabbit	L' influence of antibodies on immunological responses; effect on response to apos; particulate antigen in the rabbit.
4	the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in the mouse i a study of the immunological events utilizing the plaque technique	The immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mice i a study of the immunological events using the plaque technique.
4	relationships of x irradiation to the enhancement of candida albicans infections	Relationships between radiation and disease; increase in infections of albicans candida.
4	effect of ph on inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of acetylcholinesterase treated with esters of phosphorus acids and of carbamic acids	Effect of ph on the inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of acetylcholinesterase treated with phosphate and phosphate esters and carbamic acids.
4	studies on pneumonia virus of mice pvm in cell culture ii structure and morphogenesis of the virus particle	Studies of pneumonia virus in pvm mice in cell culture ii structure and morphogenesis of the virus particle.
4	the influence of erythrophagocytosis on the interaction of macrophages and salmonella in vitro	L' influence of apos; erythrophagocytosis on apos; interaction of macrophages and salmonella in vitro.
4	the effect of prefixation on the diameter of chromosome fibers isolated by the langmuir trough critical point method	L' effect of prefixing on the diameter of chromosomal fibers isolated by the critical point method of langmuir depression.
4	pinocytotic response of circulating erythrocytes to specific blood grouping antibodies	Pinocytotic reaction of circulating erythrocytes to specific blood grouping antibodies.
4	the ultrastructural basis of capillary permeability studied with peroxidase as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of capillary permeability was studied with peroxidase as a tracer.
4	the mechanism of denucleation in circulating erythroblasts	The mechanism of denucleation in circulating erythroblasts.
4	three cases of hemolytic anemia with erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency in alberta	Three cases of hemolytic anemia with erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency in Alberta.
4	studies of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria erythrocytes increased lysis and lipid peroxide formation by hydrogen peroxide	Studies of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria of erythrocytes increase lysis and lipid peroxide formation by hydrogen peroxide.
4	glutathione deficiency in sheep erythrocytes	Acute glutathione deficiency in sheep erythrocytes.
4	use of formalinized mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens and chicken erythrocytes in hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition studies	Use of formalized mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens and chicken erythrocytes in ectomycorrhizal and ectomycorrhizal studies; inhibition of apos; hemagglutination and apos; hemagglutination.
4	selective solubilization of a protein component of the red cell membrane	Selective solubilization of apos; a protein component of the erythrocyte membrane.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes	Hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes.
4	immunoglobulins in nzb bl mice i serum immunoglobulin levels and immunoglobulin class of erythrocyte autoantibody	Immunoglobulins in nzb bl mice i serum immunoglobulin levels and immunoglobulin class of erythrocyte autoantibody.
4	interferon production by chick erythrocytes activated by cell fusion	D&apos production; interferon by chicken erythrocytes activated by cell fusion.
4	esters of serine and threonine in hydrolysates of histones and protamines and attendant errors in amino acid analyses of proteins	Serine and threonine esters in hydrolysates of histones and protamines and the corresponding errors in apos; amino acid analysis of proteins.
4	agglutinating specificity for lw factor in guinea pig and rabbit anti rh serums	Agglutinating specificity for lw factor in guinea pig and rabbit anti @-@rh sera.
4	fire ant venom synthesis of a reported component of solenamine	Fire ant venom synthesis d'apos; a known component of solenamine.
4	mutarotase in erythrocytes isolation and properties	Mutarotase in erythrocytes isolation and properties.
4	heterogeneity of rabbit igm antibody as detected by c 1a fixation	Heterogeneity of the apos; igmic antibodies of rabbit as detected by c 1a binding.
4	studies of red cell stromal proteins in tay sachs disease	Studies of erythrocyte stromal proteins in the Tay Sachs disease.
4	an inherited molecular lesion of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase identification of a kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis	An inherited molecular lesion of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase identifies a kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis.
4	effect of hemorrhage and retransfusion on intrarenal distribution of blood flow in dogs	Effect of hemorrhage and reflux on the intrarenal distribution of blood flow in dogs.
4	heterophile antibodies in human transplantation	Anti-heterophilic antibodies in human graft.
4	studies on manganese 3 the biological half life of radiomanganese in man and factors which affect this half life	Studies on manganese 3 the half-biological life of radiomanganese in humans and factors affecting this half-life.
4	disproportional synthesis of the adult duck s two hemoglobins during acute anemia	Non-proportional synthesis of the two adult duck hemoglobins during acute anemia.
4	the interaction of triethyltin with components of animal tissues	L' interaction of triethyltin with constituents of animal tissue.
4	control of lecithin biosynthesis in erythrocyte membranes	The control of lecithin biosynthesis in erythrocyte membranes.
4	the adenylate kinase of human plasma erythrocytes and platelets in relation to the degradation of adenosine diphosphate in plasma	L' adenylate kinase of human erythrocytes and plasma platelets in relation to the degradation of l' adenosine diphosphate in plasma.
4	degradation of glycerophosphatides during storage of saline washed saline suspended red cells at 20 degrees c	Degradation of glycerophosphatides during storage of suspended red blood cells in a saline solution washed at 20 degrees c.
4	glucose and glycogen metabolism in erythrocytes from normal and glycogen storage disease type iii subjects	Glucose and glycogen metabolism in erythrocytes of normal subjects and subjects with glycogen-related diabetes mellitus.
4	hereditary nonspherocytic hemolytic disease associated with an altered phospholipid composition of the erythrocytes	Hereditary non-spherocytic hemolytic pathology associated with altered phospholipid composition of erythrocytes.
4	hereditary sideroblastic anemia and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in a negro family	Hereditary sideroblastic anemia and glucose deficiency 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in a black family.
4	screening lead workers for the presence of stippled erythrocytes	Screening for the presence of erythrocytes in primary care workers.
4	comparison of three simple methods for the assessment of free thyroid hormone	Comparison of three simple methods for the evaluation of free thyroid hormones.
4	osmotic resistance of heat damaged erythrocytes	Well, osmotic resistance to heat damaged the erythrocytes.
4	new method for detecting changes in the surface appearance of human red blood cells	New method for detecting changes in the surface appearance of human red blood cells.
4	dna protein binding in interphase chromosomes	DNA protein binding in interphase chromosomes.
4	the effect of the unstirred layer on human red cell water permeability	L' effect of the stationary layer on human red blood cell permeability.
4	1 2 3 h cholesterol as a tracer in studies of human cholesterol metabolism	There are 12.3 hours of cholesterol as a tracer in studies of cholesterol metabolism in humans.
4	hypersensitivity specific immunologic suppression of the delayed type	Specific immunological suppression; hypersensitivity of the delayed type.
4	effect of cell age on erythrocyte fatty acid composition in rats on different dietary regimes	Cell age; effect of apo on erythrocyte fatty acid composition in rats fed different diets.
4	hyaline cast formation in patients treated with cephaloridine	Hyaline cast formation in patients treated with cephaloridine.
4	heaptic glutathione concentrations linked to ethionine toxicity in rats	Hepatic glutathione concentrations associated with oral ethionine toxicity in rat.
4	the influence of conjugation of cholic acid on its uptake and secretion hepatic extraction of taurocholate and cholate in the dog	L' influence of conjugation of l' cholic acid on its uptake and secretion; hepatic extraction of taurocholate and cholate in dogs.
4	analysis of fatty acids of human red cells without lipid extraction	Analysis of the fatty acids of human red blood cells without extraction of the lipids.
4	phylogenetic origins of antibody structure 3 antibodies in the primary immune response of the sea lamprey petromyzon marinus	Phylogenetic origin of the structural 3 antibodies in the primary immune response of the sea lamprey Petromyzon marinus.
4	the subunits in rabbit anti forssman igm antibody	Subs-units in the apos; anti igm antibodies rabbit forssman.
4	folate status throughout pregnancy and in postpartum period	Folate status throughout pregnancy and period post-partum.
4	differences between brucella antigens involved in indirect hemagglutination tests with normal and tanned red blood cells	Differences between the brucella antigens involved in indirect hemagglutination with normal and tanned red blood cells.
4	phospholipid exchange between plasma and erythrocytes in man and the dog	Exchange of phospholipids between plasma and erythrocytes in man and dog.
4	bile salts and cholesterol in the pathogenesis of target cells in obstructive jaundice	Bile salt and cholesterol in the pathogenesis of target cells in jaundice.
4	in vivo lability of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in gda and gdmediterranean deficiency	In vivo suitability of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in gda and gditerranea deficiencies.
4	the haemolytic effect of various regimens of primaquine with chloroquine in american negroes with g6pd deficiency and the lack of an effect of various antimalarial suppressive agents on erythrocyte metabolism	L' hemolytic effect of various diets of primaquine with chloroquine in American blacks with deficiency of g6pd and l' absence of apos; effect of various antimalarial suppressants on erythrocyte metabolism.
4	oxygenation and ion transport in red cells	Both oxygenation and ion transport in red blood cells.
4	the physical state of hemoglobin in sickle cell anemia erythrocytes in vivo	L'apos; physical state of apos; hemoglobin in erythrocytes with apos; sickle cell anemia in vivo.
4	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with artificial and natural membranes	Interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with artificial and natural membranes.
4	an electron microscopic study of nuclear elimination from the late erythroblast	An electron microscopic study of nuclear elimination of late erythroblasts.
4	dna synthesis and mitosis in erythropoietic cells	DNA synthesis and mitosis in erythropoietic cells.
4	chronic hemolytic anemia due to cold agglutinins the mechanism of resistance of red cells to c hemolysis by cold agglutinins	Chronic hemolytic anemia due to cold agglutinins, the mechanism of resistance of red blood cells to apos; hemolysis c by cold agglutinins.
4	heterogeneity of antibody response to salmonella lipopolysaccharide measured by passive hemagglutination and hemolysis in mice	Heterogeneity of the immune response to Salmonella lipopolysaccharide measured by passive hemagglutination and hemolysis in mice.
4	plasma 3s gamma 1 globulin identity with erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase b	Plasma gamma 1 globulin 3s identity with erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase b.
4	thermal studies of the rates of the reactions of carbon dioxide in concentrated haemoglobin solutions and in red blood cells a the reactions catalysed by carbonic anhydrase b the carbamino reactions of oxygenated and deoxygenated haemoglobin	Thermal studies of the rates of reaction of carbon dioxide in concentrated solutions of d' hemoglobin and red blood cells in reactions catalyzed by l' carbonic anhydrase b the carbamino reactions of l' oxygenated and deoxygenated hemoglobin.
4	hemoglobin cc disease rheological properties or erythrocytes and abnormalities in cell water	The rheological properties of CSD; hemoglobin or erythrocytes and abnormalities of cellular water.
4	everest ms measurement of digoxin in plasma and its use in diagnosis of digoxin intoxication	Ms. Everest measures digoxin in plasma and its use in diagnosis of digoxin intoxication.
4	polycythaemia in coal miners with chronic lung disease	Polycythaemia in coal mining workers with chronic lung disease.
4	role of erythrocytes in the acute platelet response to operation	The role of erythrocytes in the acute platelet response to apos; operation.
4	lactate dehydrogenase electrophoretic variant in a new guinea highland population	Lactate dehydrogenase electrophoretic variant in a new population in the Guinean highlands.
4	stages in the incorporation of fatty acids into red blood cells	Steps to recovery; incorporation of fatty acids into red blood cells.
4	separation and characterization of soluble adenovirus type 9 components	Separation and characterization of soluble adenovirus type 9 components.
4	steady state hemoglobin facilitated o2 transport in human erythrocytes	Lapos; hemoglobin at apos; state of repair; balance facilitated oxygen transport in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of frusemide lactose and urea on urinary cell loss	The effect of frusemide lactose and urea on urinary cell loss.
4	maximal erythrocyte and hemoglobin catabolism	Maximum erythrocyte and haemoglobin catabolism.
4	the thymus and recovery of the sheep erythrocyte response in irradiated mice	Thymus and recovery of the sheep erythrocyte response in irradiated mice.
4	plasmodium falciparum phagocytosis by polymorphonuclear leukocytes	P. falciparum phagocytosis by polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
4	red blood cells why or why not	Well, red blood cells, why not?
4	rheological comparison of hemoglobin solutions and erythrocyte suspensions	Rheological comparison of hemoglobin solutions and erythrocyte suspensions.
4	lipid composition of subcellular particles of human blood platelets	Lipid composition of subcellular particles of human blood platelets.
4	dihydroorotic acid dehydrogenase introduction into erythrocyte by the malaria parasite	Introduction of l' dihydroorotic acid dehydrogenase in erythrocytes by the malaria parasite.
4	hemadsorption of mumps virus examined by light and electron microscopy	Hemadsorption of mumps virus (MMR) examined by light and electron microscopy.
4	blood volume changes in outdoor exercise of 8 10 hour duration	Changes in blood volume during an outdoor exercise lasting 8 to 10 hours.
4	on the shape of the erythrocyte	About the shape of the erythrocytes.
4	the effect of antigenic competition on various manifestations of humoral antibody formation and cellular immunity	Effect of antigenic competition on various manifestations of humoral antibody formation and cellular immunity.
4	peptide hydrolase activities of the mucosa of human small intestine	Hydrolase peptide activity of the mucosa of the human intestine.
4	red cell survival after heterograft valve surgery	Red blood cell survival after heterosexual valve surgery.
4	factors affecting the passive hemagglutination titration dilution loops titration trays vibration diluents	The factors affecting passive hemagglutination titration dilution loops are titration plate vibration diluents.
4	interaction between red cell stroma and streptolysin o inhibition of cytotoxic activity	Interaction between erythrocyte stroma and streptolysin o inhibition of the cytotoxic activity.
4	enhancement of parainfluenza 2 virus hemagglutinin	An increase in the hemagglutinin level of parainfluenza 2 virus.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in chinese	Six phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in Chinese.
4	haptoglobin and catalase loci in man possible genetic linkage	The haptoglobin and catalase loci in humans may be genetically linked.
4	primaquine induced changes in morphology of exoerythrocytic stages of malaria	Primaquine induced changes in the morphology of exoerythrocytic stages of malaria.
4	horse agglutinins in infectious mononueleosis 3 riterion for differential diagnosis	Horse agglutinins in infectious mononueleosis 3 riterion for differential diagnosis.
4	regulation of the immune response i reduction in ability of specific antibody to inhibit long lasting igg immunological priming after removal of the fc fragment	Regulation of the immune response i reduction of the ability of the immune; specific antibody; inhibit immune responses; long-term immune priming after removal of the fc fragment.
4	erythrocytes in human transplantation effects of pretreatment with abo group specific antigens	Effects of transplantation of apo; human erythrocytes; pretreatment with antigen-specific abo.
4	adenine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency a previously undescribed genetic defect in man	Adenine phosphoribosyltransferase (PPT) deficiency, a novel genetic defect in men.
4	measurement of protein concentration by quantitative electron microscopy	Measurement of protein concentration by quantitative electron microscopy.
4	erythropoiesis in the rat differential rates of dna synthesis and cell proliferation	Erythropoiesis in differential rates of DNA synthesis and cell proliferation in rats.
4	human monocytes distinct receptor sites for the third component of complement and for immunoglobulin g	Human monocytes have distinct receptor sites for the third component of complement and for immunoglobulin g.
4	sickle cell anaemia sickle cell thalassaemia sickle cell haemoglobin c disease and asymptomatic haemoglobin c thalassaemia in one ghanaian family	Schizophrenia Schizophrenia Schizophrenia Schizophrenia haemoglobin c disease and haemoglobin c asymptomatic thalassemia in a Ghanaian family.
4	a comparison of the monospot with the paul bunnell test in infectious mononucleosis and other diseases	Comparison of the monospot with Paul Bunnell's test for infectious mononucleosis and other diseases.
4	genetics of diego blood groups in guatemalan indians use of antiserums to diego a and diebo b antigens	Antisera for diego a and diebo b antigens are used in the genetics of diego blood groups in Guatemalan Indians.
4	penicillin induced haemolytic anaemia	Well, penicillin caused hemolytic anemia.
4	direct measurements of membrane potential and membrane resistance of human red cells	Direct measurement of membrane potential and membrane resistance of human red blood cells.
4	chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragment cleaved from the fifth component of guinea pig complement	Chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragments were cleaved from the fifth component of guinea pig complement.
4	conformation of blood group and virus receptor glycoproteins from red cells and secretions	Conformation of blood group glycoproteins and viral receptors of red blood cells and secretions.
4	automated technique for the detection of hemagglutinins to sheep erythrocytes	An automated technique for the detection of hemagglutinins in sheep erythrocytes.
4	studies in the enzymology of glutathione metabolism in human erythrocytes	Enzymological studies of glutathione metabolism in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of osmolality on the hydraulic permeability coefficient of red cells	The effect of osmolality on the hydraulic permeability coefficient of red blood cells.
4	intraperitoneal blood transfusion in african adults with hookworm anaemia	Intraperitoneal blood transfusion in African adults with ankylostoma anemia.
4	absorption and utilization of polyglutamyl forms of folate in man	Use of polyglutamyl forms of folate in humans.
4	active calcium and strontium transport in human erythrocyte ghosts	Active calcium and strontium transport in human erythrocyte ghosts.
4	oxygen hemoglobulin dissociation curves effect of inherited enzyme defects of the red cell	The dissociation curves of the oxygenated hemoglobulin showed the effect of the hereditary enzyme defects of the red blood cells.
4	glutathione reductase stimulation in normal subjects by riboflavin supplementation	Glutathione reductase stimulation in normal subjects by riboflavin supplementation.
4	effect of histoplasmosis on antibody response to an erythrocyte antigen	The effect of the protein on the immune response to an erythrocyte antigen.
4	role of erythrocytes and serum in the nutrition of rickettsia quintana	The role of erythrocytes and serum in the nutrition of rickettsia quintana.
4	mannose metabolism in the human erythrocyte	Metabolism of mannose in the human erythrocytes.
4	inherited deficiency of the third component of human complement c 3	Hereditary deficiency of the third component of human complement c.
4	assay of carbonic anhydrase by titration at constant ph	Apos test; carbonic anhydrase by titration to constant ph.
4	mammary tumor virus antigen sensitive immunoassay	Immunologic test sensitive to breast tumour virus antigen.
4	the calcium content of human erythrocytes	This is the calcium content of human erythrocytes.
4	some aspects of adenosine triphosphate synthesis from adenine and adenosine in human red blood cells	Aspects of apos synthesis; adenosine triphosphate from apos; adenine and l' adenosine in human red blood cells.
4	infective substructures of sendai virus from infected ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Infectious viral substructures were sent from infected ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
4	rapid sensitive assay for staphylococcal enterotoxin and a comparison of serological methods	Rapid and sensitive testing for staphylococcal enterotoxin and serologic comparison.
4	effect of statolon induced interferon on antibody formation	Effect of apos; statolon-induced interferon on antibody formation.
4	rate limiting processes in the bohr shift in human red cells	Speed limiting processes in the bohr movement of human red blood cells.
4	fluid drop like transition of erythrocytes under shear	Liquid falls like the transition of erythrocytes under shear.
4	the role of membrane lipids in the survival of red cells in hereditary spherocytosis	The role of membrane lipids in the survival of red blood cells in hereditary spherocytosis.
4	a study of nucleated erythrocytes by density gradient centrifugation in a zonal rotor	The study of nucleated erythrocytes by density gradient centrifugation in a zonal rotor.
4	adsorption of mycoplasma pneumoniae to neuraminic acid receptors of various cells and possible role in virulence	Adsorption of pneumoniae mycoplasm to neuraminic acid receptors of various cells and possible role in virulence.
4	utilization of neuraminic acid receptors by mycoplasmas	Use of neuraminic acid by mycoplasmas.
4	immune adherence by the fourth component of complement	L' immune adherence by the fourth component of complement.
4	effects of quaternary ammonium compounds on choline transport in red cells	Effects of quaternary ammonium compounds on choline transport in choline red blood cells.
4	bacteriocin hemolysin of streptococcus zymogenes	Bacteriocin hemolysin of streptococcus zymogenes.
4	passive hemolysis by serum and cobra venom factor a new mechanism inducing membrane damage by complement	L' passive hemolysis by serum and cobra venom factor is a new mechanism that induces membrane damage by complement.
4	effect of altitude on oxygen binding by hemoglobin and on organic phosphate levels	The effect of altitude on the binding of oxygen, hemoglobin and organic phosphate levels.
4	inhibition of adenosine triphosphatase in sheep red cell membranes by oxidized glutathione	L' inhibition of apos; adenosine triphosphatase in sheep erythrocyte membranes by oxidized glutathione.
4	micro determination of plasma and erythrocyte copper by atomic absorption spectrophotometry	Microscopic determination of plasma and erythrocyte copper by apo spectrophotometry; atomic absorption.
4	estimation of red cell folate activity	Estimation of apos; erythrocyte folate activity.
4	standardized automated procedure for measurement of serum hemolytic complement activity	Standardized automated procedure for measurement of apos; serum hemolytic complement activity.
4	microtiter indirect hemagglutination procedure for identification of streptococcal m protein antibodies	Microtitre indirect hemagglutination for apos; antibody identification of streptococcal protein m.
4	automated procedure for measuring antigenicity of extracted and intact influenza virus	Automated procedure for measuring apo; antigenicity of apovirus; extracted and intact influenza.
4	effect of type of red blood cells on antistreptolysin o titer	The effect of apo-type; erythrocytes on apos; antitreptolysin oiter.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and dorsolateral prostate of the rat	Lapos enzymes; carbonic anhydrase in erythrocytes and the dorsolateral prostate of the rat.
4	glycosphingolipids with lewis blood group activity uptake by human erythrocytes	Glycosphingolipids with uptake d'apos; blood group activity leached by human erythrocytes.
4	deformation of red blood cells in capillaries	Deformation of red blood cells in capillaries.
4	orientation and motion of amphiphilic spin labels in membranes	L' orientation and motion of amphiphilic spin labels in membranes.
4	glycerol permeability of human fetal and adult erythrocytes and of a model membrane	Glycerol permeability of fetal and adult human erythrocytes and a model membrane.
4	gene control of hematopoiesis i erythrocyte mosaicism and permanent immunological tolerance in allophenic mice	Genetic control of apo; hematopoiesis, erythrocyte mosaicism and permanent immunological tolerance in allophenic mice.
4	active uptake of copper and zinc during haemodialysis	Active absorption of copper and zinc during hemodialysis.
4	metabolic dependence of red cell deformability	Metabolic dependencies of red cell deformability.
4	familial plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase deficiency	Family plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase defect.
4	duplicate plating of immune cell products analysis of globulin class secretion by single cells	Duplicate analysis of immune cell products of globulin class secretion by individual cells.
4	nonequilibrium facilitated oxygen transport in hemoglobin solution	"The ""balance"" no facilitated oxygen transport in a hemoglobin solution."
4	plug effect of erythrocytes in capillary blood vessels	The effect of erythrocytes in the blood vessels.
4	disposal of plasma heme in normal man and patients with intravascular hemolysis	Disposition of abs; plasma heme in normal man and patients with intravascular hemolysis.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density i hemagglutination	Site density significance of erythrocyte antigens i hemagglutination.
4	automation of the assay of folate in serum and whole blood	Automation of the measurement of folate in serum and whole blood.
4	substrate stabilization genetically controlled reciprocal relationship of two human enzymes	Substrate stabilization genetically controlled the reciprocal relationship of two human enzymes.
4	adsorption of 3h fatty acid esters of streptococcal groups a and e cell wall polysaccharide antigens by red blood cells and their effect on hemagglutination	L' adsorption of ester d' 3h fatty acids of group wall polysaccharides a and e of streptococci by red blood cells and their effect on hemagglutination.
4	effect of flavin compounds on glutathione reductase activity in vivo and in vitro studies	Effect of flavin on glutathione reductase activity in vivo and in vitro.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests i standardization of erythrocyte suspensions	Standardized antibody testing; viral hemagglutination and anti-viral hemagglutination; anti-apos; hemagglutination i standardization of erythrocyte suspensions.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests ii description and statistical evaluation	Standardized tests for apo; viral hemagglutination and apo; hemagglutination ii Description and statistical evaluation.
4	chloroquine resistance in malaria a deficiency of chloroquine binding	Chloroquine resistance in malaria is due to chloroquine binding deficiency.
4	the effects of deoxygenation of adult and fetal hemoglobin on the synthesis of red cell 2 3 diphosphoglycerate and its in vivo consequences	The effects of deoxygenation of adult and fetal hemoglobin on the synthesis of red blood cell diphosphoglycerate 2 @-@3 and its consequences in vivo.
4	thermal inactivation of newcastle disease virus	It's called thermal inactivation of the Newcastle disease virus.
4	variables of the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test system and their effect on antigen and antibody titers	Apos test system variables; rubella inhibition; rubella hemagglutination and their effect on antigen and antibody titres.
4	primary immunization of rh negative volunteers	Primary immunization of volunteers with rhesus-negative.
4	carcinogen induced immune depression absence in mice resistant to chemical oncogenesis	The carcinogen induced apos; absence of immune depression in mice resistant to apos; chemical oncogenesis.
4	the erythrocyte ghost is a perfect osmometer	The erythrocyte ghost is a perfect osmometer.
4	stimulation of mammalian erythropoiesis by 5beta h steroid metabolites	Stimulation of apo; mammalian erythropoies by 5beta h steroid metabolites.
4	binding of dodecyl sulfate to proteins at high binding ratios possible implications for the state of proteins in biological membranes	Binding of dodecyl sulfate to proteins at high binding ratios may have implications for the state of biological membrane proteins.
4	optical activity of biological membranes scattering effects and protein conformation	Diffusion effects of apos; optical activity of biological membranes and protein conformation.
4	precipitation of proteins by vinblastine and calcium ions	Precipitation of proteins by vinblastine and calcium ions.
4	failure of intravenous aspirin to increase gastrointestinal blood loss	Insufficient appetite; intravenous aspirin to increase gastrointestinal (GI) blood loss.
4	molecular species of lecithins from erythrocytes and plasma of man	The molecular species of lecithins of erythrocytes and plasma of humans.
4	electron microscope analysis of young and old red blood cells stained with colloidal iron for surface charge evaluation	Electron microscopic analysis of young and old red blood cells stained with colloidal iron for apos; surface load assessment.
4	shear dependence of effective cell volume as a determinant of blood viscosity	The shear dependence of effective cell volume as a determinant of blood viscosity.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red cells resistance to infection by malarial parasites	Erythrocyte-deficient glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase is resistant to infection by malaria parasites.
4	membrane alterations in hemolysis internalization of plasmalemma induced by primaquine	Membrane changes in apos; primaquine-induced hemolysis of plasmalemma; internalization of apos.
4	equine isoerythrolysis clinical pathological observations and transfusion of dam s red blood cells to her foal	Isoerythrolyse equine clinical pathological observations and transfusion of the mother's red blood cells to her foal.
4	the rate of the root shift in eel red cells and eel haemoglobin solutions	The rate of root displacement in eel red blood cells and eel solutions; eel hemoglobin.
4	a general method for the specific staining of intracellular antigens with ferritin antibody conjugates	This is a general method of staining specific staining of intracellular antigens by conjugates of ferritin antibodies.
4	the detection of cell bound antibody on complement coated human red cells	The detection of cell-bound antibodies on human red blood cell complement cells.
4	detection of agglutinins in chickens infected with jm leukosis virus	Detection of agglutinins in chickens infected with leucosis virus jm.
4	rifampicin induced immune thrombocytopenia	Rifampicin induced immune thrombocytopenia.
4	susceptibility to an avian leukosis sarcoma virus close association with an erythrocyte isoantigen	The risk of infection with avian leukosis sarcoma virus closely associated with an erythrocyte isoantigen.
4	the transport of oxidized glutathione from the erythrocytes of various species in the presence of chromate	The transport of oxidized glutathione from the erythrocytes of various species in the presence of chromate.
4	automated quantitative microhemagglutination assay for treponema pallidum antibodies	Antibody-based automated quantitative microhemagglutination tests for Treponema pallidum.
4	abnormal rheology of oxygenated blood in sickle cell anemia	Abnormal rheology of oxygenated blood in the sickle cell.
4	effect of 2 3 diphosphoglycerate on oxygen affinity of blood in sickle cell anemia	The effect of diphosphoglycerate 2-3 on the apos; blood affinity for the apos; oxygen in the apos; sickle cell anemia.
4	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells i plaque technique of high sensitivity enabling access to the cells	In vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells i high-sensitivity technical plaque allowing access to the cells.
4	orotidinuria induced by allopurinol	Orotidinuria induced by allopurinol.
4	histocompatibility 2 h 2 polymorphism in wild mice	Histocompatibility 2 h 2 polymorphism in wild mice.
4	determination of alpha tocopherol in erythrocytes by gas liquid chromatography	Determination of apos; alpha tocopherol in erythrocytes by gas liquid chromatography.
4	inside out red cell membrane vesicles preparation and purification	Preparation and purification of erythrocyte membrane vesicles at the interior of those-ci.
4	the growth characteristics of an ascitic plasmacytoma mp 5563 terminating by fistulous communication with the blood stream	The growth characteristics of an ascitic plasmacytome mp 5563 ending in fistulose communication with the bloodstream.
4	allantoic fluid as a source of arbovirus hemagglutinin	The allantoic fluid as a source of apos hemagglutinin.
4	erythropoietic activity of steroid metabolites in mice	Erythropoietic activity of steroid metabolites in mice.
4	quality control in haematology report of interlaboratory trials in britain	Report on hematology quality control in interlaboratory trials in Great Britain.
4	determination of urea permeability in red cells by minimum method a test of the phenomenological equations	Determination of the permeability at the apos; urea in the red cells by a minimum method a test of the phenomenological equations.
4	natural antibodies in sera of mink before and after the development of aleutian disease viral plasmacytosis	Natural antibodies in mink serum before and after the development of Aleutian disease viral plasmacytosis.
4	macrocytosis in down s syndrome and during long term anticonvulsant therapy	Long-term anticonvulsant therapy before and during macrocytosis in the lower to lower extremity syndrome.
4	assay of serum fibrin degradation products by agglutination inhibition of coated erythrocytes	Testing of serum fibrin degradation products by apos; clotting of coated erythrocytes.
4	reactive lysis the complement mediated lysis of unsensitized cells i the characterization of the indicator factor and its identification as c7	Lysis reactivates complement-mediated lysis of unsensitized cells i the characterization of the indicator factor and its identification as c7.
4	isolation of the fundamental polypeptide subunits of biological membranes	To isolate the sub-basic polypeptide units of biological membranes.
4	electrophoretic analysis of hemoglobin and isozymes in individual vertebrate cells	Electrophoretic analysis of hemoglobin and isozymes in individual vertebrate cells.
4	genetic transmission of viruses that incite mammary tumor in mice	A genetic transmission of viruses that induce a mouse mammary tumour.
4	reduced catechol o methyltransferase activity in red blood cells of women with primary affective disorder	Lapse reduction; catechol o methyltransferase activity in erythrocytes of women with dementia; primary affective disorder.
4	solubilization and partial characterization of a phytohemagglutinin receptor site from human erythrocytes	Solubilization and partial characterization of a phytohemagglutinin receptor site from human erythrocytes.
4	in vitro induction of lysosomal enzymes by phagocytosis	In vitro phagocytosis induces production of lysosomal enzymes.
4	a variant of rabbit phosphoglucose isomerase	A variant of rabbit phosphoglucose isomerase.
4	comparison of the immune responsiveness of nzb and nzb x nzw f1 hybrid mice with that of other strains of mice	A comparison of the immune response of f1 nzb and nzb x nzw mice with that of other strains of mice.
4	disruption of adenovirus type 7 by lithium iodide resulting in the release of viral deoxyribonucleic acid	Disturbance of the apos; adenovirus type 7 by the apos; lithium iodide resulting in the release of d' viral deoxyribonucleic acid.
4	quinacrine mechanisms of antimalarial action	Quinacrine mechanisms of malaria control.
4	hundred day leukemia preferential induction in rat by pulse doses of 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene	In rats, 100-day leukemia promoted apos; pulse doses of 7812-trimethylbenz to anthracene induced apos.
4	hapten carrier relationships of isoantigens a model for immunological maturation based on the conversion of haptens of carriers by antibody	Haptene – isoantigen carrier relationships are a model of immunological maturation based on the conversion of hapene from carriers by antibodies.
4	the rate of osmotic influx of water by flexible and inflexible erythrocytes	Dapos rate; osmotic influx of water by flexible and inflexible erythrocytes.
4	acetylsalicylic acid induced hemolysis and its mechanism	L' acetylsalicylic acid induces hemolysis and its mechanism.
4	the effect of cardiac disease on hemoglobin oxygen binding	Lapses; effect of cardiac disease on calcium binding; hemoglobin at apos; oxygen.
4	phenotypic mixing of envelope proteins of the parainfluenza virus sv5 and vesicular stomatitis virus	Parainfluenza sv5 and vesicular stomatitis virus envelope phenotypic mixture of proteins.
4	thyroid hormone control of erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid concentrations	Apos; thyroid hormone in apos; diphosphoglyceric acid in erythrocytes 2 and 3.
4	molecular mechanism of hemolytic anemia in homozygous hemoglobin c disease electron microscopic study by the freeze etching technique	Molecular mechanisms of hemolytic anemia in the apos; homozygous hemoglobin c studied by cryodiffusion electron microscopy.
4	peroxidase activity in rat liver microbodies after amino triazole inhibition	L' peroxidase activity in rat liver microbodies after apos; amino triazole inhibition.
4	membrane splitting in freeze ethching covalently bound ferritin as a membrane marker	Fractured membrane by covalently freezing bound ferritin as a membrane marker.
4	vitamin b12 levels in erythrocytes in normal subjects and in pernicious anaemia	Vitamin b12 levels in normal subjects and normal subjects' erythrocytes; pernicious anemia.
4	the effect of heat on the a b and h antigenic strength of human red cells	L' effect of heat on the antigenic strength of human red blood cells b and h.
4	mucopolysaccharide in the blood of a patient with neuroblastoma	Mucopolysaccharide in the blood of a patient with neuroblastoma.
4	cephalexin human studies of absorption and excretion of a new cephalosporin antibiotic	Cephalexin human studies of apo; absorption and apo; apo excretion; a new cephalosporin antibiotic.
4	fine structure of the exoerythrocytic stage of plasmodium cynomolgi	The fine structure of the exoerythrocytic stage of plasmodium cynomolgi.
4	receptors for human gamma g globulin on human neutrophils	Receptors for gamma-human globulin on human neutrophils.
4	diminished synthesis of an alpha chain mutant hemoglobin i alpha 16 lys leads to glu	Reduced synthesis of apos; an alpha chain mutant, l' hemoglobin i alpha 16 lys, leads to glu.
4	fatty acid composition of phospholipids from platelets and erythrocytes in multiple sclerosis	Fatty acid composition of phospholipids of platelets and erythrocytes in multiple sclerosis.
4	reactivity of two gonococcal antigens in an automated microhemagglutination procedure	The reactivity of two gonococcal antigens in an automated microhemagglutination procedure.
4	sensitized erythrocyte lysis sel test as an epidemiological tool for human leptospirosis serological surveys	Sensitized erythrocyte lysis test as an epidemiological tool for human leptospirosis serological investigations.
4	titration of cholera antitoxin in human sera by microhemagglutination with formalinized erythrocytes	Title of cholera antitoxin in human serum by microhemagglutination with formalized erythrocytes.
4	genetic polymorphism of tetrazolium oxidase in dogs	Genetic polymorphism of tetrazolium oxidase in dogs.
4	purine metabolism in heterozygous carriers of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency	Purine metabolism in heterozygous carriers of guanine hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase.
4	thermal damage to red cells	Thermal damage to red blood cells.
4	the interaction between human monocytes and red cells specificity for igg subclasses and igg fragments	Interaction between human monocytes and red cell specificity for d&apos classes; igg and d&apos fragments; igg.
4	effect of ph on the physico chemical and immunologic properties of rabbit antibodies	The effect of ph on the physico-chemical and immunological properties of rabbit antibodies.
4	studies of phosphorescent probes for proteins	Studies of phosphorescent probes for proteins.
4	platelet adhesiveness after blood donation	Platelet adhesion after blood donation.
4	favism association with erythrocyte acid phosphatase phenotype	Phenotypic erythrocyte acid phosphatase phenotype associated with favism.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and uterus of the rabbit	Apos enzymes; carbonic anhydrase in erythrocytes and lapos; uterus of rabbit.
4	two populations of rh groups together with chromosomally abnormal cell lines in the bone marrow	Two populations of rh groups and chromosomal abnormal cell lines in the bone marrow.
4	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox i the effects of anti thymocyte serum	Mechanisms of recovery; a generalized viral infection with mosaepox and its associated effects; anti-viral serum @-@thymocytes.
4	lysis of erythrocytes by complement in the absence of antibody	Lysation of erythrocytes by complement in lapos; absence of antibodies.
4	differential membranolytic effects of microcrystalline sodium urate and calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate	Distinct membrane-like effects of microcrystalline sodium urate and calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate.
4	production of ultrastructural membrane lesions by the fifth component of complement	Production of ultrastructural membrane lesions by the fifth component of the complement.
4	plaque assay for pneumonia virus of mice	Plate tests for pneumonia virus in mice.
4	use of formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	The use of formalized sheep erythrocytes in the apos test; apos inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	release of phospholipid fatty acid from human erythrocytes	D&apos release; phospholipid fatty acids from human erythrocytes.
4	the purification and properties of carbonic anhydrases from guinea pig erythrocytes and mucosae of the gastrointestinal tract	Purification and properties of carbonic anhydrases of guinea pig erythrocytes and gut mucosa.
4	the dissociation of chicken erythrocyte deoxyribonuleoprotein and some properties of its partial nucleoproteins	The dissociation of chicken erythrocyte deoxyribonuleoprotein and certain properties of its partial nucleoproteins.
4	unexpectedly large size of globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Unexpected large size of globin messenger ribonucleic acid.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for detection of antibodies to cytomegalovirus	Dapos test; indirect hemagglutination for detection of cytomegalovirus antibodies.
4	deoxyribonucleotide pools and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in mouse embryo cells infected with three classes of polyoma virus particles	Deoxyribonucleotide pools and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in mouse embryonic cells infected with three classes of polyoma virus particles.
4	evaluation of liquid nitrogen storage for preservation of group a streptococcal m protein sensitized sheep red blood cells	Evaluation of apos; storage of apos; liquid nitrogen for storage of the group's streptococcal protein sensitized sheep red blood cells.
4	immunological basis of the adenovirus 8 9 cross reaction	The immunological basis of the adenovirus 8-9 cross-reaction is cross-reactivity.
4	plasmodium falciparum in owl monkeys drug resistance and chloroquine binding capacity	Plasmodium falciparum in owl monkeys drug resistance and chloroquine binding capacity.
4	hemoglobin interaction modification of solid phase composition in the sickling phenomenon	Change of solid phase composition of the hemoglobin interaction in the sickle phenomenon.
4	allopurinol alteration in pyrimidine metabolism in man	Apos-induced allopurinol alteration of pyrimidine metabolism in humans.
4	studies on erythropoiesis in uremic and post transplant renal patients utilizing radioactive iron and chromium	Studies on erythropoiesis in uremic and post-uremic renal patients transplanted-using radioactive iron and chromium.
4	thalassemia and g 6 pd deficiency in chinese canadians admission screening of a hospital population	Thalassemia and g 6 pd deficiency in chinese canadians admission screening of a hospital population.
4	heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrins and increased delta aminolevulinic acid synthetase activity	Heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrins and increased l&apos activity; aminovulinic acid synthetase delta.
4	introduction of a heterologous nucleus into enucleated cytoplasms of cultured mouse l cells	Introduction of d' a heterologous nucleus into enucleated cytoplasms of cultured mouse l cells.
4	primitive erythropoiesis in early chick embryogenesis ii correlation between hemoglobin synthesis and the mitotic history	Early erythropoiesis early in the apo; chicken embryogenesis ii correlation between hemoglobin and apo synthesis; mitotic history.
4	sporozoite induced infections of plasmodium berghei administered by the oral route	The sporozoites induced infections of plasmodium berghei administered orally.
4	some properties of an sh group essential for choline transport in human erythrocytes	Some properties of d' a critical group for choline transport in human erythrocytes.
4	on the possibility of nonthermal biological effects of pulsed electromagnetic radiation	On the possibility of non-thermal biological effects of pulsed electromagnetic radiation.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density ii hemolysis	L' importance of site density; erythrocyte antigen ii hemolysis.
4	phosphoribosyl transferase activity in normal subjects gout patients and children with mental retardation	Lapos; phosphoribosyltransferase activity in normal subjects with gout and children with mental retardation.
4	human red blood cells prostaglandin e2 epinephrine and isoproterenol alter deformability	In human erythrocytes, prostaglandin e2, epinephrine and isoproterenol alter the deformability.
4	quantitation of a slide test monotest for infectious mononucleosis	In addition, a single-line test for infectious mononucleosis was performed.
4	the erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity e c 1 6 4 2 of healthy blood donors	Lapses; erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity and c 16.42 of healthy blood donors.
4	microangiopathic haemolytic anaemia the phenomenon of red cell adherence	Anemia hemolytic microangiopathic, phenomenon of l'apos; adhesion of red blood cells.
4	protein loss and cell loss from the small intestinal mucosa	Protein and cell loss from the small intestinal mucosa.
4	studies on the coordinate activity and liability of orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and the effects of allopurinol administration	Studies on the coordination activity and responsibility of orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and the effects of apos; d' allopurinol administration.
4	effect of antibiotics on staphylococcal hemolysin production	Effect of antibiotics on staphylococcal hemolysin production.
4	bacteriophage types and o antigen groups of escherichia coli from urine	Types of bacteriophages and groups of antigens o dapos; escherichia coli in urine.
4	comparison of the streptozyme test with the antistreptolysin o antideoxyribonuclease b and antihyaluronidase tests	Comparison of the streptozyme test with the antitreptolysin or anti-deoxyribonuclease b and antihyaluronidase tests.
4	quantitative micro complement fixation test	Quantitative test of the microcomplement fixation technique.
4	automation of a hemagglutination inhibition test for parainfluenza 3 antibodies in bovine sera	Automation of apo; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination for parainfluenza 3 antibodies in bovine sera.
4	macrophage digested antigen as inducer of delayed hypersensitivity	Macrophages digest antigen as inducer of delayed hypersensitivity.
4	the effect of valinomycin on the electrical properties of solutions of red cell lipids in n decane	L' effect of valinomycin on the electrical properties of erythrocyte lipids in decane n.
4	incorporation of radioactive seleno 75se methionine into mumps virus	Incorporation of radioactive seleno 75se methionine into the mumps virus.
4	photo affinity labeling of specific acetylcholine binding sites on membranes	Photo-labeling; affinity of specific binding sites for l' acetylcholine on membranes.
4	the localization of spectrin on the inner surface of human red blood cell membranes by ferritin conjugated antibodies	Localization of spectrin on the inner surface of human erythrocyte membranes by ferritin conjugated antibodies.
4	acholeplasma axanthum sp n a new sterol nonrequiring member of the mycoplasmatales	Acholeplasma axanthum sp n a new sterol limb of mycoplasma not required.
4	antigen specific cells in mouse bone marrow ii fluctuation of the number and potential of immunocyte precursors after immunization	Specific cells; antigens in mouse bone marrow ii changes in the number and potential of apo-precursors; post-immunization immunocytes.
4	the apparent transfer of fatty acid from phosphatidylcholine to phosphatidylethanolamine in human erythrocytes	The apparent transfer of the fatty acids from phosphatidylcholine to phosphatidylethanolamine in human erythrocytes.
4	actinomycin d before and during primary and secondary anti forssman immunoglobulin hemolysin responses in rabbits	Lapses; actinomycin before and during responses to apos; apos hemolysin; primary and secondary anti forssman immunoglobulin in rabbits.
4	the contrasting effects of cyclophosphamide and radiation on the immune responses of the mouse	The contrasting effects of cyclophosphamide and radiation on the immune responses of the mouse.
4	erythroid cell differentiation and the inhibition of cytokinesis by cytochalasin	Differentiation of erythroid cells and l' inhibition of cytokinesis by cytochalasin.
4	developmental changes of erythropoiesis in cultured chick blastoderms	Developmental changes in erythropoiesis in cultured chick blastoderms.
4	conversion of vitamin b 6 compounds to active forms in the red blood cell	To convert vitamin b 6 compounds into active forms in the red blood cells.
4	analysis of chemotaxis in white blood cells	Analysis of chemotaxis in white blood cells.
4	the potential use of xylitol in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency anemia	L' potential use of xylitol in glucose deficiency anaemia 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
4	alteration in the rheologic properties of plasmodium knowlesi infected red cells a possible mechanism for capillary obstruction	Alteration of the rheological properties of Knowlesi-infected red blood cells may be a possible mechanism of hair obstruction.
4	erythropoiesis in the anemia of bone marrow failure	Erythropoiesis in the anemia of the apos; bone marrow failure.
4	mechanism of action of thyroid hormones on erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid synthesis	Mechanisms; action of thyroid hormones on erythrocyte synthesis; diphosphoglyceric acid 2 and 3.
4	characterization of the a component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Characterization of the a component of streptococcus zymogenes lysine.
4	aplastic anaemia acute myeloblastic leukaemia and oxymetholone	Aplastic anemia, acute myeloblastic leukemia and oxymetholone syndrome.
4	electron microscopy of the ammoniacal silver reaction for histones in the erythropoietic cells of the chick	L' electron microscopic examination of the ammonium reaction of l' silver for the histones in the erythropoietic cells of the chick.
4	effect of paraoxon on erythrocyte metabolism as measured by oxygen uptake in vitro	Effect of paraoxon on erythrocyte metabolism as measured by in vitro oxygen absorption.
4	structure of glycoproteins of human erythrocytes alkali stable oligosaccharides	The structure of glycoproteins in human erythrocytes: stable, alkaline oligosaccharides.
4	mechanical equilibrium of biological membranes	L' mechanical balance of biological membranes.
4	drug displacement from protein binding source of the sulphadoxine liberated by phenylbutazone	Displacement of drug from protein binding source of the phenylbutazone-released sulfadoxin.
4	method for increasing the regularity of isolation of infectious ribonucleic acid from influenza virus	Method to increase regularity; isolation of infectious ribonucleic acid from influenza virus.
4	effect of two factors source of sheep cells and concentration of amboceptor on the estimated titre of rheumatoid factor	Effect of two source factors of sheep cells and concentration of amboceptors on the estimated titre of rheumatoid factor.
4	studies on the primary structure of chicken erythrocyte histone fraction v	Studies of the primary structure of chicken erythrocyte fraction histone v.
4	effect of induced host anaemia on the viability and radiosensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo	Host induced anemia on the viability and radiosensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo.
4	specificities of haemagglutinating antibodies evoked by members of the cephalosporin c family and benzylpenicillin	Specificities of hemagglutinating antibodies evoked by members of the cephalosporin c and benzylpenicillin family.
4	intersexes and sex determination in chickens	Intersex and sex determination in chickens.
4	gene selection in hemoglobin and in antibody synthesizing cells	Gene selection in hemoglobin and in antibody synthesis cells.
4	folate metabolism in epileptic and psychiatric patients	Acute folate metabolism in epileptic and psychiatric patients.
4	porphyrin biosynthesis in the erythrocytes of patients with sideropenic anaemias	Porphyrin biosynthesis in the erythrocytes of patients with sideropenic anemia.
4	calcium binding by human erythrocyte membranes significance of carboxyl amino and thiol groups	Calcium binding by human erythrocyte membranes is important for amino carboxyl and thiol groups.
4	changes in fatty acid metabolism after erythrocyte peroxidation stimulation of a membrane repair process	Changes in fatty acid metabolism following peroxidative stimulation of erythrocytes; a membrane repair process.
4	translation of globin m rna in thalassemia and the s and c hemoglobinopathies	Translation of globin mna into hemoglobinopathies s and c and thalassemia.
4	the effect of copper on red cell enzyme activities	L' effect of copper on red cell enzymatic activities.
4	the antibody response of mice to murine leukemia virus in spontaneous infection absence of classical immunologic tolerance akr mice complement fixing antibodies lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus immunofluorescence glomerular deposits of antigen antibody complexes	Immune response of mice to murine leukemia virus in the absence of spontaneous infection of classical immunologically tolerant akr mice complements immune-fluorescent choriomeningitis-binding antibodies glomerular deposits of the antigenic complexes.
4	carbon dioxide hydration activity of carbonic anhydrase kinetics of alkylated anhydrases b and c from humans metalloenzymes isoenzymes active sites mechanism	L' d&apos activity; carbon dioxide hydration of phosphate kinetics; carbonic anhydrase of alkylated anhydrases b and c of human metalloenzyme isozymes is an active site mechanism.
4	cytochalasin b effects on cell morphology cell adhesion and mucopolysaccharide synthesis cultured cells contractile microfilaments glycoproteins embryonic cells sorting out	Cytochalasin b effects on cell adhesion; morphological cell adhesion and mucopolysaccharide synthesis cultured on microcoprotein glycoprotein sifting cell contractile cells.
4	protein synthesis its control in erythropoiesis	Protein synthesis, its control in erythropoiesis.
4	significance of transplacental hemorrhage in the induction of specific maternal unresponsiveness	L' importance of apo; transplacental haemorrhage in apo placentae; induction of specific maternal response.
4	the orientation of dna within 80 angstrom chromatin fibers	L' orientation of apos; DNA at apos; 80 angstrom chromatin fibers inside.
4	purification and characterization of the l component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Purification and characterization of the l component of streptococcus zymogenes lysine.
4	erythropoietin effects on fetal mouse erythroid cells i cell population and hemoglobin synthesis	Erythropoietin effects on fetal mouse erythroid cells i cell population and apo synthesis; hemoglobin.
4	the appearance of acetylcholinesterase in the myotome of the embryonic rabbit an electron microscope cytochemical and biochemical study	Cytochemical and biochemical electron microscopic study of the appearance of acetylcholinesterase in the myotome of embryonic rabbits.
4	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage 3 ingestion and intracellular fate of cholesterol and cholesterol esters	Cholesterol metabolism in apos; macrophage 3 ingestion and intracellular release of cholesterol and cholesterol esters.
4	deoxyribonucleic acid of anaplasma marginale	Deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid); marginal anaplasma.
4	interaction of human growth hormone and human erythrocyte membranes studies by intrinsic fluorescence	L' interaction of human growth hormone and human erythrocyte membranes is studied by intrinsic fluorescence.
4	n acetyl d galactosaminyltransferase in human serum and erythrocyte membranes	N-acetyl galactosaminyltransferase in human serum and erythrocyte membranes.
4	sensitive matrix gel diffusion test for the detection of australia antigen	Sensitive matrix gel diffusion test for detection of Australian antigen.
4	effect of the purification of virus antigens on the production of specific complement fixing antibodies	Effect of purification of virus antigens on the production of antibodies; a specific antibody binding complement.
4	use of a new buffer system with formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Use of a new buffer system with formalized sheep erythrocytes in the Dapos test; apos inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	some effects of mucopolysaccharide stains on platelet aggregation	Some effects of mucopolysaccharide stains on plaque aggregation.
4	interaction in the cerebral metabolism of the biogenic amines effect of intravenous infusion of l tryptophan on tryptophan and tyrosine in brain and body fluids	Interaction in the cerebral metabolism of tryptophan; effect of biogenic amines of intravenous infusion of tryptophan-1 on tryptophan and tyrosine in brain and body fluids.
4	daunorubicin metabolism estimation of daunorubicin reductase	Evaluation of daunorubicin reductase metabolism.
4	oxidant injury of caucasian glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red blood cells by phagocytosing leukocytes during infection	Oxidizing lesion of glucose-deficient red blood cells 6 caucasian phosphate dehydrogenase by phagocytosis of leukocytes during infection.
4	phenyldiimide hemoglobin and heinz bodies	Phenyldiimide hemoglobin and heinz body heinz.
4	ribonucleic acid polymerase activity in sendai virions and nucleocapsid	Ribonucleic acid polymerase activity in sendai virions and nucleocapsids.
4	hemagglutination inhibition with arboviruses relationship between titers and source of erythrocytes	Inhibition of apo; arbovirus hemagglutination, relationship between titers and source of apo; erythrocytes.
4	the relationship between antigenic structure and the requirement for thymus derived cells in the immune response	The relationship between antigenic structure and the requirement for thymus-derived cells in the immune response.
4	in vivo studies in c4 deficient guinea pigs	In vivo studies in guinea pigs deficient in c4 were performed.
4	exchange transfusion with dextran 40 in polycythaemia secondary to hypoxic lung disease	Dextran 40 transfusion in polycytheemia secondary to hypoxic lung disease.
4	the selective inhibition of macrophage phagocytic receptors by anti membrane antibodies	L' selective inhibition of macrophage phagocytic receptors by antibodies against-membranes.
4	studies on antibody producing cells iv ultrastructue of plaque forming cells of rabbit lymph	Studies of cells that produce apo; ultrastructural antibody iv of rabbit lymph plaque cells.
4	complement fixation by a two component antibody system immunoglobulin g and immunoglobulin m anti globulin rheumatoid factor parodoxical effect related to immunoglobulin g concentration	The complement fixation by a d&apos system; two-component antibodies, immunoglobulin g and immunoglobulin m, rheumatoid factor of the apos; immunoglobulin m, effect by dose-related effect; immunoglobulin g.
4	serum concentrations and allotypes of immunoglobulins in two lines of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Serum concentrations and allotypes of immunoglobulins in two mouse lines selected genetically for synthesis of low or high antibodies.
4	effect of propiolactone on sendai virus	Effect of propiolactone on sendai virus.
4	some physical properties of k antigens of escherichia coli related to their biological activity	Some physical properties of the k-antigen of escherichia coli are related to their biological activity.
4	cross neutralization of leptospiral hemolysins from different serotypes	Cross-neutralization of leptospiral hemolysins from different serotypes.
4	electron microscope study of pnh red cells and aet treated normal red cells pnh like cells	L' electron microscopy study of pnh erythrocytes and has treated normal pnh erythrocytes as similar cells.
4	vitamin b 12 levels in erythrocytes in hypochromic anaemia	Rate of vitamin b 12 in erythrocytes with hypochromic anemia.
4	hemagglutinin from the l phase of neisseria meningitidis group b with observations on a serum inhibitor	Hemagglutinin from phase l of neisseria meningitidis group b with observations on a serum inhibitor.
4	effect of 3 thienylalanine on antibody synthesis v immunosuppression in mice by short diet and drug treatments	Effect of 3 thienylalanine on antibody synthesis v immunosuppression in mice by short diet and drug treatment.
4	immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice pretreated with mycobacterial fractions	The immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mice pretreated with mycobacterial fractions.
4	purification of pneumolysin	Uh, pneumolysin purification.
4	adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxin and colchicine on antibody formation in the hamster	Adding action of bacterial endotoxin and colchicine on the formation of hamster antibody.
4	age related susceptibility to haemophilus influenzae type b disease in rabbits	Age-related sensitivity to haemophilus influenzae type b disease in rabbits.
4	macrophage cytophilic antibody in mice mechanism of action of bacterial lipopolysaccharide on the uptake of immunoglobulins by mouse peritoneal cells	Mouse macrophage cytophilic antibody, mechanism of action; action of bacterial lipopolysaccharide on apos; uptake of apos; immunoglobulins by mouse peritoneal cells.
4	production of staphylococcal alpha toxin i relationship between cell growth and toxin formation	Production of staphylococcal alpha toxin i relationship between cell growth and toxin formation i.
4	contribution of humoral and cellular factors to the resistance to experimental infection by pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice i interaction between immunoglobulins heat labile serum factors and phagocytic cells in the killing of bacteria	Contribution of humoral and cellular factors to resistance to apo; experimental infection by pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice i interaction between heat-labile serum factors of immunoglobulins and phagocyte cells in the destruction of bacteria.
4	enteropathogenicity of escherichia coli i evaluation of mouse intestinal loops	Apo evaluation; enteropathogenicity of escherichia coli on mouse intestinal rings.
4	biochemistry of vibrio cholerae virulence ii skin permeability factor cholera enterotoxin production in a chemically defined medium	Virulence biochemistry of vibrio cholerae ii production of apos; enterotoxin of cholera skin permeability factor in a chemically defined medium.
4	characteristics of streptolysin o action	The action of streptolysin o.
4	protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the serum bactericidal reaction	The protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the serum bactericidal reaction.
4	immunochemical studies of organ and tumor lipids xix cytolytic action of antibodies directed against cytolipin r	Immunochemical studies of organ and tumour lipids xix cytolytic action of antibodies against r cytolipin.
4	fate of intravenously administered particulate and lipoprotein cholesterol in the rat	The fate of intravenous particulate and lipoprotein cholesterol in the rat.
4	quantitative two dimensional ultrastructural distribution of rh o d antigenic sites on human erythrocyte membranes	Two-dimensional quantitative ultrastructural distribution of rh o d antigenic sites on human erythrocyte membranes.
4	induction of colonies of hemoglobin synthesizing cells by erythropoietin in vitro	Induction of colonies of cells synthesizing l' hemoglobin by l' erythropoietin in vitro.
4	biological roles of the two components of crotoxin	The biological roles of the two components of crotoxin.
4	comparison of indirect hemagglutination and immunodiffusion tests for detecting type ii leukosis marek ine	Comparison of indirect hemagglutination and immunodiffusion tests for leukosis type ii marek ine.
4	hemolytic interaction of newcastle disease virus and chicken erythrocytes i quantitative comparison procedure	Hemolytic interaction of Newcastle disease virus and chicken erythrocytes i quantitative comparison procedure.
4	modified hemagglutination inhibition test for rubella employing human group o erythrocytes	Modified tests for rubella using human group erythrocytes; inhibitors; hemagglutination for rubella.
4	further studies on the anti immunoglobulin g hemagglutination inhibition test for influenza	Further studies on the d&apos test; inhibition of apos; hemagglutination anti @-@immuneoglobulin g for influenza.
4	acetylcholine binding to torpedo electroplax relationship to acetylcholine receptors	Relationship of electroplax torpedo acetylcholine binding to d&apos receptors; acetylcholine.
4	oxygen affinity in red cells changes induced in vivo by propranolol	L' affinity for l' oxygen in erythrocytes changes in vivo with propranolol.
4	detection of human and chick nuclear antigens in nuclei of chick erythrocytes during reactivation in heterokaryons with hela cells	Detection of human and chicken nuclear antigens in the nuclei of chicken erythrocytes during reactivation in heterokaryons with helical cells.
4	detection of cholesterol in cell membranes by use of bacterial toxins	Detection of cholesterol in cell membranes by use of bacterial toxins.
4	comparison of fluorescent antibody induced by rubella virus in vaccinee and convalescent individuals	Comparison of fluorescent antibodies induced by rubella virus in immunized and recovering subjects.
4	passive hemagglutination inhibition test for typing foot and mouth disease virus	Dapos test; passive inhibition of apos; hemagglutination for typing the FMD virus.
4	indirect hemagglutination with mycoplasma antigens effects of ph on antigen sensitization of tanned fresh and formalinized sheep erythrocytes	Indirect hemagglutination with mycoplasmic antigens, effects of ph on antigen sensitization of formalized and tanned fresh sheep erythrocytes.
4	immunologic memory cells of bone marrow origin increased burst size of specific immunocyte precursors	Immunologic memory cells from bone marrow origin increased the size of specific immunocyte precursors.
4	galactosidase immunological activity of ribosome bound growing polypeptide chains	L' galactosidase immunological activity of growing ribosomal polypeptide chains.
4	membrane microfilaments of erythrocytes alteration in intact cells reproduces the hereditary spherocytosis syndrome vinblastine colchicine strychnine electron microscopy cell rigidity	Erythrocyte alteration in intact cells mimicked the hereditary spherocytosis syndrome of colchicine vinblastine strychnine by electron microscopy.
4	light scattering at various angles theoretical predictions of the effects of particle volume changes	Diffusion of light at various angles theoretical predictions of the effects of particle volume changes.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and glutathione deficiency in sheep	Erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and glutathione deficiency in sheep.
4	the survival time of df 32 p labelled erythrocytes in adult male mink	Survival time of df 32%-labeled erythrocytes in adult male mink.
4	inactivation of polykaryocytogenic and hemolytic activities of sendai virus by phospholipase b lysolecithinase	Inactivation of polykaryocytogenic and hemolytic activities of sentin virus by phospholipase b lysolecithinase.
4	actions of bretylium tosylate at the neuromuscular junction	The actions of bretylium tosylate occur at the neuromuscular junction.
4	permeability of red cell membranes to small hydrophilic and lipophilic solutes	Permeability of erythrocyte membranes to small hydrophilic and lipophilic solutes.
4	the chemical reactions of the haemagglutinins and neuraminidases of different strains of influenza viruses 3 effects of proteolytic enzymes	The chemical reactions of the hemagglutinins and neuraminidases of different strains of influenza virus 3 effects of proteolytic enzymes.
4	decrease of the 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase activities in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues after administration of dopa	Decrease of 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase activities in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues after etapos; dopa administration.
4	cell fractionation and arrangement on fibers beads and surfaces	The process of fractionation and l' arrangement of the cells on the beads and surfaces of the fibers.
4	proposal for classifying human strain navel and related simian mycoplasmas as mycoplasma primatum sp n	Proposal to classify navel human strain and related simian mycoplasmas as mycoplasma primatum sp n.
4	role of antibody and complement in the immune clearance and destruction of erythrocytes ii molecular nature of igg and igm complement fixing sites and effects of their interaction with serum	The role of antibodies and complement in the immune clearance and destruction of erythrocytes ii the molecular nature of l' igg and igmic binding sites and the effects of their interaction with serum.
4	erythrocytosis in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Erythrocytosis in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
4	inosinic acid dehydrogenase activity in the lesch nyhan syndrome	An inosinic acid dehydrogenase in the Lesch Nyhan syndrome.
4	unstable variant of nadh methemoglobin reductase in puerto ricans with hereditary methemoglobinemia	Unstable variant of nadh methemoglobin reductase in puerto ricans with hereditary methemoglobinemia.
4	glycoproteins isolation from cellmembranes with lithium diiodosalicylate	Cellular membrane glycoprotein isolation with lithium diiodosalicylate.
4	characteristics of a bacteriocin derived from streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes antagonistic to diplococcus peumoniae	Characteristics of bacteriocin derived from streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes antagonistic to diplococcus peumoniae.
4	beta hemolysin a persistent impurity in preparations of staphylococcal nuclease and enterotoxin	Hemolysin beta, a persistent impurity in preparations of staphylococcal nuclease and d' enterotoxin.
4	the isolation and functional identification of a protein from the human erythrocyte ghost	L' isolation and apos; functional identification of apos; a protein from the human erythrocyte phantom.
4	factors affecting the maturation of renal pah extraction in the new born dog	Factors influencing the maturation of l' renal pah extraction in the new born @-@.
4	erythrocyte function and marrow regulation in hemoglobin bethesda beta 145 histidine	Erythrocyte function and marrow regulation in hemoglobin bethesda beta 145 histidine.
4	histocompatibility studies in a closely bred colony of dogs ii influence of the dl a system of canine histocompatibility upon the survival of cardiac allografts	Studies of apo; histocompatibility in a narrowly elevated dog colony ii influences the immune system; canine histocompatibility influences the survival of cardiac allografts.
4	mechanism of cytolysis by complement	Mechanisms of cytolysis by complement.
4	the selective inhibitory effect of hyperthermia on the metabolism and growth of malignant cells	Selective inhibitory effect of hyperthermia on the metabolism and growth of malignant cells.
4	the structure of erythrocyte membranes studied by freeze etching ii localization of receptors for phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus to the intramembranous particles	The structure of the erythrocyte membranes studied by freeze-etching ii localization of the receptors for phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus in intramembranous particles.
4	glutathione synthesis in human erythrocytes ii purification and properties of the enzymes of glutathione biosynthesis	Synthesis of glutathione in human erythrocytes ii purification and properties of the enzymes of glutathione biosynthesis.
4	passive antibody and the immune response factors which determine enhancement and suppression	Passive antibodies and immune response factors which determine improvement and suppression.
4	macrophage melanoma cell heterokaryons iv unmasking the macrophage specific membrane receptor	Macrophage iv melanoma cell heterokaryons unmasking the macrophage specific membrane receptor.
4	antiviral activity and side effects of polyriboinosinic cytidylic acid complexes as affected by molecular size	L' antiviral activity and side effects of polyriboinosinic cytidylate complexes are influenced by molecular size.
4	rescue of rous sarcoma virus from rous sarcoma virus transformed mammalian cells	The rescue of the red sarcoma virus from the red sarcoma virus transformed mammalian cells.
4	regulation of the immune response i differential effect of passively administered antibody on the thymus derived and bone marrow derived lymphocytes	The regulation of the immune response he differential effect of the antibody passively administered to thymus-derived and bone marrow-derived lymphocytes.
4	genetic variation in human erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase	Genetic variation of human erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase.
4	variations in the responses of c57bl 10j and a j mice to sheep red blood cells	Variations in the responses of c57bl 10j and j mice to sheep erythrocytes.
4	preparation and further characterization of the mn glycoprotein of human erythrocyte membranes	Glycoprotein mn preparation and further characterization of human erythrocyte membranes.
4	regulation of antibody response by cells expressing histamine receptors	The regulation of the antibody response by cells expressing histamine receptors.
4	the isoenzymes of carbonic anhydrase kinetic properties with particular reference to the functions in the intestinal tract	Isoenzymes of the kinetic properties of carbonic anhydrase, particularly with respect to functions in the intestinal tract.
4	in vivo formation of h2o2 in red cells during exposure to hyperoxia	In vivo formation of h2o2 in red blood cells during ecosis; exposure to hyperoxia.
4	homotropic cooperative binding of the first component of guinea pig complement to rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes a possible allosteric effect	Cooperative homotropic binding of the first component of guinea pig complement to rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes may be allosteric.
4	increased survival of sickle cell erythrocytes after treatment in vitro with sodium cyanate	Increased survival of falciform erythrocytes after in vitro treatment with sodium cyanate.
4	cell to cell interaction in the immune response ix regulation of hepten specific antibody class by carrier priming	Cell-to-cell interaction in the immune response ix regulation of the class of antibody; specific antibody of the apos; apos; carrier priming.
4	induction of tolerance to sheep red blood cells	Induction of tolerance to sheep erythrocytes.
4	erythropoietic protoporphyria lipid peroxidation and red cell membrane damage associated with photohemolysis	Lipid peroxidation of erythropoietic protoporphyria and alteration of erythrocyte membrane structure associated with photohemolysis.
4	carbonic anhydrase interaction with ddt dde and dieldrin	Interaction of apos; carbonic anhydrase with ddt dde and dieldrin.
4	origin of the vaccinia virus hemagglutinin	Origins of the apos virus; hemagglutinin of the vaccinia virus.
4	alzheimer s disease in one monozygotic twin	D'apos disease; Alzheimer's disease in a twin monozygote.
4	separation and some properties of the major proteins of the human erythrocyte membrane	Separation and some properties of the major proteins of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	human antibody response to lipopolysaccharides from neisseria gonorrhoeae	Human antibody response to lipopolysaccharides of neisseria gonorrhoeae.
4	the isolation of digoxin specific antibody and its use in reversing the effects of digoxin	Lapses; isolation of apos; digoxin specific antibody and its use to reverse the effects of digoxin.
4	spin labeled electron spin resonance study of the lipid containing membrane of influenza virus	Electron-paramagnetic resonance study of the lipid-containing membrane of the influenza virus.
4	comparison of selective media for isolation of presumptive group d streptococci from human feces	Comparison of selective media for isolation of putative group d streptococci from human feces.
4	antigenic properties of the envelope of influenza virus rendered soluble by surfactant solvent systems	The antigenic properties of the influenza virus envelope were soluble by surfactant solvent systems.
4	decreased red cell uroporphyrinogen i synthetase activity in intermittent acute porphyria	Erythrocyte depletion; uroporphyrinogen i synthetase activity in intermittent acute porphyria.
4	a study of clofazimine in the rat	A study of clofazimine in the rat.
4	active calcium ion uptake by inside out and right side out vesicles of red blood cell membranes	Active calcium ion uptake by the outer bladders of the inner and outer; right outer red blood cell membranes.
4	experimental arteriosclerosis i fibrous plaque formation in primates an electron microscope study	Electron microscopic study of experimental arteriosclerosis i fibrous plaque formation in primates.
4	genetic factors controlling anti sheep erythrocyte antibody response and immunoglobulin synthesis in backcross and f2 progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Genetic factors controlling sheep erythrocyte antibody response and apo synthesis; immunoglobulins in backcross and f2 progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis.
4	genetic control of the antibody response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mice i evidence that an x linked gene plays a decisive role in determining responsiveness	Genetic control of the immune response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mouse i shows that apos; an x-chromosome linked gene plays a decisive role in determining responsiveness.
4	phenacetin induced hemolytic anemia	Well, phenacetin induced hemolytic anemia.
4	storage retrieval and inventory control of donor red cells in liquid nitrogen	Recovery and control of apo; donor red blood cell inventory in liquid nitrogen.
4	primary glomerular disease with extraglomerular vascular osmiophilic deposits	Acute primary glomerular disease with extraglomerular vascular osmiophilic deposits.
4	improved hemagglutination test for identifying type a strains of pasteurella multocida	Improvement of the d&apos test; hemagglutination to identify pasteurella multocida type a strains.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for chlamydial antibodies	Dapos test; indirect hemagglutination test for chlamydial antibodies.
4	pneumococci producing beta hemolysis on agar	Pneumococci producing beta hemolysis on agar.
4	haem biosynthesis studied in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Lapos biosynthesis; hematoma studied in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
4	effect of the oral contraceptive preparation femigen on the erythrocyte and resin uptake of 131 i triiodothyronine	The effect of the oral contraceptive preparation of a woman on the appetite; absorption of erythrocyte and resin of 131 i triiodothyronine.
4	erythropoietin production in cultures of goat renal glomeruli	The production of apos; erythropoietin in cultures of goat kidney glomeruli.
4	globin messenger rna activity in erythroid precursor cells and the effect of erythropoietin	Globin rna messenger activity in erythroid and apos precursor cells; effect of apos; erythropoietin.
4	globin messenger rna induction during erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia cells	Globin messenger RNA during erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia cells.
4	effect of a modified kaolin treatment on serum immunoglobulins	Effect of modified kaolin treatment on serum immunoglobulins.
4	structures suggesting cell wall deficient forms detected in circulating erythrocytes by fluorochrome staining	Structures suggesting defective cell wall forms detected in circulating erythrocytes by fluorochrome staining.
4	hemagglutination inhibition for serogrouping of neisseria meningitidis	Hemagglutination inhibition for serogrouping of neisseria meningitidis.
4	structure of membrane holes in osmotic and saponin hemolysis	Structure of membrane holes in osmotic and saponin hemolysis.
4	hemoglobin concentration in normal diploid and intersex triploid chickens genetic inactivation or canalization	Hemoglobin in normal diploid and triploid intersex chickens, genetic inactivation or genetic channelization.
4	effect of colchicine colcemid and vinblastine on the agglutination by concanavalin a of transformed cells	The effect of colchicine colcemid and vinblastine on apos; agglutination by concanavalin to transformed cells.
4	phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages different roles of the macrophage receptor sites for complement c3 and for immunoglobulin igg	Phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages different roles of the macrophage receptor sites for complement c3 and immunoglobulins igg.
4	a comparison of the trcii and latex particle tests for the titration of fr antigen	Comparison of trcii and latex particle tests for titration of antigen fr.
4	kinetic studies of a doubly bound red cell antigen antibody system	Kinetic studies of a system of double-linked antibody anti-@ erythrocytes.
4	assays for porphyrins delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase in microliter samples of whole blood applications to metabolic defects involving the heme pathway	Determination of the porphyrins delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase in samples of microlitres of whole blood applied to metabolic defects involving the heme pathway.
4	activation of variants of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyl transferase by the normal enzyme	Activation of variants of guanine hypoxanthine phosphoribosyl transferase by the normal enzyme.
4	thymus independence of slowly metabolized immunogens	Thymic independence of slowly metabolized immunogens.
4	stable reagent for the detection of antibody to the specific fraction i antigen of yersinia pestis	A stable reagent for the detection of apoes; antibodies to the specific fraction i of apos; antigen yersinia pestis.
4	rheology of leukocytes leukocyte suspensions and blood in leukemia possible relationship to clinical manifestations	Rheology of leukocyte suspensions and blood in leukemia in relation to clinical manifestations.
4	measurement of the third component of complement bound to red blood cells in patients with the cold agglutinin syndrome	A measure of the third component of the complement related to red blood cells in patients with L' cold agglutinin.
4	autonomous erythropoiesis during erythroblastic crisis of chronic myelocytic leukemia	Autonomous erythropoiesis during erythroblastic crisis of chronic myelocytic leukemia.
4	a cellular basis for genetically controlled immunologic unresponsiveness in mice tolerance induction in t cells	A cellular basis for l' genetically controlled immunologic inactivity in mice induces tolerance in t-cells.
4	identification and quantitation of the components of polyvalent inactivated influenza virus vaccines by immunodiffusion	Identification and quantification of the components of the inactivated influenza; immunodiffusion influenza multi-valent vaccines.
4	red cell size as measured by the coulter model s	Red blood cell size as measured by the model.
4	immunosuppressive activity in patients with active chronic hepatitis and primary biliary cirrhosis treated with azathioprine	Labs; immunosuppressive activity in patients with apo; active chronic hepatitis and vomiting; primary biliary cirrhosis treated with apo; azathioprine.
4	metabolism of rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari in irradiated l cells	The metabolism of rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari in irradiated l-cells.
4	mycoplasma like organism parasite of red blood cells of an amphibian hydromantes italicus spelerpes fuscus	Mycoplasma as a parasite of the erythrocytes of the hydromant amphibian italicus spelerpes fuscus.
4	the mechanism of folate transport in rabbit reticulocytes	Mechanisms of folate transport in rabbit reticulocytes.
4	mechanism of allopurinol mediated increase in enzyme activity in man	The mechanism of allopurinol was found to promote apos; increase in apos; enzyme activity in apos; man.
4	drug induced erythrocyte membrane internalization	The drug induced erythrocyte membrane internalization.
4	serological cross reactions between the hemagglutinin subunits of h0n1 and h1n1 influenza viruses detected with monospecific antisera	Cross serological reactions between-hemagglutinin units of h0n1 and h1n1 influenza viruses detected with monospecific antisera.
4	measles virus ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis effects of 6 azauridine and cycloheximide on viral replication	Effects of protein synthesis and apos; measles virus ribonucleic acid; azauridine 6 and cycloheximide on viral replication.
4	glycoprotein biosynthesis in small intestine 3 enzymatic basis for the difference in the antigenicity of mucins	Glycoprotein biosynthesis in the intestine; small intestine 3 enzyme base for the difference in the intestine; mucin antigenicity.
4	immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen produced by smooth and rough strains	The immunogenicity of the common enterotoxic agent produced by smooth and rough strains.
4	biochemical basis of the immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen	Biochemical basis, immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen.
4	factors affecting interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes	Factors affecting apos; interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes.
4	carbamino compounds of haemoglobin in human adult and foetal blood	Caramino compounds of haemoglobin in human adult and fetal blood.
4	the interactions of fibrinogen and dextrans with erythrocytes	The interactions of fibrinogen and dextrans with erythrocytes.
4	carbonic anhydrase polymorphism in a new jersey population of the white footed mouse peromyscus leucopus	Anhydrase polymorphism in a new jersey population of white footed mouse peromyscus leucopus.
4	differential immune response to attenuated rubella virus vaccine	Differential immune response to attenuated rubella vaccine.
4	high resolution autoradiography of malarial parasites treated with 3 h chloroquine	High resolution autoradiography of malaria parasites treated with 3 h chloroquine.
4	cytochemical localization of peroxidase activity in the developing erythrocyte	Cytochemical localization of peroxidase activity in developing erythrocytes.
4	selective effects of thermal injury on mouse peritoneal macrophages	Selective effects of thermal injury on peritoneal macrophages.
4	effect of vitamin e on the immune response of hypoxic and normal chickens	Effect of vitamin e on the immune response of hypoxic and normal chickens.
4	synthesis of globin chains in sickle thalassemia	A synthesis of globin chains in thalassemic sickle cell disease.
4	direct antiglobulin reaction in abo haemolytic disease of the newborn	Reaction direct à l'apos; antiglobulin in the abo hemolytic disease of the new-born.
4	improved dextran sulfate calcium chloride method for the removal of nonspecific inhibitors with modifications for nonspecific agglutinin removal in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Calcium chloride dextran sulfate enhanced method for apos; elimination of nonspecific inhibitors with modifications for apos; nonspecific elimination of apos; agglutinin in the apos test; apos inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	magnesium deficiency in patients on long term diuretic therapy for heart failure	Magnesium deficiency in patients on long-term, diuretic therapy for apotis; heart failure.
4	a scanning and transmission electron microscope study of antigen binding sites on rosette forming cells	A scanning and transmission electron microscope study of the binding sites of antigen on rosette cells.
4	stimulation of igg antibody response in vitro by t cell replacing factor	In vitro stimulation of immune response; antibody igg by t cell replacement factor.
4	incidence of haemagglutinating antibodies to meningococci in north west england	Incidence of hemagglutinating antibody to meningococci in the north-west of l'apos; England.
4	effects of salicylates on blood changes in mycoplasma arthritis in rats	Effects of salicylates on blood changes in mycoplasma arthritis in rats.
4	an anti curare effect of hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	It's an anti-curious effect of hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction.
4	genus specific leptospiral antigen and its possible use in laboratory diagnosis	Gender-specific leptospiral antigen and its possible use in laboratory diagnosis.
4	a quantitative morphological analysis of the response of a transplantable rat fibrosarcoma to cyclophosphamide	A quantitative morphological analysis of the response of a transplantable rat fibrosarcoma to cyclophosphamide.
4	the modification of cholinesterase activity by 5 5 dithiobis 2 nitrobenzoic acid included in the coupled spectrophotometric assay evidence for a non catalytic substrate binding site	The modification of cholinesterase activity by dithiobis 2 nitrobenzoic acid 5 is included in the apos; coupled spectrophotometric assay as evidence of apos; a noncatalytic site of binding of the substrate.
4	epstein barr virus antibody in cases and contacts of infectious mononucleosis a family study	Epstein Barr virus antibody in cases and contacts of infectious mononucleosis a family study.
4	hemolytic anemia and g6pd deficiency	Acute hemolytic anemia and g6pd deficiency.
4	selenium biochemical role as a component of glutathione peroxidase	Selenium biochemical role as a component of glutathione peroxidase.
4	induction of immunoglobulin m synthesis and secretion in bone marrow derived lymphocytes by locally concentrated concanavalin a	Induction of synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulin m in concanavalin-derived bone marrow lymphocytes was locally concentrated.
4	zinc transport in rabbit tissues some hormonal aspects of the turnover of zinc in female reproductive organs liver and body fluids	Zinc transport in rabbit tissues some hormonal aspects of hepatic reproductive zinc turnover in female reproductive organs and body fluids.
4	regulation of the immune response 3 kinetic differences between thymus and bone marrow derived lymphocytes in the proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes	The regulation of the immune response 3 kinetic differences between thymus- and bone-marrow-derived lymphocytes in the proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes.
4	sheep red cell binding to human lymphocytes treated with neuraminidase enhancement of t cell binding and identification of a subpopulation of b cells	Binding of sheep erythrocytes to human lymphocytes treated with neuraminidase increases binding of t and l&apos lymphocytes; identification of one sub-population of b lymphocytes.
4	properties of purified pneumococcal hemolysin	Properties of purified pneumococcal hemolysin.
4	partial purification and properties of the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	The partial purification and properties of the two common hereditary forms of human erythrocyte epicotylate kinase.
4	kinetic studies on the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	Kinetic studies of the two common hereditary forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase.
4	the ionogenic nature of the secretory granule membrane electrokinetic properties of isolated chromaffin granules	The ionogenic nature of the secretory granule membrane electrokinetic properties of isolated chromaffin granules.
4	hemagglutination inhibition of passively sensitized red blood cells	Apos inhibition; hemagglutination of passively sensitized red blood cells.
4	influenza a neuraminidase antibody assay with sensitized erythrocytes	Test with sensitized erythrocytes as antibody to influenza neuraminidase.
4	blood volume determination in the mouse	This is blood volume determination in the mouse.
4	isoantigens a b and h in benign and malignant lesions of breast	Isoantigens a b and h in benign and malignant lesions of the breast.
4	cultivation techniques for the erythrocytic stages of malaria parasites	Culture techniques for the erythrocyte stages of malaria parasites.
4	effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on the ultrastructure of human and rabbit erythrocytes	The effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on the ultrastructure of human and rabbit erythrocytes.
4	agglutination of african primate and rodent erythrocytes by adenoviruses reoviruses and enteroviruses	Agglutination of primate and African rodent erythrocytes by adenovirus reoviruses and enteroviruses.
4	microtitration of bacillus cereus hemolysin	Microtitration of apos; haemolysin of bacillus cereus cereus.
4	fate of the nucleus of the marrow erythroblast	Fate of the nucleus of the bone marrow erythroblastoma.
4	effect of metrifonate on blood cholinesterases in children during the treatment of schistosomiasis	Effect of metrifonate on blood cholinesterases in children during the treatment of schistosomiasis.
4	purification of erythropoietin responsive cells by immune hemolysis	Purification of erythropoietin-sensitive cells by immune hemolysis.
4	chemical characterization and surface orientation of the major glycoprotein of the human erythrocyte membrane	Chemical characterization and surface orientation of the major glycoprotein of the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	isolation and characterization of 17 hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase from human erythrocytes	Isolation and characterization of 17 hydroxy steroid dehydrogenases from human erythrocytes.
4	characteristics of chloride transport in human red blood cells	Characteristics of chloride transport in human red blood cells.
4	antibodies and soluble tumour specific antigens in blood and lymph of rats with chemically induced sarcomata	Specific soluble antibodies and tumour antigens in blood and lymph of rats with chemically induced sarcomas.
4	the cytotoxic effect of mouse macrophages on syngeneic and allogeneic erythrocytes	L' cytotoxic effect of mouse macrophages on syngene and allogeneic erythrocytes.
4	air lead relation to lead in blood of black school children deficient in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	Relationship between lead in air and lead in blood of glucose-deficient black school children 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
4	mechanisms of immune lysis of red blood cells in vitro i paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	Mechanisms of infection; immunosis of red blood cells in vitro; paroxysmal cells; nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	effects of certain purified plasma proteins on the compatibility of glass with blood	The effects of certain purified plasma proteins on the compatibility of glass with blood.
4	electrophoretic mobility and agglutinability of red blood cells a new polymorphism in mice	Electrophoretic mobility and agglutinability of red blood cells, a new polymorphism in the mouse.
4	functional characteristics of peyer s patch lymphoid cells ii lipopolysaccharide is thymus dependent	The functional characteristics of peyer stain lymphoid cells ii lipopolysaccharide depend on thymus.
4	the separation of peripheral blood cells of the horse	Separation of peripheral blood cells from the horse.
4	viscoelastic properties of the human red blood cell membrane i deformation volume loss and rupture of red cells in micropipettes	Viscoelastic properties of the human erythrocyte membrane i loss of deformation volume and rupture of red blood cells in micropipettes.
4	pentose phosphate pathway inhibition in blood cells during anticonceptive hormone therapy	Inhibition of the pentose phosphate pathway in blood cells during contraceptive hormonal therapy.
4	effects of suramin on complement blood clotting fibrinolysis and kinin formation	The effects of suramine on fibrinolysis and coagulation kinin formation in complementary blood.
4	the relationships between arterial oxygen flow rate oxygen binding by hemoglobin and oxygen utilization after myocardial infarction	The relationship between blood flow, arterial oxygen, oxygen binding by the apos, hemoglobin and the apos; use of the apos; oxygen after a myocardial infarction.
4	ozone and human blood	Uh, ozone and human blood.
4	chemical action of influenza virus on the red blood cell membrane i action on membrane neuraminic acids	Chemical action of influenza virus on the erythrocyte membrane i action on membrane neuraminic acids.
4	microrheology and light transmission of blood iii the velocity of red cell aggregate formation	Microrheology and light transmission of blood iii the rate of red blood cell aggregation.
4	rapid flow cytofluorometric analysis of mammalian cell cycle by propidium iodide staining	Rapid flow cytofluorometric analysis of mammalian cell cycle by propidium iodide staining.
4	penitrem a intoxication of calves blood chemical and pathologic changes	Penitrem intoxication of calf blood chemical and pathological changes.
4	observations on rabbit thymocytes and peripheral t cells ii rosette formation with rabbit erythrocytes	Observations on rabbit thymocytes and peripheral t cells ii rosette formation with rabbit erythrocytes.
4	difficulty in blood typing after infusion of plasma substitutes relationship to erythrocyte sedimentation rate and rouleaux formation	Difficulty in determining blood type after plasma infusion replaces relationship with erythrocyte sedimentation rate and rouleau formation.
4	the use of 51cr for sheep red blood cell survival studies	The use of 51cr for sheep red blood cell survival studies.
4	metabolic changes in avian blood and their effects on determination of blood gases and ph	Metabolic changes in avian blood and effects on determination of blood gases and ph ph ph.
4	microcalorimetric measurements of heat production in whole blood and blood cells of normal persons	Microcalorimetric measurements of heat production in whole blood and blood cells of normal people.
4	erythropoiesis inhibiting factor s in intact and haemolyzed red blood cells	Inhibitors of apos; erythropoiesis in intact and hemolyzed red blood cells.
4	distribution of the blood group antigens a and b on human spermatozoa	Distribution of blood group antigens a and b on human spermatozoa.
4	erythrocyte receptors for plasmodium knowlesi malaria duffy blood group determinants	Erythrocyte receptors for plasmodium knowlesi malaria duffy blood group determinants.
4	phagocytosis of colloidal carbon and heterologous red blood cells in the bone marrow of rats and rabbits	Phagocytosis of colloidal carbon and heterologous red blood cells in the bone marrow of rats and rabbits.
4	blood volume	The volume of blood; hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem.
4	identification of strong sd a and sd a red cells by hemagglutinins from salvia horminum	Identification of red blood cells sd a and sd a by salvia horminum hemagglutinins.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxii the value of drug resistant strains of p berghei in screening for blood schizontocidal activity	Malaria chemotherapy in rodents xxii the value of drug-resistant strains of p berghei for detection of schizontocidal activity in the blood.
4	new observations on the malaria parasites of rodents of the central african republic plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov and plasmodium chabaudi landau 1965	New observations on the malaria parasites in rodents of the republic of Apos; central Africa plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov and plasmodium chabaudi landau 1965.
4	removal of leukocytes from whole blood and erythrocyte suspensions by filtration through cotton wool v results after transfusion of 1 820 units of filtered erythrocytes	The elimination of leukocytes from whole blood and erythrocyte suspensions by filtering in cotton wool resulted from the transfusion of 1,820 units of filtered erythrocytes.
4	physiologic effects of transfusing red blood cells with high or low affinity for oxygen to passively hyperventilated anemic baboons systemic and cerebral oxygen extraction	Erythrocytes with a high or low affinity for apos; oxygen to anemic baboons subjected to passive hyperventilation; extraction of apos; systemic and cerebral oxygen.
4	an evaluation of some factors affecting the detection of blood group antibodies by automated methods	The evaluation of certain factors affecting the detection of blood group antibodies using automated methods.
4	distribution of tocopherols in human plasma and red blood cells	Distribution of tocopherols in human plasma and red blood cells.
4	in vitro incorporation of 1 14c acetate by blood cells of normal ducks and ducks infected with plasmodium lophurae	In vitro incorporation of d' acetate 1,14c into blood cells of normal ducks and ducks infected with plasmodium lophurae.
4	guanine aminohydrolase in rat and mouse red cells a potent inhibitor of guanylation of trna	The guanine aminohydrolase of rat and mouse erythrocytes is a potent inhibitor of guanylation of trna.
4	cholesterol ester hydrolase in human red blood cells	The cholesterol ester hydrolase in human erythrocytes.
4	effect of zinc and cadmium on delta aminolevulinate dehydratase of red blood cells in protecting against enzyme losses during storage	The effect of zinc and cadmium on the immune system; amino acid,-levulinate dehydratase delta of erythrocytes for protection against enzymatic loss during storage.
4	anesthetic solubility coefficients for maternal and fetal blood	Anaesthetic solubility coefficients for maternal and fetal blood.
4	microinjection of thymidine kinase and bovine serum albumin into mammalian cells by fusion with red blood cells	Microinjection of thymidine kinase and bovine serum albumin into mammalian cells by fusion with red blood cells.
4	factitious changes in binding of oxygen to hemoglobin when based on extracellular ph in the presence of certain blood additives like radiographic contrast media	Fake changes in binding of apo; oxygen to apo; hemoglobin when based on extracellular phage in the presence of certain blood additives such as X-ray contrast media.
4	effect of formaldehyde on the circular dichroism of chicken erythrocyte chromatin	Effect of formaldehyde on the circular dichroism of chicken erythrocyte chromatin.
4	blood parasites of small wild mammals in czechoslovakia	The blood parasites of small wild mammals in Czechoslovakia.
4	variability of the iron copper and mercury contents of individual red blood cells	Variability of iron-copper and mercury content of individual red blood cells.
4	electrophoretic mobility of the fetal red blood cell	The electrophoretic mobility of the fetal red blood cell line.
4	molecular features of organic anion permeablity in ox red blood cell	Molecular characteristics of organic anion permeability in bovine red blood cells.
4	the effect of egg white on the phospholipid level in blood plasma erythrocytes and beta lipoproteins of healthy children	Eggs; effect of albumin; egg on the phospholipid level in plasma erythrocytes and beta-lipoproteins; healthy children.
4	chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to inhibition of anion exchange in human red blood cells	The chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to l' the inhibition of anion exchange in human erythrocytes.
4	effects of riboflavin repletion during different developmental phases on behavioral patterns brain nucleic acid and protein contents and erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity of male rats	Effects of riboflavin replication during different developmental phases on brain nucleic acid and protein behavioural profiles and l' erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity in male rats.
4	photodynamic effects of protoporphyrin on the architecture of erythrocyte membranes in protoporphyria and in normal red blood cells	Photodynamic effects of protoporphyrin on the apos; architecture of erythrocyte membranes in protoporphyria and normal red blood cells.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 2 degradation of ghosts by butanol and pyridine	Elimination of blood group determinants of bovine erythrocyte membranes 2 degradation of phantoms by butanol and pyridine.
4	effect on cytotoxicity antibodies in potential transplant recipients of leucocyte poor blood transfusion	Effect on cytotoxicity antibodies in potential recipients of low blood leukocyte transfusion.
4	influences of exercise and endurance training on the oxygen dissociation curve of blood under in vivo and in vitro conditions	Influences of exercise and apo; training; endurance on the dissociation curve of apo; blood oxygen under in vivo and in vitro conditions.
4	genetic disorders of human red blood cells	Genetic disorders of human red blood cells.
4	red blood cell acid phosphatase ambiguity in phenotype and activity estimations in the proof of the single allele states	Red cell acid phosphatase ambiguity in phenotype and activity estimates in the proof of the single allele states.
4	blood group a activities of glycoprotein and glycolipid from human erythrocyte membranes	Blood type has glycoprotein and glycolipid activities in human erythrocyte membranes.
4	adhesion of red blood cells to charged interfaces between immiscible liquids a new method	L' adhesion of red blood cells to charged interfaces between non-miscible liquids is a new method.
4	decreased haem synthetase activity in blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Hem synthetase in the blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphy.
4	respiratory function of blood in hibernating and non hibernating hedgehogs	The respiratory function of blood in hibernating and nonhibernating hedgehogs.
4	oxygen transport by haemoglobin a comparison of whole blood washed erythrocytes and haemoglobin solution	Carriage of oxygen by hemoglobin, a comparison of whole blood washed erythrocytes and dapos solution; hemoglobin.
4	hemorheology erythrocyte aggregation and non newtonian properties of blood new rheological law and the validity of casson s law for blood	L' hemorheology, l' erythrocyte aggregation and non-Newtonian blood properties, the new rheological law and the validity of the casson law for blood.
4	class differences in the antibody response of hlc and llc mice to sheep red blood cells	Class differences in the antibody response of hlc and llc mice to sheep erythrocytes.
4	comparison of electrophoretic mobility and membrane sialic acid content of erythrocytes from adult and umbilical cord blood	Comparison of electrophoretic mobility and membrane sialic acid content of erythrocytes from umbilical cord blood and adults.
4	abnormal brain scans contribution of blood radioactivity to image	The abnormal brain scans the contribution of blood radioactivity to image.
4	pharmacokinetics of haloalkylamines cyclization and distribution in blood in vitro and in vivo	Pharmacokinetics of haloalkylamine cyclization and distribution in blood in vitro and in vivo.
4	consequences of the chronic administration of phenformine on the blood thiamine level in the dog	The effects of apo; chronic administration of phenformin on blood thiamine levels in dogs.
4	transmembrane exchange of chloride with bicarbonate ion in mammalian red blood cells evidence for a sulphonamide sensitive carrier	Transmembrane exchange of chloride with bicarbonate ion in mammalian erythrocytes indicates the presence of apos, a sulfonamide-sensitive carrier.
4	exit of anaplasma marginale from bovine red blood cells	Exit d' marginal anaplasma of bovine red blood cells.
4	distribution of progesterone and its effect on human blood during storage	Distribution of progesterone and its effects on human blood during storage conditions.
4	exchange transfusion in reye s syndrome with saline washed red blood cells	Swap transfusions into rye syndrome with washed red blood cells in saline water.
4	a simple kit for the preparation of 99mtc labeled red blood cells	A simple kit for the preparation of the red blood cells labelled at 99 mtc.
4	relative activity of alpha tocopherol and gamma tocopherol in preventing oxidative red cell hemolysis	L' relative activity of l' alpha tocopherol and gamma tocopherol in prevention of l' oxidative red blood cell hemolysis.
4	oxygen transport in the blood of children with congenital heart defects	Lodging oxygen in the blood of children with congenital heart defects.
4	a comparison of intact human red blood cells and resealed and leaky ghosts with respect to their interactions with surface labelling agents and proteolytic enzymes	Comparison of intact human erythrocytes and resplicated and fleeing phantoms in their interactions with surface labeling agents and proteolytic enzymes.
4	gamma glutamyltransferase activity in the human red blood cell membrane author s transl	L' gamma glutamyltransferase activity in the human erythrocyte membrane is reported.
4	fetal blood sampling in midtrimester pregnancies	Fetal blood sampling in the middle trimester of pregnancy.
4	evaluation of the interaction between blood and foreign material in the pump oxygenator during open heart surgery in infants by scanning electron microscopy author s transl	Evaluation of apo; interaction between blood and foreign matter in the apo; pump oxygenator during open heart surgery in infants by scanning electron microscopy using translation of apo; author.
4	blood volume changes in hypersplenic rats	Blood volume changes in the hypersplenic rats.
4	unusual response to abo incompatible blood transfusion	Unusual response to abo blood transfusion incompatible.
4	effect of combined application of carboxylin and sodium citrate on the restoration of blood proteins under conditions of experimental anemia	Effect of lupus; combined application of carboxyline and sodium citrate on the restoration of blood proteins under conditions of drought; experimental anemia.
4	permanent in series cardiac assistance with the dynamic aortic patch blood prosthesis interaction in long term canine experiments	Serial permanent cardiac assistance with apo; dynamic aortic patch blood prosthesis interaction in long-term, canine experiments.
4	plasma and red blood cell phospholipids in chronic liver diseases	Erythrocyte and plasma phospholipids in chronic liver disease.
4	maturation and interrelationship of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in bone marrow peripheral blood and peritoneal cavity in terms of erythrophagocytic activity	Maturity and interrelation of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in peripheral bone marrow blood and peritoneal cavity in terms of apo; erythrophagocytic activity.
4	methionine adenosyltransferase cystathionine beta synthase and cystathionine gamma lyase activity of rat liver subcellular particles human blood cells and mixed white cells from rat bone marrow	L' methionine adenosyltransferase cystathionine beta synthase and cystathionine gamma lyase activity of rat liver subcellular particles, human blood cells and rat bone marrow mixed white blood cells.
4	redox metabolism of glutathione in the red blood cell	The redox metabolism of glutathione in red blood cells.
4	improved deformability of crenated red cells in hyperosmolar human blood by adenosine	Improvement of deformability of deformed red blood cells in hyperosmolar human blood by apos; adenosine.
4	biochemical and morphological changes in blood during growth of heifer during the 1st pregnancy and lactation in cows	Biochemical and morphological changes in blood during heifer growth during the first pregnancy, and lactation in cows.
4	studies on the reconstitution of bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase v preparation and properties of derivatives in which both zinc and copper sites contain copper	Studies on the reconstitution of bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase v preparation and properties of derivatives in which zinc and copper sites contain copper.
4	relation between various phospholipase actions on human red cell membranes and the interfacial phospholipid pressure in monolayers	Relationship between various phospholipase actions on human erythrocyte membranes and interfacial phospholipid pressure in the monolayers.
4	a study performed on batches of serum albumin used as diluents in rh testing a report to the international society of blood transfusion international committee for standardization in haematology by their albumin working party	A study conducted on @-@albumin serum lots used as diluent in the rh d&apos test; a report to the International Society of Blood Transfusion International committee for apo standardization; hematology by their albumin working group.
4	deformation and fragmentation of human red blood cells in turbulent shear flow	Deformation and fragmentation of human red blood cells in turbulent shear flow.
4	relationship between activation of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase by heating and blood lead level	Relationship between pH; activation of pH; aminolevulinic acid delta dehydratase by heating and blood lead levels.
4	trypsin activated complex of human factor b with cobra venom factor cvf cleaving c3 and c5 and generating a lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes ii physico chemical characterization of the activated complex	Trypsin-activated complex of human b factor with cobra venom cvf factor clone c3 and c5 and generate a lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes ii Physico-chemical characterization of the activated complex.
4	alterations in reactivity of the blood factors of cattle red cells after pronase treatment	Changes in blood factor responsiveness of bovine red blood cells after pronase treatment.
4	evidence for origin of certain childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemias and lymphomas in thymus derived lymphocytes	Evidence of apo; origin of some childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemias and lymphoma in thymus-derived lymphocytes.
4	isolation and identification of a new metabolite of naltrexone in human blood and urine	Isolation and identification of drugs; a new metabolite of naltrexone in human blood and urine.
4	relationship between lead concentration in blood and biological response for porphyrin metabolism in workers occupationally exposed to lead	Ratio of lead concentration in blood to the biological response to porphyrin metabolism in workers exposed to lead in the workplace.
4	characterization of protoporphyrin in red blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Characterization of protoporphyrin in red blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria.
4	blood volume changes and production and destruction of erythrocytes in newborn dogs	Changes in blood volume and production and destruction of erythrocytes in newborn-dogs.
4	blood groups antigens plasma protein and red cell isoenzyme polymorphisms in south west scotland	Erythrocyte polymorphisms in plasma protein and isoenzyme antigens in southern Scotland-west.
4	mercury in red blood cells in relation to organic mercury in hair	Mercury in red blood cells versus organic mercury in hair tissue.
4	an experimental method correcting for absorption flattening and scattering in suspensions of absorbing particles circular dichroism and absorption spectra of hemoglobin in situ in red blood cells	Experimental method correcting for flattening and diffusion by absorption in suspensions of absorbing particles circular dichroism and d&apos spectra; absorption of l' hemoglobin in situ in red cells.
4	in vitro effect of lead in blood on the determination of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydrase	In vitro effect of lead in blood on the determination of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydrase.
4	experimental verification of a mathematical model of plasma protein and erythrocyte regeneration after blood loss	Experimental testing of apos; a mathematical model of plasma protein and erythrocyte regeneration after blood loss.
4	interaction of red blood cells with a polarized electrode evidence of long range intermolecular forces	The interaction of erythrocytes with a polarized electrode demonstrates the existence of long-range intermolecular forces.
4	homologous gene expression in intergeneric fox hybrids alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i comparative electrophoretic analysis of blood proteins and enzymes in arctic and silver foxes	homologous gene expression in intergeneric alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i fox hybrids, comparative electrophoretic analysis of blood proteins and enzymes in arctic and silver foxes.
4	the effect of lead and cadmium on liver kidney and brain levels of cadmium copper lead manganese and zinc and on erythrocyte ala d activity in mice	The effects of lead and cadmium on the levels of cadmium, copper, manganese and zinc in the kidneys and brain and on the intestines; erythrocyte activity in mice.
4	action of glycosyl transferases upon bombay oh erythrocytes conversion to cells showing blood group h and a specificities	L' action of glycosyltransferases during the conversion of bombay oh erythrocytes into cells shows the blood group h and specificities.
4	erythrocyte agglutinins in the blood of certain ascidians	Erythrocyte agglutinins in the blood of certain ascidians.
4	on the structure of agglutinated sheep red blood cell membranes	On the structure of agglutinated sheep erythrocyte membranes.
4	some hereditary blood factors of the bengali muslim of bangladesh red cell enzymes haemoglobins and serum proteins	Some hereditary blood factors of the Muslim bengali hemoglobins and serum proteins of the Bangladeshis erythrocytes.
4	enrichment of erythrocytes of fetal origin from adult fetal blood mixtures via selective hemolysis of adult blood cells an aid to antenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies	Lapos; enrichment of adult erythrocytes; fetal origin from adult fetal blood mixtures by selective hemolysis of adult blood cells facilitates the antenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies.
4	haematological values for the finnish reindeer	Hematological values for the Finnish reindeer.
4	mechanisms of the acquired erythrocyte enzyme deficiencies in blood diseases	Mechanisms for the acquisition of erythrocyte enzyme deficiencies in blood diseases.
4	asparaginase entrapped in red blood cells action and survival	Trapped asparaginase in red blood cells action and survival.
4	mass spectrometric analysis of permethylated glycosphingolipids ii comparative studies on different blood group active and related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids	Mass spectrometric analysis of permethylated glycosphingolipids ii comparative studies of different active blood groups and related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids.
4	development of immunity against antigens of the a and b blood groups during postembryogenesis in chickens	The development of immunity against antigens of blood groups a and b during post-embryogenesis in chickens.
4	rheological studies of hb ss blood influence of hematocrit hypertonicity separation of cells deoxygenation and mixture with normal cells	Rheological studies of apos; blood influence of apos; hematocrit on apos; hypertonicity Separation of deoxygenating cells and mixing with normal cells.
4	mechanisms of destruction of human rhesus sensitized red blood cells	The mechanisms of destruction of the human rhesus sensitize the red blood cells of human blood.
4	the influence of magnesium ions on pyruvate kinase deficient red blood cells	L' influence of magnesium ions on pyruvate kinase-deficient erythrocytes.
4	studies on blood components of an air breathing siluroid fish heteropneustes fossilis bloch in relation to body weight	Studies on the blood components of a siluroid fish breathing air, heteropneustes fossilis bloch, in relation to body weight.
4	red blood cell catechol o methyl transferase and response to imipramine in unipolar depressive women	Red cell catechol o methyl transferase and response to imipramine in unipolar depressive women.
4	effect of anti inflammatory preparations on the process of thermogenesis in blood erythrocytes	Effect of anti-@-@ inflammatory preparations on the process of thermogenesis in blood erythrocytes.
4	anti b activity of a lectin coexistent with blood group h like substance in seeds of euonymus sieboldiana	L' antibody activity-b d' a lectin co-exists with a similar blood group H substance in seeds of euonymus sieboldiana.
4	measurement of free erythrocyte protoporphyrin in blood collected on filter paper as a screening test to detect lead poisoning in children	Measurement of free erythrocyte protoporphyrin in blood collected on filter paper as a test for lead poisoning in children.
4	chemical characterization and distribution of abo blood group active glycoprotein in human erythrocyte membrane	Chemical characterization and distribution of abo blood group active glycoprotein in human erythrocyte membrane.
4	hemagglutination inhibition studies for the evaluation of blood group antigens in ethanol soluble substances ess obtained from human baboon and vervet monkey red blood cells	Dosage studies; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination for apo; evaluation of blood group antigens in apo-soluble substances; ethanol from human baboon and vervet monkey red blood cells.
4	pharmacokinetics of red blood cell phenothiazine and clinical effects acute dystonic reactions	Pharmacokinetics of erythrocyte phenothiazine and clinical effects Acute dystonic reactions.
4	course of skin allografts in rabbits immunized by heterologous red blood cells	Cutaneous allografts in rabbits immunized with heterologous red blood cells.
4	blood levels of lead and erythrocyte ala dehydrase in 200 employees of a turin metallurgical plant analysis of variables connected with alcohol drinking and smoking habits	Blood levels of lead and dapos; erythrocyte ala dehydrating in 200 employees of d'apos; a metallurgical plant to turin, analysis of variables related to consumption of alcohol and tobacco.
4	differentiation of red blood cells in vitro	Differentiation of red blood cells in vitro.
4	one step separation of the sialoprotein possessing abh and mn blood group activities from human red cell membrane	One-step separation of sialoprotein with abh and mn blood group activities from human erythrocyte membrane.
4	identification of plant sterols in plasma and red blood cells of man and experimental animals	Identification of plant sterols in plasma and red blood cells of experimental animals and humans.
4	anti wrb and other autoantibodies responsible for positive direct antiglobulin tests in 150 individuals	Anti wrb and other auto-antibodies responsible for direct positive antiglobulin tests in 150 people.
4	angular scattering analysis of the circular dichroism of biological cells 2 the red blood cell	Angular diffusion analysis of the circular dichroism (CD) of biological cells 2 and red blood cells.
4	effects of ph during recombination of human erythrocyte membrane apoprotein and lipid	Effects of ph during recombination of human erythrocyte membrane lipids and apoprotein.
4	changes in vitro of the electrolyte content and erythrocyte volume of the venous blood of patients with chronic pneumopathy subjected to tonometry in oxygen	In vitro changes in the electrolyte content and volume of venous blood (VB) erythrocytes in patients with chronic pulmonary disease who are subjected to oxygen tonometry.
4	effect of broad and narrow spectrum fluorescent light on blood constituents	Effect of broad and narrow spectrum fluorescent light on blood components.
4	phenotypic expression of galactokinase deficiency in heterozygous and homozygous subjects in vivo and in vitro studies	A phenotypic expression of galactokinase deficiency in heterozygous and homozygous subjects in vivo and in vitro.
4	metabolism of 4 14c estrone by sheep erythrocytes around the time of parturition	Metabolism of 4 estrone 14c by sheep erythrocytes at parturition time.
4	experiences at the blood transfusion center of the socialist republic of serbia in providing aimed transfusions	Experiences in the blood transfusion centre of the Socialist Republic of Serbia to provide targeted transfusions.
4	case of rh e and kell antigen sensitization by blood transfusion	Cases of rh and kell antigen sensitization by blood transfusion.
4	the influence of the known radioprotective compounds on the metabolism of human red blood cell part ii the influence of cysteamine on enzymic systems	L' influence of known radioprotectant compounds on the metabolism of part ii of human erythrocytes, l' influence of cysteamine on enzyme systems.
4	effects of incorporated trypsin on anion exchange and membrane proteins in human red blood cell ghosts	Effects of incorporated trypsin on anion exchange and membrane proteins in phantom human red blood cells.
4	erythrocyte ph in respiratory and metabolic acid base disturbances studies on human blood in vitro	Erythrocyte in human blood in vitro studies of metabolic and respiratory disturbances of acidic bases.
4	distribution of sulfonamides and sulfonamide potentiators between red blood cells proteins and aqueous phases of the blood of different species	Distribution of potentiating sulfonamides and sulfonamides between red blood cell proteins and aqueous phases of the blood of different species.
4	problems in determination of oxygen dissociation of avian blood	Issues related to determination of dissociation of apo; oxygen in apo blood; bird through dissociation of apo; oxygen from apo blood; bird.
4	serial radionuclide determinations of the electron fraction with 99mtc labeled red blood cells	Determination of the electron fraction of radionuclides with red blood cells labelled at 99 mtc.
4	hemolysis and hemolysis mechanisms in congenital dyserythropoietic anemia cda of type i ii iii	Mechanisms of cardiac arrest; hemolysis and hemolysis; hemolysis; congenital dyserythropoietic anemia cda type iii iii.
4	polyamine distribution in cellular compartments of blood and in aging erythrocytes	Distribution of polyamines in cellular blood compartments and in aging erythrocytes.
4	attenuation measurements of whole blood and blood fractions in computed tomography	Measurements; attenuation of whole blood and blood fractions by computed tomography.
4	the effect of calf lymph and bovine red blood cells on in vitro cultivation of theileria parva infected lymphoid cells	Effect of calf lymph and bovine red blood cells on in vitro culture of Theileria parva infected lymphoid cells.
4	human red cell acid phosphatase quantitative evidence of a silent gene po and a danish population study	Human erythrocyte acid phosphatase, quantitative evidence of apos; existence of a silent gene po and apos; Danish population study.
4	red cell volume measurements and acute blood loss in high risk newborn infants	Red cell volume measurements and acute blood loss in high risk newborn infants.
4	detection of babes negri bodies in blood erythrocytes of rabid white mice	Blood erythrocytes of rabid white mice detect black baby bodies.
4	visualization of the human cavernosum penis by using 99mtc labeled autologous red blood cells	Visualization of the human cavernosum penis with the aid of autologous red blood cells labelled with 99mtc.
4	influence of oxygen and carbon dioxide on the plasma erythrocyte ph relationship in normal human whole blood	L' influence of oxygen and carbon dioxide on the ph relationship of normal human whole blood plasma erythrocytes.
4	use and analysis of saline washed red blood cells	Use and analysis of saline washed red blood cells.
4	regional quality control	Quality control at regional scale.
4	the removal of leukocytes and platelets from whole blood	Elimination of leukocytes and platelets from whole blood.
4	ss blood group associated pas staining polymorphism of glycoprotein 3 from human erythrocyte membranes	The ss blood group associates the polymorphism of glycoprotein 3 in human erythrocyte membranes with staining at-to-pas.
4	nature of the union between sheep red blood cells and t lymphocytes	Nature of the apos; union between sheep red blood cells and t lymphocytes.
4	potential difference and the distribution of ions across the human red blood cell membrane a study of the mechanism by which the fluorescent cation dis c3 5 reports membrane potential	Potential difference and distribution of ions across the human erythrocyte membrane, a study of the mechanism by which the fluorescent cation dis c3 5 reports the membrane potential.
4	red blood cell selection in chimeric mice	Red blood cell selection in chimeric mice.
4	blood group determinations in forensic dentistry	Blood type determination in forensic dentistry.
4	fast cell size distribution analysis by laser flow microphotometry applications to ciliate populations	Rapid cell size distribution analysis by laser flow microphotometry applications to ciliate populations.
4	routine freezing of red blood cells for transfusion in western australia	Systematic freezing of red blood cells for transfusion in western Australia.
4	carbonic anhydrase isozymes of blood and oviducal tissues of leghorn hens	Isozyme carbonic anhydrase in the blood and oviducal tissues of Leghorn chickens.
4	the blood groups serum groups red cell isoenzymes and haemoglobins of the sandawe and nyaturu of tanzania	The blood types include the erythrocyte isoenzymes and the hemoglobins of the sandawe and nyaturu of Tanzania.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxiv the blood schizontocidal action of erythromycin upon plasmodium berghei	The chemotherapy of malaria in rodents xxiv l' the blood-borne schizontocidal action of l' erythromycin on plasmodium berghei.
4	familial deficiency of glutathione reductase in human blood cells	Family deficiency of glutathione reductase in human blood cells.
4	peripheral blood elements found in an egyptian mummy a three dimensional view	The peripheral blood elements found in an Egyptian mummy a three-dimensional view.
4	erythrocyte morphology in genetic defects of the rh and kell blood group systems	Morphology of erythrocytes in the genetic defects of the rh and kell blood groups.
4	characterization of the antibody response of the marmoset to sheep red blood cells	Characterization of the immune response of marmoset to sheep red blood cells.
4	studies on blood eosinophils ii patients with l ffler s cardiomyopathy	Study of patients with eosinophils; cardiomyopathy with eosinophils ii in the blood.
4	the kurloff cell its differentiation in the blood and lymphatic system	The kurloff cell differentiates in the blood and lymphatic system.
4	suppression of immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice treated with preparations of a tumor cell component and in tumor bearing mice	Suppression of the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mice treated with preparations from tumor cells and in mice carrying tumours.
4	immunosuppressive activity of submaxillary gland extracts of the mouse i effect on antibody formation in response to sheep red blood cells	Lapos; immunosuppressive activity; gland extracts under @-@mice maxillary has an effect on antibody formation in response to sheep erythrocytes.
4	complement and fc receptors on cord blood and adult neutrophils	Fc and complementary receptors on cord blood and adult neutrophils.
4	respiratory characteristics of blood from basenji dogs with classical erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency	Respiratory characteristics of blood from basenji dogs with classic erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency.
4	the red blood cell esterase d polymorphism in europe and asia	L&apos polymorphism; red blood cell esterase in Europe and Asia.
4	antigenic relationships on the diphtheria toxin molecule antitoxin versus antitoxoid	Antigenic relationships on the diphtheria toxin molecule antitoxin versus antitoxoid.
4	direct determination of ligand interactions with beta adrenergic receptors on intact turkey erythrocytes correlation of binding with biological activity	Direct determination of ligand interactions with beta adrenergic receptors on intact turkey erythrocytes, correlation of binding with etapos; biological activity.
4	long term of phenytoin effects on whole blood and red cell folate and haematological parameters	Phenytoin's long-term effects on whole blood and erythrocyte folate and hematological parameters.
4	detection of anti red blood cell antibodies by treatment of the cells with neuraminidase	The detection of the antibody-erythrocytes by treatment of cells with neuraminidase.
4	quantitative determination of blood loss by means of 51 cr labeled erythrocytes in occult hemorrhages of the gastrointestinal tract	Quantitative determination of blood loss by 51c-labeled erythrocytes in occult haemorrhages of the gastro-intestinal tract.
4	survival of 51cr tagged red blood cells in patients with artificial heart valves author s transl	Survival of 51cr-labelled red blood cells in patients with artificial heart valves.
4	formation of glutathione conjugates of prostaglandin a1 in human red blood cells	Formation of glutathione conjugates of prostaglandin a1 in human erythrocytes.
4	loading of human red blood cells with dna and rna	Loading human red blood cells with DNA and rna cells.
4	changes in the erythrocyte membrane during blood preservation influence of progesterone	The changes in the erythrocyte membrane during blood storage influence progesterone.
4	effect of sodium para aminosalicylate on oxygen affinity in normal sickle and fetal human blood	Effect of sodium para aminosalicylate on appetite; oxygen in normal and fetal human blood.
4	changes in red blood cell volume on fixation in glutaraldehyde solutions	Changes in red blood cell volume during binding in glutaraldehyde solutions.
4	the rational use of blood	L' the rational use of blood.
4	neuroleptic drug levels and therapeutic response preliminary observations with red blood cell bound butaperazine	Neuroleptic drug rate and therapeutic response Preliminary observations with red blood cell butaperazine.
4	lymphocyte subpopulations in the peripheral blood of patients with farmer s lung	Under-lymphocyte populations in the peripheral blood of patients with d&apos lungs; farmers.
4	electrophoresis of glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in erythrocytes from malaria infected animals	Electrophoresis of glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in d&apos erythrocytes; malaria infected animals.
4	morphological features of red blood cells in subjects with sickle cell trait changes during exercise	The morphological characteristics of erythrocytes of subjects with sickle cell disease change during exercise.
4	clinical trials of immunization with the towne 125 strain of human cytomegalovirus	Clinical trials of apo; immunization with towne 125 strain of human cytomegalovirus.
4	multiple myeloma an immunologic profile i peripheral blood studies	Multiple myeloma and immunologic profile i peripheral blood studies.
4	the blood groups and other heriditary blood factors of yemenite and kurdish jews	The blood types and other blood factors of the Jews of Yemen and Kurdish.
4	acetylcholinesterase of erythrocytes in various blood diseases	L' acetylcholinesterase of erythrocytes in various blood diseases.
4	seasonal changes in the makeup of the red blood of healthy children	Seasonal changes in the composition of healthy children's red blood.
4	haematological changes associated with the mcleod phenotype of the kell blood group system	Hematological changes associated with the mcleod phenotype of the kell blood group system.
4	electrokinetic properties of formed elements in blood exposed to physical factors	Electrokinetic properties of elements formed in the blood exposed to physical factors.
4	physical chemical characterization of living cells by laser flow microfluorometry	Physico-chemical characterization of living cells by laser flow microfluorometry.
4	the influence of the combination of coumarin and troxerutin on infantile blood parameter in lactation period short communication author s transl	The influence of the combination of coumarin and troxerutin on the infant blood parameters during lactation.
4	the effects of zinc on the morphology of sickle red blood cell ghosts as observed by scanning electron microscopy	The effects of zinc on the morphology of sickle cell ghosts as observed by scanning electron microscopy.
4	electronic measurement of red cell flow in micropipettes	An electronic measurement of the globular flow in micropipettes.
4	the relationship between the red cell forms and surface area during thyroxine induced metamorphosis in rana cyanophlyctis	The relationship between red blood cell shape and surface area during thyroxine administration induced metamorphosis in rana cyanophlyctis.
4	thiamine content and enzyme activity in blood cells in leukemia	Thiamine content and enzyme activity in blood cells during leukemia.
4	purification of normal human eosinophils using the different binding capacities of blood leucocytes for complexed rabbit igg	Purification of normal human eosinophils using the different binding capacities of blood leukocytes for complexed rabbit igg.
4	the substance reacting with srbc sheep red blood cells and rabbit igg isolation under mild conditions from rat thymus	The substance reacts with sheep srbc and l&apos red blood cells; rabbit igg isolation under mild conditions from rat thymus.
4	blood of the common indian weaver birds ploceus philippinus and ploceus benghalensis linnaeus	The blood of ploceus philippinus and ploceus benghalensis linnaeus of the Indian weaver.
4	the human blood platelet its derivation from the red blood cell a morphologic study	The human blood platelet is derived from the human erythrocyte, a morphological study.
4	regulation of blood pyridoxal phosphate in riboflavin deficiency in man	Effect of pyridoxal phosphate on riboflavin in men, J. Toxicol.
4	human lymphocyte subpopulations giant human red blood cell rosettes	Sub-human lymphocyte populations Giant human red blood cell rosettes.
4	a carbohydrate deficient membrane glycoprotein in human erythrocytes of phenotype s s	A carbohydrate-deficient membrane glycoprotein in human erythrocytes of phenotype s s.
4	effects of selenium and vitamin e on blood selenium levels tissue glutathione peroxidase activities and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified or hay diets	Effect of selenium and vitamin e on blood selenium levels, liver, tissue glutathione peroxidase activity, and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified diets or hay.
4	phagocytosis of old red blood cells by macrophages from syngeneic mice in vitro	Phagocytosis of old red blood cells by macrophages of syngenic mice in vitro.
4	turbulent flow of red cells in dilute suspensions effect on kinetics of o2 uptake	L' turbulent flow of red blood cells in dilute suspensions affects the kinetics of apos; absorption of apos; oxygen.
4	anti lu14 a lutheran antibody defining the product of an allele at the lu8 blood group locus	Anti-lu14 a Lutheran antibody that defines the product d' an allele at the blood group locus lu8.
4	blood group d antigen content of nucleated red cell precursors	Antigen content of nucleated red blood cell precursors in blood group d.
4	a photodecomposition fluorimetric method for determination of riboflavin in the various constitutents of blood	A fluorometric photodecomposition method for the determination of riboflavin in the various blood components.
4	distribution of riboflavin in blood in women and in prenates	Pre-natal distribution of riboflavin in the blood of women and women.
4	stabilization of flow properties of blood with phenylbenzo gama pyrone derivatives flavonoids	Stabilization of d&apos properties; flow of blood with phenylbenzo gama pyrone-derived flavonoids.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells	Removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells.
4	crossreactivity with sporozoites exoerythrocytic forms and blood schizonts of plasmodium berghei in indirect fluorescent antibody tests with sera of rats immunized with sporozoites or infected blood	Cross-reactivity with exoerythrocytic sporozoites and blood schizonts of plasmodium berghei in indirect fluorescence tests with sera from rats immunized with sporozoites or infected blood.
4	factors affecting the exchange of tocopherol between red blood cells and plasma	Factors affecting the apos; tocopherol exchange between red blood cells and plasma.
4	relationship between blood zinc level and eeg changes under the influence of hyperpnea in normal subjects	The relationship between blood zinc levels and changes in glucose; eg, influence of apo; hyperpnea in normal subjects.
4	blood group abh specific macroglycolipids of human erythrocytes isolation in high yield from a crude membrane glycoprotein fraction	Apos-specific abh macroglycolipid blood group; isolation of human erythrocytes in high yield from d' a crude fraction of membrane glycoproteins.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group determinant onto erythrocytes isolation and identification of a blocker	Transfer of bovine blood group determinant to apo; erythrocyte isolation and identification of a blocker.
4	selective depression of blood group antigens associated with hereditary ovalocytosis among melanesians	Hereditary oocytosis in melanesians; selective depression of blood group antigens associated with apos.
4	an automated method of differential red blood cell classification with application to the diagnosis of anemia	Automated differential red blood cell classification method for diagnosis of anemia.
4	uniform lateral orientation caused by flow forces of flat particles in flow through systems	Uniform lateral orientation caused by flow forces; flow of flat particles into systems; flow.
4	altered humoral immune response to sheep red blood cells by sheep erythrocyte soluble hemolysate	Modification of the humoral immune response to sheep red blood cells by sheep erythrocyte soluble hemolysate.
4	porphyrins in erythrocytes and blood plasma preliminary studies with qualitative thin layer chromatography	The porphyrins in erythrocytes and blood plasma preliminary studies with qualitative thin-layer chromatography.
4	the use of frozen thawed erythrocytes in blood banking a report of 28 months experience in a large transfusion service	The use of thawed frozen erythrocytes in blood banks reported 28 months experience in a large transfusion service.
4	relationship between microvascular blood velocity and pressure distribution	Relationship between microvascular blood velocity and pressure distribution.
4	bovine peripheral blood monocyte cultures growth characteristics and cellular receptors for immunoglobulin g and complement	Growth characteristics of bovine peripheral blood monocyte cultures and cellular receptors for immunoglobulin g and complement.
4	an interpretation of human diaphorase isozymes in terms of three gene loci dia1 dia2 and dia3	An interpretation of human diaphorase isozymes in terms of three gene loci dia1 dia2 and dia3 is proposed.
4	autoxidation and effects of pro and antioxidants in lyophilized red blood cell membranes	Autoxidation and effects of pro and antioxidants in lyophilized erythrocyte membranes.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group activity to human erythrocytes in vitro	In vitro transfer of bovine blood group activity to human erythrocytes.
4	an attempt to separate mononuclear cells fused with human red blood cell ghosts from a cell mixture treated with hvj sendai virus using a fluorescence activated cell sorter facs ii	An attempt to separate mononuclear cells fused with human phantom red blood cells; a mixture of cells treated with the Hvj virus sent to apos; an aid to apos; a cell sorter activated by fluorescence ii.
4	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia types i and ii aberrant pattern of erythrocyte membrane proteins in cda ii as revealed by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Congenital dyserythropoietic anemia of types i and ii, aberrant pattern of erythrocyte membrane proteins in cda ii as revealed by two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
4	scintigraphic assessment of vascularity and blood tissue barrier of human brain tumours	Scintigraphic evaluation of the vascularity and blood tissue barrier of human brain tumours.
4	genetic structure of an isolated group of the indigenous population of northern siberia nganasans tavgiitsi of taymyr i history erythrocyte and serum blood systems isoenzymes	Genetic structure d' an isolated group from the indigenous population of northern Siberia nganasans tavgiitsi of taymyr i history of erythrocytes and serum isoenzymous blood systems.
4	the relationship between extra and intracellular lithium concentration in human red blood cells an in vitro study	The relationship between extracellular and intracellular lithium concentration in human erythrocytes was investigated in an in vitro study.
4	nuclear steady state rna from chicken immature red blood cells distribution of globin coding and poly a sequences	Apos nuclear RNA; apos state; equilibrium from immature chicken erythrocytes; distribution of globin and poly a coding sequences.
4	relations between surface charge and in vitro lysis of red blood cells in paroxysmal nocturnal haemoglobinuria	Relationships between surface charge and in vitro lysis of red blood cells in paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	angiotensinase activity in red blood cell membranes and intact adrenal cells	L' apos activity; angiotensinase in erythrocyte membranes and intact adrenal cells.
4	the present state of haemorheology methods findings and significance with regard to physiology and pathology of the blood circulation author s transl	L' current state of procedures; discovered hemorheology and apo; importance in physiology and pathology of apo; author of blood circulation translated.
4	change of oxygen affinity of hemoglobin in different conditions of blood preservation	Changes in pH; pH; hemoglobin for apos; oxygen under different conditions of storage of blood.
4	agglutination of the red blood cells after experimental glycolytic alteration	Agglutination of red blood cells after experimental glycolytic alteration.
4	a like specificity in tn activated erythrocytes of blood group b	Similar specificity in tn activated erythrocytes of blood group b.
4	changes in the membrane proteins of blood cells in the course of embryonal megaloerythropoiesis in relation to hemoglobin maturation	Changes in the membrane proteins of blood cells during embryonic megal erythropoiesis in relation to etapos maturation; hemoglobin.
4	methemoglobin formation and binding to blood constituents as indicators for the formation availability and reactivity of activated metabolites derived from trans 4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines	Methemoglobin formation and binding to blood components are indicators of the availability and reactivity of activated metabolites derived from trans @-@4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines.
4	antigens of the blood group i and i on the surfacc of chicken erythrocytes	The blood group antigens i and i on the surfacc of chicken erythrocytes.
4	transfusion requirements of patients with enzyme deficient red blood cells	Transfusion requirements for patients with enzyme deficient red blood cells.
4	identification of the cl transport site of human red blood cells by a kinetic analysis of the inhibitory effects of a chemical probe	Identification of the cl transport site of human red blood cells by kinetic analysis of inhibitory effects of a chemical probe.
5	the concentration of glucose in mammalian liver	The concentration of glucose in mammalian liver.
5	a continuous flow method for the determination of glucose uptake by excised rat diaphragm	A continuous flow method for the determination of glucose uptake by the diaphragm of excised rat.
5	effect of galactose 1 phosphate on glucose oxidation by normal and galactosemic leukocytes	Effect of galactose phosphate 1 on glucose oxidation by normal and galactosemic leukocytes.
5	true glucose content of lumbar and ventricular cerebrospinal fluid	Real glucose content of lumbar and ventricular spinal fluid.
5	enthalpy changes associated with the lactic fermentation of glucose	D&apos changes; enthalpy associated with the lactic fermentation of glucose.
5	effects of veratrine and cocaine on cerebral carbohydrate amino acid interrelations	Effects of veratrin and cocaine on cerebral carbohydrate amino acid relationships.
5	glycogen synthesis from uridine diphosphate glucose the distribution of the enzyme in liver cell fractions	Glycogen synthesis from glucose uridine diphosphates the distribution of the enzyme in liver cell fractions.
5	dissimilation of glucose and gluconic acid by pseudomonas natriegens	Dissolution of glucose and glucose and gluconic acid by pseudomonas natriegens.
5	glucose dehydrogenation in bacteria a comparative study	Glucose dehydrogenation in bacteria is a comparative study.
5	a growth stimulating factor for an epithelial cell line in a reduced serum medium	Growth-promoting factor; an epithelial cell line in a reduced serum medium.
5	oxidative assimilation and distribution of glucose in bacillus cereus	Oxidative assimilation and distribution of glucose in the cereus bacillus.
5	citric acid fermentation of sugars purified with chelating resin	Apos fermentation; citric acid purified sugars with chelating resin.
5	the effect of exogenous energy sources on the synthesis of beta galactosidase in resting cell suspensions of escherichia coli	The effect of exogenous sources on the synthesis of beta galactosidase in resting cell suspensions of escherichia coli.
5	glucose 6 phosphatase and the exchange of glucose with glucose 6 phosphate	Glucose 6 phosphatase and l' exchange of glucose with glucose 6 phosphate.
5	intravenous nutrition a clinical evaluation of a 50 per cent dextrose in water solution containing 1 mg of hydrocortisone per 100 ml	Intravenous Nutrition: clinical evaluation of an aqueous solution containing 50% dextrose, containing 1 mg of dextrose; and hydrocortisone per 100 mL.
5	the inheritance of the glucose component of the phage nucleic acids	L' inheritance of the glucose component of the phage nucleic acids.
5	tryptophanase tryptophan synthetase systems in escherichia coli ii effect of glucose	Tryptophanase tryptophan synthetase systems in escherichia coli ii effect of glucose.
5	permeability of bacterial spores i characterization of glucose uptake	Permeability of bacterial spores i characterization of glucose uptake.
5	inhibitory effects of carbohydrates on histamine release and mast cell disruption by dextran	The inhibitory effects of carbohydrates on histamine release and mast cell disruption by dextran.
5	glucose uptake and dissimilation by x irradiated starved and division inhibited yeast	Glucose absorption and dissimilation by starved and divided irradiated yeasts inhibited yeast.
5	biosynthesis and biosynthetic pathways of pentoses in escherichia coli	Biosynthesis and biosynthetic pathways of pentoses in escherichia coli.
5	enzymes of glucose and pyruvate catabolism in cells spores and germinated spores of clostridium botulinum	The enzymes of glucose and pyruvate catabolism in cellular spores and germinated spores of clostridium botulinum.
5	substrate specificity of a glucose permease of escherichia coli	Specificity of the substrate d' glucose permease d' escherichia coli.
5	conditions affecting bacillus megaterium spore germination in glucose or various nitrogenous compounds	Conditions affecting bacillus megaterium spore germination in glucose or various nitrogen compounds.
5	cysteine stimulation of glucose oxidation in thyroid tissue	Apos cysteine stimulation; glucose oxidation in thyroid tissue.
5	convulsive syndrome in rabbits injected with fat emulsion and heparin	Convulsive syndrome in rabbits injected with fat emulsion and liverworts; heparin.
5	multicomponent substrate utilization by natural populations and a pure culture of escherichia coli	Multi-component substrate use by natural populations and pure culture of d' escherichia coli.
5	trachoma agent glucose utilization by purified suspensions	L' use of glucose by purified suspensions as trachoma agent.
5	fermentative activities of control and radiation killed spores of clostridium botulinum	Control fermentation and radiation activities killed spores of Clostridium botulinum.
5	freezing out technique applied to the concentration of biologically active materials	A freezing technique applied to the concentration of biologically active materials.
5	nutritional requirements for the production of herpes simplex virus i influence of glucose and glutamine of herpes simplex virus production by hela cells	Nutritional requirements for the production of apovirus; herpes simplex virus influences glucose and glutamine production of apovirus; herpes simplex virus from helical cells.
5	glyoxylate metabolism in growth and sporulation of bacillus cereus	Glyoxylate metabolism in growth and sporulation of bacillus cereus.
5	carbohydrate and lipid content of radiation resistant and sensitive strains of escherichia coli	Carbohydrate and lipid content of radiation-sensitive and radiation-resistant strains of escherichia coli.
5	utilization of arginine as an energy source for the growth of streptococcus faecalis	The use of apos; arginine as a source of protein; energy for the growth of streptococcus faecalis.
5	physiological changes occurring in yeast undergoing glucose repression	Physiological changes occurring in yeast undergoing glucose repression.
5	enzymatic utilization of glucose by a basidiomycete	Enzymatic utilization of glucose by a basidiomycete.
5	effect of glucose on the activity of hypothalamic feeding centers	Effect of glucose on the apos; activity of hypothalamic food centers.
5	isocitrate lyase and malate synthase in pseudomonas indigofera i suppression and stimulation during growth	Isocitrate lyase and malate synthase in pseudomonas indigofera i suppression and stimulation during growth.
5	studies on the physiology of rickettsiae iii glucose phosphorylation and hexokinase activity in coxiella burnetii	Studies on the physiology of glucose phosphorylation and apos; apos; hexokinase activity in coxiella burnetii.
5	purification and characterization of a growth stimulant for bacillus species	The purification and characterization of a growth stimulant for bacillary species.
5	2 ketogluconate fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fermentation of 2 ketogluconates by streptococcus faecalis.
5	nutritional requirements of bacillus popilliae	The nutritional requirements of the bacillus popilliae.
5	accumulation of phosphorus compounds by mucor racemosus	L' accumulation of phosphorus compounds by racemosus mucor.
5	control of isocitratase formation in rhizopus nigricans	Control of isocitratase formation in rhizopus nigricans.
5	in vitro inhibition of yeast growth by mouse ascites fluid and serum	In vitro, l'apos; inhibition of yeast growth by mouse and serum fluid.
5	green fluorescent pigment accumulated by a mutant of cellvibrio gilvus	Fluorescent green pigment accumulated by a mutant of cellvibrio gilvus.
5	staphylococci in competition iv effect of starch and kind and concentration of sugar on staphylococcal growth in mixed populations	Staphylococci in competition iv effect of starch and the nature and concentration of sugar on staphylococcal growth in mixed populations.
5	mechanism of glucose transport across the yeast cell membrane	Mechanisms of glucose transport across the yeast cell membrane.
5	quantitative studies of the effect of organic substrates and 2 4 dinitrophenol on heterotrophic carbon dioxide fixation in hydrogenomonas facilis	Quantitative studies of the effect of organic substrates and 24 dinitrophenol on heterotrophic carbon dioxide fixation in apo; Hydroomonas facilis.
5	the frictional coefficients of the flows of non electrolytes through artificial membranes	Friction coefficients of electrolyte flows of non-electrolytes through artificial membranes.
5	prediction of discrimination from generalization after variations in schedule of reinforcement	The prediction of discrimination from generalization after variations in the reinforcement schedule.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus subtilis	Pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus subtilis.
5	effect of bacterial polysaccharide accumulation on infiltration of water through sand	Effect of bacterial polysaccharide accumulation on apos; infiltration of apos; water in sand.
5	sequential substrate removal in response to qualitative shock loading of activated sludge systems	Sequential substrate removal in response to qualitative shock loading of activated sludge systems.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of acetobacter and azotobacter	Models d' oxidative assimilation in acetobacter and d' azotobacter.
5	induced biosynthesis of alpha amylase by growing cultures of bacillus stearothermophilus	The biosynthesis of alpha amylase was induced by stearothermophilus growing cultures.
5	de novo synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus stearothermophilus	A de novo synthesis of l' alpha-amylase by stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	streptomycin formation by intact mycelium of streptomyces griseus	Streptomycin formation by intact mycelium of streptomyces griseus.
5	sugar transport in a psychrophilic yeast	Sugar transport in a psychrophilic yeast?
5	physiology of the enterococci as related to their taxonomy	Physiology of the enterococci in relation to their taxonomy.
5	nutrition of cellular slime molds iii specific growth requirements of polysphondylium pallidum	Feeding of cellular slime molds iii specific growth requirements of polysphondylium pallidum.
5	biosynthesis of ribose and deoxyribose in pseudomonas saccharophila	Biosynthesis of ribose and deoxyribose in pseudomonas saccharophila.
5	intestinal disaccharidases absence in two species of sea lions	Absence of intestinal disaccharidases in two species of sea lions.
5	mechanisms in the inhibition of microorganisms by sorbic acid	Mechanisms of action; inhibition of microorganisms by sorbic acid.
5	glucose catabolism by bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Glucose catabolism by bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus.
5	chemically defined synthetic media for sporulation and for germination and growth of bacillus subtilis	Chemically defined synthetic media for sporulation, germination and growth of bacillus subtilis.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus cereus	Acute pathways of glucose catabolism in the cereus bacillus.
5	changes in terminal respiratory pathways of intact cells of bacillus cereus at various stages of development	Changes in the terminal respiratory tract of intact cells of bacillus cereus at various developmental stages.
5	pathways for biosynthesis of a bacterial capsular polysaccharide iv capsule resynthesis by decapsulated resting cell suspensions	Pathways of biosynthesis; a bacterial capsular polysaccharide IV capsule by decapsulated resting cell suspensions.
5	purification and properties of n acetyl d glucosamine kinase from streptococcus pyogenes	The purification and properties of nacetyl glucosamine kinase from streptococcus pyogenes.
5	aerobic fermentation and the depletion of the amino acid pool in yeast cells	Aerobic fermentation and depletion of the amino acid pool in yeast cells.
5	glucose transfer from adenosine diphosphate glucose to starch in preparations of waxy seeds	Glucose transfer from glucose; adenosine diphosphate glucose to starch in waxy seed preparations.
5	production of lipase by pseudomonas fragi in a synthetic medium	Lipase production by pseudomonas fragi in a synthetic medium.
5	effect of carbohydrates in phosphate buffer on germination of bacillus stearothermophilus spores	Effect of carbohydrate in phosphate buffer on spore germination of stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	dynamics of acridine orange cell interaction ii dye induced ultrastructural changes in multivesicular bodies acridine orange particles	L&apos dynamics; acridine orange cell interaction ii the dye induces ultrastructural changes in multivesicular bodies of acridine orange particles.
5	protection of renal function during surgery of the abdominal aorta	Protection of renal function during surgery of the abdominal aorta.
5	an evaluation of some commercial test papers and tablets for the determination of glucose in urine	Evaluation of certain tests and commercial tablets for the determination of glucose in urine.
5	a synthetic acyl polysaccharide and the hemagglutination activity	It is a synthetic polysaccharide; acyl and l-apos; activity d'apos; hemagglutination.
5	action of dihydrostreptomycin and antagonism by cations	L' action of dihydrostreptomycin and l' antagonism by cations.
5	viability and metabolism of staphylococcus aureus after freezing lyophilization and irradiation	The viability and metabolism of staphylococcus aureus after freeze-drying and irradiation.
5	nutritional and regulatory aspects of serine metabolism in escherichia coli	The nutritional and regulatory aspects of serine metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	growth and extracellular polysaccharide production by rhizobium meliloti in defined medium	Growth and extracellular polysaccharide production by rhizobium meliloti in a defined medium.
5	immune diffusion analysis of the extracellular soluble antigens of two strains of rhizobium meliloti	Immune diffusion analysis of extracellular soluble antigens of two strains of rhizobium meliloti.
5	bone cells biochemical and biological studies after enzymatic isolation	Bone cell biochemical and biological studies after enzyme isolation.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of pseudomonas and achromobacter	D&apos models; oxidative assimilation in pseudomonas and d&apos strains; achromobacter.
5	electron transport components of streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Elements of streptomycin-dependent electron transport of escherichia coli.
5	glucose metabolism of two strains of mycoplasma laidlawii	Glucose metabolism of two strains of mycoplasma laidlawii.
5	inhibitory action of phage k on staphylococcal dehydrogenases i effect on various strains of staphylococcus aureus including members of the phage typing series	L' inhibitory action of phage k on staphylococcal dehydrogenases i has effects on various strains of staphylococcus aureus including members of the phage series.
5	induction of alpha amylase of bacillus stearothermophilus by maltodextrins	Induction of alpha amylase of stearothermophilus bacillus by maltodextrins.
5	kinases of streptococcus faecalis i enzyme localization	The kinases of streptococcus faecalis i the localization of the enzyme i.
5	selective inhibition of proline induced pigmentation in washed cells of serratia marcescens	L' selective inhibition of proline induced pigmentation in washed serratia marcescens cells.
5	turbidity change during glucose permeation in escherichia coli	Change in turbidity during glucose permeation in escherichia coli.
5	metabolic role of the br factor in butyribacterium rettgeri	The metabolic role of the br factor in butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	conversion of glucose c14 to propionate by the rumen microbiota	Conversion of glucose c14 to propionate by the rumen microflora.
5	oxidative assimilation by bacillus megaterium	Acute oxidative assimilation by bacillus megaterium.
5	influence of growth medium on assimilatory activities of escherichia coli	Influence of growth medium on potato activities; assimilation of potato; escherichia coli.
5	comparative physiology of antibiotic resistant strains of staphylococcus aureus	Comparison of the physiology of antibiotic resistant strains of staphylococcus aureus.
5	biosynthesis of serine in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	The biosynthesis of serine in Escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
5	carbohydrate nutrition and sporulation of allescheria boydii	Glucid nutrition and sporulation of children; allescheria boydii.
5	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium novyi from soil	Isolate toxigenic strains of Clostridium novyi from the soil.
5	effect of catalase and cultural conditions on growth of beggiatoa	Effect of catalase and cultural conditions on growth of beggiatoa.
5	factors that influence toxigenicity of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Factors that influence toxigenicity of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	benzo a pyrene uptake by bacteria and yeast	Absorption of benzo a pyrene by bacteria and yeasts.
5	actinomycin d inhibition of protein synthesis unrelated to effect on template rna synthesis	Apos inhibition; actinomycin d inhibition of protein synthesis unrelated to apos; effect on rna matrix synthesis.
5	the role of polyphosphates in the transport mechanism of glucose in yeast cells	The role of polyphosphates in the transport mechanism of glucose in yeast cells.
5	effect of glucose on the capacity of escherichia coli to be infected by a virulent lamba bacteriophage	The effect of glucose on the ability of Escherichia coli; to be infected by a virulent bacteriophage lamba.
5	growth stasis by accumulated l alpha glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	Growth stage due to accumulation of alpha glycerophosphate in Escherichia coli.
5	extracellular polysaccharides of algae effects on life support systems	Extracellular polysaccharides of algae effects on life support systems.
5	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus i carbohydrate sources for the production of protease and streptomycin	Fermentation studies with griseus streptomycin carbohydrate sources for the production of protease and streptomycin.
5	production of calcium gluconate by penicillium chrysogenum in submerged culture	Production of calcium gluconate by penicillium chrysogenum in submerged culture.
5	adaptive changes in enzyme activity and metabolic pathways in adipose tissue from meal fed rats	Adaptive alterations of the enzymes; enzyme activity and metabolic pathways in adipose tissue of fed rats.
5	effect of phenol on bacillus subtilis spores at elevated temperatures	Effect of phenol on bacillus subtilis spores at high temperatures.
5	the use of gas liquid chromatography in the analysis of neutral monosaccharides in hydrolysates of gastric mucopolysaccharides	Use of-liquid chromatography for the analysis of neutral monosaccharides in hydrolysates of gastric mucopolysaccharides.
5	effects of intravenous infusions of acetate beta hydroxybutyrate triglyceride and other metabolites on the composition of the milk fat and blood in cows	Effect of intravenous infusions of d' acetate beta-hydroxybutyrate triglyceride and d' other metabolites on the composition of milk fat and blood in cows.
5	constitution viability and lactate dehydrogenase in stationary phase l cell suspension cultures	Constitution viability and lactate dehydrogenase in stationary phase l cell suspension cultures.
5	sorbose counterflow as a measure of intracellular glucose in baker s yeast	Sorbose vs.-flux as a measure of intracellular glucose in baking.
5	morphology of mycoplasma laidlawii type a ii effect of glucose on growth and cellular morphology	Morphology of mycoplasma laidlawii type ii effect of glucose on growth and cell morphology.
5	quantitative studies on glycolytic enzymes in lactobacillus plantarum ii intracellular concentrations of glycolytic intermediates in glucose metabolizing washed cells	Quantitative studies of glycolytic enzymes in lactobacillus plantarum ii intracellular concentrations of glycolytic intermediates in washed cells metabolizing glucose.
5	host parasite relationships among group a streptococci i hyaluronic acid production by virulent and avirulent strains	Relationships between streptococcal group parasites and hyaluronic acid production by virulent and avirulent strains.
5	fate of the mesosomes of bacillus megaterium during protoplasting	The fate of the mesosomes of the megaterium bacillus during protoplasty.
5	metabolism of intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relation to inducible enzyme formation	Metabolism of intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relation to inducible enzyme formation.
5	the chemotherapy of cardiac arrest	The chemotherapy of the apos; cardiac arrest.
5	mechanism of action of nalidixic acid on escherichia coli	Mechanisms; action of nalidixic acid on escherichia coli.
5	metabolic nonequivalence of the two glucose moieties of cellobiose in cellvibrio gilvus	The metabolic non-equivalence of the two glucose moieties of cellobiose in cellvibrio gilvus.
5	fumarate reduction and its role in the diversion of glucose fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fumarate reduction and its role in the diversion of glucose fermentation by streptococcus faecalis.
5	lactate degrading system in butyribacterium rettgeri subject to glucose repression	Lactate degrading system in glucose repression-prone Butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	biochemistry of nitrate respiration in pseudomonas stutzeri i aerobic and nitrate respiration routes of carbohydrate catabolism	The biochemistry of nitrate respiration in pseudomonas stutzeri i aerobic and nitrate carbohydrate catabolism.
5	cyst formation and poly beta hydroxybutyric acid accumulation in azotobacter	Cyste formation and the accumulation of beta-hydroxybutyric acid in azotobacteria.
5	oxidation and assimilation of carbohydrates by micrococcus sodonensis	The oxidation and assimilation of carbohydrates by micrococcus sodonensis.
5	factors affecting the formation of cobamide coenzymes in clostridium tetanomorphum	Factors affecting the formation of cobamid coenzymes in clostridium tetanomorphum.
5	fructose 6 phosphate reductase from salmonella gallinarum	Fructose 6 phosphate reductase from Salmonella gallinarum.
5	morphological aberration of arthrobacter globiformis cells due to biotin deficiency	Morphological aberration of d&apos cells; arthrobacter globiformis cells due to a deficiency of biotin.
5	production and characterization of multiple layered populations of animal cells	Multi-layer populations of animal cells are produced and characterised.
5	regulation of cockroach fat body metabolism by the corpus cardiacum in vitro	Regulation of cockroach fat body metabolism by the cardiac body in vitro.
5	intestinal metabolism of fatty acids	Intestinal metabolism of fatty acids.
5	the biosynthesis of streptomycin the origin of the c formyl group of streptose	Streptomycin biosynthesis is apos; origin of the c formyl group of streptosis.
5	estimation of the pentose cycle in the perfused cow s udder	Estimation of the pentose cycle in the perfused cow's udder.
5	the metabolism of glucose by the rabbit lens in the presence and absence of oxygen	The metabolism of glucose by the rabbit lens in the presence and absence of oxygen.
5	the cell walls of group d streptococci i the immunochemistry of the type 1 carbohydrate	The cell walls of the streptococci of the group D'lapos; immunochemistry of carbohydrates type 1.
5	autonomic mediation of the effect of raised arterial glucose upon free fatty acids	Self-limiting modification of glucose; effect of increased arterial glucose on free fatty acids.
5	chemotaxis in bacteria	It's called chemotaxis in bacteria.
5	feedback inhibition of glycerol kinase a catabolic enzyme in escherichia coli	Retroinhibition of glycerol kinase, a catabolic enzyme in escherichia coli.
5	effect of oxygen supply rates on growth of escherichia coli	Effect of oxygen levels on growth of escherichia coli.
5	effect of tryptophan on growth and morphology of hansenula schneggii cells	Effect of tryptophan on the growth and morphology of hansenula schneggii cells.
5	effects of prolonged incubation of isolated fat cells on their response to hormones stimulating lipolysis and glucose metabolism	Effects of apo; prolonged incubation of isolated fat cells on their response to hormones stimulating lipolysis and glucose metabolism.
5	sorbitol pathway presence in nerve and cord with substrate accumulation in diabetes	Absence of sorbitol in nerve and spinal cord with substrate accumulation in diabetes.
5	polysaccharide produced by the genus pullularia ii trans alpha glucosidation by acetone cells of pullularia	Polysaccharide produced by the genus pullularia ii trans alpha glucosidation by acetonic cells of pullularia.
5	nitrite reductase of escherichia coli specific for reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Nitrite reductase d' escherichia coli specific for nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced.
5	endogenous metabolism of azotobacter agilis	Acute endogenous metabolism of azotobacter agilis.
5	respiration of mengovirus infected l 929 cells	Respiration of mengovirus infected l 929 cells.
5	the effect of inhibitors on intestinal transfer of glucose and fluid	L' effect of inhibitors on intestinal transfer of glucose and fluid.
5	respiratory activity and maintenance of cell suspensions of rat liver	Respiratory activity and maintenance of cell suspensions in rat liver.
5	brain transplantation prolonged survival of brain after carotid jugular interposition	Brain graft prolonged survival of the brain after carotid jugular interposition.
5	ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes occurrence in bacillus licheniformis	The ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes are present in the bacillus licheniformis.
5	sequential substrate removal in a dilute system by heterogeneous microbial populations	Sequential elimination of substrate in a dilute system by heterogeneous microbial populations.
5	heterotrophic growth and production of xanthophylls by chlorella pyrenoidosa	Heterotrophic growth and production of xanthophylls by pyrenoidosa-chlorella.
5	effect of diet on the activity of several enzymes in extracts of rumen microorganisms	The effect of diet on the activity of several enzymes in extracts of microorganisms from the rumen.
5	isolation identification and metabolic role of the sudanophilic granules of zoogloea ramigera	Identification and metabolic role of the sudanophilic granules of zoogloea ramigera.
5	carbohydrate catabolism of mima polymorpha i supplemental energy from glucose added to a growth medium	Carbohydrate catabolism of polymorpha mimo supplements; energy from glucose added to a growth medium.
5	altered end product patterns and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	End product profile changes and catabolite repression in escherichia coli.
5	physiology of growth and sporulation in bacillus cereus i effect of glutamic and other amino acids	Physiology of growth and sporulation in the cereal bacillus effect of glutamic and other amino acids.
5	effects of organic matter on the growth of thiobacillus intermedius	The effects of organic matter on the growth of thiobacillus intermedius.
5	colorado tick fever virus in cell culture ii physical and chemical properties	Coloured tick fever virus in cell culture ii physical and chemical properties.
5	susceptibility and resistance of several fungi to microbial lysis	Vulnerability and resistance of several fungi to microbial lysis.
5	influence of exogenous substrates on the endogenous respiration of pseudomonas aeruginosa	L' influence of exogenous substrates on the endogenous respiration of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	purification and properties of adenosine 5 triphospae d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	Purification and properties of adenosine 5 glucose triphospae 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo effect of dietary fat or starvation on conversion of 14 glucose into fat ad turnover of newly synthsized fat	Dosage studies; in vivo effect of dietary fat or fast lipogenesis on conversion of 14 glucose to turnover of newly synthesized fats.
5	effects of insulin induced hypoglycaemia on the fate of glucose carbon atoms in the mouse	Insulin-induced hypoglycaemia on the fate of glucose carbon atoms in mice.
5	the effect of different hormonal conditions on the concentration and oxidoreduction state of the nicotinamide nucleotides of rat liver	Los; effect of different hormonal conditions on the concentration and rate; state of onset; nicotinamide nucleotide oxidation in rat liver.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in liver from foetal and neonatal sheep	Carbohydrate metabolism in liver from fetal and neonatal sheep.
5	carbon dioxide effects on glucose catabolism by mixed microbial cultures	Effects of carbon dioxide on glucose catabolism by mixed microbial cultures.
5	changes in the intracellular concentrations of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast on different carbon sources	Changes in intracellular phosphate concentrations of d' adenosine and nicotinamide nucleotides during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast on different carbon sources.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue factors influencing the increase in enzyme activity produced on incubation of tissue from starved rats in vitro	Clear-factor lipase in adipose tissue factors influences apos; increase in apos; enzyme activity produced during apos; incubation of tissue from food-deprived rats in vitro.
5	acceleration of renal gluconeogenesis by ketone bodies and fatty acids	Acceleration of renal gluconeogenesis by keto bodies and fatty acids.
5	factors affecting the rate of killing of escherichia coli by repeated freezing and thawing	Deteriorating factors affecting the rate of destruction of apos; Escherichia coli by repeated freezing and thawing.
5	replication of mycoplasma pneumoniae in broth culture	The replication of mycoplasma pneumoniae in culture broth.
5	relationship of carbon dioxide to aspartic acid and glutamic acid in actinomyces naeslundii	Relationship between carbon dioxide, l&apos, aspartic acid and l&apos, and glutamic acid in actinomyces naeslundii.
5	circumvention of the mycobactin requirement of mycobacterium paratuberculosis	Circumvention of mycobacterium paratuberculosis (mycobacterium paratuberculosis) mycobacterium requirement.
5	enzymes of glucose catabolism in a member of the psittacosis group	The enzymes of glucose catabolism in a member of the psittacosis group.
5	volatile fatty acid requirement of a strain of listeria monocytogenes	For example, a strain of listeria monocytogenes is required.
5	the fate of acetyl groups derived from glucose in the isolated perfused goat udder	The fate of acetyl groups derived from glucose in isolated perfused goat pistachio.
5	the development of invertase activity in slices of the root of beta vulgaris l washed under aseptic conditions	The development of invertase activity in aseptically washed slices of beta vulgaris root.
5	the biosynthesis of polysaccharides incorporation of d 1 14c glucose and d 6 14c glucose into plum leaf polysaccharides	The biosynthesis of polysaccharides incorporated into plum leaf polysaccharides 1,140c glucose and 614c glucose.
5	glucosylated nucleotide sequences from t even bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acids	Glucosylated nucleotide sequences from deoxyribonucleic acids of bacteriophage t.
5	some properties of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase of rat liver and their relation to the control of gluconeogenesis	Some properties of fructose 16 diphosphatase from rat liver and its relation to the control of gluconeogenesis.
5	rate of utilization of glucose and compartmentation of alpha oxoglutarate and glutamate in rat brain	Glucose utilization and compartmentation of alpha oxoglutarate and glutamate in rat brain.
5	citrate and the conversion of carbohydate into fat activities of citrate cleavage enzyme and acetate thiokinase in livers of normal and diabetic rats	Citrate and the conversion of carbohydrates into fat-like activities of the enzymes citrate and l&apos cleavage; acetate thiokinase in the livers of normal and diabetic rats.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds synthesis of cell constituents by methane and methanol grown pseudomonas methanica	Microbial growth on c1 compounds synthesized cell components by methane and methanol grown pseudomonas methanica.
5	properties of phosphofructokinase from rat liver and their relation to the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis	The properties of rat liver phosphofructokinase and their relation to the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis.
5	taste reception in the goat sheep and calf	Taste the reception in the sheep and goat calf.
5	carp myogens of white and red muscles gross isolation on sephadex columns of the low molecular weight components and examination of their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis	White and red carp myogenes crude isolation on serphadex columns of the low molecular weight components and examination of their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis.
5	further studies on the regulation of amino sugar metabolism in bacillus subtilis	Other studies on the regulation of amino sugar metabolism in bacillus subtilis.
5	incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide into sugar phosphates carboxylic acids and amino acids by clostridium thermoaceticum	The incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide into phosphates, carboxylic acids and amino acids by Clostridium thermoaceticum.
5	effects of growth rate and limiting substrate on glucose metabolism in escherichia coli	Effects of growth rate and limiting substrate on glucose metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	release of nitrogenous substances by brewer s yeast iv energetics in shock excretion of amino acids	Release of nitrogen-containing substances by yeast brewer iv energy in yeast; shock excretion of amino acids.
5	repression of tryptophanase synthesis in escherichia coli	The repression of tryptophanase synthesis in Escherichia coli.
5	the incorporation of labelled amino sugars by bacillus subtilis	L' incorporation of amino sugars labelled by subtilis bacillus.
5	glutathione peroxidase in lens and a source of hydrogen peroxide in aqueous humour	Glutathione peroxidase in lentil and a source of hydrogen peroxide in aqueous humor.
5	synthesis of the carbohydrate of mucus in the golgi complex as shown by electron microscope radioautography of goblet cells from rats injected with glucose h3	Electron microscopic radioautography of caliciform cells from rats injected with glucose h3 showed the synthesis of carbohydrate from mucus in the golgi complex.
5	radioautographic comparison of the uptake of galactose h and glucose h3 in the golgi region of various cells secreting glycoproteins or mucopolysaccharides	Radioautographic comparison of l' absorption of galactose h and glucose h3 in the Golgi region of various cells secreting glycoproteins or mucopolysaccharides.
5	sites of glycogen synthesis in rat liver cells as shown by electron microscope radioautography after administration of glucose h3	The sites of glycogen synthesis in rat liver cells were revealed by electron microscopy radioautography after h3 glucose administration.
5	nitrate ions potentiation of increased permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction	Nitrate ions potentiate the increased permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction.
5	bacterial nutritional approach to mechanisms of oxygen toxicity	Bacterial nutritional approach to mechanisms of oxygen toxicity.
5	aging of escherichia coli	Age of onset; Escherichia coli.
5	effects of inhibition and repression on the utilization of substrates by heterogeneous bacterial communities	Effect of inhibition and repression on the plants; use of substrates by heterogeneous bacterial communities.
5	a transglucosylase of streptococcus bovis	It's a transglucosylase from streptococcus bovis.
5	endocrine factors in endometrial carcinoma a preliminary report	Preliminary report on endocrine factors in endometrial carcinoma.
5	entry of glucose carbon into amino acids of rat brain and liver in vivo after injection of uniformly 14 c labelled glucose	L' entry of glucose carbon into amino acids of rat brain and liver in vivo after birth; 14 c uniformly labelled glucose injection.
5	the route of ethanol formation in zymomonas mobilis	The pathway of ethanol formation in zymomonas mobilis.
5	sucrose utilization by zymomonas mobilis formation of a levan	Sucrose utilization by zymomonas mobilis formation of levan.
5	activities of some enzymes concerned with citrate and glucose metabolism in transplanted rat hepatomas	Some enzymes involved in citrate and glucose metabolism in hepatoma of transplanted rats.
5	changes in dry weight protein deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and reserve and structural carbohydrate during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast	Changes in ribonucleic acid content of deoxyribonucleic acid, dry weight proteins, structural reserves and carbohydrates during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast.
5	the immunochemistry of shigella flexneri lipopolysaccharides a quantitative analysis of their monosaccharide constituents	L' immunochemistry of Shigella flexneri lipopolysaccharides is a quantitative analysis of their monosaccharide components.
5	synthesis of reserve materials for endogenous metabolism in streptococcus faecalis	Synthesis of storage materials for endogenous metabolism in streptococcus faecalis.
5	amino acid utilization by alcaligenes viscolactis for growth and slime production	Use of amino acids by alkaligenes viscolactis for growth and mucus production.
5	evidence for centers in the central nervous system that regulate fat mobilization in dogs	Evidence of centers in the central nervous system that regulate fat mobilization in dogs.
5	the permeability of the gastric mucosa of dog	Permeability of the gastric mucosa of the dog.
5	the influence of thyroid gland on amino acid accumulation and protein synthesis by rat small intestine in vitro	L' influence of thyroid gland on amino acid accumulation and protein synthesis in rat small intestine in vitro.
5	the inhibition of streptococci by lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and hydrogen peroxide the effect of the inhibitory system on susceptible and resistant strains of group n streptococci	L' inhibition of streptococci by lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and peroxide; hydrogen, l' effect of the inhibitory system on susceptible and resistant streptococcal group n strains.
5	a continuous fermentation technique for studying the kinetics of sugar uptake by baker s yeast	Continuous fermentation technique for the study of the kinetics of sugar absorption by baking yeast.
5	enzymatic basis for d arbitol production by saccharomyces rouxii	Enzymatic basis for d arbitrol production by saccharomyces rouxii.
5	influence of aeration and of pantothenate on growth yields of zymomonas mobilis	L' influence of aeration and pantothenate on growth yields of zymomonas mobilis.
5	major products of glucose dissimilation by pseudomonas natriegens	The major products of glucose dissimilation by pseudomonas natriegens.
5	effect of various conditions on accumulation of oxytetracycline in escherichia coli	Effects of various conditions on accumulation of oxytetracycline in escherichia coli.
5	phenethyl alcohol i effect on macromolecular synthesis of escherichia coli	Effect of apos; phenethyl alcohol on macromolecular synthesis of escherichia coli.
5	type specific polysaccharide antigens of group b streptococci ii the chemical basis for serological specificity of the type ii hcl antigen	Specific polysaccharide antigens of the type of group b streptococci ii are the chemical basis for serological specificity of the type ii hcl antigen.
5	increased plasma arginine vasopressin in clinical adrenocortical insufficeincy and its inhibition by glucosteroids	The plasma arginine vasopressin increased in the adrenal clinical and its inhibition by glucosteroids.
5	glucose titration studies in patients with chronic progressive renal disease	Glucose titration studies in patients with chronic progressive renal failure.
5	on the mechanism of the splay in the glucose titration curve in advanced experimental renal disease in the rat	On the mechanism of splay in the glucose titration curve in advanced experimental renal disease in rats.
5	studies on the biochemistry of penicillium charlesii influence of various dicarboxylic acids on galactocarolose synthesis	Studies of the biochemistry of penicillium charlesii influences various dicarboxylic acids on galactocarolose synthesis.
5	influence of ethanol on the metabolism of perfused normal fatty and cirrhotic rat livers	L' influence of ethanol on the metabolism of normal fat-perfused and cirrhotic livers.
5	some properties of rat liver glucose adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases	Some properties of rat liver glucose adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases.
5	influence of glutamic acid on the endogenous respiration of bacillus subtilis	Influence of l' glutamic acid on the endogenous respiration of the bacillus subtilis.
5	glucose c14 metabolism of dormant and activated ascospores of neurospora	Glucose metabolism c14 of dormant and activated ascospores of neurospore.
5	chemical degradation of dipicolinic acid c14 and its application in biosynthesis by penicillium citreo viride	Chemical degradation of l' dipicolinic acid c14 and its application in biosynthesis by virid penicillium citreo.
5	influence of lipid components of mycoplasma laidlawii membranes on osmotic fragility of cells	L' influence of lipid components of mycoplasma laidlawii membranes on osmotic fragility of cells.
5	anatomical connections between medial and lateral regions of the hypothalamus concerned with food intake	Anatomical connections between the mid and lateral regions of the apos; hypothalamus; food intake.
5	anomeric bond character in the pyranose sugars	Anomeric bond character in pyranosic sugars.
5	the relationship of pregnancy vaginal candidiasis and glucose metabolism	The relationship between pregnancy vaginal candidiasis and glucose metabolism.
5	toxigenicity of clostridium histolyticum	The toxigenicity of clostridium histolyticum.
5	relationship of lipoprotein lipase activity to triglyceride uptake in adipose tissue	The ratio of lipoprotein lipase activity to lipid lipase activity; triglyceride absorption in adipose tissue.
5	ethanolamine phosphoglycerides effect on the properties of myelinoid lecithin water systems	Phosphoglycerides of l' ethanolamine have an effect on the properties of aqueous lecithin-based myelin systems.
5	sex differences in taste preference for glucose and saccharin solutions	Gender differences in taste preference for glucose and saccharin solutions.
5	growth of a thermophilic bacterium on hydrocarbons a new source of single cell protein	Growth of d' a thermophilic bacterium on hydrocarbons, a new source of unicellular proteins.
5	cell permeability a factor in the biotin oleate relationship in lactobacillus arabinosus ii effect of oleic acid and other surfactants on free biotin uptake	Cellular permeability is a factor in the biotin oleate relationship in lactobacillus arabinosus ii, l' oleic acid and d&apos effect; other surfactants on apos; free biotin absorption.
5	transaminase activity and other enzymatic reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in chlamydia psittacosis trachoma group	L' transaminase and d' other enzyme reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in chlamydia psittacosis trachoma.
5	cell wall constituents of leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides	Cell wall components of leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides.
5	function of growth factors for rumen microorganisms i nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium	Function of growth factors for rumen microorganisms i nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium.
5	mechanisms of pathogenesis in listeria monocytogenes infection 3 carbohydrate metabolism	Mechanisms of pathogenesis in listeria monocytogenes infection 3 carbohydrate metabolism.
5	effect of glucose on the formation of the membrane bound electron transport system in haemophilus parainfluenzae	Effect of glucose on the formation of the membrane-bound electron transport system in haemophilus parainfluenzae.
5	pathway of glucose fermentation in relation to the taxonomy of bifidobacteria	Route of glucose fermentation in relation to the taxonomy of bifidobacteria.
5	metabolic requirements for microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus megaterium	Metabolic requirements for microcycle sporogenesis of megaterium bacillus.
5	comparative study of the cell walls of the yeastlike and mycelial phases of histoplasma capsulatum	Comparative study of the cell walls of the yeast-like and mycelial phases of l'apos; histoplasma capsulatum.
5	comparison of growth and primary shunt product formation by claviceps purpurea cultured on succinic acid and glucose as carbon sources	Comparison of growth and primary product formation by claviceps purpurea derivative grown on l' succinic acid and glucose as carbon sources.
5	effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on the composition and structure of the cell wall of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on the composition and structure of the cell wall of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	methane production from glucose in vitro by mixed rumen bacteria	Methane production from glucose in vitro by mixed rumen bacteria.
5	metabolic phases during the development of granulation tissue	Metabolic phases during the development of granulation tissue.
5	metabolic relationships of the isolated fractions of the pectic substances of actively growing sycamore cells	Metabolic relationships of fractions isolated from the pectic substances of actively growing sycamore cells.
5	effect of available water on thermal resistance of three nonsporeforming species of bacteria	Impact of available water on thermal resistance of three non-sporing bacteria species.
5	the beta glucosidase of the yeast cell surface	The beta-glucosidase activity of the yeast cell surface.
5	relationship between fatty acid and glucose utilization in ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Relationship between fatty acid and glucose utilization in ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
5	hyperglycemia during intravenous fluid therapy a clue to the presence of diabetes mellitus	L' hyperglycemia during intravenous fluid therapy is an indication of the presence of diabetes mellitus.
5	effect of ingestion of saline glucose and ethanol on mobilization and hepatic incorporation of epididymal pad palmitate 1 14c in rats	Effect of vomiting; ingestion of saline glucose and vomiting; ethanol on mobilization and vomiting; hepatic incorporation of epididymal cushion palmitate 1-14c in the rat.
5	distribution of c 14 from glucose 1 c 14 in the lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii	Distribution of c 14 from glucose 1 c 14 in the lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii.
5	galactose repression of beta galactosidase induction in escherichia coli	Galactose repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli induction.
5	a radioautographic study of glyceride synthesis in vivo during intestinal absorption of fats and labeled glucose	A radioautographic study of glyceride synthesis in vivo during intestinal absorption of labelled fat and glucose.
5	studies on the respiratory metabolism of isolated human adipose cells	Studies of the respiratory metabolism of isolated human fat cells.
5	the fate of isotopic carbon in kidney cortex synthesizing glucose from lactate	The fate of isotopic carbon in the renalic cortex synthesizing glucose from lactate.
5	transfer of propionate by rat small intestine in vitro	In vitro transfer of propionate by small intestine of rat.
5	energy supply and cell yield in aerobically growth microorganisms	Energy intake and cell yield in aerobic growth-promoting microorganisms.
5	mechanisms of protection of trehalase against heat inactivation in neurospora	Mechanisms for protection of trehalase against heat inactivation in neurospora.
5	cell walls of group d streptococci ii chemical studies on the type 1 antigen purified from the autolytic digest of cell walls	The cell walls of group d ii streptococci have been subjected to chemical studies on the apos; type 1 antigen purified by autolytic digestion of the cell walls.
5	synchrony of nuclear replication in individual hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Synchronization of nuclear replication in individual hyphae of aspergillus nidulans.
5	catabolite repression in the facultative chemoautotroph thiobacillus novellus	Catabolic repression in the facultative chemoautotroph thiobacillus novellus.
5	urea production and putrescine biosynthesis by escherichia coli	Urea production and putrescine biosynthesis by escherichia coli.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in streptomycetes ii isolation and enzymatic synthesis of trehalose	Carbohydrate metabolism in streptomycetes ii isolation and enzyme synthesis of trehalose.
5	deoxyribonucleic acid repair replication after ultraviolet light or x ray exposure of bacteria	Apos repair replica; deoxyribonucleic acid after exposure to ultraviolet light or bacterial X-rays.
5	role of a cell wall glucan degrading enzyme in mating of schizophyllum commune	Role of cell wall glucan degrading enzyme in common schizophyllum mating.
5	streptococcal sialidase i isolation and properties of sialidase produced by group k streptococcus	Sialidase i streptococcal isolation and properties of sialidase produced by group k streptococcus.
5	effect of glucose on carbon dioxide assimilation and substrate oxidation by ferrobacillus ferrooxidans	Effect of glucose on carbon dioxide assimilation and oxidation of substrate by ferrobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	effect of different nutritional conditions on the synthesis of tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes	Effect of different nutritional conditions on the synthesis of tricarboxylic acid (TRA) enzymes.
5	release of proteinase from mycelium of mucor hiemalis	Release of proteinase from mycelium of mucor hiemalis.
5	glucose catabolism in micrococcus sodonensis	Glucose catabolism in micrococcus sodonensis.
5	the effect of uranyl nitrate on intestinal transfer of hexoses	The effect of uranyl nitrate on intestinal transfer of hexoses.
5	glucose metabolism during ontogeny of intestinal active sugar transport in the chick	Glucose metabolism during apo; intestinal transport ontogeny of active sugars in chick.
5	immunochemical studies on the group and type antigens of group f streptococci and the identification of a grouplike carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an undesignated group antigen	Immunochemical studies on the group and type antigens of group f streptococci and identification of d' a group-like carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an unspecified group antigen.
5	properties of the glutamate transport system in escherichia coli	The properties of the glutamate transport system in escherichia coli.
5	the cell wall of rickettsia mooseri i morphology and chemical composition	Morphology and chemical composition of the cell wall of rickettsia mooseri i.
5	factors affecting the pathways of glucose catabolism and the tricarboxylic acid cycle in pseudomonas natriegens	Factors affecting the pathways of glucose catabolism and the tricarboxylic acid cycle in pseudomonas natriegens.
5	gluconate metabolism in escherichia coli	Gluconate metabolism in Escherichia coli.
5	comparative glucose catabolism of xanthomonas species	Comparison of the glucose catabolism of xanthomonas species.
5	mode of filamentous growth of leucothrix mucor in pure culture and in nature as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography	Filamentous growth of leucothrix mucor in pure culture and in the field as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography.
5	d arabinose countertransport in bakers yeast	D'Arabinose vs.-transport in the yeast bakery.
5	catabolite repression and pyruvate metabolism in escherichia coli	Catabolic repression and pyruvate metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in leukocytes vii metabolism of glucose acetate and propionate by human plasma cells	Carbohydrate metabolism in leukocytes vii metabolism of glucose acetate and propionate by human plasma cells.
5	basal plasma glucagon levels of man	Baseline plasma glucagon levels in humans.
5	studies on the intracerebral toxicity of ammonia	Studies of the intracerebral toxicity of apos; ammonia.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the wernicke korsakoff syndrome	Acute cerebral blood flow and metabolism in Wernicke Korsakoff syndrome.
5	a function of the golgi apparatus in polysaccharide synthesis and transport in the root cap cells of wheat	A function of l' golgi apparatus in polysaccharide synthesis and transport in cells of the wheat cap.
5	the precursors of the xylene ring in riboflavine	The precursors of the xylene ring in riboflavin.
5	formation of glucose from hexoses pentoses polyols and related substances in kidney cortex	The formation of glucose from polyol pentose hexoses and related substances in the renal cortex.
5	energy requirement for l glutamate uptake and utilization by hansenula subpelliculosa cells	Hansenula subpelliculosa cells need time; energy to absorb and utilize glutamate l.
5	metabolism of d mannose in aerobacter aerogenes evidence for a cyclic pathway	The metabolism of d mannose in aerobacter aerogenes indicates the existence of a cyclic pathway.
5	effect of sugars on transport of alanine in intestine	Effect of sugars on transport of alanine in the intestine.
5	the role of humoral factors in the dumping syndrome experimentally induced dumping before and after portal systemic shunt	The role of humoral factors in the dumping syndrome experimentally induces dumping before and after systemic gate shunting.
5	aerobic metabolism of streptococcus agalactiae	Acute aerobic metabolism of streptococcus agalactiae.
5	protein synthesis in sonically damaged escherichia coli	Protein synthesis in ultrasonically damaged escherichia coli.
5	effect of glucose on the oxidation of beta nitropropionic acid by aspergillus flavus	The effect of glucose on apos; oxidation of apos; nitropropionic beta acid by apos; aspergillus flavus.
5	chemically characterized media for study of foot and mouth disease virus in baby hamster kidney cells	Chemically characterized media for apo; study of foot-and-mouth disease virus in baby hamster kidney cells.
5	production and stabilization of cells of bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Production and stabilization of cells of the popilliae bacillus and the lentimorbus bacillus.
5	characteristics of the vegetative growth of bacillus popilliae	Characteristics of the vegetative growth of popilliae.
5	pilot plant glycerol production with a slow feed osmophilic yeast fermentation	Pilot plant glycerol production with slow fermentation of slow-feeding osmophilic yeasts.
5	staphylococcal alpha toxin effects on artificial lipid spherules	Staphylococcal alpha toxin effects on artificial lipid spherules.
5	studies on the effect of experimental nonketotic diabetes mellitus on antibacterial defense i demonstration of a defect in phagocytosis	Studies on the effects of experimental non-keto-induced diabetes mellitus on antibacterial defense i showing a defect in phagocytosis.
5	polydipsia elicited by the synergistic action of a saccharin and glucose solution	Polydipsia caused by the synergistic action of sucrose, a solution of saccharin and glucose.
5	the effect of deprivation of glucose on the ultrastructure and function of the superior cervical ganglion of the rat in vitro	The effect of glucose deprivation on the ultrastructure and function of the upper cervical ganglion of the rat in vitro.
5	membranes of animal cells ii the metabolism and turnover of the surface membrane	Membranes of animal cells ii metabolism and renewal of the surface membrane.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes ii the macromolecular state of leukocyte glycogen	Glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes ii lapos; macromolecular state of leukocyte glycogen.
5	the importance of glucose in the oxidative metabolism of the testis of the conscious ram and the role of the pentose cycle	L' importance of glucose in the oxidative metabolism of the testis of conscious sheep and the role of the pentose cycle.
5	brain metabolism during fasting	Brain metabolism during fast.
5	influence of ph on the growth characteristics of neisseria gonorrhoeae in continuous culture	L' influence of ph on the growth characteristics of Neisseria gonorrhoeae in continuous culture.
5	organic acid production by basidiomycetes 3 cultural conditions for l malic acid production	Organic acid production by basidiomycetes 3 cultural conditions for potato production; malic acid 1.
5	sweet sensitive protein from bovine taste buds isolation and assay	Sugar sensitive protein from yeast; isolation of bovine taste buds and yeast; test.
5	further properties and possibel mechanism of action of adenosine 5 triphosphate d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	Other properties and possible mechanism of action of adenosine 5 glucose triphosphate 6 rat liver phosphotransferase.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates incorporation of hexose into glycogen	Study of glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates; incorporation of l' hexose into glycogen.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates glycogen synthesis from glucose monophosphates and uridine diphosphate glucose	Studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates; glycogen synthesis from glucose monophosphates and d&apos diphosphate; uridine; glucose.
5	the glucoamylase of coniophora cerebella	The glucoamylase of coniophora cerebella.
5	effect of thyroidectomy on pathways of glucose metabolism in lactating rat mammary gland	Effect of thyroidectomy on the pathways of glucose metabolism in the lactating rat mammary.
5	identification of guanosine diphosphate derivatives of d xylose d mannose d glucose and d galactose in mature strawberry leaves	Identification of guanosine diphosphate derivatives of d xylose mannose glucose and d galactose in mature strawberry leaves.
5	regulation of development of hepatic glucokinase in the neonatal rat by the diet	The regulation of the development of hepatic glucokinase in the neonatal rat by diet.
5	metabolic changes during phosphate deprivation in euglena in air and in oxygen	Metabolic changes during phosphate deprivation in euglena in air and oxygen.
5	carbohydrate metabolism of the perfused rat liver	Metabolism of perfused rat liver carbohydrates.
5	divergent effects of actinomycin d on cortisol and on glucose stimulation of glycogenesis in mouse liver	Divergent effects of actinomycin d on cortisol and glucose stimulation of glycogenesis in mouse liver.
5	the composition and physicochemical properties of bovine nasal septa protein polysaccharide complex	Composition and physic properties of bovine nasal protein (BSE) polysaccharide complex septa-chemicals.
5	mechanism of conversion of aspartate into glutamate in cerebral cortex slices	Mechanisms of conversion of aspartate to glutamate in cerebral cortical slices.
5	the influence of fructose and its metabolites on ethanol metabolism in vitro	L' influence of fructose and its metabolites on in vitro ethanol metabolism.
5	pectic polysaccharides of growing plant tissues	Pectic polysaccharides of growing plant tissue.
5	preparation of enriched fractions from cerebral cortex containing isolated metabolically active neuronal and glial cells	Preparation of enriched cerebral cortical fractions containing isolated metabolically active neuronal and glial cells.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds uptake of 14c formaldehyde and 14c formate by methane grown pseudomonas methanica and determination of the hexose labelling pattern after brief incubation with 14c methanol	Microbial growth on c1 compounds uptake of formaldehyde 14c and formate 14c by methane-grown pseudomonas methanica and determination of labeling pattern; hexose after brief incubation with methanol 14c.
5	further studies on intestinal active transport during semistarvation	D' other studies of intestinal active transport during semistarvation were conducted.
5	respiratory inhibition in chlorella produced by purified polyethylene glycol 1540	Respiratory inhibition in chlorinella produced by purified polyethylene glycol 1540.
5	the effect of infusions of plasma and of saline on the renal response to water loading in sodium depleted dogs	The effects of infusions of plasma and saline on the renal response to sodium loading; water in sodium-depleted dogs.
5	regulation of staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase	The regulation of staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase activity.
5	effects of the rare earth cerium on escherichia coli	Effects of rare earth cerium on escherichia coli.
5	radioautographic study of cell wall deposition in growing plant cells	L' radioautographic study of cell wall deposition in growing plant cells.
5	effects of fatty acids ketone bodies lactate and pyruvate on glucose utilization by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Effects of keto fatty acids lactate and pyruvate on glucose utilization by guinea pig cerebral cortical slices.
5	a study of three enzymes acting on glucose in the lens of different species	A study of three enzymes acting on glucose in the lens of different species.
5	evaluation of the glycogenolytic effect of alpha amylase using radioautography and electron microscopy	Evaluation of apos; radioautography and electron microscopy of the glycogenolytic effect of apos; alpha amylase.
5	elution of loosely bound acid phosphatase from staphylococcus aureus	Elution of weakly bound acid phosphatase from staphylococcus aureus.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo lipogenesis during extended periods of re feeding after starvation	Study of lipogenesis in vivo lipogenesis during prolonged periods of fasting.
5	pyruvate accumulation in growth inhibited cultures of aerobacter aerogenes	Pyruvate accumulation in growth inhibited apos; Aerobacter aerogenes cultures.
5	stimulation of pentose phosphate pathway dehydrogenase enzyme activities in ethionine treated mice	Stimulation of pentose phosphate pathway dehydrogenase enzyme activity in ethionine-treated mice.
5	lipogenesis in human adipose tissue	Well, lipogenesis in human adipose tissue.
5	hepatic triglyceride secretion in relation to lipogenesis and free fatty acid mobilization in fasted and glucose refed rats	Hepatic triglyceride secretion in relation to lipogenesis and free fatty acid mobilization in fasted rats and in glucose-repressed rats.
5	sporulation of the thermophilic anaerobes	Sporulation of the anaerobic thermophiles.
5	occurrence and metabolism of scylloinositol in the locust	The occurrence and metabolism of scylloinositol in desert locusts.
5	enzymic hydrolysis of the carbon fluorine bond of alpha d glucosyl fluoride by rat intestinal mucosa localization of intestinal maltase	Enzymatic hydrolysis of the carbon bond @-@fluoride of d' alpha-d-glucosyl by localization of intestinal maltase in rat intestinal mucosa.
5	the effect of thyroidectomy on the pattern of fatty acids synthesized by mammary gland from lactating rats	L' effect of thyroidectomy on the pattern of fatty acids synthesized by the lactating rat mammary gland.
5	contribution of propionate to glucose synthesis in sheep	Contribution of propionate to glucose synthesis in sheep.
5	metabolic activities of the isolated perfused rat kidney	Metabolic activity of the isolated perfused rat kidney.
5	mechanisms of regulation of urease biosynthesis in proteus rettgeri	Mechanisms regulating urease biosynthesis in proteus rettgeri.
5	adenosine triphosphate linked control of pseudomonas aeruginosa glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	Control related to etapos; adenosine triphosphate of pseudomonas aeruginosa glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
5	the influence of saline loading on renal glucose reabsorption in the rat	L' influence of saline loading on renal glucose reabsorption in the rat.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes i characteristics of the synthesis and turnover of glycogen in vitro	Glycogenesis in human peripheral blood leukocytes i characteristic of the synthesis and turnover of glycogen in vitro.
5	structure of the cell wall of lactobacilli role of muramic acid phosphate in lactobacillus fermenti	Structure of the cell wall of lactobacilli role of l' muramic acid phosphate in lactobacillus fermenti.
5	correlated changes of some enzyme activities and cofactor and substrate contents of pea cotyledon tissue during germination	Changes in some enzyme activities correlated with cofactor and substrate contents of pea cotyledons during germination.
5	conversion of u 14c glucose into carbon dioxide glycogen cholesterol and fatty acids in liver slices from embryonic and growing chicks	Transformation of glucose u 14c into carbon dioxide, glycogen, cholesterol and fatty acids in chick liver slices from embryonic and growing chicks.
5	the effect of starvation and starvation followed by feeding on enzyme activity and the metabolism of u 14c glucose in liver from growing chicks	L' effect of fasting and fasting followed by fasting; feeding on apos; enzyme activity and glucose metabolism u 14c in the liver of growing chicks.
5	pool sizes of metabolic intermediates and their relation to glucose repression of beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli	Pool sizes of metabolic intermediates and their relation to glucose repression of beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli.
5	comparison of oxidative metabolism in starved fat fed and carbohydrate fed rats	Comparison of oxidative metabolism in fasting and starved rats.
5	intracellular protein breakdown in non growing cells of escherichia coli	Dissolution of intracellular proteins in non-growing cells of escherichia coli.
5	effect of carbonyl cyanide m chlorophenylhydrazone on respiration and respiration dependent phosphorylation in escherichia coli	Effect of carbonyl cyanide m chlorophenylhydrazone on respiration and respiration dependent phosphorylation in escherichia coli.
5	electron opaque bodies and fat droplets in mouse liver after fasting or glucose injection	Electron-opaque body and fat droplets in mouse liver after fasting or glucose injection.
5	nonselective incorporation into sporangium of either older or younger chromosome of the vegetative cell during sporulation in bacillus cereus	Unselective incorporation into the sporangium d' an older or younger chromosome of the vegetative cell during sporulation in the bacillus cereus.
5	renal contribution to thoracic duct lymph in dogs	Canine renal contribution to thoracic canal lymph.
5	effects of epinephrine corticotropin and thyrotropin on lipolysis and glucose oxidation in rat adipose tissue	Effects of corticotropin and thyrotropin of epinephrine on lipolysis and apos; glucose oxidation in rat adipose tissue.
5	distribution of radioactive glycerol and fatty acids among adipose tissue triglycerides after administration of glucose u 14c	Distribution of radioactive glycerol and fatty acids among adipose tissue triglycerides after apos; administration of glucose u 14c.
5	regulation of glutamine synthetase x effect of growth conditions on the susceptibility of escherichia coli glutamine synthetase to feedback inhibition	Apos regulation; glutamine synthetase x effect of growth conditions on the sensitivity of d&apos glutamine synthetase; escherichia coli to feedback inhibition.
5	biosynthesis of streptococcal cell walls n acetyl d muramic acid	Biosynthesis of n streptococcal cell walls Acetyl dmuramic acid.
5	biochemical basis of obligate autotrophy in blue green algae and thiobacilli	The biochemical basis of l' obligatory autotrophy in blue-green algae and thiobacilli.
5	pyruvate metabolism in sarcina maxima	Pyruvate metabolism in sarcina maxima.
5	anaerobic growth yields of aerobacter cloacae and escherichia coli	Anaerobic growth provides yields of cloacal and escherichia coli aerobes.
5	glucose metabolism by human placental villi	Glucose metabolism by human placental villosities.
5	the biosynthesis of intestinal mucins the effect of salicylate on glycoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic and human gastric mucosal tissues in vitro	Intestinal mucin biosynthesis, the effect of salicylate on glycoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colon and intestinal mucous membranes; human in vitro stomach.
5	lactogenesis in the rat metabolism of uridine diphosphate galactose by mammary gland	Lactogenesis in metabolism of uridine diphosphate galactose by the mammary gland in rats.
5	short latency antidiuresis following the initation of food ingestion	Short latency antidiuresis following apos; induction of apos; food intake.
5	phosphate dependence of monosaccharide transport in nocardia	Phosphate dependence of monosaccharide transport in nocardia.
5	n acetylglucosamine assimilation in escherichia coli and its relation to catabolite repression	N acetylglucosamine assimilation in escherichia coli and its relation to catabolite repression.
5	relationship between sugar structure and competition for the sugar transport system in bakers yeast	The relationship between sugar structure and competition for the sugar transport system in baking yeast.
5	metabolic and morphological observations on the effect of surface active agents of leukocytes	Metabolic and morphological observations on the effect of active leukocyte surfactants.
5	water permeability of thin lipid membranes	The permeability of thin lipid membranes to pH.
5	carbohydrate composition of the phenol soluble lipopolysaccharides of citrobacter freundii	The carbohydrate composition of phenol-soluble lipopolysaccharides of citrobacter freundii.
5	synthesis of teichoic acids vii synthesis of teichoic acids during spore germination	Synthesis d' teichoic acids vii synthesis of teichoic acids during spore germination.
5	inhibition of histoplasma capsulatum by candida albicans and other yeasts on sabouraud s agar media	L' inhibition of apos; histoplasma capsulatum by candida albicans and d' other yeasts on agar medium.
5	regulation and timing of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Regulation and synchronization of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in d&apos hyphae aspergillus nidulans.
5	encystment and polymer production by azotobacter vinelandii in the presence of beta hydroxybutyrate	Enkysing and polymer production by azotobacter vinelandii in the presence of beta @-@hydroxybutyrate.
5	pathways of glucose metabolism by rough and smooth variants of bacillus stearothermophilus	Metabolic pathways of glucose by rough and smooth variants of stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	mode of action of myxin on escherichia coli	The mode of action of hagfish on plants; escherichia coli.
5	membrane lipid changes during formation of a functional electron transport system in staphylococcus aureus	Membrane lipids change during the formation of a functional electron transport system in Staphylococcus aureus.
5	control of malate synthase formation in rhizopus nigricans	The control of malate synthase formation in rhizopus nigricans.
5	transient repression of the lac operon	Transient repression of the lake operon.
5	cell wall composition in relation to the taxonomy of some actinoplanaceae	Cell wall composition in relation to the taxonomy of certain actinoplanaceous species.
5	release of sporangiospores by a strain of actinoplanes	Release of sporangiospores by a strain of actinoplanes.
5	disaccharide absorption by amphibian small intestine in vitro	Absorption of disaccharides by amphibians; amphibian small intestine in vitro.
5	regulatory effect of pyruvate on the glucose metabolism of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	The regulatory effect of pyruvate on the metabolism of glucose in Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum.
5	radiorespirometric studies of leucothrix mucor	Radiorespirometric studies of leucothrix mucor.
5	observations on the mechanisms of glucosuria during glucose loads in normal and nondiabetic subjects	Observations on the mechanisms of glucosuria during glucose loading in normal and nondiabetic subjects.
5	effects of diet on hepatic triglyceride synthesis	The effects of diet on hepatic triglyceride synthesis.
5	sporulation of bacillus stearothermophilus	The sporulation of the bacillus stearothermophilus.
5	formation of isoamylase by pseudomonas	D&apos formation; formation of isoamylase by pseudomonas.
5	lipid metabolism in the testis of the ram	Lipid metabolism in the testis of the ram.
5	effect of atractyloside on glucose and pyruvate metabolism in rat diaphragm muscle	Effect of atractyloside on glucose and pyruvate metabolism in rat diaphragm.
5	rates of entry and oxidation of acetate glucose d beta hydroxybutyrate palmitate oleate and stearate and rates of production and oxidation of propionate and butyrate in fed and starved sheep	Rates of onset and onset; oxidation of apos; acetate glucose from beta hydroxybutyrate palmitate oleate and stearate and rates of production and apos; oxidation of propionate and butyrate in fed and starved sheep.
5	the time course of the synthesis of adenosine triphosphate in ehrlich ascites tumour cells and the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol	L' time course of synthesis of l' adenosine triphosphate in d&apos tumor cells; ehrlich and l&apos ascites; effect of 24 dinitrophenol.
5	studies on brain cortex slices differences in the oxidation of 14 c labelled glucose and pyruvate revealed by the action of triethyltin and other toxic agents	Cerebral cortical studies contrast differences in the oxidation of 14-c labelled glucose and pyruvate by the action of triethyltin and d*apos; other toxic agents.
5	the subcellular distribution and properties of hexokinases in the guinea pig cerebral cortex	Subcellular distribution and properties of hexokinases in the guinea pig cerebral cortex.
5	some properties of phosphofructokinase from kidney cortex and their relation to glucose metabolism	Certain properties of renal cortical phosphofructokinase and their relation to glucose metabolism.
5	reagentless substrate analysis with immobilized enzymes	Reagent-free substrate analysis with immobilized enzymes.
5	fine structure of the a and d cells of the rabbit endocrine pancreas in vivo and incubated in vitro i mechanism of secretion of the a cells	The fine structure of the a and d cells of the rabbit endocrine pancreas in vivo and incubated in vitro i mechanism of secretion of a.
5	effects of metabolic inhibitors on contraction of rabbit detrusor muscle	Effects of metabolic inhibitors on contraction of rabbit detrusor muscle.
5	quantitative assay of polysaccharide components obtained from cell wall lipopolysaccharides of xanthomonas species	Quantitative assay of polysaccharide components obtained from cell wall lipopolysaccharides of xanthomonas species.
5	an in vitro effect of triiodothyronine on rat adipose tissue	The in vitro effect of triiodothyronine on rat adipose tissue.
5	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge ii method of characterization of activated sludge bacteria	Aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of wastewater and activated sludge ii Method for characterization of activated sludge bacteria.
5	differential dialysis culture for separation and concentration of a macromolecular product	Differential dialysis culture for separation and concentration of d' macromolecular product.
5	carbon balance of a mannitol fermentation and the biosynthetic pathway	Carbon balance; a mannitol fermentation and biosynthetic pathway.
5	the mechanism of thyrotrophin action in relation to lipid metabolism in thyroid tissue	The mechanism of thyrotrophin action on lipid metabolism in thyroid tissue.
5	the effect of sodium depletion of the renal response to water loading in dogs	The effect of sodium depletion of the renal response to acid loading in dogs.
5	mammary and whole animal metabolism of glucose and fatty acids in fasting lactating goats	Mammary and whole animal metabolism of glucose and fat acids in fasting capats.
5	nutritional characteristics of the atypical mycobacteria	Nutritional characteristics of the atypical mycobacteria.
5	regulation of arginine and proline catabolism in bacillus licheniformis	Regulation of arginine and proline catabolism in licheniformis bacillus.
5	ratio of teichoic acid and peptidoglycan in cell walls of bacillus subtilis following spire germination and during vegetative growth	The ratio of teichoic acid and peptidoglycan in the cell walls of the subtilis bacillus after spire germination and during vegetative growth.
5	fermentation of glucose lactose galactose mannitol and xylose by bifidobacteria	Fermentation of glucose lactose galactose mannitol and xylose by bifidobacteria.
5	enzyme pattern and aerobic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae under various degrees of glucose limitation	Enzyme profile and aerobic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae under various degrees of glucose limitation.
5	site and characteristics of electrolyte loss and effect of intraluminal glucose in experimental canine cholera	Site and characteristics of electrolyte loss and effect of intraluminal glucose in experimental canine cholera.
5	phospholipid spherules liposomes as a model for biological membranes	Liposomal phospholipid spherules as a model for biological membranes.
5	stimulation of the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly by mono and disaccharides	Mono- and disaccharide stimulation of the mouth sugar receptor of the fly.
5	dietary regulation of galactose metabolizing enzymes adaptive changes in rat jejunum	Food regulation of galactose metabolizing enzymes, adaptive changes in rat jejunum.
5	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes of sperm cells and tests	Isoenzymes of sperm lactate dehydrogenase and tests.
5	regulation and function of lactate oxidation in streptococcus faecium	Lactose regulation and function; lactate oxidation in streptococcus faecium.
5	oxidation of d amino acids by a particulate enzyme from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Amino acid oxidation d by a particulate enzyme from Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	relation of catalase to substrate utilization by mycoplasma pneumoniae	Relationship between catalase and l' substrate utilization by mycoplasma pneumoniae.
5	direct pathway to the brain	Uh, direct pathway to the brain.
5	hemoglobin function in stored blood	The hemoglobin function in stored blood.
5	effect of early nutrition on the development of rat epididymal fat pads cellularity and metabolism	Effect of early nutrition on the development of rat epididymal cellularity and fat metabolism.
5	studies on the enzymic n acylation of amino sugars in the sheep colonic mucosa	Enzymatic acylation of amino sugars in the sheep colonic mucosa.
5	biochemical effects of the hypoglycaemic compound pent 4 enoic acid and related non hypoglycaemic fatty acids carbohydrate metabolism	Biochemical effects of the hypoglycemic compound enoic acid pent 4 and related nonhypoglycemic fatty acids carbohydrate metabolism.
5	pneumococcal c substance a ribitol teichoic acid containing choline phosphate	Pneumococcus c:-teichoic ribitol acid containing choline phosphate.
5	the glycerol teichoic acid from walls of staphylococcus epidermidis i2	L' glycerol teichoic acid from the walls of staphylococcus epidermidis i2 is present.
5	effect of sublethal heat on the metabolic activity of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of sublethal heat on the metabolic activity of staphylococcus aureus.
5	growth of ferrobacillus ferrooxidans on organic matter	Growth of ferrobacillus ferrooxidans on organic material.
5	effects of temperature on composition and cell volume of candida utilis	Effects of temperature on composition and cell volume of candida utilisa.
5	attached growth of sphaerotilus and mixed populations in a continuous flow apparatus	Growth of sphaerotilus and mixed populations was fixed in a continuous flow apparatus.
5	effects of colicins e1 and k on cellular metabolism	The effects of colicins e1 and k on cellular metabolism.
5	effect of dextrose in medium for the preparation of mycoplasma gallisepticum plate antigens	Effect of dextrose in the medium for the preparation of mycoplasma gallisepticum plate antigens.
5	an electrophysiological analysis of the action of carbohydrates on the sugar receptor of the blowfly	An electrophysiological analysis of the action of carbohydrates on the sugar receptor of the fly.
5	the effect of chlorpromazine on cerebral glucose atp adp amp and atpase in the mouse	The effect of chlorpromazine on cerebral glucose atp amp and atpase in the mouse.
5	heterogeneity of human platelets i metabolic and kinetic evidence suggestive of young and old platelets	Heterogeneity of human platelets i metabolic and kinetic evidence suggestive of young and old platelets.
5	thyroid stimulating hormone and prostaglandin e1 stimulation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in thyroid slices	Stimulation by apos; thyroid hormone and prostaglandin e1 of d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3-5 in thyroid slices.
5	some determinants of the effects of val 5 angiotensin ii amide on glomerular filtration rate and sodium excretion in dogs	Some determinants of the effects of apos; val5 angiotensin ii amides glomerular filtration rate and apos; sodium excretion in dogs.
5	sporulation in bacillus subtilis biochemical changes	Sporulation in bacillus subtilis changes biochemically.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue a possible role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of its activity	Clear factor lipase in adipose tissue may play a role in the regulation of l&apos activity; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	changes in the concentrations of some phosphorylated intermediates and stimulation of glycolysis in liver slices	Changes in the levels of some phosphorylated intermediates and stimulation of glycolysis in liver slices.
5	growth of mixed cultures on mixed substrates i continuous culture	Growth of mixed cultures on mixed substrates i continuous culture.
5	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol in canine endotoxin shock	Hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol on canine endotoxinogenic shock.
5	inhibition of glycosidases by aldonolactones of corresponding configuration the specificity of alpha l arabinosidase	L' inhibition of glycosidases by aldonolactones of configuration corresponding to the specificity of arabinosidase.
5	factors affecting the glucose 6 phosphate inhibition of hexokinase from cerebral cortex tissue of the guinea pig	Factors affecting the brain cortical tissue of the guinea pig; inhibition by glucose 6 phosphate de l'apos; hexokinase.
5	biosynthesis of intestinal mucins effect of puromycin on mucoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic mucosal tissue	Puromycin has an effect on the biosynthesis of intestinal mucins by sheep colonic mucous membranes.
5	attempts to detect lycopersene formation in yeast	Assays to detect lycopersene formation in yeast.
5	oral maintenance of water electrolyte and acid base balance in cholera a preliminary report	The oral maintenance of a balance between the electrolyte, water and acid base in cholera is a preliminary report.
5	adenosine phosphates and the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in yeast	Adenosine phosphates and the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in yeast.
5	dextran induced agglutination of streptococcus mutans and its potential role in the formation of microbial dental plaques	Dextran induced agglutination of streptococcus mutans and its potential role in the formation of microbial dental plaques.
5	immunochemistry of the cell walls of listeria monocytogenes	The immunochemistry of the cell walls of listeria monocytogenes.
5	glucose dependent secretion and destruction of hydrogen peroxide by mycoplasma pneumoniae	Glucose-dependent secretion and destruction of hydrogen peroxide by mycoplasma pneumoniae.
5	effects of carbon dioxide on growth and maltose fermentation by bacteroides amylophilus	Effects of carbon dioxide on growth and maltose fermentation by amylophilus bacteroids.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus physiological properties and purification of an inducible malic enzyme	Malate used by a group of streptococci with physiological properties and purification of an inducible malic enzyme.
5	inhibitory effect of 2 deoxy d glucose on the formation of the cell wall in yeast protoplasts	An inhibitory effect of 2 glucose deoxy on the formation of cell walls in yeast protoplasts.
5	acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp n anaerobic gram negative diplococci using amino acids as the sole energy source for growth	Acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp n anaerobic gram-negative diplococci using amino acids as sole source of acid; energy for growth.
5	sporulation of yeast harvested during logarithmic growth	Sporulation of yeasts harvested during logarithmic growth processes.
5	the metabolic fate of the products of citrate cleavage adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked malate dehydrogenase in foetal and adult liver from ruminants and non ruminants	The metabolic fate of the citrate cleavage products of adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate bound malate dehydrogenase in the fetal and adult liver of ruminants and non-ruminants.
5	glucose catabolism of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae	The glucose catabolism of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae.
5	carbohydrate formation from various precursors in noenatal rat liver	Carbohydrate formation from various precursors in rat liver.
5	the exopolysaccharide of klebsiella aerogens a3 s1 type 54 the isolation of o acetylated octasaccharide tetrasaccharide and trisaccharide	L' airborne klebsiella a3 s1 type 54 exopolysaccharide isolates octasaccharide or acetylated tetrasaccharide and trisaccharide.
5	studies on the lipid content and phosphate requirement of glucose and acetate grown escherichia coli	Studies on the lipid content and phosphate requirements of glucose and acetate grown on escherichia coli.
5	multiple forms of bacterial nadp specific isocitrate dehydrogenase	Multiple forms of bacterial bacteria-specific isocitrate dehydrogenase nadp.
5	protease production by species of entomophthora	Protease production by species of entomophthora.
5	constancy of uptake during the cell cycle in escherichia coli	Consistency of the apos; uptake during cell cycle in escherichia coli.
5	repression by glucose of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli b	Glucose repression of l' acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli b.
5	kinases in leuconostoc mesenteroides	The kinases of leuconostoc mésentéroides.
5	metabolism of carbohydrates by pasteurella pseudotuberculosis	Metabolism of carbohydrates by pasteurella pseudotuberculosis.
5	differences in the utilization of glycerol and glucose by mycobacterium phlei	Differences in the use of glycerol and glucose by phlei mycobacteria.
5	galactose transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae i nonmetabolized sugars as substrates and inducers of the galactose transport system	Galactose transport in unmetabolized succharomyces cerevisiae i sugars as substrates and inducers of the galactose transport system.
5	formation of dulcitol in aerobic dissimilation of d galactose by yeasts	Formation of dulcitol during aerobic dissimilation of the galactose by yeasts.
5	microcalorimetric study of glucose permeation in microbial cells	Microcalorimetric study of glucose permeation in microbial cells.
5	the lipid composition of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	Fatty composition of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b.
5	effect of lysozyme on resting spores of bacillus megaterium	The effect of lysozyme on resting spores of megaterium bacillus.
5	histochemical localization of renal trehalase demonstration of a tubular site	The existence of a tubular site was demonstrated by the histochemical localization of renal trehalase.
5	enterotoxin b synthesis by replicating and nonreplicating cells of staphylococcus aureus	Apos synthesis; enterotoxin b by replication and nonreplication of staphylococcus aureus cells.
5	alteration of glucose metabolism of arthrobacter crystallopoietes by compounds which induce sphere to rod morphogenesis	Modification of glucose metabolism in the apos; arthrobacter crystallopoietes by compounds inducing spherical rod morphogenesis.
5	molecular basis of transient repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Molecular basis for transient repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli.
5	synergistic and product induction of the enzymes of tryptophan metabolism in pseudomonas acidovorans	Synergistic induction and production of enzymes of tryptophan metabolism in pseudomonas acidovorans.
5	role of exogenous adenosine triphosphate in catabolic and synthetic activities of chlamydia psittaci	Role of l' exogenous adenosine triphosphate in catabolic and synthetic activities of chlamydia psittaci.
5	conversion of glucose 1 phosphate to 3 keto glucose 1 phosphate by cells of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Conversion of glucose 1 phosphate to 3 keto glucose 1 phosphate by cells d' agrobacterium tumefaciens.
5	effect of divalent cations on the uptake and oxidation of substrates by pseudomonas aeruginosa	The effect of the divalent cations on the uptake and oxidation of substrates by Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	molar growth yields of certain lactic acid bacteria as influenced by autolysis	The molar growth yields of some lactic acid bacteria are influenced by autolysis.
5	induction of adenosine deaminase in escherichia coli	Apos induction; adenosine deaminase in escherichia coli.
5	serine requirement in leukemic and normal blood cells	Need serine in leukemic and normal blood cells.
5	ribonucleic acid biosynthesis in adult and infant rat brain in vitro	Apos biosynthesis; ribonucleic acid in adult rat brain and new-born in vitro.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine the effect of glucose on hexokinase activity	Glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the intestine; small intestine; effect of glucose on the intestine; apo activity; hexokinase.
5	identification of micrococcaceae in clinical bacteriology	Identification of micrococcaceae in clinical bacteriology.
5	studies on the physiological and structural characteristics of rat intestinal mucosa mitochondrial structural changes during amino acid absorption	Studies of physiological and structural characteristics of mitochondrial structural changes of rat intestinal mucosa during amino acid uptake.
5	an in vitro study of the intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes	An in vitro study of the intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes.
5	taste stimuli a behavioral categorization	Taste stimulates a behavioral categorization.
5	the chemical composition of the lipopolyacarideof pseudomonas aeruginosa	Chemical composition of the pseudomonas aeruginosa lipopolyacaride compound.
5	catabolite repression of the lac operon separt epressionof two enzymes	Catabolic repression of the epression of the part of l' lac operon of two enzymes.
5	mitochondrial autonomy incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein by isolated mitochondria	L' incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein by isolated mitochondria is a form of mitochondrial autonomy.
5	human hormone production in vitro	Human hormones production in vitro.
5	the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol on adipose tissue metabolism	L' effect of 24 dinitrophenol on the metabolism of fat.
5	studies on the existence of a pathway in liver and muscle for the conversion of glucose into glycogen without glucose 6 phosphate as an intermediate	Studies on the existence of bios; a pathway in liver and muscle for the conversion of glucose to glucose-free 6 phosphate as an intermediate.
5	role of adenosine monophosphate in regulation of metabolic pathways of perfused rat liver	Role of l' adenosine monophosphate in regulation of perfused rat liver metabolic pathways.
5	degradation of uric acid by certain aerobic bacteria	Derivation of uric acid by certain aerobic bacteria.
5	paraffin oxidation in pseudomonas aeruginosa i induction of paraffin oxidation	L' paraffin oxidation in pseudomonas aeruginosa i induction of apos; paraffin oxidation.
5	inhibition by methylphenidate of transport across the yeast cell membrane	L' inhibition of transport across the yeast cell membrane by methylphenidate.
5	neisseria lactamicus sp n a lactose fermenting species resembling neisseria meningitidis	Neisseria lactamicus sp n a lactose-fermenting species resembling Neisseria meningitidis.
5	role of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylation in acetobacter xylinum	Role of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylation in xylinum acetobacter.
5	uptake of glucose l 14c by pullularia pullulans	Glucose uptake I 14c by pullularia pullulans.
5	biosynthesis of riboflavine in corynebacterium species the purine precursor	Riboflavin biosynthesis in species of corynebacteria, the purine precursor.
5	possible mechanisms of action of an anti pasteurella pestis factor	Mechanisms of detection; possible action of a pasteurella pestis factor.
5	effect of phenylbutazone on phagocytosis and intracellular killing by guinea pig polymorphonuclear leukocytes	The effect of phenylbutazone on phagocytosis and intracellular destruction by guinea pig polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
5	production of l asparaginase ii by escherichia coli	Production of apos; asparaginase I ii by escherichia coli.
5	gratuitous synthesis of beta lactamase in staphylococcus aureus	Free synthesis of beta lactamase in staphylococcus aureus.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism hormonal and dietary control of the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism controls both hormonal and dietary oxidative and nonoxidative reactions of the cycle in the liver.
5	uridine diphosphate d glucose dehydrogenase of aerobacter aerogenes	Uridine diphosphate glucose dehydrogenase d' Aerobacter aerogenes.
5	acceleration of gluconeogenesis from propionate by dl carnitine in the rat kidney cortex	Acceleration of gluconeogenesis from propionate by carnitine dl in the rat renal cortex.
5	a circadian rhythm in the disappearance of thyroxine from the blood in the calf and the thyroidectomized rat	A circadian rhythm in the disappearance of thyroxine from the blood of the calf and the thyroidectomized rat.
5	cerebrosides of human aorta isolation identification of the hexose and fatty acid distribution	Cerebroside of the apos; isolation of the apos; identification of the apos; hexose and fatty acid distribution.
5	early effects of feeding excess vitamin a mechanism of fatty liver production in rats	Early effects of apo; diet; excess vitamin a mechanism of fatty liver production in rats.
5	cell wall composition of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	Cell wall composition of yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis.
5	change in the absorbancy of bacterial suspensions before initiation of growth	Change in the apos; absorption of bacterial suspensions before growth begins.
5	glucose catabolism in rhizobium japonicum	Glucose catabolism in rhizobium japonicum.
5	two forms of d glycerate kinase in escherichia coli	In escherichia coli, two forms of glycerate kinase d.
5	stimulation of fermentation and yeast like morphogenesis in mucor rouxii by phenethyl alcohol	Phenethyl alcohol stimulated fermentation and yeast-like morphogenesis in mucor rouxii by l'apos.
5	molar growth yield of streptococcus faecalis on pyruvate	Molar growth of streptococcus faecalis on pyruvate.
5	sporulation of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum under conditions of restricted growth	Sporulation of Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum under conditions of restricted growth.
5	modified biochemical tests for characterization of l phase variants of bacteria	Modified biochemical tests for characterization of phase l bacterial variants.
5	effect of triperidol on carbohydrate and amino acid metabolism in rat brain cortex slices	Effect of triperidol on carbohydrate and amino acid metabolism in rat cerebral cortical slices.
5	compartmentation between glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in rat liver	Comparison between glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in rat liver.
5	structural requirements for active intestinal transport spatial and bonding requirements at c 3 of the sugar	Structural requirements for active intestinal transport spatial and c3 binding requirements of the sugar.
5	changes in the concentrations of hepatic metabolites on administration of dihydroxyacetone or glycerol to starved rats and their relationship to the control of ketogenesis	Changes in the concentrations of hepatic metabolites during apo; administration of dihydroxyacetone or glycerol to food-starved rats and their relation to the control of ketogenesis.
5	comparative intermediary metabolism of vegetative cells and microcysts of myxococcus xanthus	Intermediate comparative metabolism of vegetative cells and microcysts of xanthus myxococci.
5	production of a capsular polysaccharide by a marine filamentous fungus	Production of a capsular polysaccharide by a filamentous marine fungus.
5	influence of gas environment on catabolic activities and on reoxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in chlamydia	Influence of l' gaseous environment on catabolic activities and reoxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in Chlamydia.
5	control of dimorphism in mucor by hexoses inhibition of hyphal morphogenesis	Mucor dimorphism is controlled by apos; inhibition of hyphal morphogenesis by hexoses.
5	molar growth yields as evidence for oxidative phosphorylation in streptococcus faecalis strain 10cl	Molar growth is evidence of oxidative phosphorylation in streptococcus faecalis strain 10.
5	trehalose phosphate synthesis in streptomyces hygroscopicus purification of guanosine diphosphate d glucose d glucose 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase	Trehalose phosphate synthesis in streptomyces hygroscopicus purification of guanosine diphosphate glucose 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase.
5	autotrophy in nitrosocystis oceanus	Acute autotrophy in nitrosocystis oceanus.
5	citrate pyruvate and lactate contaminants of commercial serum albumin	Citrate pyruvate and lactate contaminants of commercial serum albumin.
5	the effects of ph on the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly	The effects of ph on the lip-sugar receptor of the fly.
5	effect of physiological variations in free fatty acid concentration on the binding of thyroxine in the serum of euthyroid and thyrotoxic subjects	Effect of physiological changes in free fatty acid concentration on the binding of thyroxine in serum of euthyroid and thyrotoxic subjects.
5	influence of ph and metal cations on aggregative growth of non slime forming strains of zoogloea ramigera	L' influence of ph and metal cations on aggregative growth of non-mucus-forming strains of zoogloea ramigera.
5	simple method for rapid determination of antibiotic blood levels	Simple method for rapid determination of blood levels of antibiotics.
5	control of respiration and metabolism in growing klebsiella aerogenes the role of adenine nucleotides	The control of respiration and metabolism in growing klebsiella aerogenes the role of nucleotides of l' adenine.
5	glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets incorporation of glucose pyruvate and citrate into platelet glycogen glycogen synthetase and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activity	Glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets, incorporation of glucose pyruvate and citrate into platelets glycogen glycogen synthetase and fructose 16 diphosphatase activities.
5	glucose production by lamprey meninges	Glucose production by lamprey meninges.
5	effect of culture medium composition and ph on the production of m protein and proteinase by group a streptococci	Effect of the composition of the culture medium and ph on the production of m protein and proteinase by the streptococcal group.
5	effects of ultraviolet radiation on respiration and growth in radiation resistant and radiation sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	The effects of ultraviolet radiation on respiration and growth of radiation-resistant and radiation-sensitive strains of escherichia coli.
5	glycolytic and related enzymes in clostridial classification	Glucocolysteine and related enzymes in clostridial classification.
5	control of synthesis of malate dehydrogenase in aerobacter aerogenes	Control of the synthesis of malate dehydrogenase in aerobacter aerogenes.
5	induction of spherule formation in physarum polycephalum by polyols	Induction of spherule formation in physarum polycephalum by polyols.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine changes of hexokinase activity during perfusion of the proximal half of rat small intestine	Glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the apos; small intestine Changes in the apos; activity of the apos; hexokinase during infusion of the proximal half of the apos; rat small intestine.
5	production and catabolite repression of the constitutive polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase of aeromonas liquefaciens	Production and catabolic repression of the trans-eliminase component of l' polygalacturonic acid; and Aeromonas liquefaciens.
5	relationship between glucose utilization and growth rate in bacillus subtilis	Relationship between glucose utilization and growth rate of subtilis bacillus.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Loin regulation; staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
5	catabolic activities of neisseria meningitidis utilization of glutamate	The catabolic activity of neisseria meningitidis utilization of glutamate.
5	multiple impairment of glycolysis in veillonella alcalescens	Multiple alterations in glycolysis in veillonella alcalescens.
5	nonoxidative pentose phosphate pathway in veillonella alcalescens	Nonoxidative pentose phosphate pathway in veillonella alcalescens.
5	macromolecular synthesis during microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus cereus t	Macromolecular synthesis during microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus cereus t.
5	carbohydrate accumulation during the sporulation of yeast	Accumulation of carbohydrates during sporulation of yeast.
5	metabolic turnover of the polar lipids of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	The metabolic turnover of the polar lipids of strain b of mycoplasma laidlawii b.
5	gargoylism hydrolysis of beta galactosides and tissure accumulation of galactose and mannose containing compounds	Gargoylism hydrolysis of beta-galactosides and tissue accumulation of compounds containing galactose and mannose.
5	practical physiological schema for the identification of herellea vaginicola and its differentiation from similar organisms	Practical physiological scheme for identification of the apos; herela vaginicola and its differentiation from similar organisms.
5	microbial production of xylitol from glucose	Microbial production of xylitol from glucose.
5	a method for the quantitative determination of neutral glycosphingolipids in urine sediment	A method for the quantitative determination of neutral glycosphingolipids in urinary sediments.
5	growth of histoplasma capsulatum vi maintenance of the mycelial phase	The growth of the apos; histoplasma capsulatum vi maintains the mycelial phase.
5	action of diethylstilbestrol on staphylococci further observations on the effect of resting cells	L' action of diethylstilbestrol on the staphylococci; subject matter; further observations on the apos; effect of resting cells.
5	isolation and partial characterization of a major inositol containing lipid in baker s yeast mannosyl diinositol diphosphoryl ceramide	Isolation and partial characterization of a major lipid containing l' inositol in yeast mannosyl diinositol diphosphoryl ceramide.
5	compartmentation in the induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	Comparison in the induction of the phosphate transport system; hexose 6 phosphate d'apos; escherichia coli.
5	separation and identification of soluble nucleotides in cambial and young xylem tissue of larix decidua mill	Separation and identification of nucleotides soluble in the cambium and young xylem of larix decidua mill.
5	the role of the cytoplasmic redox potential in the control of fatty acid synthesis from glucose pyruvate and lactate in white adipose tissue	The role of cytoplasmic redox potential in the control of fatty acid synthesis from pyruvate glucose and lactate in white adipose tissue.
5	glucose metabolism during the menstrual cycle glucose tolerance during the one cycle and under the effect of ovulatory suppressants	Glucose metabolism during the menstrual cycle Glucose tolerance during and under the cycle; effect of ovulatory suppressants.
5	parathyroid hormone 3 5 amp ca and renal gluconeogenesis	It's called parathyroid hormone 3,5 ca and renal gluconeogenesis.
5	effects of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and glycogen deposition in the perfused rat liver	Effect of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and glycogen deposition in the perfused rat liver.
5	ionizing radiation initiated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria a possible role for defective prophage	Ionizing radiation triggered the degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria, a possible role for defective prophage.
5	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin and the estrogenic hormone diethylstilbestrol	Interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin and estrogenic hormone diethylstilbestrol.
5	measurement of adipose tissue metabolites in vivo	In vivo measurement of metabolites in adipose tissue.
5	the metabolism of d glyceraldehyde by the lens	The metabolism of d glyceraldehyde by the lens.
5	glucose metabolism in the superovulated rat ovary in vitro effects of luteinizing hormone and the role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis	In vitro effects of luteinizing hormone and the role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis in the ovary of superovulated rats.
5	uptake of monosaccharides by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Capture of monosaccharides by guinea pig cerebral cortical slices.
5	a survey of infantile gastroenteritis	A survey of children's gastrointestinal illness.
5	studies on the pathogenesis of acute inflammation ix the influence of hyperosomolality secondary to hyperglycemia upon the acute inflammatory response induced by thermal injury to ear chambers of rabbits	Studies on the pathogenesis of osteoporosis; acute inflammation; influence of osteoporosis; secondary hyperosomolarity to osteoporosis; hyperglycemia on the acute inflammatory response induced by thermal injury to the ears of rabbits.
5	the effects of dietary conditions and glycerol concentration on glycerol uptake by rat liver and kidney cortex slices	Effects of dietary conditions and glycerol concentration on glycerol absorption by slices of rat liver and renal cortex.
5	composition of pseudomonas aeruginosa slime	Composition of pseudomonas aeruginosa mucus.
5	the biochemical status of metabolites of alkane utilizing pseudomonas organisms	The biochemical status of metabolites of etapos; alkane using pseudomonas organisms.
5	inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in disrupted spheroplast of escherichia coli	Inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in dislocated spheroplast of escherichia coli.
5	glucose induced crypticity toward succinate metabolism in saccharomyces lactis	Glucose induced crypticity favoring succinate metabolism in saccharomyces lactis.
5	automatic assessment of respiration during growth in stirred fermentors	Automatic evaluation of respiration during growth in fermenters.
5	respiration and glucose oxidation in human and guinea pig leukocytes comparative studies	Breathing and glucose oxidation in human and guinea-pig leukocytes have been investigated in comparative studies.
5	tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes and morphogenesis in blastocladiella emersonii	Tricarboxylic acid and morphogenesis in blastocladiella emersonii.
5	bacteria shaped gymnoplasts protoplasts of bacillus subtilis	Bacteria formed protoplasts of bacillus subtilis gymnoplasts.
5	variation in composition of yeast phosphohexosans	Variation in composition of yeast phosphohexosanes.
5	bacteriology of manganese nodules iv induction of an mno2 reductase system in a marine bacillus	The bacteriology of manganese nodules iv l'apos induction; a mno2 reductase system in a marine bacillus.
5	volutin granules in zoogloea ramigera	"""Volutin granules in zoogloea ramigera.""."
5	conversion of carbohydrate to fat in adipose tissue an energy yielding and therefore self limiting process	Carbohydrate conversion to fat in adipose tissue is an energy-producing process that, therefore, is limited to it-itself.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in hepatic cirrhosis before and after portacaval shunt operation	Cerebral blood flow and metabolism in hepatic cirrhosis before and after portacaval shunt.
5	yeast cell wall synthesis	Yeast cell wall synthesis.
5	studies of newly synthesized ribosomal ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	Apos studies; newly synthesized ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
5	pathways of glycogen synthesis in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	Key words: glycogen synthesis in d&apos cells; novikoff ascitic hepatoma.
5	metabolic studies of isolated human eccrine sweat glands	Metabolic studies of isolated human eccrine sweat glands.
5	medium for differential count of the anaerobic flora in human feces	Medium for differential counting of anaerobic flora in human feces.
5	characterization of clostridia by gas chromatography differentiation of species by trimethylsilyl derivatives of whole cell hydrolysates	Characterization of clostridia by gas chromatography, differentiation of species by trimethylsilyl derivatives of whole cells hydrolysates.
5	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli during diauxie lag accumulation of heterogeneous ribonucleic acid	Regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli during apos; late accumulation of l' heterogeneous ribonucleic acid during diauxis.
5	acetoacetate metabolism in infant and adult rat brain in vitro	Metabolism of etapos; acetoacetate in the brain of newborn and adult in vitro rats.
5	molecular weights and metabolism of rat brain proteins	The molecular mass and protein metabolism of rat brain tissue.
5	the operation of the gamma aminobutyrate bypath of the tricarboxylic acid cycle in brain tissue in vitro	L' action of gamma aminobutyrate on the cycle of l' tricarboxylic acid in brain tissue in vitro.
5	effects of added nucleotides on renal carbohydrate metabolism	Effects of apo; addition of nucleotides on renal carbohydrate metabolism.
5	relationship of staphylococcal toxins and enzymes with serological and phage types	Relationship between staphylococcal toxins and enzymes and serological and phage types.
5	obesity absence of satiety aversion to sucrose	Obesity absence of symptoms; aversion to sucrose satiety.
5	the fuel of respiration of rat kidney cortex	The breathing fuel of the rat renal cortex.
5	formation of hydrogen peroxide by group n streptococci and its effect on their growth and metabolism	D&apos peroxide formation; hydrogen by group n streptococci and its effect on their growth and metabolism.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism enzyme profiles and transient and steady state content of intermediates of alternative pathways of glucose metabolism in krebs ascites cells	The pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism enzyme profiles and glycoside content; transient and stable status of intermediates of alternative pathways of glucose metabolism in ascitic krebs.
5	synthesis of glycoprotein glycolipid protein and lipid in synchronized l5178y cells	Synthesis of glycoprotein glycolipid protein and lipid in l5178y-synchronized cells.
5	pancreozymin bioassay in man based on pancreatic enzyme secretion potency of specific amino acids and other digestive products	Pancreozymin bioassay in humans based on the ability of pancreatic enzyme secretion of specific amino acids and other digestive products.
5	comparative metabolism of vegetative and sporulating cultures of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	The comparative metabolism of vegetative and sporulating cultures of Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism influence of a growth hormone secreting pituitary tumour on the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism influences a growth hormone-secreted pituitary tumor on the oxidative and nonoxidative reactions of the cycle in the liver.
5	partial characterization of a biologically active steroid glycosideisolated from the starfish marthasterias glacialis	Partial characterization of a biologically active glycoside steroid isolated from the starfish marthasterias glacialis.
5	biosynthesis of amino acids in clostridium pasteurianum	The biosynthesis of amino acids in Clostridium pasteurianum.
5	exopolysaccharide colanic acid and its occurrence in the enterobacteriaceae	Exopolysaccharide colanic acid and its presence in the enterobacteria.
5	cobaltous ion effect on diauxie	Effect of cobalt ion on liauxie.
5	evidence against necessary phosphorylation during hexose transport in aspergillus nidulans	Evidence against the necessary phosphorylation during hexose transport in aspergillus nidulans.
5	protoplasts obtained from candida tropicalis grown on alkanes	Protoplasts obtained from candida tropicalis grown on alkanes.
5	carbohydrate transport in clostridium perfringens type a	Carbohydrate transport in clostridium perfringens type a.
5	glucose degradation in clostridium perfringens type a	Glucose degradation in clostridium perfringens type a.
5	the use of dietary restricted rat intestine for active transport studies	L' use of food-restricted rat intestines for active transport studies.
5	inhibition of translation of preformed lac messenger ribonucleic acid by t4 bacteriophage	Inhibition of translation of l' preformed messenger lac ribonucleic acid by bacteriophage t4.
5	the effects of isoniazid on the carbohydrates of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg	The effects of isoniazid on the carbohydrates of TB mycobacterium bcg.
5	regulation of sugar transport in isolated bacterial membrane preparations from escherichia coli	The regulation of sugar transport in isolated bacterial membrane preparations of Escherichia coli.
5	phenol biosynthesis in higher plants gallic acid	Phenol biosynthesis in higher than gallic acid plants.
5	dietary protein and the control of fatty acid synthesis in rat adipose tissue	Dietary proteins and the control of fatty acid synthesis in rat adipose tissue.
5	fecal streptococci on barley and malt kernels and instant malted milk powder	Fecal streptococci on barley and malt grains and instant malt milk powder.
5	product inhibition of the fermentative formation of glutamic acid	Inhibition by the product of the fermentative formation of glutamic acid.
5	rapid detection of sublethally impaired cells of enterobacteriaceae in dried foods	The rapid detection of d&apos cells; enterobacteria sub @-@Lethally altered in dried foods.
5	thymineless death in escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid replication and the immune state	Thymine-free death in deoxyribonucleic acid replication of Escherichia coli and immune status.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus regulation of malic enzyme synthesis by an inducible malate permease	Use of malate by a group of streptococci for the regulation of l&apos synthesis; malic enzyme synthesis by an inducible malate permease.
5	stimulation of galactokinase synthesis in escherichia coli by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Stimulation of galactokinase synthesis in Escherichia coli by adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	immunochemistry of the capsular polysaccharide of an acinetobacter	Immunochemistry of the capsular polysaccharide of acinetobacter.
5	undamped oscillations of pyridine nucleotide and oxygen tension in chemostat cultures of klebsiella aerogenes	Undamped oscillations of pyridine nucleotide and voltage; oxygen in chemostat cultures of klebsiella aerogenes.
5	dissimilation of methionine by fungi	Dissimulation of methionine by fungi.
5	involvement of phosphoenolpyruvate in lactose utilization by group n streptococci	L' involvement of phosphoenolpyruvate in apos; lactose utilization by group n streptococci.
5	the emision of corrosive vapours by wood hot water extracted o acetylated hemicelluloses from sweet chestnut castnaea sativa and wych elm ulmus glabrau and a discussion of o acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during incubation at 48 degrees and 100 per cent relative humidity	Emission of corrosive vapours by the apo; hot wood water extracted from acetylated hemicelluloses from the sativa chestnut and elapos; ulmus glabrau and a discussion of acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during the apo; incubation at 48 degrees and 100% d' relative humidity.
5	compartmentation of glutamate metabolism in brain evidence for the existence of two different tricarboxylic acid cycles in brain	The compartmentalization of glutamate metabolism in the brain indicates the existence of two different glutamate cycles in the brain.
5	carabolite repression of the lac operon repression of translation	Carabolic repression of the repression of the lac operon of translation.
5	induction of enzymes in dormant spores of aspergillus oryzae	Apos induction; enzymes in dormant spores of aspergillus oryzae.
5	inducible gamma butyrobetaine degrading enzymes in pseudomonas species ak 1	The inducible enzymes degrading gamma-butyrobetaine in Pseudomonas species ak 1 are inducible.
5	pathways of anaerobic acetate utilization in escherichia coli and aerobacter cloacae	Pathways; anaerobic use of acetate in escherichia coli and aerobacter cloacae.
5	effect of glucose ingestion on the metabolism of free fatty acids in human subjects	The effect of glucose ingestion on the metabolism of free fatty acids in humans.
5	tissue distribution of glycosphingolipids in a case of fabry s disease	Tissue distribution of glycosphingolipids in a case of Fabry s.
5	metabolism of d and l glyceraldehyde in adipose tissue a stereochemical probe for glycerokinase activity	Metabolism of d and l glyceraldehyde in adipose tissue, a stereochemical probe for glycerokinase activity.
5	mechanism of activation of catabolite sensitive genes a positive control system	D&apos mechanisms; activation of catabolite sensitive genes a positive control system.
5	identification of members of the family enterobacteriaceae by the r b system	System identification of members of the Enterobacterial family r b.
5	effect of glucose and low oxygen tension on l asparaginase production by a strain of escherichia coli b	The effect of glucose and dapos; low oxygen tension on the production of apos; asparaginase l by a strain of apos; escherichia coli b.
5	heterogeneity among strains of mycoplasma granularum and identification of mycoplasma hyosynoviae sp n	Heterogeneity among strains of mycoplasma granularum and identification of mycoplasma hyosynoviae sp.
5	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 11a 43	Substance specific to type 11a 43 pneumococcus.
5	disappearance of isocitrate lyase enzyme from cells of chlorella pyrenoidosa	Disappearance of apos; isocitrate lyase enzyme from chlorella pyrenoidosa cells.
5	catalase dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage during phagocytosis	Catalase-dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage during phagocytosis.
5	effect of renal insufficiency on the active transport of calcium by the small intestine	Effect of vomiting; renal insufficiency on the active transport of calcium via mucus; small intestine.
5	enhancement of phagocytosis in bovine milk leukocytes in vitro	L' augmentation of phagocytosis in bovine milk leukocytes in vitro.
5	black beauty out of mycobacterium fortuitum cruz	A black beauty extracted from mycobacterium fortuitum cruz.
5	the role of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent malate dehydrogenase and isocitrate dehydrogenase in the supply of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate for steroidogenesis in the superovulated rat ovary	The role of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent malate dehydrogenase and l' isocitrate dehydrogenase in the apos; supply of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced for steroidogenesis in the apos; ovary of superovulated rat.
5	composition of the cellular envelopes of anabaena cylindrica	Composition of cellular envelopes of anabaena cylindrica.
5	steady state measurement of the turnover of amino acid in the cellular proteins of growing escherichia coli existence of two kinetically distinct reactions	It is possible to measure at the beginning; state; equilibrium of the turnover of amino acids in the cellular proteins of growth escherichia coli exists two kinetically distinct reactions.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in spirochaeta stenostrepta	Carbohydrate metabolism in spirochaeta stenostrepta.
5	control of colanic acid synthesis	Synthesis control of l' colanic acid.
5	high yield preparation of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells a biochemical and fine structural study	High yield preparation of isolated rat liver parenchyma cells for a fine biochemical and fine structural study.
5	the biosynthesis of steryl glucosides in plants	The biosynthesis of steryl glucosides in plants.
5	studies of the effect of metoclopramide and apomorphine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Apos studies; effect of metoclopramide and apos; apomorphine on gastric emptying and secretion in men.
5	regulation of lipogenesis stimulation of fatty acid synthesis in vivo and in vitro in the liver of the newly hatched chick	Regulation of lipogenesis stimulation of fatty acid synthesis in vivo and in vitro in the liver of newly hatched chick.
5	factors that modify the metabolism of ethanol in rat liver and adaptive changes produced by its chronic administration	Factors that modify the metabolism of l*apos; ethanol in rat liver and adaptive changes produced by chronic administration.
5	the effect of nitrogen mustard intoxication on glucose absorption from the small intestine of the rat	Mustard poisoning; nitrogen poisoning; glucose absorption from the appos; rat's small intestine.
5	growth stimulants in plant extracts for leuconostoc citrovorum	Growth stimulants in plant extracts for leuconostoc citrovorum.
5	lyophilization of cell free marek s disease herpesvirus and a herpesvirus from turkeys	A herpesvirus from turkeys; a herpesvirus from acellular and dapo mares.
5	glutathione dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage	Glutathione-dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage.
5	amino acid requirements of aeromonas	Amino acid requirements for Aeromonas.
5	biosynthesis of glycosaminoglycans in bovine cornea the effet of uridine diphosphate xylose	Biosynthesis of glycosaminoglycans in bovine cornea l&apos effect; uridine diphosphate xylose xylose.
5	carbohydrate composition of vesicular stomatitis virus	Carbohydrate composition of vesicular stomatitis virus.
5	fatty acid synthetase activity in mycobacterium phlei regulation by polysaccharides	L' fatty acid synthetase activity in mycobacterium phlei regulation by polysaccharides.
5	improved chemically defined basal medium cmrl 1969 for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells	Basal chemically defined improved medium cmrl 1969 for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells.
5	resistance of bacillus subtilis spores to inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of a bactericide i suitability of viable count procedures	Resistance of bacillus subtilis spores to apo; inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of apo; a bactericide suitable for viable enumeration.
5	enzymes of glucose metabolism in normal mouse pancreatic islets	The enzymes of glucose metabolism in normal rat pancreatic islets.
5	selective inhibition of glucose oxidation by triethyltin in rat brain in vivo	L' selective inhibition of glucose oxidation by triethyltin in rat brain in vivo.
5	glucose metabolism in mouse pancreatic islets	Glucose metabolism in mouse pancreatic islets.
5	interconvertible forms of glycogen phosphorylase in neurospora crassa	Interconvertible forms of glycogen phosphorylase in neurospora crassa.
5	lipid metabolism in the perfused chicken liver lipogenesis from glucose acetate and palmitate	Lipid metabolism in chicken liver lipogenesis perfused from glucose acetate and palmitate.
5	the composition of beta lactamase i and beta lactamase ii from bacillus cereus 569 h	Composition of beta lactamase i and beta lactamase ii of the bacillus cereus 569 h.
5	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate and catabolite repression in Escherichia coli.
5	revised identification of the chromophore of a cell division factor from crown gall tumor cells of vinca rosea l	Revised identification of the d&apos chromophore; a cell division factor from vinca rosea l crown gall tumor cells.
5	effect of 2 deoxyglucose on cell wall formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae and its relation to cell growth inhibition	Effect of 2 deoxyglucose on cell wall formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae and its relationship to cellular growth.
5	influence of ribosides on ultraviolet resistance of escherichia coli role of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in the ultraviolet resistance enhancement after amino acid prestarvation	The influence of ribosides on resistance to apos; ultraviolet radiation; escherichia coli role of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in apos; increased resistance to apos; ultraviolet after amino acid preconditioning.
5	enzymes of carbohydrate metabolism in thiobacillus species	Enzymes of carbohydrate metabolism in thiobacillus species.
5	giant cysts and cysts with multiple central bodies in azotobacter vinelandii	Cysts and cysts with multiple central bodies in l'apos; azotobacter vinelandii.
5	variation in the proportion of 50s and 30s ribosomal subunits at different growth rates	Change in the proportion of 50s and 30s under-ribosomal units at different growth rates.
5	kinetics of exogenous induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	Apos kinetics; exogenous induction of the hexose phosphate transport system 6 d' escherichia coli.
5	chromosome replication and the division cycle of escherichia coli b r	Chromosome replication and the division cycle of escherichia coli b r.
5	medical management of chronic renal disease	Medical management of chronic renal disease (CRD) conditions.
5	biochemical and biophysical aspects of human platelet adhesion to collagen fibers	Biochemical and biophysical aspects of apo; human platelet adhesion to collagen fibers.
5	induction and repression of l arabinose isomerase in salmonella typhimurium	Induction and repression of isomerase isos; arabinosis in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	preparation and ultraviolet light induced transformation of an antifungal mixture of heptaene antibiotics of streptomyces surinam	The preparation and ultraviolet light induce transformation of an antifungal mixture of heptaene antibiotics of streptomyces surinam.
5	r b enteric differential system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Enteric differentiation system rb for identification of enterobacteria.
5	microbiological study of copiamycin	A microbiological study of copiamycin.
5	metabolism of the glycosyl diglycerides and phosphatidylglucose of staphylococcus aureus	Metabolism of glycosyl diglycerides and phosphatidylglucose of staphylococcus aureus.
5	utilization of glucose in heterotrophic media by thiobacillus intermedius	Utilisation of glucose in heterotrophic media by thiobacillus intermedius.
5	regulation of glucose metabolism in thiobacillus intermedius	The regulation of glucose metabolism in thiobacillus intermedius.
5	respiratory metabolism of a petite negative yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h	Respiratory metabolism d'apos; a small negative yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h.
5	biosynthesis of alpha ketoglutarate by the reductive carboxylation of succinate in bacteroides ruminicola	Biosynthesis of succinate by reductive carboxylation of succinate in bacteroides ruminicola.
5	glycogen metabolism in chlamydia infected hela cells	Glycogen metabolism in chlamydia infected helical cells.
5	radiometric method for detection of bacteremia	This is a radiometric method for detection of bacteremia.
5	role of carbon and nitrogen sources in bacterial growth and sporulation	The role of carbon and nitrogen sources in bacterial growth and sporulation.
5	preparation of labeled aflatoxins with high specific activities	Preparation of labelled aflatoxins with high specific activities.
5	the regulation of triglyceride synthesis and fatty acid synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue effects of altered dietary and hormonal conditions	Regulation of triglyceride and fatty acid synthesis in epididymal adipose tissue effects in rats of dietary and hormonal modified conditions.
5	tryptophan catabolism during sporulation in bacillus cereus	Tryptophan catabolism during sporulation in Bacillus cereus.
5	necessity of calcium ion for cell division in lactobacillus bifidus	Necessity of calcium ion for cell division in lactobacillus bifidus cells.
5	metabolic regulation in glucose limited chemostat cultures of escherichia coli	Metabolic regulation in glucose limited chemostat cultures of escherichia coli.
5	effect of type of carbohydrate on amino acid accumulation and utilization by tetrahymena	Effect of type of acid; carbohydrate on acid build-up and synthesis; amino acid utilization by tetrahymena.
5	partial purification and characterization of glycogen phosphorylase from dictyostelium discoideum	Partial purification and characterization of glycogen phosphorylase from dictyostelium discoideum.
5	listeria monocytogenes in nature	Listeria monocytogenes in nature.
5	pigment formation for differentiating cryptococcus neoformans from candida albicans	Pigment formation to differentiate cryptococcus neoformans from candida albicans.
5	distribution of the phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system in bacteria	The distribution of the phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system in bacteria.
5	induction morphogenesis and germination of the chlamydospore of candida albicans	Induced morphogenesis and germination of the chlamydospore of candida albicans.
5	cell density dependent changes of glycolipid concentrations in fibroblasts and loss of this response in virus transformed cells	Changes in the concentration of glycolipid in cell-density-dependent fibroblasts and loss of this response in virus-transformed cells.
5	elaboration of the matrix glycoprotein of enamel by the secretory ameloblasts of the rat incisor as revealed by radioautography after galactose 3 h injection	Elaboration of the matrix glycoprotein of the apos; enamel by the secretory ameloblasts of the apos; rat incisor as revealed by radioautography after a 3-h galactose injection.
5	sporulation of bacillus subtilis in continuous culture	Sporulation of bacillus subtilis in culture continued.
5	roles of acetate and pyruvate in the metabolism of streptococcus diacetilactis	Roles of acetate and pyruvate in the metabolism of streptococcus diacetilactis.
5	long term starvation survival of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	Long-term fasting survival of rod and spherical cells of the spinal cord; arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long term starvation of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	Intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long-term deprivation of rod and spherical d' arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	feedback inhibition of l glutamine d fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by uridine diphosphate n acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa	Retroactive inhibition of glutamine fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by uridine diphosphate n acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa.
5	isolation and serological characterization of a cell wall antigen of rothia dentocariosa	Serological isolation and serological characterization of a parietal antigen of rothia dentocariosa.
5	cytochrome content of two pseudomonads containing mixed function oxidase systems	Cytochrome content of two pseudomonads containing mixed function oxidase systems.
5	synchronous growth of enteric bacteria	The synchronous growth of enteric bacteria.
5	composition of human cerebrospinal fluid cerebroside	Cerebroside composition of human cerebrospinal fluid.
5	pathway of carbon flow during fatty acid synthesis from lactate and pyruvate in rat adipose tissue	The pathway of carbon flux during fatty acid synthesis from lactate and pyruvate in rat adipose tissue.
5	beta galactoside transport in bacterial membrane preparations energy coupling via membrane bounded d lactic dehydrogenase	Beta-galactosides transport in bacterial membrane preparations occurs by energy coupling via membrane-bound d lactic-dehydrogenase.
5	iron its intracellular localization and possible role in cell division	Iron its intracellular localization and possible role in cell division.
5	liver metastases an experimental study	Liver mets, an experimental study.
5	cultivation of mycoplasmas on glass	Culture of mycoplasmas on glass.
5	human alveolar macrophages comparison of phagocytic ability glucose utilization and ultrastructure in smokers and nonsmokers	Human alveolar macrophages of phagocytic capacity, apos, glucose utilization and apos; ultrastructure in smokers and non-smokers.
5	reduced brain glucose with normal plasma glucose in salicylate poisoning	Reduced cerebral glucose with normal plasma glucose during salicylate poisoning.
5	autolysis of bacillus cereus cell walls and isolation of structural components	Autolysis of bacillus cereus cell walls and isolation of structural components.
5	effects of molybdate and selenite on formate and nitrate metabolism in escherichia coli	The effects of molybdate and selenite on formate and nitrate metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	cell wall composition in corynebacterium bovis and some other corynebacteria	Composition of cell wall of corynebacterium bovis and other corynebacteria.
5	biosynthesis during recovery of heat injured salmonella typhimurium	Biosynthesis during recovery of heat-damaged Salmonella typhimurium cells.
5	heterotrophic growth of blue gren algae in dim light	Heterotrophic growth of blue-frog-like algae in low-light conditions.
5	isolation culture and fermentation characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium var bryantivar n from the rumen of sheep	Isolation, culture and fermentation characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium var bryantivar n from rumen of sheep.
5	regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	relationships between disaccharide hydrolysis and sugar transport in amphibian small intestine	Relationship between disaccharide hydrolysis and sugar transport in amphibian small intestine.
5	electron microscope radioautographic study of glycogen synthesis in the rabbit retina	Radioautographic electron microscopic study of glycogen synthesis in the rabbit retina.
5	inactivation of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase by glucose in yeast	Inactivation of fructose 16 diphosphatase by glucose in yeast.
5	reactivative action of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or dipicolinic acid on inactive glucose dehydrogenase obtained from heated spores of bacillus subtilis	L&apos reactive; ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or l' dipicolinic acid on inactive glucose dehydrogenase obtained from heated spores of subtilis bacillus.
5	2 keto 3 deoxygluconate an intermediate in the fermentation of gluconate by clostridia	The 2 keto 3 deoxygluconate is an intermediate in the fermentation of gluconate by clostridia.
5	folate replacement by tetrahydrohomopteroate in triazine resistant bacteria	Replacement of folate by tetrahydrohomopteroate (tetrahydrohomopteroate) in triazine-resistant bacteria.
5	studies on type ii glycogenosis effects of cortisone derivatives on acid glucosidase	Type ii glycogenic effects of cortisone derivatives on acid glucosidase studies.
5	a polymer of glucose and n acetylgalactosamine 1 phosphate in the wall of micrococcus sp a1	Glucose and phosphate polymer acetylgalactosamine 1 in the wall of micrococcus sp a1.
5	the interaction in vitro between polymorphonuclear leukocytes and mycoplasma	L' in vitro interaction between polymorphonuclear leukocytes and mycoplasma.
5	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells i subcellular distribution composition and transport of newly synthesized lipid liposomes	Studies on lipid compartmentation in fat cells i, subcellular distribution composition, and transport of newly synthesized lipid liposomes.
5	evidence for the presence of a pool of glycerides with a rapid rate of turnover in brown fat from newborn rabbits	Evidence of the presence of a pool of glycerides with a rapid turnover rate in the brown fat of newborn rabbits.
5	a stimulation study of brain compartments metabolism of glutamate and related substances in mouse brain	A study of brain compartments metabolism of glutamate and related substances in mouse brain.
5	listeria monocytogenes meningitis an opportunistic infection	Listeria monocytogenes meningitis is an opportunistic infection.
5	purification properties and regulation of glutamic dehydrogenase of bacillus licheniformis	Purification properties and regulation of glutamate dehydrogenase of the bacillus licheniformis.
5	mechanism for regulating the distribution of glucose carbon between the embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate pathways in streptococcus faecalis	Mechanisms to regulate the distribution of glucose carbon between the embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate pathways in streptococcus faecalis.
5	regulation of sugar transport in neurospora crassa	The regulation of sugar transport in neurospora crassa.
5	hyphal wall compositions of marine and terrestrial fungi of the genus leptosphaeria	Hyphal wall composition of marine and terrestrial fungi of the genus leptosphaeria.
5	lactate production in the perfused rat liver	Lactate production in the perfused rat liver.
5	allosteric activation of brain hexokinase by magnesium ions and by magnesium ion adenosine triphosphate complex	Allosteric activation of brain hexokinase by magnesium ions and the adenosine triphosphate complex of l' magnesium ion.
5	the uptake and efflux of glycine from rat cerebral cortex slices	L' absorption and l' efflux of glycine from rat cerebral cortical slices.
5	hydrogen peroxide utilization in myeloperoxidase deficient leukocytes a possible microbicidal control mechanism	Peroxide d' hydrogen in myeloperoxidase-deficient leukocytes, a possible microbicidal control mechanism.
5	poly hydroxybutyrate biosynthesis and the regulation of glucose metabolism in azotobacter beijerinckii	Polyhydroxybutyrate biosynthesis and regulation of glucose metabolism in azotobacter beijerinckii.
5	comparison of some metabolic parameters in the perfused and the incubated rat diaphragm muscle with diaphragm muscle in vivo	Comparison of some metabolic parameters in the diaphragm muscle of perfused and incubated rats with diaphragm muscle in vivo.
5	immunochemistry of the common antigen of enterobacteriaceae kunin relation to lipopolysaccharide core structure	Immunochemistry of the common antigen of enterobacterial kunin with respect to the central structure of lipopolysaccharide.
5	quantitative radioautography of sugar transport in intestinal biopsies from normal humans and a patient with glucose galactose malabsorption	Quantitative radioautography of sugar transport in intestinal biopsies of normal and normal humans; a patient with glucose galactose malabsorption.
5	renal failure in surgical patients treatment with intravenous essential amino acids and hypertonic glucose	Renal failure in surgical patients treated with intravenous essential amino acids and hypertonic glucose.
5	rate studies of polysaccharide biosynthesis from guanosine diphosphate d glucose and guanosine diphosphate d mannose	Rate studies of polysaccharide biosynthesis from guanosine diphosphate glucose and guanosine diphosphate mannose.
5	carbohydrate intolerance in infants with diarrhea	L'apos; carbohydrate intolerance in infants with diarrhea.
5	nutrition of mouse ascites tumor cells in primary culture ii specific requirement for glucose	Tumour cell nutrition; mouse ascites in primary culture ii specific requirement for glucose.
5	nuclease production and lysostaphin susceptibility of staphylococcus aureus and other catalase positive cocci	Nuclearase production and lysostaphin sensitivity of staphylococcus aureus and d' other catalase positive cocci.
5	growth and metabolism of l cells in a chemically defined medium in a controlled environment culture system i effects of o2 tension on l cell cultures	Growth and metabolism of l cells in a chemically defined medium in a controlled environment culture system i effects of tension o2 on l-cell cultures.
5	regulation of gluconeogenesis during exposure of young rats to hypoxic conditions	The regulation of gluconeogenesis during exposure of young rats to hypoxic conditions.
5	the diffusion capsule a novel device for the addition of a solute at a constant rate to a liquid medium its application to metabolic regulation	Diffusion capsule is a novel device for the addition of a constant velocity solute to a liquid medium its application to metabolic regulation.
5	acrylamide gel electrophoresis of intracellular proteins during early stages of sporulation in bacillus subtilis	Gel electrophoresis; acrylamide of intracellular proteins during the early stages of sporulation in bacillus subtilis.
5	fatty acid composition of cladosporium resinae grown on glucose and on hydrocarbons	Fatty acid composition of cladosporium resinae grown on glucose and on hydrocarbons.
5	electrophoretic heterogeneity of bacterial nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate specific isocitrate dehydrogenases	Bacterial nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate specific isocitrate dehydrogenases electrophoretic heterogeneity.
5	physiology of sporeforming bacteria associated with insects iv glucose catabolism in bacillus larvae	Physiology of spore-forming bacteria associated with insects iv catabolism of glucose in bacillus larvae.
5	nutritional requirements of arizona citrobacter and providencia	Arizona citrobacter and providencia nutritional needs.
5	studies on the division cycle of mammalian cells v modifications of time parameters by different steady state culture conditions	Studies on the division cycle of mammalian cells v modification of temporal parameters by different culture conditions at apo; equilibrium.
5	accumulation of untranslated lactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid during catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Lapos; ribonucleic acid accumulation, an untranslated lactose messenger, during catabolite repression in escherichia coli.
5	induction and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase in streptococcus faecalis	Induction and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific for 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase in Streptococcus faecalis.
5	transfer of alanine isomers by rat small intestine	Transmission of apo isomers; alanine through rat small intestine.
5	nuclease activities of mycoplasma gallisepticum as a function of culture age in different media	L' nuclease activity of mycoplasma gallisepticum as a function of age; culture age in different media.
5	transmethylation of sterols in aerobically adapting saccharomyces cerevisiae	Transmethylation of sterols in aerobically adapting saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	purification and characterization of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase from plasmodium berghei	The purification and characterization of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase from plasmodium berghei.
5	development of respiration and mitochondria in mucor genevensis after anaerobic growth absence of glucose repression	Development of respiration and mitochondria in mucosal genesis after anaerobic growth without glucose repression.
5	fermentation of agmatine in streptococcus faecalis occurrence of putrescine transcarbamoylase	Fermentation of agmatine in streptococcus faecalis occurrence of putrescine transcarbamoylase.
5	enzymatic basis for differentiation of rhizobium into fast and slow growing groups	Enzymatic basis for differentiation of rhizobia into fast and slow growing groups.
5	studies on the diversity of inositol containing yeast phospholipids incorporation of 2 deoxyglucose into lipid	Studies on the diversity of l' incorporation of 2 deoxyglucose into lipids containing yeast inositol phospholipids.
5	carbon and sulphur utilization during growth of pseudomonas fluorescens on potassium d glucose 6 o sulphate as the sole sulphur source	Use of carbon and sulfur during growth of pseudomonas fluorescens on potassium glucose 6 o sulfate as the sole sulfur source.
5	fatty acids of mycobacterium kansasii	Fatty acids of kansasii mycobacterium.
5	production of extracellular polysaccharide matrix by zoogloea ramigera	Production of extracellular polysaccharide matrix by zoogloea ramigera.
5	transverse septum formation in budding cells of the yeastlike fungus candida albicans	Formation of d' transverse septum in budding cells of the yeast fungus candida albicans.
5	effect of glutamate on exogenous citrate catabolism of neisseria meningitidis and of other species of neisseria	Effect of glutamate on the catabolism of exogenous citrate of neisseria meningitidis and d' other species of neisseria.
5	resistance of zygorhynchus species to lysis	Resistance of zygorhynchus species to lysis.
5	metabolic effects of the major component of bovine growth hormone	Metabolic effects of the major component of bovine growth hormone.
5	amino acid metabolism in exercising man	Amino acid metabolism in humans; exercise.
5	the effect of polystyrene beads on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate concentration in leukocytes	The effect of polystyrene beads on cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in leukocytes.
5	motor neurone disease further evidence for an abnormality of nerve metabolism	Motor-oneuron disease is further evidence of apoes, an abnormality of nerve metabolism.
5	high aflatoxin production on a chemically defined medium	High production of aflatoxin on a chemically defined medium.
5	antifungal activity of substituted nitrobenzenes and anilines	Antifungal activity of substituted nitrobenzenes and anilines.
5	impairment of glycine absorption by glucose and galactose in man	Glycine absorption by glucose and galactose in men.
5	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during glucose repression in the rat liver	Cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate during glucose repression in the rat liver.
5	haem synthesis during mitochondrogenesis in yeast	Lapos synthesis; hematoma during mitochondrogenesis in yeast.
5	some biological properties of pneumococcus type 37 and the chemistry of its capsular polysaccharide	Certain biological properties of type 37 pneumococcus and the chemistry of its capsular polysaccharide.
5	cultural estimation of yeasts on seaweeds	Cultural estimate of yeasts on seaweed.
5	anaerobic roll tube media for nonselective enumeration and isolation of bacteria in human feces	Anaerobic roll tube media for non-selective counting and isolation of bacteria from human feces.
5	utilization of carbon sources by pullularia pullulans for the elaboration of extracellular polysaccharides	Use of carbon sources by pullularia pullulans for the preparation of extracellular polysaccharides.
5	role of ph and nitrogen limitation in the elaboration of the extracellular polysaccharide pullulan by pullularia pullulans	Role of ph and nitrogen limitation in the development of extracellular polysaccharide pullulan by pullularia pullulans.
5	comparison of schaedler agar and trypticase soy yeast extract agar for the cultivation of anaerobic bacteria	Comparison of schaedler agar and trypticase soy agar yeast extract for culture of anaerobic bacteria.
5	chemically defined medium for the growth of clostridium perfringens	A chemically defined medium for the growth of clostridium perfringens.
5	influence of glucose levels on the in vitro phagocytosis of bacteria by human neutrophils	The influence of glucose levels on the in vitro phagocytosis of bacteria by human neutrophils.
5	effect of adrenocorticosteroid on glucose metabolism in bcg sensitized alveolar macrophages	Adrenocorticoid effect on glucose metabolism in bcg-sensitized alveolar macrophages.
5	effect of diuresis on staphylococcus aureus kidney infections in mice	Effect of diuresis on staphylococcus aureus kidney infections in the mouse.
5	regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis catabolite repression of phenoxazinone synthase and actinomycin formation by glucose	Regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis, catabolite repression of phenoxazinone synthase and d&apos formation; actinomycin by glucose.
5	control of stable ribonucleic acid chain initiation in escherichia coli during diauxie lag	Lacidosis control; chain initiation; stable ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli during latency of diauxis.
5	characterization and regulation of pyruvate carboxylase of bacillus licheniformis	Characterization and regulation of pyruvate carboxylase of bacillus licheniformis.
5	role of metabolic energy in the transport of galactosides by streptococcus lactis	The role of lapos; metabolic energy in the transport of galactosides by streptococcus lactis.
5	synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate from propionate in sheep liver	Synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate from propionate in sheep liver.
5	characterization of insoluble protein fractions of mitochondria from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Characterization of insoluble protein fractions of mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	fluorometric studies of oxidative metabolism in isolated papillary muscle of the rabbit	Fluorometric studies of oxidative metabolism in isolated papillary muscle of the rabbit.
5	the maltase glucoamylase and transglucosylase activities of acid glucosidase from rabbit muscle	L' glucoamylase maltase and transglucosylase activity of acid glucosidase from rabbit muscle.
5	insolubilized enzymes kinetic behaviour of glucose oxidase bound to porous glass particles	Kinetic behavior of the insolubilized enzymes of glucose oxidase bound to porous glass particles.
5	the regulation of growth hormone secretion from the isolated rat anterior pituitary in vitro the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	The regulation of apo secretion; rat growth hormone; isolated rat anterior pituitary in vitro role of apos; cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate.
5	fat transport and lymph and plasma lipoprotein biosynthesis by isolated intestine	Fat transport and lymph and plasma lipoprotein biosynthesis by isolated intestine.
5	technique for measuring 14 co 2 uptake by soil microorganisms in situ	Technique for in situ measurement of pH; 14oC absorption by soil microorganisms.
5	l asparaginase synthesis by erwinia aroideae	L-asparaginase synthesis by erwinia aroideae.
5	factors influencing l asparaginase production by erwinia aroideae	Factors influencing asparaginase production by erwinia aroideae.
5	galactose utilization in galactosemia	Use of galactose in galactosemia.
5	stimulation of glucose transport in cultures of density inhibited chick embryo cells	Chick embryos were inhibited by stimulation of glucose transport in density cultures.
5	differential sensitivities of the two malate dehydrogenases and the maltose permease to the effect of glucose in saccharomyces carlsbergensis	The differential sensitivities of the two malate dehydrogenases and maltose permease to l' effect of glucose in saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	turnover of putrescine in a pseudomonas species	The turnover of putrescine in a pseudomonad-like species.
5	nature of col e 1 plasmid replication in escherichia coli in the presence of the chloramphenicol	Nature of plasmid replication in escherichia coli in the presence of chloramphenicol.
5	induction and characterization of galactosidase in an extreme thermophile	Induction and characterization of galactosidase in an extreme thermophile.
5	relationship between yield of protoplasts and growth phase in saccharomyces	Relationship between yield of protoplasts and growth phase in saccharomyces.
5	sensitivity of the 14 co 2 radiometric method for bacterial detection	Sensitivity of the 14-co 2 radiometric method for bacterial detection.
5	stimulation of lactic streptococci in milk by galactosidase	Stimulation of lactic streptococci in milk by galactosidase.
5	fate of carbon passing through the glucose pool of rumen digesta	Route of carbon passing through the glucose pool of rumen digesta.
5	influence of culture media on the antistaphylococcal activity of fosfomycin	The influence of culture media on the antistaphylococcal activity of fosfomycin.
5	automated radiometric detection of bacteria in 2 967 blood cultures	Automated radiometric detection of bacteria in 2,967 blood cultures.
5	clostridium perfringens i sporulation in a biphasic glucose ion exchange resin medium	Clostridium perfringens i sporulation in a biphasic glucose ion exchange resin medium.
5	evaluation of the modified r b system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Evaluation of the modified rb system for apo; identification of enterobacteria.
5	growth factor requirements of ruminal cellulolytic bacteria isolated from microbial populations supplied diets with or without rapidly fermentable carbohydrate	The growth factor requirements of rumen cellulolytic bacteria isolated from microbial populations provided diets with or without rapidly fermentable carbohydrates.
5	the response of infants to carbohydrate oral loads after recovery from diarrhea	Response of infants to carbohydrate oral load after cure of diarrhea.
5	sickling reversed and blocked by urea in invert sugar	Trepanocytosis reversed and blocked by urea in invert sugar.
5	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer i basal levels and effect of food and atropine	Serum gastrin in the gastrointestinal tract; duodenal ulcer i baseline and baseline; effect of food and food; atropine.
5	the inhibition of plant and animal adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases by a cell division promoting substance from tissues of higher plant species	L' inhibition of adenosine 3-5 plant and animal cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases by a cell division favoring a substance from tissues of higher plant species.
5	coexistence of two asexual strains on a single resource	The coexistence of two asexual strains on a resource.
5	monosaccharide and chitin content of cell walls of histoplasma capsulatum and blastomyces dermatitidis	Monosaccharide and chitin content of cell walls of apos; histoplasma capsulatum and blastomyces dermatitidis.
5	subcellular fractionation by differential and zonal centrifugation of aerobically grown glucose de repressed saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Subcellular fractionation by differential and zonal centrifugation of aerobically grown glucose from repressed succharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	distribution and correlation of events during thermal inactivation of bacillus megaterium spores	Distribution and correlation of events during thermal inactivation of megaterium spores.
5	hyphal wall synthesis in aspergillus nidulans effect of protein synthesis inhibition and osmotic shock on chitin insertion and morphogenesis	Effect of apos; inhibition of protein synthesis and osmotic shock on apos; chitin insertion and morphogenesis in aspergillus nidulans.
5	relationship between energy substrate utilization and specific growth rate in aspergillus nidulans	Relationships between energy substrate utilization and specific growth rate in l' aspergillus nidulans.
5	utilization of glucose and the effect of organic compounds on the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Use of glucose and effects of organic compounds on the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	heterotrophic metabolism of the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Heterotrophic metabolism of the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	metabolism of glutamine by the intact functioning kidney of the dog studies in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis	Glutamine metabolism by intact kidney in metabolic acidosis and lacidosis studies; alkalosis in dogs.
5	isolation and properties of phagocytic vesicles ii alveolar macrophages	Isolation and properties of phagocytic vesicles ii alveolar macrophages.
5	abnormal bactericidal metabolic and lysosomal functions of chediak higashi syndrome leukocytes	Abnormal bactericidal metabolic and lysosomal functions of chediak higashi-like leukocytes.
5	cell wall composition and deoxyribonucleic acid similarities among the anaerobic coryneforms classical propionibacteria and strains of arachnia propionica	Cell wall composition and deoxyribonucleic acid similarities between the classical anaerobic propionibacteria and the d' arachnia propionica strains.
5	growth of obligate autotrophic bacteria on glucose in a continuous flow through apparatus	Growth of obligate autotrophic bacteria on glucose in a continuous flow through the apparatus.
5	factors affecting the level of alanine racemase in escherichia coli	Factors influencing the level of alanine racemase in escherichia coli.
5	glycerol turnover and oxidation in man	Glycerol turnover and dapos; glycerol oxidation in men.
5	oral rehydration of children with acute diarrhoea	Oral rehydration of children with acute diarrhea.
5	observations on cell volume ultrastructure mitochondrial conformation and vital dye uptake in ehrlich ascites tumor cells effects of inhibiting energy production and function of the plasma membrane	Lapses; observation of mitochondrial conformation of cell volume and apos; vital dye absorption in ehrlich ascites tumor cells has the effect of inhibiting the production of apos; energy and function of the plasma membrane.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b effect of thiamine starvation	The regulation of drugs; the b effect of drugs; staphylococcal enterotoxin resulting from thiamine deprivation.
5	induction of galactokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae kinetics of induction and glucose effects	Induction of galactokinase in apos kinetics; saccharomyces cerevisiae induction and glucose effects.
5	a biochemical subdivision of one phage type of salmonella typhimurium	A biochemical subdivision of salmonella typhimurium salmonella; a typical phage.
5	multiple forms of pseudomonas multivorans glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differences in size pyridine nucleotide specificity and susceptibility to inhibition by adenosine 5 triphosphate	Pseudomonas glucose multivorans 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differ in size pyridine nucleotide specificity and susceptibility to l' inhibition by l' adenosine 5 triphosphate.
5	structure and chemical composition of prospheroplast envelopes of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala	Structure and chemical composition of prospheroplast envelopes of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala.
5	recovery of exocellular acid phosphatase activity on saccharomyces mellis after treatment of the organism with reagents that affect the cell surface	Apos recovery; exocellular acid phosphatase activity on saccharomyces mellis after apo treatment; organism with reagents that affect the cell surface.
5	hydroxyproline heterooligosaccharides in chlamydomonas	Hydroxyproline heterooligosaccharides in chlamydomonas.
5	development of tetracycline resistant staphylococcus aureus in gnotobiotic mice	Development of tetracycline-resistant staphylococcus aureus in gnotobiotic mice.
5	control of the production of exo beta n acetylglucosaminidase by bacillus subtilis b	Control of production of exo beta n acetylglucosaminidase by bacillus subtilis b.
5	the development of the respiratory chain of saccharomyces carlsbergensis during respiratory adaptation	The development of the respiratory chain of saccharomyces carlsbergensis during respiratory adaptation.
5	subcellular fractionation by zonal centrifugation of glucose repressed anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Subcellular fractionation by zonal centrifugation of glucose represses saccharomyces carlsbergensis anaerobic growth.
5	changes in enzyme activities and distributions during glucose de repression and respiratory adaptation of anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Changes in apos; enzyme activity and distribution during glucose repression and l' respiratory adaptation of anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	effect of halofenate and clofibrate on growth and lipid synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The effect of halofenate and clofibrate on growth and lipid synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	lysis of saccharomyces cerevisiae with 2 deoxy 2 fluoro d glucose an inhibitor of the cell wall glucan synthesis	Lysis of saccharomyces cerevisiae with 2 deoxy 2 fluoro d glucose, an inhibitor of glucan synthesis in the cell wall.
5	inhibition of the metabolism of streptococci and salmonella by specific antisera	Inhibition of the metabolism of streptococci and salmonella by specific antisera.
5	repression of in vivo synthesis of the mitochondrial elongation factors t and g in saccharomyces fragilis	The repression of in vivo synthesis of d&apos factors; mitochondrial elongation t and g in saccharomyces fragilis.
5	effect of polyoxin d on chitin synthesis and septum formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The effect of polyoxin d on chitin synthesis and septum formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effects of oxygen tension and glucose repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis in continuous cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of oxygen tension and glucose repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis in continuous cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	nitrogen repression of the allantoin degradative enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Lapos repression; nitrogen repression of saccharomyces cerevisiae degrading enzymes; allantoin.
5	effect of cell density on lactose synthesis in bovine mammary cell cultures	The effect of cell density on lactose synthesis in bovine mammary cell cultures.
5	active transport of exogenous s adenosylmethionine and related compounds into cells and vacuoles of saccharomyces cerevisiae	The active transport of exogenous adenosylmethionine and related compounds into cells and vacuoles of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biosynthesis of fosfomycin by streptomyces fradiae	The biosynthesis of fosfomycin by streptomyces fradiae.
5	the regulated catabolism of endogenous and exogenous phosphatidylinositol by saccharomyces cerevisiae leading to extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and inositol	Regulated catabolism of endogenous and exogenous phosphatidylinositol by saccharomyces cerevisiae gave rise to extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and l' inositol.
5	copurification of l ascorbate 2 sulfate sulfohydrolase and arylsulfatase activities from the liver of a marine gastropod charonia lampas	Copurification of the sulfohydrolase activities of l' ascorbate 2 and l' arylsulfatase from the liver of d' a marine gastropod, charonia lampas.
5	galactose and glucose metabolism in galactokinase deficient galactose 1 p uridyl transferase deficient and normal human fibroblasts	Galactose and glucose metabolism in normal and galactose 1 p uridyl transferase deficient galactokinase and normal human fibroblasts.
5	duodenal control of gastric emptying in the milk fed calf	The duodenal control of gastric emptying in milk-fed calves.
5	autolytic enzymes in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans their action on old and newly formed walls	The autolytic enzymes in aspergillus nidulans and d&apos hyphae act on old and newly formed walls.
5	adenylate energy charge in saccharomyces cerevisiae during starvation	Energy charge of adenylate in saccharomyces cerevisiae during fasting.
5	glutamate oxidation of 6c3hed lymphoma effects of l asparaginase on sensitive and resistant lines	Glutamate oxidation of the effects of apos; asparaginase l on 6c3hed lymphoma in sensitive and resistant lines.
5	in vivo biosynthesis of peptidophosphogalactomannan in penicillium charlesii	In vivo biosynthesis of peptidophosphogalactomannan in penicillium charlesii.
5	biotin uptake by cold shocked cells spheroplasts and repressed cells of saccharomyces cerevisiae lack of feedback control	Absorption of biotin by spheroplasts from heat-shocked and repressed cells of saccharomyces cerevisiae n&apos is not controlled by feedback.
5	carbon metabolism under conditions of regulated penicillin biosynthesis	Regulated carbon metabolism under controlled conditions of penicillin biosynthesis.
5	microbodies in methanol assimilating yeasts	Microgranules in methanol assimilating yeast.
5	effect of acetaldehyde upon the oxidative degradation of glucose by baker s yeast	Effect of acetaldehyde on the oxidative degradation of glucose by bakers' yeast.
5	coordinate regulation of adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate permeases by the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in salmonella typhimurium	Coordinate regulation of adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate permeases by the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	a new method of obtaining zygotes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	A novel method for obtaining zygotes in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	multiple forms of mitochondrial alcohol dehydrogenase in saccharomyces cerevisiae	In many forms, the mitochondrial alcohol dehydrogenase is present in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the response of a bioelectrochemical cell with saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolizing glucose under various fermentation conditions	The response of a bioelectrochemical cell to saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolizing glucose under various conditions of fermentation.
5	is phlorizin or its aglycon the inhibitor of intestinal glucose transport a study in normal and lactase deficient man	Phlorizin or its aglycone is lapos; an inhibitor of intestinal glucose transport studied in normal lactase-deficient men.
5	development of mitochondrial membranes in anaerobically grown yeast cells	The development of mitochondrial membranes in anaerobically grown yeasts.
5	effect of ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on brain metabolism in patients with chronic liver disease	Effect of ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on cerebral metabolism in patients with chronic liver disease.
5	factors affecting the palmitoyl coenzyme a desaturase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Factors affecting the palmitoyl coenzyme a desaturase of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effect of gal4 gene dosage on the level of galactose catabolic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The effect of gal4 on the level of galactose catabolic enzymes in succharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biogenesis of mitochondrial membranes neurospora crassa during cellular differentiation ultrastructural changes accompanying differentiation	Biogenesis of mitochondrial membranes neurospora crassa during the course of ultrastructural changes accompanying differentiation.
5	studies on the mechanism of metabolic stimulation in polymorphonuclear leucocytes during phagocytosis ii presence of the nadph2 oxidizing activity in a myeloperoxidase deficient subject	Studies on the mechanism of metabolic stimulation in polymorphonuclear leukocytes during phagocytosis ii the presence of l' nadph2 oxidizing activity in a myeloperoxidase-deficient subject.
5	supplementary intravenous alimentation in the premature infant weighing less than 1 500 grams	Additional feeding by intravenous means in the case of preemies weighing less than 1,500 grams.
5	effect of anisole anethole butylhydroxyanisole and safrole on intestinal absorption in the rat author s transl	Anisole anethole butylhydroxyanisole and safrole effect on intestinal absorption in the rat translator.
5	wall mannan of saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolic stability and release into growth medium	Parietal Mannane of succharomyces cerevisiae metabolic stability and release into growth medium.
5	effect of aeration on the activity of gluconeogenetic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae growing under glucose limitation	Effect of apos; aeration on apos; gluconeogenic enzyme activity in saccharomyces cerevisiae grown under glucose limitation.
5	gonadectomy and the development of age dependent polydipsia and the intake of nacl solutions in the swr j mouse	The gonadectomy and the development of age-dependent polydipsia; age and age; ingestion of nacl solutions in the swr j mouse.
5	the accumulation of succinate by the yeast brettanomyces bruxellensis	L' accumulation of succinate by the yeast brettanomyces bruxellensis.
5	comparative studies on sporulation promotive actions on cyclic amp theophylline and caffeine in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Comparative studies of sporulation-stimulating actions on theophylline and caffeine of l' cyclic ampoule in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	energy metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae discrepancy between atp balance and known metabolic functions	Energy metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae, divergence between apos, atp and known metabolic functions.
5	mechanism of 2 deoxy d glucose inhibition of cell wall polysaccharide and glycoprotein biosyntheses in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mechanisms of action; 2 glucose deoxy inhibition of cell wall polysaccharide and glycoprotein biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	resistance to pediococcus cerevisiae to amethopterin as a consequence of changes in enzymatic activity and cell permeability ii permeability changes to amethopterin and other folates in the drug resistant mutant	Pediococcus cerevisiae resistance to apos; amethopterin as a result of changes in apos; enzymatic activity and cell permeability ii permeability changes to apos; amethopterin and dapos; other folates in the drug-resistant mutant.
5	l asparaginase activity of mycobacterium phlei under various growth conditions	L' activity of phlei mycobacteria; asparaginase l under various growth conditions.
5	self assembly of extracellular tubular structures of non protein nature produced by an actinomycete	Self-assembly of extracellular tubular structures of a non-protein nature produced by an actinomycete.
5	regulation of acetyl coa synthetase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Apos regulation; acetyl coa synthetase of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	site of initial glycosylation of mannoproteins from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Site of initial glycosylation of mannoproteins of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	inhibition of glucan and levan synthesis and neuraminidase activity of oral streptococci by monkey antiserums	L' inhibition of glucan and levan synthesis and l' neuraminidase activity of oral streptococci by monkey antisera.
5	the isolation and characterization of peroxisomes microbodies from baker s yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	Peroxisome microbody isolation and characterization of the baking yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	morphogenic effects of alpha factor on saccharomyces cerevisiae a cells	Morphogenic effects of alpha factor on saccharomyces cerevisiae a.
5	diaglycerol biosynthesis in everted sacs of rat intestinal mucosa	Diaglycerol biosynthesis in turned sacs of rat intestinal mucosa.
5	localizations of beta glucuronidase activity in sections and cultures of human gliomas	Location of apos; beta glucuronidase activity in sections and cultures of human glioma.
5	isolation and composition of an alkali soluble glucan from the cell walls of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Isolation and composition of alkali-soluble glucan from the cell walls of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the preflow technic a new method of pharmacoradiography of the mesenteric area	The preflow technique is a new method of pharmacoradiography of the mesenteric region.
5	effect of some aldoses on growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae inhibited with molybdenum	The effect of certain aldoses on growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae is inhibited by molybdenum.
5	transport of 2 deoxy d galactose in saccharomyces fragilis	The transport of 2 deoxy galactose in succharomyces fragilis.
5	significant reduction in the incidence of phlebitis with buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin	A significant reduction in apo; incidence of phlebitis with buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin.
5	the influence of conditions of growth on the endogenous metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae effect on protein carbohydrate sterol and fatty acid content and on viability	L' growth conditions influence endogenous saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolism has an effect on protein carbohydrate sterol and fatty acid content and viability.
5	augmentation of ethanol absorption by mono and disaccharides	Increased dosage; absorption of ethanol by mono and disaccharides.
5	gluconeogenesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae determination of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase activity in cells grown in the presence of glycolytic carbon sources	Gluconeogenesis in succharomyces cerevisiae can determine the apos; fructose 16 bisphosphatase activity in cells grown in the presence of a glycolytic carbon source.
5	the substrate constant for the ammonium ion of growing saccharomyces cerevisiae	The substrate constant for the ammonium ion of growing cerevisia saccharomyces.
5	micromethod for the determination of glucose with glucose dehydrogenase in the autoanalyzer author s transl	Micro-method for the determination of glucose with glucose dehydrogenase in the cell; auto-analyzer.
5	inactivation by glucose of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Glucose inactivation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase from saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	inhibition by 5 thio d glucopyranose of protein biosynthesis in vitro in spermatids from rat testis	Glucopyranose 5 thio inhibits protein biosynthesis in rat testis spermatids in vitro.
5	survival of pleomorphic sarcoma 37 transplanted virgin female dba 2j mice effects produced by high blood glucose levels alone and in combination with drugs	Survival of pleomorphic sarcoma 37 transplanted virgin female dba 2j mice produced by high blood glucose levels alone and in combination with drugs.
5	comparative study of the effect of ethyl apovincaminate and xantinol nicotinate in cerebrovascular diseases immediate drug effects on the concentrations of carbohydrate metabolites and electrolytes in blood and csf	Comparative study of the effects of apos; apos; apos; apos; ethyl and xantinol nicotinate on immediate drug effects on concentrations of carbohydrate metabolites and apos; electrolytes in blood and csf in cerebrovascular disease.
5	dextran degrading bacteria in human oral cavity and their activity against insoluble glucan from streptococcus mutants	Dextran-degrading bacteria in the human oral cavity and their activity against insoluble glucan of streptococcal mutants.
5	clinical value of washed platelet concentrates in patients with non hemolytic transfusion reactions	The clinical value of washed platelet concentrates in patients with non-hemolytic transfusion reactions.
5	biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene moiety of riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole evidence for the involvement of c 1 of a pentose as a precursor	The biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene moiety of riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole demonstrates the apos; involvement of c 1 d' pentose as a precursor.
5	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase of the fission yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h changes in activity and inhibitor sensitivity in response to catabolite repression	L' mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase of the fission yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h changes in activity and sensitivity to apos; inhibitor in response to catabolite repression.
5	physiological effects of an antimycotic azasterol on cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Physiological effects of an antimycotic azasterol on saccharomyces cerevisiae cultures.
5	the digestion of yeast cell wall polysaccharides in veal calves	Digestion of yeast cell wall polysaccharides in calves.
5	the mechanism of catabolite inhibition of invertase by glucose in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The mechanism of apos; catabolic inhibition of apos; invertase by glucose in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	transport of ribitol and d glucose in the yeast candida guillermondii	Transport of ribitol and d glucose in the yeast candida guillermondii.
5	induction of respiratory deficient mutants in saccharomyces cerevisiae by mono and diazido analogs of ethidium	Induction of respiratory-deficient mutants in saccharomyces cerevisiae by mono and diazido analogs of ethidium.
5	value of methods used in the etiological diagnosis of pleural exudates	Value of methods used in the etiological diagnosis of pleural exudates.
5	high aerobic glycolysis of rat hepatoma cells in culture role of mitochondrial hexokinase	High aerobic glycolysis of rat hepatoma cells in culture role of mitochondrial hexokinase.
5	allantoin transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae	L' allantoin transport in cerevisia saccharomyces.
5	the identification characterization and mapping of a gene for flocculation in saccharomyces sp	Identification and mapping of apos; a gene for flocculation in saccharomyces sp.
5	plating medium for differentiation salmonella arizonae from other salmonellae	Culture medium for differentiation of salmonella arizonae d' other salmonellae.
5	l methionine as an ethylene precursor in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Methionine, as a precursor of etapos; ethylene, as a precursor in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	on the mode of action of a new antifungal antibiotic aculeacin a inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	On the mode of action of a new antifungal aculeacin antibiotic, an inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	physiology and biochemistry of streptomycetes xi different incorporation of d glucose u 14c into the paromomycin isomers and the precursors of paromomycin i	The physiology and biochemistry of streptomycetes xi differ by their incorporation of glucose u 14c into the isomers of paromomycin and the precursors of paromomycin i.
5	effects of ethylene on the metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae	The effects of ethylene on the metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	apparent half lives of sugar transport proteins in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The apparent half-life of sugar transport proteins in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	promoter and attenuator related metabolic regulation of the salmonella typhimurium histidine operon	Proponent and apo metabolic regulation; salmonella typhimurium histidine operon; attenuator.
5	biosynthesis of fatty acids and sterols in relation to the antibiotic formation in oudemansiella mucida	Biosynthesis of fatty acids and sterols in relation to the formation of antibiotics in odemansiella mucida.
5	kinetics of glucose repression of yeast cytochrome c	Kinetics of glucose repression of yeast cytochrome c.
5	alcohol dehydrogenase activity of the subcellular fractions of torulopsis candida yeasts grown on glucose and hexadecane	L&apos activity; alcohol dehydrogenase activity of subcellular fractions of yeast torulopsis candida grown on glucose and hexadecane.
5	the effect of the water activity of the milieu on rates of glucose uptake by the osmophilic yeasts saccharomyces rouxii and debaryomyces hansenii	L' effect of pH; water activity of the medium on glucose uptake by osmophilic yeasts saccharomyces rouxii and debaryomyces hansenii.
5	relationship of glycolytic intermediates glycolytic enzymes and ammonia to glycogen metabolism during sporulation in the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	Relationship between glycolytic intermediates and glycolytic enzymes and ammonia and glycogen metabolism during sporulation in the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the influence of certain growth conditions on the phosphatase activity of streptococcus mutans grown in batch and continuous culture	L' influence of certain growth conditions on protein; phosphatase activity of streptococcus mutans grown in batch culture and continuous culture.
5	effects of glucose and chromium iii concentrations in the medium on the uptake of 51cr by brewer s yeast	Effects of glucose and chromium iii concentrations in the medium on apos; 51cr absorption by the brewing yeast.
5	flow microfluorometry study of diauxic batch growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae	The flow microfluorometry study of discontinuous diauxic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	mathematical model of cell growth and phosphatase biosynthesis in saccharomyces carlsbergensis under phosphate limitation	A mathematical model of cell growth and phosphatase biosynthesis in phosphate-limited saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	effect of carbon composition of the fermented medium on the synthesis of volatile acids by the yeast saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776	Effect of carbon composition of the fermented medium on the synthesis of volatile acids by the yeast saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776.
5	in situ study of the glycolytic pathway in saccharomyces cerevisiae	An in situ study of the glycolytic pathway in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biosynthesis and regulation of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources	Biosynthesis and regulation of fructose 16 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase in succharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources.
5	regulation of saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent glutamate dehydrogenase by proteolysis during carbon starvation	Phosphate-dependent glutamate dehydrogenase regulation of saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by proteolysis during carbon starvation.
5	regulation of alpha amylase biosynthesis in pichia burtonii b	Regulation of alpha-amylase biosynthesis in pichia burtonii b.
5	effect of anaerobiosis and glucose on the content of haem and its precursors in intact yeast cells	Effect of anaerobiosis and glucose on the contents of hematocrit and its precursors in intact yeast cells.
5	characterization of two salmonella newport bacteriophages	Characterization of two salmonella newport bacteriophages.
6	metabolic and ultrastructural changes induced in adipose tissue by insulin	Ultrastructural and metabolic changes induced in adipose tissue by insulin.
6	the fourth international standard for insulin	This is the fourth international standard for insulin.
6	insulin induced accumulation of d xylose against an apparent concentration gradient in diaphragm muscle in vivo	L' insulin induced an accumulation of xylose against an apparent concentration gradient in the diaphragm in vivo.
6	effects of insulin on the permeability of d and l xylose and d and l arabinose in rat diaphragm muscle	Effects of insulin on the permeability of d and xylose and d and arabinose in rat diaphragm muscle.
6	the effect of insulin alloxan diabetes and anoxia on the ultrastructure of the rat heart	The effect of insulin alloxan diabetes and anoxia on the ultrastructure of the heart.
6	hepatic glucokinase a direct effect of insulin	Hepatic glucokinase is a direct effect of insulin.
6	effect of hormones on the turnover of polysaccharides in connective tissues	Effect of hormones on the turnover of polysaccharides in connective tissue.
6	observations on the etiology and therapy of brittle diabetes	Observations on the etiology and treatment of diabetes mellitus.
6	isolation of an insulin secretion granule fraction	Isolate a granular fraction of insulin secretion.
6	insulin action in alloxan diabetes modified by actinomycin d	L' action of apos; insulin in alloxan diabetes modified by apos; actinomycin d.
6	insulin induced glomerulosclerosis in the rabbit	L' insulin induced glomerulosclerosis in the rabbit.
6	the requirement for hydrocortisone in antibody forming tissue cultivated in serum free medium	The need for hydrocortisone in antibody-forming tissue cultured in serum-free medium.
6	removal of interfering nucleotides from brain extracts containing substance p effect of drugs on brain concentrations of substance p	Removing interfering nucleotides from brain extracts containing substance p effects of drugs on brain levels of substance p.
6	studies on gastrin	Uh, gastrin studies.
6	lobuloalveolar differentiation in mouse mammary tissues in vitro	Alveolar-lobulo differentiation in mouse mammary tissue in vitro.
6	iodoinsulin used to determine specific activity of iodine 131	Iodoinsulin used to determine the specific activity of iodine.
6	jet injection of insulin vs the syringe and needle method	Lapos; injection of insulin by jet versus syringe and needle.
6	insulin inducer of pyruvate kinase	An insulin inducer of pyruvate kinase.
6	association of acute local reactions to insulin with an insulin binding gamma i m antibody	Association of acute local reactions to apos; insulin with a gamma antibody; insulin.
6	acromegaly the effects of various steroid hormones on the insulin induced growth hormone response	Acromegaly of the effects of various steroid hormones on the insulin-induced growth hormone response.
6	stimulation by insulin of the formation of ribonucleic acid and protein by mammary tissues in vitro	Stimulation by enzymes; insulin of the formation of enzymes; ribonucleic acid and proteins by the breast tissue in vitro.
6	the effects of secretin pancreozymin and gastrin on insulin and glucagon secretion in anesthetized dogs	The effects of pancreozymin and gastrin on insulin and glucagon secretion in anesthetized dogs.
6	human placental lactogen studies of its acute metabolic effects and disposition in normal man	Human placental lactogen studies of its acute metabolic effects and disposition in normal humans.
6	a receptor mechanism for the inhibition of insulin release by epinephrine in man	A receptor mechanism for the inhibition of insulin release by epinephrine in humans.
6	a comparison of the effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide upon blood glucose and serum insulin and lipid levels in diabetic subjects	Comparison of the effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide on blood sugar levels and serum insulin and lipid levels in diabetic subjects.
6	hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland sequence of action of hormones in relation to cell cycle	Hormone-dependent differentiation of the d&apos sequence; action of hormones in the mammary gland relative to the cell cycle.
6	growth hormone deficiency in man an isolated recessively inherited defect	Apos deficiency; growth hormone in men, an isolated recessively inherited hereditary abnormality.
6	assessment of hypothalamic pituitary function in endocrine disease	Evaluation of hypothalamic pituitary function in endocrine diseases.
6	glycogen synthetase activity in liver regulation by the autonomic nerves	L' glycogen synthetase activity in hepatic regulation by the autonomic nerves.
6	the renal handling of insulin	The renal manipulation of insulin.
6	insulin biosynthesis evidence for a precursor	Evidence of biosynthesis of insulin for a precursor.
6	studies on insulin biosynthesis subcellular distribution of leucine h3 radioactivity during incubation of goosefish islet tissue	Studies of subcellular distribution of leucine h3 radioactivity in apo biosynthesis; insulin during apo; incubation of islet tissue in geese and geese.
6	the significance of basal insulin levels in the evaluation of the insulin response to glucose in diabetic and nondiabetic subjects	Significance of baseline insulin levels in diabetes; evaluation of response of insulin to glucose in diabetic and non-diabetic subjects.
6	a possible role for the adenylcyclase system in insulin secretion	The adenylate cyclase system may play a role in insulin secretion.
6	role of insulin in endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	Role of insulin in endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci 3 substrate specificity of streptococcus lactis intracellular proteinase	Proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci 3 substrate specificity of intracellular streptococcus lactis proteinase.
6	concentrations of free glucogenic amino acids in livers of rats subjected to various metabolic stresses	Free glucogenic amino acids in the liver of rats subjected to various metabolic stresses.
6	use of helical wheels to represent the structures of proteins and to identify segments with helical potential	Use of helical wheels to represent the structures of proteins and identify segments with helical potential.
6	plasma growth hormone concentration in corticosteroid treated children	"""Statistics Canada, Catalogue No. 82-003, No. 82-003 in the Catalogue"" (Catalogue No. 75-001@ XPF in the Catalogue) 2."
6	immunological and biological properties of iodoinsulin labeled with one or less atoms of iodine per molecule	Immunological and biological properties of the product; iodoinsulin labeled with one or less atoms; iodine per molecule.
6	the carbohydrate components of hydrolysates of gastric secretion and extracts from mucous glands of the gastric body mucosa and antrum	Glucidic components of hydrolysates of gastric secretion and mucosal gland extracts of the gastric body and intestine mucosa; antre.
6	isolation and a partial amino acid sequence of insulin from the islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Isolation and partial sequence of fish; amino acids of fish; insulin from the tissue of cod gadus callarias.
6	degradation of insulin in vitro by liver and epididymal adipose tissue from obese hyperglycaemic mice	Degradation of l' insulin in vitro by liver and epididymal adipose tissue of obese hyperglycemic mice.
6	the sedimentation of rat skeletal muscle ribosomes effect of hydrocortisone insulin and diet	L' effect of sedimentation of rat skeletal muscle ribosomes; insulin hydrocortisone and diet.
6	the effect of vagal stimulation on plasma insulin and glucose levels in the baboon	Lapos; effect of vagal stimulation on plasma insulin and glucose levels in the baboon.
6	proteins in denaturing solvents gel exclusion studies	Proteins in denaturing solvents studies d' studies excluded.
6	the relationship between endogenous serum insulin concentration and glucose uptake in the forearm muscles of nondiabetics	The relationship between endogenous serum insulin concentration and glucose consumption in apo muscles; before @-@non-diabetic arms.
6	adrenergic receptor control mechanism for growth hormone secretion	Control mechanisms of adrenergic receptors for growth hormone secretion.
6	hormonal dependence of dna synthesis in mammary carcinoma cells in vitro	The hormonal dependence of DNA synthesis in mammary carcinoma cells in vitro.
6	the origin of acetylcholine released from guinea pig intestine and longitudinal muscle strips	L' origin of apos; acetylcholine released from apos; guinea pig intestine and longitudinal muscle strips of guinea pig.
6	rat mammary gland differentiation in vitro in the absence of steroids	Rat mammary gland differentiation in vitro into the absence of steroids.
6	elevated serum human growth hormone and decreased serum insulin in prediabetic males after intravenous tolbutamide and glucose	Increase in cholesterol; human serum growth hormone and decrease in serum insulin in pre-diabetic men following tolbutamide and glucose intravenous administration.
6	sterol like compound from sensory ganglia effect of a nerve growth factor and insulin on its biosynthesis	Sterol as a component of the sensory ganglia, a nerve growth factor and insulin on its biosynthesis.
6	effect of insulin and tolbutamide on growth rate blood glucose and body composition of lambs	Effect of insulin and tolbutamide on growth rate, glycemia and body composition of lambs.
6	serum growth hormone levels and the response of diabetic retinopathy to pituitary ablation	Serum apos; growth hormone and response of diabetic retinopathy to apos; pituitary ablation.
6	high 24 hour level of serum growth hormone in juvenile diabetics	High rate of diabetes; 24-hour serum growth hormone in young diabetics.
6	antagonism of reserpine induced emesis in pigeons a screening method for antidepressant activity	L' reserpine antagonism; reserpine-induced pigeon emesis is a screening method for antidepressant activity.
6	effect of actinomycin d on virus induced ribonucleic acid polymerase formation in foot and mouth disease virus infected baby hamster kidney cells	Effect of apo; actinomycin d on virus-induced ribonucleic acid polymerase formation in the kidney cells of baby hamsters infected with FMD.
6	mitotic division in pancreatic beta cells	Mitotic division in pancreatic beta cells.
6	mechanism of estrogenic action in acromegaly	Mechanisms in apo; estrogenic action in acromegaly.
6	insulin delivery rate into plasma in normal and diabetic subjects	Rate of onset; administration of insulin in plasma in normal and diabetic subjects.
6	growth hormone secretion during sleep	Growth hormone secretion during sleep.
6	prevention of radiation induced creatinuria by insulin	Prevention of radiation induced creatinuria by insulin.
6	resistance changes in lipid bilayers immunological applications	Resistance changes in immunological applications of lipid bilayers.
6	insulin biosynthesis in the rat demonstration of two proinsulins	Insulin biosynthesis in the demonstration of two proinsulins in rats.
6	insulin and glucose studies after one year of treatment with a sequential type oral contraceptive	Insulin and glucose studies after one year of treatment with a sequential oral contraceptive.
6	altered permeability of the peritoneal membrane after using hypertonic peritoneal dialysis fluid	Modification of the peritoneal membrane permeability after implantation; use of hypertonic peritoneal dialysis fluid.
6	insulin secretion in cardiogenic shock	Insulin secretion in cardiogenic shock.
6	characterization of response of circulating glucagon to intraduodenal and intravenous administration of amino acids	Characterization of the response of circulating glucagon to intraduodenal and intravenous administration of amino acids.
6	leucyl beta naphthylamide splitting enzymes in the mammalian endocrine pancreas	Leucyl beta naphthylamide splitting enzymes in the mammalian endocrine pancreas.
6	hypoglycemic activity of endotoxin ii mechanism of the phenomenon in bcg infected mice	Mechanisms of infection; hypoglycemic activity of the intestine; endotoxin ii in bcg-infected mice.
6	glucagon test for insulinoma a chemical study in 25 cases	Glucagon test for insulin, a chemical study in 25 cases.
6	oral glucose tolerance and related factors in a normal population sample i blood sugar plasma insulin glyceride and cholesterol measurements and the effects of age and sex	Oral glucose tolerance and related factors in a normal population sample and measurements of cholesterol and the effects of age and gender.
6	fibrinolytic response to moderate exercise in young male diabetics and non diabetics	Fibbrinolytic response to moderate exercise in young male diabetics and not-diabetics.
6	circadian variation of glucose insulin and free fatty acids during long term use of oral hypoglycaemic agents in diabetes mellitus	Circadian variation of glucose, insulin and free fatty acids during apo; long-term use of oral hypoglycemic agents in diabetes mellitus.
6	liver and kidney metabolism during prolonged starvation	Liver and kidney metabolism during prolonged starvation.
6	lactose synthetase progesterone inhibition of the induction of alpha lactalbumin	Lapos; lactose synthetase progesterone inhibition of apos; alpha lactalbumin induction.
6	hypothalamic pituitary function in depressive illness insensitivity to hylycaemia	Hypophyseal hypothalamic hyperphysia in depressive illness that is unresponsive to the apos; hylycemia.
6	plasma insulin during remission in juvenile diabetes mellitus	L' plasma insulin during remission in juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of parathyroid hormone degradation of 125i labelled hormone by a kidney enzyme	Metabolism of parathyroid hormone (parathyroid hormone), a hormone labelled at 125i by a renal enzyme.
6	a specific anti proinsulin serum and the presence of proinsulin in calf serum	A specific anti-proinsulin serum and the presence of proinsulin in calf serum.
6	potentiation of insulin action in normal subjects by a pituitary polypeptide	The action of insulin in normal subjects by a pituitary polypeptide.
6	seasonal incidence of diabetes mellitus	The seasonal incidence of diabetes mellitus.
6	physicochemical characteristics of insulin secretion granules	Physico characteristics of insulin secretion granules.
6	isolation and properties of secretory granules from rat islets of langerhans i isolation of a secretory granule fraction	Isolation and properties of secretory granules of islets of langerhans; isolation of a fraction of secretory granules.
6	effects of polypeptide and protein hormones on lipid monolayers i effect of insulin and parathyroid hormone on monomolecular films of monooctadecyl phosphate and stearic acid	Effects of protein and polypeptide hormones on lipid monolayers; effects of insulin and lycos; parathyroid hormone on monomolecular films of monooctadecyl phosphate and d' stearic acid.
6	modification of hormonal responses to arginine by alpha adrenergic blockade	Modification of hormonal responses to arginine by alpha adrenergic blockade.
6	effect of endotoxin and cortisone on synthesis of ribonucleic acid and protein in livers of mice	Effect of apos; endotoxin and cortisone on the synthesis of ribonucleic acid and protein in mouse liver.
6	biosynthesis of an insulin precursor by islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Biosynthesis of apos; a precursor of apos; insulin from the islet tissue of cod callarias gadus.
6	the sequence of amino acids in insulin isolated from islet tissue of the cod gadus callarias	The sequence of amino acids in the insulin isolated from cod gadus callarias islet tissue.
6	effect of pertussis vaccination on the sensitivity of mice to insulin bicarbonate and co2	The effect of pertussis vaccination on the sensitivity of mice to bicarbonate insulin and cobblestone.
6	the effect of dietary and hormonal conditions on the activities of glycolytic enzymes in rat epididymal adipose tissue	The effects of dietary and hormonal conditions on the activity of glycolytic enzymes in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	quantal secretion from adrenal medulla all or none release of storage vesicle content	Quantum secretion of the adrenal medulla completely or partially releases the contents of storage vesicles.
6	blood glucose and insulin relationships in the human mother and fetus before onset of labour	Relationship between blood glucose and insulin in the mother and fetus before starting work.
6	insulin sensitivity and vascular disease in maturity onset diabetics	Insulin sensitivity and vascular disease in maturity onset diabetes.
6	some ultrastructural effects of insulin hydrocortisone and prolactin on mammary gland explants	Ultrastructural effects of insulin hydrocortisone and prolactin on mammary gland explants.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by infusion of free fatty acids	Stimulation of insulin secretion by infusion of free fatty acids.
6	phosphorylation of liver histone following the administration of glucagon and insulin	Phosphorylation of the liver tissue after glucagon and insulin administration.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy vi plasma fuels insulin liver composition gluconeogenesis and nitrogen metabolism during late gestation in the fed and fasted rat	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy nourishes liver composition in apo; insulin gluconeogenesis and metabolism in apo; nitrogen in late gestation in fed and fasted rats.
6	response to insulin of the intact stomach in patients with duodenal ulcer	The response to insulin in the intact stomach in patients with duodenal ulcers.
6	template activity of liver chromatin increased by in vivo administration of insulin	Hepatic chromatin matrix activity was increased by in vivo administration of insulin.
6	insulin and corticoid response to intravenous fructose in relation to glucose tolerance	Reaction of insulin and corticosteroids to intravenous fructose in relation to glucose tolerance.
6	diabetogenic action of streptozotocin relationship of dose to metabolic response	The diabetogenic action of the dose relationship-response between streptozotocin and metabolic response.
6	serum growth hormone levels and size of pituitary tumour in untreated acromegaly	Serum level of apo; growth hormone and size of pituitary tumour in apo; untreated acromegaly.
6	proteins and insulin release a dual role of amino acids and intestinal hormones	Proteins and insulin release a dual role of amino acids and intestinal hormones.
6	biosynthesis of insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices the incorporation of tritiated leucine into a single chain proinsulin a double chain intermediate and insulin in subcellular fractions	The biosynthesis of insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices leads to apos; incorporation of tritiated leucine into a single chain, proinsulin, a double-chain intermediate, and insulin into subcellular fractions.
6	effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in guinea pigs exposed to mixed gamma neutron radiations	L' effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in guinea pigs exposed to mixed gamma-neutron radiation.
6	maximal acid response of pavlov pouches to food and histamine	Maximum acid response of pavlov pouches to food and l' histamine.
6	regulation of liver tyrosine aminotransferase by endogenous factors in the mouse	Regulation of hepatic tyrosine aminotransferase by endogenous factors in the mouse.
6	the role of the antrum and the vagus nerve in the formation of gastric mucosal histamine	The role of the host and the vagus nerve in the formation of gastric mucous histamine.
6	cortisol and growth hormone secretion in relation to linear growth patients with still s disease on different therapeutic regimens	Cortisol and dapos secretion; growth hormone in linear growth patients with apo; a fatal disease on different therapeutic regimens.
6	penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa by sodium chloride and its relation to the mechanism of optical effects	Penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa by sodium chloride and its relation to the mechanism of optical effects.
6	kinetics of amino acid transport across bone marrow cell membranes	The kinetics of amino acid transport across bone marrow cell membranes.
6	clinical and endocrine side effects of methylprednisolone acetate as used in hay fever	Clinical and endocrine side effects of methylprednisolone acetate used for hay fever.
6	adrenal function in hypothyroidism	The adrenal function in the apos; hypothyroidism.
6	increased release of gut glucagon in reactive hypoglycaemia	Increased release of intestinal glucagon in reactive hypoglycemia.
6	impaired glucose tolerance a late effect of insulin shock treatment	L' impaired glucose tolerance is a late effect of shock insulin treatment.
6	rate of disappearance of endogenous insulin from the circulation after removal of insulinomas	Rates of disappearance of insulin; endogenous insulin from the bloodstream; elimination of insulinoma.
6	pathophysiology of post gastrectomy hypoglycaemia	Pathophysiology of apos; hypoglycemia post-gastroctomy.
6	hormones and obesity changes in insulin and growth hormone secretion following surgically induced weight loss	Hormones and obesity, changes in insulin and insulin secretion, growth hormone following surgery, and loss of surgical weight.
6	the hormonal regulation of enzymes in penatal and postnatal rat liver effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Hormonal regulation of enzymes in postnatal and penatal rat liver effects of adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
6	plasma insulin in pancreatic disease	L' plasma insulin in pancreatic diseases.
6	interrelationships of blood sugar and ketones in insulin treated diabetics	Lapses; association between blood sugar and ketones in diabetic patients treated with insulin.
6	abnormal serum growth hormone response to exercise in juvenile diabetics	Apos response abnormality; serum growth hormone to apos; exercise in young diabetics.
6	factors affecting the response to insulin in the normal subhuman pregnant primate	Factors affecting the response to insulin in primate at-human normal in gestation.
6	early recognition of heterozygotes for the gene for dystrophia myotonica	Early recognition of heterozygotes for the gene for myotonic dystrophy.
6	increase in activity of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in mouse mammary tissue cultured in insulin	An increase in the amount of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the breast tissue of mice cultured in vitro; insulin.
6	regulation of glycolysis and l glycerol 3 phosphate concentration in rat epididymal adipose tissue in vitro role of phosphofructokinase	Phosphofructokinase plays a role in regulating glycolysis and glycerol 3 phosphate concentration in rat epididymal adipose tissue in vitro.
6	prolactin evidence that it is separate from growth hormone in human blood	Prolactin proves that it is separated from growth hormone in human blood.
6	pheniformin in insulin dependent diabetics	Effect of pheniformin on insulin dependent diabetes.
6	the control by insulin of amino acid accumulation in muscle	Control by apos; insulin; amino acid accumulation in the muscle.
6	a novel action of insulin on phosphoprotein formation by mammary gland explants	A novel action of insulin on phosphoprotein formation by mammary gland explants.
6	insulin secretion in heart failure	Insulin secretion in heart failure.
6	effect of histalog insulin and reserpine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Effect of histological insulin and reserpine on gastric emptying and secretion in men.
6	hormonal induction and regulation of lactose synthetase in mouse mammary gland	Hormonal induction and regulation of lactose synthetase in mouse mammary gland.
6	cell communication calcium ion and cyclic adenosine monophosphate	Cellular communication calcium ion and monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine.
6	protein hydrocarbon interactions interactions of various proteins with pure decane	Protein hydrocarbons interactions of various proteins with pure decane.
6	glucagon levels and metabolic effects in fasting man	Glucagon levels and metabolic effects in fasting adults.
6	significance of early and late positive responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in patients with intact vagi	Significance of early and late positive responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in patients with intact vagi.
6	insulin response to carbohydrate ingestion after gastric surgery with special reference to hypoglycaemia	The insulin response to apos; carbohydrate ingestion after gastric surgery, especially apos; hypoglycaemia.
6	diabetes mellitus and sexual ateliotic dwarfism a comparative study	Sweet diabetes and sexual ateliotic dwarfism a comparative study.
6	relation of gastric secretory response in man to dose of insulin	Relationship between gastric secretory response in men and dose of insulin.
6	ketonaemia in uncontrolled diabetes mellitus	Ketonaemia in no-control diabetes mellitus.
6	the influence of an oral contraceptive on glucose f f a triglyceride and insulin levels after glucose loading	L' influence of drugs; an oral contraceptive on glucose levels; a triglyceride and d' insulin after a glucose load.
6	glucose and insulin secretory response patterns following diet and tolazamide therapy in diabetes	In addition to the above, the following are the following: glucose and insulin response models; insulin following a diet and dosage; tolazamide treatment for diabetes.
6	development of vascular lesions in insulin treated animals fed a normal diet	The development of vascular lesions in insulin-treated animals was fed a normal diet.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by medium chain triglycerides in patients with cirrhosis	Stimulation of insulin secretion by medium chain triglycerides in patients with cirrhosis.
6	hypothalamic pituitary adrenal function in patients treated with long term depot tetracosactrin	Hypothalamic pituitary adrenal function in patients treated with long-term tetracosactrin deposition.
6	an effect of insulin on adipose tissue adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase	An effect of insulin on adipose tissue cyclic phosphodiesterase; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response in atherosclerosis	It's called glucose tolerance and response to apos; insulin in apos; atherosclerosis.
6	growth hormone investigation in patients with mental dysfunction	Lapos; growth hormone study in patients with mental dysfunction.
6	dose response relationships of insulin hypoglycaemia and gastric acid in man	Dosage ratio @- effects; hypoglycemia; insulin and lacid; gastric acid in men.
6	the selective nerve stain leucomethylene blue as an intraoperative aid to achieving complete vagotomy	The selective nerve stains leucomethylene blue as an intraoperative aid to complete the vagotomy.
6	amino acid transport in hepatoma cell cultures during tyrosine aminotransferase induction	Final acid transport in hepatoma cell cultures during tyrosine aminotransferase induction.
6	posttranscriptional control of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis by insulin	Post-transcriptional control of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis by insulin.
6	development of insulin sensitivity by mouse mammary gland in vitro	The development of insulin sensitivity by the mouse mammary gland in vitro.
6	intraperitoneal insulin for control of blood sugar in diabetic patients during peritoneal dialysis	Intraperitoneal insulin for the control of blood glucose in diabetic patients during peritoneal dialysis.
6	control of basal insulin secretion with special reference to the diagnosis of insulinomas	Control of basal insulin secretion with particular attention to the diagnosis of insulinoma.
6	autonomic control of insulin secretion and the treatment of heart failure	Self-contained control of insulin secretion and the treatment of insulin-induced heart failure.
6	diabetes after removal of insulin tumours of pancreas a long term follow up survey of 11 patients	Post-fetal diabetes; removal of kidney tumours; pancreatic insulin is a long-term follow-up survey of 11 patients.
6	the effects of caerulein on insulin secretion in anaesthetized dogs	The effects of caerulein on insulin secretion in anesthetized dogs.
6	diabetes and growth of tumour transplants	Diabetes and growth of tumour transplants.
6	recurrent ulceration after vagotomy and drainage with electrical stimulation test 1957 69	Recurrent ulceration after vagotomy and drainage with electrical stimulation 1957 69 test.
6	direct measurement of proinsulin in human plasma by the use of an insulin degrading enzyme	Direct measurement of proinsulin in human plasma at baseline; aid of insulin-degrading enzyme.
6	the effect of experimental insulin deficiency on glucagon secretion	L' effect of experimental insulin deficiency on glucagon secretion.
6	a rapid and direct method for the quantitative determination of tryptophan in the intact protein	A rapid, direct method for the quantitative determination of tryptophan in the intact protein.
6	changes in carbohydrate metabolism during the administration of progestational hormones	Changes in carbohydrate metabolism during administration of progestin hormones.
6	glucose tolerance and serum insulin in identical twins of diabetics	Glucose tolerance and serum insulin in identical twins of diabetics.
6	effect of adrenergic blocking or stimulating agents on plasma growth hormone immunoreactive insulin and blood free fatty acid levels in man	Effect of drug; inhibitors or adrenergic stimulants on drug levels; immunoreactive insulin and drug; free fatty acids; plasma growth hormone in men.
6	relative effects of pregnancy estradiol and progesterone on plasma insulin and pancreatic islet insulin secretion	The relative effects of estradiol and progesterone on the secretion of plasma insulin and dapos; insulin and pancreatic islets.
6	effect of insulin and acute diabetes on plasma ffa and ketone bodies in the fasting rat	The effect of insulin and acute diabetes on plasma faeces and keto bodies in fasted rats.
6	starvation in human pregnancy hypoglycemia hypoinsulinemia and hyperketonemia	Inanition in human pregnancy hypoglycemia hypoinsulinemia and hyperketonemia.
6	proinsulin crystallization and preliminary x ray diffraction studies	Proinsulin crystallization and preliminary studies of X-ray diffraction.
6	genetic control of the immune response of guinea pigs to limiting doses of bovine serum albumin relationship to the poly l lysine gene	Genetic control of the immune response of guinea pigs to limiting doses of bovine serum albumin in relation to the polylysine gene.
6	evidence for an effect of inulin on the peripheral utilization of ketone bodies in dogs	Evidence of an effect of inulin on the peripheral use of ketone bodies in dogs.
6	use of diazoxide in hypertension with renal failure	Los; use of diazoxide in apos; hypertension with renal failure.
6	the effect of administration of human growth hormone on the plasma growth hormone cortisol glucose and free fatty acid response to insulin evidence for growth hormone autoregulation in man	The effect of insulin is evidence of apo; self-regulation of apo; human growth hormone on glucose; plasma growth hormone and free fatty acid response to apo; male growth hormone; insulin.
6	growth inhibition of tumour implants by associated surface active agents	Growth inhibition of tumour implants by associated active surface agents.
6	effect of lipids on growth hormone secretion in humans	Effect of lipids on growth hormone secretion in humans.
6	the development of the dorsal and ventral mammalian pancreas in vivo and in vitro	Pancreatic development of the dorsal and ventral mammalian pancreas in vivo and in vitro.
6	clinical and metabolic study in diabetic patients treated with glibenclamide	Clinical and metabolic study in diabetic patients treated with glibenclamide.
6	selective proximal vagotomy with and without pyloroplasty	A selective proximal vagotomy with and without pyloroplasty.
6	proinsulin like component of circulating insulin in the basal state and in patients and hamsters with islet cell tumors	Proinsulin as a component of apo; basal state circulating insulin and in patients and hamsters with islet cell tumours.
6	metabolic studies in the african pygmy	Metabolic studies in the African Pygmies.
6	some quantitative aspects of the labelling of proteins with 125 i by the iodine monochloride method	Some quantitative aspects of the labelling of proteins with 125 i by the method of monochloride d'apos; iodine.
6	fitting discrete probability distributions to evolutionary events	Adjust discrete probability distributions to evolutionary events.
6	changes in the postoperative insulin test in relation to recurrent duodenal ulceration	Changes in apos; postoperative insulin test versus apos; recurrent duodenal ulceration.
6	influence of contraceptives on the carbohydrate metabolism in female diabetics	L' influence of contraceptives on the carbohydrate metabolism in female diabetics.
6	the rate limiting step of protein synthesis in vivo and in vitro and the distribution of growing peptides between the puromycin labile and puromycin non labile sites on polyribosomes	L&apos, the limiting step in protein synthesis in vivo and in vitro and the distribution of growing peptides between labile puromycin and nonlabile puromycin sites on polyribosomes.
6	study on dioxan separation in the radioimmunoassay of human growth hormone human chorionic gonadotrophin adrenocorticotrophic hormone and insulin	Dioxane separation study in the radioimmunoassay of human chorionic human chorionic gonadotropin growth hormone, insulin; adrenocorticotropic hormone.
6	insulin induced hypoglycaemia in migraine	Insulin-induced hypoglycemia in migraine headache.
6	brain serotonin content increase following ingestion of carbohydrate diet	Brain serotonin levels increase after a carbohydrate diet is consumed.
6	medroxyprogesterone acetate and carbohydrate metabolism measurement of glucose insulin and growth hormone during 6 months time	Medroxyprogesterone acetate and carbohydrate metabolism of glucose insulin and lapos; growth hormone for 6 months.
6	diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance blood sugar and plasma insulin levels morning afternoon and evening	Diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance and plasma insulin levels in the morning after-noon and evening.
6	methamphetamine induced insulin release	Methamphetamine induced insulin release.
6	the gastric secretory response to insulin an all or none phenomenon	The gastric secretory response to insulin is an all-or-nothing phenomenon.
6	isolation of the insulin receptor of liver and fat cell membranes detergent solubilized 125 i insulin polyethylene glycol precipitation sephadex	Lapses; isolation of the receptor from the liver and adipose membranes detergent solubilized 125 i d' polyethylene insulin glycol precipitation sephadex.
6	myocardial infarction and carbohydrate metabolism relating to diabetes mellitus	Acute myocardial infarction and carbohydrate metabolism related to diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin infusion test of gastric acid secretion	Dapos infusion test; gastric acid secretion insulin.
6	insulin sepharose and the dynamics of insulin action	Insulin sepharose and the dynamics of insulin.
6	hypoalaninemia a concomitant of ketotic hypoglycemia	Hypoalanemia concomitant with a ketotic hypoglycemia.
6	studies on the secretion of newly synthesized proinsulin and insulin from isolated rat islets of langerhans	Studies on the secretion of proinsulin and apos; newly synthesized insulin from isolated rat lobsters.
6	obesity evidence of decreased secretion of glucagon	Obesity shows decreased secretion of glucagon.
6	genetic forms of pituitary dwarfism	The genetic forms of pituitary dwarfism.
6	gastrin studies in gastric ulcer	Gastronomic studies on gastric ulcer.
6	studies of prolactin secretion in human pregnancy	Studies of prolactin secretion in human pregnancy.
6	action of insulin and growth hormone on protein synthesis in muscle from non hypophysectomized rabbits	L' action of insulin and apos; growth hormone on protein synthesis in muscle from unhypophysectomized rabbits.
6	the effect of acetoacetate on plasma insulin concentration	Lapos; effect of apos; acetoacetate on plasma insulin concentration.
6	abnormal insulin response in patients with small vessel disease	An abnormal insulin reaction in patients with small vessel disease.
6	insulin response to glucose in patients with peripheral vascular disease arteritis and raynaud s phenomenon	The insulin response to glucose in patients with vascular peripheral arteritis and rheumatism.
6	kinetic analysis of insulin action on amino acid uptake by isolated chick embryo heart cells	Kinetic analysis of apos; action of apos; insulin on amino acid uptake by isolated chick embryo heart cells.
6	left ventricular performance after acute myocardial infarction	Left ventricular performance after acute myocardial infarction.
6	effect of posture on glucose tolerance after gastric surgery	The effect of posture on glucose tolerance after gastric surgery.
6	further studies on streptozotocin therapy for a multiple hormone producing islet cell carcinoma	D' other studies on d&apos streptozotocin therapy; and a multi-hormone islet carcinoma of the pancreas.
6	studies on the hormone sensitive lipase of adipose tissue	Study of the hormone-sensitive lipase of adipose tissue.
6	endocrine response to substitution of corticotrophin for oral prednisolone in asthmatic children	The effect of corticotropin on the oral prednisolone in asthmatic children.
6	cyclic changes in insulin needs of an unstable diabetic	Cyclical changes in insulin requirements d' an unstable diabetic.
6	hormone calcium interactions with the plasma membrane of rat liver cells	Causal hormone interactions with the plasma membrane of rat liver cells.
6	the effect of calcium and other salts upon the release of glucagon like immunoreactivity from the gut	The effect of calcium and other salts on the release of glucagon such as epos; immunoreactivity of the intestine.
6	the metabolism of proinsulin and insulin by the liver	The metabolism of proinsulin and lapos; insulin by the liver.
6	isoelectric focusing of proteins in the native and denatured states anomalous behaviour of plasma albumin	The isoelectric focusing of proteins in native and denatured states shows abnormal plasma albumin behavior.
6	the effect of insulin on free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in rat skeletal muscle in vitro	L' effect of insulin on free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in rat skeletal muscle in vitro.
6	relationship between organization of mammary tumors and the ability of tumor cells to replicate mammary tumor virus and to recognize growth inhibitory contact signals in vitro	Relationship between apo; organization of mammary tumours and the ability of tumor cells to replicate mammary tumour virus and recognize inhibitory contact signals of growth in vitro.
6	diabetic amyotrophy a follow up study	It's called diabetic Amyotrophy, a follow-up study.
6	the relation of growth hormone to altered carbohydrate metabolism in women taking oral contraceptives	Relationship between glucose; growth hormone and glucose; impaired carbohydrate metabolism in women taking oral contraceptives.
6	radioimmunoassay of human fibrinopeptide a	A radioimmunoassay of human fibrinopeptide a.
6	a bovine pancreatic enzyme catalyzing the conversion of proinsulin to insulin	A bovine pancreatic enzyme catalyzing the conversion of proinsulin to insulin.
6	studies of the development of diabetic ketosis in the rat	Studies of the development of diabetic ketosis in the rat.
6	resistance to symptomatic insulin reactions after fasting	Resistance to symptomatic insulin reactions after fasting.
6	insulin release by emiocytosis demonstration with freeze etching technique	Insulin release by emiocytosis is demonstrated by the freeze-etch technique.
6	lipoprotein lipase activity in the adipose tissue of rats adapted to controlled feeding schedules	L' lipoprotein lipase activity in the adipose tissue of s&apos rats; adapted to a controlled diet.
6	staphylococcal protease a proteolytic enzyme specific for glutamoyl bonds	Staphylococcal protease is a proteolytic enzyme specific for glutamoyl linkages.
6	control of the synthesis of fatty acid synthetase in rat liver by insulin glucagon and adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	The control of the synthesis of l' fatty acid synthetase in rat liver by insulin glucagon and l' adenosine 3,5 monophosphate cyclic.
6	secretion and endocytosis in insulin stimulated rat adrenal medulla cells	Secretion and endocytosis in insulin stimulate rat adrenal medulla cells.
6	an enteroglucagon tumour	Uh, an entero-lucagonary tumor.
6	changes in plasma insulin related to the type of dietary carbohydrate in overweight hyperlipidemic male patients	Changes in plasma insulin related to the type of dietary carbohydrate in overweight hyperlipidemic men.
6	non ketotic hyperosmolar coma with insulin resistance in a 12 year old girl	Nonketotic hyperosmolar coma with insulin resistance in a 12-year-old girl.
6	the effect of experimental diabetes mellitus and insulin replacement on hepatic ultrastructure and protein synthesis	Effects of experimental diabetes mellitus and insulin replacement on apos; hepatic ultrastructure and protein synthesis.
6	plasma gastrin and acid secretion in man following stimulation by food meat extract and insulin	Plasma gastrin and acid secretion in men following stimulation by lapos; meat extract and insulin.
6	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer ii effect of insulin hypoglycaemia	Serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer ii effect of apos; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	the influence of the individual surgeon and of the type of vagotomy upon the insulin test after vagotomy	The influence of the surgeon and the type of vagotomy on the insulin test after vagotomy.
6	effects of hypo and hyper thyroidism on liver composition blood glucose ketone bodies and insulin in the male rat	The effects of hypo and apo; hyperthyroidism on the liver composition, glucose, keto bodies and apo; insulin in the male rat.
6	oligopeptidases of brush border membranes of rat small intestinal mucosal cells	Oligopeptidases from brush border membranes of rat mucosal cells; small intestine.
6	tolbutamide therapeutic trials and clinical practice	Tolbutamide: therapeutic trials and clinical practice.
6	the immediate effects of insulin and fructose on the metabolism of the perfused liver changes in lipoprotein secretion fatty acid oxidation and esterification lipogenesis and carbohydrate metabolism	Immediate effects of insulin and fructose on the metabolism of the hepatic changes perfused in the liver; oxidation and l' fatty acid esterification of lipoproteins and carbohydrate metabolism.
6	exocrine secretory responses of the pancreas to insulin and to a meat meal in dogs	Exocrine secretory reactions of the pancreas to insulin and a meat meal in the dog.
6	comparison of corticotrophin and corticosteroid response to lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen in man	Comparison of corticotropin and corticosteroid response to lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen in men.
6	effect of oral hypoglycaemic agents on glucose tolerance in pancreatic diabetes	Effect of oral hypoglycemic agents on glucose tolerance in pancreatic diabetes mellitus.
6	acute reversal of experimental diabetic ketoacidosis in the rat with decanoylcarnitine	Acute reversal of experimental diabetic ketoacidosis in the rat with decanoylcarnitine.
6	the reaction of protein amino groups with methyl 5 iodopyridine 2 carboximidate a possible general method of preparing isomorphous heavy atom derivatives of proteins	Reaction of protein amino groups with l' methyl iodopyridine 5,2 carboximizes a possible general method for the preparation of isomorphic d&apos derivatives; heavy atoms of proteins.
6	sequential degradation of insulin by rat liver homogenates	Sequential deterioration of insulin by rat liver homogenates.
6	is prolactin mitogenic for mammary epithelium	Prolactin is a mitogenic mammary epithelium.
6	insulinopenic diabetes in africa	Insulopenic diabetes in Africa.
6	evaluation of 1 fluoro 2 nitro 4 trimethylammoniobenzene iodide a protein solubilizing reagent	Evaluation of 1 fluoro 2 nitro 4 trimethylammoniobenzene iodide, a protein solubilizing reagent.
6	the mode of action of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in mammalian islets of langerhans effects of insulin secretagogues on islet cell protein kinase activity	The mode of action of apos; cyclic adenosine 35 monophosphate in mammalian langerhans islets effects of apos secretagogues; insulin on apos; islet cell protein kinase activity.
6	studies on the enzymology of purified preparations of brush border from rabbit kidney	Studies on the enzymology of purified preparations from edge to rabbit kidney brush.
6	the effect of estrogens on carbohydrate metabolism glucose insulin and growth hormone studies on one hundred and seventy one women ingesting premarin mestranol and ethinyl estradiol for six months	The effects of estrogens on carbohydrate metabolism, glucose, lacid; insulin and glucose studies; growth hormone in 161 women who ingested mestranol and lacid; pre-arin ethinyl estradiol for six months.
6	glucagon initiated human growth hormone release a comparative study	Glucagon initiated human growth hormone release in a comparative study.
6	the role of the sympathetic nervous system in hypoglycaemia stimulated gastric secretion	The role of the sympathetic nervous system in hypoglycaemia stimulated gastric secretion.
6	the contribution of embryo extract to myogenesis of avian striated muscle in vitro	The contribution of embryo extract to striated muscle myogenesis; birds in vitro.
6	affinity chromatography and purification of the insulin receptor of liver cell membranes	Chromatography of the liver; affinity and purification of the receptor of the liver; insulin of the membranes of the liver.
6	distribution of free and antibody bound peptide hormones in two phase aqueous polymer systems	D&apos distribution; free and antibody-bound peptide hormones in aqueous polymer systems in two phases.
6	effect of vagotomy on ascorbic acid nutrition in patients with peptic ulcer	The effect of vagotomy on nutrition; ascorbic acid in patients with dementia; gastroduodenal ulcer.
6	insulin and the regulation of adipose tissue acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase	L' insulin and the regulation of the acetyl coenzyme of adipose tissue a carboxylase.
6	effect of insulin upon the cellular character of rat adipose tissue	The effect of insulin on the cellular character of rat adipose tissue.
6	normalization effect of preceding protein meals on diabetic oral glucose tolerance in eskimos	Normal effect of previous protein meals on oral glucose tolerance in diabetic eskimo.
6	glucagon stimulating activity of 20 amino acids in dogs	Glucagon-stimulating activity of 20 amino acids in dogs.
6	effect of insulin on the growth pattern and adenylate cyclase activity of bhk fibroblasts	The effect of insulin on the growth pattern and enzymes; activity of the enzymes; adenylate cyclase of the fibroblasts bhk.
6	the effects of varying the extent of the vagotomy on the myoelectrical and motor activity of the stomach	The effects of vagotomy on the myoelectrical and motor activity of the intestine.
6	an evaluation of the hollander test by graded vagotomy in the dog	An evaluation of the Hollander test by a graded vagotomy in dogs.
6	competitive binding of somatomedin to the insulin receptors of adipocytes chondrocytes and liver membranes	Somatomedin binds competitively to lipos receptors; insulin from adipocytes, chondrocytes and liver membranes.
6	failure of glucagon release in infants of diabetic mothers	Insufficient glucagon release in infants of diabetic mothers.
6	the prevalence of diabetes in a rural population of jamaican adults	The prevalence of diabetes in a rural population of adult Jamaicans.
6	prediction of the amount of secondary structure in a globular protein from its aminoacid composition	The prediction of the amount of secondary structure in a globular protein from its amino acid composition.
6	the ontogenesis of human fetal hormones i growth hormone and insulin	The ontogenesis of human fetal hormones i growth hormone and insulin.
6	oral glucose tolerance and hormonal response in heroin dependent males	Acute oral glucose tolerance and hormonal response in male heroin addicts.
6	side effects of various drugs acting on the eye	Side effects of various drugs acting on eyes.
6	placental lactogen levels in diabetic pregnancy	Placental lactogen levels in diabetic pregnancies.
6	nyctohemeral growth hormone levels in children with growth retardation and inflammatory bowel disease	Levels of apo; nyctohemeral growth hormone in children with apo; growth retardation and apo; inflammatory bowel disease.
6	evolution of diabetes mellitus in a case of friedreich s ataxia	Evolution of diabetes mellitus in a case of diabetes mellitus; ataxia friedreichique.
6	metabolism of proinsulin insulin and c peptide in the rat	Apos metabolism; proinsulin insulin and c peptide in rat.
6	diabetic clinics today and tomorrow mini clinics in general practice	Diabetic Clinics today and tomorrow mini clinics in general practice.
6	interactions of insulin corticosterone and prolactin in promoting milk fat synthesis by mammary explants from pregnant rabbits	Interactions of insulin corticosterone and prolactin in promoting milk fat synthesis by mammary explants in pregnant rabbits.
6	parenchymal cells from adult rat liver in nonproliferating monolayer culture i functional studies	Parenchymal cells from adult rat liver in nonproliferating monolayer cultures i functional studies.
6	the influence of long term oral contraception on blood sugar and serum insulin author s transl	L' influence of long-term oral contraception on blood sugar and glucose; transcribed serum insulin therapy.
6	the role of the sympathetic innervation in the control of plasma glucagon concentration in the calf	The role of sympathetic innervation in the control of plasma glucagon concentration in calves.
6	gastrin in portal and peripheral venous blood after feeding in man	Gastin in the blood portal and peripheral venous after feeding in the men.
6	virus induced diabetes mellitus i hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia in mice infected with encephalomyocarditis virus	The virus induced diabetes mellitus hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia in mice infected with L. etapos; encephalomyocarditis.
6	change in glucose and insulin after six months treatment with the oral contraceptive demulen	Change in blood sugar and insulin after six months of treatment with the oral contraceptive Demulen.
6	pancreatic beta cell replication induced by glucocorticoids in subhuman primates	Glucocorticoid-induced pancreatic beta cell replication in primates using-humans.
6	influence of glucocorticoids on glucagon secretion and plasma amino acid concentrations in man	The influence of glucocorticoids on glucagon secretion and plasma amino acid concentrations in men.
6	affinity binding of intact fat cells and their ghosts to immobilized insulin	L' affinity of intact fat cells and their ghosts binds to immobilized insulin.
6	effect of glucagon on net splanchnic cyclic amp production in normal and diabetic men	Effect of glucagon on net production of splanchnic cyclic light bulbs in normal and diabetic men.
6	regulation of human lipolysis in vivo observations on the role of adrenergic receptors	Regulation of human lipolysis, in vivo observations on the role of adrenergic receptors.
6	the rapid changes of hepatic glycolytic enzymes and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activities after intravenous glucagon in humans	Rapid changes in hepatic glycolytic enzymes and fructose 1-6 diphosphatase activities after intravenous glucagon injection in humans.
6	effects of weight reduction on obesity studies of lipid and carbohydrate metabolism in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects	Effects of weight reduction on studies of obesity; obesity of lipid and carbohydrate metabolism in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects.
6	the different effects on the serum lipids and fecal steroids of high carbohydrate diets given orally or intravenously	The different effects on serum lipids and fecal steroids of diets high in carbohydrates administered orally or intravenously.
6	metabolic effects of exogenous glucocorticoids in fasted man	Metabolic effects of exogenous glucocorticoids in fasting men.
6	rapid intravenous sodium acetoacetate infusion in man metabolic and kinetic responses	Sodium acetoacetate in the metabolic and kinetic responses of l'apos; man.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen drug combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism i effect of ovosiston	Effect of combinations of estrogen; gestagenic estrogen on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism i effect of apos; ovosiston.
6	effect of insulin on pyruvate metabolism in epididymal adipose tissue of the rat correlation of intracellular pyruvate contents and pyruvate dehydrogenase activity	Effect of apos; insulin on pyruvate metabolism in epididymal adipose tissue of the correlation between intracellular pyruvate content and l' pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in rat.
6	binding of parathyroid hormone to bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	Apos binding parathyroid hormone to bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	the binding of cationic detergent to insulin zinc insulin and iso insulin	The binding of cationic detergent to zinc insulin and iso insulin.
6	effects of epinephrine adrenocorticotrophic hormone and theophylline on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase activity in fat cells	Epinephrine adrenocorticotropic hormone and theophylline on apos; activity of l' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in fat cells.
6	diurnal variation on oral glucose tolerance insulin and growth hormone changes with special reference to women taking oral contraceptives	Diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance L' insulin and l' growth hormone change, especially in women taking oral contraceptives.
6	gel filtration studies on immunoreactive gastrin in serum from zollinger ellison patients	Studies of gel filtration of immunoreactive gastrin in serum from patients with zollinger Ellison.
6	regulation of hepatic glycogen synthesis during fetal development roles of hydrocortisone insulin and insulin receptors	Regulation of hepatic glycogen synthesis during fetal developmental roles of insulin and l&apos receptors; insulin hydrocortisone.
6	early differentiation of glucagon producing cells in embryonic pancreas a possible developmental role for glucagon	The early differentiation of glucagon-producing cells in the embryonic pancreas may play a role in glucagon development.
6	role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the early transport changes induced by serum and insulin in quiescent fibroblasts	The role of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in the early transport changes induced by serum and l' insulin in quiescent fibroblasts.
6	stimulation by insulin of rna synthesis in chick fibroblasts	Immunostimulation; insulin of rna synthesis in chicken fibroblasts.
6	glucodynamic hormones modify the recovery period after lateral hypothalamic lesions	Glucodynamic hormones modify the recovery period after lateral hypothalamic lesions.
6	lack of glucagon response to hypoglycemia in diabetes evidence for an intrinsic pancreatic alpha cell defect	Lack of glucagon response to apo; hypoglycemia in diabetics, evidence of apo; an intrinsic alpha-pancreatic cell defect.
6	fuels hormones and liver metabolism at term and during the early postnatal period in the rat	Feeds hormones and liver metabolism at term and early in the postnatal period in the rat.
6	characteristics of membrane bound and free hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats i acute experimental diabetes mellitus	Characteristics of free and membrane-bound hepatic ribosomes in insulin-deficient rats i acute experimental diabetes mellitus.
6	effect of fenfluramine on human growth hormone release	Effect of fenfluramine on human growth hormone release.
6	adrenergic modulation of pancreatic glucagon secretion in man	Adrenergic modulation of pancreatic glucagon secretion in humans.
6	diabetes in mice after coxsackie b 4 virus infection	Diabetes in mice after coxsackie b4 infection.
6	stimulation by insulin of cell elongation and microtubule assembly in embryonic chick lens epithelia	Apos stimulation; egg insulin; cell elongation and elongation; microtubule assembly in the apos; embryonic chicken lens epithelium.
6	adrenal corticosteroids enhance production of type c virus induced by 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine from cultured mouse fibroblasts	Adrenal corticosteroids stimulate the production of c-type virus induced by 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine from cultured murine fibroblasts.
6	cell culture of mammalian endometrium and synthesis of blastokinin in vitro	Cell culture of l' mammalian endometrium and synthesis of blastokinin in vitro.
6	steroid aerosols in asthma an assessment of betamethasone valerate and a 12 month study of patients on maintenance treatment	Steroidal aerosols in asthma, evaluation of betamethasone valerate and 12-month study in patients receiving oral contraceptives; maintenance.
6	diabetes mellitus associated with epidemic of infectious hepatitis in nigeria	Sweet diabetes associated with epidemic of apo; infectious hepatitis in Nigeria.
6	remission of diabetes mellitus during pregnancy	Re-emergence of diabetes mellitus during pregnancy.
6	accelerated triglyceride secretion a metabolic consequence of obesity	Accelerated triglyceride secretion is a metabolic consequence of obesity.
6	endocrine studies in anencephaly	Uh, endocrine studies in anencephaly.
6	effect of proximal gastric vagotomy on gastric acid secretion and plasma gastrin	Effect of proximal gastric vagotomy on gastric acid secretion and plasma gastrin.
6	the gastric secretory response to a continuous insulin infusion in the dog	The gastric secretory response to a continuous insulin infusion in dogs.
6	awareness and experience of general practitioners of selected drug interactions	Knowledge and experience of general practitioners of drug interactions.
6	pituitary extracts and steroid hormones in the control of 3t3 cell growth	Pituitary extracts and steroid hormones in the control of 3t3 cell growth.
6	pyrazinoate excretion in the chimpanzee relation to urate disposition and the actions of uricosuric drugs	L' pyrazinoate excretion in relation to chimpanzee and dosage; urine and apos; uricosuric drug action.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by long chain free fatty acids a direct pancreatic effect	Stimulation of insulin secretion by long-chain free fatty acids (FLFAs), a direct pancreatic effect.
6	comparison of effects of long term corticotrophin and corticosteroid treatment on responses of plasma growth hormone acth and corticosteroid to hypoglycaemia	Comparison of effects of apo; long-term corticotropin and corticosteroid treatment on responses of apo, acth plasma growth hormone and corticosteroids to apo; hypoglycemia.
6	diabetic ketoacidosis presenting as neurosurgical emergencies	Acute diabetic ketoacidosis with neurosurgical emergencies.
6	control of pineal indole biosynthesis by changes in sympathetic tone caused by factors other than environmental lighting	Control of pineal indole biosynthesis by changes in sympathetic tone caused by factors other than ambient lighting.
6	control of the initiation of dna synthesis in 3t3 cells serum factors	Control of apo; initiation of synthesis of apo; DNA in 3t3 serum factors.
6	effects of high dose medroxyprogesterone treatment given for endometrial carcinoma on carbohydrate metabolism and liver function	Effects of high-dose, high-dose, endometrial drug treatment of taproxyprogesterone carcinoma on carbohydrate metabolism and liver function.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vi studies with conditioned medium and its functional interactions with serum factors	Growth control of fetal rat hepatocytes differentiated in monolayer vi primary culture studies with conditioned medium and its functional interactions with serum factors.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vii hormonal control of dna synthesis and its possible significance to the problem of liver regeneration	Control of the growth of hepatocytes from fetal rats differentiated in primary monolayer culture vii hormonal control of l&apos synthesis; DNA and its possible importance in the liver regeneration problem.
6	carbohydrate and lipid studies during six months treatment with megestrol acetate measurements of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and triglycerides	Carbohydrate and lipid studies during six months of treatment with megestrol acetate to measure apos; growth hormone of apos; insulin and triglycerides of blood glucose.
6	substrate turnover during prolonged exercise in man splanchnic and leg metabolism of glucose free fatty acids and amino acids	Substrate turnover during dosing; prolonged exercise in splanchnic and leg metabolism of glucose-free fatty acids and amino acids.
6	spontaneous and amino acid stimulated glucagon secretion in the immediate postnatal period relation to glucose and insulin	Amino acids and spontaneous acids stimulated glucagon secretion in the immediate postnatal period relative to glucose and insulin levels.
6	the effects of glucagon and insulin on adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations in an organ culture of mature rat liver	The effects of glucagon and insulin on the concentrations of adenosine 3 and 5 cyclic monophosphate in a culture of mature rat liver organs.
6	spermidine in hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland in vitro	Permidine in hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland in vitro.
6	prolactin receptors in estrogen receptor deficient mammary carcinoma	Prolactin receptors in estrogen receptor deficient mammary carcinoma.
6	the effect of adrenergic blockade on the glucagon responses to starvation and hypoglycemia in man	Lapos; effect of adrenergic blockade on glucagon responses to fasting and sedation; hypoglycemia in men.
6	regulation of glucose synthesis in hormone sensitive isolated rat hepatocytes	The regulation of glucose synthesis in isolated, hormone-sensitive rat hepatocytes.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism iv effect of estrone cyanate combination preparations	Effect of combination d' estrogen-gestagen on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism iv effect of combined d' estrone-cyanate on lipid metabolism iv.
6	studies on the depletion and accumulation of microvilli and changes in the tubulovesicular compartment of mouse parietal cells in relation to gastric acid secretion	Studies on the depletion and accumulation of microvilli and changes in the tubulovesicular compartment of mouse parietal cells in relation to d' gastric acid secretion.
6	gastric acid secretion and risk of recurrence of duodenal ulcer within six to eight years after truncal vagotomy and drainage	Dapos secretion; gastric acid and risk of recurrence of duodenal ulcer within six to eight years following drainage and vagotomy.
6	the molecular weight and properties of a neutral metallo endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	The molecular weight and properties of a neutral metallo endopeptidase from a rabbit kidney brush border.
6	combined test for assessment of anterior pituitary function	This is a combined test for l' evaluation of the previous function of the pituitary.
6	concomitant effects of insulin on surface membrane conformation and polysome profiles of serum starved balb c 3t3 fibroblasts	Concomitant effects of insulin on surface membrane conformation and polysomic profiles of serum-deprived Balb c3t3 fibroblasts.
6	somatostatin hypothalamic inhibitor of the endocrine pancreas	Hypothalamic somatostatin inhibitor of the endocrine pancreas.
6	correlation between serum gastrin concentration and rat stomach histidine decarboxylase activity	Correlation between serum gastrin concentration and apo; apo activity; rat stomach; histidine decarboxylase.
6	the purification and specificity of a neutral endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	Purification and specificity of a neutral endopeptidase from a rabbit kidney brush border.
6	vagal control of glucagon release in man	The vagal control of glucagon release in men.
6	long term effects of the estrogen gestagen combination preparation ovosiston on glucose level in the insulin tolerance test	Long-term effects of oosiston combined gestagen oestrogen preparation on glucose level in the insulin tolerance test.
6	immunoreactive gastrin components in human serum	The immunoreactive components of human serum gastrin.
6	the effect of vagotomy and drainage on the small bowel flora	The effect of vagotomy and drainage on the flora of the intestine.
6	progressive deterioration of glucose tolerance in the aged	Progressive deterioration of glucose tolerance in the elderly.
6	plasma adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate response to glucagon in thyroid disease	Adenosine 3 @-@5 plasma cyclic monophosphate response to glucagon in thyroid disease.
6	transplantation of islets of langerhans in diabetic rhesus monkeys	Lapos transplantation islets of langerhans in diabetic rhesus monkeys.
6	digestive and endocrine functions after partial duodeno pancreatectomy	Digestive and endocrine functions after partial duodeno pancreatectomy.
6	the purity of commercial insulin preparations	The purity of commercial insulin preparations.
6	unsuccessful treatment of acromegaly with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Unsuccessful treatment of apos; acromegaly with medroxyprogesterone acetate.
6	electrophoretic patterns of serum albumins collected from hereditary obese and diabetic mice	Electrophoretic patterns of serum albumins collected from obese and diabetic hereditary mice.
6	failure of injected growth hormone to increase plasma glucose and insulin concentration in the puppy	Apos deficiency; growth hormone injected to increase plasma glucose and insulin concentration in puppy.
6	sulfonylurea induced factitious hypoglycemia in a nondiabetic nurse	Sulfonylurea induced dummy hypoglycemia in a nondiabetic nurse.
6	effect of splanchnic nerve stimulation on glucagon and insulin output in the dog	The effect of splanchnic nerve stimulation on glucagon and insulin production in dogs.
6	plasma adrenaline and serum gastrin studies in insulin induced hypoglycemia and after adrenaline infusions	Studies of plasma epos, adrenaline and serum gastrin in insulin induced hypoglycemia and after adrenaline infusions.
6	lack of dietary regulation of jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases in obesity the role of insulin	Lack of dietary regulation of jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases in apos; obesity the role of apos; insulin.
6	pathomorphologic biochemical and diagnostic aspects of gastrinomas zollinger ellison syndrome	Pathomorphological biochemicals and diagnostic aspects of gastrinomas zollinger ellison syndrome.
6	membrane receptors as general markers for plasma membrane isolation procedures the use of 125 i labeled wheat germ agglutinin insulin and cholera toxin	The membrane receptors as general markers for the procedures; insulation of the plasma membrane, l' use of l' wheat germ agglutinin labelled 125 i and cholera toxin.
6	effects of alloxan diabetes anti insulin serum diabetes and non diabetic dehydration on brain carbohydrate and energy metabolism in young mice	Effects of alloxan diabetes anti-insulin diabetes and non-diabetic dehydration on brain carbohydrate and energy metabolism in young mice.
6	growth control in primary fetal rat liver cells in culture	Growth control in primary fetal rat liver cells in culture.
6	glycerol intolerance in a child with intermittent hypoglycemia	Glycerol intolerance in a child with intermittent hypoglycaemia.
6	stimulation of division of sparse and confluent 3t3 cell populations by a fibroblast growth factor dexamethasone and insulin	Stimulation of division of sparse and confluent 3t3 cell populations by fibroblast growth factor, dexamethasone and insulin.
6	effect of a fibroblast growth factor insulin dexamethasone and serum on the morphology of balb c 3t3 cells	The effect of a fibroblast growth factor, insulin dexamethasone and serum, on the morphology of the balb c 3t3 cells.
6	hyperplasia of rat mammary gland in vitro	Hyperplasia of the rat mammary gland in vitro.
6	mode of insulin action	D&apos mode of action; insulin action.
6	factors influencing the prognosis of vascular disease in insulin deficient diabetes of long duration a seven year follow up	Factors influencing the prognosis of vascular disease in long-term insulin-dependent diabetes on a seven-year follow-up.
6	effect of lipids on glucagon secretion in man	L' effect of lipids on glucagon secretion in men.
6	parathyroid hormone receptors of renal cortex specific binding of biologically active 125i labeled hormone and relationship to adenylate cyclase activation	Apos receptor; parathyroid hormone specific binding to the apos kidney cortex; biologically active 125i-labelled hormone and relationship to apos; apos activation; adenylate cyclase.
6	macroglossia transient neonatal diabetes mellitus and intrauterine growth failure a new distinct entity	Transient macroglossia new-born diabetes mellitus and l' intra- uterine growth failure a new distinct entity.
6	initial effect of injury on ketone bodies and other blood metabolites	Initial effect on keto bodies and other blood metabolites.
6	effects on plasma and brain tryptophan in the rat of drugs and hormones that influence the concentration of unesterified fatty acid in the plasma	Effects of drugs and apo on plasma and brain tryptophan in rats; hormones that influence the concentration of apo; nonesterified fatty acids in plasma.
6	the effect of parietal cell and truncal vagotomy on gastric and duodenal contractile activity of the unanesthetized dog	L' effect of parietal cells and trunal vagotomy on gastric and duodenal contractile activity of unanesthetized dog.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response during and after elective skeletal surgery	Glucose tolerance and insulin response during and after elective surgery.
6	insulin responses to oral carbohydrate in true prediabetics and matched controls	The insulin responses to oral carbohydrates in true prediabetics and matched controls.
6	carbohydrate tolerance and insulin responses in obstructive jaundice	It's called carbohydrate tolerance and response to acid; insulin in obstructive jaundice.
6	the role of the autonomic innervation in the control of glucagon release during hypoglycaemia in the calf	The role of apo; autonomic innervation in the control of glucagon release during apo; calf hypoglycemia.
6	effects of medroxyprogesterone acetate on carbohydrate metabolism	Effects of apos; medroxyprogesterone acetate on carbohydrate metabolism.
6	effects of oral alanine feeding on blood glucose plasma glucagon and insulin concentrations in small for gestational age infants	Effects of oral alanine feeding on blood glucose plasma glucagon and insulin levels in small gestational age infants.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism during chronic renal insufficiency effects of dialytic treatments of short duration 3 4 hours on alternate days	Effects of chronic renal failure on glycolipid metabolism resulting from short-term dialysis treatments, alternating between 3 and 4 hours a day.
6	growth hormone responses to hypoglycemia in postmenopausal depressed women	Growth hormone responses to hypoglycemia in postmenopausal women depress women.
6	glucagon role in the hyperglycemia of diabetes mellitus	Role of glucagon in glucose hyperglycemia of diabetes mellitus.
6	beta cell culture on synthetic capillaries an artificial endocrine pancreas	Beta cell culture on synthetic capillaries, an artificial endocrine pancreas.
6	insulin induced augmentation of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	The insulin induced an increase in lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity.
6	prolactin receptors in rat liver possible induction by prolactin	The prolactin receptors in rat liver may be induced by prolactin.
6	the pituitary acth gh lh fsh tsh and prolactin reserves in patients with cushing s syndrome	L'acuitary pituitary acth gh lh fsh tsh et prolactin reserves in patients with cushing syndrome.
6	induction of drinking by insulin in the rat	Induction of the consumption of insulin in rats.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on pancreatic insulin release and hepatic glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity in the rat	L' effect of apos; hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on hepatic insulin release and apos; hepatic glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity in rat.
6	plasma and cerebrosponal fluid amino acid levels in diabetic ketoacidosis before and after corrective therapy	Dapos; plasma and cerebrospinal fluid amino acids in apo; diabetic ketoacidosis before and after corrective treatment.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man i effects in normal subjects	Modification of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in humans; effects in normal subjects.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man ii effects in insulin deficient diabetics	Modification of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in men; ii effects in insulin-deficient diabetics.
6	bromocriptine treatment of acromegaly	Treatment of acromegaly with bromocriptine.
6	digestion of insulin derivatives with subtilisin a kinetic study	Digestion of l&apos derivatives; insulin with subtilisin kinetic study.
6	glucose tolerance in newborn infants of healthy mothers its relationship to the mothers insulin response to glucose infusion	Glucose tolerance in new-infants of healthy mothers, its relation to maternal insulin response to glucose infusion.
6	dynamic evaluation of growth hormone gh and prolactin hprl secretion in active acromegaly with high and low gh output	Dynamic evaluation of the secretion of the growth hormone gh and prolactin hprl in active acromegaly with high and low gh output.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin and glucagon response during intravenous glucose tolerance test in newborn infants affected by erythroblastosis foetalis	Glycemia and response to plasma insulin and glucagon during the intravenous glucose tolerance test in newborn efalizumab-infected efalizumab; erythroblastosis fetalis.
6	preclinical abnormality of left ventricular function in diabetes mellitus	Preclinical abnormality of left ventricular function in diabetes mellitus.
6	renal tubular acidosis during therapy for diabetic ketoacidosis	Acute renal tubular acidosis during the treatment of apos; diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	endocrine tumor of the pancreas composed of argyrophil and b cells a correlated light immunofluorescent and ultrastructural study	Endocrine tumor of the pancreas composed of argyrophils and b-cells, correlated ultrastructural study and immunofluorescent light study.
6	on the mechanism of hormone action in 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary tumor i prolactin and progesterone effects on estrogen receptor in vitro	On the mechanism of l' hormonal action in 712 dimethylbenz a l&apos-induced mammary tumor; anthracene i prolactin and progesterone effects on estrogen receptor in vitro.
6	maternal fetal plasma glucose relationships in late monkey pregnancy	Fetal fetal plasma glucose relationships in late monkey pregnancy.
6	the role of ca 2 and cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in insulin release induced in vitro by the divalent cation ionophore a23187	The role of monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 and d' about 2 in apos release; insulin induced in vitro by divalent cationic ionophore a23187.
6	elongation of the interchain disulfide bridges of insulin a synthetic analog	L' elongation of interchain disulfide bridges of l' insulin a synthetic analog.
6	the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp synthesis in rat kidney cortex the role of acid base balance and glucocorticoids	Regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp synthesis in rat renal cortex, the role of l' equilibrium of acid bases and glucocorticoids.
6	anosmia and hypogonadism with ovarian mosaicism	Anosmia and hypogonadism with ovarian mosaicism.
6	vitrectomy a new challenge for the anesthesiologist	Vitrectomy is a new challenge for the anesthesiologist.
6	mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on early passage cultures of human and murine fibroblasts	The mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on first-pass cultures of human and murine fibroblasts.
6	chronic depression of serum concentrations of sialic acid in alloxan induced diabetic rats	Chronic decrease in serum levels of sialic acid in rats made diabetic by apos; alloxan.
6	insulinoma with low circulating insulin levels the diagnostic value of proinsulin measurements	Insulin with low circulating insulin levels, diagnostic value of proinsulin measurements.
6	experimental diabetic ketoacidosis sequential changes of metabolic intermediates in blood liver cerebrospinal fluid and brain after acute insulin deprivation in the streptozotocin diabetic rat	Diabetic experimental ketoacidosis sequential changes of metabolic intermediates in cerebrospinal fluid-spinal fluid and blood-liver brain following acute insulin deficiency in the streptozotocin diabetic rat.
6	the insulin response to intravenous fructose in relation to blood glucose levels	The insulin response to intravenous fructose in relation to blood glucose levels.
6	altered tissue response to glucagon in obesity	Alteration of tissue response to glucagon in obesity.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on tsh release in man	Lapos; effect of apos; hypoglycemia on tsh release in men.
6	the effect of alpha msh on plasma growth hormone cortisol and tsh in children	The effects of alpha msh on the immune system; plasma growth hormone cortisol and tsh in children.
6	relationships among the secretion of acth gh and cortisol during the insulin induced hypoglycemia test in the normal and obese child	Ratio between the secretion of apos; acth gh and cortisol during testing; hypoglycemia induced by apos; insulin in the apos; normal child and the apos; obese child.
6	comparison of cylic and linear forms of somatostatin in the inhibiton of growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion	Comparison of cylic and linear forms of somatostatin in apos; insulin and glucagon secretion inhibitor; growth hormone.
6	abnormal pancreatic alpha cell function in first degree relatives of known diabetics	Anomalies of pancreatic alpha cell function in first-degree parents of known diabetics.
6	plasma insulin and glucose levels in diabetic rats prior to and following islet transplantation	Plasma insulin and glucose levels in diabetic rats prior to and following islet transplantation.
6	dietary induced hypertrophic hyperplastic obesity in mice	L' hypertrophic hyperplastic obesity induced by obesity; mouse diet.
6	hormonal regulation of lobulo alveolar growth functional differentiation and regression of whole mouse mammary gland in organ culture	Hormonal regulation of alveolar lobular growth functional differentiation and regression of whole mouse mammary gland in organ culture.
6	effect of adrenalectomy and insulin insufficiency upon the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate system of the rat mammary glands	Effect of: adrenalectomy and dapos; insulin deficiency on the cyclic monophosphate system of the apos; adenosine 3-5 of rat mammary glands.
6	postprandial blood glucose and insulin in cows fed high grain	Postprandial glycemia and insulin in cows fed high grain.
6	insulin goes metric a time for reveiw	L' insulin becomes metric at some time for awakening.
6	isoproterenol and epinephrine induced changes in blood glucose and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats the influence of alteration in endogenous insulin levels and state of nourishment	Lapos; isoproterenol and epinephrine induced changes in blood and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats, leafiness; influence; alteration of apo levels; endogenous insulin and nutritional status.
6	cyproheptadine induced depletion of insulin in the rat	Cyproheptadine induced depletion of insulin in rats.
6	comparative adenylate cyclase activities in homogenate and plasma membrane fractions of morris hepatoma 5123tc h	Comparison of l&apos activities; adenylate cyclase in homogenate and plasma membrane fractions of l' Morris hepatoma 5123 cf.
6	cell cycle associated changes in receptors for ige during growth and differentiation of a rat basophilic leukemia cell line	The cell cycle has been associated with changes in leaf receptors;ige during growth and differentiation of a basophilic rat leukemia cell line.
6	effect of insulin on the proliferation of cultured primate arterial smooth muscle cells	Effect of apos; insulin on the proliferation of cultured primate arterial smooth muscle cells.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in dystrophia myotonica	Health effects of carbohydrate metabolism in dystrophia myotonica.
6	effects of exercise and of food restriction on the development of spontaneous obesity in rats	Effects of exercise and dietary restriction on the development of spontaneous obesity in rats.
6	mucormycosis of the craniofacial structures	Mucormycosis of the craniofacial structures.
6	a study of carbohydrate metabolism in postnecrotic cirrhosis liver	A study of carbohydrate metabolism in postnecrotic cirrhosis of liver.
6	basal and reactive proinsulin and insulin secretion in overweight women author s transl	Basal and reactive proinsulin and insulin secretion in overweight women.
6	the effect of synthetic somatostatin in normal and acromegalic males	L' the effect of synthetic somatostatin in normal and acromegalic males.
6	persistent pancreatic glucagon but not insulin response to arginine in pancreatectomized dogs	Pancreatic glucagon but not insulin response to arginine in pancreatic dogs.
6	characterization of the plasma lipoproteins of the genetically obese hyperlipoproteinemic zucker fatty rat	Characterization of plasma lipoproteins in the genetically obese hyperlipoproteinemic zucker fatty rat.
6	inhibition by somatostatin of glucagon and insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas in response to arginine isoproterenol and theophylline evidence for a preferential effect on glucagon secretion	The inhibition by somatostatin of the release of glucagon and apos; insulin from the perfused rat pancreas in response to apos; arginine isoproterenol and theophylline shows apos; the existence of apos; a preferential effect on the secretion of glucagon.
6	stimulation of the uptake of alpha aminoisobutyric acid in rat thymocytes by l triiodothyronine a comparison with insulin and dibutyryl cyclic amp	Stimulation of apos; absorption of apos; alpha acid-aminoisobutyric acid in rat thymocytes by triiodothyronine vs. lido; insulin and apos; dibutyryl cyclic ampoule.
6	radioimmunoassay of canine growth hormone enzymatic radioiodination	Enzyme radioiodination radioimmunoassay of canine growth hormone.
6	diabetes mellitus distinguishing between patients receiving insulin and those requiring insulin therapy	Diabetes mellitus discriminating between patients receiving insulin and those requiring insulin therapy.
6	production of chylomicron like lipoproteins from endogenous lipid by the intestine and liver of diabetic dogs	Production of chylomicron-like lipoproteins from endogenous lipids from the intestine and liver of diabetic dogs.
6	studies of the rate of regression of the glomerular lesions in diabetic rats treated with pancreatic islet transplantation	Studies of the rate of regression of glomerular lesions in diabetic rats transplanted from the pancreatic islets.
6	long term primary culture of mouse mammary tumor cells production of virus	A long-term primary culture of mouse mammary tumour cells that produces virus.
6	plasma lipids and glucose insulin relationship in non insulin requiring diabetics with and without retinopathy	Plasma lipids and glucose insulin relation in non-insulin requiring diabetics with and without retinopathy.
6	the relationship between the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and the anti lipolytic action of insulin in isolated rat fat cells	The relationship between the concentration of d' adenosine 35 cyclic monophosphate and l' antilipolytic action of l' insulin in isolated rat fat cells.
6	the effect of oxytetracycline on insulin resistance in obese mice	Apos; effect of apos; oxytetracycline on insulin resistance in obese mice.
6	insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas mode of action of tolbutamide	Dapos release; insulin from perfused rat pancreas, mode of action; action of tolbutamide.
6	cell mediated immunity to insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin treated diabectics	Cellular immunity to insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin-treated diabetics.
6	associations between oral clefts and drugs taken during pregnancy	Association between oral cracks and medications taken during pregnancy.
6	role of glucagon and other hormones in development of diabetic ketoacidosis	Role of glucagon and other hormones in the development of diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	serial determinations of human placental lactogen in the management of diabetic pregnancy	Series of determinations of human placental lactogen in the treatment of diabetic pregnancies.
6	pituitary function after treatment of intracranial tumours in children	The pituitary function after treatment of intracranial tumours in children.
6	glucagon secretion in primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after clofibrate treatment	Glucagon secretion in primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after clofibrate treatment.
6	effects of insulin tolbutamide and glucagon on activities of jejunal carbohydrate metabolizing enzymes in humans	Effects of insulin tolbutamide and glucagon on the activities of jejunal carbohydrate metabolizing enzymes in humans.
6	the effect of alanine infusions on growth hormone insulin and glucose in protein calorie malnutrition	The effects of apo-fluid infusions, alanine on apo-fluid; insulin and glucose in apo-fluid; growth hormone in protein malnutrition.
6	normal serum lipids in renal transplant patients	Normal lipid serum in renal transplant patients.
6	development of the obese hyperglycemic syndrome in mice with a growth hormone deficiency	Development of obese hyperglycemic syndrome in mice with a growth hormone deficiency.
6	characterization of pancreatic islet monoamine oxidase	Characterization of pancreatic islet monoamine oxidase activity.
6	hepatic steatosis and the elevated plasma insulin level in patients with endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	Hepatic steatosis and high plasma insulin levels in patients with endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	regional adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in young and middle aged women	Regional adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in young and middle-aged women.
6	growth hormone responses following double pulse oral glucose administration in various clinical states	Apo responses; growth hormone following apo; dual-pulse oral glucose administration in various clinical conditions.
6	chromatographic heterogeneity of insulin extracted from insulomas	Chromatographic heterogeneity of insulin extracted from insulomas.
6	effect of alanine and glycine on glucagon secretion in postabsorptive and fasting obese man	Effect of alanine and glycine on glucagon secretion in fasting and fasting obese men-sorption.
6	effects of glucocorticoids on pituitary hormonal responses to hypoglycemia inhibition of prolactin release	Effects of glucocorticoids on pituitary hormonal responses to apos; hypoglycemic inhibition of prolactin release.
6	development and validation of a radioimmunoassay for peptides related to beta melanocyte stimulating hormone in human plasma the lipotropins	Development and validation of a radioimmunoassay of peptides linked to the human plasma beta melanocyte stimulating hormone, lipotropins.
6	plasma glucagon and alanine responses to acute insulin deficiency in man	Plasma glucagon and alanine responses to acute insulin deficiency in men.
6	long term infusion of growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in acromegaly effects on pituitary and pancreatic hormones	Long-term infusion of lapos; release hormone; growth hormone inhibits effects of lapos; acromegaly on pituitary and pancreatic hormones.
6	serum insulin and growth hormone response patterns in monozygotic twin siblings of patients with juvenile onset diabetes	Response patterns to serum insulin and growth hormone in monozygous twins of patients with juvenile diabetes.
6	an exploratory study of some behavioural consequences of insulin induced hypoglycaemia	An exploratory study of some behavioural consequences of apos; insulin-induced hypoglycaemia.
6	simple glaucoma and diabetic disease	Uh, simple glaucoma and diabetic disease.
6	metabolic aspects of obesity	The metabolic aspects of obesity.
6	kinetics of hemodiafiltration i in vitro transport characteristics of a hollow fiber blood ultrafilter	Kinetics, hemodiafiltration, in vitro transport characteristics of a hollow fiber blood ultrafilter.
6	fetal brain growth selective action by growth hormone	Selective action of fetal brain growth by growth hormone.
6	hyperosmolar nonketotic syndrome and steroid diabetes occurrence after renal transplantation	Nonketotic hyperosmolar syndrome and steroid diabetes after renal transplantation.
6	comparison of injection techniques for soluble and protamine zinc insulins in diabetes mellitus	Zinc soluble and protamine insulin injection in diabetes mellitus.
6	the functional state of the hypothalamo hypophyseal system in tumors of the pituitary and diencephalic area	L' functional state of the hypothalamo pituitary system in the pituitary and diencephaly.
6	incidence of diseases of the cardiovascular system in patients with diabetes during various types of therapy	Impact of disease of the cardiovascular system on diabetic patients during various types of therapy.
6	clinical and pathological studies in a growth hormone deficient dwarf	Clinical and pathological studies on a growth hormone deficient dwarf.
6	insulin iontophoresis in cystic fibrosis	Apos Iontophoresis; insulin in cystic fibrosis.
6	septal rage mitigation by pre surgical treatment with p chlorophenylalamine	Reduction of septal rage by pre-operative treatment with p chlorophenylalamine.
6	suppression of human growth hormone secretion by melatonin and cyproheptadine	Suppression of human growth hormone (HGH) secretion by melatonin and cyproheptadine.
6	hepatic autography in uncontrolled experimental diabetes and its relationships to insulin and glucagon	Hepatic autography in uncontrolled experimental diabetes and its association with insulin and glucagon.
6	insulin effect on creatine transport in skelatal muscle 38464	Insulin effect on creatine transport in skelatal muscle.
6	hormone and glucose responses to serial cardiac puncture in rats 38465	Hormonal and glycemic responses to serial cardiac puncture in 38465 rats were observed.
6	insulin secretion in malignant hyperpyrexia	Insulin secretion in eposes; malignant hyperpyrexia.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin secretion in patients with parathyroid disorders effect of serum calcium on insulin release	Glucose tolerance and apo secretion; insulin in patients with parathyroid disorders; effect of serum calcium on insulin release.
6	prevention of human diabetic ketoacidosis by somatostatin evidence for an essential role of glucagon	The prevention of human diabetic acidosis by somatostatin demonstrates an essential role of glucagon.
6	inhibition of l dopa induced growth hormone stimulation by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine	Dopa inhibition induced growth hormone stimulation by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine.
6	late complications of diabetes mellitus consequence of immunologic reactions	Late complications of diabetes mellitus consequence of immunological reactions.
6	in vivo interaction of the kunitz protease inhibitor and of insulin with subcellular structures from rat renal cortex	In vivo interaction of insulin with subcellular structures of rat renal cortex; inhibitors of kunitz protease and l&apos.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism in chronic renal insufficiency effects of intravenous glucose loading	The role of glycolipid metabolism in chronic renal insufficiency effects of intravenous glucose load.
6	effects of diuril and dilantin on blood glucose and insulin levels in late pregnancy	Effects of diuril and dilantin on blood glucose and insulin levels in late pregnancy.
6	oral glucose tolerance in patients with jaundice	Oral glucose tolerance in patients with jaundice.
6	pulmonary artery thrombosis during hormonal contraceptive therapy treatment with urokinase	Apos thrombosis; pulmonary artery during seizures; hormonal contraceptive treatment with urokinase.
6	inhibition of replication of normal adrenocortical cells in culture by adrenocorticotropin	L' inhibition of replication of normal adrenal cells in culture by l' adrenocorticotropin.
6	biochemical aspects of a study of 100 obese white subjects	Biochemical aspects of apos; a study of 100 obese white subjects.
6	influence of antrectomy on gastrin release and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys	L' influence of l' antrectomy on gastrin release and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys.
6	insulin receptor role in the resistance of human obesity to insulin	The role of receptors; insulin in resistance; human obesity to apos; insulin.
6	a followup report of a prospective evaluation of vagotomy pyloroplasty and vagotomy antrectomy for treatment of duodenal ulcer	A prospective evaluation of vagotomous and dapos pyloroplasty; vagotomous antrectomy for the treatment of apos; duodenal ulcer.
6	permanent neonatal diabetes mellitus a case report with plasma insulin studies	Permanent neonatal diabetes: case report with plasma insulin studies.
6	a case of leprechaunism and an analysis of some clinical manifestations of this syndrome	A case of leprechaunism and an analysis of some clinical manifestations of this syndrome.
6	lipo atrophy of the ankles and its relation to other lipo atrophies	Lip atrophy of the ankles and its relation to other lipo atrophies.
6	circadian rhythms of the endocrine pancreas a quantitative biochemical and immumocytochemical study	Circadian rhythms of the endocrine pancreas, quantitative biochemical and immumocytochemical study.
6	absence of insulin resistance in 4 cases of mild juvenile diabetes a preliminary report	Lack of resistance to apos; insulin in 4 cases of mild juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	congenital generalized lipodystrophy	It's called generalized congenital Lipodystrophy.
6	endocrinological aspects at follow up studies in neonatal hypoglycaemia	"""Endocrinological aspects at follow-up@ up studies in neonatal hypoglycaemia"", New England Journal of Medicine, Vol."
6	neuropathology of the oesophagus in diabetes mellitus	Neuropathology of the esophagus in diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin activity of the blood the action on it of various loads and the effect of blood serum on the effect of insulin relative to fatty tissue in chronic pancreatitis	L' activity of l' insulin of blood; action on it of various charges and l' effect of blood serum on the apos; effect of l' insulin relative to fat tissue in chronic pancreatitis.
6	effect of an energy reduced dietary regimen in relation to adipose tissue cellularity in obese women	Effect of reduced dietary intake; energy compared to fat cellularity in obese women.
6	increased disaccharidase activity in human diabetics	Increased disaccharidase activity in human diabetics.
6	introductory remarks nutrient hormone enzyme interactions	Introductory remarks Nutrient hormone enzyme interactions.
6	exocrine pancreatic function in juvenile diabetics	Exocrine pancreatic function in juvenile diabetics.
6	use and abuse of gastric function tests by british and american gastric surgeons	Excessive use of gastric function tests by English and American gastric surgeons.
6	variability of serum gastrin levels in zollinger ellison syndrome studies with two antisera to gastrin	Variability of serum gastrin levels in Zollinger Ellison Syndrome studies with two antisera to gastrin.
6	abo blood groups and serum gastrin	Blood types and serum gastrin abo.
6	hypothalamic stimulation induces acid secretion hypoglycemia and hyperinsulinemia	Hypothalamic stimulation induces acid secretion, hypoglycemia and hyperinsulinemia.
6	concentration of urine by the hibernating marmot	Concentration of abs; urine in the hibernating groundhog.
6	evolution of diabetic ketoacidosis in gross obesity	Progression of diabetes; diabetic ketoacidosis in general; obesity.
6	disorders in the development of the crystalline lens in chick embryos following exposure to insulin	Disturbances in the development of the crystalline lens in chick embryos exposed to the drug; insulin.
6	failure of insulin hypoglycemia to produce rise in serum prolactin	Failure of apos; insulin hypoglycemia to produce serum prolactin elevation.
6	rapid effects of insulin on uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Rapid effects of insulin on the metabolism of the apos; uridine in mammary gland explants.
6	effect of vagotomy on electrical activity of the small intestine of the dog	The effect of vagotomy on the apos; electrical activity of the apos; small intestine of the dog.
6	immunoassay of serum polypeptide hormones by using 125i labelled anti immunoglobulin g antibodies	L' immunoassay of serum polypeptide hormones to apo; aid; antibody to 125i-labelled anti--immune globulins.
6	spontaneous changes in growth hormone and insulin levels in newborn infants	Spontaneous changes in insulin and d*apos levels; growth hormone in newborns.
6	regulation of enzyme turnover during tissue differention studies on the effects of hormones on the turnover of fatty acid synthetase in rabbit mammary gland in organ culture	The regulation of turnover of the apos; enzyme during tissue retention difference studies on the effects of hormones on the turnover of fatty acid synthetase in rabbit mammary gland in cultured apos; organs.
6	insulin precursors a historical synopsis first diabetes treatment trials using pancreas extracts	L&apos precursors; insulin, a historical synopsis of early diabetes treatment trials using pancreatic extracts.
6	two cases of acute pandysautonomia	Two cases of acute pandemic endurance.
6	plasma triglyceride clearing in obese children	Plasma triglyceride clearance in obese children.
6	effect of oral contraceptives and vitamin b6 deficiency on carbohydrate metabolism	The effect of oral contraceptives and vitamin b6 deficiency on carbohydrate metabolism.
6	insulin therapy in patients with systemic insulin allergy	Insulin therapy in patients with systemic allergy to insulin.
6	hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia associated with a neurofibrosarcoma	Hyperinsulinemic hyperpoglycemia associated with a neurofibrosarcoma.
6	use of the lactose ethanol tolerance test in diabetes	Use of the lactose ethanol tolerance test in diabetes mellitus.
6	mechanisms of platelet aggregation inhibition caused by sulfonylurea compounds 4 discussion summary and literature	Mechanisms; platelet aggregation inhibition caused by sulfonylurea compounds 4 Discussion summary and publication.
6	proinsulin and insulin secretion in obese females before and after administration of metformin	Proinsulin and insulin secretion in obese women before and after pregnancy; metformin administration.
6	a controlled study of the hypoglycemic and insulinopoietic effect of glipizide and glibenclamide in non diabetic human subjects	A controlled study of the hypoglycemic and insulinopoietic effect of glipizide and glibenclamide in nondiabetic human subjects.
6	effect of the antrum and vagus nerve on the stimulation of the rat stomach by betazol in the perfusion test	Effect of the receptor and vagus nerve on the stimulation of the rat stomach by betazol in the infusion test.
6	effect of abnormal glucose tolerance in pregnancy on infant mortality rate and morbidity a prospective study	The effect of abnormal glucose tolerance during pregnancy on infant mortality and morbidity.
6	influence of pregnancy on the kinetics of insulin	L' influence of pregnancy on the kinetics of insulin.
6	differences in proliferative activity of rat and human prostate in culture	Differences in apo; proliferative activity of human prostate and rat in culture.
6	proteolytic degradation of insulin and glucagon	Proteolytic degradation of insulin and glucagon.
6	insulin degradation xv use of different assay methods for the study of mechanism of action of glutathione insulin transhydrogenase	Deterioration of insulin; use of different methods; testing for apo; study of mechanism; action of apo; insulin transhydrogenase glutathione.
6	difference derivative absorbance spectrophotometry as a technique to measure state changes of phenylalanine residues in proteins	D&apos spectrophotometry; differential absorbance derived as a technique to measure changes in pH; state of phenylalanine residues in proteins.
6	survival and growth in a woman with untreated hypothalamic panhypopituitarism of 21 years duration	Survival and growth in a woman with untreated hypothalamic hypopituitarism; 21 years duration.
6	mixed endocrine pancreatic tumors producing several peptide hormones	Mixed endocrine pancreatic tumors producing several peptide hormones.
6	hormone substrate responses to total fasting in lean and obese mice	Hormones responded to total starvation with substrate in lean and obese mice.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part i diurnal plasma glucose profile in normal and diabetic women	Cigarette carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part i diurnal plasma glucose profile in normal and diabetic women.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part ii relation between maternal glucose tolerance and glucose metabolism in the newborn	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy part ii relationship between maternal glucose tolerance and glucose metabolism in the new-born.
6	adrenal catecholamines content in fetal and newborn rats	Adrenal catecholamine content in fetal rats and new-born.
6	carrier solutions for low level intravenous insulin infusion	Intravenous infusion solutions for d' low level insulin.
6	the pancreatic insulin content and its relationship to plasma glucose and free fatty acid concentrations in the embryo and neonatal chick	Pancreatic insulin content and its relation to plasma glucose and free fatty acid concentrations in the embryo and newborn-chick.
6	hyperglucagonaemia in the surgical patient	Hyperglucagonemia in the patient undergoing surgery.
6	alcohol and its drug interactions	L' alcohol and its interactions with drugs.
6	thyroid autoimmunity increased frequency in relatives of insulin dependent diabetes patients	L' auto-thyroid immunity increased frequency in parents of insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disappearing diabetes	And that's the end of diabetes.
6	vagal impairment of gastric secretion in diabetic autonomic neuropathy	Vagal alteration of gastric secretion in diabetic autonomic neuropathy.
6	effect of trimethoprim sulfamethoxazole on blood insulin and glucose concentrations of diabetics	The effect of trimethoprim sulfamethoxazole on blood levels of insulin and glucose in diabetics.
6	biochemical characterization of carcinogen induced mammary hyperplastic aveolar nodule and tumor in the rat	Biochemical characterization of aveolar nodules and carcinogen-induced mammary hyperplastic tumours in the rat.
6	clinical secretory and motor effects of selective proximal vagotomy a three year follow up	Clinical effects of secretory and motor secretions followed by three years of selective proximal vagotomy.
6	studies on the duct ligated pancreas as allograft for islet cell function	Ligated pancreatic channel studies as an allograft for islet cell function.
6	human placental lactogen concentration during physiological fluctuations of serum glucose in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women	Human placental lactogen concentration during physiological fluctuations of serum glucose in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women.
6	lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by a fraction prepared from the urine from patients with congenital generalized lipodystrophy	Lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by a fraction prepared from the urine of patients with congenital systemic lipodystrophy.
6	double antibody radioimmunoassay of serum insulin effect of use of hormone depleted human serum	Dosage with double antibody radioimmunoassay; effect of serum insulin on apos; use of hormone depleted human serum.
6	effects of abdominal surgery under general anaesthesia and of postoperative analgesic therapy on splanchnic exchange of some blood borne energy metabolites	Effects of abdominal surgery under general anaesthesia and postoperative analgesia therapy on apos; splanchnic exchange of certain blood energy metabolites.
6	fluorometry of citrate in serum with use of citrate pro 3s lyase	Fluorometry of citrate in serum using pro 3s lyase citrate.
6	insulin release in cystic fibrosis	Insulin release in cystic fibrosis.
6	selective impairment of growth hormone response to physiological stimuli	Selective deterioration of growth hormone response to physiological stimuli.
6	hypogonadism and parathyroid adenoma in congenital poikiloderma rothmund thomson syndrome	Hypogonadism and parathyroid adenoma in congenital poikiloderma rothmund thomson syndrome.
6	plasma free fatty acid turnover in total lipodystrophy	Plasma free fatty acid turnover in total lipodystrophy.
6	quantitation of free total and antibody bound insulin in insulin treated diabetics	Antibody- and apo-linked insulin; free total insulin was quantitated in diabetics treated with apo; insulin.
6	muscular exertion a test of pituitary function in children	Muscle exercise is a test of pituitary function in children.
6	lymphopenic infectious mononucleosis	Infectious lymphopenic infectious mononucleosis.
6	phagocytic properties of exudative microphages from animals with alloxan diabetes and insulin induced hypoglycemia	The phagocytic properties of exudative microphages of animals with alloxan and allosan diabetes; insulin-induced hypoglycemia.
6	effects of medium chain triglycerides on portal and arterial levels of insulin ffa and glucose in patients with pancreatic disease	The effects of medium chain triglycerides on portal and arterial levels of ff insulin and glucose in patients with pancreatic disease.
6	oestradiol uptake and retention and high affinity binding sites in cultured rabbit uterus	Absorption and retention of estradiol and high affinity binding sites in cultured rabbit uterus.
6	urate synthesis in the perfused chick liver	Synthesis of l'apos; urate in the perfused chicken liver.
6	pituitary function in chronic alcoholism	Pituitary function in chronic alcoholism.
6	surgical disconnection of the medial basal hypothalamus and pituitary function in the rhesus monkey ii gh and cortisol secretion	Surgical disconnection of the medial basal hypothalamus and pituitary function in the rhesus monkey ii gh and cortisol secretion.
6	characteristics of the prolactin stimulation of uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Characteristics of prolactin-stimulated apos; uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants.
6	mechanism of action of gliquidone author s transl	Mechanisms of action; action of the gliquidone translations.
6	albumin fibrinogen and transferrin synthesis in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions a model for the study of plasma protein synthesis	The synthesis of albumin, fibrinogen, and transferrin in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions provides a model for the study of plasma protein synthesis.
6	the properties and extracellular location of 5 nucleotidase of the rat fat cell plasma membrane	The extracellular properties and localization of rat fat cell plasma membrane 5 nucleotidase activity.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on hypothalamic thyrotropin releasing hormone hrh in the rat	L' effect of apos; hypoglycaemia on hypothalamic thyrotropin releasing the apos; rat hormone hrh.
6	glucagon and insulin release from the allografted canine pancreas	Glucagon and insulin release from the allografted canine pancreas.
6	growth hormone catecholamines in affective disease	L' growth hormone catecholamines in affective diseases.
6	role of insulin as a portal factor in maintaining the viability of liver	The role of insulin as a factor in the portability of the liver; insulin as a factor in maintaining the viability of the liver.
6	confirmation of impaired early insulin response to glycemic stimulus in nonobese mild diabetics	Confirmation of altered early insulin response to glycemic stimulus in mild non-obese diabetics.
6	insulin therapy in phenformin associated lactic acidosis a case report biochemical considerations and review of the literature	Insulin therapy for phenformin-associated lactic acidosis is reported in one case report biochemical considerations and a review of the literature.
6	plasma renin activity and blood volume in uncontrolled diabetes ketoacidosis a state of secondary aldosteronism	Lapses; plasma renin activity and blood volume in uncontrolled diabetes acid ketoacidosis states; secondary aldosterone.
6	basement membrane thickness in muscle capillaries of normal and spontaneously diabetic macaca nigra	L' basal membrane thickness of muscle capillaries of normal and spontaneously diabetic macaca.
6	inordinately high levels of serum immunoreactive insulin in monoclonal immunoglobulinemia on the problem of big big insulin	Excessively high levels of immunoreactive serum insulin in the immune system; monoclonal immunoglobulinemia on the problem of large insulin.
6	comparison of the lipolytic effects of insulin and proinsulin on isolated fat cells	A comparison of the lipolytic effects of insulin and proinsulin on isolated fat cells.
6	plasma glucagon levels during rapid exsanguination with and without adrenergic blockade	Plasma glucagon levels during rapid exsanguination with and without adrenergic blockade.
6	progestogen induced diabetes in the dog	The progestogen induced diabetes in the dog.
6	long term effect of highly selective vagotomy on basal and maximal acid output in man	Long-term effect of highly selective vagotomy on basal and maximal production of apos; acid in men.
6	metabolic responses following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic breeder vs non arteriosclerotic virgin and ovariectomized female rats	Metabolic responses to isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic reproductive rats compared with virgin nonarteriosclerotic, ovariectomized female rats.
6	a controlled randomized trial of highly selective vagotomy versus selective vagotomy and pyloroplasty in the treatment of duodenal ulcer	A randomized trial of high selective vagotomy versus selective vagotomy and pyloroplastis in the treatment of dualenal ulcer.
6	cord plasma glucose and insulin concentrations and maternal fetal relations	Glucose concentration, umbilical plasma insulin and maternal fetal relations.
6	comparison of blood glucose and insulin concentrations in man after intravenous injection of 1 0 0 1 and 0 01 mg of glucagon author s transl	Comparison of blood glucose and insulin concentrations in men after an intravenous injection of 10 and 01 mg glucagon in translation.
6	the immediate and delayed effects of different types of vagotomy on human gastric myoelectrical activity	Immediate and delayed effects of different types of vagotomy on human gastric myoelectrical activity.
6	hormonal regulation of incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in human fetal liver explants effect of dibutyryl cyclic amp glucagon insulin and triamcinolone	Hormonal regulation of apos; incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in human fetal liver explants; effect of dibutyryl glucagonic insulin and triamcinolone.
6	age adjusted analysis of insulin responses during normal and abnormal glucose tolerance tests in children and adolescents	Age-adjusted analysis of insulin responses during normal and abnormal glucose tolerance tests in children and adolescents.
6	immunoreactive glucagon responses to intravenous tolbutamide in chronic pancreatitis	Immunoreactive glucagon responses to intravenous tolbutamide in chronic pancreatitis.
6	factitial panniculitis and necrotizing fasciitis in juvenile diabetes	Dummy panniculitis and necrotizing fasciitis in juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	actions of insulin epinephrine and dibutyryl cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate on fat cell protein phosphorylations cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate dependent and independent mechanisms	L' action of insulin epinephrine and dibutyryl cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate on protein phosphorylations of apos-dependent and apos-independent fat cells; adenosine 5 cyclic monophosphate.
6	lipids and lipoproteins in normal dogs and in dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia	Lipids and lipoproteins in normal dogs and in dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia.
6	formation of a covalent intermediate between alpha chymotryspin and the b chain of insulin during enzyme catalyzed hydrolysis	A covalent intermediate between the apos; alpha-chymotryspine and the b chain of the apos; insulin during the apos; enzyme-catalyzed hydrolysis.
6	studies on the action of hormones on the intestinal transport of l histidine	Apos studies; action of hormones on the intestinal transport of histidine l.
6	pituitary hormonal reserve in patients presenting hyperprolactinemia intrasellar masses and amenorrhea without galactorrhea	Hypituitary hormonal reserve in patients with intrasolar mass hyperprolactinemia (IPH) and amenorrhea without galactorrhea.
6	hormonal and metabolic changes induced by elevated plasma free fatty acids in term pregnancy i effect on maternal blood glucose insulin and human placental lactogen circulating levels	Hormonal and metabolic changes induced by elevated plasma free fatty acids during term pregnancy affect the levels of insulin and lactogen circulating in maternal blood and the human placenta.
6	failure of somatostatin to inhibit tolbutamide induced insulin secretion in patients with insulinomas a possible diagnostic tool	Lapos; somatostatin d' inhibiting tolbutamide induced insulin secretion in patients with insulin; insulin, a possible diagnostic tool.
6	hormonal control of ketogenesis rapid activation of hepatic ketogenic capacity in fed rats by anti insulin serum and glucagon	Hormonal control of the rapid activation of hepatic ketogenic capacity in rats fed anti-insulin serum and glucagon.
6	effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on impaired peripheral motor nerve conduction velocity in acute streptozotocin diabetes	The effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on apos; impaired peripheral motor nerve conduction velocity in acute streptozotocin diabetes.
6	effect of ketone infusions on amino acid and nitrogen metabolism in man	Effect of ketone infusions on amino acid and nitrogen metabolism in humans.
6	experimental study of dibutyryl cyclic amp its metabolic effects observed in anesthetized human subjects	L' experimental study of dibutyryl cyclic amplifier, its metabolic effects observed in human anesthetized subjects.
6	under responsiveness of growth hormone secretion after l dopa and deep sleep stimulation in obese subjects	Under-reactivity of l&apos secretion; growth hormone after dopa and deep sleep stimulation in obese subjects.
6	effect of hydrocortisone and dexamethasone on xylose uptake by isolated rat soleus muscle	Effect of hydrocortisone and dexamethasone on xylose uptake by isolated rat soleus muscle.
6	possible intervention of insulin cyclic amp and glucocorticoids in protein sparing action of dietary carbohydrate in rats	Possible intervention of apo; cyclic apo blister; insulin and glucocorticoids in apo; protein reserve action of dietary carbohydrate in rats.
6	effect of dietary cholesterol on hepatic lipogenesis and plasma insulin and free fatty acid levels in rats	The effect of dietary cholesterol on hepatic lipogenesis and plasma levels of insulin and d*apos; free fatty acids in rats.
6	hormonal control of cyclic 3 5 amp levels and gluconeogenesis in isolated hepatocytes from fed rats	The hormonal control of cyclic levels of 3 5 amperes and gluconeogenesis in isolated hepatocytes from fed rats.
6	metabolic and hormonal consequences of exchange transfusion via the umbilical artery or vein	Metabolic and hormonal consequences of exchange transfusion via the artery or umbilical vein.
6	glycerol major contributor to the short term protein sparing effect of fat emulsions in normal man	Glycerol is a major contributor to the short-term protein saving effect of fat emulsions in normal men.
6	mechanisms for development of diabetic hypertriglyceridemia in streptozotocin treated rats effect of diet and duration of insulin deficiency	Mechanisms of development of diabetes; diabetic hypertriglyceridemia in streptozotocin-treated rats Effect of diet and duration of insulin deficiency.
6	enzyme linked immunoassay i novel method for synthesis of the insulin beta d galactosidase conjugate and its applicability for insulin assay	Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay i novel method for the synthesis of the insulin beta conjugate galactosidase and its applicability to insulin.
6	binding and degradation of 125i insulin by rat hepatocytes	Key words: binding and degradation of insulin 125i by rat hepatocytes.
6	effect of serum on phenylalanine hydroxylase levels in cultured hepatoma cells	Effect of serum on phenylalanine hydroxylase levels in cultured liver cells.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone and insulin on the activity and isoenzyme of tyrosine alpha ketoglutarate transaminase in cytostructures of rat liver	Apos; effect of apos; hydrocortisone and apos; insulin on apos; activity and apos; isoenzyme of tyrosine alpha ketoglutarate transaminase in cytostructures of rat liver.
6	pyruvate kinase from kidney medulla of rabbits in insulin deficiency	Pyruvate kinase from the renal medulla of rabbits in insulin deficiency.
6	correction of endocrine metabolic disorders in oncologic patients the effect of biguanides phenformin and adebita miskleron and diphenin	Correct endocrine metabolic disorders in cancer patients; effect of biguanides phenformin and adebita miskleron and diphenin.
6	effects by heme insulin and serum albumin on heme and protein synthesis in chick embryo liver cells cultured in a chemically defined medium and a spectrofluorometric assay for porphyrin composition	Effects of hepatitis; heme insulin and hepatitis; serum albumin on synthesis of hepatitis; heme and protein in hepatic cells; chick embryos grown in a chemically defined medium and in a spectrofluorometric porphyrin composition assay.
6	metabolism of riboflavin and its nucleotides in rat liver subcellular fractions in alloxan diabetes	Metabolism of riboflavin and its nucleotides in rat liver subcellular fractions in alloxan diabetes.
6	gangrene of the newborn a case report	The gangrene of the new-arose a case report.
6	abdominal pain in diabetic metabolic decompensation clinical significance	Abdominal pain in diabetic metabolic decompensation clinical significance.
6	the accuracy of methods of diagnosis in patients with suspected recurrent ulcer after vagotomy	Accuracy of diagnostic procedures in patients suspected of having a recurrent ulcer after vagotomy.
6	gastric inhibitory polypeptide gip stimulated by fat ingestion in man	Apos-stimulated gastric inhibitory polypeptide tip; fat ingestion in men.
6	altered hypothalamic pituitary adrenal responsiveness to dexamethasone insulin tolerance test in active acromegaly	Modification of the adrenal hypothalamic hypophysial response to the apos tolerance test; dexamethasone insulin test in the apos; active acromegaly.
6	radioreceptor inactive growth hormone associated with stimulated secretion in normal subjects	Inactive growth hormone associated with stimulated secretion in normal subjects.
6	circulating nsila s in man preliminary studies of stimuli in vivo and of binding to plasma components	Nsila s circulating in humans Preliminary studies of stimuli in vivo and binding to plasma components.
6	the inhibitory effect of somatostatin on growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion in diabetes mellitus	Lapos; inhibitory effect of somatostatin on insulin and glucagon secretion of apos; growth hormone in diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of peripheral nerve myelin in experimental diabetes	Metabolism of peripheral nerve myelin in experimental diabetes.
6	differential effect of hormones on macromolecular synthesis and mitosis in chick embryo cells	The differential effect of hormones on macromolecular synthesis and mitosis in chick embryo cells.
6	hypoglycemic conditioned reflex in rats preliminary study of its mechanism	Hypoglycemic conditioned reflex in rat, preliminary study of its mechanism.
6	serum free growth of htc cells containing glucocorticoid and insulin inducible tyrosine aminotransferase and cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptors	Serum free growth of htc cells containing tyrosine aminotransferase and cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptors induced by glucocorticoids and l' insulin.
6	sex steroid influence on triglyceride metabolism	Influence of sex steroids on triglyceride metabolism.
6	glucocorticoids and the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase guanosine triphosphate in the rat	Glucocorticoids and the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase guanosine triphosphate in the rat.
6	biochemical changes in cultured foetal rat liver explants	Biochemical changes in cultured fetal rat liver explants.
6	acute and long term tocolysis by means of buphenin dilatol in insulin dependent pregnant diabetics	Acute and long term tocolysis by buphenin dilatol in pregnant insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	studies on new sulfonylurea derivatives and their metabolites in isolated langerhans s islets of the rat pancreas author s transl	Studies of new sulfonylurea derivatives and their metabolites in isolated islets of the rat pancreatic lambs.
6	clinical usefulness of gastric acidity studies	Lapos; clinical utility of gastric acidity studies.
6	peripheral metabolism of insulin proinsulin and c peptide in the pregnant rat	Peripheral metabolism of insulin proinsulin and peptide c in the pregnant rat.
6	on hepatic and extrahepatic postheparin serum lipase activities and the influence of experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes on these activities	On hepatic and extrahepatic activities of serum lipase post @-@heparin and on l' influence of experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes on these activities.
6	spontaneous diabetes mellitus in macaca cyclopis and mandrillus leucophaeus case reports	Cases of diabetes mellitus in macaca cyclopis and mandrillus leucophaeus reported.
6	estradiol dependent collagenolytic enzyme activity in long term organ culture of human breast cancer	Lapos; apos-dependent collagenolytic enzyme activity; estradiol in apos culture; long-term human breast cancer organs.
6	metabolic actions of vasopressin glucagon and adrenalin in the intact rat	L' metabolic action of vasopressin glucagon and l' adrenaline in the intact rat.
6	blood glucose serum insulin and glucagon response to arginine in premature infants	Blood glucose insulin and glucagon response to arginine in early childhood.
6	gastric acid output pepsin output and lean body mass in normal and duodenal ulcer subjects	Gastric acid production, pepsin production and lean body mass in normal and duodenal patients with ulcer.
6	antibody to cultured human insulinoma cells in insulin dependent diabetes	Antibody to cultured cells; human insulin in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	pathogenesis of nonketotic hyperosmolar diabetic coma	The pathogenesis of nonketotic hyperosmolar diabetic coma.
6	potentiation of carbon tetrachloride induced hepatotoxicity in alloxan or strepto zotocin diabetic rats	The potentiation of carbon tetrachloride induced hepatotoxicity in alloxan or streptozotocin-induced diabetic rats.
6	modification by propranolol of cardiovascular effects of induced hypoglycaemia	Propranolol modification of cardiovascular effects of apos; induced hypoglycemia.
6	effect of meal feeding on the daily variations of insulin glucose and nadp linked dehydrogenases in rats	Effect of apo; ingestion of food on daily changes in rat insulin glucose and larval dehydrogenases.
6	influence of treatment with diet alone on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma sugar and insulin levels in patients with maturity onset diabetes mellitus	Influence of diet-only treatment on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma sugar and insulin levels in patients with mature diabetes mellitus.
6	the endocrine pancreas in varanus niloticus ultrastructural and cytochemical electron microscopic study and x ray microdiffraction	The endocrine pancreas in varanus niloticus ultrastructural and cytochemical electron microscopy and microdiffraction x-ray study.
6	the historic role of insulin in the physiopathology of the metabolic complications from pancreatic diabetes therapeutic implications for somatostatin	The historical role of insulin in the pathophysiology of the metabolic complications of pancreatic diabetes therapeutic implications for somatostatin.
6	gas chromatographic and mass spectrometric detection of low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in urine of normal individuals and patients with diabetes mellitus	Gas chromatography and mass spectrometry detection of low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in apo; urine of normal individuals and diabetes mellitus patients.
6	dose response study of the inhibiting effect of somatostatin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in normal subjects and acromegalic patients	Dose-response study; inhibitory effect of somatostatin on serum lipids; insulin and d&apos secretion; growth hormone in normal subjects and acromegalic patients.
6	serum lipids in acromegaly	The serum lipids in the apos; acromegaly.
6	hypoglycaemia associated with an intrathoracic fibrosarcoma	Hypoglycemia associated with an intrathoracic fibrosarcoma.
6	depressive symptoms and the glucose tolerance test and insulin tolerance test	Depressive symptoms and glucose and insulin tolerance test.
6	feeding behavior in monkeys with spontaneous diabetes mellitus	Food behaviour in monkeys with spontaneous diabetes mellitus.
6	specific insulin binding to chloroplasts isolated from acetabularia mediterranea	The specific insulin binding to chloroplasts isolated from l' Mediterranean acetabular.
6	metabolic effects of calcitonin in the newborn	Metabolic effects of calcitonin in the new @-@born.
6	restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and ureogenesis from threonine when at low concentrations	Restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and ureogenesis from threonine at low concentrations.
6	influence of darkness on insulin binding in the unicellular algae acetabularia mediterranea	Influence of the apos; obscurity on insulin binding in the apos; unicellular acetabularia mediterranea algae.
6	effect of insulin on electric activity of sheep jejunum	Effect of apos; insulin on apos; electrical activity of sheep jejunum.
6	in vitro stimulation of human breast tissue by human prolactin	In vitro stimulation of human breast tissue by human prolactin.
6	mortality factors in diabetes a 20 year mortality study	The mortality factors in diabetes a 20-year mortality study on mortality.
6	aberrations in hollander test response after incomplete vagotomy compensating effect of antral resection in the dog	Aberrations in hollander test response after incomplete vagotomy compensation effect of antral resection in the dog.
6	ultrastructure of the adrenal medulla of normal and insulin treated hamsters	Ultrastructure of the adrenal medulla of normal and treated hamsters.
6	the effects of morphine and nalorphine on the plasma 11 hydroxycorticosteroid response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	The effects of morphine and nalorphine on the plasma response 11 hydroxycorticosteroid to insulin induced hypoglycemia in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
6	altered pulmonary capillary permeability complicating recovery from diabetic ketoacidosis	L' altered pulmonary capillary permeability complicates recovery from a diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	drug interference and the role of anesthesia in such interference	Medication interference and the role of l*apos; anesthesia in this interference.
6	continuous daily blood sugar profile in relation to serum insulin in subjects with normal metabolism and ideal or normal weight author s transl	Continuous daily glycemic profile in relation to serum insulin in subjects with normal metabolism and ideal or normal weight.
6	plasma levels of hgh insulin and nefa in diabetic children author s transl	Plasma levels of insulin and nefa in diabetic children are reported.
6	insulin plasma aminoacid imbalance and hepatic coma	Insulin deficiency; insulin plasma amino acids and hepatic coma.
6	a case report of turner s syndrome with ring x chromosome	A Turner syndrome with a ring x chromosome case report.
6	qualitative abnormality of insulin secretion in a case with insulinoma	Qualitative abnormality of insulin secretion in a case of diabetes.
6	a case of acromegaly improved by pituitary apoplexy	One case of acromegaly enhanced by pituitary apoplexy.
6	hypothalamic pituitary functions in patients with idiopathic pituitary dwarfism	Hypothalamic pituitary functions in patients with idiopathic apos; dwarf pituitary.
6	the growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in anorexia nervosa and control underweight or normal subjects	The growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycemia in the nervous anorexia and normal or low-weight control subjects.
6	influence of atropine metiamide and vagotomy on camp of resting and stimulated gastric mucosa	Influence of atropine metiamide and vagotomy on gastric mucosal stimulation and resting camp.
6	automatic treatment of radioimmunoassay data an experimental validation of the results	Automatic processing of data; radioimmunoassay, experimental validation of the results.
6	a low response of pituitary growth hormone secretion in the patient with diabetes mellitus after intravenous administration of l dopa author s transl	Low responsiveness of the pituitary growth hormone secretion in the diabetic patient post-apos; intravenous administration of translation of the apos; dopa.
6	oral diazoxide contraindicated in severe hypertension with renal failure	Oral Diazoxide vs.-indicated for severe hypertension with renal insufficiency.
6	adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in juvenile onset diabetes mellitus	Diposis tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in juvenile onset diabetes mellitus.
6	the excretion of proinsulin and insulin in urine	Lapses; excretion of proinsulin and dapos; insulin in urine.
6	the effect of phenformin on amino acid induced insulin secretion in diabetics	The effect of phenformin on amino acids induced insulin secretion in diabetics.
6	the plasma insulin and growth hormone response to oral glucose diurnal and seasonal observations in the antarctic	L' plasma insulin and response of the growth hormone to oral glucose diurnal and seasonal observations in the Antarctic.
6	serum iri in insulin treated diabetics during a 24 hour period	Serum iri in diabetics treated with apo; insulin for 24 hours.
6	the contractile capacity of the myocardium the effect of insulin on it and indices of central hemodynamics in patients with diabetes mellitus	The contractile capacity of the myocardium, the effect of insulin on it and its indices, and central hemodynamics in diabetes mellitus patients.
6	effect of metergoline a powerful and long acting antiserotoninergic agent on insulin secretion in normal subjects and in patients with chemical diabetes	Effect of metergoline, a potent long-acting anti-serotonergic agent, on insulin secretion in normal subjects and in patients with chemical diabetes.
6	demonstration of anti a component antibody a possible means to differentiate patients with auto antibodies to endogenous insulin from insulin treated patients	Demonstration of antibody; antibody a is a possible way to differentiate patients with auto-antibody to apo; endogenous insulin from apo-treated patients; insulin.
6	effect of hypophysectomy on protein synthetic activity of free and bound hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats	Effect of apos; hypophysectomy on apos; protein synthesis activity of free and bound hepatic ribosomes from insulin-deficient rats.
6	effect of duration of insulin deficiency on membrane bound and free ribosomes from livers of diabetic rats	The effect of duration of insulin deficiency on free and membrane-bound ribosomes of diabetic rat liver.
6	human c peptide in normal and diabetic subjects	Human c peptide in normal and diabetic subjects.
6	increased kidney size and glomerular filtration rate in untreated juvenile diabetes normalization by insulin treatment	Increased kidney size and glomerular filtration rate in juvenile untreated diabetes normalization; insulin.
6	assessment of the somatotropic function of the hypophysis in patients with hypophyseal nanism and gonadal dysgenesis by using the insulin tolerance and arginine tolerance tests	Evaluation of the somatotropic function of the apos; pituitary in patients with pituitary dwarfism and gonadal dysgenesis at apos; aids in insulin and apos tolerance testing; arginine.
6	blood sugar and plasma immunoreactive insulin levels in healthy pregnant women undergoing the glucose tolerance test	Plasma immunoreactive insulin and blood glucose levels in healthy pregnant women undergoing the glucose tolerance test.
6	effect of glucagon on esophageal motor function	The effect of glucagon on esophageal motor function.
6	kinetics of steroid induction and deinduction of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis in cultured hepatoma cells	Kinetics of apos; steroid induction and deinduction of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis in d&apos cells; hepatoma culture.
6	clinical investigations of the effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on pancreatic glucagon secretion author s transl	Clinical investigations of the effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on pancreatic glucagon secretion.
6	serum insulin changes in arteriosclerotic breeder female rats versus non arteriosclerotic virgin rats	"""Effect of arteriosclerotic and non-arteriosclerotic virgin rats on insulin change"", J. Am."
6	c peptide analysis in diagnosis of factitial hypoglycemia in an insulin dependent diabetic	Peptide analysis in diagnosis of hypoglycaemia dummy in an insulin dependent diabetic.
6	clinical experiences with monocomponent insulins	Clinical experiments with monocomponent insulins.
6	trial treatment of diabetic retinopathy by inhibition of pituitary somatotropin secretion with map	Experimental treatment of diabetic retinopathy by inhibition of pituitary somatotropin secretion by using a map.
6	significance of the 2 deoxy d glucose test on the differentiation of hypoglycemia in childhood author s transl	L' importance of the 2 deoxyglucose test on the differentiation of apos; hypoglycaemia in translated children.
6	prolonged control of hypoglycaemia by l asparaginase in islet cell carcinoma producing insulin and gastrin	Lapos; asparaginase prolonged control of apos; hypoglycemia in islet cell carcinoma; gastrin and insulin.
6	insulin and hydrocortisone effects on viability and glycogen stores of postnatal rat liver organ culture	Apos; insulin and apos; hydrocortisone on viability and glycogen stores of postnatal rat liver organs.
6	insulinoma aids to management	Insulinoma is a management aid.
6	studies on the role of insulin in the regulation of glyceride synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue	Studies on the role of insulin in the regulation of glyceride synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	intraportal insulin protects from the liver injury of portacaval shunt in dogs	Intraportal insulin protects against liver injury caused by the use of portacaval shunt in dogs.
6	functional subdivision of islets of langerhans and possible role of d cells	Under-functional division of islets of langerhans and possible role of d cells.
6	hormone receptors 5 binding of glucagon and insulin to human circulating mononuclear cells in diabetes mellitus	Hormonal receptors 5 bind glucagon and insulin to human circulating mononuclear cells in diabetes mellitus.
6	utilization of intravenous maltose	Use of intravenous maltosis.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin levels during prolonged pentobarbitone anaesthesia in the rat	Glucose and dapos levels; insulin during apos; prolonged pentobarbitone anaesthesia in rat.
6	effect of beta and beta2 adrenoreceptor stimulants infused intrapancreatically on glucagon and insulin secretion	Adrenoceptor beta and beta2 stimulants had an intra-pancreatic effect on glucagon and insulin secretion.
6	studies on the reversibility of oral trypsin inhibitor induced changes of rat pancreatic exocrine enzyme activity and insulin secretory capacity	Studies on the reversibility of the oral inhibitor of trypsin induced changes in pancreatic exocrine enzyme activity and insulin secretion capacity in the rat.
6	retention of endocrine function by an insulin secreting pancreatic islet cell tumour from syrain hamster through serial transplantation in nude mice	The retention of endocrine function by an insulin secreting syrain hamster pancreatic islet tumour by serial transplantation in naked mice.
6	physiological mechanisms for cardiac control by nutritional intake after early maternal separation in the young rat	Physiological mechanisms of cardiac control by adults; nutritional intake after early maternal separation in young rats.
6	blood sugar level and immunoreactive insulin in the blood plasma in pregnant women with supposed prediabetes in the dynamics of a normal glucose tolerance test	Blood sugar level and immunoreactive insulin in the blood plasma in pregnant women whose pre-diabetes is assumed to be in the dynamics of d' a normal test for glucose tolerance.
6	hormonal and pyridoxine induction of threonine dehydratase in the rat liver	Hormonal and pyridoxine induction of threonine dehydratase in rat liver.
6	lipid mobilizing hormones of the hypothalamus and pituitary	Lipid-mobilizing hormones of the hypothalamus and the apos; pituitary.
6	central factors in the control of insulin and glucagon secretion	Central factors in the control of insulin and glucagon secretion.
6	the plasma cortisol and corticotropin response to hypoglycemia following adrenal steroid and acth administration	Plasma cortisol and corticotropin response to apos; hypoglycemia after apos; adrenal and d&apos steroid administration; acth.
6	exaggerated growth hormone response to arginine infusion in huntington s disease	Excess growth hormone response to Huntington's disease.
6	function of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	Function of the canine pancreatic allograft ligated duct.
6	behaviour of the duct ligated canine pancreas during hypothermic albumin perfusion	The behaviour of the duct ligated the canine pancreas during hypothermic infusion of apos; albumin.
6	twenty four hour preservation of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	Preservation of ligated canine pancreatic allograft for 24 hours.
6	endocrinology and metabolism in uremia and dialysis a clinical review	Los; endocrinology and metabolism in uremia and dialysis a clinical review.
6	insulin metabolism insulin sensitivity and hormonal responses to insulin infusion in patients taking oral contraceptive steroids	Metabolism; insulin Sensitivity; insulin and hormonal responses to infusion; insulin in patients taking oral contraceptive steroids.
6	effect of insulin induced hypoglycemia upon plasma renin activity in man	Lapos; effect of apos; apos-induced hypoglycaemia; insulin-induced apos; plasma renin activity in men.
6	parietal cell vagotomy	Wall cell vagotomy.
6	culture of cells in beem capsules a new technique for electron microscopic study of monolayer cultures	The culture of cells in beem capsules is a new technique for electron microscopy of monolayer cultures.
6	intragastric pressure volume relationship before and after proximal gastric vagotomy	Relation of intragastric pressure volume before and after proximal gastric vagotomy.
6	conditioning insulin effects	Condition effects of insulin.
6	induction of t lymphocyte responses to a small molecular weight antigen i failure to induce tolerance in azobenzenearsonate aba specific t cells in guinea pigs with an aba conjugate of a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine d gl	Induction of t lymphocyte responses to a low molecular weight antigen i failed to induce tolerance in leaf-specific t-cells; azobenzenearsonate in guinea pigs with aba dapos conjugate; a d&apos copolymer; glutamic acid and lysine d glglgl.
6	nutritional and metabolic studies in humans with 1 3 butanediol	Nutritional and metabolic studies in humans with 13-butanediol.
6	influence of 1 3 butanediol on blood glucose concentration and pancreatic insulin content of streptozotocin diabetic rats	Effects of 13 butanediol on blood glucose concentration and pancreatic insulin content of streptozotocin diabetic rats.
6	radioimmunoassay review of basic principles	Radioimmunological review of basic principles.
6	radioimmunoassay of insulin	A radioimmunoassay of insulin.
6	cellular and circulating immunity to diabetic basement membrane a negative finding	Cellular and circulating immunity to diabetic basement membrane is negative.
6	studies of the relationship between renin secretion and the sympathetic nervous system responsiveness in man author s transl	Studies of the relationship between renin secretion and sympathetic nervous system responsiveness in the apos; transl.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide i peripheral vein immunoreactive insulin in normal subjects and mild diabetics author s transl	Immune-reactive serum insulin insulin following oral administration of a single dose of tolbutamide i peripheral insulin-reactive insulin in normal subjects and in mild diabetes mellitus.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide ii pancreatic vein immunoreactive insulin in dogs author s transl	Immunoreactive serum insulin after dosing; oral administration of apo; a single dose of tolbutamide ii immunoreactive insulin-pancreatic vein in translating dogs.
6	dietary therapy and insulin secretory response to glucose in adult onset non obese diabetic subjects	Dietary therapy and secretory response to glucose; insulin to glucose in adult non-obese subjects with type 2 diabetes.
6	determination of total insulin tiri in plasma of insulin treated diabetics and newborn infants of insulin treated diabetic mothers	Determination of the total insulin drawn into the plasma of diabetic patients treated with insulin; new and insulin treated diabetic mothers.
6	dynamics of insulin release by perfused hamster mesocricetus auratus pancreases effects of hypophysectomy bovine and human growth hormone and prolactin	The dynamics of insulin release by hamster infused mesocricetus auratus pancreas causes the effects of apos; hypophysectomy of apos; bovine and human growth hormone and prolactin.
6	aspects of the adrenal function in the domestic fowl	Some aspects of the adrenal function in domestic poultry.
6	insulin degradation by isolated fat cells and their subcellular fractions	Insulin degradation by isolated fat cells and their subcellular fractions.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man iii role of pharmacologic limitation of ffa availability	Modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in humans iii role of pharmacological limitation of ffa availability.
6	short term treatment of alloxan diabetic rats with intrajejunal administration of water in oil in water insulin emulsions	Short-term treatment of alloxan-induced diabetic rats with intrajunal administration of alloxan; water in apos; oil in apos; insulin-emulsions.
6	twenty four hour serum growth hormone levels in maturity onset diabetics	Serum Dapos; growth hormone in early-maturity diabetics for 24 hours.
6	organ culture of foetal rat pancreas effects of parabiotic culture with foetal adrenal glands	Culturing of fetal rat pancreatic organs; effects of parabiotic culture with fetal adrenal glands.
6	bacteriuria findings in diabetics	Bacteriuria in the diabetic.
6	effects of diabetes mellitus on bone mass in juvenile and adult onset diabetes	The effects of diabetes mellitus on bone mass in juvenile and adult diabetes.
6	effect of gastro entero pancreatic endocrine hormones on the histogenesis of gastric cancer in rats induced by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with special reference to development of scirrhous gastric cancer	Effect of gastric endocrine hormones-enteric on the histogenesis of gastric cancer in rats induced by n-methyl n-nitrosoguanidine, particularly with respect to the development of scirous gastric cancer.
6	islet transplantation in diabetic rats receiving corticosteroids	Islet transplantation in diabetic rats receiving corticosteroids.
6	formaldehyde ozone induced fluorescence in gastrin producing tumours	L' ozone formaldehyde induced fluorescence in gastrin-producing tumors.
6	isolation of intact liver parenchymal cells by a modified enzymatic method	Isolate intact liver parenchyma cells by a modified enzymatic method.
6	the influence of plasma triglycerides on human growth hormone response to arginine and insulin a study in hyperlipemics and normal subjects	The influence of plasma triglycerides on the human growth hormone response to apos, arginine, and apos; insulin was studied in both hyperlipemic and normal subjects.
6	blood glucose and serum insulin levels in lean and genetically obese mice	Gllycemia and serum insulin levels in lean and genetically obese mice.
6	the role of cortisol and growth hormone in the counter regulation of insulin induced hypoglycemia	Cortisol and l' growth hormone play a role in the counter-regulation of apos; insulin-induced hypoglycemia.
6	experimental hyperthyroidism in dogs evaluation and effects on blood sugar serum insulin and free fatty acids during glibenclamide infusion test	Experimental hyperthyroidism in dogs assessment and effects on blood glucose insulin and free fat acids during glibenclamide infusion test.
6	the effect of fatty acids and ketone bodies on the biosynthesis of insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of obese hyperglycemic mice	The effect of fatty acids and keto bodies on the biosynthesis of insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of obese hyperglycemic mice.
6	the effect of insulin on amino acid incorporation into exocrine pancreatic cells of the rat	Lapos; effect of apos; insulin on apos; amino acid incorporation into the exocrine pancreatic cells of the rat.
6	interaction of endogenous growth hormone cortisol and catecholamines with blood glucose in children with brittle diabetes mellitus	Interaction of endogenous growth hormone cortisol and catecholamines with blood glucose in children with fragile diabetes mellitus.
6	stimulation of growth hormone secretion by levodopa propranolol in children and adolescents	Stimulation of growth hormone secretion by levodopa propranolol in children and adolescents.
6	plasma growth hormone insulin and glucagon responses to arginine infusion in children and adolescents with idiopathic short stature isolated growth hormone deficiency panhypopituitarism and anorexia nervosa	The responses of insulin and glucagon de l'apos; plasma growth hormone to infusion of apos; arginine in children and adolescents of small size idiopathic isolated panopituitarism due to deficiency of apos; growth hormone and l'apos; anorexia nervosa.
6	propranolol augmented exercise induced human growth hormone release	Propranolol increased human growth hormone release induced by exercise.
6	acute suppressive effect of human growth hormone on basal insulin secretion in man	Acute suppressive effect of human growth hormone on apo secretion; basic insulin in humans.
6	effects of synthetic somatostatin on endotoxin induced changes of growth hormone cortisol and insulin in plasma blood sugar and blood leukocytes in man	The effects of synthetic somatostatin on the changes induced by apos; endotoxin of apos; growth hormone cortisol and apos; insulin in blood sugar and leukocytes in men.
6	growth hormone secretion and sulfation factor activity in pseudohypoparathyroidism	Growth hormone and lipid secretion; sulfation factor activity in pseudohypoparathyroidism.
6	laron dwarfism growth and immunoreactive insulin following treatment with human growth hormone	Laron growth dwarfism and immunoreactive insulin following treatment with human growth hormone.
6	change in secretion of somatotropic hormone and insulin in myocardial infarct	Change in secretion of insulin and d*apos; somatotropic hormone; myocardial infarction.
6	carbohydrate tolerance plasma insulin growth hormone and lipid levels in indian and black diabetics	Carbohydrate tolerance Hormone growth and lipid levels of insulin in Indian and black diabetics.
6	growth and hormone control mechanisms in osteosarcoma evidence for a new therapeutic approach	Growth and hormonal control mechanisms in osteosarcoma, evidence of a new therapeutic approach.
6	a comparative study of serum growth hormone and plasma cortisol levels in stimulation tests with insulin and propranolol glucagon	A comparison study of serum growth hormone and plasma cortisol levels in stimulation tests with insulin and propranolol glucagon.
6	increased immunoreactive plasma and urinary growth hormone in growth retardation with defective generation of somatomedin a laron s syndrome	Immunoreactive plasma and liver increase; urinary growth hormone in growth retardation with defective generation of somatomedin with laron syndrome.
6	growth hormone and prolactin secretion in the carcinoid syndrome	A growth hormone and prolactin secretion in the carcinoid syndrome.
6	growth hormone secretion in chronic schizophrenia	Apos secretion; growth hormone in chronic schizophrenia.
6	the effects of insulin and growth hormone on the release of somatomedin by the isolated rat liver	The effects of insulin and growth hormone on the release of somatomedin from isolated rat liver.
6	the stimulating effect of cyclic amp glucagon and insulin on guanidine acetate n methyltransferase activity in rat liver and pancreas	Lapos; stimulatory effect of glucagon; cyclic and apo-blow; insulin on apos; guanidine acetate n methyltransferase activity in rat liver and pancreas.
6	intravenous metyrapone testing evaluation of growth hormone and adrenocorticotrophic hormone in children	Evaluation of meteoporticotropin; growth hormone and lapos; intravenous meteoporticotropin hormone in children.
6	l dopa growth hormone and adipokinesis in the lean and the obese	L dopa growth hormone and adipokinesis in the lean and fat.
6	serum growth hormone serum immunoreactive insulin and blood glucose response to oral and intravenous diazepam in man	Serum growth hormone serum immunoreactive insulin and a glycemic response to oral and intravenous diazepam in men.
6	plasma growth hormone and insulin during early lactation in cows fed silage based diets	Early lactation plasma growth hormone and insulin in cows fed Dapos-based diets; silage.
6	a modification of the unlabeled antibody enzyme method using heterologous antisera for the light microscopic and ultrastructural localization of insulin glucagon and growth hormone	Modification of the enzymatic method of unlabeled antibodies with antioxidants; heterologous antisera for the light microscopic and ultrastructural localization of apos; glucagon insulin and apos; growth hormone.
6	growth hormone insulin and sugar in the blood plasma of bulls interrelated diurnal variations	Growth hormone and sugar in the blood plasma of interdependent diurnal interdependent bulls.
6	effect of alcohol administration on plasma growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycemia	Effect of apo; alcohol on response of apo; plasma growth hormone to apo; hypoglycemic induced insulin.
6	growth hormone release by glycine injected intravenously in 22 healthy sexually immature children	Glycine growth hormone release was injected intravenously into 22 healthy sexually immature children.
6	altered growth hormone release in huntington s chorea	Changes in growth hormone release in Huntington's disease.
6	effect of lipids on insulin growth hormone and exocrine pancreatic secretion in man	Effect of lipids on insulin, growth hormone and exocrine pancreatic secretion in men.
6	follicle stimulating hormone thyrotrophin human growth hormone and prolactin in hyperemesis gravidarum	Hormone follicle stimulating thyrotrophin, human growth hormone and prolactin in the apos; hyperemesis gravidarum.
6	the effect of somatostatin on plasma insulin and growth hormone levels in basal conditions and after glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects	L' effect of somatostatin on plasma levels of insulin and d' growth hormone under baseline conditions and after glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	glucagon insulin and growth hormone response in obese women	The effect of insulin glucagon on growth hormone response in obese women.
6	growth hormone response in fetal alcohol syndrome	The growth hormone response to Dapos syndrome; fetal alcoholism.
6	propranolol effect on plasma glucose free fatty acid insulin and growth hormone in graves disease	Propranolol's effect on apos; insulin and apos; free growth hormone; plasma glucose fatty acids in serious diseases.
6	diabetes mellitus in gonadal dysgenesis studies of insulin and growth hormone secretion	Diabetes in gonadal dysgenesis studies of insulin and insulin secretion; growth hormone.
6	automated approach to radioimmunoassays of somatotropin human growth hormone and insulin	Automated approach to radioimmunoassays of insulin and lyso; somatotropin human growth hormone.
6	growth hormone levels in diabetes correlation with the clinical control of the disease	Dapos; growth hormone in diabetes correlation with clinical control of disease.
6	secretion of growth hormone in hyperthyroidism	Apos secretion; growth hormone in apos; hyperthyroidism.
6	effects of methyldopa on prolactin and growth hormone	Effects of methyldopa on prolactin and growth hormone.
6	effects of growth hormone thyroxine and age on diaphragm muscle from dwarf mice	Effects of growth hormone thyroxine and lacidosis on the diaphragm of dwarf mice.
6	the influence of thyroid function on the diabetogenic action of triamcinolone in man glucose insulin and growth hormone patterns after on oral glucose load	The influence of thyroid function on the diabetogenic action of triamcinolone in insulin man and growth hormone patterns after oral glucose load.
6	hormonal regulation of fetal brain cell proliferation presence in serum of a trophin responsive to pituitary growth hormone stimulation	Hormonal regulation of the presence of proliferating fetal brain cells in the serum of a hypophysial growth hormone (hypophysial growth hormone), a hormone that reacts to the stimulation of apos.
6	a comparison of the effect of levodopa and somatostatin on the plasma levels of growth hormone insulin glucagon and prolactin in acromegaly	Comparison of levodopa and somatostatin to plasma levels of growth hormone insulin glucagon and prolactin in apos; acromegaly.
6	provocative tests for growth hormone release	Challenge tests for growth hormone release.
6	effect of prolactin on growth and the estrogen receptor level of human breast cancer cells mcf 7	The effect of prolactin on growth and estrogen receptor levels in human breast cancer cells.
6	effect of the antihistaminic agents meclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on the response of human growth hormone to arginine infusion and insulin hypoglycemia	Effect of the antihistamine agents mesclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on the response of human growth hormone to infusion of apos, arginine and lapos; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep i diurnal variations in mid and late pregnancy	Plasma concentrations of insulin and d*apos; growth hormone in pregnant sheep i diurnal changes in mid- and late gestation.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep ii post absorptive levels in mid and late pregnancy	Plasma concentrations of insulin and d*apos; growth hormone in pregnant sheep ii after birth; mid- and late-term absorption.
6	insulin and growth hormone responses in neonatal hyperglycemia	Lapses; insulin and responses; growth hormone in neonatal hyperglycemia.
6	retinopathy and plasma growth hormone levels in idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes	Retinopathy and dapos; plasma growth hormone in apo; idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes.
6	prolactin binding to r3230ac mammary carcinoma and liver in hormone treated and diabetic rats	Prolactin binds to r3230ac mammary carcinoma and liver in hormone-treated and diabetic rats.
6	effects of somatostatin on basal levels of plasma growth hormone and insulin in acromegalics dose response studies and attempted total growth hormone suppression	Effects of somatostatin on basal levels of l*apos; growth hormone and l*apos; plasma insulin levels in dose studies-acromegalic response and attempt total suppression of l*apos; growth hormone.
6	depression of growth hormone and cortisol response to insulin induced hypoglycemia after prolonged oral delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol administration in man	Decreased growth hormone and cortisol response to insulin caused hypoglycemia after apos; prolonged oral administration of delta tetrahydrocannabinol in men.
6	influence of l prolyl l leucyl glycine amide on growth hormone secretion in normal and acromegalic subjects	L' influence of leucyl glycine amide on growth hormone secretion in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	short term effects of norethisterone oenanthate and medroxyprogesterone acetate on glucose insulin growth hormone and lipids	Short-term effects of norethisterone oenanthate and apos; medroxyprogesterone acetate on glucose, lipids; growth hormone and insulin.
6	changes in glucose insulin and growth hormone levels associated with bedrest	Changes in glucose, insulin and growth hormone levels associated with bed rest.
6	binding of tritiated bovine parathyroid hormone to plasma membranes from bovine kidney cortex	Bovine gland attachment; tritiated bovine parathyroid hormone to bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	studies of binding of parathyroid hormone to a detergent dispersed preparation from bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	Studies of the binding of parathyroid hormone to a detergent-dispersed preparation from bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	cushing s disease growth hormone response to hypoglycemia after correction of hypercortisolism	Apos reaction; Cushing's disease growth hormone to apos; hypoglycemia after correction of apos; hypercortisolism.
6	relationships between thyrotropin growth hormone and insulin in hypothyroidism	The relationship between thyrotropin growth hormone and insulin in the apos; hypothyroidism.
6	growth hormone in exercise comparison of physiological and pharmacological stimuli	Apos; growth hormone in apos; comparative physiological and pharmacological stimuli exercise.
6	the effect of segmental epidural analgesia on maternal growth hormone insulin glucose and free fatty acids during labour	Effect of segmental epidural analgesia on glucose insulin and free fatty acids; maternal growth hormone in the workplace.
6	effects of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on growth hormone secretion	Effects of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on growth hormone release.
6	serum insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone levels in response to intravenous infusion of l arginine in patients with recently detected juvenile diabetes	Serum apo; pancreatic insulin and dapo; growth hormone in response to intravenous infusion of apo; arginine in patients who have recently detected juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test in various forms of diabetes	Dapos secretion; growth hormone in the liver test; insulin in various forms of diabetes.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test and the development of diabetic microangiopathy	The secretion of the growth hormone in the insulin test and the development of diabetes micro-angiopathy.
6	thyrotropin releasing hormone content of rat brain and hypothalamus results of endocrine and pharmacologic treatments	Thyrotropin-released hormones in the rat brain and intestine; rat hypothalamus, endocrine and pharmacological treatment.
6	prolactin and somatomedin studies in the syndrome of growth hormone independent growth	Prolactin and somatomedin studies in the growth-independent growth hormone l&apos syndrome.
6	luteinizing hormone responses to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and growth hormone and cortisol responses to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in functional secondary amenorrhoea	Luteinizing hormone responses to apos; luteinizing hormone release hormone; luteinizing hormone and growth hormone and cortisol responses to apos; insulin induced hypoglycemia in apos; functional secondary amenorrhea.
6	sequential use of insulin and levodopa to provoke pituitary secretion of growth hormone	Sequential use of insulin and levodopa to induce pituitary secretion of growth hormone.
6	prolactin a diabetogenic hormone	Prolactin is a diabetogenic hormone called prolactin.
6	altered growth hormone and prolactin responsiveness to trh in the infant rat	Modification of the response of growth hormone and prolactin to trh in the new rat-born.
6	suppression by thyrotropin releasing hormone trh of growth hormone release induced by arginine and insulin induced hypoglycemia in man	Thyrotropin-releasing hormone (THRH) suppresses the growth hormone release induced by arginine, arginine and lapos; insulin-induced hypoglycemia in men.
6	growth hormone and somatomedin a in girls with adolescent idiopathic scoliosis	Growth hormone and somatomedin a in girls with adolescent idiopathic scoliosis.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in a leukaemic girl with hypothalamic syndrome	Lipos; insulin and insulin secretion; growth hormone in a leukemic girl with hypothalamic syndrome.
6	secretion of human growth hormone and insulin in levodopa test during carbamazepine therapy	The secretion of insulin and human growth hormone in levodopa test during carbamazepine treatment.
6	growth hormone deficiency after treatment of acute leukaemia in children	Apo anemia; growth hormone after treatment of acute leukemia in children.
6	evaluation of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and cortisol response in heroin addicts	Evaluation of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and cortisol response in heroin addicts.
6	interstitial gamma irradiation by 198au of the pituitary in diabetic retinopathy selective growth hormone blockade and ocular results	Interstitial gamma radiations by 198au de l'apos; pituitary in apos; selective growth hormone of diabetic retinopathy and ocular results.
6	growth hormone insulin and prolactin secretion in anorexia nervosa and obesity during bromocriptine treatment	Apos growth hormone; insulin and prolactin secretion in apos; nerve anorexia and apos; obesity during bromocriptine treatment.
6	influence of prostaglandins and thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on hormone secretion and growth in wether lambs	L' influence of prostaglandins and thyrotropin releasing l' hormone trh on hormone secretion and growth in lambs.
6	luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and serum growth hormone in insulin dependent diabetes	Lapos; luteinizing hormone and luteinizing hormone; serum growth hormone in insulin-dependent diabetes.
6	effect of somatostatin on thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone and insulin responses to thyrotropin releasing hormone and arginine in healthy hypothyroid and acromegalic subjects	Effect of somatostatin on thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone and insulin responses to thyrotropin release hormone and arginine in healthy hypothyroid and acromegalic subjects.
6	pituitary and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in the duck ii plasma free fatty acids aminoacids and insulin variations following hypophysectomy and replacement therapy with growth hormone and corticosterone	Hypophysectomy and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in duck ii plasma free amino acids and changes in l' insulin after hypophysectomy and replacement therapy with l' growth hormone and corticosterone.
6	changes in plasma insulin and growth hormone after intravenous glucagon in hepatic cirrhosis	Intravenous injection of glucagon into liver cirrhosis; changes in plasma insulin and liver enzymes; growth hormone.
6	the effect of gonadotropin releasing hormone on blood glucose insulin luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone levels	Lactos; effect of apo; gonadotropin-releasing hormone on blood glucose Lapos; luteinizing hormone; insulin and follicle-stimulating hormone.
6	alterations in serum prolactin heterogeneity by provocative tests in a patient with a pituitary tumour	"""The effects of prolactin on the risk of a pituitary tumour,"" American Journal of Public Health, Vol."
6	synthesis of a nonreducible cyclic analog of somatostatin having only growth hormone release inhibiting activity	Synthesis d' a nonreducible cyclic analog of somatostatin, whose activity is inhibited by the release of the growth hormone, somatostatin.
6	correlation between plasma growth hormone and insulin and blood glucose concentrations in premature infants	The relationship between plasma growth hormone and insulin and blood glucose concentrations in premature infants.
6	low cortisol and growth hormone secretion in response to methoxamine administration in obese subjects	Low cortisol and d&apos secretion; growth hormone in response to apos; methoxamine administration in obese subjects.
6	failure of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and insulin to further augment thyrotrophin release in primary hypothyroidism	Luteinizing hormone and luteinizing hormone; insulin to further increase thyrotrophin release in the liver; primary hypothyroidism.
6	metabolic and hormonal effects of post menopausal oestrogen replacement treatment i glucose insulin and human growth hormone levels during oral glucose tolerance tests	Metabolic and hormonal effects of estrogen replacement therapy post-menopausal i glucose insulin and d' human growth hormone during oral glucose tolerance testing.
6	hypophysis and function of pancreatic islets iv effect of treatment with growth hormone and corticotrophin on insulin secretion and biosynthesis in isolated pancreatic islets of normal rats	L' pituitary and function of pancreatic islets iv effect; treatment with growth hormone and corticotropin on secretion and biosynthesis; insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of normal rats.
6	basal and stimulated serum growth hormone concentrations in inflammatory bowel disease	Basal and stimulated serum apo concentrations; growth hormone in inflammatory bowel disease.
6	inhibition of dopamine induced release of growth hormone by thyrotropin releasing hormone	The inhibition of dopamine induced release of the growth hormone from the thyrotropin-releasing hormone.
6	lack of effect of acid base alterations on growth hormone secretion in man	Absence of apo; effect of acid base alterations on apo secretion; growth hormone in men.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion stimulated by intravenous administration of arginine in the low insulin responders prediabetes	The secretion of insulin and dapos; growth hormone was stimulated by intravenous administration of arginine in prediabetic individuals with a low insulin response.
6	new evidence for growth hormone modulation by the alpha adrenergic system in man	New evidence of modulation of the growth hormone by the alpha adrenergic system in men.
6	variation of blood glucose and serum growth hormone prolactin and insulin in subjects with insulin dependent diabetes after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine	Change in blood sugar and serum growth hormone prolactin and insulin in insulin-dependent diabetics after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine.
6	comparison of the blood levels of insulin and growth hormone in healthy adolescents adolescents with excessive weight and with hereditary loading with regard to diabetes mellitus	Comparison of blood levels of insulin and d*apos; growth hormone in healthy adolescents with excessive weight and hereditary burden for diabetes mellitus.
6	release of growth hormone prolactin lh fsh and iri in serum through orally administered 1 proline in high dosage	Release of l' growth hormone prolactin lh fsh and iri in serum by oral administration of d' a high dose of 1 proline.
6	hypothalamo pituitary adrenal function in pituitary adenoma and craniopharyngioma part ii insulin test and clinical features	Hypothalamo pituitary adrenal function in pituitary adenoma and craniopharyngioma Part ii insulin test and clinical features.
6	tests for cataglykin activity on a cyanogen bromide fragment of human growth hormone	Tests; cataglykin activity on a cyanogen bromide fragment of l'apos; human growth hormone.
6	glucagon and growth hormone secretion in insulin treated diabetics effects of added sulfonylureas	The effects of added sulfonylureas on diabetics treated with insulin.
6	transient diabetes mellitus in a neonate evaluation of insulin glucagon and growth hormone secretion and management with a continuous low dose insulin infusion	Diabetes transient in a neonate evaluation of the secretion and management of insulin glucagon and lacid; growth hormone with a continuous infusion of d*apos; low-dose insulin.
6	growth hormone determination in a combined adenohypophyseal stimulation test author s transl	Determination of growth hormone in a combined adenohypophyseal stimulation test was expressed by the author.
6	reevaluation of levodopa propranolol as a test of growth hormone reserve in children	Re-evaluation of levodopa propranolol as a test for growth hormone in children.
6	familial idiopathic haemochromatosis with diabetes study of glucagon and growth hormone secretions author s transl	Hemochromatosis idiopathic family with diabetes study of glucagon and secretions of glucagon; growth hormone translates.
6	content of growth hormone in the blood in insulin resistant and insulin sensitive patients with diabetes mellitus during compensation	Dapos; growth hormone in the blood of insulin-resistant and insulin-sensitive patients with diabetes mellitus during compensation.
6	stimulatory effect of glycine on human growth hormone secretion	A stimulatory effect of glycine on human growth hormone (HGH) secretion.
6	effects of diet composition on serum levels of insulin thyroxine triiodothyronine growth hormone and corticosterone in rats	Effects of diet composition on serum levels of insulin triiodothyronine growth hormone and corticosterone in rats.
6	studies on proinsulin and problucagon biosynthesis and conversion at the subcellular level ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and hormone precursors in subcellular fractions after pulse and pulse chase incubation of islet tissue	Studies of proinsulin and problucagon biosynthesis and subcellular conversion studies ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and apo precursors; hormones in subcellular fractions after pulse incubation and pulse flushing of islet tissue.
6	inhibition by somatostatin growth hormone release inhibiting hormone gh rih of gastric acid and pepsin and g cell release of gastrin	L' inhibition by somatostatin of the release of l' growth hormone inhibiting l' hormone ghih of l' gastric acid and pepsin and the release of gastrin g cells.
6	effects of cns dopamine augmentation on stimulated prolactin secretion	Apos effects; increased dopamine cns on stimulated prolactin secretion.
6	insulin secretion in children with growth retardation	Insulin secretion in children with growth retardation.
6	serum growth hormone concentrations after growth hormone or thyrotropin releasing hormone in cows	Serum concentrations of apo; growth hormone after apo; growth hormone or apo; thyrotropin releasing hormone in cows.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in exercising adult hamsters	Increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters.
6	comparative studies of growth hormone secretion in acromegaly after isolated and combined application of insulin hypoglycemia lh rh and trh tests author s transl	Comparative studies of apo secretion; growth hormone in apo; acromegaly after apo; isolated and combined application of apo; insulin hypoglycemia lh rh rh and highly translative tests.
6	effects of insulin human placental lactogen and human growth hormone of dna synthesis in organ cultures of benign human breast tumours	Effects of insulin-induced human placental lactogen and apo; human growth hormone on apo synthesis; DNA in human breast benign tumour organs.
6	differential effects of cranial radiation on growth hormone response to arginine and insulin infusion	The differential effects of cranial radiation on the response of the growth hormone to arginine and insulin infusion.
6	generation of somatomedin activity in response to growth hormone and insulin from isolated perfused livers of normal and protein malnourished rats	Production of somatomedin in response to growth hormone and insulin from isolated perfused livers of normal and protein-fed rats.
6	a follow up study of vascular disease in growth hormone deficient dwarfs with diabetes	A follow-up study of vascular disease in growth-promoting dwarfs with diabetes.
6	growth of a human breast cancer cell line in serum free hormone supplemented medium	Growth of apos; a human breast cancer cell line in serum serum-free hormone-supplemented medium.
6	glucagon secretion in rats bearing a growth hormone producing tumor mtt w 15	Glucagon secretion in rats with apos; a growth hormone producing tumour.
6	insulin secretion from pancreatic islets effect of growth hormone and related proteins	The effect of growth hormone and related proteins on apo secretion; insulin from pancreatic islets.
6	glucagon response to arginine in growth hormone deficient children before and after treatment with growth hormone and in children with non endocrine short stature	Glucagon response to apos; arginine in growth hormone deficient children before and after treatment with growth hormone and small, non-endocrine children.
6	growth hormone response to hypoglycemia under gamma hydroxybutyrate narco analgesia in the rat	Growth response to hypoglycemia under gamma hydroxybutyrate narco analgesia in the rat.
6	development of hormone receptors and hormone responsiveness in vitro effect of prolonged insulin treatment on hexose uptake in 3t3 l1 adipocytes	The development of hormone receptors and hormone reactivity in vitro; prolonged treatment with apo; insulin on apo-capture; hexose in adipocytes 3t3l1 fat.
6	insulin secretion in growth hormone deficient children and the effect of the sulfonylurea drug glibenclamide on linear growth	Insulin secretion in growth hormone-deficient children and the effect of sulfonylurea-based glibenclamide on linear growth.
6	growth hormone modulation of arginine induced glucagon release studies of isolated growth hormone deficiency and acromegaly	The modulation of arginine by growth hormone induced glucagon release from studies of isolated growth hormone deficiency and acromegaly.
6	pituitary responsiveness to thyrotropin releasing hormone in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Hypituitary response to thyrotropin release hormone in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	abnormalities in the regulation of growth hormone in chronic renal failure	Anomalies in the regulation of apo; growth hormone; chronic renal failure.
6	hyperglycemic action of synthetic c terminal fragments of human growth hormone	Hyperglycemic action of synthetic terminal c fragments of human growth hormone.
6	plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone in kindreds with maturity onset type of hyperglycemia in young people	L' insulin glucagon plasma and l' growth hormone in lines with onset of maturity type; hyperglycemia in young people.
6	insulin binding and insulin sensitivity in isolated growth hormone deficiency	Insulin binding and insulin sensitivity in isolated insulin deficiency; growth hormone.
6	growth hormone prolactin and corticosteroid responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in alcoholics	L' growth hormone prolactin and corticosteroid responses to l' hypoglycemic insulin in alcoholics.
6	somatomedin activity in human cord plasma and relationship to birth size insulin growth hormone and prolactin	L' somatomedin activity in human umbilical cord plasma and its relationship to height at birth insulin growth hormone and prolactin.
6	transient suppression of growth hormone secretion after chronic ethanol intake	The transient suppression of the secretion of the growth hormone after the chronic absorption of ethanol.
6	effect of dopaminergic blockade on the secretion of growth hormone and prolactin in man	Effect of dopaminergic blockade on the secretion of growth hormone and prolactin in men.
6	inhibitory effect of calcitonin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in man	Inhibiting effect of calcitonin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in men.
6	growth hormone in patients with diabetes mellitus of the juvenile type	Hormone of growth in patients with diabetes mellitus of the juvenile type.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in dialyzed children influence of dietary manipulation	The insulin and growth hormone secretion of dialysis-treated children influences food handling.
6	growth hormone response to prostaglandin e2	Prostaglandin growth hormone response e2.
6	abnormal growth hormone response in obesity with normal carbohydrate tolerance and normal thyroid function	An abnormal growth hormone response to obesity with normal carbohydrate tolerance and normal thyroid function.
6	effect of short submaximal stable load exertion on blood serum insulin and human growth hormone concentration as well as on various biochemical and acid base blood parameters in healthy individuals	Effect of short, steady-state maximum loading effort on serum insulin, blood insulin, and human growth hormone, as well as on a variety of biochemical and basic acid blood parameters in healthy individuals.
6	growth hormone release inhibitory hormone like immunoreactivity in pancreas and gut in streptozotocin diabetes in the rat and response to insulin administration	Lapos; inhibitory hormone; growth hormone such as lapos; immunoreactivity in the pancreas and lapos; intestine in streptozotocin diabetes in the rat and response to lapos; administration of insulin.
6	chemical diabetes in childhood integrated concentrations of glucose insulin and growth hormone	Chemical diabetes in children has integrated concentrations of glucose, d&apos, insulin and d' growth hormone.
6	quantitative determination of the lateral diffusion coefficients of the hormone receptor complexes of insulin and epidermal growth factor on the plasma membrane of cultured fibroblasts	Quantitative determination of the lateral diffusion coefficients of the hormone receptor complexes of insulin and epidermal growth factor on the plasma membrane of cultured fibroblasts.
6	the effect of alpha adrenergic receptor blockade on the glucagon induced growth hormone response	Glucagon-induced alpha-adrenergic receptor blockade on the glucagon-induced growth hormone response was observed.
6	plasma tsh and prolactin response to insulin induced hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disorders	Both plasma tsh and prolactin in response to apos; insulin caused hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disorders.
6	plasma lh fsh tsh prolactin and cortisol during a combined test of pituitary reserve in prepubertal subjects with short stature	Prolactin and cortisol plasma lh fsh tsh during apos; a combined test of pituitary reserve in small prepubescent subjects.
6	comparison of physiological and pharmacological tests of growth hormone function in children with short stature	Comparison of physiological and pharmacological tests of growth hormone function in small children.
6	renin growth hormone and insulin in hemodialyzed uremic diabetics	Lapos; growth hormone and lapos; renin insulin in hemodialyzed uremic diabetics.
6	antiserum to somatostatin reverses starvation induced inhibition of growth hormone but not insulin secretion	Apos; antiserum to somatostatin reverses apos; inhibition due to fasting of apos; growth hormone, but not secretion of apos; insulin.
6	the effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone on the endocrine pancreas	The effects of apos; thyrotropin-releasing hormone on the endocrine pancreas.
6	modifications of insulin and growth hormone after medium chain triglycerides ingestion author s transl	Changes to the dosage of insulin and apo; growth hormone after dosing; ingestion of medium chain triglycerides.
6	dopamine affects basal and augmented pituitary hormone secretion	Dopamine affects basal and augmented pituitary hormone secretion.
6	the gastro entero pancreatic hormone secretion after a mixed meal in normal subjects before and after a 72 hour period of starvation	Gastro secretion-entero-pancreatic d' hormones after a mixed meal in normal subjects before and after a period of fasting of 72 hours.
6	diurnal variation in the response of plasma prolactin cortisol and growth hormone to insulin induced hypoglycemia in normal men	The diurnal variation in the response of plasma prolactin cortisol and the growth hormone to insulin caused hypoglycemia in normal men.
6	role of glucagon catecholamines and growth hormone in human glucose counterregulation effects of somatostatin and combined alpha and beta adrenergic blockade on plasma glucose recovery and glucose flux rates after insulin induced hypoglycemia	The role of catecholamine glucagon and growth hormone in the effects of human glucose regulation by somatostatin and combined alpha- and beta-adrenergic receptor blockade on plasma glucose recovery and glucose flux rates after apo; insulin-induced hypoglycaemia.
6	glucagon secretion in subjects with prediabetes diabetes mellitus and obesity	Glucagon secretion in subjects with pre-diabetic diabetes mellitus and obesity.
6	normal growth despite abnormalities of growth hormone secretion in children treated for acute leukemia	Normal growth despite abnormalities in growth hormone secretion in children treated for acute leukemia.
6	selective total removal of a growth hormone secreting adenoma evidence that acromegaly is a primary pituitary disease	Lapos; selective total removal of apos; an adenoma-secreting growth hormone proves that apos; acromegaly is a primary pituitary.
6	increased growth hormone response to dopamine infusion in insulin dependent diabetic subjects indication of possible blood brain barrier abnormality	Increased growth hormone response to dopamine infusion in insulin-dependent diabetic subjects, indication of apos; possible blood barrier abnormality-encephalic.
6	effect of alpha and beta receptor blockaders on the degree of glycemia growth hormone content of blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Effect of alpha and beta receptor blockaders on glycemia growth hormone content of blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	response of insulin glucagon and growth hormone to arginine infusion in patients with chronic renal failure	The response of insulin glucagon and lacid; growth hormone to infusion of arginine in patients with chronic renal insufficiency.
6	combined oral l dopa and propranolol for growth hormone provocation	Combination of oral dopa and propranolol for growth hormone challenge.
6	effect of androgen on growth hormone secretion and growth in boys with short stature	The effect of androgen on growth hormone secretion and growth in small boys.
6	effect of growth hormone on acute glucagon and insulin release	Effect of growth hormone on acute glucagon and dapos release; insulin.
6	failure of naloxone to influence plasma growth hormone prolactin and cortisol secretions induced by insulin hypoglycemia	Naloxone does not affect prolactin and cortisol secretions of the apos; plasma growth hormone induced by apos; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	familial combined hyperlipoproteinemia evidence for a role of growth hormone deficiency in effecting its manifestation	Combined familial hyperlipoproteinemia, evidence of a role of growth hormone deficiency in its manifestation.
6	effect of chlorpromazine on human growth hormone	Effect of chlorpromazine on human growth hormone.
6	involvement of prostaglandins in the inhibition of growth hormone production in cultured pituitary cells by insulin	Involvement of prostaglandins in apo; inhibition of growth hormone production by apo; insulin in cultured pituitary cells.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone ii secretion of lh fsh tsh prolactin and acth	Combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in stunted children treated with l' growth hormone ii secretion of prolactin lh fsh tsh and d' acth.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone i secretion of growth hormone and somatomedin before and after treatment	Combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in stunted children treated with lacid; growth hormone i secretion of lacid; growth hormone and somatomedin before and after treatment.
6	hormone responsiveness of a transplantable rat chondrosarcoma i in vitro effects of growth hormone dependent serum factors and insulin	Hormone reactivity; a transplantable rat chondrosarcoma in vitro effects of serum factors dependent on glucose; growth hormone and insulin.
6	metabolic disorders in myocardial infarction changes in blood serum zinc growth hormone insulin and glucose concentration in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Mysocardial infarction: metabolic disorders, changes in the intestine; insulin and glucose concentration in the intestine; serum zinc growth hormone in patients with diabetes; acute myocardial infarction.
6	phe4 somatostatin a potent selective inhibitor of growth hormone release	Somatostatin phe4 is a potent selective inhibitor of growth hormone release.
6	human growth hormone hgh stimulation tests the sequential exercise and l dopa procedure	Human growth hormone hGH stimulation tests the sequential exercise and dopa procedure.
6	serum glucocorticoids growth hormone and insulin and plasma glucose in bulls given prostaglandin e2 or f2 alpha 1	Glucocorticoid serum growth hormone, insulin and plasma glucose in bulls fed prostaglandin e2 or f2 alpha 1 are not known.
6	effects of acetylsalicylic acid on blood glucose plasma ffa glycerol 3 hydroxybutyrate alanine c peptide glucagon and growth hormone responses to arginine in insulin dependent diabetics	Effects of lacid; acetylsalicylic acid on plasma blood glucose ffa glycerol 3 hydroxybutyrate alanine c peptide glucagon and the responses of lacid; growth hormone; arginine in insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disturbed alpha adrenergic modulation of insulin and growth hormone secretion in chronic alcoholics	Disturbed alpha adrenergic modulation of insulin and d&apos secretion; growth hormone in chronic alcoholics.
6	unchanged arginine induced stimulation of insulin glucagon growth hormone and prolactin after pretreatment with indomethacin in normal man	Unchanged arginine induced stimulation of apos; glucagon insulin, growth hormone and prolactin after pretreatment with apos; indomethacin in apos; normal man.
6	purification and characterization of multiplication stimulating activity insulin like growth factors purified from rat liver cell conditioned medium	The purification and characterization of apos; stimulatory activity for the multiplication of apos; insulin as growth factors purified from the conditioned medium of rat liver cells.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters with hippocampal transections	Increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters that have undergone transection.
6	blunted prolactin response to hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disease and in subjects receiving estrogen	Mitigated the prolactin response to apos; hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic hypophysis and estrogen.
6	somatomedin like activity prolactin growth hormone and insulin in human cord blood	Somatomedin as prolactin growth hormone and insulin in human umbilical cord blood.
6	influence of acetylsalicylic acid on plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels following tolbutamide stimulation in man	L' acetylsalicylic acid affects plasma levels of insulin glucagon and d' growth hormone following tolbutamide stimulation in men.
6	the effect of three days of blood glucose normalization by means of an artificial endocrine pancreas on the concentrations of growth hormone glucagon and cortisol in juvenile diabetics	The effect of three days of blood glucose normalization using apos; an artificial endocrine pancreas on the concentrations of glucagon growth hormone and cortisol in juvenile diabetics.
6	the role of growth hormone in the glucose intolerance of uremia	The role of growth hormone in glucose intolerance; uremia.
6	cohn fraction vi enhances the growth stimulating effect of multiplication stimulating activity msa on chick embryo fibroblasts in culture	The fraction cohn vi increases in size; stimulates the growth of plants; multiplication activity msa on cultured chicken fibroblasts; chick embryos.
6	metoclopramide stimulation a test of growth hormone reserve in adolescent males	Metoclopramide stimulates a test of the reserve of the growth hormone in male adolescents.
6	diurnal profiles of serum insulin c peptide and blood intermediary metabolites in insulin treated diabetics their relationship to the control of diabetes and the role of endogenous insulin secretion	The diurnal patterns of serum insulin c peptide and blood intermediates in diabetics treated with insulin are related to the control of diabetes and the role of insulin secretion.
6	bromocriptine acute effect on insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels in acromegalic patients	Acute effect of bromocriptine on levels of insulin glucagon and growth hormone in acromegalic patients.
6	effect of the somatostatin analog d trp8 d cys14 on glucose insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone plasma levels in acromegalics and mild diabetics	Effect of apos; somatostatin analogue d trp8 d cys14 on glucose, insulin, pancreatic glucagon and plasma levels of apos; growth hormone in acromegalics and mild diabetics.
6	induction of tyrosine aminotransferase and amino acid transport in rat hepatoma cells by insulin and the insulin like growth factor multiplication stimulating activity mediation by insulin and multiplication stimulating activity receptors	Induction of tyrosine aminotransferase and of the transport of amino acids; rat hepatoma by insulin and lacid; insulin such as multiplication of the growth-promoting factor; activity mediated by insulin; insulin and its stimulating multiplication; stimulatory receptor activity by insulin.
6	roles of prolactin growth hormone insulin and thyroxine in steroid induced lactation in goats	The roles of prolactin growth hormone insulin and thyroxine in steroids induce lactation in goats.
6	somatomedin activity and growth hormone secretion i changes related to body weight in anorexia nervosa	Somametic activity and secretion of apos; growth hormone i changes in body weight in apos; nerve anorexia.
6	influence of the insulin to growth hormone ratio on body composition of mice	Influence of insulin/growth hormone ratio on body composition of mice.
6	endocrine control of energy metabolism in the cow the effect on milk yield and levels of some blood constituents of injecting growth hormone and growth hormone fragments	Endocrine control of energy metabolism in cows; effect on milk yield and levels of certain blood components; growth hormone; injection and bone fragments; growth hormone.
6	evaluation of twenty four hour secretory patterns of growth hormone and insulin in patients with myotonic dystrophy	Evaluation of secretion of growth hormone and insulin for 24 hours in patients with myotonic dystrophy.
6	persistent defect in regulation of prolactin secretion after successful pituitary tumor removal in women with the galactorrhea amenorrhea syndrome	Persistent abnormality in the regulation of prolactin secretion after apos; successful removal of apos; pituitary tumour in women with apos syndrome; amenorrhea.
6	vagal function in relation to gastro oesophageal reflux and associated motility changes	Vagal function in relation to gastro reflux-esophageal and associated motility changes.
6	growth hormone and insulin binding to isolated hepatocytes in the genetically dwarf mouse	Growth hormone and insulin bind to isolated hepatocytes in the genetically dwarf mouse.
6	effect of ouabain on the lactogenic action of prolactin and on the level of mammary prolactin receptors	Effect of etapos; ouabain on the lactogenic action of prolactin and on the level of prolactin breast receptors.
6	glucose tolerance growth hormone and somatomedin levels in osteosarcoma patients	Somatomedin and dapos levels; glucose-tolerant growth hormone in osteosarcoma patients.
6	the influence of supervision and endogenous insulin secretion on the course of insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	L' influence of supervision and secretion of insulin; endogenous insulin on insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin permits parathyroid hormone stimulation of 1 25 dihydroxyvitamin d3 production in cultured kidney cells	The production of 125 dihydroxyvitamin d3 in cultured kidney cells is stimulated by the parathyroid hormone insulin.
6	effects of exogenous insulin glucagon and somatostatin on islet hormone secretion in the perfused chicken pancreas	Effects of exogenous insulin glucagon and somatostatin on islet hormone secretion in the perfused chicken pancreas.
6	effect of hydrocortisone on acth growth hormone insulin and glucose in the blood of bilaterally adrenalectomized patients	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone on insulin and glucose; acthic growth hormone in the blood of bilaterally adrenalectomized patients.
6	plasma somatomedins endogenous insulin secretion and growth in transient neonatal diabetes mellitus	Plasma Somatomedins secretion of endogenous insulin and growth in transient neonatal diabetes mellitus.
6	prolactin growth hormone thyrotropin 3 5 3 triiodothyronine and thyroxine responses to exercise after fat and carbohydrate enriched diet	Thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone 3 triiodothyronine and thyroxine reacts to apos; exercise after a diet enriched in fat and carbohydrate.
6	integrated concentration of growth hormone in juvenile onset diabetes	Integrated concentration of diabetes; growth hormone in juvenile diabetes.
6	the influence of bromocriptine on serum levels of growth hormone and other pituitary hormones and its metabolic effects in active acromegaly	Lapos; influence of bromocriptine on serum levels of growth hormone and dapos; other pituitary hormones and their metabolic effects in active acromegaly.
7	a study of inflation of the lungs of the newborn a preliminary report	A study of l' inflation of the lungs of the new-born a preliminary report.
7	x ray survey results and costs a health officer s viewpoint a preliminary report	X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X A preliminary report for a Medical Officer of Health.
7	mechanism of production of pulmonary lesions in mice by newcastle disease virus ndv	Mechanisms of production of lung lesions in mice by Newcastle disease virus ndv.
7	indications for pulmonary resection in infants and children	Indications of resection in infants and children.
7	newer concepts of anatomy of the lungs advantages to surgeons internists bronchoscopist and radiologists	New concepts of the pulmonary anatomy benefit international bronchoscopic and radiological surgeons.
7	antibiotic therapy of abscess of the lung and bronchiectasis	Antibiotic therapy of the apos; pulmonary abscess and bronchiectasis.
7	the management abscess of the lung	Lapses; control abscess of the lung.
7	conservation of tissue and function in pulmonary resection the technique of the anatomical separation of segments	Conservation of tissues and function in the lung resection technique of the anatomical separation of segments.
7	formation of non infectious influenza virus in mouse lungs its dependence upon extensive pulmonary consolidation initiated by the viral inoculum	The formation of noninfectious influenza virus in mouse lungs depends on lung consolidation initiated by the viral inoculum.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung some remarks regarding the fine structure of the alveolar basement membrane	L' ultrastructure of the mouse lung some remarks concerning the fine structure of the alveolar basement membrane.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung general architecture of capillary and alveolar walls	L' ultrastructure of apos; general architecture of capillary and alveolar walls of mouse lung.
7	partial pressure of ammonia in alveolar air	It is not possible to determine the concentration of ammonia in the air.
7	ammonia excretion by mammalian lung	L' d&apos excretion; ammonia excretion from mammalian lungs.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung the alveolar macrophage	L' ultrastructure of mouse lung alveolar macrophage.
7	oxygen consumption of tissues in the human lung	Consumption of apos; oxygen from tissues in the human lungs.
7	pulmonary nodular granulomatosis caused by inhaled vegetable particles	Pulmonary nodular granulomatosis caused by lysis; inhalation of plant particles.
7	effect of dopamine on the isolated perfused lung lobes of the dog	Effect of dopamine on the isolated perfused lung lobes of the dog.
7	alveolar epithelial cell mitochondria as source of the surface active lung lining	Alveolar epithelial cell mitochondria originate from the active surface of the lung wall.
7	architecture of the human lung use of quantitative methods establishes fundamental relations between size and number of lung structures	Lapos architecture; use of quantitative methods for lung studies; human lung studies establish fundamental relationships between size and number of lung structures.
7	antibiotic control of tissue reactions in dogs vaccinated with viable cells of coccidioides immitis	Antibiotherapy of tissue reactions in dogs vaccinated with viable cells of coccidioides immitis.
7	clearance of bacteria by the lower respiratory tract	The use of the lower respiratory tract for the clearance of bacteria.
7	detection and quantitation of fallout particles in a human lung	Detection and quantification of fallout particles in a human lung particle.
7	brige formation and cytoplasmic flow between phagocytic cells	Flange formation and cytoplasmic flow between phagocyte cells.
7	the coefficient of thermal conductivity of blood and of various tissues	Coefficient of thermal conductivity of blood and various tissues.
7	laminated membrane surface and osmiophilic inclusions in avian lung epithelium	Laminated membrane surface and osmiophilic inclusions in avian lung epithelium.
7	the role of the alveolar macrophage in the clearance of bacteria from the lung	The role of the alveolar macrophages in the removal of the bacteria from the lungs.
7	therapy of chlorpromazine melanosis a preliminary report	Treatment of chlorpromazine melanosis, preliminary report.
7	anatomoclinical study of pulmonary embolism in patients with or without pulmonary infarction	Anatomoclinic study of apos; pulmonary embolism in patients with or without pulmonary infarction.
7	fatty acid synthesis by subcellular fractions of lung tissue	Fatty acid synthesis by subcellular fractions of lung tissue.
7	pulmonary alveolar cell inclusions their development in the rat	Pulmonary alveolar cell inclusions are developed in the rat.
7	granular pneumocytes electron microscopic evidence of their exocrinic function	Granular pneumocytes, electron microscopic evidence of their exocrine function.
7	bronchoconstrictor action and antagonism of a slow reacting substance from anaphylaxis of guinea pig isolated lung	Bronchoconstrictor action and antagonism of a slow-reacting substance from the apos; anaphylaxis of isolated guinea pig lungs.
7	distribution of polonium 210 in pulmonary tissues of cigarette smokers	Pulmonary tissue distribution of polonium 210 in cigarette smokers.
7	a comparison of the specificity of inhibition by phosphonate esters of the first component of complement and the antigen induced release of histamine from guinea pig lung	A comparison of the specificity of the phosphonate esters of the first component of the complement and the antigen induced the release of apos; histamine from the guinea pig lung.
7	nonspecific factors in resistance of mice to experimental tuberculosis	Non-specific factors for resistance of mice to experimental TB.
7	submaxillary gland of mouse effects of a fraction on tissues of mesodermal origin in vitro	Effects of a fraction of the mouse gland on hair tissue; mesodermal origin in vitro.
7	a morphometric study on the thickness of the pulmonary air blood barrier	A morphometric study on the thickness of the pulmonary blood barrier of air.
7	lung surfactants counterions and hysteresis	Against-ions and lung surfactants hysteresis.
7	fatty change of the granular pneumocyte	Fat change in the granular pneumocyte.
7	mechanisms of immunologic injury of rat peritoneal mast cells i the effect of phosphonate inhibitors on the homocytotropic antibody mediated histamine release and the first component of rat complement	Mechanisms of immunological injury in rat peritoneal mast cells; effect of phosphonate inhibitors on apos; homocytotropic antibody mediated histamine release and the first component of rat complement.
7	enhanced growth of human embryonic cells infected with adenovirus 12	Increased growth of human embryonic cells infected with adenovirus 12.
7	growth of myxovirus parainfluenza type 3 in organ cultures of guinea pig tissue	Growth of myxovirus parainfluenza type 3 in guinea pig tissue organ cultures.
7	rapid quantitative measurement of lung tissue phospholipids	A rapid quantitative measurement of lung tissue phospholipids.
7	studies of lung metabolism i isolation and properties of subcellular fractions from rabbit lung	Pulmonary metabolism i isolation and properties of subcellular fractions of rabbit lung.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and mycoplasma pulmonis for the lungs of conventional and gnotobiotic mice	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and mycoplasma pulmonis in the lungs of conventional and gnotobiotic mice.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice ii localization of mycoplasma pulmonis in the lungs of infected gnotobiotic mice by electron microscopy	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic mice ii Localization of pulmonary mycoplasma in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice infected by electron microscopy.
7	factors influencing protection against experimental tuberculosis in mice by heat stable cell wall vaccines	Influence protection against experimental tuberculosis in mice with cell wall heat-stable vaccines.
7	studies on cytotropism in animal viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in epithelial like and fibroblastic cells derived from chick embryo lung	Studies on cytotropism in animal viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in similar epithelial cells and fibroblastic cells derived from lung chickens.
7	antibodies involved in antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a in the guinea pig and rat	The antibodies involved in the antigen induced release of the slow reaction substance from rat and guinea pig anaphylaxis.
7	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase activity in experimental tuberculosis	L' nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase activity in experimental tuberculosis.
7	lung tissue resistance in diffuse interstitial pulmonary fibrosis	Pulmonary tissue resistance in interstitial pulmonary fibrosis diffused.
7	standardization of cardiopulmonary roentgenograms in infants and children	Standardization of cardiopulmonary roentgenograms in infants and children.
7	strain of mycoplasma associated with human reproductive failure	The strain of mycoplasma associated with human reproductive failure.
7	release of kallikrein from guinea pig lung during anaphylaxis	Release of kallikrein from guinea pig lung during anaphylaxis.
7	the protein coating of asbestos bodies	The protein coating of asbestos bodies.
7	further studies of the mechanism of passive sensitization	D' other studies of the mechanism of passive sensitization were carried out.
7	experimental transmission of a murine microsporidian in swiss mice	An experimental transmission of a murine microsporidomy in Swiss mice.
7	the effects of ventilation of dogs with different gas mixtures on airway calibre and lung mechanics	Effects of ventilation on dogs with different gas mixtures on airway calibre and lung mechanics.
7	simulation of respiratory mechanics	This is a simulation of respiratory mechanics.
7	correlations of mechanical stability morphology pulmonary surfactant and phospholipid content in the developing lamb lung	Comparison of the pulmonary surfactant and phospholipid content in the developmental lamb.
7	study of the use of lincomycin aerosols in dogs	Study of apos; use of lincomycin aerosols in dogs.
7	the application of starling s law of capillary exchange to the lungs	Law enforcement; capillary exchange to the lungs of the lung; starling.
7	lead 210 and polonium 210 in tissues of cigarette smokers	Lead 210 and polonium 210 in the tissues of cigarette smokers.
7	patterns of anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Anomalous pulmonary venous drainage patterns, please.
7	the ultrastructural basis of alveolar capillary membrane permeability to peroxidase used as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of alveolar capillary permeability to peroxidase was used as a tracer.
7	surface tension metabolic activity and lipid composition of alveolar cells in washings from normal dog lungs and after pulmonary artery ligation importance of a highly surface active acellular layer	Cell surface tension metabolic activity and lipid composition of alveolar cells in normal dog lung lavages and after ligation of l' major pulmonary artery d' highly active acellular surface layer.
7	polonium 210 removal from smoke by resin filters	Polonium 210 removal from smoke by resin filters.
7	effect of pulmonary blood flow upon lung mechanics	The effect of pulmonary blood flow on pulmonary mechanics.
7	lipoperoxidation of lung lipids in rats exposed to nitrogen dioxide	Lipoperoxidation of lung lipids in rats exposed to nitrogen dioxide.
7	the reflex effects of alterations in lung volume on systemic vascular resistance in the dog	The reflex effects of alterations in lung volume on systemic vascular resistance in dogs.
7	frequency dependence of flow resistance in patients with obstructive lung disease	Frequency dependence of flow resistance in patients with obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	chemodectoma of lung	Uh, pulmonary chemodectoma.
7	histopathology of fatal adenovirus infection of the respiratory tract in young children	Lapos; histopathology of apo; fatal respiratory tract infection; adenovirus in young children.
7	asbestos bodies in lungs at necropsy	Body d' asbestos in lungs at necropsia.
7	metabolism of lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline by homogenates of rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes and alveolar macrophages	Metabolism of lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline by homogenates of rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes and alveolar macrophages.
7	vascular lesions of dirofilaria immitis in the red fox	Vascular lesion of the dirofilary in the red fox.
7	the response of foetal sheep and lambs to pulmonary inflation	The response of fetal sheep and lambs to lung inflation.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction in asphyxia during cross circulation between twin foetal lambs	Pulmonary vasoconstriction in asphyxia during the cross circulation between the fetal twin lambs.
7	effects of gestation and prenatal asphyxia on pulmonary surface properties of the foetal rabbit	Effects of pregnancy and prenatal asphyxiation on pulmonary surface properties of the rabbit fetus.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction and changes in heart rate during asphyxia in immature foetal lambs	Pulmonary vasoconstriction and changes in heart rate during asphyxiation in immature fetal lambs.
7	development of fine structural damage to alveolar and capillary lining cells in oxygen poisoned rat lungs	The development of fine structural damage to alveolar and capillary cells in oxygen-poisoned rat lungs.
7	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl choline during prenatal development of the rat lung	The biosynthesis of phosphatidyl choline during prenatal development of the rat lung.
7	the fate of 7 14c methylguanine after administration to the rat	The fate of the methylguanine 7-14c after administration to the rat.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice after multiple intranasal inoculations of broth cultures of mycoplasma pneumoniae	Pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice after multiple intranasal inoculations of mycoplasma pneumoniae broth cultures.
7	longitudinal distribution of vascular resistance in the pulmonary arteries capillaries and veins	Longitudinal distribution of vascular resistance in the pulmonary artery capillaries and veins.
7	differential reactivity in the pulmonary circulation	It's called differential reactivity in the pulmonary circulation.
7	production of interferon in mice effect of altered gaseous environments	The production of interferon in mice results from altered gaseous environments.
7	phagocytosis of inhaled plutonium oxide 239pu particles by pulmonary macrophages	Phagocytosis of dapos particles; inhaled plutonium oxide 239pu by lung macrophages.
7	pulmonary venous vasculature in neonatal hyaline membrane disease	Pulmonary venous vasculature in neonatal hyaline membrane disease.
7	autoimmune glomerulonephritis induced in sheep by injections of human lung and freund s adjuvant	Glomerulonephritis auto-immune induced in sheep by injections of d' adjuvant Freund and human lung.
7	further studies on the histidine histamine relationship in vivo effects of endotoxin and of histidine decarboxylase inhibitors	D' other studies on histidine histamine in vivo effects of endotoxin and inhibitors; histidine decarboxylase.
7	pathogenicity and neurological effects of oidiodendron kalrai for mice	Pathogenicity and neurological effects of oidiodendron kalrai in mice.
7	acute granulomatous response produced in mice by trehalose 6 6 dimycolate	Acute granulomatous response produced in mice by trehalose 6 dimycolate 6 dimycolate.
7	immunopathology of lymphocytic choriomeningitis viurs infection of newborn mice antithymocyte serum effects on glomerulonephritis and wasting disease	Immunopathology of lymphocytic choriingitis virus infection of newborn thymocyte serum effects on glomerulonephritis and wasting disease.
7	goblet cell increase in rat bronchial epithelium after exposure to cigarette and cigar tobacco smoke	Caliciform cells of the apos increased; rat bronchial epithelium after exposure to cigarette and cigar smoke.
7	correlation between lung asbestos count at necropsy and radiological appearances	Correlation between lung asbestos count at time of apo; autopsy and radiological appearance.
7	growth and intracellular development of a new respiratory virus	Growth and intracellular development of a new respiratory virus.
7	morphogenesis of avian infectious bronchitis virus and a related human virus strain 229e	Morphogenesis of avian infectious bronchitis virus and a related strain of human virus 229.
7	thymidine kinase from normal simian virus 40 transformed and simian virus 40 lytically infected cells	Thymidine kinase from normal simian virus 40 transformed and simian virus 40 lytically infected cells.
7	new assay procedure for separation of mycoplasmas from virus pools and tissue culture systems	New method for the separation of mycoplasmas from viral pools and tissue culture systems.
7	morphological and lipid analysis of the alveolar lining material in dog lung	Morphological and lipid analysis of the alveolar coating material in dog lungs.
7	blow of the pilot whale	Blow from the whale pilot.
7	enzymes of the lung i detection of esterase with a new cytochemical method	Lung enzymes can detect apos; esterase; a new cytochemical method can be used.
7	characteristics and lipid requirements of coagulant proteins extracted from lung and brain the specifity of protein component of tissue factor	Lipid characteristics and requirements of coagulant proteins extracted from the lung and brain tissue, specificity of the protein component of tissue factor.
7	role of pasteurella pneumotropica and mycoplasma pulmonis in murine pneumonia	The role of pasteurella pneumotropica and mycoplasma pulmonis in murine pneumonia.
7	fluorescent cell counting as an assay method for respiratory syncytial virus	Fluorescent cell counting as a method of detection; respiratory syncytial virus analysis.
7	frequency dependence of compliance as a test for obstruction in the small airways	Compliance is subject to frequency as a test for obstruction in the small airways.
7	maximum expiratory flow rates in induced bronchoconstriction in man	Maximum expiratory flow rate in induced bronchoconstriction in men.
7	detection of allergy to penicillin and other antigens by in vitro passive sensitization and histamine release from human and monkey lung	Antigen detection; allergy to penicillin and dapos; other antigens by in vitro passive sensitization and release of dapos; and histamine in human and monkey lungs.
7	the determination of total body exchangeable o2 stores	Determination of total exchangeable reserve mass of oxygen.
7	paraquat poisoning lung transplantation	The paraquat is poisoning the lung transplant.
7	cytomegalic inclusion disease in the adult	Cervical cancer; cytomegalic inclusion in the adult.
7	alveolar macrophages reduced number in rats after prolonged inhalation of lead sesquioxide	Alveolar macrophages decreased in number in rats after prolonged inhalation of lead sesquioxide.
7	experimental carcinogenesis of the lung ii influence of phenols in the production of carcinoma	Experimental carcinogenesis of the lung ii influences phenols in the production of carcinomas.
7	receptors sensitive to carbon dioxide in lungs of chicken	Receptors sensitive to carbon dioxide in chicken lungs.
7	experimental adenovirus infection in calves	Experimental adenovirus infection in calves.
7	enhanced virus transformation of hamster embryo cells in vitro	Increased viral transformation of hamster embryonic cells in vitro.
7	elastic properties of the centrilobular emphysematous space	Elastic properties of the epos; centrilobular emphysema.
7	the resistance of collateral channels in excised human lungs	The resistance of collateral channels in excised human lungs.
7	reflex cardiovascular depression produced by stimulation of pulmonary stretch receptors in the dog	Cardiovascular depression reflex caused by stimulation of the d&apos receptors; pulmonary stretch in the dog.
7	ventilatory mechanics and expiratory flow limitation during exercise in normal subjects	Ventilatory mechanisms and expiratory flow limitation during exercise in normal subjects.
7	mitotic and nonmitotic multiple layered perfusion cultures	Mitotic and not-mitotic cultures of multiple layers perfusion.
7	cardiovascular responses in apnoeic asphyxia role of arterial chemoreceptors and the modification of their effects by a pulmonary vagal inflation reflex	Cardiovascular responses in the role of apneic asphyxia of arterial chemoreceptors and modification of their effects by a pulmonary vagal inflation reflex.
7	traube hering waves in the pulmonary circulation of the dog	Traube hering waves in the pulmonary circulation of the dog.
7	effects of nitrogen dioxide on pulmonary cell population	Effects of nitrogen dioxide on the lung cell population.
7	the activity of lung irritant receptors during pneumothorax hyperpnoea and pulmonary vascular congestion	Apo receptor activity; lung irritants during apo; pneumothorax hyperpnea and pulmonary vascular congestion.
7	reaction of urethane with nucleic acids in vivo	Reaction of urethane with nucleic acids in vivo.
7	morphogenetic aspects of multilayering in petri dish cultures of human fetal lung fibroblasts	Morphogenetic aspects of multilayer in petri dish cultures of human fetal lung fibroblasts.
7	cell killing by actinomycin d in relation to the growth cycle of chinese hamster cells	Cell destruction by actinomycin d in relation to the growth cycle of Chinese hamster cells.
7	natural resolution of air sac lesions caused by mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys	Natural resolution of air bag lesions caused by mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys.
7	pneumonic pasteurellosis of cattle microbiology and immunology	Pneumonic pasteurella of microbiology and cattle immunology.
7	a study of bovine virus diarrhea mucosal disease virus by plaque technique	A study of bovine diarrhea mucosal disease virus by technical plaque.
7	effects of beta adrenergic receptor blockade on airway conductance and lung volume in normal and asthmatic subjects	Effects of beta-adrenergic receptor blockade on respiratory conductance and lung volume in normal and asthmatic subjects.
7	pulmonary complications of oxygen therapy	Pulmonary complications of oxygen therapy.
7	in vivo inactivation of lysozyme by ozone	In vivo inactivation of lysozyme by ozone.
7	effect of long term administration of ay 9944 an inhibitor of 7 dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase on serum and tissue lipids in the rat	Effect of dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase on serum and tissue lipids of rats; long-term administration of a dehydrocholesterol inhibitor, 9944.
7	role of the kidney in staphylococcal enterotoxemia	Role of the kidney in staphylococcal enterotoxemia.
7	immunofluorescence identification of thermopolyspora polyspora the causative agent of farmer s lung	Immunofluorescence identification of the thermopolyspora polyspora, the causative agent of the lung of the farmer.
7	elimination of sodium 24 and potassium 42 interferences in activation analysis of biological samples	Elimination of interference by sodium 24 and potassium 42 in biological samples.
7	the effect of vagotomy vagal cooling and efferent vagal stimulation on breathing and lung mechanics of rabbits	The effect of vagotomy cooling and efferent vagal stimulation on the breathing and lung mechanics of rabbits.
7	the role of the vagus nerves in the respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous histamine and phenyl diguanide in rabbits	The role of the vagus nerves in the respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous histamine and phenyl diguanide in rabbits.
7	pathological changes in virus infections of the lower respiratory tract in children	Pathological changes in viral infections of the lower respiratory tract in children.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine a cytospecific growth stimulator of cultured fibroblasts	Five hydroxytryptamine, a cytospecific growth promoter of cultured fibroblasts.
7	changes in blood gas tensions and functional residual capacity chronic asthmatics treated with disodium cromoglycate	Changes in blood gas tensions and functional residual capacity in chronic asthmatics treated with disodium cromoglycate.
7	characterization of human anti glomerular basement membrane antibodies eluted from glomerulonephritic kidneys	Characterization of anti-glomerular human basement membrane antibodies eluted from glomerulonephritic kidneys.
7	pulsatile uptake of co in the human lung	The pulsatile uptake of co in the human lung.
7	elimination of toxicity from polyvinyl trays after sterilization with ethylene oxide	Elimination of toxicity from polyvinyl trays after ethylene oxide sputum sterilization.
7	adaptation of a roller tube apparatus to accommodate cultivation of cells in roller bottles	Tailoring a roller tube apparatus to allow the cultivation of cells in a roller bottle.
7	evidence for excision of ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimers from the dna of human cells in vitro	L' excision of pyrimidine dimers induced by apos; ultraviolet has been revealed in the apos; DNA of human cells in vitro.
7	a microsurgical methodology for human cells in vitro evolution and applications	A microsurgical methodology for human cell evolution and applications in vitro.
7	mechanisms of histamine release by compound 48 80	The mechanisms of release of histamine by compound 48 are described below.
7	cell surface coatings and membrane potentials of malignant and nonmalignant cells	Cell surface coatings and membrane potentials of malignant and nonmalignant cells.
7	pulmonary surfactant and evolution of the lungs	Pulmonary surfactant and evolution of the lungs.
7	permeability of lung capillaries to macromolecules in foetal and new born lambs and sheep	The permeability of the pulmonary capillaries to macromolecules in newly born lambs and sheep.
7	x ray sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells irradiated during hypoxia	X radiation sensitivity of synchronized Chinese hamster cells irradiated during hypoxia.
7	growth of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in human diploid cell strain wi 38	Apos virus growth; Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis in human diploid cell line wi.
7	cholelithiasis in singapore i a necropsy study	Cholelithiasis in singapore i a necropsy study.
7	emphysema in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Emphysema in Anthrax workers pneumoconiosis pneumoconiosis.
7	granuloma formation induced in mice by chemically defined mycobacterial fractions	Granuloma formation induced in mice by chemically defined mycobacterial fractions.
7	alterations in the mechanical properties of the lung during dyspnea in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	Changes in the mechanical properties of the lung during dyspnea in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	acute effects of inhaled isoproterenol on the mechanical characteristics of the lungs in normal man	Acute effects of inhaled isoproterenol on the mechanical characteristics of the lungs in normal men.
7	house dust mite asthma results of challenge tests on five criteria with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus	Asthma caused by house dust mites, dermatophagoides pteronyssinus challenge test results on five criteria.
7	serum reagins and leucocyte response in patients with house dust mite allergy	Serum reagins and leukocyte response in patients with house dust mite allergies.
7	the effect of isoproterenol on airway obstruction in cystic fibrosis	Effects of apo; isoproterenol on apo; airway obstruction in cystic fibrosis.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus i conversion from polio sensitivity to polio resistance accompanying loss of human gene dependent polio receptors	Human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus i conversion of polio susceptibility to polio resistance accompanying loss of human gene-dependent polio receptors.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to polio virus ii polio sensitivity and the chromosome constitution of the hybrids	Human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus ii Polio sensitivity and the chromosome constitution of the hybrids.
7	adsorption of foot and mouth disease virus by muscle kidney lung and brain from infant and adult mice	Adsorption of the FMD virus by the muscle lung and brain of the mouse kidney again-born and adult.
7	replication of repetitious dna and the s period	Reproduction of DNA; repetitive and period s DNA.
7	capsid mosaics of intermediate strains of human adenoviruses	Capsidal mosaics of intermediate strains of human adenoviruses.
7	bronchograms and tracheograms of seals under pressure	Bronchograms and tracheograms of seals under pressure.
7	pulmonary absorption and retention of kanamycin after repeated inhalation administration of kanamycin aerosol	Dosage; pulmonary absorption and retention of kanamycin after dosing; repeated inhalation administration of kanamycin.
7	chikungunya virus infection of cell monolayers by cell to cell and extracellular transmission	Chikungunya virus infection of cell monolayers by intercellular and extracellular transmission.
7	relative sensitivities of viruses to different species of interferon	Relative sensitivity of viruses to different species of interferon.
7	desmosterol as the major sterol in l cell mouse fibroblasts grown in sterol free culture medium	Desmosterol is the major sterol in mouse cell fibroblasts grown in sterol-free culture media.
7	separation by gel chromatography of naturally occurring phosphatidylcholine mixtures according to number of ethylenic linkages	Separation by gel chromatography of natural phosphatidylcholine mixtures according to the number of ethylene bonds.
7	direct assessment of viral aerosols on cell cultures	Direct evaluation of viral aerosols on cell cultures.
7	congenital absence of the pulmonary valve	Congenital absence of the pulmonary valve.
7	enhancement of inflammation and histamine formation by actinomycin d	Stimulation of inflammation and formation of apos; histamine by apos; actinomycin d.
7	histamine formation in rat gastric mucosa and lung after injecting reserpine or adrenaline	The formation of histamine in the rat gastric mucosa and lungs after dosage; reserpine or d&apos injection; adrenaline.
7	comparison of transformation and t antigen induction in human cell lines	Comparison of transformation and induction of t-antigen in human cell lines.
7	detection of postoperative bronchopleural fistulas by radionuclide fog inhalation	Detection of post-operative bronchopleural fistulas by radionuclide fog inhalation.
7	acromegalic pneumonomegaly lung growth in the adult	Amegal pneumonome, pulmonary growth in the adult.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves i clinical signs	Ascaris suum infection in calves i clinical signs.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves 3 pathology	Ascaris suum infection in calves 3 pathology.
7	gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Immunizations against Venezuelan gamma irradiated equine encephalitis.
7	identification of mineral particles in pneumoconiotic lungs	Identification of mineral particles in pneumoconiotic lungs.
7	shock lung	Uh, shock lung.
7	antibody production in milk serum after virus instillation of goat mammary gland iv experiments with protective properties of specific influenza antibody associated with lactogammaglobulin	Production of antibody in milk serum after viral instillation of goat mammary gland iv experiments with protective properties of specific anti-influenza antibody associated with lactogammaglobulin.
7	studies with the light microscope and electron microscope of lung macrophages in rabbits inoculated with an attenuated stain of mycobacterium microti	Light microscope and electron microscopic studies of lung macrophages from rabbits inoculated with an attenuated staining of microti mycobacteria.
7	effect of poly i c on experimental respiratory infection in hamsters	The effect of poly i c on lung cancer; experimental respiratory infection in hamsters.
7	experience with electron microscopy in the differential diagnosis of smallpox	Experience in electron microscopy in the differential diagnosis of smallpox.
7	comparison of various methods for preparation of viral serological antigens from infected cell cultures	Comparison of various methods for preparation of viral antigens from infected cell cultures.
7	comparison of the pulmonary bactericidal capacity of mice and rats aganist strains of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Comparison of the pulmonary bactericidal capacity of mice and rats of aganist strains of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
7	lipoprotein inhibitor of newcastle disease virus from chicken lung	Newcastle disease virus lipoprotein inhibitor for chicken lung.
7	viral aggregation resulting in the failure to correctly identify an unknown rhinovirus	S' viral aggregation; translates into inability to correctly identify an unknown rhinovirus.
7	relative antiviral resistance induced in homologous and heterologous cells by cross reacting interferons	Relative antiviral resistance was induced in homologous and heterologous cells by interferon cross-reactivity.
7	fatal fat embolism following replacement arthroplasty for transcervical fractures of femur	Lapos; fatal fat embolism following replacement of the apos; transcervical fractures of the femur.
7	a simple sensitive protein binding assay for guanosine 3 5 monophosphate	A simple sensitive protein binding test for guanosine 3-5 monophosphate.
7	viruses as an aid to cancer therapy regression of solid and ascites tumors in rodents after treatment with bovine enterovirus	Viruses as an aid for treatment of cancer is reducing solid and ascending tumours in rodents after treatment with bovine enterovirus.
7	biochemical and cytological evidence for triple hybrid cell line formed from fusion of three different cells	Biochemical and cytological evidence of the formation of a triple hybrid cell line by fusion of three different cells.
7	on the differential cytotoxicity of actinomycin d	On differential cytotoxicity of actinomycin d.
7	mixed function oxidation in tumors	Mixed-function oxidation in the tumors.
7	inhibition of metastatic spread by i c r f 159 selective deletion of a malignant characteristic	Inhibition of metastatic propagation by selective suppression i c r f 159 d' a malignant feature.
7	three size classes of intracellular adenovirus deoxyribonucleic acid	In addition, there are three size classes of d' intracellular deoxyribonucleic acid adenovirus.
7	transformation of murine cells by two slow viruses visna virus and progressive pneumonia virus	Transformation of murine cells by two slow viruses, visna virus and progressive pneumonia virus.
7	priming a nonantiviral function of interferon	Boot d' a non-anti-viral function of Interferon.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats i the natural disease	Respiratory disease in a colony of rats i natural disease.
7	the pulmonary vasopressor response to decreases in blood ph in intact dogs	The pulmonary vasopressor response to decreases in blood ph in intact dogs.
7	factors influencing pulmonary methane excretion in man an indirect method of studying the in situ metabolism of the methane producing colonic bacteria	Factors influencing apo; lung methane excretion in humans, an indirect method; study of in situ metabolism of methane-producing colonic bacteria.
7	an eosinophil leukocyte chemotactic factor of anaphylaxis	A chemotactic factor in eosinophilic leukocyte anaphylaxis.
7	induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes after fusion with interphase cells	Apos induction; nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes after fusion with interphase cells.
7	de novo fatty acid synthesis and elongation of fatty acids by subcellular fractions of lung	De de novo fatty acid synthesis and elongation of fatty acids by subcellular fractions of the lungs.
7	mapping of a human genetic regulator element by somatic cell genetic analysis	Map of apos; a human genetic regulator by somatic cell genetic analysis.
7	ultrastructural analysis of mitotic spindle elongation in mammalian cells in vitro direct microtubule counts	L' ultrastructural analysis of apos; mitotic spindle elongation in mammalian cells in vitro counts microtubules directly.
7	the cellular site of action of angiotensin	The cellular site of action of apos; angiotensin.
7	tuberculous morbidity in swiss albino mice immunized with bcg	Tuberculosis morbidity in Swiss albino mice immunized with bcg vaccine.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine metabolism in sheep	Metabolism 5 hydroxytryptamine in sheep.
7	effect of beta adrenoceptor blocking compounds propranolol practolol and lb 46 on isoprenaline induced changes in regional blood flow in the rat	L' effect of β-adrenoceptor blocking compounds propranolol practolol and lb 46 on isoprenaline induced changes in regional blood flow in the rat.
7	error theory and ageing in human diploid fibroblasts	Apos theory; error and aging of human diploid fibroblasts.
7	gas exchange in renal failure ii pulmonary gas exchange during peritoneal dialysis	Gas exchange during apo; renal failure ii Peritoneal gas exchange during peritoneal dialysis.
7	study of the secular trend in asbestos bodies in lungs in london 1936 66	Study of the secular trend of asbestos bodies in the lungs in London.
7	chromosome pulverization in micronuclei induced by tritiated thymidine	Chromosome sputtering in micronuclei induced by tritiated thymidine.
7	biosynthesis of vasopressin in vitro and ultrastructure of a bronchogenic carcinoma patient with the syndrome of inappropriate secretion of antidiuretic hormone	In vitro vasopressin biosynthesis and ultrastructure of a patient with apo; bronchogenic carcinoma with the syndrome of inappropriate secretion of apo; an antidiuretic hormone.
7	cigarette smoking objective evidence for lung damage in teen agers	Cigarette smoking: objective evidence of lung damage in older teens.
7	isolation characterization and surface chemistry of a surface active fraction from dog lung	Characterization, isolation and surface chemistry of a fraction of active surface from dog lungs.
7	bronchiolitis obliterans bronchiectasis and other sequelae of adenovirus type 21 infection in young children	Infection with adenovirus type 21: bronchiolitis obliterrante bronchiectase and other sequelae in young children.
7	smoking risks of different tobaccos	Smoking of different tobacco products.
7	ultrastructure of the nucleolus during the chinese hamster cell cycle	L' ultrastructure of the nucleolus during the Chinese hamster cell cycle.
7	permeability of lung capillaries and alveoli to non electrolytes in the foetal lamb	Permeability of lung capillaries and alveoli to non-electrolytes in the fetal lamb.
7	mumps virus replication in chick embryo lung cells properties of ribonucleic acids in virions and infected cells	Reproduction of mumps virus in chicken lung cells; properties of ribonucleic acids in virions and infected cells.
7	depression of laryngeal reflexes during keatmine anaesthesia	Decreased laryngeal reflexes during keatmine anesthesia.
7	the pathology of parietal pleural plaques	Pathology of parietal pleural plaques.
7	effects of elastase collagenase and papain on structure and function of rat lungs in vitro	Effects of collagenase elastase and papain on structure and function of rat lungs in vitro.
7	role of plasma lipoproteins in cortisone induced fat embolism	The role of plasma lipoproteins in cortisone induced fat embolism.
7	thyroid hormone influence upon lung surfactant metabolism	Influence of thyroid hormones on lung surfactant metabolism.
7	induced changes in the rates of uridine 3 h uptake and incorporation during the g 1 and s periods of synchronized chinese hamster cells	Changes were induced in the rates of d' absorption and d' and uridine incorporation during the g1 and s periods of synchronized Chinese hamster cells.
7	the role of non myelinated vagal afferent fibres from the lungs in the genesis of tachypnoea in the rabbit	The role of nonmyelinated vagal afferent fibers from the lungs in the genesis of tachypnea in rabbits.
7	template activity of chromatin during stimulation of cellular proliferation in human diploid fibroblasts	L' chromatin matrix activity during stimulation of cell proliferation in human diploid fibroblasts.
7	the effect of high oxygen tensions on the mechanical properties of rat lungs	The effect of high oxygen tensions on the mechanical properties of rat lungs.
7	standardization of human diploid fibroblast cultivation centrifugation procedure	Standardization of human diploid fibroblast culture centrifugation procedure.
7	effect of chlorite oxidized oxyamylose on influenza virus infection in mice	Apos effect; chlorite-oxidized oxyamylosis on apos; influenza virus infection in mice.
7	effect of relative humidity on dynamic aerosols of adenovirus 12	Dosage effects; relative humidity on dynamic aerosol products; adenoviruses.
7	immunity to aerosol challenge in guinea pigs immunized with gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Immunity to apo; administration of aerosol products in guinea pigs immunized with apo vaccines; Venezuelan equine encephalitis gamma-irradiated.
7	synergistic effect of herpes simplex virus and cytosine arabinoside on human chromosomes	The synergistic effect of herpes simplex virus and cytosine arabinoside on human chromosomes.
7	sites of pulmonary vasomotor reactivity in the dog during alveolar hypoxia and serotonin and histamine infusion	Sites of pulmonary vasomotor reactivity in dogs during alveolar hypoxia and serotonin and d' histamine.
7	homologous interference by incomplete sendai virus particles changes in virus specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	L' homologous interference by incomplete sendai virus particles changes virus-specific ribonucleic acid synthesis.
7	delayed hypersensitivity type granuloma formation and dermal reaction induced and elicited by a soluble factor isolated from schistosoma mansoni eggs	Hypersensitivity-like delayed granuloma formation and dermal response were induced and elicited by a soluble factor isolated from schistosoma mansoni eggs.
7	subhuman primate diploid cells possible substrates for production of virus vaccines	Human primate diploid cells-could be used as substrates for the production of antiviral vaccines.
7	three dimensional structure identified from single sections	A three-dimensional structure identified from individual sections.
7	isolation of echoviruses with human embryonic lung fibroblast cells	Ultraviolet echovirus isolation helps human embryonic lung fibroblasts.
7	fatal adenovirus pneumonia in infants correlation of histologic and electron microscopic observations	Correlation between histological and electron microscopic observations of fatal adenovirus pneumonia in infants.
7	neutralizing antibodies to cytomegaloviruses in normal simian and human sera	Neutralizing antibody to cytomegalovirus in normal simian and human sera.
7	inhibition of influenza virus and interferon response intranasally with statolon	Intranasal inhibition of the statolon-mediated response of influenza virus and l'apos.
7	respiratory movements and rapid eye movement sleep in the foetal lamb	Respiratory movements and rapid eye movement sleep in the fetal lamb.
7	inhibition or enhancement of immunological injury of virus infected cells	Inhibition or enhancement of immunological lesion in virus infected cells.
7	antiviral activity of a bis benzimidazole against experimental rhinovirus infections in chimpanzees	Antiviral activity d' a bis benzimidazole against experimental rhinovirus infections in chimpanzees.
7	characterization of the growth of herpes simplex virus in human lymphoid cells	Characterization of growth of herpes simplex virus in human lymphoid cells.
7	propagation and purification of high titer human cytomegalovirus	The spread and purification of human cytomegalovirus infection.
7	morphologic development of fetal rabbit lung and its acceleration with cortisol	Morphological development of the fetal rabbit lung and its acceleration with cortisol.
7	genetics of human mouse somatic cell hybrids linkage of human genes for lactate dehydrogenase a and esterase a 4	Genetics of human mouse somatic cell hybrids binding human lactate dehydrogenase a and l' lactate dehydrogenase a 4 genes.
7	ischaemic enterocolitis an expression of the intravascular coagulation syndrome	Ischemic Enterocolitis, expression of the intravascular clotting syndrome.
7	assignment of three human genes to chromosomes ldh a to 11 tk to 17 and idh to 20 and evidence for translocation between human and mouse chromosomes in somatic cell hybrids thymidine kinase lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 e 17 and f 20 chromosomes	L' assignment of three human genes to ldh a chromosomes at 11 tk at 17 and idh at 20 and l' evidence of a translocation between human and mouse chromosomes in hybrids of somatic thymidine kinase lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 and 17 and f 20 chromosomes.
7	rabies virus in nasal mucosa of naturally infected bats	The rabies virus in the nasal mucosa of naturally infected bats-mice.
7	release of dopamine from bovine lung by specific antigen and by compound 48 80	Release of dopamine from bovine lungs by specific antigen and compound.
7	angiotensin i metabolism by plasma membrane of lung	Apos metabolism; angiotensin i by the plasma membrane of the lung.
7	metabolic control mechanisms in mammalian systems xv studies on the role of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in estrogen action on the uterus	Metabolic control mechanisms in mammalian systems xv studies on the role of l' adenosine 3,5 monophosphate in apos; estrogen action on the apos; uterus.
7	suppression of urethan induced lung adenomas in mice treated with trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor and living bacillus calmette gu rin	The suppression of urethane-induced lung adenomas in mice treated with trehalose 6 dimycolate cord factor and live calm guine bacillus.
7	murine leukemia virus restriction in fused permissive and nonpermissive cells	Limiting murine leukemia virus in fused permeable and nonpermeable cells.
7	induction of prophase in interphase nuclei by fusion with metaphase cells	Induction of prophase in interphase nuclei by fusion with metaphase cells.
7	alteration in cell proliferation in mouse lung following urethane exposure ii effects of chronic exposure on terminal bronchiolar epithelium	Modification of cell proliferation in mouse lung following exposure to urethane; urethaneii effects of chronic exposure to apos; terminal bronchiolar epithelium.
7	ultrastructural changes in the alveolar epithelium in response to freund s adjuvant	Ultrastructural changes in apos; alveolar epithelium in response to freund adjuvant.
7	elevated plasma activity of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme 3 ldh 3 in experimentally induced immunologic lung injury	High plasma activity of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme 3 ldh3 in experimentally induced immunological lung injury.
7	regional lung function in patients with hepatic cirrhosis	Regional lung function in patients with hepatic cirrhosis.
7	effect of cigarette tar upon tissue culture cells neoplastic transformation of hamster lung cells by tobacco tar in tissue culture	Effect of cigarette tar on tissue culture cells Neoplastic transformation of hamster lung cells by tobacco tar in tissue culture.
7	effects of biliary obstruction on pulmonary ultrastructure in the rat	Effects of the apos; biliary obstruction on the apos; pulmonary ultrastructure in the rat.
7	effect of various combinations of antibacterial drugs on enzyme activity in guinea pig tissues	Effect of various combinations of antibacterial drugs on the enzyme activity in guinea pig tissues.
7	study of the nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis using gel filtration	Gel filtration study of the nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis.
7	the protein and lipid composition of arterial elastin and its relationship to lipid accumulation in the atherosclerotic plaque	The protein and lipid composition of the arterial elastin and its relationship to lipid accumulation in the atherosclerotic plate.
7	epidemic listeriosis in the newborn	Epidemic listeriosis in the new-born.
7	the lung in hemorrhagic shock iv the role of neutrophilic polymorphonuclear leukocytes	The lung in hemorrhagic shock iv the role of polymorphonuclear neutrophils leukocytes.
7	intravasation of fat from the bone marrow cavity	Intravasation of fat from the bone marrow cavity.
7	intra and extracellular compartmentalization of the surface active fraction in dog lung	Intra- and extracellular comparison of the active surface fraction in dog lungs.
7	the effect of sendai virus infection on bactericidal and transport mechanisms of the murine lung	The effects of apo; sentin virus infection on bactericidal and transport mechanisms of the murine lung.
7	a virus from epidemic vomiting disease	It's a virus from a vomiting epidemic.
7	nitrosamine induced carcinogenesis the alkylation of n 7 of guanine of nucleic acids of the rat by diethylnitrosamine n ethyl n nitrosourea and ethyl methanesulphonate	Nitrosamine induced the carcinogenesis of the rat nucleic acid guanine n7 alkylation by diethylnitrosamine n ethyl nitrosourea and methanesulfonate d'apos; ethyl.
7	pulmonary aspiration after fibre endoscopy of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Pulmonary aspiration after endoscopy of the gastrointestinal tract fibers-upper intestinal.
7	inhibition of angiotensin i converting enzyme by venom peptides	Apos; inhibition of apos; enzyme conversion of apos; angiotensin i by venom peptides.
7	nonviral microbodies with viral antigenicity produced in cytomegalovirus infected cells	Non-viral microbodies showing viral antigenicity produced in cytomegalovirus infected cells.
7	susceptibility to spontaneous pneumonitis in an inbred strain of beige and satin mice	Pneumopathic pneumonitis in a self-bred strain of beige and satin mice.
7	elimination of mycoplasma contaminants from virus stocks by treatment with nonionic detergents	Elimination of mycoplasmic contaminants from virus stocks by treatment with nonionic detergents.
7	freeze etch studies of the plasma membrane of pulmonary endothelial cells	Freeze and burn studies of the plasma membrane of pulmonary endothelial cells.
7	delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol localization in body fat	The location of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol in body fat.
7	induction of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin synthesis in the fetal lung by corticosteroids	Induction of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin synthesis in the fetal lung by corticosteroids.
7	amniotic fluid lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and fetal lung development	Sphingomyelin ratio-lecithin of amniotic fluid and fetal lung development.
7	collagen substrata for studies on cell behavior	Collagen substrate for cell behavior studies.
7	microculture plaque assay for human and simian cytomegaloviruses	Microculture plate assay for human and simian cytomegaloviruses.
7	early clinical experience with bleomycin in the united kingdom in series of 105 patients	Past clinical experience with bleomycin in the United Kingdom in series of 105 patients.
7	pasteurella haemolytica of cattle serotype production of beta galactosidase and antibacterial sensitivity	Pasteurella haemolytica from serotype production of beta galactosidase and antibacterial susceptibility cattle.
7	effects of ultrasonic nebulization on pulmonary mechanics and blood gases in obstructive pulmonary disease	The effects of ultrasonic nebulization on lung mechanics and blood gases in obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	role of cord factor trehalose 6 6 dimycolate in allergic granuloma formation in rabbits	Role of trehalose 6-6 dimycolate in allergic granuloma formation in rabbits.
7	etiology of chronic pneumonia in rats and a study of the experimental disease in mice	The etiology of chronic pneumonia in rats and the study of experimental disease in mice.
7	chromatid breakage differential effect of inhibitors of dna synthesis during g 2 phase	Differential effect of chromatid breakage of inhibitors of DNA synthesis during phase g 2 of the g phase.
7	fetal renal structure and the genesis of amniotic fluid disorders	Acute fetal renal structure and the genesis of amniotic fluid disorders.
7	virological studies of sudden unexplained infant deaths in glasgow 1967 70	In Glasgow, virological studies of unexplained sudden infant deaths in 1967.
7	lung mechanics and frequency dependence of compliance in coal miners	Pulmonary mechanics and frequency dependence in coal miners.
7	use of pulmonary hydrogen h 2 measurements to quantitate carbohydrate absorption study of partially gastrectomized patients	The use of pulmonary measurements of glucose; hydrogen 2 to quantify glucose; carbohydrate absorption in partially gastrectomized patients.
7	indirect hemagglutination test for varicella zoster infection	Dapos test; indirect hemagglutination test for apos; varicella zoster infection.
7	immunogenicity of egg grown influenza vaccine inhibition by immunization of recipients with host antigen	Immunogenicity of vaccines; inhibition of influenza vaccine produced from eggs; immunization of recipients with host antigen.
7	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice ii decreased virulence of pr8 influenza virus	Respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide-treated mice ii decreased virulence of pr8 influenza virus.
7	hyperoxia influence on lung mechanics and protein synthesis	L' hyperoxia influences lung mechanics and protein synthesis.
7	hyperoxia a stereologic ultrastructural examination of its influence on cytoplasmic components of the pulmonary granular pneumocyte	L' hyperoxia is an ultrastructural stereological examination of its influence on cytoplasmic components of the pulmonary granular pneumocyte.
7	passive protection of mice against intracerebral infections with bordetella pertussis	Passive protection of mice against intracerebral infections with bordetella pertussis.
7	the pulmonary clearance of bacteria by calves and mice	Pulmonary clearance of bacteria by calves and mice.
7	the tissue localization of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos	The tissue localization of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats ii isolation of mycoplasma pulmonis from the natural disease and the experimental disease induced with a cloned culture of this organism	Respiratory disease in a colony of rats ii isolation of the pulmonary mycoplasm from natural and experimental disease induced by cloned culture of this organism.
7	the nature of the toxic reaction of influenza virus towards lung tissue	The nature of the toxic reaction of the flu virus to lung tissue.
7	the influence of the route of immunization on the protection of mice infected intracerebrally with bordetella pertussis	L' influence of the apo pathway; immunization on the protection of the intracerebral pertussis virus infected mice.
7	effect of glucocorticoids on histamine metabolism in mice	Effect of glucocorticoids on metabolism of histamine in mice.
7	sendai virus induced transcriptase from infected cells polypeptides in the transcriptive complex	Sendai virus induces transcriptase from infected cell polypeptides in the transcription complex.
7	the release of spasmogenic substances from human chopped lung tissue and its inhibition	The release of spasmogenic substances from minced human lung tissue and its inhibition.
7	studies of the pulmonary vagal control of central respiratory rhythm in the absence of breathing movements	Studies of the pulmonary vagal control of the central respiratory rhythm in the absence of respiratory movements.
7	the virulence of t mycoplasmas isolated from various animal species assayed by intramammary inoculation in cattle	The virulence of the t-mycoplasmas isolated from various animal species was evaluated by intramammary inoculation in cattle.
7	interferon studies with japanese and u s rubella virus strains	Apos studies; interferon with Japanese and American rubella virus strains.
7	antigen mediated fusion of specifically sensitized rabbit alveolar macrophages	Antigen-mediated fusion of specifically sensitized rabbit alveolar macrophages.
7	membrane dynamics in the action of dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and testosterone on mammalian cells	Membrane dynamics of l' action of dibutyryl adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate and testosterone on mammalian cells.
7	cryptococcus neoformans of unusual morphology	Cryptococcus neoformans d' unusual morphology.
7	appearance in trypsinized normal cells of reactivity with antibody presumably specific for malignant cells	Appearance in normal trypsinized cells of reactivity with an antibody presumably specific for malignant cells.
7	bedside determination of left atrial pressure	Patient bedside determination of left atrial pressure.
7	bubble stability test compared with lecithin assay in prediction of respiratory distress syndrome	The bubble stability test predicts respiratory distress syndrome compared to the lecithin test.
7	effects of histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin on the vascular system of isolated lungs of the guinea pig and the influence of phenylbutazone on these effects	The effects of histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin on the vascular system of the lungs isolated from the guinea pig and the influence of phenylbutazone on these effects.
7	the inactivation of bradykinin in the pulmonary circulation of isolated lungs	L' inactivation of bradykinin in the pulmonary circulation of isolated lungs.
7	a dual action of histamine on guinea pig lung vessels	Double action of l' histamine on guinea pig pulmonary vessels.
7	lipid metabolism by rat lung in vitro utilization of citrate by normal and starved rats	Lipid metabolism in rat lungs, in vitro use of citrate by normal and starving rats.
7	experimental paracoccidioidomycosis in mice	Experimental paracoccidioidomycosis in mice.
7	experimental pneumococcal infection in embryonated eggs previously infected with influenza c virus	An experimental pneumococcal infection in embryo eggs previously infected with influenza c virus.
7	murine resistance to inhaled neisseria meningitidis after infection with an encephalomyocarditis virus	Murine resistance to inhaled neisseria meningitidis after infection with an encephalomyocarditis virus.
7	an outbreak of adenovirus type 7 infection in children in montreal	Outbreak of adenovirus type 7 infection in children in Montreal.
7	adenylate rich sequences in sendai virus transcripts from infected cells	Adenylate-rich sequences are present in sendai virus transcripts from infected cells.
7	the bradykininase activities of extracts of dog lung	L-apos; bradykininase activity of apos; dog lung extracts.
7	dispersal of rabbit lung into individual viable cells a new model for the study of lung metabolism	Rabbit lung dispersion in individual viable cells is a new model for the study of pulmonary metabolism.
7	the fluorescent antibody technique in the diagnosis of equine rhinopneumonitis virus abortion	The fluorescent antibody technique in the diagnosis of equine rhinopneumonitis virus abortion.
7	hypoxic changes in conducting tissue of the heart in sudden death in infancy syndrome	Hypoxic changes in conducting tissue of the heart during onset of sudden death during early childhood syndrome.
7	concentration of herpesviruses	Concentration of the herpesviruses.
7	the experimental production of hyaline membranes in premature rhesus monkeys	The experimental production of hyaline membranes in premature rhesus monkeys.
7	effect of hypersensitivity pneumonitis on the pulmonary defense mechanisms of guinea pig lungs	Effect of hyper-sensitivity on the respiratory defense mechanisms of guinea pig lungs.
7	types of afferent nervous activity which may be measured in the vagus nerve of the sheep foetus	Type of apo; afferent nerve activity that can be measured in the vagus nerve of the sheep fetus.
7	pulmonary fibrosis following therapy with melphalan for multiple myeloma	Fibrosis of the lungs following d'apos; treatment with melphalan for multiple myeloma.
7	pathological findings after right lung transplantation in a patient with fibrosing alveolitis	Effect of fibrosing alveolitis on breast cancer: the American Journal of Public Health.
7	effect of cortisone administration on experimental nocardiosis	Effects of cortisone administration on experimental nocardiosis.
7	ultrastructure of ehrlichia canis	L' ultrastructure of ehrlichia canis.
7	self regulation of growth in three dimensions	Auto-regulation of growth in three dimensions.
7	sudden and unexpected deaths in infants histology and virology	Sudden and unexpected death in infants histology and virology.
7	trephine lung biopsy	Trespanin lung biopsy.
7	immunofluorescent staining of lung biopsy in fibrosing alveolitis	Immunofluorescent staining of lung biopsy in fibrotic alveolitis.
7	pulmonary contusion in children due to rubber bullet injuries	Pulmonary contusion in children due to rubber gunshot.
7	role of relative humidity in the synergistic effect of a sulfur dioxide aerosol mixture on the lung	The role of nitrogen oxides; relative humidity in the environment; the synergistic effect of nitrogen oxides; a mixture of sulphur dioxide aerosols on the lungs.
7	fine structure of cryptococcus neoformans grown in vivo as observed by freeze etching	Ultrastructure of cryptococcus neoformans grown in vivo was observed by freeze-etching.
7	relative roles of irritant type j and pulmonary stretch receptors in lung reflexes	Relative roles of apo; j-type irritant and apo receptors; pulmonary stretch in pulmonary reflexes.
7	regulation of respiration by bronchopulmonary receptors in conscious dogs	The regulation of respiration by bronchopulmonary receptors in conscious dogs.
7	studies on the central effects of hering breuer reflexes	Studies on the central effects of reflexes in brewing.
7	afferent vagal impulses in anaphylactic bronchial asthma	Afferent vagal impulses in anaphylactic bronchial asthma.
7	the cyanide gasp and spontaneous deep breaths	Uh, cyanide breath and spontaneous deep breaths.
7	ten years experience in running a pulmonary function laboratory	Ten years of experience in managing lung function laboratories.
7	cytomegalovirus replication in cells pretreated with 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine	Cytomegalovirus replication in cells pretreated with 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine.
7	growth characteristics of cytomegalovirus in human fibroblasts with demonstration of protein synthesis early in viral replication	Growth characteristics of cytomegalovirus in human fibroblasts with demonstration of protein synthesis early in viral replication.
7	light microscopic and ultrastructural study of the adverse effects of oxygen therapy on the neonate lung	Light microscopic and ultrastructural study of the adverse effects of oxygen therapy on the lungs of newborns.
7	a combined scanning and transmission electron microscopic study of alveolar epithelial development of the fetal rabbit lung	A combined scanning and transmission electron microscopic study of the alveolar epithelial development of rabbit fetal lung.
7	antiviral effects of aphidicolin a new antibiotic produced by cephalosporium aphidicola	Antiviral effects of cephalosporium aphidicol, a new antibiotic produced by cephalosporium aphidicola.
7	isolation and characterization of lamellar bodies and tubular myelin from rat lung homogenates	The isolation and characterization of lamellar bodies and tubular myelin in rat lung homogenates.
7	use of technetium 99m tc as a bacterial label in lung clearance studies	The use of technetium 99 mtc as a bacterial marker in lung clearance studies.
7	a sequence of biochemical events in the antigen induced release of chemical mediators from sensitized human lung tissue	A sequence of biochemical events in the antigen induced release of chemical mediators from sensitized human lung tissue.
7	measurement of respiratory volume for virus retention studies in mice	Measurement of respiratory volume for viral retention studies in mice.
7	induction of labour in sheep and in humans by single doses of corticosteroids	Induction of labor in sheep and in humans by single doses of corticosteroids.
7	role of the mast cell in the pulmonary pressor response to hypoxia	The role of the mastocycle in the pulmonary pressor response to apos; hypoxia.
7	rimantadine therapy of influenza a infection in mice	Treatment with rimantadine of influenza, an infection in mice.
7	the effect of phospholipids on anaphylactic histamine release	L' effect of phospholipids on anaphylactic release of histamine.
7	the optical and electron microscopic determination of pulmonary asbestos fibre concentration and its relation to the human pathological reaction	Optical and electron microscopic determination of fibre concentration of lung asbestos and its relationship to pathological response in man.
7	serotonin producing neuroepithelial bodies in rabbit respiratory mucosa	Serotonin produces neuroepithelial bodies in rabbit respiratory mucosa.
7	contributions of loss of lung recoil and of enhanced airways collapsibility to the airflow obstruction of chronic bronchitis and emphysema	Contribution of loss of lung recoil and weight; improvement of airway collapsibility; obstruction of air flow; chronic bronchitis and emphysema.
7	effects of bradykinin and indomethacin on cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in lung slices	Effects of bradykinin and lapos; indomethacin on cyclic gmp and lapos; lung slice cyclic ampoule.
7	antibacterial mechanisms of the lower respiratory tract i immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion	Antibacterial mechanisms of synthesis and secretion of immune globulin from the lower respiratory tract i.
7	cytoplasmic receptor for glucocorticoids in lung of the human fetus and neonate	Cytoplasmic receptor of glucocorticoids in the lungs of the human fetus and the new-born.
7	lung surface active fraction as a model system for macromolecular ultrastructural studies with crotalus atrox venom	The pulmonary surface active fraction as a model system for macromolecular ultrastructural studies with atrox crotalus venom.
7	characterization of bleomycin resistant dna	Characterization of bleomycin resistant DNA.
7	hemagglutination assay of antibodies associated with pulmonary acariasis in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	Test for hemagglutination of antibodies associated with apos; pulmonary acariosis in Rhesus macaca mulatta monkey.
7	human papovavirus bk strain biological studies including antigenic relationship to simian virus 40	Biological studies of the human papovavirus bk strain including the antigenic relationship with simian virus.
7	intermittent dna synthesis and periodic expression of enzyme activity in the cell cycle of wi 38	Intermittent synthesis of apo; DNA and periodic expression of enzyme activity in the cell cycle of wi.
7	contrast between the environmental ph dependencies of prophasing and nuclear membrane formation in interphase metaphase cells	The contrast between the environmental dependencies of prophase and nuclear membrane formation in interphase metaphase cells contrasts.
7	clinical radiologic and histopathologic studies on pulmonary toxicity induced by treatment with bleomycin nsc 125066	Clinical radiological and histopathological studies of pulmonary toxicity induced by bleomycin treatment with bleomycin.
7	ferromagnetic contamination in the lungs and other organs of the human body	Ferromagnetic contamination of the lungs and other organs of the human body.
7	immune enhancement of pulmonary bactericidal activity in murine virus pneumonia	Canadian Journal of Epidemiology, 3rd Edition, 3rd Edition, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
7	pathogenicity of allescheria boydii for mice	Pathogenicity of Apos; Allescheria boydii for Mice.
7	role of immunity in viral induced bacterial superinfections of the lung	The role of immunity in viral lung bacterial overinfections.
7	synergistic effect in viral bacterial infection combined infection of the murine respiratory tract with sendai virus and pasteurella pneumotropica	The synergistic effect of the virus; viral bacterial infection combined with sendai virus and pasteurella pneumotropica infection of the murine respiratory tract.
7	an ultrastructural analysis of nocardia during experimental infections in mice	An ultrastructural analysis of nocardia during experimental infections in the mouse.
7	attempts to detect homologous autointerference in vivo with influenza virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Tests for apo; auto-inference that is homologous in vivo with apovirus; influenza virus and vesicular stomatitis virus.
7	granulomatous hypersensitivity to trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor in mice infected with bcg	Granulomatous hypersensitivity to trehalose 6-6 dimycolate cord factor in mice infected with bcg.
7	inhibition of cathepsin d type proteinase of macrophages by pepstatin a specific pepsin inhibitor and other substances	Inhibition of cathepsin d-type proteinase from macrophages by pepstatin, a specific pepsin inhibitor, and d' other substances.
7	sources of cyclic nucleotides in plasma	Sources of cyclic nucleotides in plasma.
7	experimental lung injury i bacterial pneumonia ultrastructural autoradiographic and histochemical observations	Experimental lung injury i bacterial pneumonia ultrastructural autoradiographic and histochemical observations.
7	guanylate cyclase inhibition by light in retinal photoreceptors	Guanylate cyclase inhibition by light in the retinal photoreceptors.
7	development and evaluation of a direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii infections in experimental animals	Development and evaluation of a direct immunofluorescence method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii infections in laboratory animals.
7	immunologic events in experimental hypersensitivity granulomas	Immunological effects in experimental hypersensitivity.
7	an experimental model of pulmonary arterial granulomatous inflammation	It's an experimental model; granulomatous inflammation of the lung artery.
7	pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone a correlated light and electron microscopic study	The pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone were investigated in a correlative light and electron microscopic study.
7	morphometric evaluation of pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone	Morphometric evaluation of pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone.
7	pulmonary blood flow distribution at different lung volumes and body positions	Pulmonary blood flow distribution at different lung volumes and body positions.
7	haemodynamic changes at different lung volumes	Hemodynamic changes at different lung volumes.
7	supersaturation with bilirubin followed by colloid formation and disposition with a hypothesis on the etiology of kernicterus	Bilirubin oversaturation followed by colloid formation and disposition with hypothesis on the apos; etiology of kernicterus.
7	amphetamine in human plasma a sensitive and specific enzymatic assay	Amphetamine in human plasma, a sensitive and specific enzyme assay.
7	heparan sulphate sulphotransferase properties of an enzyme from ox lung	Heparan sulphate sulphotransferase properties of an enzyme from ox ox lung.
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells i sequence of viral replication	Human cytomegalovirus virus; herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells i viral replication sequence.
7	in vitro binding of retinol to rat tissue components	In vitro binding of retinol to rat tissue components.
7	molecular nature of mammalian cell dna in alkaline sucrose gradients	Molecular nature of apos; mammalian cell DNA in alkaline sucrose gradients.
7	pulmonary gas exchange in nonnative residents of high altitude	Lung gas exchange in non-aboriginal high-elevation residents.
7	early response of lung to low levels of ozone	Early lung response to low levels of ozone.
7	fate of angiotension i in the total bufo melanostictus	The fate of angiotension i in the bufo melanostictus total.
7	specificity of a bcg induced pulmonary granulomatous response in rabbits	Dapos specificity; bcg induced pulmonary granulomatous response in rabbits.
7	enhanced effect of repeated administration of bacterial vaccine against viral respiratory infection	Increased effect of apo; repeated administration of bacterial vaccine against apo; viral respiratory infection.
7	experimental induction of anergy to coccidioidin by antigens of coccidioides immitis	Experimental induction of d' anergy to coccidioidin by coccidioid immitis antigens.
7	antibody response to a human diploid cell rabies vaccine	Immune response to a human diploid cell rabies vaccine.
7	early development of and pathology associated with strongylus edentatus	The early development and pathology associated with Strongylus edentatus.
7	pneumothorax in pulmonary eosinophilic granuloma	Pneumothorax in pulmonary eosinophilic granuloma.
7	cell free translation of paramyxovirus messenger rna	Cell-free translation of paramyxovirus messenger rna.
7	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the calf	Acute, systemic anaphylaxis in the calf.
7	growth inhibition and morphological changes caused by lipophilic acids in mammalian cells	Growth inhibition and morphological changes caused by lipophilic acids in mammalian cells.
7	assessment of fetal lung maturity by estimation of amniotic fluid palmitic acid	Assessment of fetal lung maturity by estimation of the fetal amniotic liquid palmitic acid.
7	direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis from sputa or tracheal aspirates from humans	Direct immunofluorescent method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii pneumonia from sputa or dapos; tracheal aspiration of humans.
7	bacterial growth in vivo an important determinant of the pulmonary clearance of diplococcus pneumoniae in rats	Bacterial growth in vivo is an important determinant of the pulmonary clearance of diplococcus pneumoniae in rats.
7	inhibition of murine leukemia virus replication by poly vinyluracil and poly vinyladenine	Lapses; inhibition of murine leukemia virus replication by poly vinyluracil and poly vinyladenine.
7	human regulatory gene for inducible tyrosine aminotransferase in rat human hybrids	Human regulatory gene for inducible tyrosine aminotransferase in rat human hybrids.
7	epidemiological and quantitative relationships between mesothelioma and asbestos on tyneside	Epidemiological and quantitative relationships between mesothelioma and asbestos on tyneside.
7	viscosity of cellular protoplasm	Viscosity of cellular protoplasm.
7	assignment of the gene for adenine phosphoribosyltransferase to human chromosome 16 by mouse human somatic cell hybridization	Apos gene assignment; adenine phosphoribosyltransferase to human chromosome 16 by human somatic cell hybridization in mice.
7	role of extrapulmonary conversion in mediating the systemic pressor activity of angiotensin i	The role of extrapulmonary conversion in the mediation of apos; systemic pressor activity of apos; angiotensin i.
7	variation in the life span of clones derived from human diploid cell strains	Change in the life span of clones derived from human diploid cell lines.
7	prophasing of interphase nuclei and induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes in hela and chinese hamster homo and heterokaryons	Prophylaxis of interphase nuclei and induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes in Chinese hamster and helix homos and heterokaryons.
7	adaption to hyperoxia influence on protein synthesis by lung and on granular pneumocyte ultrastructure	L' adaptation to apos; hyperoxia influences protein synthesis by lung and lung; granular pneumocyte ultrastructure.
7	disability and coal workers pneumoconiosis	Handicapped and coal workers pneumoconiosis pneumoconiosis.
7	alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency correlation between biochemical tests and phenotypes in one family	Correlation between biochemical tests and phenotypes of apos; same family for alpha deficiency-1 antitrypsin.
7	release of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs and prostaglandins induced by chemical or mechanical stimulation of guinea pig lungs	Release of rabbit aorta, rcs and prostaglandins, induced by chemical or mechanical stimulation of guinea pig lungs.
7	qualitative and quantitative aspects of the biosynthesis of ribonucleic acid and of protein in the liver and the lung of the syrian golden hamster	Qualitative and quantitative aspects of the biosynthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and proteins in the liver and lung of the Syrian golden hamster.
7	the effects of diethylnitrosamine on ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis in the liver and lung of the syrian golden hamster	The effects of diethylnitrosamine on protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis in the liver and lung of the Syrian golden hamster.
7	some effects of burimamide on the isolated perfused pulmonary circulation of the guinea pig	Some effects of burimamide on the isolated guinea pig perfused pulmonary circulation system.
7	soap abortion and fat embolism	Uh, soap abortion and fatty embolism.
7	cytologic changes in dogs lungs induced by chronic exposure to ozone	Cytological changes in canine lungs induced by chronic exposure to ozone.
7	method for storing toxoplasma gondii rh strain in liquid nitrogen	Method of storage of toxoplasma gondii rh strain in liquid nitrogen.
7	ultrastructural changes in hamster tracheal ring cultures exposed to mycoplasma pneumoniae	Ultrastructural changes in hamster tracheal rings cultures exposed to pneumoniae mycoplasma.
7	early pathological changes associated with fasciola hepatica infections in white tailed deer	Early pathological changes associated with fasciola hepatica infections in white tail.
7	genetic variation in coumarin hydroxylase activity in the mouse mus musculus	Genetic variation of l' coumarin hydroxylase activity in the mouse musculus.
7	allografted lungs in matched dogs with induced pulmonary hypertension	Pulmonary allografting in dogs with induced pulmonary hypertension.
7	spectrum of asthma in children i clinical and physiological components	Dosage spectrum; asthma in children i clinical and physiological components.
7	ectopic acth production in carcinoma of the lung	Ectopic acth production in carcinoma of the lung.
7	superoxide dismutase activity in leukocytes	L' superoxide dismutase activity in leukocytes.
7	the distribution between gamma glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and l glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities in rat tissues studies in vitro	The distribution between gamma glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities in in vitro studies of rat tissues.
7	lung collagen heterogeneity	Uh, lung collagen heterogeneity.
7	effective treatment for paraquat poisoning in rats and its relevance to treatment of paraquat poisoning in man	Effective treatment; paraquat poisoning in rats and its relevance to the treatment of cancer; paraquat poisoning in men.
7	metabolic differences between normal and neoplastic cells effects of aminonucleoside on cytoplasmic messenger rna	Metabolic differences between aminonucleoside effects on normal and neoplastic cells of the rna cytoplasmic messenger.
7	purification and properties of the cathepsin d types proteinase from beef and rabbit lung and its identification in macrophages	The purification and properties of cathepsin proteinase type from bovine and rabbit lung and its identification in macrophages.
7	studies with radioactive endotoxin ii clearance of 3h labelled endotoxin from the blood of calves	Studies with radioactive endotoxin ii clearance of the apos; labelled endotoxin 3 h from the blood of calves.
7	immunofluorescent studies of bovine hypersensitivity pneumonitis	Immuno-fluorescent studies of bovine hypersensitivity pneumonitis.
7	properties of intracytoplasmic a particles isolated from oncornavirus producing human cells	Properties of intracytoplasmic particles isolated from oncornavirus producing human cells.
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells ii an ultrastructural study of viral penetration	Virus de l'apos; herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in cells wi 38 ii., ultrastructural study of viral penetration.
7	rectal and gastric involvement in a case of sarcoidosis	Rectal and gastric involvement in a case of sarcoidosis.
7	the use of immunoadsorbent columns for the isolation of antibodies specific for antigens associated with human bronchogenic carcinoma	Use of d&apos columns; immunoadsorbents to isolate the antibodies specific to the antigens associated with human bronchogenic carcinoma.
7	evidence for different gestation dependent effects of cortisol on cultured fetal lung cells	Evidence of different cortisol-dependent effects of gestation on cultured fetal lung cells.
7	biosynthetic pathway of desmosines in elastin	The biosynthetic pathway of desmosins in elastin.
7	effects of intravenous administration of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis histamine bradykinin and prostaglandin f2alpha on pulmonary mechanics in the guinea pig	Effects of apos; intravenous administration of slow reaction substance of apos; histamine bradykinin and prostaglandin f2alpha on lung mechanics in guinea pig.
7	positive control of transformed phenotype in hybrids between sv40 transformed and normal human cells	Positive control of transformed phenotype in hybrids between transformed and normal human sv40 cells.
7	cell cycle analysis in 20 minutes	Okay, cell cycle analysis in 20 minutes.
7	fibrosing alveolitis and treatment with sulphasalazine	Fibrosing alveolite and treatment with sulphasalazine.
7	pulmonary bacterial susceptibility in the burned rat	The pulmonary bacterial susceptibility in the burned rat.
7	aspiration of blood and pulmonary host defense mechanisms	Aspiration of blood and defense mechanisms of the lung host.
7	pulmonary platelet aggregates associated with sudden death in man	The pulmonary platelet aggregates associated with sudden death in men.
7	clearance of candida albicans from the bloodstream of rabbits	Elimination of candida albicans from the bloodstream of rabbits.
7	human beta d n acetylhexosaminidases a and b expression and linkage relationships in somatic cell hybrids	Human beta expression and binding relationships; human acetylhexosaminidases a and b in somatic cell hybrids.
7	the effect of corrective surgery on pulmonary function in scoliosis	The effect of corrective surgery on pulmonary function in scoliosis.
7	differences in the character and intensity of morphologic changes in the peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from experimental exposure to cement dust	Nature and environmental differences; intensity of morphological changes in the peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from apo; experimental exposure to cement dust.
7	lipoid pneumonia in infants and children in south india	Lipoid pneumonia in infants and children in India.
7	adrenaline induced acute massive pulmonary oedema in the dog	L' adrenaline caused acute pulmonary edema in the dog.
7	comparison by controlled clinical trial of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of life threatening pulmonay embolism	A comparison by controlled clinical trial of streptokinase and apos; heparin in the treatment of apos; pulmonary embolism threatening life.
7	genetic control of mitochondrial thymidine kinase in human mouse and monkey mouse somatic cell hybrids	The genetic control of mitochondrial thymidine kinase in mouse–monkey hybrid somatic cells.
7	plaque assay for avirulent lentogenic strains of newcastle disease virus	Sluggish, avirulent strains of the Newcastle disease virus are measured on a plaque.
7	histopathology of one stage bilateral lung allografts	Histopathology of a bilateral lung allografts stage.
7	the effect of carbon dioxide in the airways and alveoli on ventilation a vagal reflex studied in the dog	The effect of carbon dioxide in the airways and alveoli on ventilation is a vagal reflex studied in dogs.
7	the effect of edema hydrocortisone acetate concurrent viral infection and immunization on the clearance of pasteurella hemolytica from the bovine lung	The effect of apo; hydrocortisone acetate oedema concomitant with apo; viral infection and apo; immunization on the clearance of pasteurella hemolytica from the bovine lung.
7	influence of the ventilation mechanics on the hematocrit value i research in rabbits subjected to experimental pneumothorax	Mechanical ventilation influences the value of hematocrit in rabbits subjected to experimental pneumothorax.
7	growth of mammalian cells on substrates coated with cellular microexudates i effect on cell growth at low population densities	The growth of mammalian cells on substrates coated with cellular microexudates i has an effect on cell growth at low population densities.
7	differentiation of smallpox and camelpox viruses in cultures of human and monkey cells	Differentiation of smallpox and camel pox viruses in cultures of human cells and monkeys.
7	autopsy data and their total evaluation	Data from the post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, and post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, post-mortem, and
7	modified spinning top homogeneous spray apparatus for use in experimental respiratory disease studies	Modified swivel top homogeneous spray applicator for use in experimental respiratory disease studies.
7	phospholipid biosynthesis the activity of phosphatidic acid phosphohydrolase in the developing lung and amnionic fluid	Phospholipid biosynthesis is the apos; phosphohydrolase activity of l' phosphatidic acid in the developing lung and amnionic fluid.
7	functional evaluation of lung mitochondria	Functional evaluation of lung mitochondria.
7	collagen in the lung development of a technology applicable to human lung disease	Collagen in lung development d' a technology applicable to human lung diseases.
7	pharmacologic regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetal and newborn rabbits acth heroin isoxsuprine and glucocorticoid	Pharmacological regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetus and newborn rabbits-born acth heroin isoxsuprine and glucocorticoids.
7	the destruction of type 2 pneumocytes by airborne influenza pr8 a virus its effect on surfactant and lecithin content of the pneumonic lesions of mice	The destruction of type 2 pneumocytes by the pr8 virus has influenza in suspension in the air, its effect on the surfactant and lecithin content of the pneumonic lesions in mice.
7	comparison of the cardiopulmonary effects of subcutaneously administered epinephrine and terbutaline in patients with reversible airway obstruction	Comparison of the cardiopulmonary effects of epinephrine, epinephrine and terbutaline in patients with epinephrine and epinephrine; reversible airway obstruction.
7	pulmonary mycotoxicosis	Uh, pulmonary mycotoxicosis.
7	fatal lung scan in a case of pulmonary hypertension due to obliterative pulmonary vascular disease	Fatal lung scan in a case of pulmonary hypertension due to obliterative pulmonary vascular disease.
7	pulmonary function studies in ex heroin users	Lung function studies in former heroin addicts.
7	the use of spontaneous ventilation with constant positive airway pressure in the treatment of salt water near drowning	L' use of spontaneous ventilation with constant positive respiratory pressure in the treatment of salt water near drowning.
7	the chest abdomen sign in familial dysautonomia	L' abdomen indicates dysfunction in the family.
7	clinical aspects of atypical mycobacterial infection	Clinical aspects of atypical mycobacterial infection.
7	importance of physical properties of benzo a pyrene ferric oxide mixtures in lung tumor induction	Importance of physical properties of benzo a pyrene ferric oxide mixtures in lung tumour induction.
7	effects of cigarette smoking on aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase activity in lungs and tissues of inbred mice	Effects of smoking on apo; apo activity; aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in lungs and tissues of inbred mice.
7	suggestive evidence for in vivo binding of specific antitumor antibodies of human melanomas	Evidence suggesting in vivo binding of specific anti-tumour antibodies to human melanoma.
7	aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental acute inflammation of the respiratory tree	Apos; aminochlorthenoxycycline in the apos; experimental acute inflammation of the respiratory tree.
7	bronchopulmonary aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental burns of the respiratory tree	Bronchopulmonary level, aminochlorthenoxycycline in experimental burns of respiratory tree.
7	techniques of radiotherapy in so called operable carcinoma of the breast	Radiotherapy techniques in cases of so-called operable carcinoma of the breast.
7	endogenous c type virus of a mouse cell line and its defectiveness	Endogenous virus type c d' a mouse cell line and its defectivity.
7	diffuse and focal oxygen pneumonitis a preliminary report on the threshold of pulmonary oxygen toxicity in man	Diffusion and focal pneumonia due to apos; oxygen, a preliminary report on the threshold of lung toxicity in men.
7	tryptamine receptors in rat pulmonary artery	Tryptamine receptors in rat pulmonary artery.
7	pulmonary mechanical effects of experimental lung embolism and their modification by bronchodilator drugs in the guinea pig	Pulmonary mechanical effects of lung embolism and their modification by bronchodilators in the guinea pig.
7	characterization of particulate and soluble guanylate cyclases from rat lung	Characterization of particulate and soluble guanylate cyclases in rat lung.
7	viral respiratory infections of horses structure and function of lungs in relation to viral infection	Viral respiratory infections in horses and the structure and function of the horses' lungs in relation to viral infection.
7	early changes in lungs of rats exposed to 70 per cent o2	Early changes in lungs of rats exposed to 70% o2.
7	five fluorocarbons for administration of aerosol bronchodilators	Five fluorocarbons for administration of aerosol bronchodilators.
7	prostaglandin inactivation in guinea pig lung and its inhibition	Prostaglandin inactivation in guinea pig lung and its inhibition.
7	clinically useful method for the isolation of respiratory syncytial virus	This is a clinically useful method for the isolation of the respiratory syncytial virus.
7	evaluation of four antiviral agents in the treatment of herpes simplex encephalitis in a rat model	Evaluation of four antiviral agents in the treatment of herpes simplex encephalitis in a model rat.
7	dissociation of the immunologic release of histamine and slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis from human lung using cytochalasins a and b 1	Dissociation of the immunological release of histamine and the slow-reacting substance from the apos; anaphylaxis of the human lung to the apos; cytochalasins a and b 1.
7	antibody mediated cytotoxicity after measles virus infection	Antibody-mediated cytotoxicity after measles virus infection.
7	migration and embolization of macrophages to the lung a possible mechanism for colloid uptake in the lung during liver scanning	Migration and lupus; embolization of macrophages in the lung, a possible mechanism for lupus; absorption of colloids in the lung during liver scintigraphy.
7	production and characteristics of 125xe a new noble gas for in vivo studies	The production and characteristics of 125xe a new rare gas for in vivo studies.
7	liver scan showing intense lung uptake in neoplasia and infection	Hepatic scan showing intense pulmonary absorption in neoplasia and liver infections.
7	does rna pass from mesenchyme to epithelium during an embryonic tissue interaction	Rna changes from mesenchyme to epithelium during the epithelial phase; an embryonic tissue interaction.
7	extension of the lifespan of cultured normal human diploid cells by vitamin e	Extension of the lifespan of normal human diploid cells grown by vitamin e.
7	experimental meconium aspiration effects of glucocorticoid treatment	Experimental effects of glucocorticoid treatment on meconium aspiration.
7	relationship between fibrinolysis of cultured cells and malignancy	The relationship between fibrinolysis of cultured cells and malignancy.
7	human cytomegalovirus stimulates host cell rna synthesis	Human cytomegalovirus stimulates host cell rna synthesis.
7	paragonimus kellicotti infection in wild carnivores in southwestern ontario i prevalence and gross pathologic features	Paragonimus kellicotti infection in wild carnivores in southwestern Ontario and general pathological characteristics.
7	tuberculosis in lesser flamingoes in kenya	Tuberculosis in small flamingoes in Kenya.
7	prevalence of dictyocaulus viviparus infection in rocky mountain elk in teton county wyoming	Prevalence of dictyocaulus viviparus infection in mountain elk in Teton wyoming county.
7	optimum end expiratory airway pressure in patients with acute pulmonary failure	Optimum terminal expiratory pressure in patients with acute pulmonary insufficiency.
7	land edwards membrane oxygenator without pump as total lung prosthesis	Land border membrane oxygenator without pump as total lung prosthesis.
7	glomerulonephritis associated with antibody to glomerular basement membrane	Glomerulonephritis associated with antibodies to glomerular basement membrane.
7	effect of continuous positive airway pressure on breathing pattern of infants with respiratory distress syndrome	Effect of prolonged positive respiratory pressure on the respiratory profile of infants with respiratory distress syndrome.
7	peripheral metabolism of bovine parathyroid hormone in the dog	Peripheral metabolism of bovine parathyroid hormone in dogs.
7	congenital bronchopulmonary foregut malformation with anomalous pulmonary artery	Congenital bronchopulmonary malformation of the intestine, anterior intestine with pulmonary artery.
7	ventilatory control in myxedema and hypothyroidism	The ventilatory control of myxedema and apos; hypothyroidism.
7	direct isolation of mycoplasmas and acholeplasmas from sera and kidneys of calves	Directly isolate mycoplasmas and acholeplasmas from the sera and kidneys of calves.
7	respiratory function in liver cirrhosis spirometry blood gas analysis and radioisotope study with xenon 133	Respiratory function in hepatic cirrhosis spirometry blood gas analysis and radioisotope study with xenon 133.
7	a simple method of inflation fixation and air drying of lungs	A simple method for attachment of abs; inflation and air drying of the lungs.
7	cytomegalovirus interference in vitro	Acute cytomegalovirus interference in vitro.
7	effects of pattern of ventilation on pulmonary metabolism and mechanics	Effects of ventilation mode on pulmonary metabolism and mechanics.
7	the effect of pre existing pulmonary vascular disease on the response to mechanical ventilation with peep following open heart surgery	In addition to the above, there is also a pre-existing pulmonary vascular disease on the response to mechanical ventilation with peep after open-heart surgery.
7	anti herpesvirus action of isoprinosine	Anti--herpesviruses of l' isoprinosine.
7	evaluation of the effect of respiratory movements of the organs on the resolution index	Evaluate the effect of respiratory movements of the organs on the apos; resolution index.
7	variability of closing volume measurements in normal man	Variability of volume measurements in normal man.
7	the n2 closing volume test in population studies sources of variation and reproducibility	The n2 closure volume test in population studies is a source of variation and reproducibility.
7	diffusing capacity membrane diffusing capacity capillary blood volume pulmonary tissue volume and cardiac output measured by a rebreathing technique	Membrane diffusion capacity capillary blood volume diffusion capacitance lung volume and cardiac output measured by a rebreathing technique.
7	the effects of proteolytic enzymes on the tensile strength of human lung	The effects of proteolytic enzymes on the tensile strength of human lungs.
7	the beta adrenoceptors of the lung mediating inhibition of antigen induced histamine release	The beta-adrenergic receptors of the lung that mediate antigen inhibition induce release of apos; histamine.
7	pulmonary vascular changes associated with isolated mitral stenosis in india	Lung vascular changes associated with isolated mitral stenosis in Idaho.
7	cryostat microtomy of lung tissue in an expanded state	Freeze-statued microtomy of lung tissue at enlarged state.
7	interstitial pulmonary edema following bromocarbamide intoxication	Interstitial pulmonary edema following bromocarbamide intoxication.
7	pulmonary emboli prevention diagnosis and treatment	Prevention diagnosis and treatment; pulmonary embolism.
7	citrate formation by rat lung mitochondrial preparations	Citrate formation by rat lung mitochondrial preparations.
7	cellular aspects of local antibody response in rabbits	Cellular aspects of local immune response in rabbits.
7	the part played by cell mediated immunity in mycoplasma respiratory infections	The role of cell-mediated immunity in mycoplasma respiratory infections.
7	role of respiratory viruses in childhood mortality	The role of respiratory viruses in infant mortality.
7	effects of alpha and beta receptor stimulating and blocking agents on experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation	Effects of alpha and beta receptor stimulators and blockers on experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation.
7	comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors plasminogen antiactivators heparin and acetylsalicylic acid on the experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation induced by thormbin	Comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors, plasminogen antiactivators, heparin, and acetylsalicylic acid on the experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation induced by thormbin.
7	the lung colony assay extension to the lewis lung tumour and the b16 melanoma radiosensitivity of b16 melanoma cells	The lung colony test was extended to Lewis lung tumour and melanoma b16 radiosensitivity of b16 melanoma cells.
7	formation of cysteinyldopa from glutathionedopa in melanoma	The formation of cysteine-yldopa from glutathioneedopa in melanoma.
7	lung expansion and the formation of the alveolar lining layer in the fullterm newborn rabbit	Pulmonary expansion and formation of the alveolar lining layer in the term new-rabbit.
7	relationship of ehrlichia canis infected mononuclear cells to blood vessels of lungs	Relationships between infected mononuclear cells of ehrlichia canis and blood vessels of the lungs.
7	the effect of in utero decapitation on the morphological and physiological development of the fetal rabbit lung	L' effect of in utero decapitation on the morphological and physiological development of the fetal lung of rabbit.
7	effects of airway versus arterial co2 changes on lung mechanics in dogs	Effects of airway versus arterial co2 changes on dog lung mechanics.
7	interrelations between pulmonary liquid volumes and lung compliance	Interrelationship between pulmonary fluid volumes and pulmonary compliance.
7	influence of cycloheximide on the lung	L' influence of cycloheximide on the lungs.
7	pulmonary diffusing capacity and capillary blood volume in aging dogs	Pulmonary diffusion capacity and capillary blood volume in aging dogs.
7	lung mechanics in hypervolemic pulmonary edema	Pulmonary mechanics in hypervolemic pulmonary edema.
7	distribution of ventilation perfusion ratios in dogs with normal and abnormal lungs	Distribution of ventilation ratios in dogs with normal and abnormal lungs.
7	branching pattern of airways and air spaces of a single human terminal bronchiole	Connecting pattern of airways and air spaces d'apos; a unique human terminal bronchiole.
7	human air space shapes sizes areas and volumes	L' human airspace forms volumes and zone sizes.
7	cell mediated cytotoxicity to human pulmonary neoplasms	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity to human pulmonary neoplasms.
7	aerosol metallic paints deliberate inhalation a study of inhalation and or ingestion of copper and zinc particles	Intentional inhalation metallic aerosol paints Study of symptoms; inhalation or failure; ingestion of copper and zinc particles.
7	pulmonary granulomatous pneumocystosis following renal transplantation report of a case	Acute pulmonary granulomatous pneumocyste following a kidney transplant.
7	neonatal pneumopericardium	It's called neonatal pneumopicardium.
7	lymphangiomyomatosis report of a case with ureteral involvement and chyluria	One case of lymphangiomyomatosis with urethral and chyluria was reported.
7	the mucosubstance coating the pneumonocytes in the lungs of xenopus laevis and lacerta viridis	The mucosubstance that covers the pneumonocytes in the lungs of xenopus laevis and lacerta viridis.
7	ultrastructure of the lung in loeffler s pneumonia	L' ultrastructure of the lung in Loeffler's pneumonia.
7	a prospective evaluation of the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and the rapid surfactant test in relation to fetal pulmonary maturity	A prospective evaluation of the lecithin-sphingomyelin ratio and the rapid surfactant test in relation to fetal lung maturity.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fatty acids in normal pregnancies relation to gestational age and neonatal condition	In normal pregnancies, amniotic fluid phospholipids and fatty acids are related to gestational age and neonatal condition.
7	endocrine influences on pulmonary maturation and the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in the fetal baboon	Endocrine influences on pulmonary maturation and lecithin ratio in fetal baboon rats-sphingomyelin.
7	fetal maturity biochemical analyses of amniotic fluid	Biochemical analysis of amniotic fluid fetal maturity.
7	influence of lung parenchyma on collapsibility of dog bronchi	The influence of lung parenchyma on the collapsibility of dog bronchi.
7	lung lavage using a single lumen endotracheal tube	Lung lavage at the top of the lungs; an endotracheal tube with a single lumen.
7	increased sheep lung vascular permeability caused by pseudomonas bacteremia	Increased sheep pulmonary vascular permeability caused by pseudomonas bacteremia.
7	the relation of endogenous adenosine cyclic 3 5 monophosphate to the antagonistic effects of adenosine and colchicine on cell shape	The relationship between monophosphate d' endogenous cyclic adenosine 3-5 and the antagonistic effects of adenosine and colchicine on cell shape.
7	distribution and seasonal prevalence of bovine lungworms in selected areas in western montana	Distribution and seasonal prevalence of bovine lungworms in certain regions of west montana.
7	lung function consequences of dust exposure in asbestos cement manufacturing plants	Effects on lung function in apo; dust exposure in apo manufacturing plants; asbestos-cement.
7	bacterial contamination of organic dusts effects on pulmonary cell reactions	Effects of bacterial contamination of organic dusts on pulmonary cell responses.
7	reaction of cultured adult and fetal lung to prednisolone and thyroxine	Reaction of adult and fetal lungs to prednisolone and thyroxine therapy.
7	ultrastructural alterations observed in mouse lung after prolonged he o2 exposure	Ultrastructural alterations were observed in the mouse lung after prolonged exposure to sulphur dioxide.
7	increased susceptibility to pulmonary oxygen toxicity after cholesterol biosynthesis inhibition	Increased sensitivity to pulmonary toxicity of cholesterol; oxygen; inhibition of cholesterol biosynthesis.
7	phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung ii comparison of occurrence composition and metabolism in surfactant and residual lung fractions	Phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung ii compared composition and metabolism of surfactant and residual lung fractions.
7	changes in the number of binding sites for ribonucleic acid polymerase in chromatin of wi 38 fibroblasts stimulated to proliferate	Changes in number of binding sites for l' ribonucleic acid polymerase in chromatin from 38 stimulated to proliferate wi fibroblasts.
7	location and abundance of poly a sequences in sendai virus messenger rna molecules	Localization and abundance of poly a sequences in sendai virus rna messenger molecules.
7	differential feulgen deoxyribonucleic acid hydrolysis patterns of herpes simplex virus type 1 and type 2 infected cells	Apos-differential models; deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic feulgenic acid; type 1 and type 2 herpes simplex infected cells.
7	immune complexes in cystic fibrosis	You know, immune complexes in cystic fibrosis.
7	ultrastructure of rabbit lung intravenously infected with mycobacterium simiae weiszfeiler no 52	Lapos; ultrastructure of rabbit lung infected intravenously with the mycobacterium simiae weiszfeiler no.
7	the mechanism of damage to neutrophils in allergic reactions in tuberculosis	Alteration of neutrophils in allergic reactions to tuberculosis.
7	failure of pentamidine isethionate to provide chemoprophylaxis against pneumocytis carinii infection in rats	Inadequacy of pentamidine isethionate to provide chemoprophylaxis against apos; pneumocytis carinii infection in rats.
7	acute immunologic pulmonary alveolitis	It's called acute immunologic pulmonary alveolitis.
7	association of asbestos and bronchogenic carcinoma in a population with low asbestos exposure	The association of asbestos and bronchogenic carcinoma in a population with low exposure to asbestos.
7	characterization of lung surfactant factors promoting formation of artifactual lipid protein complexes	Characterization of pulmonary surfactant factors promoting formation of artificial lipid protein complexes.
7	chromatographic analyses of 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism in adult and fetal mice and the occurrence of conjugating enzymes in the fetus	Chromatographic analysis of metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes in adult and fetal mice and the presence of conjugated enzymes in the fetus.
7	in vitro metabolism and microsome mediated mutagenicity of dialkylnitrosamines in rat hamster and mouse tissues	In vitro metabolism and microsomal-mediated mutagenicity of dialkylnitrosamines in rat hamster and rat mouse tissue.
7	peptidyl proline hydroxylase in adult developing and neoplastic rat tissues	The peptidyl proline hydroxylase in tissues from developing and neoplastic adult rats.
7	aminopeptidases and arylamidases in normal and cancer tissues in humans	aminopeptidases and arylamidases in normal and cancerous tissues in humans.
7	baroreceptor and chemoreceptor influences on heart rate during the respiratory cycle in the dog	Baroreceptor and chemoreceptor influences on heart rate during the dog respiratory cycle.
7	rhinovirus rna polymerase products and kinetics of appearance in human diploid cells	Rhinovirus rna polymerase products and cell kinetics; appearance in human diploid cells.
7	demonstration that the atria ventricles and lungs each are responsible for a tonic inhibition of the vasomotorcenter in the dog	Evidence that the ventricles of the atrium and the lungs are each responsible for a tonic inhibition of the vasomotorcenter in the dog.
7	continuous inhibition of renin release in dogs by vagally innervated receptors in the cardiopulmonary region	L' continuous inhibition of renin release in dogs by vagally innervated receptors in the cardiopulmonary region.
7	arterial lysosomes and connective tissue in primate atherosclerosis and hypertension	Arterial lysosomes and connective tissue in primate atherosclerosis and hypertension.
7	abolition of natural tolerance and the influence of the chemical allergen beryllium on autoimmune processes	Removal of natural tolerance and lapos; influence of the chemical allergen beryllium on auto processes-immune.
7	maximal oxygen uptake lung volume and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and hypoxia in a pair of identical twin athletes	The maximum volume of lung consumption of oxygen and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and hypoxia in identical twin athletes.
7	a new radiologic sign of subpulmonic effusion	A new radiological sign of d' effusion at-pulmonary.
7	goodpasture s syndrome author s transl	Apos translation; author of Goodpasture Syndrome.
7	filaroides hirthi sp n nematoda metastrongyloidea from the lung of the dog	Filaroides hirthi sp nematoda metastrongyloidea of the lung of the dog.
7	pulmonary emphysema and liver disease occurrence in an alpha antitrypsin deficient adult	Pulmonary infection due to lupus; emphysema and liver disease in an alpha antitrypsin deficient adult.
7	methods to preclude aspiration or swallowing of dental appliances	Methods to prevent aspiration or aspiration; ingestion of dental appliances.
7	the pathogenesis of infections of the mouse caused by virulent and avirulent variants of an influenza virus	Pathogenesis of the mouse infections caused by virulent and avirulent variants of the influenza virus.
7	the role of cardiac sympathetic discharges during the pulmonary depressor reflex	The role of cardiac sympathetic discharges during the pulmonary depressor reflex.
7	certain problems of intensive therapy of acute myocardial infarct	Some problems with the intensive treatment of acute myocardial infarction.
7	principles of early postoperative management of patients after open heart surgery	The principles of early postoperative treatment of patients after open heart surgery.
7	multiple herpesvirus simiae isolation from a rhesus monkey which died of cerebral infarction	Multiple herpesvirus is isolated from a rhesus monkey that died of a cerebral infarction.
7	influence of cotton dust inhalation on free lung cells in rats and guinea pigs	Influence of apo; cotton dust inhalation on free lung cells of rats and guinea pigs.
7	the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the division of wi 38 cells the cellular response to prostaglandin e1 and the effects of an cyclic adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate analogue and prostaglandin e1 on cell division	The role of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in the division of wi 38 cells, cell response to prostaglandin e1 and the effects of d' a cyclic analog of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and prostaglandin e1 on cell division.
7	variations in pulmonary antibacterial defenses among experimental animals	Variations in pulmonary antibacterial defenses in laboratory animals.
7	inhibition by derivatives of phloretin of anaphylactic histamine release from human lung tissue and of prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction	Inhibition by phloretin derivatives of anaphylactic histamine release from human lung tissue and prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction.
7	histamine in the tissues of the marsupial setonix brachyurus the quokka	Histamine in the tissues of the marsupial setonix brachyurus the quokka.
7	radiographically determined lung volumes at full inspiration and during dynamic forced expiration in normal subjects	In normal subjects, lung volume was determined by X-ray at maximum; inspiration and during dynamic forced exhalation.
7	cardiac and pulmonary effects of acebutolol	The cardiac and pulmonary effects of acebutol.
7	oxygen toxicity in the newborn the effect of prolonged 100 per cent o2 exposure on the lungs of newborn mice	Toxicity to the liver; oxygen in the newborn-ne Effect of d' prolonged exposure to 100% d' O2 on the lungs of newborn mice.
7	pulmonary insufficiency induced by oleic acid in the sheep a model for investigation of extracorporeal oxygenation	Acute pulmonary insufficiency induced by apos; oleic acid in sheep, a model for apos; study of apos; extracorporeal oxygenation.
7	isolation and some serological and epidemiological data on the viruses recovered from patients with subacute thyroiditis de quervain	Isolation and some serological and epidemiological data on viruses recovered from patients with subacute thyroiditis of quervain.
7	effects of prolonged administration of chlorphentermine on the rat lung	Effects of apos; prolonged administration of chlorphentermine in rat lung.
7	detection by means of cell fusion of macromolecular synthesis involved in the reconstruction of the nuclear envelope in mitosis	The detection, by cell fusion, of macromolecular synthesis involved in the reconstruction of the nuclear envelope during mitosis.
7	collagen in the human lung quantitation of rates of synthesis and partial characterization of composition	Collagen in the human lung quantitation of synthetic rates and partial characterization of composition.
7	histamine release formation of prostaglandin like activity srs c and mast cell degranulation by the direct lytic factor dlf and phospholipase a of cobra venom	L' histamine releases the formation of prostaglandins such as srsc activity and mast cell degranulation by direct lytic factor dlf and phospholipase has cobra venom.
7	metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of delta 8 and delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol in some organs of the monkey callithrix jacchus	Metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of delta 8 and delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol in certain organs of the callithrix monkey jacchus.
7	liquid breathing trials and animal studies with a demand regulated liquid breathing system	Fluid-breathing tests and animal studies with a liquid-breathing system regulated by demand.
7	automated system for measurement of mechanics of breathing	Automated measurement system for the measurement of the mechanics of breathing.
7	gamma ray densitometry in the analysis of hemodynamic function	Gamma densitometry in the apos; analysis of hemodynamic function.
7	quantitative comparison of techniques used to measure complement mediated cytotoxicity of nucleated cells	Quantitative comparison of techniques used to measure complement-mediated cytotoxicity of nucleated cells.
7	edge sharpness and enhancement of electron radiographs ergs produced with powder cloud development	The sharpness of the edges and l' improvement of electronic radiographs ergs produced with the development of cloud powders.
7	experimental immune complex disease of the lung the pathogenesis of a laboratory model resembling certain human interstitial lung diseases	Experimental immunologic complex disease of the lungs, the pathogenesis of lung cancer; a laboratory model resembling certain human interstitial lung diseases.
7	induction of blood eosinophilia by pulmonary embolization of antigen coated particles the relationship to cell mediated immunity	Induction of apo; blood eosinophilia by pulmonary embolization of coated particles; antigen relationship; cell-mediated immunity.
7	intralobar pulmonary sequestration in lymphoid and vascular hamartia	Intraobar pulmonary sequestration in lymphoid and vascular hamartia hamartia.
7	intracellular supravital stain delocalization as an assay for antibody dependent complement mediated cell damage	The delocalization of intracellular supravital staining as a test for complement-mediated cell damage.
7	quantitative extraction of tubocurarine gallamine and decamethonium from biological materials	Quantitative extraction of tubocurarine gallamine and decamethonium from biological material.
7	effects of therapeutic irradiation delivered in early childhood upon subsequent lung function	Effects of apo; therapeutic irradiation in early childhood on subsequent lung function.
7	chemoreceptor reflexes in preterm infants ii the effect of gestational and postnatal age on the ventilatory response to inhaled carbon dioxide	Chemo-receptor reflexes in preterm infants; effect of pregnancy; gestational and postnatal age on ventilatory response to apo; carbon dioxide inhalation.
7	extravascular lung water following hemorrhagic shock in the baboon comparison between resuscitation with ringer s lactate and plasmanate	Extravascular pulmonary water following hemorrhagic shock in the baboon comparison between resuscitation with serum lactate and plasmanate.
7	cultivation and survival studies of neisseria gonorrhoeae in a human diploid cell strain	Culture and survival studies of neisseria gonorrhoeae in a human diploid cell strain.
7	a new model for neonatal pulmonary hemorrhage research	A new model for neonatal pulmonary hemorrhage research.
7	the significance of circulating glycerol as a precursor of pulmonary phosphatidylcholine in the developing mammalian lung	L' importance of circulating glycerol as a precursor of pulmonary phosphatidylcholine in developing mammalian lungs.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid i validation and significance of method for determination of volume and volume change	Validation and significance of method for determination of volume and volume changes in fetal lung fluid; lamb i.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid ii fate of phosphatidylcholine	Fetal lung fluid d' lamb ii become phosphatidylcholine.
7	the enzymes of lecithin biosynthesis in human neonatal lungs iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase	Enzymes of lecithin biosynthesis in human neonatal lungs iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase.
7	cerebral etiology of the acute respiratory distress syndrome diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis	Cerebral etiology of acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis.
7	increased rna synthesis in nuclear monolayers of wi 38 cells stimulated to proliferate	Increased rna synthesis in the nuclear monolayers of wi 38 cells stimulated to proliferate.
7	inhibition by levamisole of metastases by cells transformed by herpes simplex virus type i	L' inhibition by levamisole of metastasis by cells transformed by L&apos virus; herpes simplex type i.
7	differential effects of prostaglandins a1 and a2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in the dog	Differential effects of prostaglandins a1 and a2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in the dog.
7	alveolar lavage cytology in transplanted lungs i staining methods and findings in dogs with autografts and allografts without immunosuppression	Alveolar washing cytology in transplanted lungs i staining methods and findings in dogs with autografts and allografts without immunosuppression.
7	pulmonary problems in duchenne muscular dystrophy diagnosis prophylaxis and treatment	Pulmonary problems in prophylaxis and treatment of duchenne muscular dystrophy.
7	diagnostic approaches in metastatic lung disease	These are diagnostic approaches to metastatic lung disease.
7	vasoactive intestinal polypoptide inactivation in liver and potentiation in lung of anesthetized dogs 384699	Inactivation of vasoactive intestinal polypopulations in the liver and potentiation in the lungs of anesthetized dogs 384699.
7	metabolic and dosimetric studies after inhalation of 227th in rats with regard to the risk of lung and bone tumors	Metabolic and dosimetric studies after inhalation of 227e in rats with respect to the risk of lung and bone tumours.
7	pulmonary radiographic abnormalities in shock roentgen clinical pathological correlation	Pulmonary radiographic abnormalities in clinical pathological correlation of shock roentgen.
7	gallstone in the lung	Gallstones in the lungs.
7	experimental infection of calves with respiratory syncytial virus	Experimental infection of calves with respiratory syncytial virus.
7	experimental infection of lambs with an aerosol of pasteurella haemolytica	Infection with an aerosol of pasteurella haemolytica.
7	a model of the pathways of inhaled medicaments to their receptor sites	This is a model of the pathways of inhaled drugs to their receptor sites.
7	intraspecies differences in lung metabolism and granular pneumocyte mitochondria	Intraspecific differences in lung metabolism and granular pneumocyte mitochondria.
7	gas transport efficacy of gills lungs and skin theory and experimental data	L' gill gas transport efficiency, lung and skin theory and experimental data.
7	postnatal growth of the mammalian lung lack of influence by carbon monoxide exposure	The postnatal growth of the lungs of mammals is not influenced by carbon monoxide exposure.
7	progress in fetal assessment	Progress in fetal evaluation.
7	a determination of the minimum radiopacification necessary for radiographic detection of an aspirated or swallowed object	Determination of the minimum radiopacification required for radiographic detection of an aspirated or swallowed object.
7	treatment of crenosomiasis in dogs	Treatment of crenosomiasis in dogs.
7	mode of action of chlorambucil initial metabolic studies using carbon 14 isotope labeling rheumatological implications of their results	Mode of action of chlorambucil initial metabolic studies using carbon isotope labeling 14 rheumatological implications of their results.
7	sarcoid reactions in pulmonary neoplasms	Acute sarcoid reactions in pulmonary neoplasms.
7	isolation of type c virions from a normal human fibroblast strain	Isolate the human fibroblast virus type c from a normal human fibroblast strain.
7	pulmonary edema in patients with sepsis	Acute pulmonary edema in patients with sepsis.
7	bronchial venular leakage during endotoxin shock	Venous bronchial leak during endotoxin shock.
7	on glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharide in a case of pulmonary fibrosis author s transl	On glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharide in a case of translative pulmonary fibrosis.
7	lactate formation by the avian lung tissue	Lactate formation by the avian lung tissue.
7	comprehensive lung function test for outpatients a present day review and its application	Complete lung function test for external patients a current day examination and its application.
7	inflation reflex in the rat	Reflex inflation in the rat.
7	dual camera studies of pulmonary function with computer processing of data	Dual camera studies of pulmonary function with data processing.
7	the fat embolism syndrome	Lapos syndrome; fat embolism.
7	clearing patterns of pulmonary infarction and slowly resolving pneumonia	Slow resolution models of pulmonary infarction and pneumonia.
7	methacholine a 7 day inhalation toxicity study with primates	Methacholine, a seven-day inhalation toxicity study in human primates.
7	effects of intratracheal instillation of dactinomycin on pulmonary edema and phosphatase activity of the lung lavage fluid in rats	Effect of inhalation; intratracheal instillation of dactinomycin on the apos; pulmonary edema and l' phosphatase activity of the lung lavage fluid in the rat.
7	conditioned medium from plateau phase cells effect on growth of proliferative cells and on repair of potentially lethal radiation damage	The conditioned medium from plateau phase cells has an effect on the growth of proliferative cells and on the repair of potentially lethal radiation damage.
7	idiopathic progressive pulmonary fibrosis	Idiopathic progressive pulmonary fibrosis.
7	absorption of phenol red from the human lung	L' absorption of phenol red from the human lungs.
7	growth and development of human fetal trachea and lung in immune deprived mice	Growth and development of fetal trachea and lung in immunocompromised mice.
7	patho histological findings on pulmonary biopsy in patients after mitral commissurotomy and morphometric studies of the upper and lower pulmonary lobes author s transl	Pathological histological studies of lung biopsy in patients after mitral commissurotomy and morphometric studies of the upper and lower pulmonary lobes.
7	increase of dermatan sulfate in a case of pulmonary fibrosis	Increased dermatan sulfate in a case of pulmonary fibrosis.
7	zwoegerziekte virus the causative agent for progressive interstitial pneumonia maedi and meningo leucoencephalitis visna in sheep	Zwoegerziekte virus is a causative agent for progressive interstitial pneumonia and meningo leukoencephalitis in sheep.
7	evolution of spirographic patterns in pulmonary bilaterally denervated dogs	Evolution of spirographic patterns in pulmonary dogs denervated bilaterally and bilaterally.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Los; effect of nitrosomethylurea on cultures of human embryonic lung tissue organs.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Los; effect of nitrosomethylurea on cultures of human embryonic lung tissue organs.
7	the metabolism of 3 h cortisone and 3 h cortisol by the isolated perfused rat and guinea pig lungs	The metabolism of 3-h cortisone and 3-h cortisol by isolated perfused rat and guinea pig lungs.
7	cellular proliferation induced in the lung by cadmium aerosol	Cellular proliferation induced in the lungs by cadmium aerosols.
7	asbestos exposure and multiple primary tumors	Asbestos exposure and multiple primary tumours.
7	alpha antitrypsin pi types in postmortem blood	Alpha antitrypsin pi types in blood post-mortem.
7	hyperlucent lung after radiation therapy	Lungs are hyperlucid after radiation therapy.
7	iniencephalus apertus report of a case author s transl	Iniencephalus apertus report d'apos; case author s translations.
7	biosynthesis of collagen and mode of action of d penicillamine author s transl	Biosynthesis of collagen and mode of action of apos; author of penicillamine.
7	spontaneous perforation of the proximal colon following lung surgery	Spontaneous perforation of the proximal colon following lung surgery.
7	pulmonary tumourlets	Uh, lung tumors.
7	corticosteroids in clinical and experimental lung transplantation	Corticosteroids in clinical and experimental lung transplants.
7	purification and some properties of arginase from human lung	The purification and certain properties of arginase in human lungs.
7	accumulation of alprenolol in some polypeptide hormone producing cells and in melanin containing tissues	L' accumulation of alprenolol in some polypeptide hormones and melanin-containing tissues.
7	dual infections of mice visceral larva migrans and sublethal infection with japanese encephalitis virus	Double infection of migrating larval visceral mice and sublethal infection with Japanese encephalitis.
7	the pathology of naturally occurring bovine schistosomiasis in the sudan	Disease of bovine schistosomiasis d' natural origin in southern.
7	pulmonary complications of acute myocardial infarct therapeutic orientation	Pulmonary complications of the spinal cord; acute myocardial infarction.
7	naturally occurring tyzzer s disease bacillus piliformis infection in horse foals	Natural Tyzzer's disease bacillus infection in horse foals.
7	a case of polytetrafluoroethylene poisoning in cockatiels accompanied by polymer fume fever in the owner	One case of polytetrafluoroethylene poisoning in cockatiels accompanied by polymer fume fever in the owner.
7	an evaluation of the inhalation toxicity of one commercial proteolytic enzyme preparation	Evaluation of the inhalation toxicity of a commercial proteolytic preparation of enzymes.
7	histamine induction and release following proteolytic enzyme exposure	Induction and release of histamine following proteolytic enzyme exposure.
7	hematologic responses to prolonged extracorporeal circulation ecc with microporous membrane devices	Hematological responses to prolonged extracorporeal circulation with microporous membrane devices.
7	antihistaminic action of trans delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Antihistamine action of trans delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol.
7	cardiophrenic adenopathy in hodgkin disease	Acute cardiophrenic adenopathy in Hodgkin's disease.
7	pneumatoceles following hydrocarbon ingestion report of three cases and review of the literature	Pneumatocles following hydrocarbons ingestion have been documented; a report of three cases and a review of the literature.
7	effect of the exposure to cold on the extrathyroidal conversion of l thyroxine to triiodo l thyronine and on intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in thyroidectomized rats on l thyroxine	Effect of apo; exposure to cold on the extrathyroid conversion of thyroxine to triiodo lronine and on l' intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in thyroidectomized rats.
7	characteristics of proliferative cells from young old and transformed wi 38 cultures	Characteristics of the proliferative cells of young old and transformed wi 38 cultures.
7	alterations in chromatin functions during aging in vitro	Changes in chromatin functions during aging in vitro.
7	relationship between cell kinetic changes and metabolic events during cell senescence in vitro	Relationship between cellular kinetic changes and metabolic events during cell senescence in vitro.
7	time lapse cinemicrophotographic studies of cell division patterns of human diploid fibroblasts wi 38 during their in vitro lifespan	Chronological cinemicrophotographic studies of cell division patterns of human diploid fibroblasts during their lifetime in vitro.
7	the amniotic fluid foam test l s ratio and total phospholipids in the evaluation of fetal lung maturity	Amniotic fluid foam tests the ratio and total phospholipids in the fetal lung maturity assessment.
7	inhalatory infection of mice with influenza a0 pr8 virus i the site of primary virus replication and its spread in the respiratory tract	Inhalation of mice with influenza virus a0 pr8 at apos; site of primary replication of virus and spread in the respiratory tract.
7	effect of 60amino 6 deoxy d glucose hydrochloride on influenza infection in mice	Effect of 60amino 6 deoxy d glucose hydrochloride on apos; mouse influenza infection.
7	interferon production by rabies strains isolated from wild rodents	Interferon by rabies strains isolated from wild rodents.
7	depression of pulmonary 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake by metabolic inhibitors	Decreased apos; pulmonary absorption of apos; hydroxytryptamine 5 by metabolic inhibitors.
7	bacteremia and postmortem microbiology in burned children	Bacteremia and postmortem microbiology in burn children.
7	pulmonary infection due to disruption of the pharyngeal bacterial flora by antibiotics in hamsters	Pulmonary infection due to disruption of pharyngeal bacterial flora by antibiotics in hamsters.
7	risk of respiratory distress syndrome as determined by amniotic fluid lecithin concentration	Risk of respiratory distress syndrome as determined by amniotic fluid lecithin concentration.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fetal lung maturity i assessment of various methods of determining lecithin and sphingomyelin	Evaluation of amniotic fluid phospholipids and fetal lung maturity i of various methods of lecithin and sphingomyelin determination.
7	pulmonary embolism associated with surgically proved deep venous thrombosis	A pulmonary embolism associated with surgically proven deep vein thrombosis.
7	experimental investigations on the effectiveness of fenbendazole in parasitic helminths of the stomach intestines and lung of cattle author s transl	Experimental studies on the effectiveness of fenbendazole in the helminths of the stomach and lungs of cattle were carried out.
7	a comparison of two heated water bath humidifiers	Comparison of two bath humidifiers d' hot water.
7	evaluation of infant ventilators	L' evaluation of apo fans; apo fan child; apo child; apo team; evaluation.
7	isolation of two turkey influenza a viruses in minnesota	The isolation of two turkey influenza a viruses in Minnesota.
7	acute copper toxicosis in the canada goose	Acute copper toxicity in the Canadian geese.
7	candida tropicalis infecting the respiratory tract of turkeys in israel	It infects the respiratory tract of turkeys in the intestines.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii v preflight studies on tolerance of pocket mice to oxygen and heat part ii effects on lungs	The effects of cosmic radiation on hand-held mice on board pre@-@ light studies on the tolerance of hand-held mice to apos; oxygen and heat part ii effects on the lungs.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii appendix iii evaluation of viscera and other tissues	Effects of cosmic radiation on hand-held mice on board; appendices; apollo xvii, evaluation of viscera and other tissues.
7	influence of hypothalamic hyperphagia on tolerance of lung to explosive decompression	Influence of apo; hypothalamic hyperphagia on lung tolerance to explosive decompression.
7	giant cell carcinoma of lung a cytologic evaluation	Giant cell carcinoma of the lungs, cytological evaluation.
7	quantitation in morphology possibilities and limits	Quantification in morphological possibilities and limits in possibilities and limits.
7	ultrastructural studies on cells of hamster lung cultures after chronic exposure to whole smoke or the gas vapour phase of cigarettes	Ultrastructural studies on the cells of hamster lung cultures following chronic exposure to whole smoke or the gaseous phase of cigarettes.
7	postmortem fixation of human lungs for electron microscopy	Post-fixation @-@mortem of human lungs for electron microscopy.
7	lung growth after unilateral pneumonectomy quantitation of collagen synthesis and content	Pulmonary growth after unilateral pneumonectomy quantitation of collagen content and synthesis.
7	isolation and chemical characterization of collagen in bovine pulmonary tissues	Isolation and chemical characterization of collagen in bovine pulmonary tissue.
7	acid base disorders application of total body carbon dioxide titration in anesthesia	Application of acidic-basic total body carbon dioxide titration in anesthesia.
7	isolation and characterization of acidic structural glycoproteins in pulmonary tissues	The isolation and characterization of acidic structural glycoproteins in lung tissue.
7	subcellular localization of pulmonary antiotensin converting enzyme kininase ii	Subcellular localization of apos; conversion enzyme; kininase pulmonary antiotensin ii.
7	advances in the treatment of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis	Progress in the treatment of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis.
7	methyl iodide intoxication a case report	Report of cases; methyl iodide poisoning.
7	tracheal mucous transport in beagles after long term exposure to 1 ppm sulfur dioxide	Tracheal mucous transport in beagles after long term exposure to 1 ppm sulfur dioxide.
7	long term exposure to sulfur dioxide sulfuric acid mist fly ash and their mixtures results of studies in monkeys and guinea pigs	Long-term exposure to sulfur dioxide, sulfuric acid fog, fly ash and their mixtures results from studies in monkeys and guinea pigs.
7	primary amyloidosis of the respiratory tract	This is primary amyloidosis of the respiratory tract.
7	pulmonary responses of unilateral positive end expiratory pressure peep on experimental fat embolism	The positive pulmonary responses of unilateral expiratory pressure at the end of the experiment were observed during an experimental adipose embolism.
7	epidemiological implications of environmental cadmium i the probable utility of human hair for occupational trace metal cadmium screening	Epidemiological implications of cadmium in the environment; likely utility of human hair for occupational trace metal cadmium screening.
7	orbital and conjunctival involvement in multiple myeloma report of a case	Orbital and conjunctival involvement in multiple myeloma (MMI) reporting.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue i virus isolation	Cytomegalovirus studies in tissues; autopsy isolation of virus.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue ii incidence of inclusion bodies and related pathologic data	Cytomegalovirus autopsy tissue studies ii Incidence of included bodies and related pathological data.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of a leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Unusual ultrastructural features of the lung leiomyosarcoma.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Unusual ultrastructural features of the lung leiomyosarcomas.
7	herpetic tracheobronchitis cytologic and virologic detection	Cytological and virologic detection of herpetic tracheobronchitis.
7	changes in functional residual capacity of the lung after operation	Changes in functional residual capacity of the lungs following surgery.
7	inhibition of cardiolipin synthesis following infection with herpes simplex virus	Inhibition of cardiolipin synthesis following infection with herpes simplex virus.
7	eosinophilic gastroenteritis with malabsorption extensive villous atrophy recurrent hemorrhage and chronic pulmonary fibrosis	Gastro-eosinophilic enteritis with widespread malabsorption villositary atrophy recurrent hemorrhage and chronic pulmonary fibrosis.
7	radiologic evaluation of the premature newborn rabbit after pharyngeal deposition of surfactant	Radiological evaluation of the premature rabbit again-born after pharyngeal deposition of d' surfactant.
7	oncocytes a system of serotoninocytes	Oncocytes, a system of serotoninocytes.
7	pathological anatomy of pneumonia in mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children	The pathological anatomy of pneumonia in the apos; mycoplasma pneumonia infection in children.
7	collagen metabolism in rat lungs during chronic intermittent exposure to oxygen	Collagen metabolism in rat lungs during breathing; chronic intermittent exposure to apo; oxygen.
7	transversal and longitudinal lecithin sphingomyelin ratios in amniotic and lung fluids of fetal lambs	Transverse and longitudinal ratio of lecithin sphingomyelins in amniotic and pulmonary fluids of fetal lambs.
7	extraction and preliminary characterization of a human bronchogenic carcinoma antigen	Preliminary extraction and characterization of a human bronchogenic carcinoma antigen.
7	study of the antigenic cross reactivity between carcinoembryonic antigen and nonspecific cross reacting antigens nca and nca 2	Study of the cross antigenic reactivity between carcinoembryonic antigen and nonspecific crossed antigens nca and nca 2.
7	enzymatic formation of inosine 3 5 monophosphate and of 2 deoxyguanosine 3 5 monophosphate inosinate and deoxyguanylate cyclase activity	Enzymatic formation of the etapos; inosine 3,5 monophosphate and deoxyguanosine 2, 3,5 monophosphate inosinate and deoxyguanylate cyclase.
7	lipoprotein lipase in rat lung the effect of fasting	Lipoprotein lipase in rat lung tissue, the effect of fasting.
7	pulmonary lymphangiomyomatosis a review	It's called pulmonary lymphangiomyoma.
7	differential in vivo pulmonary degradation of prostaglandins e1 b1 and a1	Differential in vivo pulmonary degradation of prostaglandins e1 b1 and a1.
7	enzymic n acetylation of 2 4 toluenediamine by liver cytosols from various species	The enzymatic acetylation of 24 toluenediamine by the hepatic cytosols of various species.
7	roentgenographic findings in fucosidosis type 2	Rotentgenography results in type 2 fucoside.
7	the circle system without absorber use with controlled ventilation	Circular system without use of absorbor with controlled ventilation.
7	new advances in pulmonary gas exchange	New developments in pulmonary gas exchange.
7	inhibition of benzo alpha pyrene metabolism catalyzed by mouse and hamster lung microsomes	The inhibition of benzo alpha pyrene metabolism catalyzed by mouse and hamster lung microsomes.
7	characterization of a rat lung microsomal fraction obtained by sepharose 2b ultrafiltration	Characterization of a rat lung microsomal fraction obtained by serpharose ultrafiltration 2b.
7	excretion of carbon 14 labeled aflatoxin b1 via bile urine and intestinal contents of the chicken	L' 14C-labelled aflatoxin b1 via the apos; bile urine and intestinal contents of the chicken.
7	coincidence of sarcoidosis and hashimoto s thyroiditis	Coincidence of onset; sarcoidosis and progestin; hashimoto thyroiditis.
7	occult pulmonary hemorrhage in anticoagulated patients	Acute occult pulmonary hemorrhage in anticoagulated patients.
7	adult respiratory distress syndrome in postoperative patients study of pulmonary pathology in shock lung with prophylactic and therapeutic implications	Adult respiratory distress syndrome in post-operative patients, study of pulmonary pathology in shock lungs with prophylactic and therapeutic implications.
7	respiratory tract disease from thermosetting resins study of an outbreak in rubber tire workers	Respiratory disease caused by thermosetting resins Study of an outbreak in rubber tire workers.
7	do the severity and duration of rheumatoid arthritis influence pulmonary ventilation	Do the severity and duration of rheumatoid arthritis affect pulmonary ventilation?
7	fatal self administration of sodium azide	Auto @-@fatal administration of sodium azide and sodium azide.
7	maternal and transplacental kinetics of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole separately and in combination	Maternal and transplacental kinetics of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole separately and in combination.
7	monolayer cultures of human prostatic cells	Monolayer cultures of human prostate cells.
7	localization of polycyclic hydrocarbon carcinogens in the lung following intratracheal instillation in gelatin solution	The localization of carcinogenic polycyclic hydrocarbons in the lungs following intratracheal instillation in gelatin solution.
7	species differences in the effect of benzo alpha pyrene ferric oxide on the respiratory tract of rats and hamsters	Differences between species in the effect of benzo alpha pyrene ferric oxide on the respiratory tract of rats and hamsters.
7	occurrence of hemangiosarcomas in beagles with internally deposited radionuclides	Apos; hemangiosarcomas in beagles with internal radionuclide deposition.
7	damage and repair of dna in various tissues of the rat induced 4 nitroquinoline 1 oxide	The alteration and repair of DNA in various tissues of the rat induced 4 nitroquinoline oxides 1.
7	d valine as a selective agent for normal human and rodent epithelial cells in culture	Valine as a selective agent for normal human and rodent epithelial cells in culture.
7	drying and irradiation of calf and horse serum i influence on the growth of cell cultures and mycoplasmas	The drying and irradiation of calf and horse serum influence the growth of cell cultures and mycoplasmas.
7	effect of increased vascular pressure on lung fluid balance in unanesthetized sheep	Effects of increased vascular pressure on lung fluid balance in unanesthetized sheep.
7	effect of exercise on dilution estimates of extravascular lung water and on the carbon monoxide diffusing capacity in normal adults	Effect of apo; exercise on dilution estimates of extravascular lung water and carbon monoxide diffusion capacity in normal adults.
7	the echocardiographic assessment of pulmonary artery pressure and pulmonary vascular resistance	L' echocardiographic assessment of pulmonary arterial pressure and pulmonary vascular resistance.
7	desquamative fibrosing alveolitis unresponsive to steroid or cytotoxic therapy	Fibrosing alveolite desquamative insensitive to steroid or cytotoxic treatment.
7	mechanism of the serotonin effect on lung transvascular fluid and protein movement in awake sheep	Dosage mechanisms; effect of serotonin on lung transvascular fluid and protein movement in awake sheep.
7	effect of thyroid hormones on activity of nonspecific phosphohydrolases in blood serum tissues and liver mitochondrial fraction of white rat	Effect of thyroid hormones on apos; activity of nonspecific phosphohydrolases in blood serum tissues and the hepatic mitochondrial fraction of white rat.
7	pulmonary fungal infection complicating treated malignant disease	Pulmonary fungal infection complicating treatment of malignancy.
7	a study of various changes in transfer ribonucleic acid methylase activity during adenovirus 12 transformation in vitro	A study of various changes in apo activity; transfer ribonucleic acid methylase activity during the transformation of apos; adenovirus 12 in vitro.
7	cryptogenic fibrosing alveolitis	It's called cryptogenic fibrosing alveolite.
7	pulmonary granulomas in a patient with pulmonary veno occlusive disease	Pulmonary granulomas in a patient with pulmonary veno occlusive disease.
7	cardiopulmonary changes following 24 36 hours of hyperoxia	Cardio-respiratory changes after 24 hours of exposure; hyperoxia.
7	development of a live attenuated varicella vaccine	Development of a live attenuated varicella vaccine.
7	application of a live attenuated varicella vaccine to hospitalized children and its protective effect on spread of varicella infection	Application of a live attenuated varicella vaccine to hospitalized children and its protective effect on the spread of varicella infection.
7	purification and separation of enveloped and unenveloped herpes simplex virus particles	Herpes simplex virus purification and separation of enveloped and unwrapped particles.
7	regional pulmonary function before and after pneumonectomy using 133xenon	Regional lung functions before and after pneumonectomy at 133xenon.
7	volume controlled lung lavage in a woman with cystic fibrosis	Volume-controlled lung lavage in a woman with cystic fibrosis.
7	doxycycline concentrations in lung tissue bronchial wall and bronchial secretions	Doxycycline concentrations in bronchial wall and bronchial secretions of lung tissue.
7	visualization of doxycycline in lung tissue and sinus secretions by fluorescent techniques	The visualization of doxycycline in lung tissue and sinus secretions by fluorescent techniques.
7	the occurrence of mercury in amphibia	The occurrence of mercury in amphibians.
7	hydatid disease transmission in california a study of the basque connection	Transmission of Hydatidanian diseases in California, a study of the Basque-speaking connection.
7	fatal disseminated adenovirus infection in a renal transplant recipient	Dispersed fatal adenovirus infection in a renal transplant recipient.
7	the influence of environmental agents on prostaglandin biosynthesis and metabolism in the lung inhibition of lung 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by exposure of guinea pigs to 100 per cent oxygen at atmospheric pressure	L' influence of environmental agents on prostaglandin biosynthesis and metabolism in adults; pulmonary inhibition of 15 lung hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by apos; exposure of guinea pigs to 100% d' oxygen to atmospheric pressure.
7	respiratory function in pregnant obese women	Respiratory function in obese pregnant women.
7	the influence of pulmonary growth and development on paediatric respiratory diseases	L' influence of lung growth and development on paediatric respiratory diseases.
7	factors affecting the concentration of combustible gases in the colon during colonoscopy	Factors affecting the concentration of combustible gases in the colon during colonoscopy.
7	effect of the protease inhibitor aprotinin on pulmonary function and on the inhibitory activity of sputum in patients with chronic obstructive bronchitis	Effect of protease inhibitors, aprotinin, on pulmonary function and lipids; inhibitory activity of lipids; sputum in patients with chronic obstructive bronchitis.
7	ventilation and blood gas studies during experimentally produced mendelson s syndrome in the dog	Ventilation and blood gas studies during trials produced mendelson syndrome in dogs.
7	change in end tidal position in children after suxamethonium	Change in terminal tide position in children after sux-methonium.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog i demonstration of microthrombi in lung	Thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog i demonstration of microthrombi in the lung.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog ii cardiorespiratory changes during spontaneous and controlled ventilation	Thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog ii cardiorespiratory changes during spontaneous and controlled ventilation.
7	growth and development of the fetal rhesus monkey vi morphometric analysis of the developing lung	Growth and development of lung cancer; fetal viometric morphometric analysis of the developing rhesus lung monkey.
7	characteristics of bovine lung as observed by scanning electron microscopy	Characteristics of the bovine lung as observed by scanning electron microscopy.
7	determination of fluorocarbon 11 and fluorocarbon 12 in post mortem tissues a case report	Determination of fluorocarbon 11 and fluorocarbon 12 in tissues postmortem.
7	studies on the immune response and pathogenesis of sendai virus infection of mice iii the effects of cyclophosphamide	Studies on the immune response and pathogenesis of apos; infection of mice by the virus sentai iii the effects of cyclophosphamide.
7	ultrasonic pulmonary densitometry preliminary studies	Lung ultrasonic densitometry preliminary studies.
7	changes in template activity and structure of nuclei from wi 38 cells in the prereplicative phase	Modifications of the apos; activity of the matrix and structure of nuclei of cells wi 38 during the pre-replicative phase.
7	xero radiography of the thorax author s transl	X X-rays of the apos; thorax author s translations.
7	radiological features of the rectal manifestations of myelofibrosis author s transl	Radiological characteristics of the rectal manifestations of myelofibrosis translation from l&apos.
7	diagnosis of neisseria infections by defined immunofluorescence methodologic aspects and applications	The diagnosis of neisseria infections by defined aspects and methodological applications of immunofluorescence.
7	direct association of messenger rna with microsomal membranes in human diploid fibroblasts	L' direct association of messenger rna with microsomal membranes in human diploid fibroblasts.
7	idiopathic scoliosis mechanical properties of the respiratory system and the ventilatory response to carbon dioxide	Idiopathic scoliosis mechanical properties of the respiratory system and the ventilatory response to carbon dioxide.
7	effects of a molecular change in collagen on lung structure and mechanical function	The effects of a molecular change in collagen on lung structure and mechanical function.
7	experimental pulmonary fibrosis induced by soluble immune complex and 60 oxygen atmosphere	Experimental pulmonary fibrosis induced by soluble immune complex and 60-oxygen atmosphere.
7	behaviour of local and systemic immunoglobulins in patients with lung cancer	The behaviour of local and systemic immunoglobulins in patients with lung cancer.
7	bovine parainfluenza type 3 virus infection ultrastructural aspects of viral pathogenesis in the bovine respiratory tract	Type 3 bovine parainfluenza virus infection: ultrastructural aspects of viral pathogenesis in the respiratory tract of cattle.
7	pulmonary perfusion ventilation and gas exchange during modified cobalt 60 teletherapy of operated on breast carcinomas	Lung perfusion ventilation and lapos; gas exchange during modified cobalt 60 teletherapy of lapos; breast carcinoma operation.
7	nicotine inhibition of the metabolism of 3 4 benzopyrene a carcinogen in tobacco smoke	L' nicotine inhibition of the metabolism of 34 benzopyrene, a carcinogen in tobacco smoke.
7	survival of synchronized chinese hamster cells exposed to radiation of different linear energy transfer	Survival of synchronized Chinese hamster cells exposed to radiation from various linear energy transfers.
7	differential diagnosis of a round infiltrative tubercular focus and pulmonary tuberculoma	Differential diagnosis of a round infiltrating tubercular focus and pulmonary tuberculoma.
7	dyspnea in the patient with cardiopulmonary disease	Dyspnea in the patient with cardiopulmonary disease.
7	streptomycin and kanamycin level in the blood and lungs of guinea pigs when the antibiotics are administered by inhalation and intramuscularly	Levels of streptomycin and kanamycin in the blood and lungs of guinea pigs when the antibiotics are administered by inhalation and intramuscularly.
7	treatment of influenza infection of mice by using rimantadine hydrochlorides by the aerosol and intraperitoneal routes	Aerosol and intraperitoneal treatment for influenza infection of mice with rimantadine hydrochloride.
7	indications for mediatinoscopy author s transl	Indications for translation by mediatinoscopic authors.
7	effect of metopirone on the synthesis of lung surfactant in does and fetal rabbits	The effect of metopirone on the synthesis of lung surfactant in rabbits and fetal rabbits.
7	effects of chronic oral contraceptive treatment on the conversion of angiotensin i to angiotensin ii in the rat	The effects of chronic oral contraceptive treatment on the conversion of angiotensin i to angiotensin ii in rats.
7	age smoking inhalation and pulmonary function	Tobacco inhalation and the pulmonary function of smoking seniors.
7	effect of maternal malnutrition on surface activity of fetal lungs in rats	The effect of maternal malnutrition on body weight; surface activity of the fetal lungs in rats.
7	modification of respiratory center output in the unanesthetized fetal sheep in utero	Change in respiratory center flow in unanesthetized fetal sheep in utero.
7	residual levels and biochemical changes after ventilation with perfluorinated liquid	Residual levels and biochemical changes after ventilation with perfluoro fluid.
7	effect of continuous postive pressure ventilation cppv on edema formation in dog lung	Epos; continuous postive pressure ventilation cppv on canine lung edema formation.
7	experimentally reversed pulmonary blood flow implications for the surgical management of complex forms of congenital heart disease	Experimental reversal of pulmonary blood flow on the surgical treatment of complex forms of congenital heart disease.
7	obstructive pulmonary emphysema evolution of various parameters of pulmonary function and its correlation	Obstructive pulmonary emphysema of various parameters of pulmonary function and its correlation.
7	antitussive drugs i cardiopulmonary effects of codeine	Antitussive drugs i cardiopulmonary effects of codeine.
7	antitussive drugs ii bronchopulmonary effects of dextromethorphan and doxylamine	Antitussive drugs ii bronchopulmonary effects of hormone and doxylamine.
7	biotransformation and biliary excretion of imipramine in rats under various experimental conditions	Biotransformation and biliary excretion of imipramine in rats under various experimental conditions.
7	pulmonary alveolar proteinosis and histoplasmosis report of three cases	Three cases of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis and histoplasmosis were reported.
7	pulmonary angiotensin converting enzyme structural and catalytic properties	Lapses; pulmonary angiotensin converts structural and catalytic properties of the enzyme.
7	glucocorticoid receptors in lung comparison between nonactivated and activated forms of the cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein and their relationship to the nuclear binding protein of fetal rabbit lung	Glucocorticoid receptors in the lung comparison between the activated and nonactivated forms of the cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein and their relationship to the nuclear binding protein of the fetal rabbit lung.
7	compatible bone marrow transplantation and immunologic reconstitution of combined immunodeficiency disease	Compatible bone marrow transplant and immunologic reconstitution of apos; combined immunodeficiency.
7	bronchiolar emphysema in a child at the age of 1 1 2 months	Bronchiolar emphysema in a child of 1 year and 2 months.
7	diabetic feto and embryopathies	Uh, diabetic feto and embryopathies.
7	method for the functional evaluation of contrasted vessels of the lungs with the aid of stereoroentgenogrammetry and morphometry	Procedure; functional evaluation of the vessels opposite the lungs to the apos; help with stereoentgenogrammetry and morphometry.
7	clinicopathologic characterization of herpesvirus saimiri malignant lymphoma in new zealand white rabbits	Clinical characterization of herpesvirus saimiri malignant lymphoma in new zealand white rabbits.
7	iodination of herpesvirus nucleic acids	Iodization of herpesvirus nucleic acids.
7	enhanced inactivation of prostaglandin e2 by the rabbit lung during pregnancy or progesterone treatment	Increased inactivation of prostaglandin e2 by the rabbit lung during pregnancy or progesterone treatment.
7	the effect of intrauterine phrenic nerve division on the development of the lungs and diaphragm in fetal rabbits	L' effect of intra @-@uterine phrenic nerve division on lung and diaphragm development in fetal rabbits.
7	congenital respiratory tract defects in lambs	Congenital respiratory tract defects in lambs.
7	cure regression and cell survival a comparison of common radiobiological endpoints using an in vitro tumour model	Comparison of common radiobiological parameters at the x-ray site; assistance from an in vitro tumour model.
7	gas chromatographic evaluation of the volatile constituents of lung brain and liver tissues	Gas chromatographic evaluation of volatile components of lung brain and liver tissue.
7	radiographic manifestations of malignant mixed uterine tumors	X-ray manifestations of malignant mixed uterine tumours.
7	correction by hyaluronidase of the interstitial tissue transport defect during shock a new approach to therapy	The correction by apos; hyaluronidase of the interstitial transport defect during shock is a new therapeutic approach.
7	quantitative studies on cell mediated immunity in the pleural cavity of guinea pigs	Quantitative studies on cell-mediated immunity in the pleural cavity of guinea pigs.
7	physiological pathological correlations in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Physiological pathological correlations in pneumoconiosis coal workers.
7	toxicity of platinum iv salts for cells of pulmonary origin	Toxicity of platinum iv to d&apos cells; pulmonary origin.
7	the relative roles of platelets and macrophages in clearing particles from the blood the value of carbon clearance as a measure of reticuloendothelial phagocytosis	The relative roles of platelets and macrophages in the removal of particles from the blood the value of carbon clearance as a measure of reticuloendothelial phagocytosis.
7	a role for the eosinophil in acquired resistance to schistosoma mansoni infection as determined by antieosinophil serum	A role of eosinophilia in acquired resistance to schistosoma mansoni infection as determined by the antiteosinophil serum.
7	congenital lung malformations a unified concept and a case report	Congenital pulmonary defects A unified concept and a case report.
7	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis v lack of hematogenous dissemination of mycobacterium tuberculosis to the lungs in animals vaccinated with bacille calmette gu rin	Parasitic relationships between the host and the experimental airborne tuberculosis v lack of blood-borne dissemination of tubercular mycobacteria in the lungs in animals vaccinated with guin calf bacillus.
7	a comparison of chlormethiazole and diazepam as intravenous sedatives for fibre endoscopic examination of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Comparison of chlomethiazole and diazepam as intravenous sedatives for lacidosis; endoscopic examination of upper intestinal tract fibers.
7	morphine administration to pregnant rabbits effect on fetal growth and lung development	Morphine administration to pregnant rabbits has an effect on fetal growth and lung development.
7	interpreting chest radiographs without visual search	Interpretation of chest X-rays without visual research.
7	proceedings changes in the disease pattern of pulmonary tuberculosis	Changes in the pattern of pulmonary tuberculosis disease.
7	absorption distribution and excretion of trifluoperazine in rats	Distribution of d' absorption and excretion of trifluoperazine in rats.
7	the rabbit fetal lung as a glucocorticoid target tissue	The rabbit fetal lung as a glucocorticoid target tissue.
7	mechanisms of bronchial hyperreactivity in normal subjects after upper respiratory tract infection	Mechanism(s); bronchial hyperresponsiveness in normal subjects after upper respiratory tract infection.
7	lung damage caused by phospholipase c and the changes in phospholipids in the rat lung	Pulmonary injury caused by phospholipase c and changes in phospholipids in the rat lung.
7	effect of injection of a phosphorylcholine containing compound from nippostrongylus brasiliensis on the infestation of the rat by this parasite	Effect of the compound containing phosphorylcholine from nippostrongylus brasiliensis on the apos; infestation of the rat by this parasite.
7	pulmonary edemas anatomic study	Anatomical study of pulmonary edema.
7	particulate environmental matter as seen in lung sections	Particulate matter in the environment, as seen in lung sections.
7	gestational changes in pulmonary vascular responses in fetal lambs in utero	Gestational changes in pulmonary vascular responses in fetal lambs in utero.
7	a study of the inhalation of pentachlorophenol by rats part i a method for the determination of pentachlorophenol in rat plasma urine and tissue and in aerosol samples	A study of pentachlorophenol inhalation by rats, part I, a method for the determination of pentachlorophenol in rat urine and plasma tissues and in aerosol samples.
7	early diagnosis of cardiac insufficiency with the spiroergometric method	Early diagnosis of heart failure by the spiroergometric method.
7	clinico pharmacological examination of gentamycin in thoracic surgery	Clinical pharmacological examination of gentamycin in thoracic surgery.
7	calcium independent modulation of cyclic gmp and activation of guanylate cyclase by nitrosamines	Calcium independent modulation of cyclic gmp and activation of guanylate cyclase by nitrosamines.
7	an investigation of the chest radiographs in a controlled trial of busulphan cyclophosphamide and a placebo after resection for carcinoma of the lung	A study of the chest radiographs in a controlled trial of busulphan cyclophosphamide and a post-resection placebo for lung carcinoma.
7	pulmonary pathology in acute respiratory insufficiency lung biopsy as a diagnostic tool	Pulmonary pathology in acute respiratory failure lung biopsy as a diagnostic tool.
7	pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in isolated perfused lungs of macaca mulatta and papio species	The pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in isolated perfused lungs of macaca mulata and papio species.
7	freeze etch study of collagen i native collagen from tendon and lung of rats	Cryogenic study of native collagen from tendon and lungs of rats.
7	effect of angiotensin on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in isolated dog lung	Effect of angiotensin on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in isolated dog lung.
7	uremic lung lesions as a form of chronic edema	Pulmonary uremic lesions are a form of chronic edema.
7	pulmonary damage following pulmonary microembolism in the dog effect of various types of treatment	Pulmonary injury following pulmonary microembolism in the apos; canine effect of various types of treatment.
7	thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysm presenting as a solitary pulmonary nodule	Chest aorta-abdominal in the form of apos; a solitary pulmonary nodule.
7	morphological effects in rats following a 22 day space flight	Morphological effects in rats following 22 day space flight.
7	in vitro antagonism of the mediators of allergy by a benzopyrano benzopyran carboxylic acid pr d 92 ea	In vitro antagonism of the intermediates d' allergy to a benzopyrano benzopyranic carboxylic acid pr 92 ea d.
7	an ultrastructural study of the pathogenesis of tissue injury in limited wegener s granulomatosis	An ultrastructural study of the pathogenesis of tissue injury in granulomatose limited Wegener s.
7	gm2 ganglioside in fetal tay sachs disease brain cultures a model system for the disease	Gm2 ganglioside in the fetal brain of disease of Tay Sachs cultures a model system for the disease.
7	the hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by bovine lung tissue factor thromboplastin	The hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by bovine pulmonary tissue factor thromboplastin is a method used.
7	fluid flow in the human foetal lung a theoretical model	So, fluid flow in the human fetal lung, a theoretical model.
7	immunology of the lung	L' immunology of the lung.
7	chronic eosinophilic pneumonia ultrastructural evidence of marked immunoglobulin production plus macrophagic ingestion of eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes leading to intracytoplasmic charcot leyden crystals	Chronic eosinophilic pneumonia, ultrastructural evidence of apos; marked production of immunoglobulin and macrophage ingestion of eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes leading to intracytoplasmic charcoal crystal formation.
7	action of isoprenaline on the mechanical properties of lungs and airways in healthy people and patients with obstructive lung diseases	L' action of isoprenaline on the mechanical properties of the lungs and respiratory tract in healthy people and patients with obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	emphysema as possible explanation for the alteration of expiratory po2 and pco2 curves	L' emphysema is a possible explanation for the alteration of po2 and pco2 expiratory curves.
7	tuberculosis in scotland a national sample survey 1968 70 2 a two year follow up of newly diagnosed respiratory tuberculosis notified in 1968	Tuberculosis in Scotland, 1968 national sample survey 70,2 after two years of follow-up of the new cases of respiratory TB reported in 1968.
7	cell division and tissue repair following localized damage to the mammalian lung	Cell division and tissue repair following localized damage to the mammalian lungs.
7	scanning electron microscopy of the lungs of vitamin e deficient rats exposed to a low concentration of ozone	Scanning electron microscopy of the lungs of vitamin-deficient rats exposed to low concentrations of ozone.
7	further studies on the mechanism of adrenaline induced lipolysis in lipid micelles	D' other studies on the mechanism of adrenaline induce lipid micelle lipolysis.
7	transbronchoscopic cryosurgery of respiratory structures experimental and clinical studies	Cryosurgery transbronchoscopy of respiratory structures experimental and clinical studies.
7	comparative mutagenicity of n nitrosamines in a semi solid and in a liquid incubation system in the presence of rat or human tissue fractions	Comparison of the mutagenicity of nitrosamines in a solid medium with a liquid incubation in the presence of human or rat tissue fractions.
7	evidence for regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity and cholesterol synthesis in nonhepatic tissues of rat	Evidence for regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase and cholesterol synthesis in non-hepatic tissues of rat.
7	continuity of a rabbit antigen between generations	The continuity of a rabbit antigen between generations.
7	lung ph and pulmonary absorption of nonvolatile drugs in the rat	L' pulmonary absorption and pulmonary absorption of non-volatile drug products in rats.
7	increased elastic recoil as a determinant of pulmonary barotrauma in divers	Increased elastic recoil as a determinant of pulmonary barotrauma in divers.
7	the formation of histotypic structures from monodisperse fetal rat lung cells cultured on a three dimensional substrate	Formation of histotypic structures from monodisperse fetal rat lung cells cultured on three-dimensional substrate.
7	experimental morphological study of the vaccination process following aerosol application of lyophilized live influenza a2 hong kong and b ussr vaccines	An experimental morphological study of the post-dose immunization process; aerosol application of lyophilized live influenza vaccines a2 hong kong and b ussr.
7	lung inflation and alveolar permeability to non electrolytes in the adult sheep in vivo	Pulmonary influx and alveolar permeability to non-@-@ electrolytes in the adult sheep in vivo.
7	morphologic and biochemical study of pulmonary changes induced by bleomycin in mice	Morphological and biochemical study of pulmonary changes induced by bleomycin in mice.
7	studies on the migratory route of paragonimus siamensis in the bandicoot bandicota indica	Study of the migration route of paragonimus siamensis in the bandicoot bandicota indica indica.
7	new neonatal problems of blood coagulation and fibrinolysis ii thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid and its relation to lung maturity	New neonatal problems of blood clotting and fibrinolysis ii Thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid and its relation to lung maturity.
7	effect of inhaling medication vapors from a colds preparation on murine pulmonary bacterial defense systems	Effect of aspiration; inhalation of drug fumes from cold preparation on murine pulmonary bacterial defense systems.
7	pulmonary function in premature lambs during the first few hours of life	Pulmonary functions in premature lambs during the first few hours of life.
7	role of peridural anesthesia in thoracic surgery	The role of apo; epidural anesthesia in thoracic surgery.
7	immunisation with a polyvalent pneumococcal vaccine reduction of adult respiratory mortality in a new guinea highlands community	Immunization with polyvalent pneumococcal vaccine to reduce adult respiratory mortality in a new upland community in Guinea.
7	a study in the pharmacodynamics of oxytetracycline in the chicken	A study of the pharmacodynamics of oxytetracycline in chicken.
7	pathomorphology of lung alterations in calves naturally infected with the virus of infectious rhinotracheitis	Pathomorphology of pulmonary alterations in calves naturally infected with the infectious rhinotracheitis virus.
7	sarcoidosis initially occurring as apical infiltrate and pleural reaction	Sarcoidosis occurs initially as apical infiltration and pleural reaction.
7	needle aspiration biopsy a critical appraisal eight years and 3 267 specimens later	It's called a needle aspiration biopsy, a critical evaluation eight years later and 3,267 specimens later.
7	morphological macro micro electronoptical changes and cytoenzyme changes after ligation of the pulmonary artery pulmonary veins and both in dogs	Macroelectronoptic morphological changes and cytoenzymatic changes after ligation of the pulmonary veins of the lung artery and both in the dog.
7	a critical assessment of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in the production of exercise induced asthma	A critical evaluation of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in the production of asthma induced by exercise.
7	pulmonary allescheriasis report of a case from ontario canada	Pulmonary allescheriasis reported from apos; one case from ontario canada.
7	the effects of ephedrine on the physiological and psychological responses to submaximal and maximal exercise in man	The effects of ephedrine on the physiological and psychological responses to it; exercise under-maximal and maximal in the apos; man.
7	gallegostronglyus ibicensis n gen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae a lung parasite of mus musculus linnaeus 1758 rodentia muridale in ibiza balearic islands author s transl	Gallegostronglyus ibicensis ngen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae, a lung parasite of musculus linnaeus 1758 rodentia muridale in the islands ibiza balearic.
7	induction of monooxygenases in rhesus monkeys by 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism and mutagenic activation of n 2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene	Induction of monooxygenases in rhesus monkeys by metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes and mutagenic activation of n 2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene.
7	physical properties and biochemistry of lung surfactant following vagotomy	Physical and biochemical properties of lung surfactant after a vagotomy.
7	circadian rhythms in lung resistance and dynamic lung compliance of healthy children effects of two bronchodilators	Circadian rhythms of pulmonary resistance and dynamic pulmonary compliance of healthy children effects of two bronchodilators.
7	systemic collateral and pulmonary artery stenosis in patients with congenital pulmonary valve atresia and ventricular septal defect	Systemic collateralateral pulmonary artery stenosis in patients with congenital pulmonary valvular atresia and defective ventricular septation.
7	response of immature baboon fetal lung to intra amniotic betamethasone	Reaction of the immature baboon fetal lung to betamethasone intra-amniotic.
7	inhibiting effect of caffeine on spontaneous and urethan induced lung tumors in strain a mice	The inhibitory effect of caffeine on spontaneous and apos-induced pulmonary tumours; urethane in the mouse a strain.
7	morphological effects of chronic tracheal ligation and drainage in the fetal lamb lung	Morphological effects of chronic tracheal ligation and drainage in the fetal lamb.
7	biochemical composition and heterogeneity of heparan sulfates isolated from ah 130 ascites hepatoma cells and fluid	Biochemical composition and heterogeneity of heparan sulfates isolated from apo cells, ascitic hepatoma ah 130 and fluid.
7	effects of sputum on pulmonary function	The effects of sputum on lung function.
7	sphingolipid composition and catabolism in human fetal tissues	Sphingolipid composition and catabolism in human fetal tissue.
7	inspiration chest radiography by lateral recumbency	Chest x-ray; inspiration by lateral rest.
7	severe asthma prevention is better than cure	Prevention is better than cure; severe asthma.
7	human body buoyancy a study of 98 men	Buoyancy of the human body: a study of 98 men.
7	determining fetal lung maturity a sensitive surfactant method	Determining fetal lung maturity is a sensitive surfactant method.
7	restrictive ventilatory defect in a patient with primary pulmonary hypertension	Restrictive respiratory infections in a patient with diabetes; primary pulmonary hypertension.
7	innervation and cytochemistry of the neuroepithelial bodies in the ciliated epithelium of the toad lung bufo marinus	The innervation and cytochemistry of neuroepithelial bodies in the ciliated epithelium of the lung of bufo marinus marinus toads.
7	pulmonary function in coal workers with caplan s syndrome and non rheumatoid complicated pneumosoniosis	Pulmonary functions in non-rheumatoid complicated pneumosoniosis in coal workers with Caplan and Dapos syndrome.
7	farber s disease as a ceramidosis clinical radiological and biochemical aspects	Farber's disease as a ceramidosis clinical radiological and biochemical clinical aspects.
7	remote results of surgical treatment of chronic nonspecific suppurative lung diseases under conditions of extreme north	Results of surgical treatment of non-specific chronic suppurative lung diseases under extreme northern conditions.
7	isolated perfused dog lungs a comparative stereologic comparison with normal dog lungs	Stereological comparison between isolated perfused dog lungs and normal dog lungs.
7	energy status of the rat lung after exposure to elevated po2	Energy status of rat lung after exposure to high po2.
7	determination of disaturated lecithin in rhesus monkey amniotic fluid as an index of fetal lung maturity	Determination of disaturated lecithin in rhesus monkey amniotic fluid as an index of fetal lung maturity.
7	vaccination against canine bordetellosis using an aluminum hydroxide adjuvant vaccine	Vaccination against canine botulism using an adjuvant vaccine containing dapos, dapos hydroxide, aluminum.
7	occlusion pressure in acute bronchospasm induced by methylcholine	Apos pressure; acute bronchospasm occlusion induced by methylcholine.
7	primary lymphoma of lung	Primary lymphoma of the lung.
7	ventilation perfusion lung imaging in diaphragmatic paralysis	Ventilation infusion lung imaging in diaphragmatic paralysis.
7	absorption of inhaled antigen into the circulation of isolated lungs from normal and immunized rabbits	Lapos; absorption of inhaled antigen into the circulation of isolated lungs from normal and immunized rabbits.
7	control of the myocardial contractile state by carotid chemo and baroreceptor and pulmonary inflation reflexes in conscious dogs	Masters of the apos; myocardial contractile state by chemo carotid, baroreceptor reflexes and pulmonary inflation in conscious dogs.
7	ultrastructural changes in the lungs after chronic experimental intoxication with benzine and ethyline vapour	Ultrastructural changes in the lungs after chronic experimental intoxication with benzine and d*apos; ethyline.
7	experimental scleroma a histopathological study	Experimental sclerosis: a histopathological study.
7	effect of intrapulmonary hematocrit maldistribution on o2 co2 and inert gas exchange	Effect on CO2 and inert gas exchange due to poor distribution of intraprandial hematocrit.
7	uptake metabolism and efflux of l alpha acetylmethadol laam by rat lung tissue	Metabolism of apos; absorption and efflux of apos; alpha-acetylmethadol laam by rat lung tissue.
7	pathologic changes and pathogenesis of parascaris equorum infection in parasite free pony foals	Pathological changes and pathogenesis of parascaris equorum infection in free pony foals.
7	dna synthesis in the human diploid cell strain wi 38 during in vitro aging an autoradiography study	Synthesis of apos; DNA in the human diploid strain wi 38 during in vitro aging, autoradiographic study.
7	a case of lung myiasis caused by larvae of megaselia spiracularis schmitz diptera phoridae	A case of myiasis caused by larvae of megaselia spiracularis schmitz diptera phoridae.
7	effect of allogenic serum from pregnant pneumonectomized rats on embryonic lung tissue	The effect of allogenic serum from pregnant pneumonectomized rats on embryonic lung tissue.
7	legionnaires disease clinical and pulmonary histopathologic features of a sporadic case	Legionnaires' disease characterized by clinical and pulmonary histopathology; a sporadic case.
7	bronchofiberscopy in asthmatics a method for minimizing risk of complications	Bronchofiberscopy in asthmatics is a method for minimizing the risk of complications.
8	histochemical changes in lymphocytes during the production of antibodies in lymph nodes of rabbits	Histochemical changes in lymphocytes during the production of antibody in the lymph nodes of rabbits.
8	the lymphocytic origin of a plasma factor responsible for hypersensitivity in vitro of tuberculin type	Lapos; lymphocytic origin of apos; a plasma factor responsible for tuberculin hypersensitivity in vitro.
8	protein concentration in normal mouse lymphocytes thymocytes and mouse and human leukemic cells as measured by interference microscopy	Human protein concentration in normal mouse lymphocytes, thymocytes and leukemia cells measured by interfering microscopy.
8	studies on tubercle bacillus histiocyte relationship v passive transfer of cellular resistance	Studies of histiocyte histiocyte tuberculosis v passive transfer of cell resistance.
8	the in vivo reutilization of lymphocytic and sarcoma dna by cells growing in the peritoneal cavity	The in vivo reuse of lymphocyte and sarcoma DNA by cells growing in the peritoneal cavity.
8	lymphocyte glycogen content in various diseases	Lymphocyte glycogen levels in various diseases.
8	immune response and mitosis of human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro	Immune response and mitosis of human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro.
8	studies on the isolation of metaphase chromosomes	Studies on the isolation of metaphase chromosomes.
8	cellular specificity in the homograft reaction	Cell specificity in the homograft reaction.
8	reaction of lymphocytes with purified protein derivative conjugated with fluorescein	Reaction of lymphocytes with purified protein derivative conjugated to fluorescein.
8	lymphocyte interaction a potential histocompatibility test in vitro	Lapos; lymphocyte interaction is a potential in vitro histocompatibility test.
8	histocompatibility and immunologic competence in renal homotransplantation	L' histocompatibility and immunologic competence in renal homotransplantation.
8	the cellular origin of human immunoglobulins gamma 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a	L' cellular origin of human immunoglobulins gamma 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a.
8	further studies on adoptive transfer of sensitivity to skin homografts	D' further studies on adoptive transfer of sensitivity to cutaneous homografts have been conducted.
8	transformation of adult allogeneic small lymphocytes after transfusion into newborn rats	Transformation of small adult allogenic lymphocytes after transfusion in newborn-rats.
8	electron microscopy of the bursa of fabricius of the embryonic chick with particular reference to the lympho epithelial nodules	Electron microscopy of the bursa of the embryonic chick fabricius with special attention to the l&apos nodules; lymphatic epithelium.
8	tuberculin hypersensitivity studies with radioactive antigen and mononuclear cells	Tuberculin hypersensitivity studies with radioactive antigen and mononuclear cells.
8	role of the thymus in immune reactions in rats ii suppressive effect of thymectomy at birth on reactions of delayed cellular hypersensitivity and the circulating small lymphocyte	The role of thymus in immune responses in rat ii L' suppressive effect of thymectomy at birth on d&apos reactions; delayed cellular hypersensitivity and circulating small lymphocytes.
8	ataxia telangiectasia	I'm sorry, I'm sorry.
8	circulating small lymphocytes immunologically competent cells with limited reactivites	Small circulating lymphocytes, immunologically competent cells with limited reactivities.
8	serologic typing of human lymphocytes with immune serum obtained after homografting	Serological type of human lymphocytes at baseline; immune serum obtained after homograft.
8	reutilization of lymphocyte dna by cells of intestinal crypts and regenerating liver	Reuse of lymphocytic DNA by the cells of intestinal crypts and regenerating liver.
8	proliferative activity of the lymphatic tissues of rats as studied with tritium labeled thymidine	Lymphatic proliferative activity in the lymphatic tissues of rats, as studied with tritium-labelled thymidine.
8	homograft immunity in pregnancy survival rates in rabbits born of ova transplanted into sensitized mothers	Immunity; homograft immunity in pregnancy survival rates in postnatal rabbits; transplanted ovules to sensitized dams.
8	antigenic material persistence in hypersensitive cells	Persistence of antigenic material in hypersensitive cells.
8	delayed hypersensitivity in man transfer by lymphocyte preparations of peripheral blood	Hypersensitivity delays the transfer of men through lymphocyte preparations of peripheral blood.
8	the effect of skin homograft rejection on recipient and donor mixed leukocyte cultures	Effect of dermal homograft rejection on mixed cultures of recipient and donor leukocytes.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with antisera to six igg allotypes and summation with mixtures of antisera to different allotypes	Studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with antisera against six igg allotypes and summation with mixtures of d' antisera against different allotypes.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 3 proteins rna and dna synthesis by lymphocyte cultures after stimulation with phytohaemagglutinin with staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and with heterologous antiserum to rabbit whole serum	Studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 3 proteins rna and synthesis of DNA by lymphocyte cultures after stimulation with phytohemagglutinin with staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and with heterologous antiserum against whole rabbit serum.
8	feulgen hydrolysis of normal cells and mouse ascites tumor cells	Alleulgen hydrolysis of normal cells and mouse tumor cells.
8	allograft survival effect of antiserums to thymus glands and lymphocytes	Allograft survival effect of antiserums to thymus glands and lymphocytes.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro iv blast transformation of the lymphocytes from newborn rabbits induced by antiallotype serum to a paternal igg allotype not present in the serum of the lymphocyte donors	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro iv blast transformation of newborn rabbit lymphocytes (@-@) induced by antiallotype serum to a paternal igg allotype not present in the serum of lymphocyte donors.
8	mitosis induction by cultures of human peripheral lymphocytes	Induction of mitosis by cultures of human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing lymph node cells	Electron microscopic observations on antibody producing lymph node cells.
8	acid phosphatase rich granules in human lymphocytes induced by phytohemagglutinin	Acid phosphatase rich granules in human lymphocytes are induced by phytohemagglutinin.
8	lymphocyte lifetime in women	Lymphocyte lifespan in women.
8	occurrence of lymphopenia in heart failure	Incidence of lymphopenia in heart failure.
8	immunologic competence of thoracic duct cells i delayed hypersensitivity	The immunological competence of thoracic canal cells delayed hypersensitivity.
8	follicular lymphosarcoma brill symmers disease	Glowing follicular lymphosarcoma syringe disease.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro i stimulation of blast transformation with an antiallotype serum	Studies of rabbit lymphocytes in vitro i stimulation of blast transformation with antiallotype serum.
8	the origin of the cells in the efferent lymph from a single lymph node	The origin of efferent lymph from a single lymph node.
8	the fine structure of mitosis in rat thymic lymphocytes	The fine structure of mitosis in rat thymic lymphocytes.
8	the interaction of mycoplasmas with mammalian cells ii monocytes and lymphocytes	L' interaction of mycoplasmas with mammalian cells ii monocytes and lymphocytes.
8	effect of previous irradiation on the transformation of blood lymphocytes	Previous irradiation on the transformation of blood lymphocytes.
8	synthesis of nonribosomal rna by lymphocytes a response to phytohemagglutinin treatment	Synthesis of non-ribosomal rna by lymphocytes in response to phytohemagglutinin treatment.
8	lymphocytes from thymectomized rats immunologic proliferative and metabolic properties	Lymphocytes from thymectomized rats showed proliferative and metabolic immunological properties.
8	kidney homografts uptake of fluorochrome labeled tissue extracts by lymph node cells	Fluorochrome-labeled tissue extracts from lymph node cells are taken up by the renal homografts.
8	adenosylmethionine elevation in leukemic white blood cells	Elevation of adenosylmethionine in leukemic white blood cells.
8	virus replication and high titered interferon production in human leukocyte cultures inoculated with newcastle disease virus	Virus replication and high production rates; interferon in human leukocyte cultures inoculated with Newcastle disease virus.
8	histochemical demonstration of gamma glutamyl transpeptidase activity in bone marrow and blood cells	Histochemical demonstration of apos; gamma glutamyl transpeptidase activity in bone marrow and blood cells.
8	the carriage of immunological memory by small lymphocytes in the rat	The transport of immunological memory by small lymphocytes in the rat.
8	functional anatomy of the lymphocyte in immunological reactions in vitro	Anatomical function of the lymphocyte in immunological reactions in vitro.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro i biological and physicochemical properties of the pokeweed mitogen	Studies of human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro i biological and physico-chemical properties of the host plant mitogen.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro ii morphological and biochemical studies on the transformation of lymphocytes by pokeweed mitogen	Human peripheral blood lymphocyte studies in vitro ii Morphological and biochemical studies of the transformation of lymphocytes by the mitogen of lice.
8	l asparaginase toxicity to normal and leukemic human lymphocytes	Toxicity of asparaginase @-@1 to normal and leukemic human lymphocytes.
8	the ultrastructure and function of the cells in lymph following antigenic stimulation	L' ultrastructure and function of lymphatic cells following antigenic stimulation.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro vi the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit iga and igm	Studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro, induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera against iga and l' rabbit igm.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro v the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit igg subunits	Studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro; induction of blast transformation with antisera from sheep to rabbit igg units.
8	effect of cycloheximide on protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis in cultured human lymphocytes	Effect of cycloheximide on protein and l&apos synthesis in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	mouse isoantigens separation of soluble tl thymus leukemia antigen from soluble h 2 histocompatibility antigen by column chromatography	Mouse isoantigens separation of apos; soluble leukemic antigen thymus of apos; antigen d' soluble histocompatibility h 2 by column chromatography.
8	cytotoxic potential of stimulated human lymphocytes	The cytotoxic potential of stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	chromosomal breakage induced by extracts of human allogeneic lymphocytes	Chromosomal breakage induced by extracts from human allogeneic lymphocytes.
8	cell bound immunity to autologous and syngeneic mouse tumors induced by methylcholanthrene and plastic discs	Cell-associated immunity to autologous and syngenic mouse tumours induced by methylcholanthrene and plastic discs is cell-associated.
8	the effect of malnutrition on the inflammatory response as exhibited by the granuloma pouch of the rat	The effect of malnutrition on the inflammatory response as evidenced by the granulomatous sac of the rat.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats i conditions and parameters of response	Quantitative studies on apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats i response conditions and parameters.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats ii relationship of the proliferative response to the immunologic status of the donors	Quantitative studies of apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rat ii relationship of proliferative response to apo; immunologic status of donors.
8	studies of the cells in the afferent and efferent lymph of lymph nodes draining the site of skin homografts	Studies of the afferent and efferent lymph node cells of lymph nodes draining the site of skin homografts.
8	autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoiesis and lymphocyte migration in mice bearing multiple thymus grafts	Autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoiesis and lymphocyte migration in mice with multiple thymus grafts.
8	in vitro demonstration of humoral and cell bound immunity against common specific transplantation atigen s of adenovirus 12 induced mouse and hamster tumors	In vitro demonstration of immune humoral and cell-mediated immunity against apovirus; common specific etigen of apovirus 12 induced mouse and hamster tumours.
8	pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis regulatory control during transformation of lymphocytes in vitro	Control of pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis during transformation of lymphocytes in vitro.
8	antiserum to immunoglobulin a inhibition of cell mediated demyelination in tissue culture	An antiserum to apos; immunoglobulin, an inhibition of cell-mediated demyelination in tissue culture systems.
8	mechanism of a reaction in vitro associated with delayed type hypersensitivity	Mechanisms of in vitro reaction associated with delayed type hypersensitivity.
8	radioautographic and electron microscopic evidence of rapid uptake of antigen by lymphocytes	Both radioautographic and electron microscopic data indicate rapid uptake of the antigen by lymphocytes.
8	heterologous antilymphocyte globulin studies in vitro	Heterologous antilymphocyte globulin studies in vitro.
8	chromosome studies on marshall islanders exposed to fallout radiation	Chromosome studies on Marshall Islanders exposed to fallout radiation.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes prolonged survival of canine renal allografts	Lymphocyte antiserum prolonged survival of canine renal allografts.
8	phosphorylation of nuclear protein early in the course of gene activation in lymphocytes	Lymphocyte-mediated phosphorylation of nuclear protein early in the apo cycle; gene activation in lymphocytes.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing cells in lymph and blood	Electron microscopic observations on antibody producing cells in lymph and blood.
8	intestinal lymphangiectasia a protein losing enteropathy with hypogammaglobulinemia lymphocytopenia and impaired homograft rejection	Intestinal lymphangiectasis, a protein that is losing kidney function; enteropathy due to diabetes; lymphocytopenic and d*apos hypogamaglobulinemia; impaired rejection of apos; homograft.
8	renal homotransplantation in rats i allogeneic recipients	Renal homotransplantation in rats i allogeneic recipients.
8	antigens in immunity xv ultrastructural features of antigen capture in primary and secondary lymphoid follicles	Ultrastructural immunity xv characteristic of antigen capture in primary and secondary lymphoid follicles.
8	ring d chromosome a second case associated with anomalous haptoglobin inheritance	A second case associated with abnormal inheritance of haptoglobin is the d chromosome of the d-ring.
8	effect of amantadine hydrochloride on the response of human lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Effect of amantadine on the response of human lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
8	the pathogenesis of chronic lymphocytic leukemia	This is the pathogenesis of chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	histones of genetically active and inactive chromatin	The histones of genetically active and inactive chromatin.
8	mortality of radiation chimeras in relation to the number of transplanted bone marrow and lymph node cells	Mortality due to the radiation chimeras in relation to the number of transplanted bone marrow and lymph node cells.
8	the initial lesion in experimental allergic neuritis a phase and electron microscopic study	The initial lesion in experimental allergic neuritis phase and electron microscopic study.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 8 the relationship between heterozygosity and homozygosity of lymphocyte donor and per cent blast transformation induced by antiallotype sera	Studies of rabbit lymphocytes in vitro8 examined the relationship between heterozygosity and apo; homozygosity of the lymphocyte donor and percent blastic transformation induced by antiallotype sera.
8	association of experimental chronic arthritis with the persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls in the articular tissue	Experimental chronic arthritis with the persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls in the articular tissue.
8	activation of lymphocytes	Activating lymphocytes now.
8	chromosomes and transformation of lymphocytes in lymphoproliferative disorders	The chromosomes and lymphocyte transformation in lymphoproliferative disorders.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats 3 kinetics of the response	Quantitative dose–response studies; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats 3 kinetics of the response.
8	chemotoxis of mononuclear cells	Chemotoxicity of mononuclear cells.
8	incorporation of sulfate by the mouse thymus its relation to secretion by medullary epithelial cells and to thymic lymphopoiesis	Incorporation of thymus sulfate by mouse thymus, its relation to secretion by medullary epithelial cells and thymic lymphopoiesis.
8	the mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for tolerance	Mixed lymphocyte response is an in vitro test of tolerance.
8	effect of chloroquine on morphology of cytoplasmic granules in maturing human leukocytes an ultrastructural study	The effect of chloroquine on the morphology of cytoplasmic granules in maturing human leukocytes; ultrastructural study.
8	studies on the in vitro behavior of agammaglobulinemic lymphocytes	Study of the in vitro behavior of the agammaglobulinemic cells.
8	studies on lysosomes xi characterization of a hydrolase rich fraction from human lymphocytes	Studies on characterization of lysosomes xi d' a hydrolase-rich fraction of human lymphocytes.
8	eosinophilic response in glioblastoma tissue culture after addition of autologous lymphocytes	Eosinophilic response in glioblastoma tissue culture after addition of autologous lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocyte antigen interaction in delayed hypersensitivity	Cytotoxic effect of apos; lymphocyte antigen interaction with apos; delayed hypersensitivity.
8	viral inhibition of lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin	Viral inhibition of lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin.
8	dna replication patterns and chromosomal protein synthesis in opossum lymphocytes in vitro	Apos replication models; DNA and chromosomal protein synthesis in Dapos lymphocytes; opossum in vitro.
8	antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a rat in rats prepared with homologous antibody	The antigen induced release of apos, a slow-reacting substance from rat anaphylaxis, in rats prepared with a homologous antibody.
8	a quantitative study of the stimulation of dna synthesis in lymph node cell cultures by anti lymphocyte serum anti gamma globulin serum specific antigen and phytohemagglutinin	A quantitative study of the stimulation of lymph node DNA synthesis in lymph node cultures by serum antigen-specific anti-gamma serum serum globulin and phytohemagglutinin.
8	tissue interaction in the development of thymus lymphocytes	Tissue interaction in the development of thymus lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic test automation a live dead cell differential counter	Cytotoxic test automation of apo, a live dead differential counter.
8	cell separation on antigen coated columns elimination of high rate antibody forming cells and immunological memory cells	Cell separation on coated cells; antigen removal of high rate of cell formation; antibodies and immune memory cells.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ix the suppression of antiallotype induced blast transformation in lymphocyte cultures from allotypically suppressed donors	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro ix suppression of allos-induced blast transformation in lymphocyte cultures from allotypically suppressed donors.
8	a sex difference in the leucocyte count	This is a sex difference in the number of leukocytes.
8	characteristics of the rna synthesized in vitro by the normal human small lymphocyte and the changes induced by phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Characteristics of rna synthesized in vitro by the normal human small lymphocyte and changes induced by phytohemagglutinin stimulation.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections i monocyte as host cell for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific role of each human leukocyte type in i monocyte viral infections as host cell for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro.
8	noncycling tumor cells mitogenic response to antilymphocytic serum	Non-cyclic tumor cell mitogenic response to antilymphocyte serum.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity i characterization of the phenomenon	Cytoxicity mediated by apo; soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed onset; delayed hypersensitivity i characterization of phenomenon.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity ii correlation of the in vitro response with skin reactivity	Cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity ii correlation of in vitro response with skin reactivity.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity 3 analysis of mechanism	Apos-mediated cytotoxicity; soluble antigen and lymphocytes in apo; mechanism of apo; delayed hypersensitivity testing.
8	the interaction of human monocytes and lymphocytes	L' the interaction of human monocytes and lymphocytes.
8	studies on the anti inflammatory action of 6 mercaptopurine	Studies on the immune system; anti-inflammatory action of 6 mercaptopurine.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes and procarbazine compared as immunosuppressants in mice	Lymphocyte antiserum and procarbazine were compared in mice as immunosuppressive agents.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections ii phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes as host cells for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections ii Phytohemagglutinin treats lymphocytes as host cells for in vitro vesicular stomatitis virus replication.
8	serotyping for homotransplantation xxii specificity of cytotoxic antibodies developing after renal transplantation	Serotyping for apo; homotransplantation xxii specificity of cytotoxic antibodies developing after renal transplantation.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes interactions with chemical immunosuppressants	Antiserum interactions with lymphocytes and chemical immunosuppressants.
8	microspikes on the lymphocyte uropod	Micropics on the lymphocyte uropod.
8	leukotactic factor produced by sensitized lymphocytes	A leukotactic factor produced by sensitized lymphocytes.
8	mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for antilymphocytic serum activity	Mixed lymphocyte reaction is an in vitro test for anti-lymphocyte serum activity.
8	significance of the changes in the circulating lymphoid cells in hodgkin s disease	Importance of changes in the circulating lymphoid cells of Hodgkin's disease.
8	nonrandomness of translocations in man preferential entry of chromosomes into 13 15 21 translocations	The nonrandom character of translocations in humans has favoured chromosome entry in 13, 15 and 21 translocations.
8	labial salivary gland biopsy in sj gren s disease	Lipid salivary gland biopsy in grenade disease sj.
8	immunological aspects of intrauterine transfusion	Immunological aspects of intra-transfusion @-@uterine.
8	studies of pplo infection v inhibition of lymphocyte mitosis and antibody formation by mycoplasmal extracts	Lupus studies; pandemic infection; inhibition of lymphocyte mitosis and mucosal formation; antibody by mycoplasma extracts.
8	the effect of epithelial remnant and whole organ grafts of thymus on the recovery of thymectomized irradiated mice	Effect of the epithelial remnant and whole organ grafts of thymus on the recovery of irradiated thymectomized mice.
8	antigenic changes in lymph node cells after administration of antiserum to thymus cells	Antigenic changes in lymph nodes after oral administration of antibody to thymus cells.
8	mn blood group locus data concerning the possible chromosomal location	Data on the mn blood group locus concerning the possible chromosomal location.
8	the cellular infiltrate in hashimoto s disease and focal lymphocytic thyroiditis	L' cellular infiltration in the Hashimoto disease and focal lymphocytic thyroiditis.
8	virus containing lymphocyte cultures from cancer patients	Virus containing lymphocyte cultures from cancer patients.
8	studies on marek s disease ii pathogenesis	Studies of Marek disease ii pathogenesis.
8	abnormalities of in vitro lymphocyte responses during rubella virus infections	Anomalies of in vitro lymphocyte responses during rubella virus (CRV) infection.
8	fine structural alterations of interphase nuclei of lymphocytes stimulated to grwoth activity in vitro	Fine structural alterations of interphase nuclei of stimulated lymphocytes; grwoth activity in vitro.
8	the frequency of antigen sensitive cells in tissue transplantation a commentary on clonal selection	A comment on clonal selection on the frequency of antigen-sensitive cells in tissue transplants.
8	the occurrence and properties of leukocytosis and lymphocytosis stimulating material in the supernatant fluids of bordetella pertussis cultures	The frequency and properties of leucocytosis and of lymphocytosis-stimulating material in the supernatants of bordetella pertussis cultures.
8	dissociation of hemolytic and lymphocyte transforming activities of streptolysin s preparations	Dissociation of hemolytic and lymphocytic transformation activities from streptolysin s preparations.
8	replication of poliovirus in phytohemagglutinin stimulated human lymphocytes	The replication of poliovirus in phytohemagglutinin will stimulate human lymphocytes.
8	aggregation and transformation of rat lymphocytes on rat embryo monolayers	L' aggregation and transformation of rat lymphocytes on rat embryo monolayers.
8	immunoglobulins g a and m determined in single cells from human tonsil	The immunoglobulins g a and m were determined in isolated cells from the human amygdala.
8	reentry of nondividing leukemic cells into a proliferative phase in acute childhood leukemia	Reintroduction of non-divisional leukemia cells into a proliferative phase of acute childhood leukemia.
8	lymphocytoid lines from persons with sex chromosome anomalies	Lymphocytoid cell lines of individuals with abnormal sex chromosomes.
8	the proliferative and anamnestic antibody response of rabbit lymphoid cells in vitro i immunological memory in the lymph nodes draining and contralateral to the site of a primary antigen injection	The proliferative and anamnestic antibody response of rabbit lymphoid cells in vitro i immunologic memory in the lymph nodes draining and contralateral to the site of d' primary injection of antigen.
8	cellular immunity in vitro clonal proliferation of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	L' cellular immunity in vitro promoted clonal proliferation of antigen-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	human granulocyte collagenase	It's called human granulocyte collagenase.
8	isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits mitosis of human lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin	L' isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits the mitosis of human lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin.
8	serum mediated protection of neoplastic cells from inhibition by lymphocytes immune to their tumor specific antigens	Serum protects neoplastic cells from the apos; inhibition by lymphocytes immunized against their specific tumour antigens.
8	the human chromosome electron microscopic observations on chromatin fiber organization	Electron microscopic observations of human chromosomes on chromatin fiber organization.
8	transformation of human lymphocytes inhibition by homologous alpha globulin	Transformation of human lymphocytes inhibition by alpha globulin homologous.
8	hodgkin s disease histological classification and diagnosis	Histological classification and diagnosis of Hodgkin's disease.
8	localization of immunological complexes fixing beta1c c3 in germinal centers of lymph nodes	Localization of the immunological complexes binding beta1c c3 in germinal centers of lymph nodes.
8	the distribution of large dividing lymph node cells in syngeneic recipient rats after intravenous injection	The distribution of large dividing lymph node cells in recipient syngenic rats after intravenous injection.
8	lymphocytosis and histamine sensitization of mice by fractions from bordetella pertussis	Lymphocytosis and sensitization to apos; histamine of mice by fractions of bordetella pertussis.
8	cells involved in the immune response 13 the nature of the cellular interactions relating antibody formation and immunologic tolerance a unified hypothesis	The cells involved in the immune response 13 the nature of the cellular interactions linking antibody formation and immune tolerance a unified hypothesis.
8	heterogeneity of antibody forming cells an electron microscopic analysis	The heterogeneity of antibodies in the cells formed by electron microscopy.
8	lymphoid cellular responses in the blood after immunization in man	Lymphoid cellular responses in the blood after exposure; immunizations in humans.
8	immune response to gluten in adult coeliac disease	The immune response to gluten in adult ectomycorrhizal cancer.
8	stress effect of antilymphocyte serum	Stress effect of antilymphocyte serum.
8	dna polymerase activity as an index of lymphocyte stimulation studies in down s syndrome	Apos polymerase activity; DNA as an index of lymphocyte stimulation studies in bottom-down syndrome.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis by salivary gland lymphoid cells in sj gren s syndrome	Garnet Synthesis; immune globulin by salivary gland lymphoid cells in garnet skin syndrome sj.
8	specific antibody within lymphoid germinal center cells of mice after primary immunization with horseradish peroxidase a light and electron microscopic study	A specific antibody in mouse lymphoid germ cells after primary immunization with horseradish peroxidase was studied by light and electron microscopy.
8	changes in the blood picture in therapeutic use of hormones	Changes in apo; blood image in apo; therapeutic use of hormones.
8	rat thoracic duct lymphocytes types that participate in inflammation	Lymphocyte types in the rat thoracic canal that participate in inflammation.
8	isolation and zonal fractionation of metaphase chromosomes from human diploid cells	Metaphase isolation and zonal fractionation of chromosomes from human diploid cells.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactions and tissue transplantation tolerance	Mixed lymphocyte reactions and tissue transplant tolerance.
8	white blood count in patients on regular haemodialysis	White blood cell count in patients on regular hemodialysis.
8	morphological comparison of machupo with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus basis for a new taxonomic group	Morphological comparison of machupo with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus for a new taxonomic group.
8	the effect of glucocorticosteroids on the kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	The effect of glucocorticoids on the kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes.
8	giant neutrophil granules in the chediak higashi syndrome of man mink cattle and mice	Giant neutrophil granules in the chediak higashi syndrome of mink and mouse.
8	hematological and febrile responses of rabbits to listerial hemolysins	Hematological and febrile reactions of rabbits to listerial hemolysins.
8	unscheduled incorporation of thymidine in ultraviolet irradiated human lymphocytes	Unforeseen incorporation of thymidine in human lymphocytes exposed to ultraviolet light (UV) radiation.
8	effects of short term epithelial reticular cell and whole organ thymus grafts in neonatally thymectomized mice	Effects of epithelial reticular cell and thymus d&apos transplants; short-term whole-body effects in neonatally thymectomized mice.
8	cytogenetic studies with cyclamate and related compounds	The cytogenetic studies with cyclamate and related compounds.
8	lymphocytic responses to streptococcal antigens in glomerulonephritic patients	The effects of streptococcal antigens on glomerulonephritic patients.
8	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells ii cell interactions and effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors	In vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells ii cell interactions and effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors.
8	the role of the lymphatic system in the rejection of homografts a study of lymph from renal transplants	The role of the lymphatic system in the rejection of homografts a study of lymph from renal transplants.
8	biochemical endocrine and other indices during quinestrol therapy	Biochemical endocrine and other indices during quinestrol therapy.
8	mixed lymphocyte cultures produce effector cells model in vitro for allograft rejection	Cultures of mixed lymphocytes produce effector cells model in vitro for the rejection of allografts.
8	labeling and other effects of actinomycin d on human chromosomes	Marking and other effects of actinomycin d on human chromosomes.
8	quantitation of strain balb c mouse peritoneal cells	Quantification of mouse peritoneal cells of the balb c strain.
8	the effect of caffeine on the mitosis of human lymphocytes in culture	The effect of caffeine on the mitosis of human lymphocytes in culture.
8	isolation of leucogenenol from bovine and human liver	Isolation of leucogenenol from bovine and human liver.
8	lymphocyte stimulation transfer of cellular hypersensitivity to antigen in vitro	Lymphocyte stimulation in vitro; cell hypersensitivity to antigen in vitro.
8	cell mediated immunological processes in leprosy	Cell-mediated immunological processes in leprosy.
8	correction of celluar metachromasia in cultured fibroblasts in several inherited mucopolysaccharidoses	Repair of cell metachromasia in fibroblasts grown in several inherited mucopolysaccharide infections.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity during depression of tuberculin hypersensitivity by 6 mercaptopurine	In vitro lymphocyte reactivity during decrease of tuberculin supersensitivity by 6 mercaptopurine.
8	pompe s disease detection of heterozygotes by lymphocyte stimulation	Pump s disease detection of heterozygotes by lymphocyte stimulation.
8	detection of simultaneous antibody synthesis in plasma cells and specialized lymphocytes in rabbit lymph nodes	Detection of simultaneous synthesis of antibody in plasma cells and of lymphocytes specialized in rabbit lymph nodes.
8	human monocytes and macrophages interaction with antigen and lymphocytes	Human monocytes and macrophages interact with antigen and lymphocytes.
8	antigen recognition in vitro studies on the specificity of the cellular immune response	In vitro studies on the specificity of the cellular immune response.
8	cells involved in the immune response xii the differing responses of normal rabbit lymphoid cells to phytohemagglutinin goat anti rabbit immunoglobulin antiserum and allogeneic and xenogeneic lymphocytes	The cells involved in the immune response xii are the different responses of normal rabbit lymphoid cells to rabbit phytohemagglutinin antisera-immunoglobulin and to allogeneic and xenogenic lymphocytes.
8	rapid lymphocytic recognition of histoincompatibility changes of the deoxyribonucleoprotein complex in mixed cultures of allogeneic human lymphocytes	Rapid lymphocyte recognition of histoincompatibility of the deoxyribonucleoprotein complex in mixed cultures of allogeneic human lymphocytes.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats iv immunologic potentiality of the responding cells	Quantitative apo studies; mixed lymphocyte interaction in rat iv immunologic potentiality of the responding cells.
8	lymphocyte transformation in multiple sclerosis	Acute lymphocyte transformation in multiple sclerosis.
8	the differential attachment of antibiotics to glycoprotein and blood lymphocytes	L' differential attachment of antibiotics to blood lymphocytes and glycoproteins.
8	mixed leukocyte reactivity and leukemia study of identical siblings	Study of leukocyte reactivity and leukemia in identical siblings.
8	specificity of antigen recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specificity of antigen recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	cytotoxicity specificity after in vitro sensitization	Cytotoxicity specificity after in vitro sensitization.
8	a study of the effects of certain hormones on human cells in culture	A study of the effects of certain hormones on human cells in culture.
8	changes in the differential leukocyte count of chicks inoculated with salmonella	Changes in the differential leukocyte count of salmonella-inoculated chicks.
8	alkaline phosphatase activity of polymorphonuclear leucocytes and lymphocytes separated from normal human blood	L' alkaline phosphatase activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and lymphocytes is separated from normal human blood.
8	quantitation of lymphocyte transformation using radioactive iododeoxyuridine	Diagnosis of lymphocyte transformation using radioactive iododeoxyuridine.
8	quantitative enzyme cytochemistry of leukaemic cells	Quantitative enzyme cytochemistry of leukemic cells.
8	glucocorticoids and cellular immunity in vitro facilitation of the sensitization phase and inhibition of the effector phase of a lymphocyte anti fibroblast reaction	Glucocorticoids and lapos; cellular immunity in vitro facilitates the sensitization phase and lapos; inhibition of the effector phase of apos; lymphocytic fibroblast anti-fib reaction.
8	studies on the differentiation of thymus derived lymphocytes	Studies on the differentiation of thymus-derived lymphocytes.
8	histocompatibility type and immune responsiveness in random bred hartley strain guinea pigs	Examples of such guinea pigs include the type of apo, histocompatibility, and immune response in randomly reared hartley strain guinea pigs.
8	clinical evaluation of the urinary sediment after renal allotransplantation	Clinical evaluation of the urinary sediment after renal allotransplantation.
8	y fluorescence of interphase nuclei especially circulating lymphocytes	The fluorescence of interphase nuclei, especially circulating lymphocytes.
8	in vitro and in vivo activity of a lymphocyte and immune complex dependent chemotactic factor for eosinophils	In vitro and in vivo eosinophilic activity of eosinophils; a lymphocyte and immune complex dependent chemotactic factor.
8	immunological problems in leprosy research 1 clinical and pathological spectrum of leprosy	Immunological problems in leprosy research 1 clinical and pathological spectrum of leprosy.
8	response of the rheumatoid synovial membrane to exogenous immunization	Response of the rheumatoid synovial membrane to apos; exogenous immunisation.
8	comparison of the hl a phenotypes of lymphocytes and kidney cells determined by the fluorochromasia cytotoxicity assay	Comparison of the phenotypes of lymphocytes and of renal cells as determined by the fluorochromatic cytotoxicity assay.
8	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in human lymphocytes alterations after phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Cyclic adenosine 35 monophosphate in human lymphocyte alterations following stimulation by phytohemagglutinin.
8	human lymphocytic metabolism effects of cyclic and noncyclic nucleotides on stimulation by phytohemagglutinin	Effects of human lymphocyte metabolism of cyclic and noncyclic nucleotides on stimulation by human phytohemagglutinin.
8	specificity of allogeneic cell recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specificity of allogeneic cell recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	specific lymphocyte sensitization in cancer is there a common antigen in human malignant neoplasia	Specific lymphocyte sensitization in cancer is due to the existence of a common antigen in human neoplastic malignancies.
8	karyotyping of single human chromosomes from dry mass determined by electron microscopy	Karyotyping simple human chromosomes of the dry mass determined by electron microscopy.
8	immunoglobulin production by human lymphocytoid lines and clones absence of genic exclusion	Production of immunoglobulins by human lymphocytoid lines and clones without gene exclusion.
8	cell surface antigens serial sectioning of single cells as an approach to topographical analysis	Serial separation of cell surface antigens from individual cells for use in topographic analysis.
8	lymphocyte stimulation selective destruction of cells during blastogenic response to transplantation antigens	Lymphocyte stimulation selective destruction of cells during blastogenic response to transplantation antigens.
8	a study of gluco corticosteroid induced pyknosis in the thymus and lymph node of the adrenalectomized rat	A study of gluco corticosteroids induced pyknosis in the thymus and lymph node of the adrenalectomized rat.
8	6 thioguanine antimitotic effect on human lymphocytes in vitro prevented by adenine	Thioguanine is an antimitotic effect on human lymphocytes in vitro prevented by adenosine.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in sarcoidosis	Acute lymphocyte sensitization to sarcoidosis.
8	cytodiagnosis of rheumatoid pleural effusions	Cydiagnosis of rheumatoid pleural effusions.
8	human lymphocyte antigen reactivity modified by neuraminidase	Antigenic human lymphocyte reactivity modified by neuraminidase.
8	ultrastructural study of two cases of alpha chain disease	Ultrastructural study of two cases of alpha chain disease.
8	quantitative aspects of plasma membrane associated immunoglobulin in clones of diploid human lymphocytes	Quantitative aspects of plasma membrane associated immunoglobulin in clones of diploid human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocytic sialadenitis in the major and minor glands a correlation in postmortem subjects	Acute lymphocytic sialadenitis in the main and secondary glands, a correlation in postmortem subjects.
8	mediators of histamine release from human platelets lymphocytes and granulocytes	The mediators of histamine release from human platelet lymphocytes and granulocytes.
8	mixed leukocyte stimulation of normal peripheral leukocytes by autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Mixed leukocyte stimulation of normal peripheral leukocytes by autologous lymphoblastoid cells.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats v tempo and specificity of the proliferative response and the number of reactive cells from immunized donors	Quantitative studies on the apo; mixed lymphocyte interaction in the rat v. and the specificity of the proliferative response and the number of reactive cells of immunized donors.
8	biochemically marked lymphocytoid lines establishment of lesch nyhan cells	Biochemically labelled lymphocytoid lines of lesch nyhan cells established.
8	uptake of transfer ribonucleic acid by normal and leukemic cells	Transfer the extracts; ribonucleic acid to normal and leukemic cells.
8	action of diphenylhydantoin on chromosomes	The action of diphenylhydantoin on chromosomes.
8	the peritoneal exudate lymphocyte i differences in antigen responsiveness between peritoneal exudate and lymph node lymphocytes from immunized guinea pigs	Lapos lymphocytes; peritoneal exudate differ in antigenic reactivity between lymphocytes from immunized guinea pigs; peritoneal exudate and lymph nodes.
8	lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in vitro effect of enhancing antisera	An in vitro lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxic effect of eposalin; increase in antisera.
8	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox 3 regression infectious foci	Mechanisms of recovery; a generalized viral infection mousepox 3 infectious foci of regression.
8	synthesis and assembly of immunoglobulins by malignant human plasmacytes and lymphocytes ii heterogeneity of assembly in cells producing igm proteins	Synthesis and assembly of apos; immunoglobulins by malignant human plasmacytes and lymphocytes ii heterogeneity of apos; assembly in cells producing igmic proteins.
8	studies on the life history of lymphocytes i the life span of cells responsive in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	Lymphocyte-mediated interactions: studies of the life cycle of lymphocytes and the lifespan of cells reacting to apos; mixed lymphocyte interaction.
8	specific inhibition of tumor cell dna synthesis in vitro by lymphocytes from peritoneal exudate of immunized syngeneic guinea pigs	L' specific inhibition of synthesis of apos; DNA of tumour cells in vitro by lymphocytes of l' peritoneal exudate of immunized syngenic guinea pigs.
8	on the number and nature of antigen sensitive lymphocytes in the blood of delayed hypersensitive human donors	The number and nature of antigen-sensitive lymphocytes in the blood of delayed hypersensitive human donors.
8	antigen binding cells in normal mouse thymus	Antigen-binding cells in normal mouse thymus.
8	tumor immunity tumor suppression in vivo initiated by soluble products of specifically stimulated lymphocytes	Tumour immunity tumor suppression in vivo initiated by soluble products of specifically stimulated lymphocytes.
8	treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukaemia comparison of immunotherapy b c g intermittent methotrexate and no therapy after a five month intensive cytotoxic regimen concord trial preliminary report to the medical research council by the leukaemia committee and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	Treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukemia, comparison of apo; intermittent c-methotrexate immunotherapy and no treatment after five months of intensive cytotoxic testing, preliminary report to the Medical Research Council by the Committee on Leukemia and the Working Group on Leukemia in Children.
8	synthesis of plasma membrane associated and secretory immunoglobulin in diploid lymphocytes	L&apos synthesis; plasma membrane associated secretory immunoglobulin in diploid lymphocytes.
8	sensitized lymphocytes in muscular dystrophy evidence for a neural factor in pathogenesis	Sensitized lymphocytes in muscular dystrophy indicate the existence of apos; a neural factor in pathogenesis.
8	lymphocyte sensitization to nervous tissues and muscle in patients with the guillain barr syndrome	Lymphocyte sensitization to nervous tissue and muscle in patients with Guillain Barr syndrome.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes i method of detection and functional significance	A Dapos Receptor; Lymphocyte Antibody B i method of detection and functional significance.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes ii immunochemical and electron microscopy characteristics	An antibody on the lymphocytes b ii Characteristics of immunochemical and electron microscopy.
8	synergistic interaction of macrophages and lymphocytes in antigen induced transformation of lymphocytes	L' synergistic interaction of macrophages and lymphocytes in antigen induced lymphocyte transformation.
8	receptors on immunocompetent cells ii specificity and nature of receptors on dinitrophenylated guinea pig albumin 125 i binding lymphocytes of normal guinea pigs	Receptors on immunocompetent cells ii specificity and nature of receptors on l&apos-binding lymphocytes; dinitrophenylated guinea pig albumin 125 i from normal guinea pigs.
8	a new micromethod for evaluating lymphocyte responses to phytohemagglutinin quantitative analysis of the function of thymus dependent cells	A new micromethod for assessing lymphocyte responses to apos; quantitative analysis of the function of thymus-dependent cells by phytohemagglutinin.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with coeliac disease	Anomalies in lymphocyte responsiveness to tumour cells in patients with CD.
8	dna dependent dna polymerases i and ii from normal human blood lymphocytes	DNA-dependent polymerases i and ii from normal human blood lymphocytes.
8	the relationship between thymus and oncogenesis a study of the incidence of non thymic malignancy in myasthenia gravis	The relationship between thymus and oncogenesis is a study of the incidence of non-thymic malignancy in severe myasthenia.
8	enhancement by interferon of the specific cytotoxicity of sensitized lymphocytes	An increase in the specific cytotoxicity of sensitized lymphocytes by apos; interferon.
8	mouse cytomegalovirus necrosis of infected and morphologically normal submaxillary gland acinar cells during termination of chronic infection	Cytomegalovirus-induced cytomegalovirus necrosis of infected and morphologically normal acinar cells under-maxillaria during end of infection; chronic infection.
8	surface immunoglobulins on thymus and thymus derived lymphoid cells	Cell surface immunoglobulins on thymus and thymus-derived lymphoid cells.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats vi reactivity of lymphocytes from conventional and germfree rats to allogeneic and xenogeneic cell surface antigens	Mixed lymphocyte interaction in the rat vi reactivity of lymphocytes from normal and germ-free rats to allogeneic and xenogenic cell surface antigens.
8	the compartmentalization of antigen reactive lymphocytes in desensitized guinea pigs	The compartmentalization of reactive antigenic lymphocytes in desensitized guinea pigs.
8	cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes induction by phytohemagglutinin	L' cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes induced by phytohemagglutinin.
8	antigen solubilized from human leukemia lymphocyte stimulation	Antigen solubilized from human leukemia lymphocyte stimulation.
8	cell cycle dependent immune lysis of moloney virus transformed lymphocytes presence of viral antigen accessibility to antibody and complement activation	Cell-cycle-dependent immune lysis of moloney virus transforms lymphocytes in the presence of apo; accessibility of apo; viral antigen to antibody and apo; complement activation.
8	membrane associated dna in the cytoplasm of diploid human lymphocytes	Membrane-associated DNA in the cytoplasm of diploid human lymphocytes.
8	thymus dependent and thymus independent lymphocyte separation relation to exposed sialic acid on cell surface	The relationship between thymus-dependent and thymus-independent exposure to sialic acid on cell surfaces and lymphocyte separation.
8	antigen binding specificity of isolated cell surface immunoglobulin from thymus cells activated to histocompatibility antigens	Cell-surface antigen binding specificity isolated from thymus cells activated to antigen-free antigens; histocompatibility.
8	stimulated normal human lymphocytes contain a ribonuclease sensitive dna polymerase distinct from viral rna directed dna polymerase	Stimulated normal human lymphocytes contain ribonuclease-sensitive DNA polymerase distinct from viral RNA polymerase directed by viral rna polymerase.
8	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro potentiation and inhibition of rat lymphocyte responses to antigen and mitogens by cytochalasin b	The regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro and in vitro; inhibition of rat lymphocyte responses to antigen and mitogens by cytochalasin b.
8	interaction of aggregated globulin with b lymphocytes	Interaction of aggregated globulin with lymphocytes b.
8	the host cell response in the local graft versus host reaction induced in the kidneys of f 1 rats by parental thoracic duct lymphocytes	Host cell response in the local graft versus host response induced in the kidneys of f1 rats by the parental thoracic duct lymphocytes.
8	the effect of bordetella pertussis on lymphocyte cyclic amp metabolism	Lapos; effect of bordetella pertussis on lymphocyte cyclic ampulla.
8	deletion of b5 immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in allotype suppressed rabbits	The deletion of immunoglobulin b5 from lymphocytes in rabbits of rabbits; allotype suppresses rabbits.
8	characterization of a lymphocyte factor which alters macrophage functions	Characterization of a lymphocyte factor that modifies macrophage functions.
8	independence of h 2k and h 2d antigenic determinants on the surface of mouse lymphocytes	Independence of h 2k and h 2d antigenic determinants on the surface of mouse lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte transformation in immunoproliferative disorders	Acute lymphocyte transformation in immunoproliferative disorders.
8	excretion of deoxyribonucleic acid by lymphocytes stimulated with phytohemagglutinin or antigen	L' excretion of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid by lymphocytes stimulated by phytohemagglutinin or l' antigen.
8	action of rifamycin derivatives on rna polymerase of human leukemic lymphocytes	The action of rifamycin derivatives on the rna polymerase of human leukemic lymphocytes.
8	cytochalasin b inhibits lymphotoxin production by antigen stimulated lymphocytes	Cytochalasin b inhibits lymphotoxin production by antigen-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	aryl hydrocarbon benzopyrene hydroxylase is stimulated in human lymphocytes by mitogens and benz a anthracene	Benzopyrene aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase is stimulated in human lymphocytes by mitogens and anthracene benz.
8	the effect of lymphocytes from sufferers from recurrent aphthous ulceration upon colon cells in tissue culture	Effects of lymphocytes in patients with recurrent aphthous ulceration on colon cells in tissue culture.
8	lymphocyte transformation in chagas disease	Lymphocytic transformation in chagas disease.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across the vascular endothelium in lymphoid tissue a reexamination	Lymphocyte migration across the vascular endothelium in lymphoid tissue has been reexamined.
8	idiotypic determinants of immunoglobulin m detected on the surface of human lymphocytes by cytotoxicity assays	Idiotypic antibody determination; immunoglobulin m detected on the surface of human lymphocytes by cytotoxicity assays.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and lymphocyte response to mitogens in horses persistently infected by equine infectious anemia virus	Apos-carrying lymphocyte quantification; immunoglobulin and lymphocyte response to mitogens in horses persistently infected with infectious equine anemia.
8	papain solubilized hl a antigens from cultured human lymphocytes contain two peptide fragments	Hl-solubilized papain a antigens from cultured human lymphocytes contain two peptide fragments.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with crohn s disease	Defects in lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with Crohn's disease.
8	macrophage lymphocyte interaction i characteristics of the antigen independent binding of guinea pig thymocytes and lymphocytes to syngeneic macrophages	Lymphocyte interaction of macrophages characteristic of the independent binding of guinea pig thymocytes and lymphocytes to syngenic macrophages.
8	anti human immunoglobulin g activity of membrane bound monoclonal immunoglobulin m in lymphoproliferative disorders	L' anti--human immunoglobulin g of l' membrane-bound monoclonal immunoglobulin m in lymphoproliferative disorders.
8	control of transcription of rna rich in polyadenylic acid in human lymphocytes	Control of transcription of rna high in polyadenylic acid in human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic antibody in normal human serums reactive with tumor cells from acute lymphocytic leukemia	A cytotoxic antibody in normal human serum reacting with tumor cells of acute lymphocytic leukemia.
8	function of macrophages in antigen recognition by guinea pig t lymphocytes i requirement for histocompatible macrophages and lymphocytes	The function of macrophages in antigen recognition by guinea pig t lymphocytes i need to have macrophages and histocompatible lymphocytes.
8	studies of two subpopulations of human lymphocytes differing in responsiveness to concanavalin a	Studies of two sub-populations of human lymphocytes with different reactivity to concanavalin.
8	transmissible mink encephalopathy studies on the peripheral lymphocyte	Studies on apo; transmissible mink encephalopathy in peripheral lymphocytes.
8	the response to phytohaemagglutinin pha of lymphocytes from cancer patients	The response to phytohaemagglutinin pha in lymphocytes from patients with cancer.
8	relationship of adenovirus to lymphocytes in naturally infected human tonsils and adenoids	Relationship of adenovirus to lymphocytes in naturally infected human tonsils and adenoids.
8	the effect of in vivo hydrocortisone on subpopulations of human lymphocytes	Impact of apos; in vivo hydrocortisone on sub@-@ human lymphocyte populations.
8	the thymic suppressor cell i separation of subpopulations with suppressor activity	Separation of the suppressive cells of thymus i from those under-populations with suppressive activity.
8	alterations in cyclic amp metabolism in human bronchial asthma ii leukocyte and lymphocyte responses to prostaglandins	Alterations in cyclic ampoule metabolism in human bronchial asthma ii leukocyte and lymphocyte responses to prostaglandins.
8	tissue factor activity in lymphocyte cultures from normal individuals and patients with hemophilia a	Lapos; tissue factor activity in lymphocyte cultures of normal and hemophilic individuals a.
8	studies on the distribution of surface immunoglobulins of human b lymphocytes	Studies on the distribution of surface immunoglobulins in human b lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte anergy in patients with carcinoma	Lymphocytic anergy in patients with carcinoma.
8	enumeration of activated thymus derived lymphocytes by the virus plaque assay	Determination of lymphocytes derived from the thymus activated by the apos; viral plaque test.
8	stimulated lymphocyte cultures responder recruitment and cell cycle kinetics	Recruitment of responders into lymphocyte cultures and cell cycle kinetics should be stimulated.
8	antibody mediated suppression of lymphoma participation of platelets lymphocytes and nonphagocytic macrophages	Antibodies suppressed the participation of platelet lymphocytes and nonphagocytic macrophages in lymphoma.
8	occurrence of surface igm igd and free light chains of human lymphocytes	Presence of free surface and light chains of human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocytes in patients with variable immunodeficiency and panhypogammaglobulinemia evaluation of b and t cell surface markers and a proposed classification	Lymphocytes in patients with variable immunodeficiency and panhypogammaglobulinemia were evaluated with the aid of b and t cell surface markers and a proposed classification.
8	pattern of immunoglobulin synthesis and assembly in a human mouse somatic cell hybrid clone	Synthetic and dapos diagram; immunoglobulin assembly in a human mouse somatic cell hybrid clone.
8	the k chains of the immunoglobulin from a continuous culture of human lymphocytes daudi have an unusual molecular size	The immunoglobulin from the k-chains of apos; a continuous culture of human lymphocytes daudi has an unusual molecular size.
8	relationship between hl a antigens and beta 2 microglobulin as studied by immunofluorescence on the lymphocyte membrane	The relationship between hl a antigens and beta-2 microglobulin was studied by immunofluorescence on the lymphocyte membrane.
8	the phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes to the effects of protons	The phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes to the effects of protons.
8	macrophage lymphocyte clusters in the immune response to soluble protein antigen in vitro ii ultrastructure of clusters formed during the early response	Lymphocyte macrophage clusters in the immune response to soluble protein antigen in vitro ultrastructural clusters formed at the beginning of the response.
8	receptor for the fourth component of complement on human b lymphocytes and cultured human lymphoblastoid cells	Receptor for the fourth component of complement on human b lymphocytes and cultured human lymphoblastoid cells.
8	separation of antigen specific lymphocytes a new general method of releasing cells bound to nylon mesh	The separation of specific lymphocytes from antigens is a new general method of releasing nylon-net-bound cells.
8	human lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin capping normal characteristics and anomalous behavior of chronic lymphocytic leukemic lymphocytes	The human lymphocyte surface immunoglobulins cover the normal characteristics and abnormal behaviour of chronic lymphocyte leukemia.
8	human peripheral lymphocytes and cancer in vitro studies on the basic protein histone f2a1 fraction	In vitro studies of human peripheral lymphocytes and cancer on the basic protein histone fraction f2a1 of l&apos.
8	a girl with karyotype 46 xx del 7 qter p 15	One girl with karyotype 46 xx del 7 qter p 15.
8	transformation antigens on stimulated lymphocytes	It's called transformation antigens on stimulated lymphocytes.
8	chromatin proteins from human lymphocytes a gel electrophoretic comparison between normal mitogen stimulated cell line and chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes	Chromatin proteins from human lymphocytes were compared by gel electrophoresis between the mitogen-stimulated normal cell line and chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	insoluble particulate antigen s in cell mediated immunity of autoimmune thyroid disease	Specific antigens insoluble in the cell-mediated immunity of auto @-@immune thyroid diseases.
8	periapical destructions caused by experimental pulpal inoculation of streptococcus mutans in rats	Periapical destruction caused by experimental pulpal inoculation of streptococcus mutans in rats.
8	in vitro lymphocyte response to treponema refringens im human syphilis	In vitro lymphocyte response to treponema refringens in human syphilis.
8	evidence for two waves of induction of dna enzymes in stimulated human lymphocytes	There appear to be two waves of induction of DNA enzymes in stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes from pregnant mice on cultivated tumor cells i specificity nature of effector cells and blocking by serum	The cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes from pregnant mice on tumour cells cultured i specificity of effector cells and blockade by serum.
8	a simple method for the elimination of platelets from the lymphocyte platelet mixture by sucrose	This is a simple method; elimination of the platelets from the lymphocyte platelet mixture by sucrose.
8	studies of the human lymphocyte receptor for heat aggregated or antigen complexed immunoglobulin	In vivo studies of the human lymphocyte receptor; heat-complexed immunoglobulin or immunoglobulin; antigen.
8	chromosome breakage studies in lymphocytes from normal women pregnant women and women taking oral contraceptives	Chromosome breakage studies in lymphocytes of normal pregnant women and women taking oral contraceptives.
8	abnormal immune responses of bloom s syndrome lymphocytes in vitro	Abnormal immune responses of the flowering syndrome lymphocytes in vitro.
8	in vitro generation of memory lymphocytes reactive to transplantation antigens	The in vitro generation of memory lymphocytes responsive to transplantation antigens.
8	sialyl residues in hepatitis b antigen their role in determining the life span of the antigen in serum and in eliciting an immunological response	Sialyl residues in the apo antigen; hepatitis b is implicated in determining the life span of the apo antigen; antigen in serum and apo antigen; immunologic response.
8	effect of anti beta2 microglobulin on antigen and allogeneic lymphocyte induced proliferation of human lymphocytes	L' effect of anti--beta2 microglobulin on antigen and allogenic lymphocytes induced proliferation of human lymphocytes.
8	lipid composition of plasma membranes from human leukemic lymphocytes	Lipid composition of plasma membranes in human leukemic lymphocytes.
8	heritability of the phytohemagglutinin responsiveness of lymphocytes and its relationship to leukemogenesis	Heritability of phytohemagglutinin responsiveness of lymphocytes and its relation to leukogenesis.
8	some properties of a dna unwinding protein unique to lymphocytes from chronic lymphocytic leukemia	There are certain properties of lymphocyte-specific DNA that are unique to chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	dna dependent rna polymerase levels during the response of human peripheral lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Apos-dependent rna polymerase level; DNA during the response of human peripheral lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
8	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens ii cooperation between subclasses of ly cells in the generation of killer activity	Under-functional classes of t lymphocytes carrying different ly antigens ii cooperation between sub-ly cell classes in the generation of lethal activity.
8	contact sensitivity in vitro ii the effect of beryllium preparations on the proliferative responses of specifically allergised lymphocytes and normal lymphocytes stimulated with pha	Sensitivity to contact in vitro; effect of beryllium preparations on the proliferative responses of specifically allergized lymphocytes and normal lymphocytes stimulated by pha.
8	the properities of lymphocytes which carry immunologic memory of phix 174	The properties of the lymphocytes that carry the immunological memory of phix 174 are discussed.
8	the yield of chromosomal aberrations in rabbit lymphocytes after irradiation in vitro and in vivo	The yield of chromosomal aberrations in rabbit lymphocytes after irradiation in vitro and in vivo.
8	suppression of maternal responsiveness to paternal antigen by maternal plasma	Suppression of maternal responsiveness to paternal antigen by maternal plasma.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice iv desensitization as a manifestation of increased proliferation of sensitized cells	Tolerance and sensitivity to contact with dnfb in mice iv desensitization as a manifestation of apos; increased proliferation of sensitized cells.
8	characterization of immunoglobulin bearing and other small lymphocytes in mouse bone marrow by sedimentation and electrophoresis	Characterization of apo; immunoglobulins and apo; other small lymphocytes in mouse bone marrow by sedimentation and electrophoresis.
8	concanavalin a receptors on the surface membrane of lymphocytes from patient s with hodgkin s disease and other malignant lymphomas	Concanavalin has receptors on the surface membrane of lymphocytes from patients with Hodgkin's disease and other malignant lymphomas.
8	biologic and antigenic similarity of virus induced migration inhibition factor to conventional lymphocyte derived migration inhibition factor	Biological and antigenic similarity of dapos factor; virus-induced migration inhibition with dapos factor; migration inhibition derived from classical lymphocytes.
8	phytohemagglutinin committed lymphocytes the mitotic activity of the phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Phytohemagglutinin gave the lymphocytes l&apos, a mitotic activity of the phytohemagglutinin that stimulated the lymphocytes.
8	hl a ld lymphocyte defined typing a rapid assay with primed lymphocytes	One lymphocyte defined dapos typing; rapid assay with primed lymphocytes.
8	detection of canine kidney allograft rejection with 51cr labeled lymphocytes	Canine renin allograft rejection with 51cr markled lymphocytes.
8	asymptomatic liver disease in hepatitis b antigen carriers	Asymptomatic liver infection in hepatitis B; antigen; hepatitis.
8	a cytotoxic factor released from unactivated human lymphocytes	Inactivation is a cytotoxic factor released from inactivated human lymphocytes.
8	multiple protein kinases from human lymphocytes identification enzymes phosphorylating exogenous histon and casein	Multiple protein kinases from apo; apo enzymes; identification of exogenous histone and casein phosphorylating human lymphocytes.
8	excision repair in lymphocytes of psoriasis author s transl	Repair of apo; excision in lymphocytes of psoriasis.
8	a technique for separation of canine lymphocytes and their use in the lymphocytotoxic blastogenic and rosette assys	Procedure for the separation of canine lymphocytes and their use in the blastogenic and rosette lymphocytotoxic assays.
8	differences in the sensitivity of tumor cells and normal lymphocytes toward lysis by alloantibodies and guinea pig or rabbit complement	Differences in the sensitivity of tumor cells and normal lymphocytes to lysis by alloantibodies and guinea pig or rabbit complement.
8	appparent familial multiple sclerosis in three generations report of a family with histocompatibility antigen typing	A related family of three generations of multiple sclerosis reported a family with typified histocompatibility.
8	distribution of cytoplasmic vacuoles in blood t and b lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders	Distribution of cytoplasmic vacuoles in blood t and b lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders.
8	lymphocyte in chronic lymphatic leukemia	Acute lymphocyte in chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	immunosuppressive effect of a human serum ferroprotein of hepatic origin alpha 2 h globulin study on blastic transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin	Immunosuppressive effect of a human serum ferroprotein study; hepatic origin alpha 2 h globulin on the blast transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	the possible utilization of nuclear pockets of lymphocytes in the diagnosis of enzootic bovine leucosis	Lapos; possible use of nuclear pockets of lymphocytes for diagnosis of enzootic bovine leukosis.
8	comparison of results of isolating lymphocytes with ficoll plus ronpacon and with gelatin	Comparison of results of apo; isolation of lymphocytes with ficoll plus purple and gelatin.
8	chromosomal aberrations in peripheral lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis author s transl	Chromosome aberrations in peripheral lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis.
8	surface immunoglobulin of guinea pig leukaemic lymphocytes	L' surface immunoglobulin of guinea pig leukemia lymphocytes.
8	an investigation of the characteristics of a negative pion beam by means of induced chromosome aberration in human peripheral blood lymphocytes	A study of the characteristics of negative pawns by means of apos; induced chromosomal aberration in human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	studies on the production of anti human lymphocyte serum als in bulls	Studies on the production of antibody to human lymphocyte serum in bulls.
8	lymphocytes roles in cellular immunity and humoral immunity	Lymphocytes are involved in cellular and humoral immunity.
8	role of a non committed accessory cell in the in vivo suppression of a syngeneic tumour by immune lymphocytes	The role of apos; an uninvolved accessory cell in the in vivo suppression of apos; a syngenic tumour by immune cells.
8	an assay of biological dosimetry from the changed number of lymphocytes and hypersegmented neutrophiles evaluated by means of statistical decision method	This is a test of biological dosimetry based on the modified number of lymphocytes and neutrophils, evaluated using apo; a method of statistical decision.
8	lymphocyte response to hepatitis b surface antigen findings in hepatitis and indian childhood cirrhosis	Lymphocyte response to surface antigen; hepatitis b in hepatitis; childhood hepatitis and cirrhosis in India.
8	b lymphocytes lacking surface ig in patients with immune deficiency initiation of ig synthesis in culture in cells of a patient with thymoma	In patients with immuno-deficient cells, cell-free b-cells initiate the synthesis of ig in culture in the cells of a patient with thymoma.
8	surface structure of the macrophages and lymphocytes in their interaction under conditions of antigenic stimulation observed with the scanning electron microscope	The surface structure of macrophages and lymphocytes in their interaction under conditions of antigenic stimulation as observed by the scanning electron microscope.
8	induction of 16alpha hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Induction of 16alpha hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	surface proteins of thymus derived lymphocytes and bone marrow derived lymphocytes selective isolation of immunoglobulin and the theta antigen by non ionic detergents	The surface proteins of thymus-derived lymphocytes and bone marrow-derived lymphocytes selectively isolate l' immunoglobulin and l' theta antigen by non-ionic detergents.
8	fractionation of functional lymphocytes sensitized to basic encephalitogen on derivatized collagen and gelatin gels	Fractionation of functional lymphocytes sensitized to basic etapos; encephalitogenic on derived collagen and gelatin gels.
8	regulation of the release of colony stimulating activity from mitogen stimulated lymphocytes	The regulation of the release of l' stimulatory activity of the mitogen-stimulated lymphocyte colonies.
8	stimulator t cells involvement in the induction of cell mediated cytotoxicity	Cell-mediated t-cells are involved in the induction of cell-mediated cytotoxicity.
8	kinetic studies of circulating lymphocytes in malignant lymphatic disease using the impulse cytophotometer	Kinetic studies of circulating lymphocytes in malignant lymphatic disease assisted by an impulsive cytophotometer.
8	human antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity isolation and identification of a subpopulation of peripheral blood lymphocytes which kill antibody coated autologous target cells	Human antibody-dependent cell cytotoxicity isolation and identification of a sub@-@ population of peripheral blood lymphocytes that kill autologous target cells coated with antibody.
8	effects of cytotoxic immunosuppressants on tuberculin sensitive lymphocytes in guinea pigs	Effects of cytotoxic immunosuppressants on tuberculin sensitive lymphocytes in the guinea pig.
8	comparative study of the ultrastructure of immune and normal phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes	Comparative study of the ultrastructure of immune and normal lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin.
8	ultrastructural relationships between decidua trophoblast and lymphocytes at the beginning of human pregnancy	Lymphocyte ultrastructural relationships between trophoblast decidua and early human pregnancy.
8	characteristics of a cytotoxic human lymphocyte dependent antibody	Characteristics of a cytotoxic antibody dependent on human lymphocytes.
8	high terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity in a new t cell line rpmi 8402 of acute lymphoblastic leukemia origin	High terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity in a new cell line of rpmi 8402 d' acute lymphoblastic origin.
8	thymosin induced increase in e rosette forming capacity of lymphocytes in patients with malignant neoplasms	Thymosin increased the rosette-forming ability of lymphocytes in patients with malignant neoplasms.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal donors a functional marker of human non t lymphocytes	Cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal donors are a functional marker of non-t human lymphocytes.
8	in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes obtained from uraemic patients maintained by heamodialysis	In vitro reactivity of lymphocytes obtained from uremic patients maintained by heamodialysis.
8	effect of dimethylbenzanthracene on lymphocytes of the peripheral blood in man	Effect of dimethylbenzanthracene on lymphocytes of peripheral blood in humans.
8	induction of t cell differentiation in the bursa of fabricius by a soluble thymus factor	Induced differentiation of t-cells in the bundle of fabricius by a soluble thymus factor.
8	physicochemical characterization of chemotatic lymphokines produced by human t and b lymphocytes	Physico-chemical characterization of chemotactic lymphokines produced by human t and b lymphocytes.
8	the expression of theta like antigen by rat peripheral lymphocytes serologic and functional studies	L' expression of theta antigens by rat peripheral lymphocytes in serological and functional studies.
8	suppressor cell control of unresponsiveness to experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	Suppressant cell control of non-response to experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	in vitro production of ige by lymphocytes from a patient with hyperimmunoglobulinaemia e eosinophilia and increased lymphocytes carrying surface ige	In vitro production of eosinophilia and augmentation of lymphocytes carrying apos; a patient with apos; hyperimmunoglobulinemia and apos; eosinophilia; surface snow.
8	an absolute requirement for serum macromolecules in phytohaemagglutinin induced human lymphocyte dna synthesis	An absolute requirement for serum macromolecules in phytohemagglutinin induces human lymphocyte DNA synthesis.
8	activation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a dependence of monocytes	Activation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by concanavalin, dependence of monocytes on concanavalin-@-@.
8	ultrastructural investigations on the lysosomal system of lymph node lymphocytes in transplantation immunity	Ultrastructural studies on the lysosomal system of lymph node lymphocytes in apos; transplantation immunity.
8	depressed lymphocyte function after measles mumps rubella vaccination	Decreased lymphocyte function after mumps rubella vaccination.
8	lymphocyte associated antigens in patients with alveolar cell carcinoma	Lymphocyte-associated antigens in patients with apos; alveolar carcinoma.
8	migration inhibition of peritoneal cells and pha lymphocyte toxicity in rats during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis	Inhibition of peritoneal cell migration and pha lymphocyte toxicity in rats during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis.
8	effect of oil attached bcg cell wall on the kinetics of lymphocytes in the tumor draining node	The effect of the oil attached to the cell wall of the bcg on the kinetics of lymphocytes in the draining ganglion of the tumour.
8	unscheduled dna synthesis in human lymphocytes treated with neocarzinostatin	Unprogrammed synthesis of DNA in human lymphocytes treated with neocarzinostatin.
8	histocompatibility testing in dogs ii leukocyte typing in relation to the mixed lymphocyte culture mlc reactivity	Tests of apos; histocompatibility in dogs ii leukocyte typing in relation to the mlc reactivity of mixed lymphocyte cultures.
8	relative genetic efficiency of 50 me v protons as derived from analyses of chromosome anomalies in human lymphocytes	The relative genetic efficiency of the 50-m-old protons was determined from chromosome aberrations in human lymphocytes.
8	radiation induced chromosome aberrations in human peripheral lymphocytes exposure to x rays or protons	The radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human peripheral lymphocytes exposed to X-rays or protons.
8	role of the regional lymph node in neoplasia cellular mediated reactivity in vitro by autologous regional or distant lymph nodes or peripheral blood lymphocytes of dogs with spontaneous neoplasms	The role of the regional lymph node in the in vitro neoplastic cell-mediated reactivity of autologous regional or distal lymph nodes or peripheral blood lymphocytes in dogs with spontaneous neoplasms.
8	increased lymphocyte mediated destruction of tumor cells in microcytotoxicity assays seen after addition of inhibitors of protein synthesis	Increased destruction of tumour cells by the lymphocyte intermediate in microcytotoxicity assays was observed after the addition of inhibitors of protein synthesis.
8	tissue factor activity of cultured human lymphocytes	L' tissue factor activity of cultured human lymphocytes.
8	massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia e eosinophilia and increased ige bearing lymphocytes	Massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia and eosinophilia and increased carrier snow lymphocytes.
8	relationship between sterol synthesis and dna synthesis in phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes	The relationship between sterol synthesis and DNA synthesis in phytohemagglutinin stimulates mouse lymphocytes.
8	selective adsorption of immune lymphocytes synthesizing dna on corresponding target cells	Selective adsorption of immune cells synthesizing DNA from corresponding target cells.
8	radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes after partial body exposure to 60co gamma irradiation and in vitro exposure to 230 kv x irradiation	Radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes after partial body exposure to 60co gamma irradiation and in vitro exposure to 230 kv x irradiation.
8	isolation and electrophoretic characteristics of 3 lymphocyte populations of normal human blood	Isolation and electrophoretic characteristics of three populations of normal human blood lymphocytes.
8	studies on n5 methyltetrahydrofolate homocystein methyltransferase in normal and leukemia leukocytes	Studies of n5 methyltetrahydrofolate homocysteine methyltransferase in normal and leukemic leukocytes.
8	human lymphocytes 5 nucleotidase positive and negative subpopulations	Human lymphocytes 5 under-human nucleotidase positive and negative populations.
8	radiosensitivity of sensitized and nonsensitized human lymphocytes evaluated in vitro	The radiosensitivity of sensitized and non-sensitized human lymphocytes evaluated in vitro.
8	the blood xylose test in childhood correlation between 1 hour blood xylose levels and numbers of intraepithelial lymphocytes in intestinal mucosa in celiac disease	The blood xylose test in childhood correlation between 1 hour blood xylose levels and number of intraepithelial lymphocytes in intestinal mucosa.
8	experimental production of granulomatous pneumonitis comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with particulate and soluble antigens administered via the respiratory route	Experimental production of granulomatous pneumonia, comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with particulate and soluble antigens administered by the respiratory route.
8	investigations concerning the fixation of hepatitis b antigen hbag on peripheral lymphocytes and isolated hepatocytes in patients with inflammatory liver diseases author s transl	Hepatic hepatitis antigen binding research; hepatitis b on peripheral lymphocytes and isolated hepatocytes in patients with inflammatory liver disease.
8	very short lived and stable mrnas from resting human lymphocytes	Resting human lymphocytes are stable and of very short duration.
8	increased cellular levels of spermidine or spermine are required for optimal dna synthesis in lymphocytes activated by concanavalin a	An increase in the cellular levels of spermidine or spermine is required for optimal synthesis of DNA in concanavalin a-activated lymphocytes.
8	t rosette assay in vitro correlate of cellular immunity	T Rosette in vitro test correlated with cellular immunity.
8	two stages in lymphocyte mediator production by differential susceptibility to blockade using niridazole	Two stages of lymphocyte mediator production by differential susceptibility to blockade with niridazole.
8	studies on the behavior of lymphocytes in the direct lymphocytotoxicity test dlt in surgical patients ii dynamics of immunological reactivity in selected cases	Studies of the behaviour of lymphocytes in the direct lymphocytotoxicity test dlt in surgical patients ii dynamics of immunologic reactivity in selected cases.
8	morphological changes in maternal lymphocytes in pregnancy	Morphological changes in maternal lymphocytes in pregnancy.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity and t cell levels in patients with melanoma correlations with clinical and pathological stage	Lymphocyte reactivity in vitro and t cell levels in patients correlating with the clinical and pathological stage of melanoma.
8	production of mif like supernatants by rheumatoid arthritis lymphocytes stimulated by immunoglobulin g	Production of mif-like supernatants by rheumatoid polyarterial lymphocytes stimulated by apos; immunoglobulin g.
8	study of the effects of antigammaglobulin factors on lymphocytes from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Study of the effects of antigammaglobulin factors on lymphocytes in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	a case of impaired chemotaxis and lymphocyte transformation	A case of lymphocyte cancer; a case of impaired chemotaxis and impaired lymphocyte transformation.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis in vitro by cerebrospinal fluid cells in patients with meningoencephalitis of presumed viral origin	In vitro synthesis of immunoglobulins by cerebrospinal fluid cells in patients with meningo-encephalitis d' presumed viral origin.
8	contamination of anti immunoglobulin reagents with antibodies to beta 2 microglobulin and other unrelated antigens effects on immunofluorescence staining of human lymphocytes	Contamination of the anti--immunoglobulin reagents with antibodies to beta 2 microglobulin and d' other unrelated antigens affecting the immunofluorescence staining of human lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of normal lymphocytes with autologous lymphoid cell lines properties of derived killer cells	Stimulation of normal lymphocytes with autologous properties of derived killer cell lines.
8	capacity of sera from patients with mammary carcinoma to promote pha stimulation of human lymphocytes	The ability of sera from patients with apo; breast carcinoma to promote pha stimulation of human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic mechanisms detected in vitro following sheep renal allografts	Cytotoxic mechanisms detected in vitro following sheep renal allografts.
8	rhesus lymphocyte alloantigens iii identification of new antigens	Rhesus lymphocyte Alloantigen iii identification of new antigens.
8	elution and characterization of lymphocytes from rheumatoid inflammatory tissue	Elution and characterization of lymphocytes from inflammatory rheumatoid tissue.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in the cerebrospinal fluid and peripheral blood in patients with multiple sclerosis	Under-lymphocyte populations in the cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord and peripheral blood in patients with multiple sclerosis.
8	quantitative studies of lymphocytes and other cell populations in the bone marrow of neonatally thymectomized c3h mice	Quantitative studies of lymphocytes and dolipos; other cellular populations in the bone marrow of neonatal thymectomized mice.
8	in vitro effect of methylprednisolone on protein synthesis of activated canine thymus derived lymphocytes	In vitro effect of methylprednisolone on protein synthesis of activated canine thymus-derived lymphocytes.
8	the assessment of histocompatibility by mixed lymphocyte reaction as measured by the macrophage electrophoretic mobility mem test	Lapos; evaluation of apos; histocompatibility by a mixed lymphocyte reaction as measured by the macrophage electrophoretic mobility test.
8	anti hl a7 lymphocyte dependent antibody	Antibody-hl a7 is lymphocyte dependent.
8	direct cell mediated lympholysis by peripheral blood lymphocytes from renal allograft recipients	Cell-mediated direct cell-mediated lympholysis by peripheral blood lymphocytes of renal recipients.
8	ultrastructural comparison of the cell coat in normal and chronic lymphocytic leukaemic blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a labelling and cationic staining	Ultrastructural comparison of the apos; cell envelope in normal and chronic lymphocytic leukemic blood lymphocytes by concanavalin, labelling and cationic staining.
8	morphological studies on allergen induced blast transformation of sensitized lymphocytes	Morphological studies of allergens induced blast transformation of sensitized lymphocytes.
8	correlation between incorporation of myo 2 3h inositol into the phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes and disability degree stage and duration of multiple sclerosis	Correlation between myo 2 h inositol incorporation into the phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes and the stage of the degree of apos; disability and duration of multiple sclerosis.
8	the fine structure of the lymphocyte nucleus under conditions of phytohaemagglutinin stimulation	The fine structure of the lymphocyte nucleus under conditions of phytohemagglutinin stimulation.
8	in vitro dna synthesis in lymphocytes from turkeys vaccinated with lasota tc and inactivated newcastle disease vaccines	In vitro synthesis of DNA in the lymphocytes of turkeys vaccinated with lasota tc and inactivated vaccines against Newcastle disease.
8	increased lymphocyte atp ase activity in patients with carcinomas of the oral cavity and larynx	An increase in the incidence of lymphocyte activity in patients with carcinoma of the oral cavity and the larynx.
8	anitroxide sterol derivative potently modifies cholesterol biosynthesis by normal and neoplastic guinea pig lymphocytes	The sterol derivative of anitroxide markedly modifies cholesterol biosynthesis by normal and neoplastic guinea pig lymphocytes.
8	influence of serum blocking factors on cancer patients undergoing immunotherapy	L' influence of serum blocking factors on cancer patients on immunotherapy.
8	damaged dna in lymphocytes of aplastic anemia	DNA of lymphocytes with aplastic anemia was damaged.
8	decrease and altered distribution of human t antigen on chronic lymphatic leukemia cells of t type suggesting a clonal origin	Decreased and altered distribution of the human tgen on chronic lymphatic leukemia type t cells, suggesting a clonal origin.
8	cellular composition of the nipple aspirate specimen of breast fluid i the benign cells	Cellular composition of the apos; sample of breast fluid sucked up by the nipple i benign cells.
8	dna synthesis of lymphocytes in hyperthyroid and euthyroid subjects effect of 131i therapy on hyperthyroidism	DNA synthesis of lymphocytes in hyperthyroid and euthyroid subjects Effect of therapy 131i on apos; hyperthyroidism.
8	electronmicroscopic and immunohistochemical studies on human lymphocytes	Electron microscopy and immunohistochemistry studies on human lymphocytes.
8	influence of prednisone and cytostatics on human blood b t and o lymphocytes in diseases	L' influence of prednisone and cytostatics on human blood lymphocytes and lymphocytes in disease.
8	antibody dependent and direct lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in patients on hemodialysis	Antibody-dependent and directly lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in patients on hemodialysis.
8	the influence of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on the growth of lymphocytes and fibroblasts in vitro	L' influence of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on the growth of lymphocytes and fibroblasts in vitro.
8	intracellular immunoglobulin production in vitro by lymphocytes from patients with hypogammaglobulinaemia and their effect on normal lymphocytes	Intracellular immune globulin production in vitro by lymphocytes from patients with apo; hypogamaglobulinemia and its effects on normal lymphocytes.
8	investigations of the t and b cells and the hemopexin carrying lymphocytes in cases of porphyria cutanea tarda author s transl	Examining t and b cells and hemopexin-carrying lymphocytes in cases of cutanea porphyria took a long time to translate.
8	immunologic heterogeneity of the lymphocyte surface in various diseases	Immunological heterogeneity of the lymphocyte surface in various diseases.
8	co operation between macrophages and a factor from lymphocytes in tumor lysis in vitro	Co-operation between macrophages and a factor of lymphocytes in tumor lysis in vitro.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactivity of human lymphocytes primed in vitro i secondary response to allogenic lymphocytes	Mixed lymphocyte reactivity of human lymphocytes initiated in vitro i secondary response to allogeneic lymphocytes.
8	analysis of human thymocyte subpopulations using discontinuous gradients of albumin precursor lymphocytes in human thymus	Analysis of human thymocyte populations at baseline; help discontinuous gradients of precursor lymphocytes; albumin in human thymus.
8	separation of complement dependent and lymphocyte dependent cytotoxic activity in human sera	Dosage separation; complement- and dose-dependent cytotoxic activity; lymphocyte-dependent activity in human sera.
8	participation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in the production of macrophage migration inhibitory factor	Participation of immunoglobulin-carrying lymphocytes in the production of macrophage migration inhibitory factor.
8	determination of the nucleolar coefficient in lymphocytes in chemotherapeutically treated patients with ovarian carcinoma	Determination of the nucleolar coefficient in lymphocytes from patients with chemotherapeutic treated ovarian carcinoma.
8	effect of cyclic nucleotides on the transformation and proliferation of lymphocytes	The effect of cyclic nucleotides on the transformation and proliferation of lymphocytes.
8	reactivity of lymphocytes from patients with syphilis towards t pallidum antigen in the leucocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests	Lymphocyte reactivity in leukocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests of patients with syphilis towards the antigen pallidum.
8	inhibition of haemopoietic stem cells by syngeneic lymphocytes treated with antilymphocyte serum	Inhibition of hematopoietic stem cells by syngenic lymphocytes treated with antilymphocyte serum.
8	experimental murine leprosy 8 ultrastructural features of the inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology in c3h and c57bl mice after foot pad inoculation with mycobacterium lepraemurium	Experimental murine 8 ultrastructural features of the intestines; inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology in c3h and c57bl mice after inoculation with lepraemurium mycobacteria in plantar pads.
8	the response of lymphocytes to phytohaemagglutinin in women with pre eclampsia	The response of lymphocytes to phytohaemagglutinin in women with preclampsia.
8	plasma inhibitors of lymphocyte response to phytohaemagglutinin in children with recurrent infections	Plasma inhibitors of lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin in children with recurrent infections.
8	t and cr lymphocyte profile in leprosy and the effect of treatment	T and the pattern of lymphocytes in leprosy and lupus; effect of treatment.
8	the rate of sister chromatid exchanges parallel to spontaneous chromosome breakage in fanconi s anemia and to trenimon induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts	The rate of sister chromatid exchange was found to be parallel to spontaneous chromosome breakage in the apos; fanconi anemia and trenimon-induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts.
8	effect of cortisol on the ultrastructure of normal leukemic and cultured human lymphocytes	The effect of cortisol on the ultrastructure of normal leukemic and cultured human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte stimualtion by a mammary carcinoma assoicated glycoprotein	Acute lymphocyte stimulation by a specific glycoprotein-specific mammary carcinoma.
8	effect of blood serum from schizophrenic patients and from normal donors on dna synthesis in lymphocytes	The effect of blood serum from patients with schizophrenia and from normal donors on the synthesis of DNA in lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic action of immune lymphocytes on adherent cells macrophages of autologous system lymph nodes during delayed hypersensitivity	Cytotoxic action of immune lymphocytes on adherent macrophages of autologous lymph nodes during delayed hypersensitivity.
8	mesenchymal reaction and serum glycoprotein concentration in chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Mesenchymal reaction and serum glycoprotein concentration in chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis.
8	tumour associated lymphocyte cytotoxicity superimposed on spontaneous cytotoxicity in melanoma patients	Tumour-associated cytotoxicity of lymphocytes is superimposed on spontaneous cytotoxicity in melanoma.
8	sequential in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes from melanoma patients receiving immunotherapy compared with the reactivity of lymphocytes from healthy donors	The sequential in vitro responsiveness of lymphocytes from melanoma patients receiving immunotherapy is comparable to the responsiveness of lymphocytes from healthy donors.
8	in vitro monitoring of cadaver kidney donor pretreatment by lymphocyte culture	In vitro monitoring of cadaver kidney donor pretreatment by lymphocyte culture.
8	spontaneous rosette formation by lymphocytes differential effect of cytochalasin b on thymocytes and thymus related peripheral blood lymphocytes in the guinea pig	Spontaneous lymphocyte rosette formation has a differential effect of cytochalasin b on thymocytes and thymus-like peripheral blood lymphocytes in the guinea pig.
8	appearance of epstein barr virus nuclear antigen in human cordblood lymphocytes	Lapos; appearance of epstein virus nuclear antigen in human cord blood lymphocytes.
8	mixed lymphocyte culture stimulatory and responding capacity of lymphocytes from patients with lymphoproliferative diseases	Lymphocytes from patients with lymphoproliferative diseases have a combined lymphocyte stimulation and response capacity.
8	immunological studies in patients with chronic active hepatitis cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to autochthonous liver cells grown in tissue culture	Immunological studies in patients with chronic active hepatic cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes on cultured autochthonous liver cells.
8	the immunological capacity of peripheral lymphocytes in a blast transformation system using frozen stored cells	Immunological capacity of peripheral lymphocytes in explosion transformation system using frozen stored cells.
8	binding of c reactive protein to antigen induced but not mitogen induced t lymphoblasts	The binding of c-reactive protein to n&apos antigen-induced t lymphoblasts is not mitogenic.
8	secondary cytotoxic allograft responses in vitro ii differentiation of memory t cells into cytotoxic t lymphocytes in the absence of cell proliferation	Secondary reactions cytotoxic allografts in vitro ii differentiation of memory t cells into cytotoxic t lymphocytes in the absence of cell proliferation.
8	diamond blackfan syndrome lymphocyte mediated suppression of erythropoiesis	Blackfan diamond lymphocyte syndrome mediated suppression of epos; erythropoiesis.
8	ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of the replication of herpesvirus saimiri in cultured lymphocytes of infected owl monkeys	Ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of the replication of saimiri herpesviruses in cultured lymphocytes of infected owl monkeys.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in vitro independence of mixed lymphocyte reactions and t cell mitogen responses from the in vitro generation of cytotoxic effectors in primary immunodeficiency diseases	Cell-mediated lympholysis in vitro Independent of the in vitro generation of cytotoxic agents in primary immunodeficiency diseases, mixed lymphocyte reactions and responses of t-cell mitogens.
8	immunological responsiveness of frozen thawed human lymphocytes	Frozen and thawed human lymphocytes are immunologically reactive.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and the lymphocyte response to pha in experimental pyelonephritis	Quantification of lymphocytes with apos; immunoglobulin and lymphocyte response to pha in experimental pyelonephritis lymphocytes.
8	effect of vincristine on sister chromatid exchanges of normal human lymphocytes	Effect of vincristine on the sister chromatid exchanges of normal human lymphocytes.
8	elaboration of pyrimidine specific nucleosidases by human lymphoblastoid cells of established cultures	Development of pyrimidine-specific nucleosidases by human lymphoblastoid cells from established cultures.
8	immunologic mechanisms in hepatitis b assayed by antigen binding lymphocytes	Immunologic mechanisms of apo; hepatitis b tested by binding lymphocytes; antigen.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep i recirculation of lymphocytes through peripheral lymph nodes and tissues	Studies of sheep lymphocytes i recirculation of lymphocytes in lymph nodes and peripheral lymphatic tissues.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep ii some properties of cells in various compartments of the recirculating lymphocyte pool	Studies of sheep lymphocytes ii certain properties of the cells in various compartments of the recirculating lymphocyte pool.
8	lymphocyte stimulation by soluble subcellular fractions	Lymphocyte stimulation by soluble subcellular fractions.
8	marrow grafts between canine litter mates homozygous or heterozygous for lymphocyte defined histocompatibility antigens	Pith marrow grafts between canine litter partners are homozygous or heterozygous for cell-defined antigen; histocompatibility.
8	suppressor cell activity after concanavalin a treatment of lymphocytes from normal donors	L' suppressive cell activity following concanavalin treatment of lymphocytes from normal donors.
8	binding of components of the properdin system to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and b lymphocytes	The binding of components of the propellin system to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and b lymphocytes.
8	membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphatic leukaemia	The membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	antibody dependent direct cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes ii studies on peripheral blood lymphocytes synovial fluid cells and sera from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Direct antibody-dependent cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes ii studies of peripheral blood lymphocyte synovial fluid cells and sera from patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	surface immunoglobulins of lymphocytes in plasmacytoma v the effect of rna rich extract from mouse plasmacytoma mopc 104e on the immune response	The surface immunoglobulins of lymphocytes in the plasmacytome have an effect of apos; a rich extract of mouse mopc 104 plasmacytome on the immune response.
8	inhibition of macrophage lymphocyte interaction by cytochalasin b during antigen recognition by t lymphocytes	Lapse; macrophage and lymphocyte interaction by cytochalasin b during apos recognition; antigen by t lymphocytes.
8	lymphoid cell subpopulations ii characterization of cell populations responsible for syngery in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	Sub--lymphoid cell populations ii Characterization of the cell populations responsible for the syntax in the apos; mixed lymphocyte interaction.
8	t lymphocyte enriched murine peritoneal exudate cells i a reliable assay for antigen induced t lymphocyte proliferation	Murine lymphocytes enriched with dapos cells; peritoneal peritoneal exudate a reliable assay for antigen-induced t-cell proliferation.
8	effect of anti ia sera on mixed lymphocyte reaction in mice	Effect of anti ia antisera on mixed lymphocyte reaction in mice.
8	adoptive transfer of tumor immunity between twins by in vitro immunized nodal macrophages and lymphocytes reversal of serum enhancement	Adoptional transmission of the apo; tumour immunity between twins by in vitro immunized nodal macrophages and reverse apo lymphocytes; serum augmentation.
8	terminal transferase in human bone marrow lymphocytes	A terminal transferase in human bone marrow lymphocytes.
8	lack of synergistic effect between x ray and uv irradiation on the frequency of chromosome aberrations in pha stimulated human lymphocytes in the g1 stage	The absence of apo; synergistic effect between X-rays and apo; UV irradiation on the frequency of chromosomal aberrations in pha stimulated human lymphocytes at the g1 stage.
8	ferritin synthesis in lymphocytes polymorphs and monocytes	Ferritin synthesis in polymorphic lymphocytes and monocytes.
8	the blocking effect of conditioned media from tumour cell cultures on the lysis of target cells by immune lymphocytes and macrophages	L' blocking effect of conditioned media from tumor cell cultures on the lysis of target cells by immune cells and macrophages.
8	long term effects of radiation of t and b lymphocytes in peripheral blood of patients with hodgkin s disease	Long-term effects of radiation from t and b lymphocytes in peripheral blood of patients with Hodgkin's disease.
8	the lysosomal enzymes of lymphocytes in the premature and the term infant	Lysosomal enzymes of lymphocytes in premature and term infants.
8	activation of purified human t cells by mitogens diminished mitogen induced deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in human t cells compared with autologous peripheral blood lymphocytes	L' mitogen-purified activation of human t cells decreased mitogen-induced deoxyribonucleic acid etapos synthesis in human t cells compared with autologous peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	reactive and nonreactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis i possible role of macrophage lymphocyte interactions	Reactive and non-reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis i possible role of lymphocyte-macrophage interactions.
8	acridine orange fluorescence cytochemistry for detecting lymphocyte immunoreactivity	Acridine orange, fluorescence cytochemistry for detection of lymphocyte immunoreactivity.
8	some properties of the mitogenic factor induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin	Some properties of the mitogenic factor are induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	effect of crude and purified hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis	The effect of crude and purified hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	epstein barr nuclear antigen ebna carrying lymphocytes in human palatine tonsils	L' nuclear antigen barr ebna carries lymphocytes in human palatine tonsils.
8	variables and specificity of in vitro lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in human melanoma	The variables and specificity of in vitro lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in human melanoma.
8	separation of populations of sensitized lymphoid cells into fractions inhibiting and fractions enhancing syngeneic tumor growth in vivo	Separation of populations of sensitized lymphoid cells into inhibitory and growth-promoting fractions of syngenetic tumors in vivo.
8	isolation and partial characterization of agf 1 a rat lymphocyte membrane antigen	Isolation and partial characterization of agf 1, a rat lymphocyte membrane antigen.
8	an improved quantitative plaque assay for lymphocytes bearing antigen specific cell receptors	An improved quantitative plate assay for lymphocytes with specific cell receptors for antigen.
8	sequential studies of lymphocytes neutrophils and serum proteins during prednisone treatment	Sequential studies of lymphocyte neutrophils and serum proteins during prednisone treatment.
8	identification of camp dependant protein kinases in human lymphocytes	Identification of protein kinases in human lymphocytes.
8	leucocyte migration inhibitory activity of concanavalin a stimulated human lymphocytes modification by dipyridamole lysine acetylsalicylate and heparin	The inhibition of leukocyte migration by concanavalin stimulated human lymphocyte modification by dipyridamole lysine acetylsalicylate and l' heparin.
8	the use of nylon fibre as a method of separating human lymphocyte subpopulations	Using nylon fiber as a method of separating from sub@-@ human lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in normals and patients with rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis	Under-lymphocyte populations in normal subjects and patients with rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis.
8	long term maintenance in vitro of human t cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulator cells differences when using repeated stimulation in allogeneic mixed leukocyte culture and when using stimulation with autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Long-term in vitro maintenance of human t-cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulatory cells when using repeated stimulation in a mixed allogeneic leukocyte culture and when using stimulation with autologous lymphoblastoid cells.
8	massive invasion of fetal lymphocytes into the mother s blood at induced abortion	Massive invasion of fetal lymphocytes into the mother's blood during induced abortion.
8	secondary responses of human lymphocytes to alloantigens in vitro	Secondary reactions of human lymphocytes to alloantigens in vitro.
8	inhibition by anti beta2 microglobulin antisera of responder cells and not of stimulator cells in the mixed lymphocyte reaction	L' microglobulin anti-beta2 antisera inhibition of reactive cells and not of stimulatory cells in the mixed lymphocyte response.
8	cytotoxic antibody complicating platelet support in acute leukemia response to chemotherapy	Cytotoxic antibody that complicates platelet support in acute leukemic response to chemotherapy.
8	c1 and human platelets decrease in chronic lymphocyte leukemia effect of lymphocytes	Both human platelets and c1 decrease lapos; the chronic leukemic effect of lymphocytes on lymphocytes.
8	failure of nitrous oxide to inhibit transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin	Failure of nitrous oxide to inhibit transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin.
8	expression and segregation of hl a antigens in d98 ah 2 by lymphocyte and fibroblast hybrids	Expression and segregation of hl a antigens in d98 ah 2 by lymphocytes and hybrid fibroblasts.
8	lymphocyte abnormalities in mycosis fungoides	Acute lymphocyte abnormalities in mycosis fungi.
8	occurrence of lymphocytotoxic lymphocytes and antibodies after corneal transplantation	Lapos; development of lymphocytes and dapos; lymphocytotoxic antibodies after corneal transplant.
8	differences in free fatty acid and glucose metabolism of human blood neutrophils and lymphocytes	Differences in free fatty acid and glucose metabolism of neutrophils and human blood lymphocytes.
8	in vitro proliferative reactions by lymphocytes from both responder and low responder mice to t g a l	In vitro proliferative reactions of lymphocytes from both responding and low-response mice.
8	studies of intestinal lymphoid tissue i electron microscopic evidence of blast transformation in epithelial lymphocytes of mouse small intestinal mucosa	Epithelial lymphocyte transformation electron microscopy studies of intestinal lymphoid tissue from mouse small intestine.
8	relation of antigen binding cells to immunological memory	Relationship between antigen-binding cells and the immunological memory.
8	observations in vitro regarding the mechanism of the cell destruction by stimulated lymphocytes	In vitro observations of the mechanism of cell destruction by stimulated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte surface attached immunoglobulins in some clinical conditions	The lymphocyte surface binds immunoglobulins under certain clinical conditions.
8	the influence of sequential chemotherapy and radiotherapy on mitogen induced lymphocyte transformation in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia	L' influence of sequential chemotherapy and radiotherapy on mitogen-induced lymphocyte transformation in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
8	the effect of changes in dose rate on the yield of chromosome aberrations in human lymphocytes exposed to gamma radiation	The effect of changes in dose rate on the yield of chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes exposed to gamma radiation.
8	unusual intranuclear filaments in the circulating lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis and optic neuritis	Unusual intranuclear filaments in the circulating lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis and optic neuritis.
8	accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis in mice given lymphoid cells and serum from infected donors	Accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis from mice receiving lymphoid cells and serum from infected donors.
8	origin of lymphoid lines established from mixed cultures of cord blood lymphocytes and explants from infectious mononucleosis burkitt lymphoma and healthy donors	Origins of lymphoid lines established from mixed cultures of cord blood lymphocytes and dapos; explants of infectious burkitt lymphoma mononucleosis and healthy donors.
8	antigenic structure of phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes using specific antisera	The antigenic structure of phytohemagglutinin stimulates mouse lymphocytes using specific antisera.
8	t and b cells and cell mediated immunity in mycosis fungoides	Cell t and b and cell-mediated immunity in mycosis fungi.
8	nucleoli of lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of patients with bronchogenic lung and gastrointestinal cancer	Nucleolates of lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of patients with bronchogenic lung cancer or gastro-intestinal.
8	kinetics of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the small intestine of thymus deprived mice and antigen deprived mice	The kinetics of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the small intestine of thymus-deprived mice and of antigen-deprived mice.
8	evidence for suppressor cell activity associated with induction of herpesvirus saimiri induced lymphoma	Evidence of suppressive cell activity associated with apos; apos induction; apos-induced lymphoma; saimiri herpesviruses.
8	the effect of intrauterinely injected lymphocytes prepared from sensitized or non sensitized guinea pigs on the ultrastructure of rat fetal membranes visceral yolk sac	Effect of apo; intra-uterine injection of lymphocytes prepared from sensitized or non-sensitized rat fetal yolk sac; ultrastructure of rat fetal visceral yolk sac membranes.
8	demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal lymphocyte of balb c mice and absence of these activities in yc8 tumor cells and in lymphocytes of animals with yc8 lymphoma	Demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal lymphocytes from Berber mice and absence of these activities in yc8 tumor cells and lymphocytes from animals with dapos; lymphoma yc8.
8	in vitro response of bovine thoracic duct lymphocyte to phytohaemagglutinin following adult thymectomy	In vitro response of bovine thoracic canal lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin following adult thymectomy.
8	cytotoxic activity of human lymphocyte plasma membranes	L' cytotoxic activity of human lymphocyte plasma membranes.
8	double stranded ribonuclease activity in human lymphocyte nuclei	Double stranded ribonuclease activity in human lymphocyte nuclei.
8	in vitro lymphocyte stimulation by wart antigen in man	In vitro lymphocyte stimulation by the verrue antigen in humans.
8	in vitro transforming activity of ebv i establishment and properties of two ebv strains m81 and m72 produced by immortalized callithrix jacchus lymphocytes	In vitro transformative activity; establishment and properties of two strains m81 and m72 of ebv produced by immortalized callithrix jacchus lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	The cytotoxic lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis.
8	inhibitory activity of medium dialyzed transfer factor on lymphocyte blastogenesis	Inhibitor activity of the medium's dialyzed transfer factor on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	a comparison of in vitro cell mediated reactivity against syngeneic tumor cells by various lymphoid cell populations from bacillus calmette gu rin tumor cured tumor sensitized tumor bearing and normal inbred guinea pigs	Comparison of in vitro cell-mediated responsiveness to syngenetic tumor cells by various populations of gu rin, tumour-susceptible, and normal inbred guinea pigs lymphoid cells.
8	genetic control of interindividual variations in the inducibility of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Genetic control of interindividual variations in apo; aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte subpopulation in neoplastic and non neoplastic thymus and in blood of patients with myasthenia gravis	Under-lymphocyte population in neoplastic and non-neoplastic thymus and blood of patients with severe myasthenia.
8	concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Concanavalin is an activated suppressant found in normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	the repair of x ray induced chromosomal damage in trisomy 2 and normal diploid lymphocytes	X-ray repair induced chromosomal damage in normal trisomic 2 and diploid lymphocytes.
8	control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes inhibitory effect of guanine and guanosine on induction of enzymes for pyrimidine biosynthesis de novo in phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes, inhibitory effect of guanine and guanosine on apos; induction of apos; enzymes for pyrimidine biosynthesis in phytohemagglutinin-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	permanent lymphoid lines from genetically marked lymphocytes success with lymphocytes recovered from frozen storage	Perennial lymphoid lines of lymphocytes successfully labelled with lymphocytes recovered from frozen storage.
8	the influence of dissolved oxygen on the mitogen responses of mouse lymphocytes	Lapos; influence of dissolved oxygen on mouse lymphocyte mitogenic responses.
8	a sensitive micromethod for generating and assaying allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes	A sensitive micromethod for generating and testing allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes.
8	humoral sensitization in parous women cytotoxic antibodies to non hl a antigens	Humoral sensitization to cytotoxic antibodies to non-hl a antigens in pregnant women.
8	suppressor function of peripheral blood mononuclear cells in normal individuals and in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Suppressive functions of peripheral blood mononuclear cells in normal individuals and in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across specialized vascular endothelium i the entry of lymphocytes into the isolated mesenteric lymph node of the rat	Lymphocyte migration in the vascular endothelium specialized in the lymphocyte; entry of lymphocytes into the isolated mesenteric lymph node of the rat.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity against measles virus in sspe ii analysis of cytotoxic effector cells	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against measles virus in apos; immunoassay of cytotoxic effector cells.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of human lymphocytes against a myeloid cell line characterization of effector cells	Natural cytotoxic reactivity of human lymphocytes against characterization of epos, a myeloid cell line of effector cells.
8	bidirectional amplification of macrophage lymphocyte interactions enhanced lymphocyte activation factor production by activated adherent mouse peritoneal cells	Lapses; bidirectional amplification of macrophage-lymphocyte interactions increased lymphocyte factor production; activation by activated mouse adherent peritoneal cells.
8	rosette plaques with lymphoid cells from heterozygous rabbits ani hapten antibody forming cells displaying either one or both b locus surface allelic markers	Rosette plates containing lymphoid cells from heterozygous rabbits and anti-apos; hapten formed cells with one or both b locus surface allele markers.
8	effect of lectins on the levels of camp and cgmp in guinea pig lymphocytes early responses of lymph node cells to mitogenic and non mitogenic lectins	Effect of lectins on levels of camp and cgmp in guinea pig lymphocytes, early responses of lymph node cells to mitogenic and non-mitogenic lectins.
8	specific positive and negative selection of rat lymphocytes reactive to strong histocompatibility antigens activation with alloantigens in vitro and in vivo	Specific positive and negative selection of rat lymphocytes reactive to high level of antigen activation; alloantigen-compatibility in vitro and in vivo.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro i the development of suppressor cells and cytotoxic lymphocytes in mixed lymphocyte cultures	Cell-mediated immune response in vitro i the development of suppressive cells and cytotoxic lymphocytes in mixed lymphocyte cultures.
8	factor b of the alternative complement pathway on human lymphocytes	Factor b of the alternative pathway of complement in human lymphocytes.
8	t cell deficiency in patients with autoimmune hemolytic anemia warm type	Hemolytic hot-cell immune-auto hemolytic anemia in patients with apo.
8	presence of alpha 2 macroglobulin on the membrane of peripheral human blood lymphocytes a new lymphocyte maker	The presence of apos; alpha 2 macroglobulin on the membrane of peripheral human blood lymphocytes is a novel lymphocyte factor.
8	peripheral lymphocytes in paraproteinemia	Uh, peripheral lymphocytes in paraproteinemia.
8	5 nucleotidase activity in leukaemic lymphocytes	L' nucleotidase activity in leukemic lymphocytes is 5.
8	the effects of therapeutic irradiation on lymphocytes and immunity	Dosage effects; therapeutic irradiation on lymphocytes and lupus; immunity.
8	collagenase production by rheumatoid synovial cells stimulation by a human lymphocyte factor	Collagenase production by rheumatoid synovial cell stimulation by human lymphocyte factor.
8	free ribosomes in physiologically nondividing cells human peripheral lymphocytes	Free ribosomes in physiologically non-divisional human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	cytochemical characteristics of nucleic acids in the peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis	Cytochemical characteristics of nucleic acids in peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis.
8	quantitative ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of iodinated plasma membranes of lymphocytes during segregation and internalization of surface immunoglobulins	Quantitative ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of iodinated plasma membranes of lymphocytes during segregation and l' internalization of surface immunoglobulins.
8	cytotoxic activity of rheumatoid and normal lymphocytes against allogeneic and autologous synovial cells in vitro	Cytotoxic activity of rheumatoid and normal lymphocytes against allogeneic and autologous synovial cells in vitro.
8	b t and null lymphocytes in newborn infants and their mothers	Bt lymphocytes and null lymphocytes in newborns and their mothers.
8	interaction of c reactive protein with lymphocytes and monocytes complement dependent adherence and phagocytosis	L' interaction of reactive protein c with lymphocytes and monocytes completes adhesion and phagocytosis.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice vi inhibition of afferent sensitivity by suppressor t cells in adoptive tolerance	Tolerance and sensitivity to dnfb contact in vi mice inhibition of afferent sensitivity by t suppressive cells in adoptive tolerance.
8	t lymphocyte precursors i synergy between precursor and mature t lymphocytes in the response to concanavalin a	Lymphocyte precursors t i synergy between precursor and mature t-cells in response to concanavalin a.
8	lymphocyte nucleoli activation as a marker of autoimmune disorder development i observation in nzb mice	L' lymphocyte nucleolus activation as a marker of auto-immune development in nzb mice.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of rat lymphocytes against syngeneic gross virus induced lymphoma	The natural cytotoxic reactivity of rat lymphocytes against macroscopic syngenic virus induced lymphoma.
8	lymphocyte plasma membranes vi surface antigens of lymphocytes in chronic lymphocytic leukemia	The plasma membranes of viogenic surface antigens of lymphocytes in chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	spontaneous interaction in vitro between lymphocytes and syngeneic peritoneal macrophages of mice	Spontaneous in vitro interaction between lymphocytes and syngeneal peritoneal macrophages of mice.
8	different effects of phytohemagglutinin activated lymphocytes and their culture supernatants on macrophage function	Various effects of phytohemagglutinin-activated lymphocytes and their culture supernatants on macrophage function were observed.
8	mg2 and ca2 stimulated atpase at the outer surface of human peripheral lymphocytes and hematopoietic cell lines correlation between enzyme activity and immunoglobulin secretion	Both mg2 and ca2 stimulated apos; atpase at the outer surface of human peripheral lymphocytes and hematopoietic cell lines correlated with enzyme activity and immunoglobulin secretion.
8	hemihypotrophy in a girl with a translocation t 13q 7p	Hemihypotrophy in a girl with a translocation t 13q 7p.
8	lymphocyte cytotoxicity in alcoholic hepatitis	Lymphocyte cytotoxicity in alcoholic hepatitis.
8	normal lymphocyte function in the presence of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Normal lymphocyte function in the presence of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol.
8	immunofluorescent staining of the surfaces of lymphocytes in suspension from patients with dengue hemorrhagic fever	The immunofluorescent staining of the surfaces of the suspended lymphocytes of patients with dengue hemorrhagic fever.
8	fate of antibodies bound to lymphocyte surface i study with complement dependent cytotoxicity indirect immunofluorescence and radiolabelled antibodies	The fate of antibody bound to lymphocyte surface i was studied with complement-dependent cytotoxicity, indirect immunofluorescence, and radiolabeled antibodies.
8	effect of supernatant from pha stimulated lymphocyte culture on blastic transformation of peripheral blood lymphocytes in healthy controls and patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia	Lapos; supernatant effect of pha stimulated lymphocyte culture on the blast transformation of peripheral blood lymphocytes in healthy controls and patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	characterization of lymphocyte inhibition by supernatants of crowded lymphocytoblasts	Characterization of lymphocyte inhibition by supernatants of overpopulated lymphocytoblasts.
8	interaction of k lymphocytes with myeloma proteins of different igg subclasses	Interaction of k lymphocytes with myeloma proteins of different under-d&apos classes; igg.
8	role of t lymphocytes in the humoral immune response iii lack of influence of antigen charge on the isotype and charge of antibody	The role of t-cells in the humoral immune response iii absence of os; influence of antigenic load on the apos; isotype and charge of the apos; antibody.
8	sequential examination of lymphocyte proliferative capacity in patients with malignant melanoma receiving bcg immunotherapy	Sequence examination of lymphocyte proliferative capacity in patients with malignant melanoma receiving bcg immunotherapy.
8	establishment in continuous culture of a new type of lymphocyte from a burkitt like malignant lymphoma line d g 75	Establishment in continuous culture of a new type of lymphocyte from animals; a burkitt type of malignant lymphoma lineage.
8	suppressor cells in homograft tolerant rats	Suppressive cells in potato-tolerant rats; homograft.
8	in vitro induction of tumor specific immunity ii activation of cytotoxic lymphocytes to murine oncofetal antigens	In vitro, induction of apo; tumor-specific immunity ii; activation of cytotoxic lymphocytes to murine oncofetal antigens.
8	in vitro lymphocyte immunization to cultured human tumor cells parameters for generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes	In vitro immunization of lymphocytes against the parameters of human tumor cells cultured for cytotoxic lymphocyte production.
8	differentiation of lymphoid cells b cell as a direct target and t cell as a regulator in lipopolysaccharide enhanced induction of immunoglobulin production	Differentiation of b lymphoid cells as a direct target and t cells as a regulator in lipopolysaccharide increases the induction of immunoglobulin production.
8	inhibition of antigen and mitogen induced human lymphocyte proliferation by gold compounds	Inhibition of the antigen and mitogen induced human lymphocyte proliferation by the compounds of the gold.
8	lymphocytes hla antigens expressivity after neuraminidase treatment author s transl	L' expression of hla lymphocyte antigens after neuraminidase treatment was translated by the author.
8	role of suppressor cells in antibody induced inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions	The role of suppressive cells in antibody induced the inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions.
8	altered lymphocyte reactivity in rheumatoid arthritis	Altered lymphocyte reactivity in rheumatoid arthritis.
8	5 nucleotidase in different populations of mouse lymphocytes	Nucleotidase 5 in different populations of mouse lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte response in patients with head and neck cancer effect of clinical stage and radiotherapy	Lymphocyte response in patients with head and neck cancer following cancer; clinical and apo stage; radiation therapy.
8	lymphocyte locomotion i the initiation velocity pattern and path of locomotion in vitro	Lymphocyte locomotion i the velocity profile, initiation and in vitro locomotion pathway.
8	lymphocyte locomotion ii the lymphocyte traffic over the post capillary venules analysed by phase contrast microscopy of thin sections of rat lymph nodes	Lymphocytic locomotion ii Lymphocytic movement at-above capillary venules post-capillary was analyzed by phase contrast microscopy of thin sections of rat lymph nodes.
8	cell partition a simple test for lymphocyte sensitisation	Cell sharing A simple test for lymphocyte sensitization.
8	primary in vitro antibody response from human peripheral blood lymphocytes	The primary immune response of the human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro.
8	studies on the glycolipids of sheep thymus and of normal and concanavalin a stimulated sheep peripheral lymphocytes	Studies of glycolipids of sheep thymus and of normal and concanavalin stimulated peripheral lymphocytes of sheep.
8	inhibition of eb virus transformation of non adherent human lymphocytes by co cultivation with adult fibroblasts	L' inhibition of transformation of non-adherent human lymphocytes by Eb virus by co-culture with adult fibroblasts.
8	electron microscopic evidence for phagocytic properties of human peripheral mononuclear cells cultured with pha	Electron microscopic evidence of phagocytic properties of human peripheral mononuclear cells cultured with pha.
8	capability of lymphocytes stimulated in vitro with phytohemagglutinins to accomplish the graft versus host reaction	The ability of lymphocytes stimulated in vitro with phytohemagglutinins d' accomplish the graft versus host response.
8	enzymatic and immunologic activity of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis	Immunological and enzymatic activity of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis.
8	b and t lymphocytes in man iii b t and null lymphocytes in multiple sclerosis	B and T lymphocytes in adults; men iii b and null lymphocytes in multiple sclerosis patients.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by cholinergic receptor in myasthenia gravis	Stimulation of lymphocytes by cholinergic receptor in severe myasthenia.
8	complement dependent immunoglobulin g receptor function in lymphoid cells	L&apos g receptor function; complement-dependent immunoglobulin in lymphoid cells.
8	the blocking by autologous serum of maternal cell mediated immune reactions to placental antigen	The blockade by autologous serum of mother cell-mediated immune responses to the placental antigen.
8	reaction of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin in vitro in hereditary microspherocytosis	Reaction of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin in vitro in hereditary microspherocytosis.
8	advantages of cryoperserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence i mitogen stimulation	Advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for apo; sequential evaluation of human immune competence i stimulation of mitogens.
8	inhibition of lymphocyte blastogenesis by plasma of patients with minimal change nephrotic syndrome	L' inhibition of lymphocytic blastogenesis by plasma in patients with minimal change nephrotic syndrome.
8	leukocyte inhibiting factor lif production from human lymphocytes stimulated by bacterial lipopolysaccharides	Leukocytes inhibiting life factor production from human lymphocytes stimulated by bacterial lipopolysaccharides.
8	detection of t cell lymphoma associated antigens on cord blood lymphocytes and phytohemagglutinin stimulated blasts	The detection of lymphoma-associated antigens on cord blood lymphocytes and phytohemagglutinin stimulated these explosions.
8	cell electrophoretic analysis of lymphocytes and polymorphonuclear cells from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Cellular electrophoretic analysis of lymphocytes and polymorphonuclear cells from patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	cytokine inhibition of dna synthesis effect on cyclic adenosine monophosphate in lymphocytes	Apos; cytokine inhibition of apos; effect of apos synthesis; DNA on apos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate in lymphocytes.
8	human lymphocytes as target cells in a metabolizing test system in vitro for detecting potential mutagens	Human lymphocytes as target cells in a test system for in vitro metabolism to detect potential mutagens.
8	globulin producing cells in cultures of blast transformed lymphocytes in vitro	Cells that produce globulins in cultures of lymphocytes transformed by in vitro explosion.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by antigen in microplate cultures absence of an effect of transfer factor in vitro	Stimulation of lymphocytes by antigen in microplate cultures has no effect on transfer factor in vitro.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by chondrocytes in mixed cultures	The stimulation of lymphocytes by chondrocytes in mixed cultures.
8	properties of blast cells in control cultures of human blood lymphocytes preliminary note	The properties of blast cells in control cultures of human blood lymphocytes.
8	membrane characteristics of established human t and b cell lines cross reactivity of human t antigenic determinants with peripheral lymphocytes of non human primates and the presence of mlc antigens on cultured t cell lines	The membrane characteristics of established human t- and b-cell lines cross the reactivity of human t-antigen determinants with peripheral lymphocytes from non-human primates and the presence of mlc antigens on cultured t-cell lines.
8	assessment of the functional activity of human lymphocytes in malignant disease by the local graft versus host reaction in rats and the t rosette forming cell test	Evaluation of the functional activity of human lymphocytes in malignant disease by the local graft vs. theapos; host in rats and test for rosette formation on the cells.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by nucleus pulposus in patients with degenerative disk disease of the lumbar spine	Stimulation of lymphocytes by the nucleus pulposus in patients with degenerative lumbar spinal disc disease.
8	comparative study of the effect of haloperidol and maptil on the karyotype and immunoproliferative response of lymphocytes	Comparative study of the effect of haloperidol and maptil on the karyotype and immunoproliferative response of lymphocytes.
8	rosette formation by human t and b lymphocytes in the presence of adrenergic and cholinergic drugs	Formation of a rosette by human t and b lymphocytes in the presence of adrenergic and cholinergic drugs.
8	modulating effects of levamisole nsc 177023 on human lymphocyte response in vitro	Modulatory effects of levamisole nsc 177023 on human lymphocyte response in vitro.
8	influence of radiotherapy on lymphocyte stimulation	L' influence of radiotherapy on lymphocyte stimulation.
8	cell free media of mixed lymphocyte cultures augmenting sensitization in vitro of mouse t lymphocytes against allogeneic fibroblasts	Cell-free media from mixed lymphocyte cultures increasing in vitro sensitization of mouse t lymphocytes to allogeneic fibroblasts.
8	effects of concanavalin a and a succinylated derivative on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels	The effects of concanavalin a and d' a succinylated derivative on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels.
8	t b and k cells in autoimmune thyroid disease	Cells t b and k in auto-immune thyroid diseases.
8	study of lymphocyte subpopulations in normal humans and patients with systemic lupus erythematosus by fractionation of peripheral blood lymphocytes on a discontinuous ficoll gradient	Study of sub-lymphocyte populations in normal humans and patients with systemic lupus erythematosus by fractionation of peripheral blood lymphocytes along a discontinuous ficoll gradient.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in human malnutrition cytotoxic and suppressor cells	Under-lymphocyte populations in cytotoxic and suppressive human malnutrition cells.
8	specific sensitization of lymphocytes to tumor antigens by co cultivation with peritoneal cells exposed to such antigens	Specific sensitization of lymphocytes to tumor antigens by co-culture with peritoneal cells exposed to the antigens.
8	cell mediated immune response to gonococcal antigen in uro arthritis reiter s disease a inhibition of migration of sensitised human lymphocytes b lymphocyte transformation in vitro measured by 14c thymidine uptake	The cell-mediated immune response to gonococcal antigen in bone marrow; uroarthritis reiterates an inhibition of migration of sensitized human lymphocytes by in vitro lymphocyte transformation as measured by thymidine absorption 14c.
8	t lymphocyte number and function and the course of hepatitis b in hemodialysis patients	The number and function of the t-cells and apo; progression of apo; hepatitis b in hemodialysis patients.
8	mitogen induced membrane changes and cell proliferation in t lymphocyte subpopulations	Mitogen induced membrane changes and cell proliferation in sub@-@t lymphocyte populations.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by allogeneic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts in the presence of anti hla antisera	Lymphocyte stimulation by allogeneic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts in the presence of anti-hla antibody drugs.
8	differential cytotoxicity of activated lymphocytes on allogeneic and xenogeneic target cells iii species specificity of lymphocyte target cell recognition in vitro	Differential cytotoxicity of activated lymphocytes on allogenic and xenogenic target cells: iii specificity of apos; species of lymphocyte target cell recognition in vitro.
8	the systemic production of cytotoxic lymphoid cells in corneal allograft reaction 1 a quantitantitative study utilizing 51chromium release assay	Systemic production of cytotoxic lymphoid cells in corneal allograft reaction 1, a quantitative study using a 51chromium release test.
8	separate ia like determinants in human lymphocytes and macrophages	Factors such as determinants in human lymphocytes and macrophages are distinct.
8	thyroid antigen stimulates lymphocytes from patients with graves disease to produce thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin tsi	The thyroid antigen stimulates lymphocytes in patients with apo; a serious disease to produce apo; thyroid-enhancing immunoglobulin tsi.
8	effect of 2 mercaptoethanol on the in vitro response of sensitized bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes to anaplasma antigen	Effect of mercaptoethanol 2 on the in vitro response of bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes to antigen D' anaplasma.
8	atypical t cells in rheumatoid synovial membranes	Atypical t cells in rheumatoid synovial membranes.
8	dissociation of blastogenic factor production and lymphocyte transformation of guinea pig lymphocytes stimulated with tuberculin ppd	Disassociation of blastogenic factor production and lymphocyte transformation of tuberculin-positive guinea pig lymphocytes.
8	in vitro activation of mouse macrophages by rat lymphocyte mediators	L' in vitro activation of mouse macrophages by rat lymphocyte mediators.
8	chromosome aberration yields induced in human lymphocytes by 15 mev electrons given at a conventional dose rate and in microsecond pulses	Chromosomal aberrations are induced in human lymphocytes by 15 mev electrons given at a conventional dose rate and microsecond pulses.
8	change in specific antigen binding by rabbit lymphocytes during immunization with human serum albumin	Modification of specific antigen binding by rabbit lymphocytes during apos; immunization with human serum albumin.
8	a simple method for the cryopreservation of human lymphocytes at 80c	A simple method for the cryopreservation of 80 c.
8	ultrastructural study of so called curvilinear bodies and fingerprint structures in lymphocytes in late infantile amaurotic idiocy	Ultrastructural study of curvilinear bodies and structures; fingerprinting in lymphocytes of late childhood amaurotic idiocyte.
8	t lymphocyte shifts in patients with melanoma and bronchogenic carcinoma author s transl	T-cell lymphocyte transfer in patients with melanoma and dapos; bronchogenic carcinoma.
8	responsiveness of lymphocytes to soluble extracts of prostatic tumors and abrogation by serum blocking factor s	Reactivity of lymphocytes to soluble extracts of prostatic tumors and abrogation by serum blocking factors.
8	hyperacute rejection of a kidney allograft may be caused by cytotoxic lymphocytes	Hyperacute rejection of kidney cells; renal allograft may be caused by cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	myasthenia gravis mitotic activity of thymus dependent and blood lymphocytes	Myasthenia gravis mitotic activity of thymus-dependent lymphocytes and blood lymphocytes.
8	fate of foreign dna taken up by tonsillar lymphocytes	The fate of the apo; foreign DNA taken up by lymphocytes.
8	a simplified one step procedure for the simultaneous determination of complement receptor lymphocytes and lymphocytes with membrane bound immunoglobulins	One-step simplified procedure for the simultaneous determination of complement receptor lymphocytes and lymphocytes with membrane-bound immunoglobulins.
8	enzymatic activity of blood lymphocytes experimental tsutsugamushi fever in mice	Enzymatic activity of blood lymphocytes (blood lymphocytes), experimental tsutsugamushi fever in mice.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia correlation of clinical course and therapeutic response with in vitro testing and morphology of lymphocytes	Chronic lymphocytic leukemia correlates with apos; clinical evolution and therapeutic response with in vitro testing and lymphocyte morphology.
8	bloom s syndrome iv sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes	Flowering syndrome iv sister chromatid exchange in lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from patients with coeliac disease by a subfraction of gluten	Stimulation of lymphocytes in patients with celiac disease by a single sub-fraction of gluten.
8	cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to bronchogenic carcinoma cells in patients with lung cancer	L' cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes on bronchogenic carcinoma cells in patients with lung cancer.
8	regulation of low density lipoprotein receptor activity in freshly isolated human lymphocytes	Loin regulation; low density lipoprotein receptor activity in freshly isolated human lymphocytes.
8	does the pro inflammatory factor in lymphocytes lpif explain the role of these cells in acute inflammation	The pro inflammatory factor of pancreatic lymphocytes explains-t-it the role of these cells in acute inflammation?
8	ectogalactosyltransferase studies in fibroblasts and concanavalin a stimulated lymphocytes	Ectogalactosyltransferase in fibroblasts and concanavalin in stimulated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte differentiation in the rabbit thymus	Lymphocyte differentiation in the rabbit thymus.
8	cell mediated destruction of human leukemic cells by mhc identical lymphocytes requirement for a proliferative trigger in vitro	The cell-mediated destruction of human leukemia cells by identical lymphocytes is necessary for a proliferative elicitation in vitro.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro ii the mechanism s involved in the suppression of the development of cytotoxic lymphocytes	The cell-mediated immune response in vitro ii the mechanism involved in the suppression of cytotoxic lymphocyte cell development.
8	a study of the variable heavy chain vh region of membrane bound ig on human chronic leukemic lymphocytes	A study of the variable heavy chain vh region of the membrane linked ig to chronic human leukemia lymphocytes.
8	expression of alloantigens ly 5 and ly 6 on cytotoxic effector cells	Alloantigen expression in ly 5 and ly 6 on cytotoxic effector cells.
8	sequential proliferation induced in human peripheral blood lymphocytes by mitogen ii suppression by pha activated cells	Sequential proliferation induced in human peripheral blood lymphocytes by mitogen ii suppression by pha-activated cells.
8	genetic studies in inbred rats viii the production of xenoantisera against ag b histocompatibility antigens	Genetic studies in inbred rats viii the production of xenoantian antigens against ag b histocompatibility.
8	antigen induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes	The antigen induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes.
8	activity and intracellular localization of lysosomal acid phosphatase in lymphocytes from patients with hodgkin s disease plasma cell myeloma and primary polycythemia	Activity and intracellular localization of lysosomal acid phosphatase in lymphocytes from patients with apo; hodgkin's and dapos myeloma; primary polycythemia.
8	production of the second component of complement by human monocytes stimulation by antigen activated lymphocytes or lymphokines	The production of the second component of complement by stimulation of human monocytes by antigen-activated lymphocytes or lymphokines.
8	t cell variant of chronic lymphocytic leukaemia with chromosome abnormality and defective response to mitogens	Chromosomal abnormalities and a defective response to mitogens are a variant of chronic lymphocytic leukemia t cells.
8	the chromosomal radiosensitivity of lymphocytes from the chimpanzee pan troglodytes	The chromosomal radiosensitivity of lymphocytes from chimpanzee pan troglodytes.
8	leukocyte inhibitory factor lif production from lymphocytes stimulated by leucogenenol	In addition, there is a need to increase the number of lymphocytes stimulated by leucogenenol.
8	effect of sera from patients with graves disease on the e rosette function of normal lymphocytes	The effect of the serum on the function of normal lymphocytes in patients with severe disease.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in childhood solid tumours and lymphoblastic leukaemia measured by electrophoretic mobility test	Lymphocyte sensitization in solid childhood tumours and lymphoblastic leukemia as measured by electrophoretic mobility test.
8	preparation of mononuclear cell subpopulations from normal human peripheral blood	Preparation of mononuclear cell populations from normal human peripheral blood.
8	lymphocyte like cells of the tunicate pyura stolonifera binding of lectins morphological and functional studies	Lymphocyte cells of the pyura stolonifera tunicate bind to the lectins during morphological and functional studies.
8	cytophotometric characterization of cortical and medullary lymphocytes in the chicken bursa and thymus	Cytophotometric characterization of cortical and medullary lymphocytes in the chicken bursa and thymus.
8	epithelium and associated lymphocytes of developing human fetal appendix electron microscopic study	Electron microscopic study of the epithelium and associated lymphocytes of developing human fetal appendage.
8	in vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculous infection ii the effects of the culture supernatants of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocytes on the growth of tubercle bacilli within macrophages	In vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculosis infection ii the effects of supernatants of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocyte cultures on the growth of tubercle bacilli in macrophages.
8	cytotoxic antibodies to cultured melanoma cells in the sera of melanoma patients	Cytotoxic antibody directed against cultures of melanoma cells in the serum of patients with melanoma.
8	concanavalin a and the production of bovine leukemia virus antigen in short term lymphocyte cultures	Concanavalin and the production of bovine leukemia virus (BLEV) antigens in short-term lymphocyte cultures.
8	the effect of cyproheptadine on the chromosomes of human lymphocytes in vitro	The effect of cyproheptadine on the chromosomes of human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	virus receptors on lymphocytes	Viral receptors on lymphocytes.
8	human lymphocyte subpopulations involved in mlc and cml	Under-human lymphocyte populations involved in mlc and cml.
8	in vitro reactivity of human lymphocytes after cryopreservation using a programmed cooling device	In vitro reactivity of human lymphocytes after cryopreservation with a programmed cooling device.
8	specific affinity fractionation of lymphocytes using glass or plastic bead columns	Fraction d'apos; specific affinity of lymphocytes to apos; aid of glass or plastic bead columns.
8	in vitro effect of thymosin on t lymphocyte rosette formation in rheumatic diseases	In vitro effect of thymosin on t-cell rosette formation in rheumatic diseases.
8	lack of restimulation by non hla antigens in primed lymphocyte typing	Lack of restimulation by non-hla antigens in primed lymphocyte typing.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the specificity of secondary responses assayed by titration of primed lymphocyte populations	Reactions of lymphocytes primed with alloantigens in vitro the specificity of secondary responses measured by titration of the primed lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte surface markers in acute rheumatic fever and post streptococcal acute glomerulonephritis	Lymphocyte surface markers in acute rheumatic fever and acute post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis.
8	human lymph node lymphocytes fail to effect lysis of antibody coated target cells	Human lymph node lymphocytes do not affect the lysis of target cells coated with antibody.
8	enhancement of in vitro immunoglobulin synthesis of human lymphocytes by lysosomal enzymes from polymorphonuclear leucocytes	Increased in vitro synthesis of human lymphocyte immunoglobulins by lysosomal enzymes from polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
8	antigen specific lymphocyte activity in vitro by peripheral blood leucocytes from mantoux positive and negative human beings i comparison of quantitative and qualitative differences in the ppd specific lymphoproliferative response of lymphocytes from the two kinds of donors	Lapses; specific antigenic lymphocytic activity in vitro of peripheral blood leukocytes from positive and negative human mantoux i comparison of quantitative and qualitative differences in specific lymphoproliferative response ppd lymphocytes from both types of donors.
8	immunity and cancer suppressor effect on the cytotoxic activity of lymphoid cells from animals carrying syngeneic tumors	Immunity and immunities; cancer suppressive effect on immune cells; cytotoxic activity of lymphoid cells; animals carrying syngenetic tumors.
8	long term physiologic study of thoracic duct lymph and lymphocytes in rat and man	Long-term physiological study of thoracic canal lymph and lymphocytes in rats and men.
8	dna repair after uv and gamma irradiation ii human lymphocytes	Repair of the apos; DNA after UV and gamma irradiation ii human lymphocytes.
8	differential uptake of platinum uracil by human peripheral lymphocytes	The differential uptake of platinum uracil by human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	suppression of generation of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectin activated peripheral blood lymphocytes	Suppression of the generation of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectins activated peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of human mixed lymphocyte culture stimulation by anti hla d associated antisera studies with primed responding cells	An inhibition of human mixed lymphocyte culture stimulation by anti-hla d associated antisera studies with primary response cells.
8	immunotherapy with autologous white cell infusions lymphocytes in the treatment of recurrrent glioblastoma multiforme a preliminary report	A preliminary report was prepared on the use of autologous infusion therapy for white lymphocytes in the treatment of recurrent multiform glioblastoma.
8	mechanism of target cell lysis of cytolytic t lymphocytes i characterization of specific lymphocyte target cell conjugates separated by velocity sedimentation	Mechanisms of target cell lysis of cytolytic t-cells i characterization of specific conjugates of velocity-separated target lymphocytes.
8	variable region fv determinants on mouse lymphocytes	Determinants of the variable region fv on mouse lymphocytes.
8	studies on the role of suppressor cells in specific unresponsiveness to dncb	Studies on the role of suppressor cells in dncb specific non-response.
8	frozen lymphocyte pools as technical and reference controls for lymphocyte transformation	Frozen lymphocyte masses as reference and technical controls for lymphocyte transformation.
8	detection of a minor stimulating product involved in secondary allogenic proliferation of human lymphocytes in vitro	Detection of apos; a minor stimulant involved in secondary allogenic proliferation of human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	the effect of x ray induced mitotic delay on chromosome aberration yields in human lymphocytes	L' effect of X-ray induced mitotic retardation on chromosome yields in human lymphocytes.
8	effect of immunotherapy on lymphocyte function in acute lymphatic leukemia	Effect of apo; immunotherapy on lymphocyte function in acute lymphatic leukemia.
8	immunological characteristics of lymphoblasts and lymphocytes in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in children	Immunological characteristics of lymphoblasts and lymphocytes in acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
8	education of lymphocytes in vivo following a transient take of a matched unrelated bone marrow graft in man	Lymphocyte education in vivo following a transient take of an unrelated paired bone marrow graft in men.
8	nodular lymphoid hyperplasia of the bowel in primary hypogammaglobulinaemia study of in vivo and in vitro lymphocyte function	Nodular lymphoid hyperplasia of the apos; intestine in the apos; primary study of apos; in vivo and in vitro hypogamaglobulinaemia of lymphocyte function.
8	serum albumin biosynthesis and secretion by resting and lectin stimulated human lymphocytes	Lectin and resting serum albumin biosynthesis and secretion stimulate human lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by a sodium periodate naio4 induced growth factor	Stimulation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by sodium periodate naio4 induced a growth factor.
8	electron microscopic studies of lymphocytes in the bone marrow of the mouse i effect of hydrocortisone on marrow small lymphocytes author s transl	Electron microscopy studies of lymphocytes in the bone marrow of mice; effect of apos; hydrocortisone on small lymphocytes of the marrow.
8	the effects of azathioprine and levamisole on rosette forming cells of healthy subjects and cancer patients	Effects of azathioprine and levamisole on rosette cell formation in healthy subjects and cancer patients.
8	the effect of intensive immunosuppression on the in vitro activity of lymphocytes from multiple sclerosis patients	Lapses; effect of intensive immunosuppression on the immune system; in vitro lymphocyte activity in MS patients.
8	a simplified technique for obtaining purified peripheral lymphocytes from chickens	A simplified procedure for obtaining purified peripheral lymphocytes from chickens.
8	assay of immune cytolysis of lymphocytes and tumour cells by automatic determination of cell volume distribution	Determination of immune cytolysis of lymphocytes and tumour cells by automatic cell volume distribution.
8	human mixed lymphocyte culture using separated lymphocyte populations	Mixed human lymphocyte culture at baseline; separate lymphocyte populations.
8	characterization of human lymphocyte subpopulations for cytotoxicity against tumor derived monolayer cultures	Characterization of cytotoxicity of sub@-@ human lymphocyte populations against monolayer tumour-derived cultures.
8	biologic activity of transfer factor tested in vitro with cord blood lymphocytes	L' biological transfer factor activity was tested in vitro with cord blood lymphocytes.
8	synthesis of ribosomal rna in the lymphocytes with 21 chromosome trisomy	Synthesis of ribosomal rna in 21-chromosome trisomy lymphocytes.
8	effect of schizophrenic patients serum on dna synthesis in cultures of pha stimulated lymphocytes	Serum effect of schizophrenic patients on DNA synthesis in pha-stimulated lymphocyte cultures.
8	a population of lymphocytes in human blood distinctive in morphology and other characteristics	Population of lymphocytes in human blood distinguished by morphology and other characteristics.
8	a new antigen system expressed in human endothelial cells	It's a new antigen system expressed in human endothelial cells.
8	immune response to immunization via the anterior chamber of the eye i f lymphocyte induced immune deviation	The immune response to apos; immunization by apos; intermediate of the anterior chamber of the apos; f lymphocyte eye induced immune deviation.
8	distribution of alloantigens on human fc receptor bearing lymphocytes the presence of b cell alloantigens on sig positive but not sig negative lymphocytes	Alloantigen distribution on human fc receptor lymphocytes, presence of alloantigenic b cells on sig-positive but not on sig-negative lymphocytes.
8	membrane transport by murine lymphocytes ii the appearance of thymidine transport in cells from concanavalin a stimulated mice	The mice were stimulated by membrane transport by murine lymphocytes ii l' the appearance of thymidine transport in concanavalin cells.
8	effect of cytochalasin b on human lymphocyte responses to mitogens time and concentration dependence	The effect of cytochalasin b on human lymphocyte responses to mitogens as a function of time and concentration.
8	fractionation on lymphocyte surface antigens i rapid method for eliminating labeled lipid from cell surface antigens iodinated by the lactoperoxidase catalysed reaction	The fractionation of labelled lipids from iodinated cell surface antigens by the lactoperoxidase-catalyzed reaction on lymphocyte surface antigens is rapid.
8	role of clozapine in the occurrence of chromosomal abnormalities in human bone marrow cells in vivo and in cultured lymphocytes in vitro	Role of clozapine in apo; chromosomal abnormalities in human bone marrow cells in vivo and in cultured lymphocytes in vitro.
8	effect of the elimination of suppressor cells on the development of dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pig	Effect of apo; elimination of suppressive cells on the development of dncb sensitivity in guinea pig.
8	a suppressor mechanism controlling lymphocyte recruitment	It's a suppressor mechanism that controls lymphocyte recruitment.
8	kinetics of small lymphocytes in normal and nude mice after splenectomy	Kinetics of small lymphocytes in normal and nude mice after splenectomy.
8	stimulation of human fetal lymphocytes by lipopolysaccharide b in culture	Stimulation of human fetal lymphocytes by lipopolysaccharide b in culture.
8	nuclear bodies of lymphocytes in the lymph nodes of guinea pigs treated with phytohemagglutinin in vivo	Nuclear bodies of lymphocytes in lymph nodes of guinea pigs treated with phytohemagglutinin in vivo.
8	action of adenosine hosphates on the release of intracellular lactate dehydrogenase from human and rat lymphocytes	Effect of adenosine on the release of intracellular lactate dehydrogenase from human and rat lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions in humans after immunization with tetanus toxoid	Lapses; inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions in humans after dosing; tetanus anatoxin immunization.
8	the production of micronuclei from chromosome aberrations in irradiated cultures of human lymphocytes	The production of micronuclei from chromosome aberrations in irradiated cultures of human lymphocytes.
8	impaired response of lymphocytes of diabetic subjects to antigen of staphylococcus aureus	Altered lymphocyte response of diabetic subjects to antigen of staphylococcus aureus.
8	studies on difference in cellular immune response between the human tonsil and blood lymphocytes	Study of the difference in cellular immune response between the human and the human blood lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte transformation in vitro in dermatophytosis	Lymphocyte transformation in vitro in dermatophytosis.
8	proteolytic enzymes in palatine tonsil lymphocytes	Proteolytic enzymes in palatine tonsil lymphocytes.
8	triiodothyronine receptors in lymphocytes of newborn and adult rats	Receptors for triiodothyronine in lymphocytes of newborn and adult rats.
8	reactive and non reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	Reactive and non-reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	immunity to trichinella spiralis i transfer of resistance by two classes of lymphocytes	Immunity to trichinella spiralis i transfer of resistance by two classes of lymphocytes.
8	a receptor for self on lymphocytes	A receiver for yourself-even on lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from rheumatoid arthritis patients by mitogens and igg	Lymphocyte stimulation by mitogens and igg in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	cytotoxicity to isolated rabbit hepatocytes by lymphocytes from children with liver disease	Toxicity to isolated rabbit hepatocytes by lymphocytes from children with liver disease.
8	autoallergic states tumor immunology impaired function of peripheral lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus	L' tumor immunology of autoallergic states has altered the function of peripheral lymphocytes in the systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	detection of a nuclear ebna type antigen in apparently ebna negative herpesvirus papio hvp transformed lymphoid lines by the acid fixed nuclear binding technique	Detection of a nuclear ebna-like antigen in lymphoid lines transformed by papio hvp d' herpesviruses apparently negative ebna by the nuclear binding technique fixed to the acid.
8	a non t non b human leukemia cell line nalm 1 establishment of the cell line and presence of leukemia associated antigens	Establishment of human non-bacterial leukemia nalm 1 cell line and presence of antigens associated with leukemia.
8	in vitro reactivity of macrophages and lymphocytes from ultraviolet irradiated mice	In vitro reactivity of macrophages and lymphocytes from mice irradiated with ultraviolet radiation.
8	semiquantitative cytochemical estimation of beta glucuronidase activity in peripheral lymphocytes in healthy human subjects	Quantitative cytochemical estimation of liver enzymes; beta activity-glucuronidase in peripheral lymphocytes in healthy human subjects.
8	t and b lymphocytes before during and after cytostatic therapy of acute lymphoblastic leukemia all in children author s transl	Both t and b lymphocytes before and after cytostatic treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children were all translated by the authors.
8	the effect of surgical removal of a rat sarcoma on lymphocyte cytotoxicity	Effects of apo; surgical ablation of apo; a rat sarcoma on lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
8	evidence for the release of mitogenic factors by both t and b lymphocytes in the human	Evidence of release of mitogenic factors from both t and b lymphocytes in humans.
8	dna synthetic responses of fractionated human lymphocytes exposed to lymphocyte derived mitogenic factor	DNA synthetic responses of fractionated human lymphocytes exposed to derived mitogenic factor.
8	the effects of mouse alpha fetoprotein on t cell dependent and t cell independent immune responses in vitro	The effects of mouse fetoprotein alpha on the t-cell dependent and t-cell independent immune responses in vitro.
8	distribution of heavy chain variable region vh subgroups on human lymphocytes	Sub-groups distribution of the heavy variable chain vh region on human lymphocytes.
8	comparison of microtitre plates with flat bottomed and round bottomed wells for mixed lymphocyte culture mlc	Comparison of microtitre plates with flat bottom and round bottom wells for mixed mlc lymphocyte culture.
8	reduced mitogenic responses in cultures of lymphocytes from newly calved cows	In the cultures of lymphocytes from newly born cows, the mitogenic responses were reduced.
8	cytomegalovirus directed lymphocyte reactivity in healthy adults tested by a cmv induced lymphocyte transformation test	Test for cytomegalovirus induced lymphocyte transformation in healthy adults.
8	diminished cap formation in lymphocytes from patients and carriers of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Reduced cap formation in lymphocytes of patients and carriers of duchenne muscular dystrophy.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in man an attempt to type with cytotoxic lymphocytes	Cell-mediated lympholysis in humans, an attempt to typify with cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	chromosome aberrations induced by fortrin in human lymphocytes in cultures and in vivo	Chromosomal aberrations induced by fortrin in cultured and in vivo human lymphocytes.
8	on the structure of the t cell receptor for antigen	On the structure of the t cell receptor for the antigen.
8	structure of hl a a and b antigens isolated from cultured human lymphocytes	Structure of hl a and b antigens isolated from cultured human lymphocytes.
8	immune complexes in hepatitis b antigen associated periarteritis nodosa detection by antibody dependent cell mediated cytotoxicity and the raji cell assay	Immune complexes in apo antigen detection; hepatitis b associated with cytotoxicity nodulated by cell-mediated antibody-mediated cytotoxicity and apo; adjusted cell assay.
8	lymphocytes which differentiate in an allogeneic thymus ii evidence for both central and peripheral mechanisms in tolerance to donor strain tissues	The lymphocytes that differentiate in an allogenic thymus ii indicate the existence of both central and peripheral mechanisms in the tissue tolerance of the donor strain.
8	lymphocyte stimulation in multiple sclerosis patients untreated and treated with transfer factor long term studies on the effect of different stimulants on myo 2 3h inositol incorporation into phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes	Lymphocytic stimulation in patients with untreated multiple sclerosis treated with Dapo-transfer factors; long-term studies on apos; effect of various stimulants on apos; incorporation of apos; inositol myo 2 h into phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave uv radiation prior to incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine	Sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralenes and long-wave uv radiation prior to apos; incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes induction of a lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for allogeneic and syngeneic mouse target cells	L' mycoplasma-dependent activation of normal lymphocytes induces cytotoxicity mediated by lymphocytes to target cells of allogeneic and syngeneic mice.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes role of arginine and nonviable mycoplasma antigen in the induction of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for syngeneic mouse target cells	Mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes role of arginine and nonviable mycoplasma antigen in the induct of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for syngeneic mouse target cells.
8	inhibition of proliferative and plaque forming cell responses by human bone marrow derived lymphocytes from peripheral blood by antisera to the p23 30 antigen	L' inhibition of proliferative and plaque-forming responses by human lymphocytes derived from bone marrow and from peripheral blood by antisera to apos; antigen p2330 was observed.
8	lymphocytes alloantigens associated with x chromosome linked immune response genes	Lymphocyte alloantigens associated with x-chromosome-linked immune response genes are linked to x chromosomes.
8	in vitro anti kidney effect of lymphocytes in experimental immunization to placental antigens	Renal anti-inflammatory effect of lymphocytes in vitro; experimental immunization against placental antigens.
8	morphology of immune lymphocytes in homograft lymph	Morphology of immune cells in homogreated lymph.
8	transformation of lymphocytes by herpesvirus papio	Transformation of lymphocytes by pap papio herpesvirus.
8	early effects of phytohemagglutinin on induction of dna polymerase thymidine kinase deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate pools and dna synthesis in human lymphocytes	The early effects of phytohemagglutinin on apo; induction of apo pools; DNA polymerase thymidine kinase deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate and synthesis of apo; DNA in human lymphocytes.
8	discrimination of b t and null lymphocytes by esterase cytochemistry	Cytochemistry of the apos; esterase distinguishes between b t lymphocytes and null ones.
8	effect of corticosteroids on the response of lymphocytes to stimulation by galactose oxidase modified lymphocytes	Effect of corticosteroids on the response of lymphocytes to stimulation by galactose oxidase-modified lymphocytes.
8	the effect of steroids on the circulating lymphocyte population ii studies of the thoracic duct lymphocyte population of the guinea pig after neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment	The effect of steroids on the circulating lymphocyte population ii studies of the guinea pig thoracic canal lymphocyte population following neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iii the lineage of memory cells	Quantitative studies of the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iii the line of memory cells.
8	t cell regulation of human peripheral blood b cells responsiveness	Cellular regulation of human peripheral blood b cell reactivity.
8	polygenic control of mixed lymphocyte reaction in dogs	Polygenic control of mixed lymphocyte response in dogs.
8	separation of lymphoid cells with a suppressor effect on the activity of cytotoxic cells in vitro during the growth of a syngeneic mouse tumour	Segregation of lymphoid cells with suppressive effect on the apos; activity of cytotoxic cells in vitro during the growth of d' a mouse syngenic tumour.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the contribution of increased frequencies of responding lymphocytes to differences between reactivity of normal and primed lymphocyte populations	Reactions of primed lymphocytes with alloantigens in vitro The contribution of alloantigens; increased reactive lymphocyte frequency to the difference in responsiveness of normal and primed lymphocyte populations.
8	peripheral blood lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus relation to activity	Relationship between activity and peripheral blood lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosum.
8	thymus and breast cancer plasma androgens thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in myasthenia gravis	Thymus and plasma androgen breast cancer thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in myasthenia gravis.
8	relationship between lymphocyte response to tetanus toxoid and age of lymphocyte donor	The relationship between lymphocyte response to apo; tetanus toxoid and apo; age of lymphocyte donor.
8	immunosuppression by sex steroid hormones the effect upon pha and ppd stimulated lymphocytes	L' immunosuppression by sex steroid hormones had an effect on pha- and ppd-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	characterization of human adenoid cells using surface and functional markers for lymphocyte subpopulations	Characterization of human adenoid cells at baseline; aid in surface and functional markers for sub@-@ lymphocyte populations.
8	isolation of enzymatically homogeneous populations of human lymphocytes monocytes and granulocytes by zonal centrifugation	Isolate enzymatically homogeneous populations of human cell monocytes and granulocytes by zonal centrifugation.
8	ultrastructural study of the vacuoles in the peripheral lymphocytes in juvenile amaurotic idiocy juvenile form of generalized ceroid lipofuscinosis	Ultrastructural study of the vacuoles in peripheral lymphocytes of the juvenile form of generalized cervical lipofuscinosis in juvenile amaurotic idiomes.
8	hl a b 27 in reiter s disease with special reference to oligosymptomatic course forms	Hl a b 27 in reme nt, particularly with respect to oligosymptomatic forms.
8	antisera against leukaemia associated antigens on human lymphocytes	Anti-antigens associated with leukemia on human lymphocytes.
8	post transplant monitoring of renal allograft recipients for t b and null lymphocyte subpopulations	Post-transplant surveillance of transplant recipients; renal allografts for sub@b and null lymphocyte populations.
8	the use of detergents and immunoperoxidase reagents for the ultrastructural demonstration of internal immunoglobulin in lymph cells	Use of detergents and immunoperoxidase reagents for the ultrastructural demonstration of l' internal immunoglobulin in lymphatic cells.
8	phylogeny of lymphocyte heterogeneity i membrane immunoglobulins of teleost lymphocytes	Phylogeny of the apos; heterogeneity of membrane lymphocytes i immunoglobulins of teleost lymphocytes.
8	surface igm on lymphocytes from pregnant women	Surface pattern on lymphocytes of pregnant women.
8	mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identification of igm and igd molecules by tryptic cleavage and a postulated role for cell surface igd	Mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identify protein and protein molecules by tryptic cleavage and a postulated role for cell surface igd.
8	determination of antiplatelet antibody activity in sera cytotoxic for human lymphocytes	Determination of apos; antiplatelet antibody activity in cytotoxic serum for human lymphocytes.
8	immunologic surface markers on nonhuman primate lymphocytes	Surface immunological markers on nonhuman primate lymphocytes.
8	comparison of the stimulating capacity of human leukemia t cell null cell and b cell lines in mixed lymphoma culture	Comparison of the stimulatory capacity of human t-leukemia b-cell lines and zero cell lines in mixed lymphoma cultures.
8	lack of specificity of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity against the bladder cancer cell line t24	The lack of specificity of the lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity against the bladder cancer cell line t24.
8	inhibition of dna biosynthesis in human lymphocytes by alpha 1 antitrypsin	Apos; alpha 1 antitrypsin inhibits biosynthesis of apos; DNA in human lymphocytes.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro of human lymphocytes against a cervical cancer cell line	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity in vitro of human lymphocytes against a cervical cancer cell line.
8	surface immunoglobulins and lymphocyte adhesiveness during development	Cell surface immunoglobulins and lymphocyte adhesion during development.
8	the procoagulant activity of human granulocytes lymphocytes and monocytes stimulated by endotoxin coagulation and electron microscopic studies	L' procoagulatory activity of human lymphocytes and monocytes stimulated by coagulation with l' endotoxin and electron microscopy studies.
8	formation and release of antibodies in lymphocytes	Formation and release of antibody in lymphocytes.
8	temperature effects on lymphocyte transformation invitro	Temperature effects on invitro lymphocyte transformation.
8	induction of specific unresponsiveness against the c3h m1s antigen in mice increase of suppressive capacity of c3h x cba f1 lymphocytes after sensitization against cba lymphoid cells	L' induction of apos; specific anti-apos non-reactivity; antigen c3h m1s in mice increases the suppressive capacity of c3h x cba f1 lymphocytes after sensitization against cba lymphoid cells.
8	increased succinate dehydrogenase activity of lymphocytes in eczema	Increased apo; succinate dehydrogenase activity of lymphocytes in apo; eczema.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells iv ultrastructural labelling of a and b group allotypic determinants	Immunoglobulin surface on rabbit lymphoid cells iv ultrastructural labelling of a and b group allotypic determinants.
8	structure and biological function of human igd ix anti igd activation of human lymphocytes	The structure and biological function of human igd igd igd antiactivating human lymphocytes.
8	studies in porphyria vii induction of uroporphyrinogen i synthase and expression of the gene defect of acute intermittent porphyria in mitogen stimulated human lymphocytes	Studies of porphyria vii, lapos, induction of uroporphyrinogen i synthase and lapos, expression of the gene defect of acute intermittent porphyria in human lymphocytes stimulated by mitogen, have stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	studies on the capacity of human tonsillar lymphocyte subpopulations to produce interferon	Studies on the ability of human amygdal lymphocyte populations to produce interferon.
8	the effect of a23187 upon calcium metabolism in the human lymphocyte	L' the effect of a23187 on calcium metabolism in human lymphocytes.
8	ligand independent cap formation redistribution of surface receptors on mouse lymphocytes and thymocytes in hypertonic medium	Ligand-independent cap formation, redistribution of surface receptors on mouse lymphocytes and thymocytes in hypertonic medium.
8	dna synthesis in isolated lymphocyte nuclei effects of megaloblastic anaemia due to folate or vitamin b 12 deficiency or antimetabolite drugs	Synthesis of apo; DNA in isolated lymphocyte nuclei effects of apo; megaloblastic anemia due to folate or vitamin b12 deficiency or antimetabolite medications.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iv specificity and cross reactivity of cytotoxic clones	Quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iv specificity and cross-reactivity of the cytotoxic clones.
8	a cytotoxic proteinase isolated from human lymphocytes	A cytotoxic proteinase isolated from human lymphocytes.
8	alkaline phosphatase positive lymphocytes appl in man	Alkaline phosphatase positive lymphocytes clap in men.
8	ultrastructural cytochemical and membrane surface marker characteristics of the atypical lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	Ultrastructural cytochemical characteristics and markers of the membrane of atypical lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis.
8	transplantation of nuclei from lymphocytes of adult frogs into enucleated eggs special focus on technical parameters	The transplantation of nuclei from adult frog lymphocytes into enucleated eggs focuses on technical parameters.
8	changes in the cellular membrane surface coat of lymphocytes and thymocytes after incubation in vitro with cystein as revealed with electronmicroscopy	Changes in the cell surface layer of lymphocytes and thymocytes after incubation in vitro with cysteine were observed by electron microscopy.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in multiple scerlosis comparison with neuroelectric blocking activity	Under-lymphocyte populations in multiple sclerosis comparison with l' neuroelectrical blocking activity.
8	characteristics of cytotoxic t lymphocytes eluted from allogenic target cells	The characteristics of cytotoxic t-cells were eluted from allogenic target cells.
8	kinetics and properties of a cortisol resistant population of lymphocytes from the lymph nodes of guinea pigs with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	Kinetics and properties of a population of cortisol-resistant lymphocytes from the lymph nodes of guinea pigs with apo; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes on peritoneal macrophages of mice in contact dermatitis induced by dinitrochlorbenzene	Cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes on peritoneal macrophages of Dapos mice; contact dermatitis induced by dinitrochlorobenzene.
8	an electron microscopic study of intraepithelial lymphocytes in human fetal small intestine	Electron microscopic study of intraepithelial lymphocytes in human fetal small intestine.
8	change in the density of surface lymphocyte receptors and in the level of serum immunoglobulins in chronic lympholeukosis	Change in the density of surface lymphocyte receptors and serum immunoglobulin levels in chronic lympholeukosis.
8	autoradiographic study of dna metabolism in different populations of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis is mice of the balb c strain	L' autoradiographic study of liver metabolism; DNA in different populations of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis in balb c mice.
8	studies of t b and null lymphocytes during the course of acute lymphocytic leukemia	Studies of b-cells and null lymphocytes during acute lymphocytic leukemia.
8	cytogenetic investigations on lymphocytes from workers exposed to vinyl chloride	Cytogenetic studies of lymphocytes from workers exposed to the vinyl chloride.
8	the location of dna homologous to human satellite iii dna in the chromosomes of chimpanzee pan troglodytes gorilla gorilla gorilla and orang utan pongo pygmaeus	The localization of the DNA homologous to the human satellite iii DNA in the chromosomes of gorilla and orang utan pongo pygmaeus pan troglodyte chimpanzees.
8	fluidity of membrane lipids and lateral mobility of concanavalin a receptors in the cell surface of normal lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with malignant lymphomas and leukemias	Membrane lipid fluidity and lateral mobility of concanavalin receptors a on the cell surface of normal lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with malignant lymphomas and leukemias.
8	distribution of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase inducibility in cultured human lymphocytes	Distribution of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase inducibility in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	an attempt at passive transfer of immunity to leprosy patients by transfusion of allogeneic lymphocytes inactivated with mitomycin c	An attempt to passively transfer immunity to leprosy patients by transfusion of allogeneic lymphocytes inactivated by mitomycin c.
8	antisera with ia specificity selected by lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Specific antisera ia selected by lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	the activating effect of synovial fluid and washings of synovial membrane on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis	L&apos is the activating effect of synovial fluid and synovial membrane lavage on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis.
8	incorporation of deoxynucleotides into dna by diethylaminoethyldextran treated lymphocytes	Incorporation of deoxynucleotides in DNA by diethylaminoethyldextran treated lymphocytes.
8	morphological differences between sub populations of human lymphocytes revealed by scanning electron microscopy	Morphological differences between sub-populations of human lymphocytes revealed by scanning electron microscopy.
8	heterogeneity of acid phosphatase beta glucuronidase and alpha naphthyl acetate esterase in normal and leukaemic lymphocytes	Heterogeneity of acid phosphatase beta glucuronidase and apos; alpha naphthyl acetate esterase in normal and leukemic lymphocytes.
8	gamma radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes dose rate effects in stimulated and non stimulated cells	The gamma radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes, dose-rate effects in stimulated and unstimulated cells.
8	in vitro morphological studies on antibody dependent nonimmune lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in chronic active liver disease	In vitro morphological studies on antibody-dependent non-immune lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in chronic active liver disease.
8	concomitant presence of tumor specific cytotoxic and inhibitor lymphocytes in patients with osteogenic sarcoma	The concomitant presence of cytotoxic lymphocytes and specific tumour inhibitors in patients with osteogenic sarcomas.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells v ultrastructural distribution of b4 allotypic determinants of thymus lymph node and bone marrow lymphocytes	Immunoglobulin surface on rabbit lymphoid cells v ultrastructural distribution of allotypic determinants b4 of thymus lymph nodes and bone marrow lymphocytes.
8	thymic factors regulating dna synthesis in lymphocytes cultured in vitro	Thymic factors regulating DNA synthesis in lymphocytes cultured in vitro.
8	quantitative distribution of satellite associations differing according to the number of chromosomes in human lymphocytes	Quantitative distribution of satellite associations, differing according to the number of chromosomes in human lymphocytes.
8	kinetics of indium iii labelled lymphocytes in normal subjects and patients with hodgkin s disease	The kinetics of indium iii labelled lymphocytes in normal subjects and patients with Hodgkin's disease.
8	patterns of immunological anti donor reactivity in renal allotransplanted patients a prospective study	An immunological anti-donor reactivity patterns in renal allotransplanted patients: a prospective study.
8	frozen thawed mononuclear cells as a source of b lymphocytes for antibody screening	Frozen and thawed mononuclear cells are a source of b lymphocytes for antibody screening.
8	association between hla determinants and complement receptors on human lymphocytes	The association between hla determinants and complementary human lymphocyte receptors.
8	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin in patients with asbestosis and pleural mesothelioma	Lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin in patients with asbestosis and pleural mesothelioma.
8	close genetic relation between determinants coding for the hla d region detected by the technique of mixed primary and secondary lymphocyte culture and by serology of b lymphocytes	A close genetic relationship between the determinants coding for the hla d region was detected by the technique of mixed primary and secondary lymphocyte culture and by b lymphocyte serology.
8	cytoenzymatic studies on the lymphocytes of peripheral blood and lymphatic nodes of rats in an experimental magnesium deficiency	Cyto-enzymatic studies of peripheral blood lymphocytes and lymph nodes from experimental magnesium deficiency rats.
8	effect of the serum of patients with cholestasis on lymphocyte e rosette formation	The effect of serum from patients with cholestasis on lymphocyte and rosette formation.
8	influence of autologous serum on in vitro reactivity of peripheral lymphocytes of patients with breast cancer	Influence of autologous serum on in vitro reactivity of peripheral lymphocytes of patients with breast cancer.
8	cytochemical reactions of normal and neoplastic lymphocytes	Cytochemical reactions of normal and neoplastic lymphocytes.
8	mitotic chiasmata and other quadriradials in mitomycin c treated bloom s syndrome lymphocytes	Mitotic chiasmata and other quadriradials in mitomycin c treated bloom lymphocyte syndrome.
8	uva induced inhibition of proliferation of pha stimulated lymphocytes from humans treated with 8 methoxypsoralen	L' uva induced apos; inhibition of proliferation of pha-stimulated lymphocytes in humans treated with 8 methoxypsoralen.
8	lymphocyte activation by streptococcal antigens in psoriasis	L' lymphocyte activation by streptococcal antigens in psoriasis.
8	serologically detected lymphocyte antigens in holstein cattle	Detection of serologically detected lymphocyte antigens in Holstein cattle.
8	adenosine triphosphatase and 5 nucleotidase activity of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	Apos; adenosine triphosphatase and 5 nucleotidase activity of antigen-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	differentiation between various effects of cytotoxic fractions of lymphocyte culture medium	Differentiation among the various effects of cytotoxic fractions of lymphocyte culture media.
8	cytotoxins against a granulocyte antigen system detection by a new method employing cytochalasin b treated cells	Cytotoxins against detection of apos; a granulocytic antigen system by a novel cytochalasin-treated cell method b.
8	unchanged electrophoretic mobility in human cryopreserved lymphocytes	Unchanged electrophoretic mobility in human cryopreserved lymphocytes.
8	secretion by tumor and non tumor cells of substances modifying macrophage migration and the cytopathogenic effect of immune lymphocytes in vitro	The secretion by tumor and non-tumour cells of substances modifying macrophage and l&apos migration; cytopathogenic effect of immune lymphocytes in vitro.
8	adhesive lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of schizophrenic patients	The adhesive lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of schizophrenic patients.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia well differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma with monoclonal iga iga production by circulating lymphocytes	Well-differentiated chronic lymphocytic lymphocyte leukemia with monoclonal iga iga production by circulating lymphocytes.
8	bloom s syndrome dna replication in cultured fibroblasts and lymphocytes	Apos replication; flowering syndrome DNA in cultured fibroblasts and lymphocytes.
8	changes in the electric charge of blood lymphocyte populations after secondary immunization with tetanus antitoxin in man	Changes in the electrical charge of blood lymphocyte populations after apo; secondary immunization with tetanus antitoxin in men.
8	in vitro activating properties of polyene antibiotics for murine lymphocytes	In vitro, the activating properties of polyene antibiotics for murine lymphocytes.
8	induction of delayed reaction to dinitrophenylated lymphocytes in guinea pigs with contact sensitivity to dncb	Induction of apos; delayed reaction to dinitrophenylated lymphocytes in guinea pigs sensitive to dncb.
8	lower azure b methylene blue ratios in giemsa type blood and malaria stains	Reduced azure b methylene blue ratios in giemsa-like blood and in malaria spots.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes of psoriatics after treatment with 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave ultraviolet radiation	Sister chromatid exchanges in psoriatic lymphocytes after treatment with 8 methoxypsoralenes and long wavelength ultraviolet radiation.
8	a sensitive rosetting method for detecting subpopulations of lymphocytes which react with alloantisera	Sensitive method of detection of sub-populations of lymphocytes that react with alloanties.
8	interdependence of in vitro responsiveness of cord and maternal blood lymphocytes to antigens from oral bacteria	Interdependence of in vitro responsiveness of umbilical cord lymphocytes and maternal blood to antigens from oral bacteria.
8	human blood l lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus rheumatoid arthritis and scleroderma a comparison with t and b cells	Human blood lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid arthritis and scleroderma compared to t and b cells.
8	suppression of dna synthesis by con a activated human lymphocytes stimulation by con a bound to non t cells unless removed after activation	The suppression of DNA synthesis by stimulation of activated human lymphocytes by binding to non-total cells, unless removed after activation.
8	demonstration of nuclear antigen binding lymphocytes by the resette method in sle patients	"""Nuclear antigen binding lymphocytes by the resetting method in patients,"" Lancet."
8	vacuolated lymphocytes in type ii glycogenosis a diagnostic approach	Lymphocytes vacuolated in type ii glycogenosis a diagnostic approach.
8	bacille calmette gu rin infection in the mouse regulation of macrophage plasminogen activator by t lymphocytes and specific antigen	Bacille calmette gu rin infection in the mouse control of macrophage plasminogen activator by t lymphocytes, and specific antigen.
8	anti viral activity induced by culturing lymphocytes with tumor derived or virus transformed cells identification of the anti viral activity as interferon and characterization of the human effector lymphocyte subpopulation	Antiviral activity induced by lymphocyte culture with virus-derived or tumor-transformed cells Identification of the apos; anti-viral activity as an interferon and characterization of the human effector lymphocyte population.
8	sensitization of lymphocytes against pooled allogeneic cells i generation of cytotoxicity against autologous human lymphoblastoid cell lines	Lymphocyte sensitization against allogeneic cells clustered i generation of cytotoxicity against autologous human lymphoblastoid cell lines.
8	induction of ebna precedes the first cellular s phase after ebv infection of human lymphocytes	Lapos; induction of apos; ebna precedes the first cellular phase following apos; infection of human lymphocytes with apos; ebv.
8	metabolism of immunoglobulin a lymphocyte function and histocompatibility antigens in patients on anticonvulsants	Dosage metabolism; immunoglobulin, lymphocyte function and antigenesis; histocompatibility in patients treated with anticonvulsants.
8	k lymphocytes killer cells in crohn s disease and acute virus b hepatitis	K-cell killer cells in Crohn's disease and liver disease; acute viral hepatitis b.
8	immuno suppressive effect of human macrophages ii influence of macrophages on the kinetics of dna rna and protein synthesis in pha stimulated lymphocytes	Immuno effect-suppressor of human macrophages ii influences macrophages on the kinetics of l&apos synthesis; rna DNA and proteins in pha stimulated lymphocytes.
8	suppression of growth of guinea pig line 10 hepatocarcinoma ii effect of passive transfer of xenogeneic and syngeneic antibodies and normal lymphoid cells	Suppression of the growth of the guinea-pig hepatocarcinoma cell line 10; effect of passive transfer of xenogenic and syngeneic antibodies and normal lymphoid cells.
8	in vitro immune response of human peripheral lymphocytes iii effect of anti mu or anti delta antibody on pwm induced increase of cyclic nucleotides in human b lymphocytes	In vitro immune response of human peripheral lymphocytes iii effect of mucos; mu or delta antibody on mucos; pwm-induced increase in cyclic nucleotides in human b lymphocytes.
8	increase in titer of the naturally occurring human antibody to neuraminidase treated lymphocytes after influenza	Naturally occurring human antibody to neuraminidase-treated lymphocytes following influenza.
8	fc receptor heterogeneity immunofluorescent studies of b t and third population lymphocytes in human blood with rabbit igg b4 anti b4 complexes	Dosage studies; immunofluorescence of apo; fc receptor heterogeneity of b t lymphocytes and third population in human blood with rabbit anti b4 igg b4 complexes.
8	a simple and rapid method to distinguish between rosettes and non specific aggregation of erythrocytes in the rosette assay for human t lymphocytes	A simple and rapid method to distinguish between rosettes and l' non-specific aggregation of erythrocytes in the rosette test for human t-cells.
8	kinetics of 21 trisomic lymphocytes i in vitro response of 21 trisomic lymphocytes to pha	Kinetics of 21 trisomic lymphocytes i, in vitro response of 21 trisomic lymphocytes to pha.
8	baisc protein hydrolysis in lymphocytes of lewis rats with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	L' baisc protein hydrolysis in lymphocytes of lewis rats with apo; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes detected by using 5 bromdeoxyuridine	Sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes were detected using 5 bromdeoxyuridine.
8	the cytolytic effect of puva treatment on pha stimulated human peripheral lymphocytes	The cytolytic effect of puva treatment on pha stimulated human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	a further contribution on nucleoli of human lymphocytes	Another contribution on the nucleoli of human lymphocytes.
8	differences in purine metabolizing enzyme activities in human leukemia t cell b cell and null cell lines	Differences in purine-metabolizing enzyme activities in human leukemia b cells and null cell lines.
8	behaviour of sheep immunoglobulin bearing and non immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes isolated by nylon wool columns	Behaviour of carrier and non-carrying lymphocytes; sheep immunoglobulin isolated by nylon wool columns.
8	an improved syncytia infectivity assay for the bovine leukemia virus	Improvement of apo; apo test; syncytia infectivity for the bovine leukemia virus.
8	3h thymidine labelling kinetics of peripheral blood lymphocytes in adult thymectomized mice	Thymidine labelling kinetics of peripheral blood lymphocytes in adult thymectomized mice.
8	replication patterns of three isodicentric x chromosomes and an x isochromosome in human lymphocytes	Replication patterns of three isodicentric x chromosomes and d' an isochromosome x in human lymphocytes.
8	augmented mitotic response of human peripheral lymphocytes in the presence of lymphocytes from nude mice detection of a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the explanted host	Enhanced mitotic response of human peripheral lymphocytes in the presence of lymphocytes from nude mice, detection of a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the peripheral lymphocyte.
8	nonspecific activation of murine lymphocytes i proliferation and polyclonal activation induced by 2 mercaptoethanol and alpha thioglycerol	Non-specific activation of murine lymphocytes i proliferation and polyclonal activation induced by 2 mercaptoethanol and alpha thioglycerol.
8	secondary cytotoxic response in vitro against moloney lymphoma cells antigenically altered by drug treatment in vivo	A secondary cytotoxic reaction in vitro against moloney lymphoma cells damaged by drug treatment in vivo.
8	autoreactivity between lymphocytes and thymus cells in myasthenia gravis	Autoreactivity between lymphocytes and thymus cells in severe myasthenia.
8	the surface morphology of mitogen stimulated human peripheral blood lymphocytes	The surface morphology of mitogen stimulates human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	evidence that blood group a antigen on lymphocytes is derived from the plasma	Proof that the blood type is an antigen on lymphocytes is from plasma.
8	induction of long lived chromosome damage as manifested by sister chromatid exchange in lymphocytes of animals exposed to mitomycin c	L' induction of long-term chromosomal damage is manifested by the exchange of sister chromatids in lymphocytes of animals exposed to mitomycin c.
8	caffeine inhibition of prereplication repair of mitomycin c induced dna damage in human peripheral lymphocytes	Caffeine inhibition of the repair of mitomycin c prior to replication caused DNA damage in human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	response of human lymphocytes to mitogen at what stage is there a requirement for ca2	The response of human lymphocytes to mitogen at what stage is there a ca2 need-t @-@?
8	expression and specificity of fcigg receptor sites on neoplastic lymphocytes	L' expression and specificity of fcigg receptor sites on neoplastic lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of human lymphocyte responses by methylmethacrylate	The inhibition of human lymphocyte responses by methylmethacrylate.
8	in vitro assay for responsiveness of lymphocytes to transfer factor by a new leukocyte migration inhibitory test	In vitro assay of lymphocyte responsiveness to transfer factor by a new leukocyte migration inhibition test.
8	immunologic study of t and b lymphocytes in thymectomized monkeys after irradiation and autologous bone marrow transplantation	Immunological study of t and b lymphocytes in thymectomized monkeys after irradiation and autologous bone marrow transplantation.
8	cytotoxic effects of toximul mp8 in human lymphocytes in culture a preliminary investigation	A preliminary study of the cytotoxic effects of toximul mp8 on human lymphocytes in culture.
8	macrophages lymphocytes and plasma cells in the perivascular compartment in chronic multiple sclerosis	Lymphocyte macrophages and plasma cells in the perivascular compartment in chronic multiple sclerosis.
8	beta adrenoreceptors on the surface membranes of lymphocytes and macrophages	Adrenoceptor beta on the surface membranes of lymphocytes and macrophages.
8	lymphocyte mediated natural cytotoxicity in neoplasia	Lymphocyte-mediated natural cytotoxicity in neoplasia was due to natural cytotoxicity.
8	in vitro induction of cytotoxic effector cells with spontaneous killer cell specificity	In vitro, induction of cytotoxic effector cells with spontaneous killer cell specificity.
8	lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in patients with head and neck cancer	Lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in patients with head and neck cancer.
8	lymphocyte associated beta 2 microglobulin studied by crossed radioimmunoelectrophoresis	Beta-2 microglobulin associated with lymphocytes was studied by cross-immunoelectrophoresis.
8	affinity chromatography of nonhistone chromosomal proteins from lymphocytes on dna agarose columns	Chromatography of apo; DNA agarosis; affinity of nonhistone chromosomal proteins of lymphocytes.
8	sister chromatid exchange induced by x ray of human lymphocytes and the effect of l cysteine	L' sister chromatid exchange induced by human lymphocyte X-ray and l&apos radiation; effect of cysteine.
8	transglutaminase activity in human lymphocytes early activation by phytomitogens	Phytomitogens activate L' transglutaminase activity in human lymphocytes early.
8	uptake and early fate of metaphase chromosomes ingested by the wi l2 human lymphoid cell line	Early absorption and fate of metaphase chromosomes ingested by the wi l2 human lymphoid cell line.
8	the lymphocyte transformation response of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to mitogens and antigens	The lymphocyte transformation response of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to mitogens and antigens.
8	lack of effect of halothane on e ea and eac rosette formation and cyclic amp level of human lymphocytes	Absence of apo; effect of halothane on ea and eac rosette formation and cyclic rate of human lymphocyte blisters.
8	production of prostaglandins in mixed lymphocyte cultures mlc between allograft donors and recipients	Production of prostaglandins in mixed mlc lymphocyte cultures between donors and recipients of allografts.
8	comparison of the relative cytotoxic effector cell capabilities and the proportions of cells bearing various surface markers in human tonsil and peripheral blood mononuclear cells	Comparison of the relative cytotoxic capacities of effector cells and the proportions of cells with various surface markers in human amygdala and peripheral blood mononuclear cells.
8	detection and separation of two serum factors responsible for depression of lymphocyte activity in pregnancy	Detection and separation of two serum factors responsible for decreased lymphocyte activity during pregnancy.
8	a new approach to the autoradiographic study of proliferating lymphocytes	A new approach to the autoradiographic study of proliferating lymphocytes.
8	interferon and spontaneous cytotoxicity in man i enhancement of the spontaneous cytotoxicity of peripheral lymphocytes by human leukocyte interferon	Interferon and spontaneous cytotoxicity in humans; increased spontaneous cytotoxicity of peripheral lymphocytes by human leukocyte interferon.
8	thymic humoral factor in the assessment of t lymphocytics in a patient with t cell chronic lymphocyte leukemia	Thymic humoral factor in the evaluation of lymphocytics in a patient with t cell chronic lymphocyte leukemia.
8	a 3h thymidine paper strip method for stimulation of lymphocytes i culture conditions for human or murine lymphocytes and reproducibility of the paper strip method	Thymidine strip method 3 h for the stimulation of lymphocytes i culture conditions of human or murine lymphocytes and reproducibility of the paper strip method.
8	symposium on membrane markers and antigens of human lymphocytes and leukemic cells	Symposium on the membrane markers and antigens of human lymphocytes and leukemia cells.
8	lymphocytes within glial cells emperipolesis in a case of a granular cell tumor	The inner lymphocytes of the glial cells are infected with emperipolesis in the case of a granular cell tumour.
8	detection of b lymphocyte b cell associated antigens on human leukemic lymphocytes masking of membrane antigens	Detection of apo; b lymphocyte associated antigens on human leukemic lymphocytes masking membrane antigens.
8	suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes by methylprednisolone an immunosuppressive mechanism of action of steroids	The suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes by methylprednisolone is an immunosuppressive mechanism of steroids.
8	liposomes as model membrane systems for immune attack i transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes after interactions with hapten bearing liposomes	Liposomes as model membrane systems for immune attack i transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes after interactions with hapten-bearing liposomes.
8	the induction of cytolytic t lymphocytes with specificity for p azophenylarsonate coupled syngeneic cells	Induction of cytolytic t lymphocytes with specificity to p azophenylarsonate coupled syngenic cells.
8	target antigens of cell mediated lympholysis discrimination of hla subtypes by cytotoxic lymphocytes	Targeted antigen of cell-mediated lympholysis discrimination of sub@-@ types hla by cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	double expression of vh region a2 and a3 allotypes in individual rabbit lymphocytes	Allotype double expression of vh a2 and a3 regions in individual rabbit lymphocytes.
8	in vitro studies of the rabbit immune system vi rabbit anti mouse cytotoxic t effector cells are inhibited by anti rabbit t cell serum in the absence of complement	In vitro studies of the rabbit immune system against cytotoxic effect cells of mice are inhibited by anti serum-rabbit t cells in the absence of complement.
8	rosette formation in chronic lymphocytic leukemia studies of lymphocytes from peripheral blood and lymph node biopsy	Formation of a rosette in chronic lymphocytic leukemia studies of peripheral blood lymphocytes and lymph node biopsy.
8	carbohydrate composition of peripheral cultured and leukaemic human lymphocyte plasma membranes	Carbohydrate composition of cultured and leukemic peripheral human lymphocyte plasma membranes.
8	activation of measles virus from silently infected human lymphocytes	L' activation of measles virus from silently infected human lymphocytes.
8	failure of autologous mixed lymphocyte reactions between t and non t cells in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Insufficient number of autologous mixed lymphocyte reactions between t and non-t cells in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	the enhancing effect of multiple sclerosis brain homogenates on the active e rosette forming lymphocytes	Lupus; increase in apo; effect of multiple sclerosis brain homogenates on active lymphocyte rosette.
8	suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by a nonspecific factor produced by the burkitt lymphoma derived lymphoblast cell line	The suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by a nonspecific factor produced by the Burkitt lymphoblast derived cell line.
8	ebv antigens in lymphocytes of patients with exudative tonsillitis infectious mononucleosis and hodgkin s disease	Antigen ebv in lymphocytes of patients with exudative tonsillitis, infectious mononucleosis and Hodgkin's disease.
8	advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence ii mixed lymphocyte cultures and mononuclear cell subpopulations	Advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for apo; sequential assessment of human immune competence ii mixed lymphocyte cultures and under-mononuclear cell populations.
8	in vitro generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by tumor extracts of transitional cell carcinoma	In vitro generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by tumor extracts from transient cellular carcinomas.
8	lithium a modulator of cyclic amp dependent events in lymphocytes	Lithium is a modulator of light-dependent cyclic events in lymphocytes.
8	transitional cell carcinoma lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in lymphocyte carcinoma transitional cells is cytotoxicity.
8	detection and separation of lymphocytes with specific surface receptors by using microparticles	Microparticle-assisted detection and separation of lymphocytes with specific surface receptors.
8	lymphocyte morphology in mucoid middle ear effusions	Acute lymphocyte morphology in mucoid middle ear effusions.
8	nonspecific suppressive and cytostatic activities mediated by human colonic carcinoma tissue or cultured cell extract	Non-specific cytostatic and suppressive activities mediated by human colonic carcinoma or lacid; cultured cell extract.
8	cytotoxicity of human peripheral lymphocytes in cell mediated lympholysis antibody dependent cell mediated lympholysis and natural cytotoxicity assays after mixed lymphocyte culture	The cytotoxicity of human peripheral lymphocytes in antibody-mediated cell-mediated lympholyses, cell-mediated lympholysis and natural cytotoxicity assays after mixed lymphocyte culture.
8	in vitro sensitization of human lymphocytes against histiocytic lymphoma cell lines ii characterization of two different effector activities and of suppressor cells	In vitro sensitization of human lymphocytes to histiocytic lymphoma cell lines ii characterization of two different effector activities and of suppressive cells.
8	toxicity of na251cro4 when used to label rat lymphocytes	Toxicity of na251cro4 when used to label rat lymphocytes.
9	markovian model of time patterns of speech	Markovian model of time patterns of speech.
9	the squid giant axon mathematical models	Giant axon mathematical models of squid.
9	isotope flows and flux ratios in biological membranes	Isotope flows and flux ratios in biological membranes.
9	a note on puck and steffen s equations for the life cycle analysis of mammalian cells	Note on the palet and steffen equations for cell biology; life cycle analysis of mammalian cells.
9	analysis of permeability data for the case of parallel diffusion pathways	Analysis of permeability data for the case of parallel diffusion channels.
9	the input impedance of an assembly of randomly branching elastic tubes	L' impedance d' entry d' a set of elastic tubes branched randomly.
9	a mathematical evaluation of the core conductor model	A mathematical evaluation of the core conductor model.
9	correction to one of macarthur s species abundance formulas	Repair to one of the formulas; abundance of macarthur species.
9	the tail movement of bull spermatozoa observations and model calculations	The tail movement of bull sperm observed and the calculations of the model.
9	inactivation of oriented bacteria with polarized ultraviolet light	Inactivation of oriented bacteria by the polarized ultraviolet light.
9	a unified kinetic hypothesis of carrier mediated transport its applications	A unified kinetic hypothesis of carrier-mediated transport its applications.
9	the steady state properties of ion exchange membranes with fixed sites	Properties at sites; state of repair; exchange membrane balance; ion exchange with fixed sites.
9	an extension of the solid angle potential formulation for an active cell	An extension of the potential formulation d' solid angle for an active cell.
9	a quantitative analysis of the voltage current relationships of fixed charge membranes and the associated property of punch through	A quantitative analysis of the voltage current relationships of fixed-head membranes and the associated property of punching across membranes.
9	a mathematical physical model of the genesis of the electrocardiogram	A mathematical physical model of the genesis of the apos; electrocardiogram.
9	volume conductor fields of action currents	Fields d' volume conducting action of currents d' action.
9	an analysis of age prevalence data by catalytic models a contribution to the study of bilharziasis	Analysis of prevalence data by age at onset; use of catalytic models, contribution to onset; schistosomiasis study.
9	the steady state properties of an ion exchange membrane with mobile sites	Properties at apos; state; d&apos equilibrium; ion exchange membrane with mobile sites.
9	use of fourier series for the analysis of biological systems	Use of Fourier series for the analysis of biological systems.
9	response of nonspherical biological particles to alternating electric fields	Non-spherical response of biological particles to alternative electric fields.
9	the numerical solution of the time dependent nernst planck equations	The numerical solution of time dependent nernst planck equations.
9	a theoretical analysis of neuronal variability	A theoretical analysis of neuronal variability.
9	limitations on complexity of random learning networks	The complexity of the complexities of networks of random learning.
9	on the concentration gradient across a spherical source washed by slow flow	Concentration gradient through a spherical source washed by slow flow.
9	the non steady state membrane potential of ion exchangers with fixed sites	The non-steady state membrane potential of fixed site ion exchangers.
9	state vector description of the proliferation of mammalian cells in tissue culture i exponential growth	Vector description of the state of mammalian cell proliferation in tissue culture i exponential growth.
9	treatment of low angle x ray data from planar and concentric multilayered structures	Processing of low-angle X-ray data from planar and concentric multilayered concentric structures.
9	observable changes of hypotheses under positive reinforcement	Observable changes in; hypotheses with positive reinforcement.
9	osmotic flow in a rigid porous membrane	An osmotic flow in a rigid porous membrane.
9	oxygen hemoglobin system a model for facilitated membranous transport	The d' oxygenated hemoglobin system is a model for membrane transport.
9	the measurement of synthesis rates of albumin and fibrinogen in rabbits	Rates of synthesis of albumin and fibrinogen in rabbits were measured.
9	some kinetic properties of a deterministic epidemic confirmed by computer simulation	Some kinetic properties of apos; a deterministic epidemic was confirmed by computer simulation.
9	potassium 40 content as a basis for the calculation of body cell mass in man	Potassium level 40 as the basis for calculating body cell mass in men.
9	a mathematical model of the human respiratory control system	A mathematical model of the human respiratory control system; the human respiratory system, the respiratory control system.
9	investigation of an operator method in the analysis of biological tracer data	L' a methodology; an evaluator; an evaluator; an analyst; a biological marker data analysis of biological markers; an evaluator; an operator.
9	steady state phototropism in phycomyces	Phototropy in apo; state of apo; phycomycetous equilibrium.
9	differential growth and phototropic bending in phycomyces	Differential growth and phototropic bending in phycomycetes.
9	kinetics of growth of individual cells of escherichia coli and azotobacter agilis	Growth kinetics of individual cells of escherichia coli and d' azotobacter agilis.
9	studies of cell deformability iv a possible role of calcium in cell contact phenomena	Studies of cell deformability iv a possible role of calcium in cell contact phenomena.
9	determination of distribution of diffusing capacity in relation to blood flow in the human lung	Determination of the distribution of diffusion capacity in relation to blood flow in the human lungs.
9	intercellular communication and tissue growth i cancerous growth	Cell-to-cell communication and tissue growth i cancerous growth.
9	synthesis of rna in mammalian cells during mitosis and interphase	Synthesis of rna in mammalian cells during mitosis and interphase.
9	absolute sensitivity of electron microscope radioautography	Absolute sensitivity of electron microscopy radioautography.
9	studies on cell deformability 3 some effects of edta on sarcoma 37 cells	Cells deformability studies 3 Some effects of d' Edta on sarcoma 37 cells.
9	physicochemical differences between fragments of plasma membrane and endoplasmic reticulum	Physico differences-chemicals between fragments of plasma membrane and endoplasmic reticulum.
9	a theory of fluid flow in compliant tubes	Apos theory; fluid flow in conforming tubes with conditioning tubes.
9	cell growth and division i a mathematical model with applications to cell volume distributions in mammalian suspension cultures	Cell growth and division i, a mathematical model that applies to cell volume distribution in suspension cultures of mammals.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology ii numerical solution of the integral equations	Application of electromagnetic theory to apo; electrocardiology ii numerical solution of the integral equation.
9	aerobic microbial growth at low oxygen concentrations	Aerobic microbial growth at low oxygen concentrations.
9	limitations on the equivalent cardiac generator	The limitations on the equivalent cardiac generator are limited.
9	orientation in systems with asymmetric density distribution	L' orientation in systems with asymmetric density distributions.
9	the kinetics of osmotic transport through pores of molecular dimensions	Kinetics of osmotic transport through pores of molecular size.
9	are infinity machines paradoxical can processes involving an infinite sequence of operations or acts be completed in a finite time	Infinite machines are paradoxical can processes involving an infinite sequence of operations or actions be completed in a finite time.
9	some relations between changes in the linear electrical properties of striated muscle fibers and changes in ultrastructure	Some relationships between changes in the linear electrical properties of striated muscle fibers and changes in ultrastructure.
9	a new approach to molecular configuration applied to aqueous pore transport	A new approach to the molecular configuration applied to aqueous pore transport.
9	osmotic volume flow in the proximal tubule of necturus kidney	Osmotic volume flow in the proximal tubule of the necturus kidney.
9	the active state of mammalian skeletal muscle	L' active state of mammalian skeletal muscle.
9	application of fourier analysis to the visibility of gratings	Apply l' Fourier analysis to the visibility of the screens.
9	the energetics of tortoise muscle	L' energetics of the muscle of the turtle.
9	the relation of oxygen intake and velocity of walking and running in competition walkers	The relationship between the supply of oxygen and the speed of walking and running in competitive walkers.
9	wave propagation in a viscous fluid contained in an orthotropic elastic tube	Wave in a viscous fluid contained in an orthotropic elastic tube.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology i derivation of the integral equations	L' application of electromagnetic theory to apo; electrocardiology i derivation of the integral equation.
9	on the relative contribution of viscous flow vs diffusional frictional flow to the stationary state flow of water through a tight membrane	On the relative contribution of slime flow versus slime flow; friction diffusion flow to the apos; stationary flow of slime; water through a tight membrane.
9	the time dependence of single file diffusion	The time dependence of single file broadcasting.
9	the kinetics of a novel cyclic reaction system and its use in the assay of polynucleotide phosphorylase or adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate	The kinetics of a novel cyclic reaction system and its use in the assay of polynucleotide phosphorylase or l' adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate.
9	methods for the determination of adipose cell size in man and animals	Methods for the determination of the size of the fat cells in humans and animals.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis during exponential growth and microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	Apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid during exponential growth and microcyst formation in xanthus myxococcus.
9	standing gradient osmotic flow a mechanism for coupling of water and solute transport in epithelia	Steady-gradient osmotic flux, a coupling mechanism of water and solute transport in the epithelium.
9	validity of the force velocity relation for muscle contraction in the length region l less than or equal to l o	Validity of the force relationship-velocity for muscle contraction in the length region l less than or equal to l o.
9	theoretical series elastic element length in rana pipiens sartorius muscles	Theoretical series on elastic element length in rana pipiens sartorius muscle elastic elements.
9	heat work and phosphorylcreatine break down in muscle	Heat and phosphorylcreatin break down in the muscles.
9	the site of calcium binding in relation to the activation of myofibrillar contraction	The site of calcium binding in relation to the activation of myofibrillar contraction.
9	hydrolysis of polynucleotides and the characterization of their secondary structure a theoretical study	The hydrolysis of polynucleotides and the characterization of their secondary structure is a theoretical study.
9	a study of the alkaline hydrolysis of fractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of the alkaline hydrolysis of reticulocyte ribonucleic acid; fractionated ribonucleic acid and its relationship to secondary structure.
9	an approach to the study of phase separation in ternary aqueous systems	An approach to the study of phase separation in ternary aqueous systems.
9	membrane potentials at zero current the significance of a constant ionic permeability ratio	Zero current membrane potentials, a constant ionic permeability ratio.
9	a method to relate steady state ionic currents conductances and membrane potential in ion exchange membranes with unknown thermodynamic properties	A method to relate the conductances of ionic currents to the steady state and membrane potential in the membranes of unknown thermodynamic ions.
9	numerical data concerning the sensitivity of anaerobic bacteria to oxygen	Numerical data concerning the sensitivity of anaerobic bacteria to oxygen.
9	sulfur isotope fractionation and kinetic studies of sulfite reduction in growing cells of salmonella heidelberg	By sulfur isotope fractionation and kinetic studies of sulfite reduction in growing cells of Salmonella heidelberg.
9	enzyme activities in polarized cell membranes	Enzyme activity in polarized cell membranes.
9	visual adaptation of the rhodopsin rods in the frogs retina	Visual adaptation of the rhodopsin rods in frog retinas.
9	spectral sensitivity of the planarian ocellus	The spectral sensitivity of the planar cell.
9	filtration coefficient of the axon membrane as measured with hydrostatic and osmotic methods	The filtration coefficient of the axonal membrane as measured by hydrostatic and osmotic methods.
9	passive electrical properties of rod outer segments	Passive electrical properties of outer segments of stem.
9	a kronig penney model of salts of dna	Kronig penney model of d&apos salts; DNA.
9	a thermodynamic analysis of fluxes and flux ratios in bioligical membranes	Thermodynamic analysis of fluxes and flux ratios in bioligical membranes.
9	surface charge of giant axons of squid and lobster	Surface loading of squid and lobster giant axons.
9	turbidimetric assays the antibiotic dose response line	The turbidimetric tests are on the dose line-antibiotic response.
9	kinetic analyses of calcium movements in hela cell cultures i calcium influx	Kinetic analysis of calcium movements in helical cell cultures i calcium influx.
9	the kinetics of cellular proliferation in regenerating liver	The kinetics of cell proliferation in regenerating liver tissue.
9	diffusion and convective flow across membranes irreversible the thermodynamic approach	Diffusion and convective flow through the irreversible membranes l' thermodynamic approach.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors ii a mathematical analysis of the areas of isodensity surfaces in reorienting gradient systems	Transport phenomena in the zonal centrifugal rotors ii a mathematical analysis of the d' isodensity in reorienting gradient systems.
9	rates of polypeptide chain assembly in liver in vivo relation to the mechanism of temperature acclimation in opsanus tau	The rates of in vivo polypeptide chain assembly in the liver are related to the mechanism of d' temperature acclimation in Opsanus tau.
9	linkage and selection new equilibrium properties of the two locus symmetric viability model	Link and select new properties d' two-locus symmetric viability model equilibrium.
9	analysis of glycerol 3h transport in the frog oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Analysis of glycerol transport for 3 h in the apos; frog oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques.
9	estimation of radiation resistance values of microorganisms in food products	Estimation of radiation resistance values of microorganisms in food products.
9	distribution of circulation rates within a single tissue type	Distribution of circulation rates within a single tissue type.
9	kinetics of fibrin clot lysis	Kinetics of fibrin clot lysis.
9	rod increment thresholds on steady and flashed backgrounds	Thresholds; stem increment on stable and lighted bottom.
9	impulse functions for human rod vision	Pulse for human vision per stem.
9	the variations in visual threshold measurement	Variations in visual threshold measurement.
9	quantum efficiency and false positive rate	Quantum efficiency and false positive rate.
9	an analytical model of the counter current heat exchange phenomena	An analytical model of the phenomena d' heat exchange of the against-current.
9	the dissipation and dispersion of small waves in arteries and veins with viscoelastic wall properties	The dissipation and dispersion of small waves in arteries and veins with viscoelastic wall properties.
9	computed action potentials for purkinje fiber membranes with resistance and capacitance in series	Potential effects calculated for purkinje fiber membranes with resistance and capacitance in series.
9	failure of the nernst einstein equation to correlate electrical resistances and rates of ionic self exchange across certain fixed charge membranes	Failure of the apos; nernst einstein equation to correlate electrical resistors and d&apos rates; auto-ion exchange through certain fixed charge membranes.
9	frequency dependent capacitance of hydrophobic membranes containing fixed negative charges	Frequency-dependent capacity of hydrophobic membranes containing fixed negative charges.
9	computation of impulse conduction in myelinated fibers theoretical basis of the velocity diameter relation	Calculation of impulse conduction in myelinated fibers, theoretical basis for the velocity relation-diameter.
9	predicted delays in the activation of the contractile system	Delays in the activation of the contractile system were predicted.
9	wave propagation through a viscous fluid contained in a tethered initially stresses orthotropic elastic tube	Wave propagation through a viscous fluid contained in an elastic tube initially restrained by a webbing imposes orthotropic stress on the elastic tube.
9	spectral studies of iron coordination in hemeprotein complexes difference spectroscopy below 250 millimicrons	Spectral studies of iron coordination in differential spectroscopy of hemeprotein complexes at-below 250 millimicrons.
9	wave propagation through a newtonian fluid contained within a thick walled viscoelastic tube	The propagation of the waves through a newtonian fluid contained in a viscoelastic tube with a thick wall.
9	estimating the median generation time of proliferating cell systems in steady state	Estimation of the median generation time of proliferating cell systems in the apo state; equilibrium.
9	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics i theory	Three-compartment tracer kinetics in unstable state i theory i.
9	the extracellular potential field of the single active nerve fiber in a volume conductor	The extracellular potential field of the single active nerve fiber in a volume conductor.
9	energetics of active transport processes	L' active transport processes energetics.
9	comparison of caplan s irreversible thermodynamic theory of muscle contraction with chemical data	Compare the irreversible thermodynamic theory of muscle contraction with chemical data.
9	the electrical characteristics of fixed charge membranes solution of the field equations	Electrical characteristics of fixed charge membrane solution of field equations.
9	electroosmosis in membranes effects of unstirred layers and transport numbers i theory	Electroosmosis in membranes effects of stationary layers and transport numbers i theory.
9	capacitance of the surface and transverse tubular membrane of frog sartorius muscle fibers	The surface and transverse tubular membrane capacity of frog sartorius muscle fibers.
9	ammonium ion currents in the squid giant axon	The ion currents of ammonium in the giant axon of the squid.
9	interpretation of tracer data significance of the number of terms in specific activity functions	Interpretation of tracers data meaning number of terms in specific activity functions.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors i velocity and shear stress distributions of fluid during acceleration	Transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors i speed and shear stress distributions of fluid during acceleration.
9	the influence of muscle length on the development of fatigue in toad sartorus	L' influence of muscle length on the development of fatigue in the toad.
9	the active transport of 5 hydroxyindol 3 ylacetic acid and 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from a recirculatory perfusion system of the cerebral ventricles of the unanaesthetized dog	The active transport of 5 hydroxyindol-3 yelastic acid and 3 methoxy-4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from d' a recirculatory infusion system of the cerebral ventricles of the unanaesthetized dog.
9	responses to single photons in virual cells of limulus	Responses to single photons in virulent limulus cells.
9	a mathematical analysis of concomitant virus replication and heat inactivation	This is a mathematical analysis of the simultaneous replication of the virus and of the apos; inactivation by heat.
9	oxygen consumption in normally grown small for dates and large for dates new born infants	Oxygen consumption in normal shoots small for dates and large for dates new-infants.
9	oscillations in controlled biochemical systems	Oscillations in controlled biochemical systems.
9	division patterns from single escherichia coli cells	Dividing patterns from individual Escherichia coli cells.
9	the kinetics of mechanical activation in frog muscle	Moose kinetics; egg activation; mechanical activation in frog muscle.
9	translational and rotational diffusion constants of tobacco mosaic virus from rayleigh linewidths	The translational and rotational diffusion constants of tobacco mosaic virus from rayleigh linewidths.
9	the analysis of fluorescence decay by a method of moments	L' analysis of fluorescence decay by a moment method moment method.
9	interpretation of tracer data	L' interpretation of tracer data.
9	note on the stability problem for mammillary matrices	Note on the stability stability stability problem for the matrices of the list; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; civil status; etc.
9	electrical sizing of particles in suspensions i theory	Electrical dimensions of suspended particles i theory i.
9	correlations between virulence and other characters of clostridium perfringens type a	Correlations between virulence and other characters of clostridium perfringens type a.
9	temperature dependence of oscillation in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	The oscillation of squid axons as a function of the temperature of the experiments with calculations.
9	a model for ultraviolet and photoreactivating light effects in euglena	A model for ultraviolet and photoreactivating light effects in the euglena.
9	distributed representations for actin myosin interaction in the oscillatory contraction of muscle	Distribution of apo representations; myosin interaction; actin in oscillatory contraction of muscle.
9	conjugation in escherichia coli k 12 and its modification by irradiation	The conjugation in escherichia coli k 12 and its modification by irradiation.
9	the general theory of mapping functions for random genetic recombination	The general theory of mapping functions for random genetic recombination.
9	determinants of pulmonary blood volume	The determinants of pulmonary blood volume are the following.
9	inhibition by iodine of the release of thyroxine from the thyroid glands of patients with thyrotoxicosis	Inhibition by apos; iodine release of thyroxine from the thyroid glands of patients with thyrotoxicosis.
9	dark current and photocurrent in retinal rods	Dark current and photocurrent in retinal sticks.
9	ultraviolet inactivation dichroic ratio of oriented fd bacteriophage	Dichroic ratio d' ultraviolet inactivation of oriented fd bacteriophage.
9	study of biological pigments by single specimen derivative spectrophotometry	The study of biological pigments by spectrophotometry on a single derived specimen.
9	concentration dependence of permeability coefficient to an electrolyte component across bovine lens capsule in vitro	Concentration-dependent on permeability coefficient to an electrolyte component across the bovine lentil capsule in vitro.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow across bifurcations in distensible tubes	Calculation of the gap; pulsatile flow through the bifurcations in distensible tubes.
9	studies on the origin of milk fat a further study of bovine serum lipoproteins and an estimation of their contribution to milk fat	Studies on apos; origin of milk fat, further study of bovine serum lipoproteins and evaluation of their contribution to milk fat.
9	quantitation of tail lesions in vaccinia infected mice	Quantification of tail lesions in vaccinia infected mice.
9	ionized calcium in normal serum ultrafiltrates and whole blood determined by ion exchange electrodes	Ionized calcium in normal serum ultrafiltrates and whole blood determined by ion exchange electrodes.
9	the measure in vivo of regional cerebral oxygen utilization by means of oxyhemoglobin labeled with radioactive oxygen 15	In vivo measurement; regional use of brain oxygen by means of apos; oxygen labeled with apos; radiogenic oxygen.
9	on tuning and amplification by lateral inhibition	Adjustment and amplification by lateral inhibition.
9	a model for responses to activation by axodendritic synapses	A model for responses to l' activation by axodendritic synapses.
9	a theoretical study of pulmonary capillary gas exchange and venous admixture	A theoretical study of pulmonary capillary gas exchange and venous admixture.
9	passive membrane potentials a generalization of the theory of electrotonus	Passive membrane potentials a generalization of the theory of electrospeakers.
9	rapid histamine assays a method and some theoretical considerations	Quick analysis of histamine and some theoretical considerations.
9	exchange of carbon dioxide in the pregnant rhesus monkey multicompartmental analysis of carbon dioxide kinetics	L' carbon dioxide exchange in apo; gravid rh rhesus monkey multicompartmental analysis of carbon dioxide kinetics.
9	the electrical capacitance of phospholipid membranes	This is the electrical capacity of phospholipid membranes.
9	flow through a collapsible tube experimental analysis and mathematical model	Flux through a collapsible tube experimental analysis and mathematical model.
9	use of 33p as an indicator for 32p pulse labeling of nucleic acids in bacterial cultures	L' use of 33p as an indicator for the 32p pulse labeling of nucleic acids in bacterial cultures.
9	visibility of aperiodic patterns compared with that of sinusoidal gratings	The visibility of aperiodic patterns compared with that of sinusoidal networks.
9	kinetics of heterogeneous chemical reactions ii	The kinetics of heterogeneous chemical reactions ii.
9	x ray diffraction of myelin membrane ii determination of the phase angles of the frog sciatic nerve by heavy atom labeling and calculation of the electron density distribution of the membrane	X diffraction of myelin membrane rays ii determination of phase angles of frog sciatic nerve by heavy atom labeling and calculation of membrane electron density distribution.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction i rate equations at a given length based on irreversible thermodynamics	A phenomenological theory of muscle contraction i rate equations at a given length based on irreversible thermodynamics.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction ii generalized length variations	Phenological theory of muscular contraction ii.
9	nonlinear electrical effects in lipid bilayer membranes 3 the dissociation field effect	Nonlinear electrical effects in lipid bilayer membranes 3 l' dissociation field effect.
9	demographic correlates of low birth weight	Demographic correlations of low birth weight and low birth weight.
9	the measurement of the exchangeable pools of cholesterol in the baboon	Measurement of the exchangeable cholesterol stores in baboons.
9	estimations of bacterial growth rates in natural waters	Estimates of bacterial growth rates in natural waters.
9	a model for the long time constant transient voltage response to current in epithelial tissues	A model for the constant long-term response of transient voltage to current in epithelial tissues.
9	morphological variants of coliphage p1	Morphological variants of coliphage p1.
9	mathematical approaches to the evaluation of the flux of gamma aminobutyrate in brain tissue in vitro	Molecular approaches to l' evaluation of the flux of gamma aminobutyrate in brain tissue in vitro.
9	gluconeogenesis in the kidney cortex flow of malate between compartments	Gluconeogenesis in the flow of malate from the renal cortex between compartments.
9	interpretation of sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern of deoxyribonucleic acid fragments resulting from random breaks	Interpretation of the sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern of deoxyribonucleic acid fragments resulting from random failures.
9	validity of the british system for anticoagulant control using the national reagent	Validity of the British anticoagulant control system at l' national reagent aid.
9	standardized annular assay of dual radioisotopes on a well type sodium iodide crystal	Normalized annular test of two isotopes on a crystal d' sodium iodide well type.
9	bilateral symmetry in morphogenesis of embryos	Bilateral symmetry in morphogenesis of embryos.
9	a model for gallbladder function and cholesterol gallstone formation	Model for gallbladder function and cholesterol gallstone formation.
9	chemical states of bacterial spores heat resistance and its kinetics at intermediate water activity	Chemical states of bacterial spores resistant to heat and its kinetics to intermediate water activity.
9	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge v analysis of population structure and activity	Aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of wastewater and activated sludge v analysis of structure and l' population activity.
9	stress distribution in the canine left ventricle during diastole and systole	Stress distribution in the canine left ventricle during diastole and systole.
9	centrifugal sedimentation of virus particles for electron microscopic counting	Centrifugal deposition of virus particles for electron microscopic counting.
9	computer treatment of gas liquid chromatographic data with special reference to fatty acid methyl esters	Computer processing of liquid chromatographic data with special reference to fatty acid methyl esters.
9	quantitative determination of phosphorus in soybean lipids	Quantitative determination of phosphorus in soybean lipids.
9	use of an epidemiological model for estimating the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures sensitivity of the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures to the social time preference	The use of an epidemiological model to estimate the incidence; efficacy of TB control measures the susceptibility of the disease; efficacy of TB control measures to social time preference.
9	q i iia os formula for predicting left atrial pressure in mitral stenosis	Formula q i iia os for predicting left atrial pressure in mitral stenosis.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes ii oscillating phase transition	Co-operative effects in transport models; state of equilibrium across membranes ii oscillating phase transition.
9	selection and polygenic characters	Polygenic selection and typefaces.
9	a study of vascular stresses and deformations in relation to variations of the tonus and to their geometrical characteristics	A study of vascular stresses and strains in relation to variations in tone and their geometrical characteristics.
9	a study of the distribution of the flow in a branched system of vessels in parallel system of vessels	A study of the distribution of ice; flow in a floating system; vessel branching in a parallel system of vessels in a parallel system of vessels in a study of the distribution of ice; flow in a floating system; branching.
9	kinetics of initiation of germination of bacillus pumilus spores by hydrostatic pressure	Kinetics of l' initiation of germination of pumilus spores by hydrostatic pressure.
9	on the relation between effector concentration and the rate of induced enzyme synthesis	The relationship between the effector concentration and the rate of induced enzyme synthesis.
9	the potential distribution and the short circuiting factor in the sucrose gap	The potential distribution and the short factor, @-@, in the sucrose gap band.
9	analysis of the components of ionic flux across a membrane	Analysis of the components of ionic flux across a membrane.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes i field dependent conductances in the presence of solution symmetry	Kinetic theory model for ionic motion across biological membranes whose field-dependent conductances in the presence of solution symmetry.
9	pulse frequency modulation in neural systems a random model	Pulse frequency modulation in neural systems a random model.
9	van der waals forces special characteristics in lipid water systems and a general method of calculation based on the lifshitz theory	Van der waals imposes special characteristics in the lipid water systems and a general method of calculation based on the theory of lifshitz.
9	solutions to axon equations	Well, solutions to axonal equations.
9	electrical properties of phospholipid vesicles	Electrical properties of phospholipid vesicles.
9	the writhing number of a space curve	The number of bends; a curve; space is the number of bends; a curve; space.
9	liquid scintillation spectrometer data processing by desk top computer	Liquid scintillation spectrometer data processing by desktop computer.
9	a mathematical study of nerve fiber interaction	A mathematical study of nerve fiber interaction.
9	the locomotion of mouse fibroblasts in tissue culture	The locomotion of mouse fibroblasts in tissue culture.
9	the geometry of peripheral myelin sheaths during their formation and growth in rat sciatic nerves	The geometry of peripheral myelin sheaths during their formation and growth in the sciatic nerves of rats.
9	the use of equilibrium density gradient methods for the preparation and characterization of blood group specific glycoproteins	L' use of density gradient methods; balance for preparation and characterization of blood group specific glycoproteins.
9	cooperative regulation of cellular proliferation by intercellular diffusion	The cooperative regulation of cell proliferation by intercellular diffusion.
9	a physical model for muscular behavior	It's called a physical model of muscular behavior.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex i theoretical analysis	Formation of a focal point by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex i theoretical analysis.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex ii quantitative aspects of the interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its murine sarcoma virus pseudotype in strain c57bl mouse embryo cells	Formation of a focal site by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex ii quantitative aspects of the interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its mouse sarcoma virus pseudotype in mouse c57bl embryonic cells.
9	calorific content of certain bacteria and fungi	Calorific content of certain bacteria and fungi.
9	analysis of the multiseptate potential of bacillus subtilis	Analysis of the multi-septate potential of bacillus subtilis.
9	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers i the constancy of the unit cell volume with variation in sarcomere length in a lattice in which the thin to thick myofilament ratio is 6 1	Studies of the network of myofilaments on isolated fibers i the consistency of unit cell volume with variation in sarcomere length in a network with a thin to thick myofilaments ratio of 6.1.
9	an exact constant field solution for a simple membrane	An exact constant field solution for a single membrane.
9	membrane potentials and ion permeability in a cation exchange membrane	Membrane potentials and ion permeability in a cation exchange membrane.
9	electrical properties and ultrastructure of mycoplasma membranes	Ultrastructural and electrical properties of mycoplasmal membranes.
9	the validity of the ussing flux ratio equation in a three dimensionally inhomogeneous membrane	The validity of the equation using flux ratio in a three-dimensional, three-dimensional, inhomogeneous membrane.
9	studies with composite membranes preparation and measurement impedances	Studies with composite membrane preparation and measurement impedances.
9	studies with composite membranes ii measurement of asymmetric properties	Studies with composite membranes ii measures asymmetric properties.
9	the role of diffusion in bimolecular solution kinetics	The role of diffusion in bimolecular solution kinetics.
9	the role of diffusion in enzyme kinetics	The role of diffusion in enzyme kinetics.
9	linear electrical properties of the transverse tubules and surface membrane of skeletal muscle fibers	Linear electrical properties of the transverse tubules and of the surface membrane of skeletal muscle fibers.
9	division cycle of myxococcus xanthus 3 kinetics of cell growth and protein synthesis	The division cycle of myxococcus xanthus 3 kinetics of cell growth and protein synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes 3 the size distribution of peroxisomes and the incorporation of new catalase	The synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes 3, the size distribution of peroxisomes and l&apos, a new catalase.
9	the dynamic characteristics of color coded s potentials	The dynamic characteristics of the s-coded color-coded potentials.
9	response properties of a sensory hair excised from venus s flytrap	The response properties of a sensory hair extracted from a Venus flytrap.
9	cable theory for finite length dendritic cylinders with initial and boundary conditions	Cable theory for finite length dendritic cylinders with initial and boundary conditions.
9	functional inactivation and appearance of breaks in rna chains caused by gamma irradiation of escherichia coli ribosomes	Functional inactivation and appearance of breaks in the rna chains caused by apos; gamma irradiation of apos ribosomes; escherichia coli.
9	blood flow slip and viscometry	Okay, blood flow and viscometry.
9	numerical solution of steady state electrodiffusion equations for a simple membrane	Numerical solution of d&apos equations; electrodiffusion at apos; steady state for a single membrane.
9	fiber interaction in a nerve trunk	You know, fiber interaction in a nerve stem.
9	anisotropic absorption of linearly polarized light by cylindrical molecules	Anisotropic absorption of linearly polarized light by cylindrical molecules.
9	cell growth and division v error analysis of the collins richmond equation	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: cell growth and apoanalysis; division error v.
9	ion microprobe mass analyzer	Ion microprobe mass analyzer, ion microprobe mass analyzer.
9	matching sequences under deletion insertion constraints	Initiation sequences; pairing under deletion constraints; deletions inserted.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes 3 steady state electrical properties with solution asymmetry	Kinetic theory model for ion movement across biological membranes 3 electrical properties at apos; d&apos state; solution asymmetry equilibrium.
9	the independence principle a reconsideration	The principle of independence is a re-examination.
9	depression kinetics of ornithine transcarbamylase in escherichia coli	Kinetics of depression of ornithine transcarbamylase in escherichia coli.
9	macromolecular sieving by the dormant spore of bacillus cereus	Macromolecular smearing by the dormant spore of bacillus cereus.
9	action of ionizing radiation on sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	Action of ionizing radiation on sensitive strains of escherichia coli b.
9	direct determination of the structure of barium stearate multilayers by x ray diffraction	Direct determination of the structure of barium stearate multiple layers by X-ray diffraction.
9	the location of photopigment molecules in the cross section of frog retinal receptor disk membranes	L' location of photopigment molecules in the cross section of frog retinal receptor disc membranes.
9	net electric charge on photopigment molecules and frog retinal receptor disk membrane structure	Net electrical charge on photopigment molecules and membrane structure of frog retinal disc.
9	gas liquid chromatographic assay of lipid bound sialic acids measurement of gangliosides in brain of several species	Lipid-bound sialic acids, a gas-phase chromatography that measures the presence of gangliosides in the brain of several species.
9	determination of the optimal priming dose for achieving an isotopic steady state in a two pool system application to the study of cholesterol metabolism	Dose determination; optimal initiation to reach a state of readiness; isotopic balance in a two-pool system for apo; study of cholesterol metabolism.
9	phonoangiography a new noninvasive diagnostic method for studying arterial disease	Phonoangiography is a new non-invasive diagnostic method for studying arterial diseases.
9	thermal resistance of certain oncogenic viruses suspended in milk and milk products	The thermal resistance of certain oncogenic viruses suspended in milk and milk products.
9	herpes vimplex virus genome size and redundancy studied by renaturation kinetics	The herpes vimplex virus genome size and redundancy were studied by renaturation kinetics.
9	divalent ions and the surface potential of charged phospholipid membranes	The divalent ions and the surface potential of the charged phospholipid membranes.
9	studies on the regulation of plasma cholesterol levels in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes	Studies on the regulation of plasma cholesterol levels in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes.
9	cascade chromatography and automated multidimensional fractionation	Automatic multi-dimensional cascade chromatography and fractionation.
9	sterological measurements of cardiac ultrastructures implicated in excitation contraction coupling	Steric measurements of cardiac ultrastructures involved in coupling contractions.
9	renal gluconeogenesis in eviscerated diabetic rats	Renal gluconeogenesis in eviscerated diabetic rats.
9	staphylococcal enterotoxin b solid phase radioimmunoassay	Staphylococcal enterotoxin b, solid phase radioimmunoassay.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes iv one site two site and multisite models	Co-operative effects in transport models at apo; state of equilibration across membranes one site two multisite models.
9	dielectrophoresis of cells	Electrophoresis of cells.
9	rotational diffusion of rhodopsin digitonin micelles studied by transient photodichroism	Rotational diffusion of rhodopsin digitonin micelles studied by transient photodichroism.
9	biological ion exchanger resins i quantitative electrostatic correspondence of fixed charge and mobile counter ion	Exchange resins; biological ions he quantitative electrostatic correspondence of fixed and mobile loads.
9	biological ion exchanger resins 3 molecular interpretation of cellular ion exchange	Biological ion exchange resins 3 molecular interpretation of cellular ion exchange.
9	spectral analysis of laser light scattered from motile microorganisms	Spectral analysis of laser light scattered by moving micro-organisms.
9	physicochemical and light scattering studies on ribosome particles	Physico-chemical and light scattering studies on ribosomal particles.
9	reliability of computation in the cerebellum	Reliability of the computation in the cerebellum.
9	white noise analysis of a neuron chain an application of the wiener theory	White noise analysis of a neural chain, application of the sausage theory.
9	a mathematical model of the controlled plant of the respiratory system	A mathematical model of the controlled plant of the respiratory system; respiratory system; biological plant.
9	a mathematical model of the human menstrual cycle	It's a mathematical model of the human menstrual cycle.
9	a stochastic model for discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	A stochastic model for discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor.
9	water permeability of isolated muscle fibers of a marine crab	Water permeability of isolated muscle fibers from marine crabs.
9	mechanism of the enhancement of the bohr effect in mammalian hemoglobins by diphosphoglycerate	Mechanisms of onset; increase of onset; bohr effect in apo; mammalian hemoglobin by diphosphoglycerate.
9	three dimensional reconstruction from radiographs and electron micrographs application of convolutions instead of fourier transforms	Three-dimensional reconstruction from x-rays and electron micrographs l' application of convolutions instead of Fourier transforms.
9	quantitation of serum lipoproteins by electrophoresis on agarose gel standardization in lipoprotein concentration units mg 100 ml by comparison with analytical ultracentrifugation	Quantification of serum lipoproteins by standard gel electrophoresis; agarose in units of 100 mL lipoprotein concentration by comparison with analytical ultracentrifuge.
9	early increase in left ventricular compliance after myocardial infarction	Early increase in left ventricular compliance after myocardial infarction.
9	the binomial nature of transmitter release at the crayfish neuromuscular junction	The binomial nature of transmitter release at the crayfish neuromuscular junction.
9	quantitation of transplacental haemorrhage	Quantification of apos; transplacental hemorrhage.
9	addition of chemical and osmotic free energies through negative interaction of protein bound ligands	Addition of chemical and osmotic free energies via apos; negative interaction of protein-bound ligands.
9	the state of water in muscle tissue as determined by proton nuclear magnetic resonance	L' status; water in muscle tissue as determined by proton nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
9	theoretical and experimental studies of energy exchange from jackrabbit ears and cylindrically shaped appendages	Theoretical and experimental study of the apos; exchange of ideas; energy from the apos; hare ears and cylindrical appendages.
9	effects of viscosty and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels i theoretical analysis	Effects of viscosity and stress on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels i theoretical analysis.
9	effects of viscosity and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels ii comparison of analysis with experiments	Effects of viscosity and stress on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels ii comparison of l' analysis with experiments.
9	the dipole model and phase transitions in biological membranes	Dipole model and phase transitions in biological membranes.
9	the measurement of glomerular filtration pressure from sieving data for macromolecules	The measurement of glomerular filtration pressure from macromolecule screening data.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra i hard sphere cross sections	Calculation of hard sphere cross sections to slow down electronic spectra.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra ii classical cross sections	The calculation of d' electron retardant spectra in classical cross sections is carried out.
9	thresholds for lenticular damage in the rabbit eye due to single exposure to cw microwave radiation an analysis of the experimental information at a frequency of 2 45 ghz	Thresholds for lenticular damage in the rabbit eye due to a single exposure to microwave radiation @-@cw waves and l' analysis of experimental data at a frequency of 245 ghz.
9	the behavior of 137cs and other fallout radionuclides on a michigan dairy farm	The behaviour of 137c and other fallout radionuclides on a dairy farm in Michigan.
9	asymmetries generated by diffusion and reaction and their bearing on active transport through membranes	The asymmetries generated by diffusion and reaction and their impact on active transport across membranes.
9	construction of a three dimensional model of the polypeptide backbone of the variable region of kappa immunoglobulin light chains	A three-dimensional model of the polypeptide skeleton of the variable region of the light chains of l' immunoglobulin kappa.
9	microscopic fat cell size measurements on frozen cut adipose tissue in comparison with automatic determinations of osmium fixed fat cells	Microscopic measurement of the size of fat cells on frozen cut adipose tissue in comparison with the automatic determination of the fat cells attached to the osmium.
9	mass transfer from gas bubbles to impinging flow of biological fluids with chemical reaction	Mass transfer of gas bubbles to apos; impassable flow of biological fluids by chemical reaction.
9	the rotating fourier s ring an alternative model for cell kinetic studies	The Fourier rotational ring is an alternative model for cell kinetics.
9	computer simulation of after inhibition in crayfish slowly adapting stretch receptor neuron	Computer simulation of post-inhibition in fish; crayfish, slowly adapting receptor neuron d' stretching.
9	model simulation of blood flow and oxygen uptake during exercise	Simulation model of blood flow and oxygen consumption during exercise.
9	computer simulation of radial immunodiffusion i selection of an algorithm for the diffusion process	Computer simulation of the apos; radial immunodiffusion i selection of apos; an algorithm for the diffusion process.
9	voltage clamp of cardiac muscle a theoretical analysis of early currents in the single sucrose gap	Cardiac muscle tension clamp, theoretical analysis of early currents in the single sucrose space.
9	spatial distribution of potential in a flat cell application to the catfish horizontal cell layers	Spatial distribution of potential in a flat cell application on the horizontal cell layers of fish-chat.
9	influence of electrolytes on the thicknesses of the phospholipid bilayers of lamellar lecithin mesophases	L' influence of electrolytes on the thickness of the phospholipid bilayers of the lamellar mesophases of lecithin.
9	locomotion of spirilla	Locomotion of a spirill.
9	growth dynamics of mitochondria in synchronized chinese hamster cells	Growth dynamics of mitochondria in synchronized Chinese hamster cells.
9	breakage of parental dna strands in haemophilus influenzae by 313 nm radiation after replication in the presence of 5 bromodeoxyuridine	Breakage of parental DNA strands in l'apos; haemophilus influenzae by 313 nm radiation after replication in the presence of 5 bromodeoxyuridine.
9	mechanical properties of the sarcolemma and myoplasm in frog muscle as a function of sarcomere length	Mechanical properties of the sarcolemma and myoplasm in frog muscle as a function of sarcomere length.
9	neurological abnormalities in the cri du chat syndrome	Uh, neurological abnormalities in the cat's cry syndrome.
9	a mathematical method for analysing questionnaires	A method of analysis; a method of analysis; an end-to-end analysis; another from Europe.
9	theoretical aspects of orbital steering	Theoretical aspects of orbital direction.
9	free energy calculations of the interactions of helical poly l proline with water	Free energy calculations for the interactions of polyl polyl helical proline with water.
9	the stability theory of nonpolynomial kinetics	The stability theory of nonpolynomial kinetics.
9	lateral diffusion of phospholipids in a vesicle membrane	Lateral diffusion of phospholipids in a membrane vesicle.
9	gene order of the poliovirus capsid proteins	Genetic order of the poliovirus capsid proteins.
9	voltage clamp experiments of single muscle fibers of rana pipiens	Potential experiments on single muscle fibers of rana pipiens.
9	light adaptation of discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	Light adaptation of discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor.
9	voltage dependent conductance induced in thin lipid membranes by monazomycin	Stress-dependent conductance induced in thin lipid membranes by monazomycin.
9	phosphate starvation and the nonlinear dynamics of insect fibrillar flight muscle	Phosphate deprivation and the nonlinear dynamics of insect fibrillar flight muscle.
9	fluorescence spectroscopy of an oriented model membrane	Dapos fluorescence spectroscopy; an oriented model membrane.
9	magnetic anisotropy and the orientation of retinal rods in a homogeneous magnetic field	Magnetic anisotropy and orientation of retinal rods in a homogeneous magnetic field.
9	ring orientation in ionone and retinals	Ring in the apos, ionone and retina.
9	energetics of isometric and isotonic twitches in toad sartorius	Energy of isometric and isotonic tremors in sartorius toads.
9	an energetic model of muscle contraction	You know, an energetic model of muscle contraction.
9	oxygen permeability of the limiting layers of the cornea	L'oxygenation à l'apos; oxygen of the boundary layers of the cornea.
9	enzyme kinetics systematic generation of valid king altman patterns	Enzyme kinetics consistently generates valid king altman patterns.
9	red blood cell damage by shear stress	Red blood cell damage from shear stress.
9	cross sectional shape of collapsible tubes	Cut section shape of collapsible tubes.
9	the frequency response coherence and information capacity of two neuronal models	The frequency response coherence and the capacitance d'apos; information of two neural models.
9	origin of hepatic triglyceride fatty acids quantitative estimation of the relative contributions of linoleic acid by diet and adipose tissue in normal and ethanol fed rats	Origins of hepatic triglyceride fatty acids Quantitative estimate of relative contributions of apo; linoleic acid by diet and fat in normal rats and rats fed apo; ethanol.
9	determination of unidirectional uptake rates for lipids across the intestinal brush border	Unidirectional rates of apo; absorption of lipids across the intestinal brush border.
9	nonequilibrium steady state differences in partial pressure of co 2 and in concentration of weak acids and bases between blood and tissue	Differences in partial pressure of co 2 and concentrations of acids and weak bases between blood and tissue at baseline; state of repair; unbalanced balance.
9	oxygen equilibrium characteristics of abnormal hemoglobins hirose alpha 2 beta 2 37ser l ferrara alpha 2 47 gly beta 2 broussais alpha 2 90 asn beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg	Features d' cell balance; abnormal haemoglobin oxygen hirose alpha 2 beta 2 37ser l ferrara alpha 2 47 gly beta 2 broussais alpha 2 90 asn beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg.
9	the use of lithium in the treatment of thyrotoxicosis	L' the use of lithium in the treatment of thyrotoxicosis.
9	correction for mechanical dead space in the calculation of physiological dead space	Correction for mechanical dead space in the computation of mechanical dead space.
9	the effect of membrane parameters on the properties of the nerve impulse	L' effect of membrane parameters on the properties of nerve impulse.
9	dipole theory of heat production and absorption in nerve axon	Dipolar theory of production and apo; heat absorption in nerve axon.
9	modeling the carotid sinus baroreceptor	Modeling the carotid sinus baroreceptor.
9	on the electrostatic interaction across a salt solution between two bodies bearing unequal charges	On the apos; electrostatic interaction through a salt solution between two salt bodies with unequal charges.
9	myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction	Membrane structure of myelin as revealed by X-ray diffraction.
9	a study of heavy light atom discrimination in bright field electron microscopy using the computer	A study of heavy light discrimination in bright field electron microscopy using the computer.
9	muscle energetics and the fenn effect	L' muscle energy and l' effect fennel.
9	studies with composite membranes 3 measurement of water permeability	Studies with composite membranes 3 measurements of permeability to water.
9	computer simulation of flagellar movement i demonstration of stable bend propagation and bend initiation by the sliding filament model	Computer simulation of flagellar motion demonstrates stable bend and loop propagation; curvature initiation by the sliding filament model.
9	the transient response and impedance locus of a mobile site membrane	The transient response and locus d' a mobile site membrane impedance.
9	number of deoxyribonucleic acid uptake sites in competent cells of bacillus subtilis	Number of sites; absorption of deoxyribonucleic acid in competent cells of subtilis bacillus.
9	taxonomy of aerobic marine eubacteria	The taxonomy of aerobic marine eubacteria.
9	hydrostatic pressure and ionic strength effects on the kinetics of lysozyme	Effects of hydrostatic pressure and ionic strength on the kinetics of lysozyme.
9	h 2 co 3 as substrate for carbonic anhydrase in the dehydration of hco 3	A 2 h co 3 as the substrate for the pH; carbonic anhydrase in the dehydration of hco 3.
9	tautomerism of uracil and thymine in aqueous solution spectroscopic evidence	Tautomerism of uracil and thymine in aqueous solution spectroscopic evidence.
9	individual states in the cycle of muscle contraction	The individual states in the cycle of muscle contraction.
9	z average sedimentation coefficient in reversibly self aggregating systems	Z average sedimentation coefficient in systems with auto-reversible aggregation.
9	ribonucleic acid synthesis in cells infected with herpes simplex virus controls of transcription and of rna abundance	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in cells infected with herpes simplex virus controls transcription and l' abundance of rna.
9	the interaction of histone iv with nucleoside triphosphates	L' interaction of histone iv with triphosphate nucleosides.
9	circadian surfaces and the diversity of possible roles of circadian organization in photoperiodic induction	Circadian surfaces and the diversity of possible roles of the circadian organization in photoperiodic induction.
9	self association of gene 32 protein of bacteriophage t4	Auto-association of gene 32 of bacteriophage t4 protein.
9	estimating the number of organisms in quantal assays	Estimation of the number of organisms in quantum tests.
9	validity of computer interpretation of the electrocardiogram	Validity of the apos; computer interpretation of the apos; electrocardiogram.
9	running up and down hills some consequences of size	Run up and down the hills some consequences of size.
9	direct measurement of osteolysis in man	It's a direct measurement of osteolysis in men.
9	the interpretation of current voltage relations recorded from a spherical cell with a single microelectrode	L' interpretation of current voltage relationships recorded from d' a spherical cell with a single microelectrode.
9	membrane permeability generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Membrane permeability generalization of the reflection coefficient method to describe bulk and solute flow.
9	analysis of the torus surrounding planar lipid bilayer membranes	Analysis of the torus surrounding the planet's planar lipid bilayer membranes.
9	the graphical determination of k m and k i	The graphical determination of k m and k i i.
9	the control by ventilation of airborne bacterial transfer between hospital patients and its assessment by means of a particle tracer ii ventilation in subdivided isolation units	Ventilation control of the transfer of bacteria into the air between hospitalized patients and its evaluation by means of a particle tracers ii ventilation in subdivided isolation units.
9	physical properties and subunit structure of l asparaginase isolated from erwinia carotovora	The following are the physical properties and structure of the sub @-@units of l' asparaginase l isolated from l' erwinia carotovora.
9	sex chromosome translocations in the evolution of reproductive isolation	Translocation of sex chromosomes in apo; evolution of reproductive isolation.
9	valinomycin crystal structure determination by direct methods	Crystal structure determination of valinomycin by direct methods.
9	dynamics of number fluctuations motile microorganisms	The dynamics of the change in the number of micro-systems.
9	the statistical nature of the acetycholine potential and its molecular components	The statistical nature of the acetycholine potential and its molecular components.
9	a structure activity study of sympathomimetic amines on the beta adrenoreceptors of guinea pig trachea	A study of the structure of sympathomimetic amines on beta-adrenoceptors of guinea pig trachea.
9	a quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the rat isolated fundal strip	A quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the isolated rat band.
9	amphetamine and conditioned anxiety	Uh, amphetamine and conditioned anxiety.
9	kinetic studies of nitrogenase from soya bean root nodule bacteroids	Kinetic studies of nitrogenase from soybean root nodule bacteroids.
9	the effect of substitution at c 2 of d glucose 6 phosphate on the rate of dehydrogenation by glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from yeast and from rat liver	The effect of c2 substitution of glucose 6 phosphate on the rate of dehydrogenation by glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from yeast and rat liver.
9	the significance of abrupt transitions in lineweaver burk plots with particular reference to glutamate dehydrogenase negative and positive co operativity in catalytic rate constants	L' importance of abrupt transitions in linear weaver burk curves, particularly the negative and positive cooperativity of glutamate dehydrogenase in catalytic rate constants.
9	inhibition by gamma hydroxybutyrate of chlorpromazine induced increase in homovanillic acid	The inhibition by gamma hydroxybutyrate of chlorpromazine induced an increase in l' homovanillic acid.
9	characteristics of the antitrypsin activity of human serum	Characteristics of apos; antitrypsin activity of human serum.
9	a kinetic study of rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase	A kinetic study of rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase activity.
9	automatic screening of biological specimens by optical correlation	Automatic screening of biological specimens by optical correlation.
9	expression of fetal antigens in tumor cells	The expression of fetal antigens in tumor cells.
9	an engineering study of the peristaltic drive of axonal flow	This is a technical study of the peristaltic drive of the axonal flow.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase and isoleucyl trna phe a possible verification mechanism for aminoacyl trna	Phenylalanyl trna synthetase and isoleucyl trna phe constitute a possible verification mechanism for aminoacyl trna.
9	protein changes in different brain areas as a function of intermittent training	Protein changes in different brain regions as a function of intermittent training.
9	the anisotropic elastic properties of the sarcolemma of the frog semitendinosus muscle fiber	The anisotropic elastic properties of the sarcolemma of frog semitendinosus muscle fibers.
9	one dimensional harmonic model for biomolecules	A one-dimensional harmonic model for biomolecules.
9	passive electrical properties of microorganisms v low frequency dielectric dispersion of bacteria	Electrical passive properties of microorganisms dielectric dispersion of bacteria at low frequencies.
9	a model for the genetics of handedness	A genetic genetic genetics model model for the genetics of HIV/AIDS;adadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadad
9	on treating the chromosome as the unit of selection	Treat the chromosome as the unit of the apos; unit of selection of the treatment unit.
9	methods of determining rate constants in single substrate single product enzyme reactions use of induced transport limitations of product inhibition	Methods for determining rate constants in single-substrate enzyme reactions use induced limitations of l&apos transport; product inhibition.
9	the radiofrequency field distribution surrounding coils for intrauterine diagnostic procedures i geometrical factors	Distribution of the radiofrequency field surrounding coils for intra-@uterine diagnostic procedures i geometric factors.
9	simplified method in polynucleotide helix coil transition theory including binding of complementary monomer	A simplified method in helix polynucleotide coil transition theory including complementary monomer binding.
9	dynamics of fluorescence polarization in macromolecules	The dynamics of fluorescence polarization in macromolecules.
9	analysis of a calcium ion binding system composed of two different sites	Analysis of a calcium ion binding system composed of two different sites.
9	reply to myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction by david harker	Response to myelin membrane structure revealed by X-ray diffraction by David Harker.
9	dissipative structures for an allosteric model application to glycolytic oscillations	Dissipative structures for an allosteric model with glycolytic oscillations.
9	the nature of electrosensing in the fish	The nature of it; electrosensing in the fish.
9	virial expansions for ideal self associating systems	Viral expansion for ideal associative auto-systems.
9	force balances in systems of cylindrical polyelectrolytes	Power balances in systems of cylindrical polyelectrolytes.
9	a model of peritubular capillary control of isotonic fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	A model of peritubular capillary control of isotonic fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders i nonretarded forces between thin isotropic rods and finite size corrections	Undelayed van der waals between cylinders i forces between thin isotropic rods and finite dimension corrections.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders ii retarded interaction between thin isotropic rods	Van der waals forces between cylinders ii retard momentum; interaction between thin isotropic shoots.
9	ionic partition between surface and bulk water in a silica gel a biological model	Ion division between surface water and surface water; bulk water in a silica gel.
9	on two sex models leading to stable populations	On two sex models leading to stable populations.
9	quantitative studies of the delivery of hepatic synthesized bilirubin to plasma utilizing aminolevulinic acid 4 14 c and bilirubin 3 h in man	Quantitative studies of apos; administration of synthesized bilirubin to plasma liver using apos; aminolevulinic acid 4 c and bilirubin 3 h in men.
9	ultrafiltration of lipoproteins through a synthetic membrane implications for the filtration theory of atherogenesis	Ultra filtration of lipoproteins through a synthetic membrane implications for filtration theory of atherogenesis.
9	facilitated diffusion of monosaccharides in saccharomyces cerevisiae experimental investigation of kinetic parameters without the assumptions of symmetry	Facilitate diffusion of monosaccharides in apos; experimental study of kinetic parameters without symmetry in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
9	a new newton s law of cooling	And a new Newtonian law on cooling.
9	assessment of acid base disturbances employing a desk top computer	Assessment of acid base disturbances at a desktop computer.
9	three pool model of the long term turnover of plasma cholesterol in man	A three-basin model of the long-term turnover of plasma cholesterol in men.
9	improved estimation of body masses and turnover of cholesterol by computerized input output analysis	Improvements in the quality of life; estimation of body mass and turnover of cholesterol by weight; computerized analysis of inputs and outputs.
9	kinetics of small ising systems deviations from internal equilibrium in a tetrahedral model	In a tetrahedral model the kinetics of small systems d' ising s' deviates from the apos; internal equilibrium.
9	a new method for analyzing electron microscope autoradiographs using hypothetical grain distributions	A new method using hypothetical grain distributions to analyze autoradiography by electron microscopy.
9	nonlinear spectroscopy	Uh, nonlinear spectroscopy.
9	nomograms for calculation of heat loss	From a qualitative point of view, there is no other way to achieve satisfactory results.
9	oxygen consumption by the component layers of the cornea	Oxygen consumption by the layers of the cornea.
9	pancreatic acinar cells measurement of membrane potential and miniature depolarization potentials	Pancreatic acinar cells measure membrane potential and miniature depolarization potentials.
9	a numerical inversion of the perrin equations for rotational diffusion constants for ellipsoids of revolution by iterative techniques	Numerical inversion of the perrin equations for rotational diffusion constants of revolution ellipsoids by iterative techniques.
9	the need for a kinetics for biological transport	The need for a kinetics for biological transport.
9	intracellular biopotentials during static extracellular stimulation	Intracellular biopotentials during static extracellular stimulation.
9	an automated microbiological method for the measurement of vitamin b12	An automated microbiological method for the measurement of vitamin B12 deficiency.
9	the avian egg and the retina	L'apos; egg d'apos; bird and the retina.
9	the thermodynamic description of enzyme catalyzed reactions the linear relation between the reaction rate and the affinity	Thermodynamic description of the enzyme-catalyzed reactions, the linear relationship between the reaction rate and the reaction affinity.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney i central core model of the renal medulla	Concentration drivers and model of the renal kidney's central core i.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney ii multisolute central core systems	Concentration engines and the renal system ii Central, multi-luteal, central central core system.
9	a continuum mechanical approach to the flow equations for membrane transport i water flow	A continuous mechanical approach to the flow equations for membrane transport and water flow.
9	finite difference solution for biopotentials of axially symmetric cells	Finite difference solution for the biopotentials of axially symmetric cells.
9	integral equation solution for biopotentials of single cells	D&apos solution; integral equation for biopotentials of individual cells.
9	dischroism of the infrared spectrum of nerve	Dischroism of the infrared spectrum of nerve.
9	traveling wave solutions of a nerve conduction equation	Roving wave solutions of a nerve conduction equation.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization of r factors	Deoxyribonucleic acid Deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization of r factors by deoxyribonucleic acid.
9	the double fixed charge membrane low frequency dielectric dispersion	Fixed charge double membrane low frequency dielectric dispersion.
9	the double fixed charge membrane solution membrane ion partition effects and membrane potentials	Membrane ion partitioning effects and membrane potentials of the membrane fixed charge solution.
9	physical properties of onsager s dipole chain model for ionic transport across membranes i steady state fluxes and instabilities	Physical properties of the onshore polar chain model for ionic transport across membranes, fluxes, and steady state instabilities.
9	studies on the fluorophore sempervirene and its complexes with dna	Studies on the sempervirene fluorophore and its complexes with DNA.
9	phospholipid flip flop and the distribution of surface charges in excitable membranes	Phospholipid dislocation and the distribution of surface charges in excitable membranes.
9	small angle x ray scattering of the thylakoid membranes of rhodopseudomonas speroides in aqueous suspensions	X-ray scattering of the thylakoid membranes of rhodopseudomonas speroides in aqueous suspensions is low.
9	note on the theory of x ray diffraction by spherical shell structures	Note on the theory of X-ray diffraction by spherical shell structures.
9	measurement of the size distribution of zymogen granules from rat pancreas	Measurement of the size distribution of zymogen granules in rat pancreas.
9	improved profiles of electron density distribution along collagen fibrils	Improved patterns of electron density distribution along collagen fibrils.
9	studies on the analysis of fluorescence decay data by the method of moments	Studies on the apos; analysis of fluorescence decay data by the moment method.
9	probit transformation improved method for defining synchrony of cell cultures	The method of defining the synchrony of cell cultures was improved by probit transformation.
9	normalization in the fitting of data by iterative methods application to tracer kinetics and enzyme kinetics	Standardization of apos; adjustment of data by iterative methods applied to tracer kinetics and enzyme kinetics.
9	branch input resistance and steady attenuation for input to one branch of a dendritic neuron model	Resistance to branches and constant attenuation of plants; entry into a d&apos branch; a dendritic neural model.
9	deformation of the diastolic left ventricle nonlinear elastic effects	Deformation of diastolic left ventricle nonlinear elastic effects.
9	electrical breakdown of bimolecular lipid membranes as an electromechanical instability	Electrical degradation of bimolecular lipid membranes is an electromechanical instability.
9	radioimmunoassay of rat 1 fetoprotein	A radioimmunoassay of rat fetoprotein 1.
9	physiocochemical properties of low density lipoproteins of normal human plasma evidence for the occurrence of lipoprotein b in associated and free forms	The physiochemical properties of low density lipoproteins of normal human plasma indicate the presence of b-lipoproteins in free and associated forms.
9	a study of the properties of two porphyringlobin species formed in the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with human globin	A study of the properties of two porphyringlobin species formed during the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with human globin.
9	a study of the properties of hybrids of oxyhaemoglobin and deoxyhaemoglobin with two porphyringlobin species	A study of the properties of apos, oxyhemoglobin and deoxyhemoglobin hybrids with two porphyringlobin species.
9	structural features of ring c of 20 oxo steroids and the interaction with cortisone reductase	Structural features of the c-cycle of 20 oxo steroids and interaction with cortisone reductase.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat iv determination of the ultrafiltration coefficient	L&apos dynamics; glomerular ultrafiltration in the determination of d&apos coefficient IV; and rat ultrafiltration.
9	stereological analysis of mammalian skeletal muscle i soleus muscle of the adult guinea pig	Stereological analysis of mammalian skeletal muscle i soleus in the adult guinea pig.
9	the kinetics of intramolecular distribution of 15n in uric acid after administration of 15n glycine a reappraisal of the significance of preferential labeling of n 3 9 of uric acid in primary gout	The kinetics of the intramolecular distribution of 15n in apos; uric acid after apos; administration of 15n glycine reevaluated with respect to apos; importance of preferential labeling of n.39 of apos; uric acid in primary drop.
9	linkage disequilibrium in subdivided populations	A linkage disequilibrium in subdivided populations.
9	steady state enzyme kinetics with high affinity substrates or inhibitors a statistical treatment of dose response curves	Enzyme kinetics at apos; apos state; equilibrium with high affinity substrates or d*apos inhibitors; a statistical treatment of dose-response curves.
9	incidence of anticonvulsant osteomalacia and effect of vitamin d controlled therapeutic trial	Impact of apo; anticonvulsant osteomalacia and effect of apo; vitamin d controlled therapeutic trial.
9	transcription unit mapping in bacteriophage t7 i in vivo transcription by escherichia coli rna polymerase	Mapping of transcription units in bacteriophage t7 i in vivo by escherichia coli rna polymerase activity.
9	numerator analysis of fertility change in costa rica a methodological examination	Numerator analysis of data; fertility trends in the costa rica a methodological review.
9	weighting functions and data truncation in the fitting of multi exponential functions	Weighting functions and data truncation in the map; exponential multi@-@ function adjustment.
9	electrical response to vibration of a lipid bilayer membrane	Electrical response to vibration a lipid bilayer membrane.
9	the stiffness of the flagella of impaled bull sperm	Rigidity of the flagella of impaled bull semen.
9	direct structure determination of multilayered membrane type systems which contain fluid layers	Direct determination of the structure of membrane-type multilayer systems which contain fluid layers.
9	cysteine activation in cultured cystinotic cells the specific activity of cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys and the determination of the michaelis menten constants for cysteinyl trna synthetase	L' cysteine activation in cultured cystotic cells, l' specific activity of cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys and determination of michaelis menten constants for cysteinyl trna synthetase.
9	an experimental evaluation of genetic correlation	This is an experimental evaluation of genetic correlation.
9	limiting distribution under assortative mating	The limitation of the distribution under the wedge; sexual choice matching.
9	gene flow and selection in a cline	The gene flow and selection in a cline.
9	on the thermodynamics of cell injury some insights into the molecular mechanisms	A few ideas on molecular mechanisms on the thermodynamics of cellular lesions.
9	light induced changes in photoreceptor membrane resistance and potential in gecko retinas i preparations treated to reduce lateral interactions	Light induced changes in photoreceptor membrane resistance and in the potential of gecko i retina preparations to reduce lateral interactions.
9	origin of esterified cholesterol transported in the very low density lipoproteins of human plasma	The origin of esterified cholesterol carried in the very low density lipoproteins of human plasma.
9	method for comparing concentrations of the open air factor	The method for comparing concentrations of ozone; exposure to free air is the same as that used for comparing ozone concentrations; exposure to free air.
9	an approach to the current voltage characteristics of nerve membranes based on adsorption phenomena	An approach to the current stress characteristics of nerve membranes based on d' adsorption.
9	electron spinal resonance analysis of the nitroxide spin label 2 2 6 6 tetramethylpipidone n oxyl tempone in single crystals of the reduced tempone matrix	Electron spin resonance analysis of the nitroxide spin label 2 2 2 6 6 6 n-oxylated tetramethylpipidone-tetramer in single crystals of the reduced tempone matrix.
9	effect of structure on function in model nerve nets	L' effect of structure on function in nervous-network models.
9	limited binding capacity sites for l triiodothyronine in rat liver nuclei nuclear cytoplasmic interrelation binding constants and cross reactivity with l thyroxine	Binding sites for triiodothyronine l in rat liver nuclei are limited, as are nuclear cytoplasmic binding constants and cross-reactivity with thyroxine l.
9	optical diffraction studies of muscle fibers	Optical diffraction studies of muscle fibers.
9	electronic conduction in lipid films with metal contacts	Electron-conduction in lipid films with metal contacts.
9	unsteady transport and hydration dynamics in the in vivo cornea	Dynamics of transport and d' unstable hydration in the cornea in vivo.
9	model studies of the magnetocardiogram	Model studies of the magnetocardiogram.
9	dilute solution approximation and generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Dilute solution approximation and generalization of the reflection coefficient method to describe volume and solute flows.
9	restricted transport in small pores a model for steric exclusion and hindered particle motion	Restricted transport in small pores a model for l' steric exclusion and hindered particle movement.
9	use of inert gases to study the interaction of blood flow and diffusion during passive absorption from the gastrointestinal tract of the rat	The use of inert gases to study the processes; interaction of blood flow and diffusion during pregnancy; passive absorption from the gastrointestinal tract of the rat.
9	correlation between leprosy rates in villages different distances apart	The correlation between leprosy rates in villages and distances between villages.
9	cross correlation functions for a neuronal model	Cross correlation functions for a neural model.
9	letter oral contraceptives and risks of thromboembolism	Letter-based oral contraceptives and risk of thromboembolism.
9	production of plasma esterified cholesterol in lean normotriglyceridemic humans	The production of plasma cholesterol esterified in lean normotriglycerides.
9	quantitative analysis of cholesterol in 5 to 20 microliter of plasma	Quantitative analysis of cholesterol in 5 to 20 microlitres of plasma.
9	voltage and current clamp transients with membrane dielectric loss	Clamp voltage and current transients with membrane dielectric loss.
9	ventricular and arterial wall stresses based on large deformation analyses	Ventricular and arterial wall stress based on large strain analyses.
9	binding of ions to oligopeptides	The binding of ions to oligopeptides.
9	model hydrophobic ion exchange membrane	Model hydrophobic ion exchange membrane.
9	inherited biochemical variation in drosophila melanogaster noise or signal i single locus analysis	Hereditary biochemical variation in drosophila melanogaster noise or l' single locus i-signal analysis.
9	isozyme genotype environment associations in natural populations of the harvester ant pogonomyrmex badius	Association of isozyme loci genotypes; environment in natural populations of the pogonomyrmex badius ant.
9	wave length dependencies of light scattering in normal and cold swollen rabbit corneas and their structural implications	Wave length dependence and light scattering in normal and cold-swollen rabbit corneas and their structural implications.
9	flux of free fatty acids among host tissues ascites fluid and ehrlich ascites carcinoma cells	Fluxes; free fatty acids in the tissues of the host ascites fluid and ehrlich ascites carcinoma cells.
9	measurement of the permeability of biological membranes application to the glomerular wall	Measurement of the permeability of the apos; application of biological membranes to the glomerular wall.
9	kinetic cell cycle analysis of a cultured mammalian cell population	Kinetic analysis of the cell cycle of a cultured mammalian cell population.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetic mechanism from steady state kinetics of the reaction catalysed by the enzyme in solution and covalently attached to diethylaminoethylcellulose	Rhodopseudomonas spheroides hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase kinetic mechanism from l' kinetic steady state of reaction catalyzed by l' enzyme covalently attached to diethylaminoethylcellulose in solution.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetics of radioisotope redistribution at chemical equilibrium catalysed by the enzyme in solutions	D3 rhodopseudomonas spheroides hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase kinetic radio redistribution-l&apos isotopes; chemical equilibria catalyzed by the enzyme in solutions.
9	the origin and consequences of concentration dependence in gel chromatography	L' origin and consequences of concentration dependence in gel chromatography.
9	reactions of papain and of low molecular weight thiols with some aromatic disulphides 2 2 dipyridyl disulphide as a convenient active site titrant for papain even in the presence of other thiols	Reactions of papain and low molecular weight thiols with some aromatic disulfides 2 dipyridyl disulfide as the active site titrant convenient for papain, even in the presence of other thiols.
9	the mechanism of action of beta galactosidase effect of aglycone nature and deuterium substitution on the hydrolysis of aryl galactosides	The mechanism of action of apos; effect of aglyconic beta galactosidase and deuterium substitution on apos; hydrolysis of aryl galactosides.
9	a new mathematical model for fitting an hpl radioimmunoassay curve	A new mathematical model for fitting a radioimmunoassay in hpl.
9	proteins of the postsynaptic density	It's called postsynaptic density proteins.
9	evaluation of some thin layer chromatography procedures for the identification and detection of impurities of hormonal steroids	Evaluation of certain methods of thin-layer chromatography for the identification and detection of impurities of hormonal steroids.
9	mass fragmentographic determination of eleven estrogens in the body fluids of pregnant and nonpregnant subjects	Mass fragmentographic determination of 11 estrogens in the body fluids of pregnant and non-pregnant subjects.
9	curves of ligand binding the use of hyperbolic functions for expressing titration curves	Binding curves of the ligand using hyperbolic functions to express titration curves.
9	phototaxis in chlamydomonas reinhardtii	Phototaxis in chlamydomonas reinhardtii.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver of rat liver peroxisomes iv biochemical pathway of catalase synthesis	Synthesis and turnover of rat liver of rat liver peroxisomes iv biochemical pathway of catalase synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes v intracellular pathway of catalase synthesis	Synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes v intracellular pathway of catalase synthesis.
9	the forces generated at the human elbow joint in response to imposed sinusoidal movements of the forearm	Forces generated at the apos; articulation of the human elbow in response to imposed sinusoidal movements of the apos; front-arms.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance transverse relaxation times of water protons in skeletal muscle	Nuclear magnetic resonance transverse relaxation time of d&apos protons; skeletal muscle water.
9	the use of simple epidemiological models in the evaluation of disease control programmes a case study of trachoma	Use of simple epidemiological models in the evaluation of disease control programs a case study of trachoma.
9	changes of action potential shape and velocity for changing core conductor geometry	Changes in shape and velocity of d&apos potential; action to change conductor core geometry.
9	enzymic mechanisms involving concomitant transfer and hydrolysis reactions	Enzyme mechanisms involving concomitant transfer and d&apos reactions; hydrolysis.
9	on the use of contour maps in the analysis of spread of communicable disease	On the map; use of contour cards; use of templates; use of contour cards in the map; analysis of gaps; analysis of spread of communicable disease of potato disease; other side of the map; Atlantic.
9	error rates in cervical cytological screening tests	Error in cervical cytological screening tests.
9	a method of comparing differences in tumour growth rates applied to a study of the increasing growth capacity of mouse carcinomata	Method for comparing differences in tumour growth rates applied to a study of the increasing growth capacity of mouse carcinomas.
9	breast volumes in cancer of the breast	Volume of breast cancer in breast cancer.
9	stability of dna in purkinje cell nuclei of the mouse an autoradiographic study	Stability of apos; DNA in purkinje cell nuclei of mouse autoradiographic study.
9	a model for the passage of the nurohypophysial hormones and their related proteins through the rat neurohypophysis	A model for the passage of nurohypophysial hormones and their related proteins through the rat neurohypophysis system.
9	x ray small angle scattering a new deconvolution method for evaluating electron density distributions from small angle scattering diagrams	X small angle scattering a new deconvolution method for evaluating electron density distributions from small angle scattering diagrams.
9	measurement of the impedance of frog skeletal muscle fibers	Measuring l' impedance of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
9	an ultrasensitive vibrating probe for measuring steady extracellular currents	Ultra-sensitive vibrating probe for measuring stable extracellular currents.
9	cross age tutoring fifth graders as arithmetic tutors for kindergarten children	Inter-ages course for fifth graders as arithmetic tutors for kindergarteners.
9	selection in complex genetic systems i the symmetric equilibria of the three locus symmetric viability model	Selection in complex genetic systems i l' symmetric equilibrium of the symmetric viability model at three loci.
9	interaction between natural selection for heterozygotes and directional selection	An interaction between natural selection for heterozygotes and directional selection.
9	use of inert gases and carbon monoxide to study the possible influence of countercurrent exchange on passive absorption from the small bowel	Use of inert gases and carbon monoxide to study the possible influence of the apos; exchange against current-on the apos; passive absorption from the apos; small intestine.
9	competitive binding of bilirubin and drugs to human serum albumin studied by enzymatic oxidation	The competitive binding of bilirubin and drugs to human serum albumin was studied by enzymatic oxidation.
9	the spontaneous release of transmitter from insect nerve terminals as predicted by the negative binomial theorem	Spontaneous release of a transmitter from insect nerve terminals as predicted by the negative binomial theorem.
9	smoking in pregnancy and subsequent child development	Smoking during pregnancy and subsequent child development.
9	interpretation of serum calcium in patients with abnormal serum proteins	L' interpretation of serum calcium in patients with abnormal serum proteins.
9	linear analysis of membrane conductance and capacitance in cardiac purkinje fibres	Linear analysis of membrane conductance and capacitance in cardiac purkinje fibers.
9	the direct linear plot a new graphical procedure for estimating enzyme kinetic parameters	The direct linear plot represents a new graphical procedure for estimating enzyme kinetic parameters.
9	an efficient optimization technique for recovering ventilation perfusion distributions from inert gas data effects of random experimental error	An effective d&apos technique for recovering ventilation perfusion distributions from inert gas effects resulting from random experimental errors.
9	transient response in a dendritic neuron model for current injected at one branch	Transient response in a dendritic neural model for current injected into a branch.
9	quantitative studies of pinocytosis ii kinetics of protein uptake and digestion by rat yolk sac cultured in vitro	Quantitative studies of pinocytosis ii kinetics of protein uptake and digestion by in vitro cultured rat yolk sac.
9	mitosis in tilia americana endosperm	Mitosis in America; tilia americana endosperm.
9	cardiovascular investigations and fuzzy sets theory	Cardiovascular investigations and fuzzy set theory.
9	variola minor in bragan a paulista county 1956 lack of evidence indicating the influence of contaminated classrooms on spread of the disease	Minor smallpox in Bragane, Paulista County, 1956; lack of evidence of apos; influence of contaminated classrooms on spread of the disease.
9	theory of delayed lateral inhibition in the compound eye of limulus	Lapse theory; delayed lateral inhibition in the eye; compound eye of limulus.
9	theory of photometric errors applied to the design and evaluation of a high performance filter photometer	Theory of photometric errors applied to design and installation; evaluation of a high-performance filter photometer.
9	statistical evaluation of method comparison data	For the needs of the business, one can go directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly directly from the position of the company; company in view of the business; evaluation of the business; state of the business; assembly of the business; information for the business; review of the situation.
9	the impact of laboratory error on the normal range a bayesian model	L' laboratory error on the normal range of a Bayesian model.
9	tobacco smoking and sex ratios in the united states	Cigarette smoking and sex ratio in the United States.
9	active site titration and aminoacyl adenylate binding stoichiometry of aminoacyl trna synthetases	Title of active site and aminoacyl adenylate binding stoichiometry of aminoacyl trna synthetases.
9	oxygen binding by hemocyanin from levantina hierosolima ii interpretation of cooperativity in terms of ligand ligand linkage	Ligand ligand binding by levantina hemocyanine hierosolima ii interpretation of cooperativity in terms of ligand binding.
9	ligand binding and enzymic catalysis coupled through subunits in tyrosyl trna synthetase	The ligand binding and enzyme catalysis are coupled by sub-@-@units in tyrosyl trna synthetase.
9	hydrodynamic diameters of rna tumor viruses studies by laser beat frequency light scattering spectroscopy of avian myeloblastosis and rauscher murine leukemia viruses	Study of the hydrodynamic diameters of rna tumor viruses by laser-beat frequency light scattering spectroscopy of avian myeloblastosis and murine leukemia viruses.
9	binding of calcium to phosphatidylcholines as determined by proton magnetic resonance and infrared spectroscopy	The binding of calcium to phosphatidylcholines was determined by nuclear magnetic resonance and infrared spectroscopy.
9	demonstration of two active sites on a monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of the sites reactivity in oligomeric enzymes	Demonstration of two active sites on a monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase of the possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of the site reactivity in oligomeric enzymes.
9	relationship between frequency dependence of lung compliance and distribution of ventilation	The relationship between frequency dependence of lung condition and distribution of ventilation.
9	a simulation study of the efficacy of stepwise discriminant analysis in the detection and comparison of event related potentials	A simulation study of the apos; effectiveness of the apos; stepwise discriminant analysis in the detection and comparison of the apos-related potentials; event.
9	an electronic activity integrator for operant conditioning of patterns of neural and muscular activity	D&apos integrator; electronic activity for surgical conditioning of d&apos patterns; neural and muscular activity.
9	frequency dependence of the transmission of the eeg from cortex to scalp	The transmission of the apos; eg, from the cortex to the scalp is frequency dependent.
9	the determination of density and molecular weight distributions of lipoproteins by sedimentation equilibrium	Determination of density and molecular weight distributions of lipoproteins by apos; sedimentation equilibrium.
9	mechanism of inactivation of the flavoenzyme lactate oxidase by oxalate	Mechanism of inactivation of the flavoenzyme lactate oxidase by oxalate.
9	subunit interactions in aspartate transcarbamylase the interaction between catalytic and regulatory subunits and the effect of ligands	Interactions of sub-units in aspartate transcarbamylase interaction between sub-catalytic and regulatory units and l' effect of ligands.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 i equilibrium dialysis studies	Interaction of guanosine nucleotides with dialysis studies; d&apos factor balance; elongation 2 i.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 ii effect of ribosomes and magnesium ions on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding to the enzyme	Interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 ii, effect of ribosomes and magnesium ions on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding to l' enzyme.
9	the structure of ferrocytochrome b5 at 2 8 a resolution	The structure of ferrocytochrome b5 at 28 a resolution.
9	quaternary structure of partially liganded intermediates of sheep carbon monoxide hemoglobin at alkaline ph	Quaternary structure of the partially ligand intermediates of sheep carbon monoxide hemoglobin at the alkaline phalange.
9	role of metal ions in escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase a study of the metal water interaction by nuclear relaxation rate measurements on water protons	The role of metal ions in alkaline phosphatase in apos; escherichia coli; study of apos; metal interaction with apos; water by proton nuclear relaxation rate measurements; water.
9	the interaction of inhibitors of proteolytic enzymes with 3 methylhistidine 57 chymotrypsin	L' interaction d' inhibitors d' proteolytic enzymes with 3 methylhistidine 57 chymotrypsin.
9	the effect of functional differences in the alpha and beta chains on the cooperativity of the osidation reduction reaction of hemoglobin	L' effect of functional differences in the alpha and beta chains on the cooperativity of the l&apos reduction reaction; l&apos ester; hemoglobin.
9	the molecular dissociation of ferrihemoglobin derivatives	This is the molecular dissociation of ferrihemoglobin derivatives.
9	the effect of potassium chloride on the bohr effect of human hemoglobin	The effect of potassium chloride on the skin; the bohr effect of the apos; human hemoglobin.
9	radiolabeling of proteins and viruses in vitro by acetylation with radioactive acetic anhydride	Radiolabeling of proteins and viruses in vitro by acetylation with radioactive acetic anhydride.
9	cross linking of the components of lactose synthetase with dimethylpimelimidate	A cross-link between the components of lactose synthetase and dimethylpimelimidate.
9	affinity partitioning a method for purification of proteins using specific polymer ligands in aqueous polymer two phase systems	Sharing of proteins; apo affinity; purification of proteins at apo; aid of specific polymeric ligands in aqueous two-phase polymer systems.
9	the covalent and three dimensional structure of concanavalin a iii structure of the monomer and its interactions with metals and saccharides	The covalent, three-dimensional structure of the concanavalin a iii structure of the monomer and its interactions with metals and saccharides.
9	threonine deaminase from salmonella typhimurium relationship between regulatory sites	Threonine deaminase of Salmonella typhimurium relationship between regulatory sites.
9	blood flow and mineral deposition in canine tibial fractures	Blood flow and mineral deposition in the canine tibial fractures.
9	role of inertia in the measurement of dynamic compliance	Role of the Inspectorate; inertia in the measurement of dynamic compliance.
9	a theory of aerosol deposition in the human respiratory tract	A theory of aerosol deposition in the human respiratory tract.
9	in vivo occlusal forces and moments ii mathematical analysis and recommendations for instrumentation specifications	In vivo occlusive forces and moments ii Mathematical analysis and recommendations for specifications; instrumentation.
9	major fatty acids and proximate composition of dairy products	Main fatty acids and immediate composition of dairy products.
9	a simple graphical method for determining the inhibition constants of mixed uncompetitive and non competitive inhibitors	A simple graphical method for determining d&apos constants; non-competitive and non-competitive inhibitors.
9	inhibition of enzymes by metal ion chelating reagents theory and new graphical methods of study	Inhibition of enzymes by metal ion chelator reagent theory and new graphical methods d' study.
9	detection of neuroelectric signals from multiple data channels by optimum linear filter methods	Detection of neuroelectric signals from multiple data channels by optimal linear filter methods.
9	computer based method for calculation of the available energy of proteins	Computer method of calculating the values; available energy of the proteins.
9	corneal thickness measured by interferometry	Corneal thickness measured by interferometry.
9	selection of the candidate for myocardial revascularization a profile of high risk based on multivariate analysis	Selection of the candidate for myocardial revascularization; a high risk profile based on multivariate analysis.
9	equation of the helix for separating plants in a spiral radial cultivator	L&apos equation; helix to separate plants in a spiral radial cultivator.
9	mechanism of osmotic flow in porous membranes	Mechanisms of osmotic flow in porous membranes.
9	sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	Variance of time; sampling interval; heterozygosity and genetic distance.
9	longitudinal magnification in radiologic images of thick objects a new concept in magnification radiography	Longitudinal magnification in radiological images of thick objects, a new concept in magnification radiography.
9	the cutoff characteristics of rotating grids	The cutting characteristics of rotating grids.
9	effects of partial reinforcement on conditioning conditional probabilities asymptotic performance and extinction of the rabbit s nictitating membrane response	Effects of partial reinforcement on conditioning of asymptotic performance and extinction of the nictitating membrane response in rabbit.
9	problems of quantities and units in enzymology	Problems of quantity and dosage; units in enzymology.
9	determination of the kinetic constants of glucose 6 phosphate 1 epimerase by non linear optimization	Determination of the kinetic constants of glucose 6 phosphate 1 epimerase by nonlinear optimization.
9	evidence for an essential lysine in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from leuconostoc mesenteroides	Evidence of essential lysine in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase of leuconostoc mesenteroides.
9	approach for an equation of state for adsorbed protein surfaces	Approach to an equation d' state for adsorbed protein surfaces.
9	frequency dependence of the frog skin impedance	L' impedance of the frog skin depends on the frequency.
9	the interaction of atebrin with phospholipid vesicles	L' interaction of the spine with phospholipid vesicles.
9	critical arterial stenosis a theoretical and experimental solution	Critical arterial stenosis is a theoretical and experimental solution.
9	dynamic local distensibility of living arteries and its relation to wave transmission	The dynamic local distensibility of living arteries and its relation to wave transmission.
9	a mathematical model of cardiac rhythm disorders in the presence of rapid auricular electrical activity	Mathematical model of cardiac rhythm disorders in the presence of rapid atrial electrical activity.
9	multi exponential analysis of plasma free amino acid kinetics in the rat	Multiple exponential analysis of plasma free amino acid kinetics in the rat.
9	calculation of elementary components of evoked potentials	Elemental components of the evoked potentials are calculated from the elementary components of these potentials.
9	theory of syncytial tissues ii open syncytiae	The theory of syncytial tissue ii opens up syncytiae.
9	role of functional reorganization of the receptive fields in forming a relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter	Role of functional reorganization of receptor fields in pupil formation; a relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter.
9	reproduction by means of a methematical model of the dynamic characteristics of human vertical posture maintenance	Reproduction, using a methodical model, of the dynamic characteristics of human vertical posture maintenance.
9	mathematical modeling of the dynamics of biokinematic chains	Mathematical modelling of the dynamics of biokinematic chains.
9	letter analysis of the lateral stability of the protofibril lattice in the a disk of striated muscle	Analysis of the letters of the lateral stability of the protofibril network in a striated muscle disc.
9	letter velocity of passive conductance in a branching fiber	Speed of letter of passive conductance in a branched fiber.
9	receptor potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle	Receptive potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle.
9	on the theory of ionic solutions	Within the framework of the theory of ionic ionic solutions of ionic solutions, one can, in the field of the theory of ionic solutions of ionic ionic solutions, continue the work on the theory of ionic ionic solutions.
9	electro optical property of extremely stretched skinned muscle fibers	Electrooptic property of extremely stretched and stretched muscle fibers.
9	systemic error during measurement of dp dt using conventional heart catheters and their correction	Systemic error in the measurement of dp dt at baseline; aid in the correction of defects in conventional cardiac catheters.
9	the stability constants of magnesium oxalate complexes	The stability constants of magnesium oxalate d&apos complexes.
9	measurement of right ventricular volumes using 131i maa	Measurement of right ventricular volumes using 131i maa maa.
9	factors affecting the times till death of pedestrians killed in road accidents	Factors affecting time up to; death of pedestrians killed in road accidents.
9	plasma volumes and constituents of heat exposed men before and after acclimatization	Plasma volumes and heat constituents exposed men before and after acclimation.
9	chest wall mechanics during artificial ventilation	Chest wall mechanics during artificial ventilation.
9	effects of lung inflation on pulmonary arterial blood volume in intact dogs	Effects of pulmonary inflation on pulmonary arterial blood volume in intact dogs.
9	total work rate of breathing optimization in co 2 inhalation and exercise	Total rate of work; optimization of breathing in breathing; inhalation co 2 and breathing; exercise.
9	measurement of axial diffusivities in a model of the bronchial airways	Measurement of axial diffusivities in a model of airways.
9	continuous in vivo measurement of arterial po2 in humans	Continuous in vivo measurement of arterial po2 in humans.
9	tetralogy of fallot a morphometric and geometric study	Tetralogy of fallot a morphometric and geometric study.
9	direct quantitative estimation of paneth and total cell populations in the jejunal glands of lieberk hn	Direct quantitative estimation of paneth and total cell populations in the jejunal glands of lieberk hn.
9	collaborative study of a spectrofluorometric method for lasalocid sodium in feeds	A collaborative study of a spectrofluorometric method for sodium lasalocides in animal feed.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat viii effects of hematocrit	Lapos dynamics; glomerular ultrafiltration in the viii effects of the apos; hematocrit in the rat.
9	an electronic device for the automatic correction of fluorescence emission spectra	An electronic device for the automatic correction of the d' fluorescence emission spectra.
9	effect of protein concentration on the molecular weight of delta5 3 ketosteroid isomerase	Effect of protein concentration on the molecular weight of delta5 3 ketosteroid isomerase.
9	crystallographic structure refinement of chromatium high potential iron protein at two angstroms resolution	Development of the crystallographic structure of high-chromatic potential ferric protein at two angstrom resolution.
9	role of the surface excess of palmitoyl coenzyme a in the 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase reaction catalyzed by microsomes	The role of l' excess surface area of palmitoyl coenzyme a in the microsome-catalyzed reaction 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase.
9	antenatal fetal growth from the nineteenth week ultrasonic study of 12 head and chest dimensions	Pre-natal fetal growth from the baseline; ultrasonic study of 12 dimensions of the head and chest, performed at the 10th-9th week.
9	the kinetics of glucocorticoid binding to the soluble specific binding protein of mouse fibroblasts	The kinetics of glucocorticoid binding to the soluble specific binding protein of mouse fibroblasts.
9	the calcium and magnesium binding sites on troponin and their role in the regulation of myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase	The calcium and magnesium binding sites on troponin and their role in the regulation of myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase.
9	mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase independent function of the catalytic binding sites	L&apos-independent function; mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from the catalytic binding sites.
9	the pathology of the degenerate meniscus lesion	The pathology of the degenerate meniscus lesion.
9	pulmonary blood flow determined by continuous analysis of pulmonary n2o exchange	Pulmonary blood flow determined by apo; continuous analysis of apo; n2o exchange of the lungs.
9	restitution of blood volume after hemorrhage mathematical description	The restitution of blood volume after the mathematical description of hemorrhage.
9	regulation of intestinal calcium binding protein calcium intake in the rat	Control of intestinal calcium binding protein calcium intake in rats.
9	participation of the catalytic carboxyls asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 in the binding of substrate analogues to hen lysozyme	Participation of the catalytic carboxyls asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 in the binding of substrate analogs to hen lysozyme.
9	tryptophan fluorescence lifetimes in lysozyme	Typtophan fluorescence lifetimes in lysozyme.
9	mechanism by which antibodies inhibit hapten malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme immunoassay for morphine	The mechanism by which antibodies inhibit haptene malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme-linked morphine immunoassay.
9	kinetic demonstration of the intermediate role of aminoacyl adenylate enzyme in the formation of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid	Kinetic demonstration of the intermediacy of l' aminoacyl adenylate enzyme in the formation of l' valyl transfer ribonucleic acid.
9	the steady state kinetic parameters and non processivity of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase i	The kinetic parameters at baseline; state of equilibrium and non-fatalities; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase i d' escherichia coli.
9	role of sulfhydryl groups in cellular adhesiveness	The role of sulfhydryl groups in cellular adhesion.
9	myonemal contraction of spirostomum ii some mechanical properties of the contractile apparatus	Myonemic contraction of spirostomum ii certain mechanical properties of the spirostomum; contractile apparatus.
9	the hepatic adenylate cyclase system iii a mathematical model for the steady state kinetics of catalysis and nucleotide regulation	The hepatic adenylate cyclase system iii, a mathematical model for kinetics at apos; d&apos state; equilibrium of nucleotide catalysis and regulation.
9	comparably massive penicillin g therapy in renal failure	Comparatively massive penicillin therapy in apos; renal failure.
9	possible physical substrates for the interaction of electromagnetic fields with biologic membranes	Possible physical substrates for the apos; interaction of electromagnetic fields with biological membranes.
9	hydrophobic interaction of alkanes with liposomes and lipoproteins	The hydrophobic interaction of alkanes with liposomes and lipoproteins.
9	rumen modeling rumen input output balance models	Rumen rumen modeling of the rumen models; balance balance input of the apos; balance of the apos; rumen input.
9	kinetic aspects of synchrony in suspension cultures of acer pseudoplatanus l	The kinetic aspects of synchrony in suspension cultures of acer pseudoplatanus l.
9	photoelectron quantum yields of the amino acids	Photoelectronic quantum yields of the amino acids are obtained.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at low resolution 17 a	Direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at low resolution 17 a.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods ii beef products	Full evaluation of fatty acids in foods ii Beef products.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods iii eggs and egg products	Extensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods iii eggs and egg products.
9	osmosis in cortical collecting tubules a theoretical and experimental analysis of the osmotic transient phenomenon	Osmosis in cortical collecting tubules a theoretical and experimental analysis of the osmotic transient phenomenon.
9	auditory membrane vibrations measurements at sub angstrom levels by optical heterodyne spectroscopy	Measurement of auditory membrane vibrations at levels-angstroms by optical heterodyne spectroscopy.
9	a simple specific assay for estriol in maternal urine	A simple specific test for estriol in maternal urine.
9	influx of cholesterol into plasma in rabbits with fasting hyperbetalipoproteinemia	Infection of cholesterol in the plasma in rabbits with fasting hyperbetalipoproteinemia.
9	a biological least action principle for the ecological model of volterra lotka	A principle of less biological action for the ecological model of volterra lotka.
9	transmucosal triglyceride transport rates in proximal and distal rat intestine in vivo	Transmucosal triglyceride transport rates in the distal and proximal intestine of the rat in vivo.
9	activation of 3 5 cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase by calcium ion and a protein activator	Activation of 35 cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase by calcium ion and a protein activator.
9	studies on the kinetic mechanism of s adenosylmethionine protein o methyltransferase of calf thymus	Studies on the kinetic mechanism of adenosylmethionine o methyltransferase protein in calf thymus.
9	affinity labeling of a regulatory site of bovine liver glutamate dehydrogenase	Labelling of apos; affinity of apos; a regulatory site of bovine hepatic glutamate dehydrogenase.
9	neutral and cationic sulfonamido derivatives of the fluorescent probe 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications	Neutral and cationic sulfonamido derivatives of the fluorescent probe 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications.
9	energy transfer by chlorophyll a in detergent micelles	Transfer of energy by chlorophyll a into detergent micelles.
9	the rapid component of electron paramagnetic resonance signal ii a candidate for the physiological donor to photosystem ii in spinach chloroplasts	The fast component of the electron paramagnetic resonance signal ii is a potential candidate for the physiological donor of photosystem ii in spinach chloroplasts.
9	calcium binding to rabbit skeletal myosin under physiological conditions	Calcium binding to rabbit skeletal myosin under physiological conditions.
9	electric birefringence of myosin subfragments	Electrical Birfringence of myosin fragments-sub.
9	participation of manganese ions complexed with trna in the interaction with amino acids and dipeptides	The participation of manganese ions complexed with the trna in the interaction with amino acids and dipeptides.
9	the kinetic mechanism and properties of the cytoplasmic acetoacetyl coenzyme a thiolase from rat liver	The kinetic mechanism and properties of the cytoplasmic coenzyme acetoacetyl a thiolase from rat liver.
9	the amine oxidases of human placenta and pregnancy plasma	The amine oxidases of human placenta and pregnancy plasma.
9	determinants of glomerular filtration in experimental glomerulonephritis in the rat	The effects of glomerular filtration on glomerulonephritis and glomerulonephritis.
9	hepatocellular uptake of taurocholate in the dog	L' hepatocellular uptake of taurocholate in dogs.
9	kinetics of the hydrolysis of n benzoyl l serine methyl ester catalysed by bromelain and by papain analysis of modifier mechanisms by lattice nomography computational methods of parameter evaluation for substrate activated catalyses and consequences of postulated non productive binding in bromelain and papain catalysed hydrolyses	Apos kinetics; benzoyl serine methyl ester catalyzed by bromelain and apos; analysis of modifying mechanisms by network name calculation methods for apos; evaluation of the parameters of substrate-activated catalysts and consequences of nonproductive binding in bromelain and papain hydrolys.
9	kinetics of irreversible enzyme inhibition by an unstable inhibitor	Kinetics; irreversible enzyme inhibition by an unstable inhibitor.
9	the inhibition of human placental diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	L' inhibition of human placental diamine oxidase by substrate analogs.
9	macroscopic rate constants involved in the formation and interconversion of the two central enzyme substrate complexes of the lactate dehydrogenase turnover	The macroscopic rate constants involved in the formation and interconversion of the two central enzyme substrates of lactate dehydrogenase turnover.
9	a kinetic analysis of enzyme systems involving four substrates	Kinetic analysis of enzyme systems involving four substrates.
9	a comparison of two methods for fitting the integrated michaelis menten equation	Comparison of two methods d' adjustment of l' integrated Michaelis menten equation.
9	colloidal alpha stannic acid and negative iron colloid as differential electron stains for surface proteins	Stannic alpha colloidal acid and negative iron colloid as differential surface protein electronic dyes.
9	long term potentiation of the perforant path granule cell synapse in the rat hippocampus	In the long term, potentiation of the granule cell synapse of the perforating pathway in the rat hippocampus.
9	transparency of pair correlated random distributions of small scatterers with applications to the cornea	Pair transparency correlated random distributions of small scatterers with corneal applications.
9	cross talk in absorbing optical fibers	The word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of God.
9	visual fourier transform spectroscopy with a single crystal plate	Fourier transform spectroscopy with a single crystal plate.
9	masking of the non test ear in speech audiometry	Hide the apos; untested ear audiometry of the speech.
9	masking of the non test ear in tone decay b k sy audiometry and sisi tests	Masking of the ears; ear not tested in the audiometry and sisi tests; tone decay and sisi systems.
9	determination of bile acid pool size in man a simplified method with advantages of increases precision shortened analysis time and decreased isotope exposure	Determination of the bile acid pool size in humans is a simplified method that has the advantage of increasing accuracy, shortening the time to onset, analysis and decreasing the time to onset, and exposure to isotopes.
9	an improved mantel bryan procedure for safety testing of carcinogens	An improved test procedure for the safety of carcinogens based on bryan mantel.
9	localization of heart vectors produced by epicardial burns and ectopic stimuli validation of a dipole ranging method	Localization of cardiac vectors produced by epicardial burns and ectopic stimulus validation; dipolar telemetry method.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow through a branch implications for the hemodynamics of atherogenesis	Apos calculation; pulsatile flow through the implications of apos; branch for apos; hemodynamics of apos; atherogenesis.
9	theory of current source density analysis and determination of conductivity tensor for anuran cerebellum	L&apos theory; current source density analysis and determination of conductivity tensor for anuran cerebellum.
9	experimental optimization of current source density technique for anuran cerebellum	Experimental optimization of current source density technique for anuran cerebellum.
9	the evaluation of left ventricular function in man a comparison of methods	L' evaluation of left ventricular function in men a comparison of methods.
9	linear working graphs in blood lead determinations with the beckman flameless atomic absorption cuvet	Linear working charts for the determination of blood lead level with the cuvette d'apos; atomic absorption beckman without flame.
9	biological populations with nonoverlapping generations stable points stable cycles and chaos	Biological populations with non-overlapping generations indicate stable cycles and indicate chaos.
9	tracer flow permeability and partial conductance	Lapos permeability; tracer flow and partial conductance.
9	food intake and growth of guinea pigs fed a cholesterol containing diet	Food ingestion and growth of guinea pigs fed a cholesterol-containing diet.
9	application of the loo riegelman absorption method	Application of the d&apos method; loo riegelman absorption.
9	measurement of surface color and color difference of tablet colorants by tristimulus colorimetry	Measurement of color of the surface and color difference of tablet dyes by tristimulus.
9	determination of stability constants of stannous fluoride complexes by potentiostatic titration	Determination of the stability constants of stannous fluoride complexes by potentiostatic titration.
9	influence of the electrical properties of electrodes platinum wire on the myoelectric signal	L' influences the electrical properties of the platinum electrodes on the myoelectric signal.
9	quantitative study of autoradiographic marking in the rat nervous system ii final characteristics of the adult animal brain interpretation rules and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture	Quantitative study of autoradiographic labelling in the rat nervous system ii Final characteristics of the rules; interpretation of the brain of the adult animal and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture.
9	calculation of the electromyographic jitter	Calculation of the electromyographic shock.
9	a model for the transient and steady state mechanical behavior of contracting muscle	A model for the transient and stationary mechanical behaviour of contracting muscle.
9	the differential scattering of circularly polarized light by chloroplasts and evaluation of their true circular dichroism	The differential scattering of circularly polarized light by chloroplasts and l' evaluation of their true circular dichroism.
9	the effect of energization on the apparent michaelis mentne constant for oxygen in mitochondrial respiration	L' effect of apo; energy on apparent constant michaelis for apo; oxygen in mitochondrial respiration.
9	the effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on the kinetics of cell proliferation in rat prostate	The effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on the kinetics of cell proliferation in rat prostate.
9	a re evaluation of energy independent calcium ion binding by rat liver mitochondria	An apos-independent reevaluation of calcium ion binding by rat liver mitochondria.
9	experimental tonography on enucleated human eyes i the validity of grant s tonography formula	Enucleated Human Eye Experimental Tonography i the validity of the Grant s tonography formula.
9	calcium ion binding to the chromaffin granule surface	The calcium ion binds to the chromaffin granule surface.
9	model connective tissue systems a study of polyion mobile ion and of excluded volume interactions of proteoglycans	Connective tissue systems model study of polyionic mobile ions and excluded volume interactions of proteoglycans.
9	the macromolecular properties of blood group specific glycoproteins characterization of a series of fractions obtained by solvent fractionation	The macromolecular properties of blood-group-specific glycoproteins are characteristic of a series of fractions obtained by solvent fractionation.
9	a study of the kinetics and mechanism of rabbit muscle l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	A study of the kinetics and mechanism of rabbit muscle glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase was made.
9	the molecular and crystal structures of 4 n 2 acetamido 2 deoxy beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine trihydrate and 4 n beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine monohydrate the x ray analysis of a carbohydrate peptide linkage	The molecular and crystal structures of 4 n 2 acetamido 2 deoxy beta trihydrate of glucopyranosyl asparagine l and 4 n beta monohydrate of glucopyranosyl asparagine l were determined by x-ray analysis of d' a glucose peptide bond.
9	a solid phase radioimmunoassay for plasma progesterone	A solid phase radioimmunoassay for plasma progesterone.
9	a new method for determining the michaelis constant	A new method for determining the Michaelis constant.
9	studies of the dimensions of oligopeptides by singlet singlet energy transfer and theoretical calculations i influence of glycine on the dimensions of tetrapeptides	L' study of the dimensions of oligopeptides by single energy transfer and theoretical calculations influence glycine on tetrapeptide dimensions.
9	air pressure and flow in the nose6 represented in a double logarithmic system author s transl	Pressure and flow d' air in the nose6 represented in a translational double-author log system.
9	mathematical method for determining kvp from x ray attenuation measurements	A mathematical method for determining kvp from x-ray attenuation measurements.
9	the use of 13c nuclear magnetic resonance of aromatic amino acid residues to determine the midpoint oxidation reduction potential of each iron sulfur cluster of clostridium acidi urici and clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxins	Use of 13c nuclear magnetic resonance of apo residues; aromatic amino acids to determine the potential of apo; half-way oxidation of each group of ferric sulphides of clostridium acidi urici and ferredoxins of clostridium pasteurianum.
9	ph dependence of the adair constants of human hemoglobin nonuniform contribution of successive oxygen bindings to the alkaline bohr effect	The ph dependence of the eposadair constants; human hemoglobin contributes inconsistently to successive oxygen bonds to the apos; alkaline bohr effect.
9	the mechanism of stabilization of the structure of nuclease t by binding of ligands	The mechanism of stabilization of the structure of nuclease t by ligand binding is described.
9	an expression for the calculation of relative affinities of antibody ligand interactions	An expression for the calculation of relative affinities of d&apos antibody ligand interactions.
9	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for postganglionic acetylcholine receptors of the guinea pig ileum	Relationships between chemical structure and l' affinity for postganglionic receptors of l' acetylcholine; guinea pig ileum.
9	build up region of megavoltage photon radiation sources	To build a region of megavoltage photonics sources.
9	hidden part suppression on three dimensional plots	Partial hidden suppression on three-dimensional plots.
9	high energy electron radiotherapy in a magnetic field	High energy electronic radiation in a magnetic field.
9	kinetic studies on the depolymerization of polyadenylic acid by ribonuclease a	Kinetic studies on the depolymerization of polyadenylic acid (PAA) by a ribonuclease.
9	kinetic behavior of associating enzyme systems ofthe type m in equilibrium m2 in equilibrium m3 in equilibrium and of the type 2m in equilibrium d in equilibrium d2 in equilibrium d3 in equilibrium	Kinetic behavior of associated enzyme systems of the type M to apos; equilibrium m2 to apos; equilibrium m3 and type 2m to apos; equilibrium d2 to apos; equilibrium d2 to apos; equilibrium d3 to apos; equilibrium d3 to apos; equilibrium d3.
9	the structure of hydrophobic cores of globins	The structure of hydrophobic nuclei in globins.
9	a study of the mechanism of action of phosphorylase b using isotope labelled substrates	A study of the mechanism of action of phosphorylase b at apos, using isotope labelled substrates.
9	a study of the interaction of oligonucleotides with polynucleotides by the method of equilibrium gel filtration the effect of magnesium ions and the composition of the oligonucleotides on the stability of the complex	A study of the apos; interaction of oligonucleotides with polynucleotides by the gel filtration method at the apos; equilibrium of the apos; effect of magnesium ions and the composition of the oligonucleotides on the stability of the complex.
9	diffuse scattering of x rays by polypeptides and proteins in solution iii analysis of scattering curve of sperm whale myoglobin	Diffuse X-ray scattering by polypeptides and proteins in solution iii analyses the diffusion curve of sperm whale myoglobin.
9	an analysis of the cost of selection concept	An analysis of the cost of the selection concept using a selection cost approach.
9	differential light scattering from spherical mammalian cells	Differences in light scattering by mammalian spherical cells.
9	a pressure vessel model for nerve compression	It's a pressure vessel model for nerve compression.
9	the resolution of arterial pulses into forward and backward waves as an approach to the determination of the characteristic impedance	The resolution of arterial wave impulses to the front and back as an approach to the determination of the characteristic impedance.
9	quantitative analysis of mass and energy balance in non ideal models of the renal counterflow system	Quantitative analysis of mass and energy balance in non-ideal models of the system versus-renal flow.
9	population structure in relation to cost of selection	Population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. cost of selection vs. cost of elucidation; access to el' information on el' recent election def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def def
9	the interaction of ribonuclease t 1 with dna	L' interaction of ribonuclease t 1 with DNA.
9	investigation of very slowly tumbling spin labels by nonlinear spin response techniques theory and experiment for stationary electron electron double resonance	Study of very slow rocking spin labels by nonlinear spin response and l&apos techniques; experimentation with d&apos electronic double resonance; stationary electrons.
9	analysis of a simple prototypal muscle model near to and far from equilibrium	Dapos analysis; simple prototypic muscle model near and far from the apos; equilibrium.
9	discontinuous variability in the form of a geometric progression of albumin production in hepatoma and hybrid cells	Discontinuous variation in the form of a geometric progression of albumin production in the liver, hepatoma and hybrid cells.
9	island models for takeover by a social trait facing a frequency dependent selection barrier in a mendelian population	Island models of takeovers by a social trait facing a frequency-dependent selection barrier in a Mendelian population.
9	niche overlap and diffuse competition	Niche overlap and diffuse competition overlap one another.
9	the coats of the eyeball and the intraocular pressure author s transl	The coats of the eyeball and the intraocular translation of l' author on pressure.
9	changes in arterial pressure viscosity and resistance during cardiopulmonary bypass	Changes in blood pressure viscosity and resistance during cardiopulmonary bypass surgery.
9	assessment of some problems associated with prediction of the three dimensional structure of a protein from its amino acid sequence	Assessment of some of the problems associated with predicting the three-dimensional structure of a protein from its amino acid sequence structure.
9	stochastics of cycle completions fluxes in biochemical kinetic diagrams	Stochastic ring complements fluxes in biochemical kinetic diagrams.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase from baker s yeast role of 3 terminal adenosine of trna phe in enzyme substrate interaction studied with 3 modified trna phe species	Phenylalanyl trna baker's yeast synthetase role of 3 terminal adenosine of trna phe in the apos; substrate interaction studied with 3 modified species of trna phe.
9	magnetic resonance spectra of membranes	Membrane magnetic resonance (MMR) spectrum.
9	a group of thermodynamic potentials applicable to ligand binding by a polyfunctional macromolecule	Group of thermodynamic potentials applicable to d&apos binding; ligand by a polyfunctional macromolecule.
9	moments for sum of an arbitrary function of gene frequency along a stochastic path of gene frequency change	Moments for the sum d' an arbitrary function of gene frequency along d' a stochastic path of gene frequency change.
9	vascular and extravascular volume changes due to elevated venous pressure	Vascular and extravascular volume changes due to elevated venous pressure.
9	a model for ultracentrifugal quantification of 35 s bromosulphthalein binding to plasma proteins in the presence of radioimpurities	Model for ultracentrifugal quantification of 35-s bromosulftalein binding to plasma proteins in the presence of radioimpurities.
9	interference competition and niche theory	Competition with interference and niche theory.
9	special pharmacokinetic aspects in newborns and young infants	Special pharmacokinetics in newborns and young children.
9	the effect of chlorpromazine on some properties dna in solution	The effect of chlorpromazine on certain properties of DNA in solution.
9	a potent new mesodermal growth factor from mouse submaxillary gland a quantitative comparative study with previously described submaxillary gland growth factors	A potent new gland mesodermal growth factor under mouse maxillary-made the subject d' a quantitative comparative study with gland growth factors under previously described-maxillary.
9	on equation of gas transport in the lung	On the map; equation of gas transport in the lungs.
9	a sigmoid model of the static volume pressure curve of human lung	Sigmoid model of the static volume pressure curve of human lungs.
9	carbon monoxide elimination	So, carbon monoxide removal.
9	determination of mean whole body intracellular ph in unanesthetized dogs	Determination of the mean body intracellular ph in unanesthetized dogs.
9	on the psychophysical law an information theory interpretation	On the psychophysical law an interpretation of the theory of information.
9	a theory of group selection	It's a theory of group selection.
9	a general model for genetic recombination	So, a general pattern of genetic recombination.
9	short lived messenger rna in hela cells and its impace on the kinetics of accumulation of cytoplasmic polyadenylate	Short-lived messenger rna in helical cells and its impact on the kinetics of apos; accumulation of cytoplasmic polyadenylate.
9	computer generated isodose curves for high energy x ray machines experimental verification and time saving strategies	Computer-generated isodose curves for high-energy X-ray equipment experimental verification and time saving strategies.
9	new approach to the study of hormone protein interaction using the microcalorimetric method	A new approach to the study of protein interactions using the micro-calorimetric method.
9	tumor and normal tissue response to irradiation in vivo variation with decreasing dose rates	Tumour and tissue response normal to apo; in vivo variation with decreasing dose rates.
9	the total biological dose	The total biological dose.
9	appraisal of the angiographic circulation time as an index of cerebral blood flow	Assessment of angiographic circulation time as an index of cerebral blood flow.
9	analytical approach for depth dose calculations 60co beams with fixed source target distance	Analytical approach to calculating depth doses 60co beams with fixed target distance source.
9	errors in applying the nsd concept	Errors in the application of the concept.
9	reward versus cost token systems an analysis of the effects on students and teacher	An analysis of the effects on students and teachers of reward systems versus fee-for-service systems.
9	comparative measurements of airway resistance	The results of respiratory resistance assessment with respect to respiratory resistance are presented in draft legislation.
9	interspecific competition a new approach to the classical theory	Interspecific competition is a new approach to the classical theory.
9	the impact of organization of family planning clinics on waiting time	The impact of the organization of family planning clinics on waiting times was highlighted.
9	high counting rates from 125i in radioimmunoassays	High counting rates from 125i in radioimmunoassays.
9	a dynamical model for human population	A dynamic model for human population.
9	a technique for estimating the position of the oxygen hemoglobin dissociation curve	Procedure; estimation of the position of the dissociation curve of oxygenated hemoglobin.
9	realpop a mathematical model for resource allocation in population programs results from a test in the dominican republic	Realpop a mathematical model for resource allocation in population programs results from a test in the Dominican Republic.
9	polar vectors in the posterior inferior parietal myocardial infarct and left anterior hemiblock	Polar vectors in the apos; lower posterior parietal myocardial infarction and left anterior hemococci.
9	intracranial volume pressure relationships during experimental brain compression in primates 1 pressure responses to changes in ventricular volume	Relationships between intracranial volume and pressure during experimental cerebral compression in primates 1: pressure responses to changes in ventricular volume.
9	intramyocardial pressure effect of preload on transmural distribution of systolic coronary blood flow	Effect of preload on intramyocardial pressure on transmural distribution of systolic coronary blood flow.
9	quantitative evaluation of hemodialysis therapy using a simple mathematical model and a programmable pocket calculator	Quantitative evaluation of apo; hemodialysis; help from apo; simple mathematical model and apo; programmable pocket calculator.
9	observations on a model of the biology of carcinoma of the cervix a poor fit between observation and theory	Observations on a model of the biology of cervical carcinoma; uterus a poor fit between observation and theory.
9	the inotropic memory of amphibian myocardium i identification of two stimultaneous mechanisms and statement of a model	The inotropic memory of amphibian myocardium identification of two stimulatory mechanisms and a model.
9	ventricular performance in patients based upon rate of change of power during isovolumic contraction	Ventricular performance in patients based on the rate of change in power during isovolumic contraction.
9	isovolumic fractional rate of change of power its applicability to assessment of ventricular performance in patients	Isovolumic fractional rate of change of power its applicability to stroke evaluation of ventricular performance in patients.
9	ray tracing through a toric refracting surface	Radiation drawn through a refracted toric surface.
9	analysis of photometric data	Analysis of photometric data.
9	kinetics of renin antirenin reaction micromethods for the assay of renin and antirenin	Kinetics of the reaction renin-antirenin micromethods for the determination of renin and l' antirenin.
9	linear measurements of the rhomboid fossa the fourth ventricle in man	Linear measurement of rhomboidal fossa of the fourth ventricle in males.
9	mathematical analysis of several parameters of the microcirculatory bed of muscles and muscular organs	Mathematical analysis of several parameters of the microcirculatory bed of muscles and muscle organs.
9	infant development and adipositas author s transl	Infant development and adipositas translat s authors.
9	population variation in asymmetry and diversity from finger to finger for digital ridge count	Variation in the asymmetry and diversity of the populations; one finger at the base; another for the numerical ridge count.
9	dermatoglyphics of schizophrenics patients with down s syndrome and mentally retarded males as compared with australian europeans using multivariate statistics	The dermatoglyphs of schizophrenia sufferers with the lowest-level syndrome and the mentally retarded men compared to European men; Australian origin using multivariate statistics.
9	the radius dose relationship in linear source therapy	The radius dose relationship in linear source therapy.
9	sulphated glycosaminoglycans as virus inhibitors 2nd communication inhibitory effect of glycosaminoglycanpolysulphates on yellow fever virus 17 d in animal experiments author s transl	Sulfated glycosaminoglycans as virus inhibitors 2nd inhibitory effect of glycosaminoglycan polysulfate communication on yellow fever virus 17 days in animal experiments.
9	biothermal simulation of scuba divers	Biothermal simulation of scuba divers.
9	the use of stereologic image analysis in medicine peripheral nerves	L' use of l' analysis d' stereological images in medicine for peripheral nerves.
9	inactivation of bacteriophages t7 and phix174 by radiomimetics	Inactivation of bacteriophages t7 and phix174 by radiomimetics.
9	a mathematical model for bacterial chemotaxis	A mathematical model for bacterial chemotaxis.
9	karyometric analysis of the supraoptic nucleus and the paraventricular nucleus before and after milking the cow	Karyometric analysis of the supraoptic nucleus and the paraventricular nucleus before and after cow milking.
9	light scattering spectrum due to wiggling motions of bacteria	Light scattering spectrum due to agitated bacteria movement.
9	inelastic light scattering by large structured particles	Inelastic light scattering by large structured particles.
9	normal hemoglobin oxygen affinity	Normal affinity for apos; oxygen of the apos; hemoglobin.
9	8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole and disrupted mitochondria a re evaluation of the use of double reciprocal plots in the derivation of binding parameters for fluorescent probes binding to mitochondrial membranes	Anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole and broken mitochondria reevaluation of l' use of double reciprocal tracings in the derivation of binding parameters for fluorescent probes binding to mitochondrial membranes.
9	the new patient index a method of measuring the activity of day hospitals	The new Patient Index is a method of measuring the activity of day hospitals.
9	overlap problems in counting fibers	There were overlapping problems in fibre counting.
9	right ventricular volume in congenital heart disease	Uh, right ventricular volume in congenital heart defects.
9	a simple method for anzlyzing multifactorial data	A simple method for multi-factor data annotation.
9	comparison of 2 angiographic methods to determine the expulsion fraction of the left ventricle	Comparison of two angiographic methods to determine the fraction of left ventricle efflux.
9	effect of papaverine hydrochloride on brain circulation studies using a scintillation camera computer system	Effects of papaverine hydrochloride on brain circulation studies using a scintillation camera computer system.
9	sense and applicability of means various critical considerations	Meaning and applicability of terms mean various critical considerations.
9	an equilibrium binding study of the interaction of fructose 6 phosphate and fructose 1 6 bisphosphate with rabbit muscle phosphofructokinase	An apo-binding study; phosphate balance; interaction of fructose 6 phosphate and fructose 16 bisphosphate with rabbit muscle phosphofructokinase.
9	fluorescence energy transfer between ligand binding sites on aspartate transcarbamylase	D&apos transfer; fluorescence energy between ligand binding sites on aspartate transcarbamylase.
9	negative cooperativity in the binding of thyroxine to human serum prealbumin preparation of tritium labeled 8 anilino 1 naphthalenesulfonic acid	Negative co-activity in the binding of thyroxine to a l&apos labelled human serum tritium préalbumin preparation; anilino acid 8 naphthalenesulfonic acid 1.
9	mandelate racemase from pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance and kinetic studies of the mechanism of catalysis	Mandelate racemase of pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance and kinetic studies of the catalysis mechanism.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of histone iv solution conformation	The nuclear magnetic resonance study of the conformation of the l&apos solution; histone iv in solution.
9	platelet stimulation by thrombin and other proteases	Platelet stimulation by thrombin and other proteases.
9	immobilized electric eel acetylcholinesterase i kinetics of acetylcholinesterase trapped in polyacrylamide membranes	The kinetics of immobilized electrical eel acetylcholinesterase i are trapped in the polyacrylamide membranes.
9	human platelet 6 phosphofructokinase relation between inhibition by mg atp2 and cooperativity towards fructose 6 phosphate and investigations on the formation of a ternary complex	Relationship of human platelet phosphofructokinase 6 between apos; inhibition by mg atp2 and cooperativity with fructose phosphate 6 and apos; d&apos formation; ternary complex.
9	ph effects in plasmin catalysed hydrolysis of alpha n benzoyl l arginine compounds	The ph effects in plasmin catalyze the hydrolysis of benzoyl n-butyl esters; arginine.
9	physicochemical and kinetic properties of beef liver argininosuccinase studies in the presence and absence of arginase	The chemical and kinetic properties of bovine liver argininosuccinase were studied in the presence and absence of arginase.
9	mammalian 3 oxosteroid delta4 delta5 isomerase a membrane bound enzyme ii activation by divalent cations	Mammalian 3 delta4 delta5 isomerase oxosteroid, a membrane-bound enzyme ii activation by divalent cations.
9	a physical explanation of the epr spectrum observed during catalysis by enzymes utilizing coenzyme b12	A physical explanation of the esr spectrum observed during catalysis by coenzyme b12 enzymes.
9	lateral diffusion of cholesterol in monolayers	Dissemination of cholesterol in the monolayer.
9	the characterization of energized and partially de energized respiration independent beta galactoside transport into escherichia coli	Characterization of energized and partially energized breathing-independent beta galactoside transport in escherichia coli.
9	a conformational change in bovine beta lactoglobulin at low ph	A conformational change in bovine beta-low-php bovine lactoglobulin.
9	nonlinear regression methods in design of experiments and mathematical modelling applications to the analysis of the steady state kinetics of glutathione reductase	Nonlinear regression methods in the design of experiments and mathematical modelling applications at apos; kinetics analysis at apos; state d' glutathione reductase equilibrium.
9	substrate inhibition kinetics in assemblages of cells	The kinetics of substrate inhibition in cell assemblages.
9	dynamics of cellular growth	Dynamics of cellular growth.
9	a computer simulation model for analysis of conformation of nuclear chromatin and of the transcription process	A computer simulation model for the analysis of the conformation of nuclear chromatin and the transcription process.
9	a negative control model of hormone receptor interaction	Negative control model of hormone receptor interaction.
9	time hierarchy equilibrium and non equilibrium in metabolic systems	Assumption d' temporal hierarchy equilibrium and no@-@ equilibrium in the metabolic systems.
9	analytic procedures for large dimention nonlinear biochemical oscillators	Analytical procedures for large dimensional, nonlinear biochemical oscillators.
9	genetic distance and gene diversity among linguistically different tribes of mexican indians	Genetic distance and genetic diversity among linguistically different tribes of the Mexican Indians.
9	estimation of race admixture a new method	Estimation of the apos; race admixture a new method.
9	influence of crossbridge compliance on the force velocity relation of muscle	L' influence of cross-bridge compliance on the relationship of force velocity to muscle.
9	electron diffraction study of the hexagonal polymorphic form of some choline containing phosphpolipids	Electron diffraction study of the hexagonal polymorphic form of some choline containing phospholipids.
9	monolayer characteristics of some glycolipids at the air water interface	Monolayer characteristics of selected glycolipids at the air-water interface.
9	modification of optical responses associated with the action potential of lobster giant axons	Modification of optical responses associated with the action of giant axons in lobster.
9	kinetics of macrotetrolide induced ion transport across lipid bilayer membranes	The kinetics of macrotetrolide induce ion transport across lipid bilayer membranes.
9	electromechanical stresses and the effect of ph on membrane structure	Electromechanical stress and the effect of ph on the membrane structure.
9	light scattering from nucleated biological cells	Light diffusion from nucleated biological cells.
9	analysis of fluorescence decay curves by means of the laplace transformation	Analysis of fluorescence decay curves by means of the laplace transformation.
9	the effect of essential fatty acid deficiency upon fatty acid uptake by the brain	Moose; effects of essential fatty acid deficiency on appetite; fatty acid absorption by the brain.
9	diffusion in bile and its implications on detergency	Dissemination in bile and its implications for detergents.
9	influence of glucocorticoids on some morphological and biochemical aspects of rat small intestinal mucosa	Influence of glucocorticoids on certain morphological and biochemical aspects of rat small bowel mucosa.
9	the effect of neomycin and streptomycin on the electrical polarisability of aqueous suspensions of escherichia coli	Effects of neomycin and streptomycin on the electrical polarizability of aqueous suspensions of escherichia coli.
9	kinetics of a ca 2 triggered membrane aggregation reaction of phospholipid membranes	The kinetics of apos; a ca 2 elicits a membrane-bound phospholipid membrane aggregation reaction.
9	relationship between hb and hba2 concentrations in healthy and iron deficient subjects	Relationships between hb and hba2 concentrations in healthy and iron deficient subjects.
9	the acidity and peptic activity of gastric juice in healthy children and in children suffering from cystic fibrosis author s transl	Lactos; acidity and lacidosis; peptic activity of gastric juice in healthy children and children with cystic fibrosis.
9	kidney position and the measurement of relative uptake of 131 i hippuran in renography	Kidney positioning and lapos measurement; relative absorption of 131 i hippuran in renography.
9	energy a useful criterion in analysis of human visual evoked response	Energy is a useful criterion in the analysis of human visual evoked response.
9	sterility control basic mathematical considerations author s transl	Infertility controls the basic mathematical considerations of the author's translation.
9	spectral analysis of the eeg recorded during stimulation of the human fovea	L' spectral analysis of the age was recorded during stimulation of the human fovea.
9	the length of the fibroin gene in the bombyx mori genome	The length of the fibroin gene in the bombyx mori genome.
9	structural genes adjacent to interspersed repetitive dna sequences	Structural genes adjacent to DNA-dispersed d&apos repeats.
9	purification and properties of coffee bean alpha d galactosidase	Purification and properties of coffee bean alpha galactosidase.
9	complexation of reducing and nonreducing carbohydrates with hydroxides of some alkali and alkaline earth metals	Complexation of reducing and nonreducing carbohydrates with hydroxides of certain alkali and alkaline metals-earthy.
9	the result sequence method sequence analysis in leptospira research 3 communication the bilateral sequential test de boer armitage for testing the difference of mean values of two binomial distributions author s transl	L' sequential analysis of the sequential method of results in leptospira research 3 allows to communicate the bilateral sequential boer armitage test to test the difference in the average values of two binomial distributions.
9	some physico chemical properties of aqueous solutions of n alpha acyl l histidine	Some physico properties-chemicals of aqueous solutions of n alpha acyl l histidine.
9	a model of lateral diffusion in phosphatide bilayers and natural membranes	A model of lateral diffusion in phosphatidic bilayers and natural membranes.
9	studies on phosphatidylcholine model membranes i iodine permeability measurement by specific ion electrode	Studies on the measurement of permeability to phosphatidylcholine model membranes by a specific ion electrode.
9	a new method of measuring propagation coefficients and characteristic impedance in blood vessels	A new method for measuring propagation coefficients and characteristic impedance in blood vessels.
9	simulation of action potential propagation in an inhomogeneous sheet of coupled excitable cells	Simulation of d&apos potential propagation; action in an inhomogeneous layer of coupled excitable cells.
9	right ventricular performance in patients with coronary artery disease	Right ventricular performance in patients with coronary artery disease.
9	trend detection in control data optimization and interpretation of trigg s technique for trend analysis	Trend detection in apo; monitoring data optimization and interpretation of the triggers technique for apo; trend analysis.
9	use of carbon dioxide and oxygen tonometered phosphate bicarbonate chloride glycerol water mixtures for calibration and control of ph pco2 and po2 electrode systems	Use of aqueous mixtures of bicarbonate, carbon dioxide and dapos; oxygen, toner with phosphate, to calibrate and control pco2 and po2 electrode systems.
9	pressure drop across artificially induced stenoses in the femoral arteries of dogs	Pressure drop in the artificially induced stenoses in the femoral arteries of dogs.
9	observations on blood viscosity changes after acute myocardial infarction	Observations on blood viscosity changes following acute myocardial infarction.
9	radionuclide angiocardiography improved diagnosis and quantitation of left to right shunts using area ratio techniques in children	Lapses; radionuclide angiocardiography has been successful; improved diagnosis and quantification of left-hand derivations-right-to-right; help with reporting techniques; area in children.
9	molar absorptivities of beta nadh and beta nad at 260 nm	The molar absorptivities of beta-nadh and beta-nad at 260 nm nm, respectively.
9	transient potentials in dendritic systems of arbitrary geometry	Transient potentials in dendritic systems of arbitrary geometry.
9	cumulative radiation effect part iv normalisation of fractionated and continuous therapy area and volume correction factors	Cumulative Effect of Exposure Part iv normalization of the implant; continuous therapy and fractionation area and volume correction factors.
9	expressions of the michaelis menten equation when studying enzyme reactions in a variable volume medium	Expressions of the michaelis menten equation in the apos; study of the enzymatic reactions in a variable volume medium.
9	the effect of systematic error on the accuracy of michaelis constants and maximum velocities estimated by using the integrated michaelis menten equation	L' effect; systematic error on the accuracy of michaelis constants and maximum estimated velocities at the apos; aid of the apos; integrated michaelis menten equation.
9	cine angiographic determination of ventricular volumes with the help of a computer author s transl	Anchor-based angiographic determination of ventricular volumes at the apos; aided by a translatable computer.
9	validation of a dual isotope plasma ratio method for measurement of cholesterol absorption in rats	Validation of d' a double-isotope plasma ratio method for the measurement of cholesterol absorption in rats.
9	time course of the effect of adrenalectomy on transcortin binding characteristics appraisal of different methods of calculation	L' the temporal evolution of apos; the effect of adrenalectomy on apos; the evaluation of trans-cortine binding characteristics according to different calculation methods.
9	optimal statistical design of radioimmunoassays and competitive protein binding assays	Optimal statistical design of radioimmunoassays and competitive protein binding tests.
9	a simple method to evaluate the massive dose vitamin a prophylaxis program in preschool children	A simple method to assess the massive dose of vitamin a prophylactic program in preschool children.
9	blood sugar determination with the reflomat author s transl	Glycemia determination with translation of the author of reflomat.
9	alimentary iodine deficiency in the federal republic of germany author s transl	Food iodine deficiency in the Federal Republic of Germany; translator.
9	the effects of diet lipolysis and limb ischaemia on the distribution of plasma tryptophan in the rat	The effects of dietary lipolysis and limb ischemia on the distribution of plasma tryptophan in the rat.
9	extracellular enzyme system utilized by the fungus sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum for the breakdown of cellulose 2 activities of the five endo 1 4 beta glucanases towards carboxymethylcellulose	Extracellular enzyme system used by the fungus sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum for the breakdown of cellulose apices; cellulose activity 2 of the five endo 14 beta glucanases to carboxymethylcellulose.
9	the semen of fertile men statistical analysis of 1300 men	The sperm of fertile men Statistical analysis of 1300 men.
9	voltage transients in neuronal dendritic trees	Tension transients in neuronal dendritic trees.
9	a note on the variance of the number of loci having a given gene frequency	A note on the variance of the number of loci with a given gene frequency.
9	on nei and roychoudhury s sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	On nei and roychoudhury s sampled variances of leaf, heterozygosity and genetic distance.
9	a new method for measurement of right ventricular residual ratio using 121i maa	A new method for measuring right ventricular residual ratio using 121i maa.
9	sequential change in the different of potential distribution between a normal subject and simulated torso model	Sequential change in the difference in potential distribution between a normal subject and a simulated torso model.
9	methods of mathematical differentiation in tonography	Methods of mathematical differentiation in tonography.
9	model for the growth of a solid in vitro tumor	Model for growth of a solid in vitro tumour.
9	the influence of women s work opportunities on marriage rates	L' influence of l' influence of l' work activity of women on opportunities; employment, work opportunities of women and marriage rates.
9	estimates of fecundability from a truncated distribution of conception times	Estimates of the fecundability from a truncated distribution of design times.
9	a general method of correction for age misreporting in census populations	General method of correction of errors; estimate of age in census populations.
9	constructing increment decrement life tables	Build decrement life tables incrementally.
9	use of a specific probe for ovalbumin messenger rna to quantitate estrogen induced gene transcripts	L' use of a specific probe for o' ovalbumin messenger rna to quantify estrogen-induced gene transcripts.
9	structure function relationship in the binding of snake neurotoxins to the torpedo membrane receptor	Structure function ratio in the binding of snake neurotoxins to the torpedo membrane receptor.
9	application of pulsed gradient fourier transform nuclear magnetic resonance to the study of self diffusion of phospholipid vesicles	Application of pulsed gradient Fourier transform nuclear magnetic resonance to apos; study of apos; auto-diffusion of phospholipid vesicles.
9	optical spectra and electronic structure of flavine mononucleotide in flavodoxin crystals	Optical spectrum and electronic structure of flavin mononucleotide in flavodoxine crystals.
9	spin label studies of tropomyosin	Studies of tropomyosin spin labels.
9	a practical approach to quantitate hepatic excretory function	This is a practical approach to quantifying hepatic excretory function.
9	aspartate aminotransferase from wheat germ purification and kinetic properties	Aspartate aminotransferase from wheat germ purification and kinetic properties.
9	model of regulation of the proliferation rate of bone marrow stem cells	A model for regulating the rate of bone marrow stem cell proliferation.
9	actinomycin d deoxynucleotide complexes as models for the actinomycin d dna complex the use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine the stoichiometry and the geometry of the complexes	L' the use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine the stoichiometry and geometry of the d&apos deoxynucleotide complexes; actinomycin as models of the d&apos complex; l&apos DNA; actinomycin.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at moderate resolution 7a	Direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at moderate resolution 7a.
9	in vitro measurement of margin of safety of neuromuscular transmission	In vitro measurement of margin of safety for neuromuscular transmission.
9	a medico genetic study of the population of western pamir vi local genetic differentiation in the populations of western pamir	A genetic study of the population of pamir de l'apos; west vi local genetic differentiation in the populations of pamir de l'apos; west.
9	viscosity and molecular weight of hyaluronic acids	The viscosity and molecular weight of hyaluronic acids.
9	the allosteric properties of beef liver fructose bisphosphatase	The allosteric properties of beef liver fructose bisphosphatase.
9	kinematics of spontaneous breathing the ventilatory system as a non linear oscillator	The kinematics of spontaneous breathing the ventilatory system as a nonlinear oscillator.
9	the steady state kinetics of the oxygenation of linoleic acid catalysed by soybean lipoxygenase	Cinetics at apos; apos state; equilibrium of apos; oxygenation of apos; linoleic acid catalyzed by soybean lipoxygenase.
9	analysis of the kinetics of the transition of cells to dna synthesis in systems with stimulated proliferation ii theoretical bases of the method	Analysis of the kinetics of the transition of cells to synthesis of DNA in stimulated proliferation systems ii theoretical basis of the method.
9	a two state conformational transition of the extracellular ribonuclease of bacillus amyloliquefaciens barnase induced by sodium dodecyl sulfate	A two-state conformational transition of the extracellular ribonuclease of the amyloliquefaciens barnase bacillus induced by sodium dodecyl sulfate.
9	a computational method for calculating distensibility of the blood vessel in vivo	A method for calculating the distensibility of the blood vessels in vivo.
9	inactivation of biologically active dna by gamma ray induced superoxide radicals and their dismutation products singlet molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide	The inactivation of DNA biologically active by gamma rays induced superoxide radicals and their disproportionation products, the singlet molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide.
9	an nmr investigation of electron transfer in the copper protein plastocyanin	A study of electron transfer in the copper protein plastocyanine.
9	kinetics of the cooperative association of actin to actin filaments	The kinetics of actin and actin; the cooperative association of actin and actin.
9	the response of the ferrous sulphate dosemeter to neutrons	Uh, the response of the ferrous sulfate deposit to neutrons.
9	a possible mechanism of the generation of singlet molecular oxygen in nadph dependent microsomal lipid peroxidation	A possible mechanism of nadpha-dependent microsomal lipid peroxidation is the molecular oxygen molecule.
9	theoretical model of the ionic mechanism of 1 f noise in nerve membrane	A theoretical model of the ionic mechanism of 1 f noise in the nerve membrane.
9	work of large information systems	The work of a large system of information on European Union information systems.
9	simulation studies of self associating systems discrimination between specific and isodesmic associations	Simulation studies of discrimination between specific and isodesmic associations in the associated auto-systems.
9	a theoretical study of gaseous homeostasis in the magill circuit	This is a theoretical study of gas homeostasis in the magillary circuit.
9	kinetic manifestations of slow isomerization of allosteric enzyme for the model of monod wyman and changeux	Kinetic manifestations of slow isomerization of apos; allosteric enzyme for model of wyman and monodic change.
9	model for the positional differentiation of the cap in acetabularia	Model for the positional differentiation of the cap in the acetabular.
9	the measurement of the performance of the display system of radioisotope imaging device the multi element band display	Measurement of the performance of the apo-system; display of apo-system; apo-system; radioisotope imagery; multi-element strip display.
9	structure of the complexes of distamycin type antibiotics and actinomycin d with dna new data on the localization of these antibiotics within the dna narrow groove	Structure of the complexes of the antibiotic distamycin and apos; actinomycin d with new DNA data on the localization of these antibiotics in the narrow pathway of apos; DNA.
9	compartmental model of the adsorption of a dye by proteins the possible role of adsorption in the hepatic excretion of bromosulphophthalein	Compartmental model of apos; adsorption of apos; dye by proteins the possible role of apos; adsorption in apos; hepatic excretion of bromosulfophthalein.
9	numerical determination of intestinal membrane diffusing constants by a gradient method	Numerical determination of intestinal membrane diffusion constants by a gradient method.
9	derivation of the angle of torsion of the eye	The derivation of the angle of the apos; angle of torsion of the apos; eye of the apos; eye of the apos; observer.
9	simple formulas for computation of prism vergence and accommodation stimulation in a brewster stereoscope	Simple formulas for the calculation of prism vergence and visual stimulation; accommodation in a brewery stereoscope.
9	in vivo determination of cerebral blood volume with radioactive oxygen 15 in the monkey	In vivo determination of cerebral blood volume with radioactive oxygen 15 in the monkey.
9	criteria for optimising phylogenetic trees and the problem of determining the root of a tree	Criteria; optimization of phylogenetic trees and problem of determining the roots of trees.
9	improvements and simplifications of the ozonolysis schiff staining method for plasma lipoproteins on cellulose acetate	Improved and simplified ozonolysis schiff staining method for plasma lipoproteins on cellulose acetate.
9	kinetic analysis of carrier mediated ion transport by the charge pulse technique	A kinetic analysis of carrier ion transport was carried out using the charge pulse technique.
9	structural requirements for steroid binding and quenching of albumin fluorescence in bovine plasma albumin	Structural requirements for steroid binding and l' fluorescence quenching of l' albumin in l' bovine plasma albumin.
9	propagation of the action potential in the vicinity of the soma of giant neurons after the hodgkin huxley model	D&apos spread; action in the vicinity of the soma of giant neurons according to the hodgkin huxley model.
9	assembly of three major subclasses of mouse immunoglobulin g a theoretical model for covalent assembly in vivo	Assembly of three under-main classes d' mouse immunoglobulin, a theoretical model for l' covalent assembly in vivo.
9	analogue solution for electrical capacity of membrane covered square cylinders in square array at high concentration	Similar solution for the electrical capacity of high concentration square membrane-covered cylinders in square row.
9	comparison of jumping and electrodiffusion mechanisms of particle movement in thin membranes i statement of the problem stationary transfer	Comparison of jump and gap mechanisms; electrodiffusion of particle motion in thin membranes he statement of the problem stationary transfer problem.
9	utilization of the inactivation rate of coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine properties of the enzyme coa intermediate	Use of Dapos level; inactivation of coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine properties of the intermediate coa enzyme.
9	asymmetric charge distributions in planar bilayer systems	Asymmetric charge distributions in planar bilayer systems have been obtained.
9	study of cycle of cell wall assembly in streptococcus faecalis by three dimensional reconstructions of thin sections of cells	L' study of the cycle of cell wall assembly in streptococcus faecalis by three-dimensional reconstruction of thin sections of cells.
9	system analysis of the multi oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency range and its monitoring value for load effects exemplified by a varying light dark regimen in the intensive rearing of sheep	Systemic analysis of l' multiple oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency ranges and its monitoring value for load effects illustrated by a d&apos regime; variable luminous obscurity in the apos; intensive rearing of sheep.
9	an evaluation of statistical procedures designed to detect outliers resulting from a light degree of contamination in random samples of moderate size	Evaluation of statistical procedures designed to detect outliers resulting from a slight degree of contamination in random samples of medium size.
9	conformational transitions of polypeptides in ternary solvent systems	The conformational transitions of polypeptides in ternary solvent systems.
9	errors in the measurement of total respiratory resistance and reactance by forced oscillations	Errors in the measurement of total respiratory resistance and reactivity due to forced oscillations.
9	recording of ventricular pressure by conventional catheter manometer systems efficiency of several combinations of conventional catheters modern transducers and catheter flush systems author s transl	Ventricular pressure recording by conventional catheter manometers systems Effectiveness of several combinations of conventional catheters Modern transducers and catheter rinsing systems Translators.
9	interaction of aminoacyl trna synthetases and trna positive and negative cooperativity of their active centres	The interaction of aminoacyl trna synthetases and the positive and negative cooperation of their active centers.
9	transfer free energies and average static accessibilities for ribonuclease a in guanidinium hydrochloride and urea solutions	Transfer free energies and mean static ribonuclease a accessibilities to guanidinium hydrochloride and d' urea solutions.
9	the sedimentation equilibrium of heterogeneously associating systems and mixtures of non interacting solutes analysis without determination of molecular weight averages	L' sedimentation equilibrium of heterogeneous association systems and mixtures of l' analysis of solutes without interaction without determination of molecular weight averages.
9	chemical studies on yeast hexokinase specific modification of a single tyrosyl residue with 1 ethyl 3 3 dimethylaminopropyl carbodiimide	Chemical studies on specific modification of apos; yeast hexokinase d' a single tyrosyl residue with 1 ethyl carbodiimide-3 dimethylaminopropyl-3 methyl carbodiimide.
9	flow cytofluorometric analysis of cell cycle distributions using propidium iodide properties of the method and mathematical analysis of the data	Continuous flow cytofluorometric analysis of cell cycle distributions using the properties of the method propidium iodide and l' mathematical analysis of the data.
9	analysis of afferent responses from isolated semicircular canal of the guitarfish using rotational acceleration white noise inputs ii estimation of linear system parameters and gain and phase spectra	Analysis of semi-circular channel afferent responses isolated from fish-guitar to l' help d' white noise inputs d' rotational acceleration ii estimation of linear system parameters and gain and phase spectra.
9	conformational characteristics of luliberin circular dichroism and fluorescence studies	Conformational characteristics of luliberin circular dichroism and fluorescence studies.
9	the epr of low spin heme complexes relation of the t2g hole model to the directional properties of the g tensor and a new method for calculating the ligand field parameters	The relationship of the slow spin heme complexes of the t2g hole model with the directional properties of the g tensor and a new method for calculating the ligand field parameters.
9	reaction of cis and trans isomers of platinum ii diamminedichloride with purine adensine and its derivatives in dilute solutions	Reaction of cis and trans isomers of platinum diamedichloride ii with purine adenosine and its derivatives in dilute solution.
9	mathematical analysis of myelin structure of nerves of the brachial plexus in antenatal and early postnatal ontogenesis of man	Mathematical analysis of myelin structure of brachial plexus nerves in prenatal and early postnatal ontogenesis of men.
9	a simplified approach to the measurement of specific airway resistance	A simplified approach to the measurement of airway specific strength.
9	serological study of several strains of foot and mouth disease virus type o isolated in europe between 1971 and 1975 application of the biomathematical system of classification	Serological study of several strains of Type o FMD isolated in Europe between 1971 and 1975 application of the biomathematic classification system.
9	pressure jump relaxation kinetics of frog skin open circuit voltage and short circuit current	The pressure jump kinetics of relaxation of frog skin tension open circuit and short-current circuit.
9	normal values in clinical electrooculography iii numerical evaluation of two dimensionless eog parameters	Normal values in clinical electrooculography iii numerical evaluation of dimensionless two-dimensional eog parameters.
9	the momentum of population growth with time dependent net maternity function	L' momentum of momentum; population increase with a net maternity function dependent on time.
9	a proposal for revision of the quality factor	A proposal for revision of the quality factor is on the agenda for revision of the quality factor.
9	resolution of electron microscope autoradiography iv application to analysis of autoradiographs	Apos resolution; electron microscopy autoradiography iv application to apos; analysis of autoradiographs.
9	occurrence of an uncoupler resistant intermediate type of phosphate water oxygen exchange reaction catalyzed by heart submitochondrial particles	Event of d' an intermediate reaction d' oxygen exchange; phosphate- and decoupling-resistant water, catalyzed by particles of the type under cardiac mitochondrial.
9	the microfilarial load in the anterior segment of the eye a parameter of intensity of onchocerciasis	The microfilament load in the anterior segment of the eye, a parameter of the intensity of the epos; onchocerciasis.
9	water and electrolyte acquisition across the placenta of the sheep	Acquisition of water and electrolytes across the placenta of sheep.
9	size and density of fibrin fibers from turbidity	Size and density of fibrin fibers from turbidity.
9	on the use of calibration equations in perception research	On the apos; use of calibration equations from the apos; use of dÃ ́apos equations; calibration in researching perception research perception.
9	clinical application of a single compartment model to urea and creatinine kinetics in dialysis therapy	Clinical application of apos; a single compartment model to urea and creatinine kinetics in dialysis treatment.
9	open field behavior in mice generality of results from a diallel analysis of replicate selected lines	Field Behaviour in the Mouse Generality of results from a diallel analysis of replicated selected lines.
9	albumin clearance from alveoli tissue permeation vs airway displacement	L&apos clearance; albumin from alveolar permeation vs airway displacement.
9	kinetics of bilirubin binding to bovine serum albumin and the effects of palmitate	Kinetics of bilirubin binding to l' bovine serum albumin and the effects of palmitate.
9	mechanodynamics at the interventricular sulcus reciprocal effect of the ventricles on the ventricular function	Mechanodynamics at the apo level; reciprocal effect of the interventricular groove of the ventricles on ventricular function.
9	electronic conformational interactions of molecular biological systems i quantum chemical aspect of the theory of electronic conformational interaction	Conformational electronic interactions of molecular biological systems i quantum chemical aspect of the theory of electronic conformational interactions.
9	systems matching by degeneration ii interpretation of the generation and degeneration of retinal ganglion cells in the chicken by a mathematical model	Degeneration systems ii. interpretation of the generation and degeneration of retinal ganglion cells in chicken at apos; aid d' a mathematical model.
9	stereological analysis of reinke s crystals in human leydig cells	Stereological analysis of reindeer crystals in human leucodinated cells.
9	quantitative structure activity relationships vi non linear dependence of biological activity on hydrophobic character calculation procedures for bilinear model	Quantitative relationships between structures and apo; nonlinear apo dependent vi activity; biological activity on hydrophobic characterization procedures for bilinear model.
9	heritability estimates from twin studies i formulae of heritability estimates	Estimations of heritability derived from studies; twin formulae; estimates of heritability.
9	spectroscopic studies of specifically deuterium labeled membrane systems nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the effects of cholesterol in model systems	Spectroscopic studies of membrane systems specifically labelled with deuterium Study of the nuclear magnetic resonance effects of cholesterol in model systems.
9	influence of viscosity of enzymatic reactions studied with glucoamylase of aspergillus niger	The influence of viscosity of enzymatic reactions has been studied with d' aspergillus niger glucoamylase.
9	steady state turnover and body pool of ascorbic acid in man	Spinning; steady state and body pool of ascorbic acid in males.
9	ring current effects in the conformation dependent nmr chemical shifts of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor	The ring current effects in conformationally dependent nmr chemical shifts of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor.
9	an automated study of eeg a method of detection of non stationary points	An automated study of the detection method; eg, a method of detection of non-stationary stationary points of the detection method.
9	structure of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and the complex formed by its interaction with apolipoprotein c iii x ray small angle scattering studies	The structure of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and the complex formed by its interaction with l' apolipoprotein c iii x rays was studied by low-angle scattering.
9	conformation as the determinant of saccharide binding in concanavalin a ca2 concanavalin a complexes	Conformation is the determinant of saccharide binding in concanavalin, concanavalin, and concanavalin a ca2 complexes.
9	peritubular capillary control of proximal tubule reabsorption in the rat	The peritubular capillary control of proximal tubular reabsorption in the rat.
9	instantaneous pressure volume relationship of right atrium during isovolumic contraction in canine heart	Instant relationship between right atrial pressure volume and isovolumic contraction in dog heart.
9	light propagation in twisted anisotropic media application to photoreceptors	Light propagation in twisted anisotropic medium applied to photoreceptors.
9	heat stress upon undressed man due to different combinations of elevated environmental temperature air humidity and metabolic heat production a critical comparison of heat stress indices	Thermal stress on the apos; undressed man due to different combinations of high environmental temperature humidity of the apos; air and metabolic heat production a critical comparison of thermal stress indices.
9	possibility of the spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems the determination of the mycelium concentration of actinomyces aureofaciens a producer of tetracycline cultured on a medium with corn meal	Possibility of l' spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems the determination of the concentration of mycelium d' actinomyces aureofaciens a tetracycline producer grown on a medium with corn flour.
9	method for computing motion in a two dimensional cochlear model	A method for calculating motion in a two-dimensional model.
9	the orientations of reaction center transition moments in the chromatophore membrane of rhodopseudomonas sphareroides bases on new linear dichroism and photoselection measurements	The orientations of reaction center transition moments in the chromatophore membrane of rhodopseudomonas sphareroides are based upon new linear dichroism and photoselection measurements.
9	synthesis and degradation of xanthine dehydrogenase in chick liver in vivo and in vitro studies	Synthesis and degradation of xanthine dehydrogenase in chick liver in vivo and in vitro.
9	dna replication in hela cells after gamma irradiation ii the periodicity of dna replication in the process of giant cell formation	The replication of DNA in the helical cells after gamma irradiation ii the periodicity of replication of DNA in the process of formation of giant cells.
9	theory of binaural interaction based on auditory nerve data iii joint dependence on interaural time and amplitude differences in discrimination and detection	L&apos theory; binural interaction based on auditory nerve data iii joint dependence on apos; consideration of interaural time and differences in apos; magnitude of discrimination and detection.
9	a method for the determination of amitriptyline and its metabolites nortriptyline 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxynortriptyline in human plasma using stable isotope dilution and gas chromatography chemical ionization mass spectrometry gc cims	A method for the determination of l' amitriptyline and its metabolites nortriptyline 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxynortriptyline in human plasma at l' using stable isotope dilution and gas chromatography chemical ionization mass spectrometry gc cims.
9	analysis of the adolescent growth spurt using smoothing spline functions	Analysis of the growth spurt of the adolescent at l' helps splines of smoothing.
9	curve of labeled mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics v effect of the circadian rhythm of cell proliferation on the shape of the labeled mitosis curve	Curve of marked mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics v effect of the circadian rhythm of cell proliferation on the shape of the labelled mitosis curve.
9	evolutionary potential a mathematical hypothesis of mouse hemoglobin beta chain evolution	Evolutionary potential mathematical hypothesis of apos; beta chain evolution of apos; mouse hemoglobin.
9	kinetics of tryptophan transport into the brain	The kinetics of tryptophan transport in the brain.
9	role of surface distribution of hydrophobic groups in the assembly of protein quaternary structure	Role of surface distribution of hydrophobic groups in the assembly of quaternary protein structure.
9	spike transmission in statistical neuronal ensembles induced epileptic focus in a model of hippocampal field ca3	Transmission of d' peak in statistical neural sets induced epileptic focusing in a model of a c3 hippocampal field.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent proflavine	Resistance and cross-resistance of the mutants d' escherichia coli to apos; radiomimetic agent proflavine.
10	tryptophan and indole excreting prototrophic mutant of escherichia coli	Both tryptophan and indole excrete the prototrophic mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	cross resistance relationships in escherichia coli between ultraviolet radiation and nitrous acid	Cross-resistance relationships in Escherichia coli between ultraviolet radiation and nitrous acid.
10	thymineless mutation site on escherichia coli chromosome	Thymine-free mutation site on Escherichia coli d&apos chromosome.
10	mutational synergism between radiations and methylated purines in escherichia coli	Mutational synergism between radiation and methylated purines in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and properties of a putrescine degrading mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and properties of a putrescine degrading mutant Escherichia coli.
10	effect of drug resistance factor r on the f properties of escherichia coli	Effect of resistance factor r on fetus; escherichia coli properties.
10	gene transfer by f strains of escherichia coli iv effect of a chromosomal deletion on chromosome transfer	Gene transfer by fetus strains; escherichia coli iv effect of apos; a chromosomal deletion on chromosome transfer.
10	new type of streptomycin resistance resulting from action of the episomelike mutator factor in escherichia coli	A new type of streptomycin resistance resulting from the action of episomal mutator factor in escherichia coli.
10	proline metabolism in escherichia coli ii regulation of total growth of a proline auxotroph by a proline oxidizing system	Proline metabolism in escherichia coli ii regulation of total growth of a proline auxotroph by a proline-oxidizing system.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent nitrofurazone	Resistance and cross-resistance of the mutants d' escherichia coli to apos; radiomimetic agent nitrofurazone.
10	fructose 1 6 diphosphatase and acid hexose phosphatase of escherichia coli	Fructose 16 diphosphatase and acid hexose phosphatase d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	kinetic and genetic analyses of d cycloserine inhibition and resistance in escherichia coli	Kinetic and genetic analysis of d cycloserine inhibition and resistance in escherichia coli.
10	metabolism of glutamic acid in a mutant of escherichia coli	Apos metabolism; glutamic acid in a mutant of apos; escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage common to pasteurella pestis and escherichia coli	The bacteriophage common to pasteurella pestis and escherichia coli.
10	suppression of a lac o o mutation in escherichia coli	Deletion of a lac o o o o o mutation in Escherichia coli.
10	gene recombination and segregation of resistance factor r in escherichia coli	Genetic recombination and segregation of resistance factor r in escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage induced functions in escherichia coli k lambda infected with rii mutants of bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage-induced functions in escherichia coli k lambda infected with rii mutants of bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	chromosomal location of thymine and arginine genes in escherichia coli and an f incorporating them	Chromosomal localization of thymine and l' arginine genes in escherichia coli and an incorporator f.
10	analysis of a gene controlling cell division and sensitivity to radiation in escherichia coli	Dapos analysis; a gene controlling cell division and radiation sensitivity in escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal aberrations associated with mutations to bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli	Chromosome aberrations associated with mutations in bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli.
10	isolation of mutants affecting tryptophanase production in escherichia coli	Isolate mutants affecting tryptophanase production in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of tryptophanase mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of tryptophanase mutants of escherichia coli.
10	autoradiographic studies of bacterial chromosome replication in amino acid deficient escherichia coli 15t	Autoradiographic studies of bacterial chromosome replication in amino acid deficient escherichia coli 15t.
10	nature of the effector of catabolite repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Nature of bacterium; effector of catabolite repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli.
10	effect of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyladenine on polymer synthesis in a polyauxotrophic strain of escherichia coli	The effect of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyladenine on polymer synthesis in a polyauxotrophic d' escherichia coli strain.
10	genetics of host controlled restriction and modification of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	The genetics of host-controlled restriction and the modification of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli are controlled by the host.
10	loss and repair of conjugal fertility and infectivity of the resistance factor and sex factor in escherichia coli	Loss and repair of conjugal fertility and sex; infectivity of resistance factor and sex in escherichia coli.
10	properties and regulation of the beta d galactosidase in shigella dysenteriae and in escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae hybrids	The properties and regulation of beta dgalactosidase in shigella dysenteriae and escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae hybrids.
10	intracellular forms of lambda deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli infected with clear or virulent mutants of bacteriophage lambda	Intracellular forms of etapos; lambda deoxyribonucleic acid in Escherichia coli infected with clear or virulent mutants of lambda bacteriophage.
10	distribution and function of genes concerned with aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Distribution and function of genes for aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	biosynthesis of riboflavine by a purine requiring mutant strain of escherichia coli	Riboflavin biosynthesis by purine requiring mutant strain of apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic instability in escherichia coli	L' genetic instability in Escherichia coli.
10	the biosynthesis of alkaline phosphatase with a particulate fraction of escherichia coli	The biosynthesis of alkaline phosphatase with a particulate fraction of escherichia coli.
10	the synthesis of ribosomes by a mutant of escherichia coli	The synthesis of ribosomes by a mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli variably resistant to bacteriophage t1	Dapos; escherichia coli mutants are variably resistant to bacteriophage t1.
10	gene controlling the uptake of shikimic acid by escherichia coli	Gene controlling apo; absorption of shikimic acid by escherichia coli.
10	location of the maltose a and b loci on the genetic map of escherichia coli	Location of maltosis a and b loci on the genetic map of Escherichia coli.
10	evidence for two mechanisms of photoreactivation in escherichia coli b	Two mechanisms of photoreactivation were demonstrated in escherichia coli b.
10	conditional mutations involving septum formation in escherichia coli	Conditional mutations involving septum formation in escherichia coli.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the isoenzymes concerned in the first reaction of aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Genetic and biochemical analysis of the isoenzymes involved in the first reaction of aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	sensitivity of escherichia coli to atabrine conferred by r factor and its potential clinical significance	Sensitivity of Escherichia coli to apos; atabrin conferred by r factor and its potential clinical importance.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli i active transport and utilization of beta glucosides	Inducible system for l' use of beta-glucosides in the active transport of d' escherichia coli i and use of beta-glucosides.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli ii description of mutant types and genetic analysis	Inducible system for apos; use of beta glucosides in escherichia coli ii description of mutant types and genetic analysis.
10	inversion of transfer modes and sex factor chromosome interactions in conjugation in escherichia coli	Reversal of sex factor transfer patterns and chromosomal interactions in conjugation in escherichia coli.
10	induction of capsular polysaccharide synthesis by rho fluorophenylalanine in escherichia coli wild type and strains with altered phenylalanyl soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase	Induction of capsular polysaccharide synthesis by rho fluorophenylalanine in wild escherichia coli and strains with impaired phenylalanyl-soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	suppression of radiation sensitivity and capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 by ochre suppressors	Removal of radiation sensitivity and capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 by ochre suppressants.
10	selection of sucrose dependent escherichia coli to obtain envelope mutants and fragile cultures	Selection of sucrose-dependent escherichia coli to obtain d&apos mutants; envelope and fragile cultures.
10	mutagenesis in escherichia coli by visible light	Mutagenesis in escherichia coli by visible light.
10	chromosomal location of the structural gene for glycerol kinase in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of the structural gene for glycerol kinase in escherichia coli.
10	unusual growth characteristics of a methionine cyano b12 auxotroph of escherichia coli	Unusual growth characteristics of a cyano b12 methionine auxotroph; Escherichia coli.
10	azure mutants a type of host dependent mutant of the bacteriophage f2	Azur mutants, a type of f2-mediated mutant of the bacteriophage host.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli strain specificity	Thymine-free death in specificity of dapos; escherichia coli strains.
10	genetic analysis of mutant strains of escherichia coli requiring p aminobenzoic acid for growth	Genetic analysis of mutant strains of escherichia coli which require apo; paminobenzoic acid for growth.
10	metabolism of thymineless mutants of escherichia coli i absence of thymidylate synthetase activity and growth characteristics of two sequential thymineless mutants	Metabolism of thymine-free mutants; escherichia coli i absence of apos; thymidylate synthetase activity and growth characteristics of two sequential thymine-free mutants.
10	genetic mapping of mutations affecting phosphoglucose isomerase and fructose diphosphatase in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of mutations affecting phosphoglucose isomerase and fructose diphosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene of escherichia coli b	The mutant gene of escherichia coli b.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli	These are the giant cells of Escherichia coli.
10	ubiquinone deficiency in an auxotroph of escherichia coli requiring 4 hydroxybenzoic acid	A desotroph of escherichia coli requiring 4 hydroxybenzoic acids.
10	cell wall composition and virulence in escherichia coli	Cell wall composition and virulence in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of glutamate transport and glutamate decarboxylase in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the transport of glutamate and glutamate decarboxylase in escherichia coli.
10	effects of streptomycin deprivation on enzyme synthesis in streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Effects of streptomycin deficiency on enzyme synthesis in streptomycin-dependent escherichia coli.
10	acridine binding by escherichia coli ph dependency and strain differences	Acridine binding by escherichia coli ph dependence and strain differences.
10	properties of mitomycin c sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The properties of mitomycin-sensitive mutants c d' escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	temperature sensitive chloramphenicol acetyltransferase from escherichia coli carrying mutant r factors	Chloramphenicol acetyltransferase temperature sensitive d' escherichia coli carries the mutant factors.
10	dominance studies with stable merodiploids in the d serine deaminase system of escherichia coli k 12	Dominance studies with stable merodiploids in the esterase d serine deaminase system; escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic basis of colicin e susceptibility in escherichia coli i isolation and properties of refractory mutants and the preliminary mapping of their mutations	Genetic basis of susceptibility to colicine in apos; isolation of escherichia coli and properties of refractory mutants and preliminary mapping of their mutations.
10	streptomycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli altered ribosomal protein	Streptomycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli altered ribosomal protein.
10	the control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli by o acetyl l serine	The control of sulfate reduction in escherichia coli by acetyl serine.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in ribonucleoside and deoxyribonucleoside catabolism	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli defective in ribonucleoside and deoxyribonucleoside catabolism.
10	selection of a mutant of escherichia coli which has high mutation rates	Selection of a mutant of escherichia coli with a high mutation rate.
10	genetic determination of resistance to acriflavine phenethyl alcohol and sodium dodecyl sulfate in escherichia coli	Genetic determination of resistance to apos; acriflavin, apos; phenethyl alcohol and sodium dodecyl sulfate in escherichia coli.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light i effect of rec mutations on liquid holding recovery	Recovery processes at baseline; darkness in escherichia coli irradiated by ultraviolet light i effects of mutations on retention fluid recovery.
10	analysis of melibiose mutants deficient in alpha galactosidase and thiomethylgalactoside permease ii in escherichia coli k 12	L' analysis of mutants deficient in alpha galactosidase and thiomethylgalactoside permease ii in escherichia coli k 12 was performed.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the biotin loci of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic and biochemical analysis of the loci of biotin d' escherichia coli k12.
10	factors influencing the survival and revival of heat treated escherichia coli	Factors influencing survival and reappearance of heat treated escherichia coli.
10	lysis inhibition in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	Lysis inhibition in Escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4.
10	transcription and intragenic recombination in polar mutants of escherichia coli	Transcription and intragenic recombination in polar mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of loci for glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of loci of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase in escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with an altered tryptophanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	Mutants of d' escherichia coli with a modified tryptophanyl transfer ribonucleic synthetase.
10	localization and regulation of synthesis of nitrate reductase in escherichia coli	Localization and regulation of synthesis of nitrate reductase in escherichia coli.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli isolation characterization and mapping oc cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of sulfate reduction in characterization of apos; isolation of escherichia coli and mapping cysteine-free mutants of e coli k12 mutants.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli the nature of the pleiotropic cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of sulfate reduction in escherichia coli the nature of the protein-free pleiotropic mutants of e coli k12 mutants.
10	genetic location of certain mutations conferring recombination deficiency in escherichia coli	Genetic localization of certain mutations conferring a recombination deficiency in escherichia coli.
10	synthesis of an s adenosylmethionine cleaving enzyme in t3 infected escherichia coli and its disturbance by co infection with enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage	Apos synthesis; an adenosylmethionine cleaving enzyme in t3 infected escherichia coli and co-disturbance-infection with an enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage.
10	acridine sensitivity of bacteriophage t2h in escherichia coli	Acridine sensitivity of bacteriophage t2h in Escherichia coli.
10	identification of closely linked loci controlling ultraviolet sensitivity and refractivity to colicin e2 in escherichia coli	Identification of a closely linked loci controlling ultraviolet sensitivity and refractivity to colicin e2 in escherichia coli.
10	phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli infected with t4 bacteriophages	Phospholipid synthesis in Escherichia coli infected with bacteriophages t4.
10	escherichia coli strains that excrete an inhibitor of colicin b	Escherichia coli strains that excrete an inhibitor of colicin b.
10	genetic analysis of the maltose a region in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the maltose a region in escherichia coli.
10	correlation between the rate of ribonucleic acid synthesis and the level of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid in mutants of escherichia coli	Correlation between the rate of synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and the rate of ribonucleic acid transfer in d' escherichia coli.
10	chromosome transfer from f lac strains of escherichia coli k 12 mutant at reca recb or recc	Chromosome transfer from f lac strains of reca or recc mutant k12 d' escherichia coli.
10	carbohydrate accumulation and metabolism in escherichia coli the close linkage and chromosomal location of ctr mutations	The accumulation of carbohydrates and metabolism in escherichia coli the close linkage and chromosomal localization of ctr mutations.
10	effects of oleate starvation in a fatty acid auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	Deprivation effects; oleate in a potato auxotroph; fatty acids; escherichia coli k 12 auxotroph.
10	nonrandom mutagenesis of the escherichia coli genome by nitrosoguanidine	Nonrandom mutagenesis of the Escherichia coli genome by nitrosoguanidine.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 unable to form ubiquinone	Mutant strains of escherichia coli were unable to form apos; ubiquinone.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism of escherichia coli xv biochemical properties of mutants resistant to thiaisoleucine	Isoleucine and valine metabolism of escherichia coli xv biochemical properties of thiaisoleucine-resistant mutants.
10	site and gene specific limited heterocatalytic expression in bacteriophage t4 infected escherichia coli	L' heterocatalytic expression in bacteriophage t4 infected with escherichia coli was site- and gene-specific.
10	phenotypic suppression in escherichia coli by chloramphenicol and other reversible inhibitors of the ribosome	The phenotypic suppression in Escherichia coli by chloramphenicol and d' other reversible inhibitors of the ribosome.
10	ferrous activated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide linked dehydrogenase from a mutant of escherichia coli capable of growth on 1 2 propanediol	Nicotinamide, an activated ferrous adenine dinucleotide linked dehydrogenase, is a mutant of d' escherichia coli capable of growth on 12 propanediol.
10	catabolite repression in escherichia coli a study of two hypotheses	Catabolic repression in escherichia coli is a study of two hypotheses.
10	anthranilate synthetase an enzyme specified by the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli comparative studies on the complex and the subunits	L' anthranilate synthetase is an enzyme specified by l' operon tryptophane d' escherichia coli in comparative studies on the complex and under-units.
10	nonsense suppression in a multiauxotrophic derivative of escherichia coli 15t identification and consequences of an amber triplet in the deoxyribomutase gene	Absurd deletion in a multiauxotrophic derivative of apos; identification of 15t escherichia coli and consequences of apos; an amber triplet in the deoxyribomutase gene.
10	loss of host controlled restriction of lambda bacteriophage in escherichia coli following methionine deprivation	Loss of controlled restriction of l' host of lambda bacteriophage in Escherichia coli following methionine starvation.
10	effect of infection with ribonucleic acid bacteriophage r23 on the inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; infection by bacteriophage r23 ribonucleic acid on the inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k bacteriophages i isolation and introductory characterization of five escherichia coli k bacteriophages	Bacteriophage isolation; escherichia coli k and preliminary characterization of five bacteriophages k d d' escherichia coli k.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid replication in lambda bacteriophage mutants	Replication of deoxyribonucleic acid in lambda bacteriophage mutants.
10	replication of t4rii bacteriophage in escherichia coli k 12 lambda	The replication of bacteriophage t4rii in Escherichia coli k 12 lambda.
10	coresistance to neomycin and kanamycin by mutations in an escherichia coli locus that affects ribosomes	Co-resistance to neomycin and kanamycin by mutation in a locus d' escherichia coli that affects ribosomes.
10	regulation of glyoxylate metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	Regulation of glyoxylate metabolism in escherichia coli k 12.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli relationship between chromium sensitivity and high iron requirement in mutants of escherichia coli	Iron transport in escherichia coli relationship between chromium sensitivity and high iron needs in mutants of escherichia coli.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli roles of energy dependent uptake and 2 3 dihydroxybenzoylserine	Iron transport in escherichia coli roles of l' absorption dependent on l' energy and 2 3 dihydroxybenzoylserine.
10	arabinose leucine deletion mutants of escherichia coli b r	Leucine arabinose deletion mutants of l' escherichia coli b r.
10	antipolarity in the ilv operon of escherichia coli k 12	Anti-polarization in the respiratory tract; escherichia coli c.
10	mutation in escherichia coli k 12 mediating spherelike envelopes and changes tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and some antibiotics	The mutation in escherichia coli k 12 mediates spherical envelopes and alters tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and certain antibiotics.
10	induction by mercuric ion of extensive degradation of cellular ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Induction by apos; mercuric ion of apos; significant degradation of cellular ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	corepressor system for catabolite repression of the lac operon in escherichia coli	Corepression system for catabolite repression of the lac operon in escherichia coli.
10	some properties of excision defective recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Some properties of mutants d' escherichia coli k 12 recombination-deficient and excision-deficient.
10	regulator gene controlling enzymes concerned in tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Regulatory gene controlling enzymes involved in tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of mutants unable to reduce nitrate	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k 12, isolation and characterization of mutants unable to reduce nitrate.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with anomalous cell division and ability to decrease episomally and chromosomally mediated resistance to ampicillin and several other antibiotics	Escherichia coli mutant with abnormal cell division and ability to decrease resistance to ampicillin and several other episomal and chromosomal antibiotics.
10	escherichia coli mutant with elevated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced oxidase activity	A mutant d' Escherichia coli with high nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced oxidase activity.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli p1 transduction	Characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs from transduction p1 d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate and map polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	characterization of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	Characterization of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of Escherichia coli.
10	ribonucleic acid synthesis and glutamate excretion in escherichia coli	Ribonucleic acid and glutamate excretion in escherichia coli.
10	infectious drug resistance among clinically isolated escherichia coli	Infectious drug resistance among clinically isolated escherichia coli.
10	interaction of the exr and lon genes in escherichia coli	Interaction of the exr and lon genes in escherichia coli.
10	paradoxical effect of weak inducers on the lac operon of escherichia coli	The paradoxical effect of weak inducers on the cell; lactic acid operon; escherichia coli.
10	erythromycin resistant mutant of escherichia coli with altered ribosomal protein component	Apos mutant; erythromycin resistant escherichia coli with altered ribosomal protein component.
10	an analysis of the ribosomal ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli by hybridization techniques	An analysis of the ribosomal ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli using DNA hybridization techniques.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light ii effect of uvr genes on liquid holding recovery	Recovery processes at apo; darkness in escherichia coli irradiated by ultraviolet light ii effect of genes uvr on retained liquid recovery.
10	kasugamycin resistance 30s ribosomal mutation with an unusual location on the escherichia coli chromosome	Ribosomal mutation 30s of kasugamycin resistance with an unusual kasugamycin location on the d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	specificity and efficiency of thymidine incorporation in escherichia coli lacking thymidine phosphorylase	Specificity and effectiveness of thymidine incorporation in escherichia coli lacking thymidine phosphorylase.
10	regulation of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonic 7 phosphate acid synthetase activity in relation to the synthesis of the aromatic vitamins in escherichia coli k 12	Control of l' deoxy arabino heptulosonic 7 phosphate acid synthetase activity in relation to aromatic vitamin synthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	escherichia coli ras locus its involvement in radiation repair	Escherichia coli ras locus its involvement in radiation repair.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 participation of specific formate dehydrogenase and cytochrome b1 components in nitrate reduction	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k 12 participation of specific formate dehydrogenase and cytochrome b1 components in nitrate reduction.
10	leakiness of pleiotropic maltose negative bacteriophage lambda resistant mutants of escherichi coli k 12	Fluidity of pleiotropic maltose negative bacteriophage lambda resistance mutants of escherichi coli k 12.
10	unlinking of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication in a temperature sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis mutant of escherichia coli	Decoupling of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication in a temperature-sensitive mutant of l&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid of escherichia coli.
10	polarity in gene arab of the l arabinose operon in escherichia coli b r	Polarity in the arab gene of arabinose operon in escherichia coli b r.
10	catabolite repression gene of escherichia coli	Catabolic repression gene of apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12 carrying rec mutations cotransducible with thya	Genetic analysis of recombination-deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12 carrying cysteine-repeatable mutations.
10	presence of nuclear bodies in some minicells of escherichia coli	The presence of nuclear bodies in some minicells; escherichia coli.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli tryptophan operon by early reactions in the aromatic pathway	The regulation of the tryptophan operon Escherichia coli by early reactions in the aromatic pathway.
10	mechanism of 3 methylanthranilic acid derepression of the tryptophan operon in escherichia coli	Mechanisms of derepression of the epos; operon tryptophan by the apos; methylanthranilic acid 3 in escherichia coli.
10	resistance of escherichia coli to penicillins vi purification and characterization of the chromosomally mediated penicillinase present in ampa containing strains	D&apos resistance; escherichia coli purification by vi penicillins and characterization of the chromosomally mediated penicillinase present in ampa strains containing strains.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli permitting replication of two f factors	A d&apos mutant; escherichia coli, which allows the replication of two f factors.
10	origin and direction of dna synthesis in e coli b r	Origin and direction of biosynthesis; DNA in e coli b r.
10	phi x 174 bacteriophage structural mutants which affect deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Phi x 174 bacteriophage structural mutants affecting l&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	induction of helical arrays of ribosomes by vinblastine sulfate in escherichia coli	Induction of apos; helical arrangements of ribosomes by vinblastine sulfate in escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerant mutants of escherichia coli resistance of membranes to colicin e1	Colicine-tolerant mutants of the resistance of membranes to colicine e1 d' escherichia coli.
10	energy coupling in the lactose transport system of escherichia coli	D&apos coupling; energy in the lactose transport system d' escherichia coli.
10	structure and function of e coli ribosomes 8 cold sensitive mutants defective in ribosome assembly	Ribosome structure and function of the apos; e coli 8 cold-sensitive mutants incapable of assembling the ribosomes.
10	sensitization of anoxic recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 to x rays by triacetoneamine n oxyl	Sensitization of n-oxyl n-oxyl n-oxylated triacetoneamine anoxic recombination deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli k12.
10	studies with bacteriophage phi ii events following infection of male and female derivatives of escherichia coli k 12	Studies with phi bacteriophage following infection of male and female derivatives of escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli chromosomal position of linkage group i	Characterization of pyridoxin auxotrophs d'apos; escherichia coli in the chromosomal position of linkage group i.
10	effect of r factors and other plasmids on ultraviolet susceptibility and host cell reactivation property of escherichia coli	Effect of r and dapos factors; other plasmids on susceptibility to apos; ultraviolet and host cell reactivation properties; escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli	Mutant gene studies in Escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to nalidixic acid genetic mapping and dominance studies	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to nalidixic acid genetic mapping and dominance studies.
10	expression of the arginine regulon of escherichia coli w evidence for a second regulatory gene	The expression of the dapos regulon; arginine d'apos; escherichia coli revealed the presence of a second regulatory gene.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive streptomycin protein	A d' escherichia coli mutant with a temperature sensitive streptomycin protein.
10	segregation into and replication of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in chromosomeless segregants of escherichia coli	Segregation and replication of deoxyribonucleic plasmidic acid in segregants without d' escherichia coli chromosomes.
10	biosynthesis of 4 aminobenzoate in escherichia coli	Biosynthesis of 4 aminobenzoate in escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and cell division in a lon mutant of escherichia coli	Lapos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid and cell division in a davons mutant; escherichia coli.
10	identification of the puri locus in escherichia coli k 12	Identification of the puri locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	3 phosphoserine transaminase mutants of escherichia coli b	Three phosphoserine transaminase mutants d' escherichia coli b.
10	dominance of ultraviolet radiation resistance in partial diploids of escherichia coli k 12	The dominance of ultraviolet resistance in partial diploids of escherichia coli k 12 is dominance.
10	second pyridine nucleotide independent 1 alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Second pyridine nucleotide independent of 1 alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in the apos; escherichia coli k12.
10	effect of the ribonucleic acid control locus in escherichia coli on t4 bacteriophage specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	The effect of the locus of control of l' ribonucleic acid in Escherichia coli on the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid specific for bacteriophage t4.
10	fitness of an escherichia coli mutator gene	Adaptation of escherichia coli mutator gene.
10	biochemical and genetic studies of recombination proficiency in escherichia coli ii rec revertants caused by indirect suppression of rec mutations	Biochemical and genetic studies of recombination ability of reactive esterichia coli ii caused by indirect suppression of recurrent mutations.
10	an endonuclease activity from escherichia coli absent from certain rec strains	Lapos; endonuclease activity of escherichia coli is absent from some rec strains.
10	mapping of the nadb locus adjacent to a previously undescribed purine locus in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping the nadb locus adjacent to a previously undescribed purine locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light 3 effect of rec mutations on recovery of excision deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Recovery processes at apo; darkness in escherichia coli irradiated by ultraviolet light 3 effect of mutations on the recovery of excision-deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12 effect of ultraviolet light.
10	loss of colicinogeny in escherichia coli strains infected by certain resistance factors	Loss of Colicinogenesis in Escherichia coli strains infected by certain resistance factors.
10	selection of arab and arac mutants of escherichia coli b r by resistance to ribitol	Selected mutants of arab and arac d' escherichia coli b r by resistance to ribitol.
10	genetic analysis of a large cell radiation resistant strain of escherichia coli	DNA analysis of a large cell radiation resistant Escherichia coli strain.
10	induction of the lactose transport system in a lipid synthesis defective mutant of escherichia coli	Induction of the lactose transport system in a lipid-synthetic deficient d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	transketolase mutants of escherichia coli	Transmetolase d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	nonsense mutations in the maltose a region of the genetic map of escherichia coli	Absurd mutations in maltosis, a region of the genetic map of Apos; Escherichia coli.
10	sulfur deficient transfer ribonucleic acid in a cysteine requiring relaxed mutant of escherichia coli	D&apos transfer; sulfur-deficient ribonucleic acid in a cysteine requiring a mutant relaxed from d' escherichia coli.
10	decay of normal and 5 fluorouracil substituted messenger ribonucleic acid of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	The decomposition of the normal messenger ribonucleic acid (MCRA) and the 5-fluorouracil-substituted ribonucleic acid (RCA) alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	suppression of adsorption properties of a z mutant of bacteriophage t4 by r mutations	Removal of d&apos properties; adsorption of a z mutant of bacteriophage t4 by r mutation.
10	functional interdependence of ribosomal components of escherichia coli	Functional interdependency of ribosomal components of d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and partial characterization of escherichia coli mutants with altered glycyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases	Isolation and partial characterization of d' escherichia coli mutants with altered glycol transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases.
10	resistance transfer to the resident intestinal escherichia coli of rats	Transmission of resistance to the intestinal escherichia coli of rats.
10	induction of filament formation and thymineless death in escherichia coli k 12	Induction of thymine-free filament formation and death in escherichia coli k 12.
10	conversion of t4 gene 46 mutant deoxyribonucleic acid into nonviable bacteriophage particles	Conversion of t46 gene, a l&apos mutant; deoxyribonucleic acid, into nonviable bacteriophage particles.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 location of genes affecting the metabolism of 3 octaprenyl 4 hydroxybenzoic acid and 2 octaprenylphenol	Biosynthesis of apos; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12 localization of genes affecting the metabolism of apos; 3 octaprenyl acid-4 hydroxybenzoic acid and 2 octaprenylphenol.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli inactivation and recovery	Thymine-free death in Escherichia coli inactivation and recovery.
10	reversion instability in the galactose operon of escherichia coli	Reversion instability in the galactose operon; escherichia coli.
10	effect of glycine on thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	The effect of glycine on thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	glycolate uptake by mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12	Absorption of glycolate by mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 is mediated by mutant strains.
10	isolation of conditionally putrescine deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate putrescine-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli under conditions.
10	inhibition of de novo purine biosynthesis and interconversion by 6 methylpurine in escherichia coli	De novo inhibition of purine biosynthesis and interconversion by 6 methylpurine in escherichia coli.
10	depression of guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase by mutations in two different regulator genes involved in capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	Decrease of guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase by mutations in two different regulatory genes involved in capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	the action of streptomycin in a mutant of escherichia coli with increased sensitivity to the antibiotic	L' action of streptomycin in a mutant of escherichia coli with increased susceptibility to antibiotics.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with an altered glutamyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 with modified glutamyltransfer of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	streptomycin suppressible lethal mutations in escherichia coli	Streptomycin suppressible lethal mutation in escherichia coli.
10	relation between deoxyribonucleic acid and intracytoplasmic membranes in escherichia coli o111a	Relationship between deoxyribonucleic acid and intracytoplasmic membranes in escherichia coli o111a.
10	genetic mapping and dominance of the amber suppressor su1 supd in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mapping and dominance of the suppressor in escherichia coli.
10	repair of radiation induced damage in escherichia coli ii effect of rec and uvr mutations on radiosensitivity and repair of x ray induced single strand breaks in deoxyribonucleic acid	Repair of radiation-induced damage in escherichia coli ii, the effect of rec and work mutations on the radiosensitivity and repair of X-ray induced single strand breaks in deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	genetic exchange between escherichia coli strains in the mouse intestine	Genetic exchange between d'apos strains; escherichia coli in the mouse intestine.
10	n 5 phosphoribosyl anthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase of tryptophan biosynthesis relationship between the two activities of the enzyme from escherichia coli	N 5 phosphoribosyl anthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase of the tryptophan biosynthetic relationship between the two activities of l' l&apos enzyme; escherichia coli.
10	genetic recombination in escherichia coli the role of exonuclease i	Genetic recombination in escherichia coli the role of exonuclease i.
10	an examination of the inhibitory effects of n iodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and isolation of resistant mutants	Examination of the inhibitory effects of niodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and isolation of resistant mutants.
10	synchronous reinitiation of chromosome replication in e coli b r after nalidixic acid treatment	Synchronous reactivation of chromosomal replication in e coli b r after nalidixic acid treatment.
10	isolation and genetic analysis of a strain of escherichia coli k 12 with an amber reca mutation	Isolation and genetic analysis of a strain of Escherichia coli k 12 with a confirmed amber mutation.
10	ultraviolet and x ray induced responses of a deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Ultraviolet radiation and X-rays induce the responses of a deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase deficient escherichia coli mutant.
10	d fucose as a gratuitous inducer of the l arabinose operon in strains of escherichia coli b r mutant in gene arac	Fucose as a free inducer of the arabinose operon in mutant strains of apos; escherichia coli b r of the arac gene.
10	mutants of escherichia coli lacking endonuclease i ribonuclease i or ribonuclease ii	Dapos; escherichia coli mutants lack endonuclease i ribonuclease i or ribonuclease ii.
10	regulation of tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of operator mutants	The regulation of tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12; isolation and characterization of mutant operators.
10	chromosomal integration of f factors in recombination deficient hfr strains of escherichia coli	Chromosome integration of f factors in recombinant deficient hfr strains of escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerance induced by ampicillin or mutation to ampicillin resistance in a strain of escherichia coli k 12	Colicin tolerance induced by ampicillin or a mutation of resistance to apos; ampicillin in an apos strain; escherichia coli k.
10	involvement of recombination genes in growth and viability of escherichia coli k 12	Implications of recombinant genes in growth and viability of fish and other aquatic organisms.
10	biosynthesis of the iron transport compound enterochelin mutants of escherichia coli unable to synthesize 2 3 dihydroxybenzoate	Biosynthesis of the iron-transport compound enterochelin mutants d' escherichia coli unable to synthesize 2-3 dihydroxybenzoate.
10	metabolism of d arabinose a new pathway in escherichia coli	D arabinose metabolism, a new pathway in escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting iron transport in escherichia coli	Mutations affecting iron transport in escherichia coli.
10	effects of ribonucleosides on thymidine incorporation selective reversal of the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in thymineless auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Effects of ribonucleosides on apos; incorporation of thymidine Selective reversal of apos; inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in thymine-free auxotrophs; escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and genetic analysis of mutator genes in escherichia coli b and k 12	Cellular characterization; isolation and genetic analysis of mutant genes in escherichia coli b and k 12.
10	chromosomal location of the c gene involved in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of the c gene involved in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic location in escherichia coli k 12 of the ultraviolet sensitive mutation uvrd3	Genetic localization in escherichia coli k 12 of the ultraviolet-sensitive uvrd3 mutation.
10	host induced modification restriction and the utilization of 5 bromouracil by thymineless mutants of escherichia coli	The host induced a modification restriction and the use of 5 bromouracil by thymine-free mutants d' escherichia coli.
10	inhibition by phenylalanine of thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	L' inhibition by phenylalanine of thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nalidixic acid resistant auxotrophs of escherichia coli	D&apos auxotrophs; escherichia coli resistant to apos; nalidixic acid.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli serine and pdxf mutants	Characterization of escherichia coli serine and pdxf mutants and pyridoxine auxotrophs.
10	partial purification and properties of d desthiobiotin synthetase from escherichia coli	The partial purification and properties of desthiobiotin synthetase d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of phosphotransferase mutants in escherichia coli	Isolate and map phosphotransferase mutants in escherichia coli.
10	methylated bases of bacillus megaterium km nucleic acids comparison with escherichia coli	Comparison of methylated bases of bacillus megaterium km nucleic acids with those of l' escherichia coli.
10	elimination of sex factors in escherichia coli by urea	Elimination of sexual factors in Escherichia coli by urea.
10	genetic and molecular characteristics of x ray sensitive mutants of escherichia coli defective in repair synthesis	Genetic and molecular characteristics of X-ray-sensitive mutants of dysfunctional repair synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	translational repression in the arginine system of escherichia coli	The translational repression in the arginine system of d' escherichia coli.
10	defective excision repair of pyrimidine dimers in the ultraviolet sensitive escherichia coli ras mutant	Defective repair of apos; excision of pyrimidine dimers in the ultraviolet-sensitive ras escherichia coli mutant.
10	l serine sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Serine-sensitive mutants of l' escherichia coli k 12 serine-sensitive mutants.
10	nalidixic acd resistant mutants of escherichia coli deficient in isocitrate dehydrogenase	Escherichia coli dehydrogenase-deficient isocitrate mutants; nalidixic acd dapos; isocitrate dehydrogenase mutants.
10	genetic analysis of diaminopimelic acid and lysine requiring mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of lysine; diaminopimelic acid and lysine requiring mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	effect of nalidixic acid on semionservative replication and repair synthesis after ultraviolet irradiation in escherichia coli	Effect of nalidixic acid on semionative replication and repair synthesis after ultraviolet irradiation in escherichia coli.
10	lysine suppressor in escherichia coli	Lysine suppressor in Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with a growth requirement for either lysine or pyridoxine	Mutants of d' escherichia coli that require growth for either lysine or pyridoxine.
10	growth rate of escherichia coli at elevated temperatures limitation by methionine	Growth rate of d' methionine-limited escherichia coli at elevated temperatures.
10	repression of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase trp and enzymes of the tryptophan pathway in escherichia coli k 12	The repression of 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase trp and d&apos enzymes of the tryptophan pathway in escherichia coli k 12.
10	ampicillin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting mating ability and susceptibility to sex specific bacteriophages	Apos; escherichia coli k 12 mutants, resistant to ampicillin, exhibit lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting mating ability and susceptibility to sex-specific bacteriophages.
10	mutants of escherichia coli sensitive to antibiotics	Antibiotic-susceptible mutants of escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid transferred from ultraviolet irradiated excision defective hfr cells of escherichia coli k 12	Deoxyribonucleic acid transferred from defective hfr cells of escherichia coli k 12 following ultraviolet irradiation.
10	biosynthesis in vitro of tryptophanase by polyribosomes from induced cultures of escherichia coli	The in vitro biosynthesis of tryptophanase by polyribosomes from induced cultures of d' escherichia coli.
10	ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 accumulation of an octaprenol farnesylfarnesylgeraniol by a multiple aromatic auxotroph	Ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 accumulation of an octaprenol farnesylfarnesylgeraniol by a multiple aromatic auxotroph, Arch.
10	cotransduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium hybrids	Co-transduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium hybrids.
10	degradation of escherichia coli b deoxyribonucleic acid after infection with deoxyribonucleic acid defective amber mutants of bacteriophage t7	Degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid; escherichia coli after infection with defective amber mutants of bacteriophage t7 with deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b i isolation and preliminary characterization	Even bacteriophage-tolerant mutants of isolation and preliminary characterization of Escherichia coli b i.
10	the utilization of prolyl peptides by escherichia coli	L' use of prolylic peptides by escherichia coli.
10	differential recovery of auxotrophs after penicillin enrichment in escherichia coli	Differential recovery of auxotrophs after apos; penicillin enrichment in escherichia coli.
10	mutation preventing capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 and its effect on bacteriophage resistance	Mutations preventing capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 and its effect on bacteriophage resistance.
10	pleiotropic effect of the rec a gene of escherichia coli uncoupling of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication	The pleiotropic effect of the rec a dapos gene; escherichia coli, which decouples cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) replication.
10	membrane association of conjugally transferred deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli minicells	Membrane association of l' deoxyribonucleic acid conjugated transferred in d&apos minicells; escherichia coli.
10	transformation of agrobacterium tumefaciens into a non oncogenic species by an escherichia coli rna	Transformation of l' agrobacterium tumefaciens into a non-oncogenic species by an escherichia coli rna.
10	galactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid contents in escherichia coli	Galactose-specific concentration of messenger ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	phosphoglucomutase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Apos phosphoglucomutase mutants; escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	mapping the gene determining ornithine transcarbamylase and its operator in escherichia coli b	Mapping of the gene determining ornithine transcarbamylase and its operator in escherichia coli b.
10	biochemical characterization of the ctr mutants of escherichia coli	Biochemical characterization of the ctr d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	mutants of escherichia coli unable to make protein at 42 c	Mutants of d' escherichia coli unable to produce 42 c protein.
10	stimulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by chloramphenicol in a rel aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Stimulation of apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid by chloramphenicol in a relict l&apos mutant; escherichia coli, transfer mutant; aminoacyl l' ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	phenotypic restoration by molybdate of nitrate reductase activity in chld mutants of escherichia coli	Phenotypic restoration by molybdate of nitrate reductase activity in chld d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	growth of escherichia coli on short chain fatty acids growth characteristics of mutants	Growth of apos; escherichia coli on short chain fatty acids characteristic of mutant growth.
10	relationship between sex pili formation and macarbomycin sensitivity in escherichia coli	Relationship between sexual pili formation and macarbomycin sensitivity in escherichia coli.
10	temperature dependence of sex factor maintenance in escherichia coli k 12	Temperature dependence of sexual factor maintenance in escherichia coli k12 is important.
10	enzymatic characterization of a mutant of escherichia coli with an altered dna ligase	Enzymatic characterization of apos; a mutant of escherichia coli with a modified DNA ligase.
10	isolation of vitamin b 12 transport mutants of escherichia coli	To isolate the mutants of transport of vitamin b 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for chorismate mutase p prephenate dehydratase	Phenylalanine biosynthesis in d' escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for chorismate mutase p prephenate dehydratase mutants.
10	auxotroph accumulation in deoxyribonucleic acid polymeraseless strains of escherichia coli k 12	Apos; auxotroph accumulation in apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 without polymerization of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	regulation of thymidine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 studies on the inducer and the coordinateness of induction of the enzymes	The regulation of thymidine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 was studied on the inducer and coordination of l' induction of enzymes.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli studies of nucleotide levels	Cell division and induction of prophage in studies of nucleotide levels of Escherichia coli.
10	growth inhibition and appearance of the membranous structure in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage fd	Growth inhibition and appearance of membrane structure in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage fd.
10	on the process of cellular division in escherichia coli v incorporation of deoxynucleoside triphosphates by dna thermosensitive mutants of escherichia coli also lacking dna polymerase activity	On the process of cell division in escherichia coli; incorporation of deoxynucleoside triphosphates by heat-sensitive mutants of d' escherichia coli without apos; d&apos activity; DNA polymerase.
10	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection i description of the phenomenon	Escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection i description of the phenomenon.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b ii nucleic acid metabolism	Even bacteriophage-tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b ii nucleic acid metabolism.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid i protein synthesis dependent inhibition	The bacteriophage t4 inhibits deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) degradation induced by colicin e2, which is dependent on epos; inhibition.
10	incomplete lambda bacteriophage heads produced by a gene f mutant	Incomplete lambda bacteriophage heads produced by a f gene mutant.
10	occurrence of lysophosphatides in bacteriophage t4rii infected escherichia coli s 6	Presence of lysophosphatides in bacteriophage t4rii infected escherichia coli 6 s.
10	isolating tryptophan regulatory mutants in escherichia coli by using a trp lac fusion strain	Isolate tryptophan regulatory mutants in Escherichia coli using a trp lac fusion strain.
10	alternate pathway for isoleucine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Alternative pathway for isoleucine biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	ordering of mutant sites in the isoleucine valine genes of escherichia coli by use of merogenotes derived from f 14 a new procedure for fine structure mapping	L' order of mutant sites in the isoleucine genes valine d' escherichia coli par l' use of f14-derived merenotes, a new procedure for fine structure mapping.
10	ribosomal proteins involved in the suppression of streptomycin dependence in escherichia coli	Ribosomal proteins are implicated in the suppression of streptomycin dependence in escherichia coli.
10	utilization of aminobutyric acid as the sole carbon and nitrogen source by escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Use of apos; aminobutyric acid as sole carbon and nitrogen source; nitrogen by mutants k12 d' escherichia coli.
10	slow joining of newly replicated dna chains in dna polymerase i deficient escherichia coli mutants	Slow junction of newly replicated DNA strands in DNA-deficient mutants; DNA polymerase i d' escherichia coli.
10	new polarity suppressors in escherichia coli suppression and messenger rna stability	New polarity suppressors in the removal of escherichia coli and messenger stability.
10	analysis of dna polymerases ii and 3 in mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for dna synthesis	Analysis of polymerases ii and 3 of apos; DNA in mutants of apos; escherichia coli temperature-sensitive for apos synthesis; DNA.
10	specific inhibition of cell division by colicin e 2 without degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in a new colicin sensitivity mutant of escherichia coli	Specific inhibition of cell division by colicin e 2 without degradation of the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in a novel colicin-sensitive mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	control of nucleotide metabolism and ribosomal ribonucleic acid synthesis during nitrogen starvation of escherichia coli	Control of nucleotide metabolism and synthesis; ribosomal ribonucleic acid during deprivation; escherichia coli nitrogen.
10	mutations in r factors of escherichia coli causing an increased number of r factor copies per chromosome	Mutations in r-factors; escherichia coli causing an increased number of r-factors copies per chromosome.
10	recombinant f factors from escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying recb or recc	Reccinating factors of dapos strains; escherichia coli k 12 carriers of recb or recc.
10	physiological factors in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Physiological factors in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	new rifampin resistant mutant of escherichia coli	New mutant of rifampin-resistant Escherichia coli isolates.
10	establishment of repression by lambdoid phage in catabolite activator protein and adenylate cyclase mutants of escherichia coli	Establishment of lambdaid phage repression in apos mutants; escherichia coli catabolite activator protein and apos; adenylate cyclase.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli bacteriophage requiring cell wall galactose	Isolation and characterization of escherichia coli bacteriophage requiring parietal galactosis.
10	location and orientation of the phoa locus on the escherichia coli k 12 linkage map	Location and orientation of the phoa locus on the escherichia coli k 12 genetic map.
10	purification and properties of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe from a lambda arog transductant of escherichia coli	The purification and properties of the deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid, 7 phosphate synthetase phe, from d'apos; a lambda transducer arog d' escherichia coli.
10	biochemical characterization of a mutant isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase from escherichia coli k 12	Biochemical characterization of an isoleucyl transfer mutant; ribonucleic acid synthetase of apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	phospholipids of virus induced membranes in cytoplasm of escherichia coli	The phospholipids of the virus induce membranes in the cytoplasm of d' escherichia coli.
10	presence of bacteriophage like inhibitory particles in escherichia coli	The presence of bacteriophage-like inhibitory particles in Escherichia coli.
10	lethal synthesis of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli during unregulated glycerol metabolism	The lethal synthesis of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli during unregulated glycerol metabolism.
10	polysome turnover during amino acid starvation in escherichia coli	Polysome turnover during amino acid deprivation in escherichia coli.
10	physical and functional characteristics of r factor deoxyribonucleic acid segregated into escherichia coli minicells	The physical and functional characteristics of deoxyribonucleic acid r factor segregate into d' escherichia coli minicells.
10	repression of aromatic amino acid biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12	The repression of aromatic amino acid biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	phenylalanine and tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase tyr chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a	Phenylalanine and tyrosine biosynthesis in d&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 deoxy arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a.
10	alteration of a 30s ribosomal protein accompanying the ram mutation in escherichia coli	Modification of apos; a 30s ribosomal protein accompanying the ram mutation in escherichia coli.
10	control of vitamin b 6 biosynthesis in escherichia coli	The control of vitamin b 6 biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
10	nature of the penetration barrier in escherichia coli k 12 effect of macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in strains containing the enva gene	Nature of penetration barrier in escherichia coli k 12 d&apos effect; macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in strains containing the enva gene.
10	phenethyl alcohol as a suppressor of the enva phenotype associated with the enva gene in escherichia coli k 12	L' phenethyl alcohol suppresses the phenotype of apos; enva associated with the apos gene; enva in apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	alterations in the cytoplasmic membrane proteins of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Changes in the cytoplasmic membrane proteins of various mutants of chlorate-resistant d' escherichia coli.
10	transposition of the lac region to the gal region of the escherichia coli chromosome isolation of lambda lac transducing bacteriophages	Transposition from the lake region to the gal region of the lake; chromosomal isolation of lambda bacteriophages; escherichia coli.
10	specific role of sex pili in the effective eliminatory action of sodium dodecyl sulfate on sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli	The specific role of sexual pili in the effective eliminatory action of sodium dodecyl sulfate on sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli.
10	close linkage between ochre and missense suppressors in escherichia coli	Close link between ochre and false-sense suppressors in escherichia coli.
10	breakdown and exclusion of superinfecting t even bacteriophage in escherichia coli	Decomposition and isolation of superinfecting bacteria even bacteriophage in escherichia coli.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli effects of pantoyl lactone and various furan derivatives	Cell division and l' prophage induction in escherichia coli effects of pantoyl lactone and various furan derivatives.
10	isolation and some properties of cell envelope altered mutants of escherichia coli	Isolation and certain properties of apos; cell envelope have altered mutants of apos; escherichia coli.
10	relationship between permeability cell division and murein metabolism in a mutant of escherichia coli	Relationship between permeability cell division and murine metabolism in a mutant of d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of 2 keto 3 deoxyoctonate lipid a from a heptose deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of 2 keto 3 deoxyoctonate lipid a dapos; a heptose-deficient escherichia coli mutant.
10	mutations affecting the dissimilation of mannitol by escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting concealment of mannitol by escherichia coli k 12.
10	requirement for protein synthesis in rec dependent repair of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli after ultraviolet or x irradiation	The need for protein synthesis in the recoso-dependent repair; deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli after ultraviolet or x irradiation.
10	a second transport system for l arabinose in escherichia coli b r controlled by the arac gene	A second transport system for arabinosis in escherichia coli b r controlled by the arac gene.
10	mapping of a d cycloserine resistance locus in escherichia coli k 12	Map of a cycloserine resistance locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	a new element in the control of dna initiation in escherichia coli	A new element in the control of apos; DNA initiation in escherichia coli.
10	new small polypeptides associated with dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli after infection with bacteriophage t4	New small polypeptides associated with apos-dependent rna polymerase; d*apos DNA; escherichia coli after infection with bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli that requires high concentrations of biotin	A mutant of escherichia coli that requires high concentrations of the biotin.
10	the energy linked transhydrogenase reaction in respiratory mutants of escherichia coli k12	Energy-related transhydrogenase reaction in respiratory mutants of escherichia coli k12 was energy-dependent.
10	death through respiratory failure of a fraction of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli b r cells	Death due to respiratory insufficiency; a fraction of the skin cells; escherichia coli b radiation-induced.
10	excision repair properties of isogenic rec mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The repair properties of the excision of recisogenic mutants of escherichia coli k 12 are described below.
10	escherichia coli mutants tht require either pyridoxine or alanine	The mutants of d' Escherichia coli require either pyridoxine or d' alanine.
10	infection of escherichia coli by t2 and t4 bacteriophages as seen in the electron microscope t4 head morphogenesis	Infection of apos; Escherichia coli by bacteriophages t2 and t4, as observed by electron microscopy during t4 head morphogenesis.
10	limiting availability of binding sites for dehydrogenases on the cell membrane of escherichia coli	Limitation of the availability of binding sites for dehydrogenases on the cell membrane of d' escherichia coli.
10	nuclear disruption after infection of escherichia coli with a bacteriophage t4 mutant unable to induce endonuclease ii	Nuclear Rupture After Apos; infection of escherichia coli by a bacteriophage t4 mutant that is unable to produce apos; induction of apos; endonuclease ii.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k12 that use d amino acids	Mutant strains of d' escherichia coli k12 that use amino acids.
10	analysis of host range restriction in escherichia coli treated with toluene	Analysis of host range restriction in escherichia coli treated with toluene.
10	regulation of lambda rex expression after infection of escherichia coli k by lambda bacteriophage	Regulation of infection; lambda rex expression after infection; escherichia coli k by lambda bacteriophage.
10	three membered parasitic system a bacteriophage bdellovibrio bacteriovorus and escherichia coli	Three members of the parasite system, a bacteriophage bdellovibrio bacteriovorus and escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage lysozyme synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 lambda infected with rii mutant of bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage lysozyme synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 lambda infected with rii mutant of bacteriophage t4.
10	genetic map of the lactose repressor gene i of escherichia coli	A genetic map of the lactose repressor gene of escherichia coli.
10	eight transfer rnas induced by infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4	Eight induced transfer events; infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4 were observed.
10	conjugational complementation analysis of transfer deficient mutants of flac in escherichia coli	L' conjugative complementation analysis of flask transfer deficient mutants in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of transfer by the escherichia coli sex factor f using p1 transductional complementation	Genetic analysis of transfer by the sex factor f of escherichia coli using p1 transduction complementation.
10	deletion map of the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f the order of eleven transfer cistrons	Deletion map of the sex factor k 12 of the intestines; escherichia coli f of the intestines; order of 11 transfer cistrons.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 deficient for detergent resistant phospholipase a	The d' escherichia coli k12 mutant is deficient for detergent-resistant phospholipase a.
10	effect of the folic acid analogue trimethoprim on growth macromolecular synthesis and incorporation of exogenous thymine in escherichia coli	Apos effect; folic acid analog, trimethoprim, on macromolecular growth synthesis and l' incorporation of exogenous thymine in escherichia coli.
10	gene transfer in pasteurella pestis harboring the f cm plasmid of escherichia coli	Gene transfer in pasteurella pestis containing the plasmid f cm d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	arginine control of transcription of argecbh messenger ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	L' arginine controls transcription of l' ribonucleic acid (RNA), a messenger of l' argecbh, in escherichia coli.
10	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from escherichia coli and from a high level mutant	In addition, a high-level mutant, glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli and d&apos.
10	construction and properties of escherichia coli strains exhibiting complementation of galactosidase fragments in vivo	Construction and properties of Escherichia coli strains showing complementarity of galactosidase fragments in vivo.
10	manganese resistant mutants of escherichia coli physiological and genetic studies	Manganese-resistant mutants of escherichia coli physiological and genetic studies.
10	biochemical and genetic studies on ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase	Biochemical and genetic studies on biosynthesis of os; ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12-4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase.
10	ribosomal alterations controlling alkaline phosphatase isozymes in escherichia coli	Ribosomal alterations controlling alkaline phosphatase isozymes in escherichia coli.
10	membrane mutation associated with sensitivity to acriflavine in escherichia coli	Membrane mutation associated with sensitivity to acriflavin in escherichia coli.
10	effects of acridine orange on the growth of escherichia coli	Effects of acridine orange on the growth of acridine orange and escherichia coli.
10	induction of the ara operon of escherichia coli b r	Induction of escherichia coli b r.
10	genetic analysis of flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of flagellar mutants in escherichia coli.
10	effect of thymine starvation on deoxyribonucleic acid repair systems of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of thymine deficiency on deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid repair systems; escherichia coli k 12.
10	porphyrin accumulating mutants of escherichia coli	Porphyrin accumulating mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet sensitive mutator strain of escherichia coli k 12	The ultraviolet-sensitive mutant strain of escherichia coli k12 is ultraviolet-sensitive.
10	evidence for the direct action of colicin k on aerobic 32 p i uptake in escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro	Evidence of the direct action of colicin k on apos; aerobic absorption of 32 p i in escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro.
10	characterization of lethal zygosis associated with conjugation in escherichia coli k 12	Characterization of lethal zygosis associated with conjugation in escherichia coli k 12.
10	osmotic reversal of temperature sensitivity in escherichia coli	Osmotic reversal of temperature sensitivity in escherichia coli.
10	importance of facilitated diffusion for effective utilization of glycerol by escherichia coli	L' importance of facilitated diffusion for l' effective use of glycerol by escherichia coli.
10	deletion and complementation analysis of biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	Deletion and complementation analysis of a group of escherichia coli biotin genes.
10	molecular studies on entry exclusion in escherichia coli minicells	Molecular studies on apo; exclusion to apo; microcell entry; escherichia coli.
10	dominant mutations lex in escherichia coli k 12 which affect radiation sensitivity and frequency of ultraviolet lght induced mutations	Dominant lex mutations in escherichia coli k 12 which affect radiation sensitivity and frequency of ultraviolet-induced mutations.
10	flagellar assembly mutants in escherichia coli	Apos mutants; flagellar assembly in escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport of branched chain amino acids	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 altered in the transport of branched chain amino acids.
10	anaerobic l glycerophosphate dehydrogenase of escherichia coli its genetic locus and its physiological role	Anaerobic glycerophosphate dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli is its genetic locus and its physiological role.
10	bacterial cell division regulation physiological effects of crystal violet on escherichia coli lon and lon strains	Physiological effects of purple crystal bacterial cell division on lon and lon d' escherichia coli strains.
10	alteration of ribosomal protein s4 by mutation linked to kasugamycin resistance in escherichia coli	Modification of s4 ribosomal protein by mutation related to kasugamycin resistance in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli syndrome	A genetic analysis of apos; dapos syndrome; Escherichia coli.
10	properties and mode of action of a bactericidal compound methylglyoxal produced by a mutant of escherichia coli	Identity and mode of action of a bactericidal compound methylglyoxal produced by a mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of rhodospirrillum rubrum obtained after long term anaerobic dark growth	Mutants of rhodospirrillum rubrum were obtained after long anaerobic growth in darkness.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli a morphological study	Giant cells of escherichia coli, morphological study.
10	alkaline sucrose gradient sedimentation of chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid from escherichia coli pola and pola strains during thymine starvation	Apos alkaline sucrose gradient sedimentation; chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid from apos strains; escherichia coli pola and pola during thymine deprivation.
10	genetic determinant in escherichia coli affecting thymineless death and ultraviolet sensitivity	Genetic determinant affecting thymine-free death and ultraviolet sensitivity in Escherichia coli.
10	in vivo production of an rna dna copolymer after infection of escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4	In vivo production of a DNA copolymer after infection of escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in dna polymerase ii activity	A mutant of apos; escherichia coli defective in apos; apos activity; DNA polymerase ii.
10	mutants of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli pleiotropically defective in active transport	Mutants of salmonella typhimurium and d' escherichia coli pleiotropically defective in active transport.
10	fine structure deletion map of the escherichia coli l arabinose operon	Deletion map of the fine structure of the cell; escherichia coli l.
10	mapping of new escherichia coli k and 15 restriction sites on specific fragments of bacteriophage phi x174	Mapping new restriction sites of Escherichia coli k and 15 others on specific fragments of phi x174 bacteriophage.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid ii inhibition by t4 ghosts and by t4 in the absence of protein synthesis	Bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin-induced deoxyribonucleic acid deacid e2 colonization; this inhibition is induced by t4 ghosts and t4 in the absence of protein synthesis.
10	on some genetic aspects of phage lambda resistance in e coli k12	On some genetic aspects of phage lambda resistance in e coli k12.
10	a dominant constitutive phor mutation in escherichia coli	A dominant constitutive phor mutation in escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage tail components iv pteroyl polyglutamate synthesis in t4d infected escherichia coli b	Viv pteroyl polyglutamate synthesis in t4d infected escherichia coli b.
10	analysis of nuclear disruption and binding of intermediates in host dna breakdown to membranes after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophages t4 and t7	Analysis of nuclear disorganization and binding of intermediates in the degradation of DNA; host to membranes after apos; infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophages t4 and t7.
10	degradation of escherichia coli chromosome after infection by bacteriophage t4 role of bacteriophage gene d2a	Dapos chromosome degradation; escherichia coli after bacteriophage t4 infection, role of bacteriophage d2a gene.
10	reconstitution of d lactate dependent transport in membrane vesicles from a d lactate dehydrogenase mutant of escherichia coli	Reconstitution of lactate-dependent transport in membrane vesicles of a lactate dehydrogenase mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	rna linked nascent dna fragments in escherichia coli	Rna has linked fragments of Escherichia coli incipient DNA.
10	characterization by electron microscopy of fused f prime factors in escherichia coli	F-f fused major factors in escherichia coli characterized by electron microscopy.
10	mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for the synthesis of transfer rna	Thermosensitive mutants of d' escherichia coli for the synthesis of transfer proteins.
10	r factors of escherichia coli from dressed beef and humans	The factors are r' Escherichia coli from prepared beef and humans.
10	transport of magnesium by a repressible and a nonrepressible system in escherichia coli	The transport of magnesium by a repressible system and a system unrepresentable in escherichia coli.
10	role of dna polymerase i and the rec system in excision repair in escherichia coli	Role of apo; DNA polymerase i and the rec system in apo-repair; excision in escherichia coli.
10	low activity of galactosidase in frameshift mutants of escherichia coli	Low galactosidase activity in frameshift mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	growth and macromolecular composition of a mutant of escherichia coli during polyamine limitation	Growth and macromolecular composition of a mutant of escherichia coli during polyamine limitation.
10	the utilization of fructose by escherichia coli properties of a mutant defective in fructose 1 phosphate kinase activity	Lapses; utilization of fructose by escherichia coli dapos properties; a mutant whose fructose 1 phosphate kinase activity is deficient.
10	recircularization and autonomous replication of a sheared r factor dna segment in escherichia coli transformants	Recirculation and autonomous replication of apos; a segment of d' factor DNA specified in d&apos transformants; Escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli the muts gene	Mutant gene studies in escherichia coli muts gene.
10	suppression of ultraviolet sensitivity in escherichia coli uvr502 by the su58 missense suppressor	The suppression of ultraviolet sensitivity in Escherichia coli uvr502 by the su58 false-sense suppressor was observed.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor sites for vitamin b12 and the e colicins on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	The transport of vitamin b12 to common receptor sites for vitamin b12 and colicins on the outer membrane of apos; cell envelope.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli genetic studies	Vitamin b12 transport in escherichia coli genetic studies was studied.
10	derepression of anthranilate synthase in purified minicells of escherichia coli containing the col trp plasmid	The derepression of anthranilate synthase in purified minicells of apos; escherichia coli containing the plasmid trp.
10	genetic analysis of the system that reduces biotin d sulfoxide in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the system that reduces biotin sulfoxide d in escherichia coli.
10	thymineless death in pola and pola strains of escherichia coli	Thymine-free death in pola and pola d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	novel mutation to dominant fucose resistance in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli	New mutation to dominant fucose resistance in the arabinose operon of escherichia coli.
10	two genetic loci for resistance to kasugamycin in escherichia coli	Two genetic loci for resistance to kasugamycin in escherichia coli.
10	protein synthesis and deoxyribonucleic acid membrane attachment during thymineless death in escherichia coli	Protein synthesis and membrane binding; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) during thymineless death in escherichia coli.
10	rapid mapping of conditional and auxotrophic mutations in escherichia coli k 12	Rapid mapping of conditional and auxotrophic mutations in escherichia coli k 12.
10	isolation and characterization of mutations affecting the transport of hexose phosphates in escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of mutations affecting the transport of hexose phosphates in escherichia coli.
10	involvement of the recb recc nuclease exonuclease v in the process of x ray induced deoxyribonucleic acid degradation in radiosensitive strains of escherichia coli k 12	L' exonuclease v recc nuclease recb is involved in the process of breakdown of l' x-ray-induced deoxyribonucleic acid in radiosensitive strains of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	physiology of escherichia coli k 12 during conjugation altered recipient cell functions associated with lethal zygosis	Physiology of the apos; escherichia coli k12 during conjugation altered the receptor cell functions associated with lethal zygosis.
10	x ray sensitivity and repair capacity of a pola1 exra strain of escherichia coli k 12	X-Ray sensitivity and repair capability of a pola1 strain will be extirpated; escherichia coli k 12 will be extirpated.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxi mutations affecting derepression and valine resistance	Isoleucine and valine metabolism in dapos mutations; escherichia coli xxi affecting derepression and valine resistance.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxii a pleiotropic mutation affecting induction of isomeroreductase activity	Isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxii, pleiotropic mutation affecting apos; induction of apos; isomeroreductase activity.
10	organic solvents as probes for the structure and function of the bacterial membrane effects of ethanol on the wild type and an ethanol resistant mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Organic solvents as probes for the structure and function of the bacterial membrane effects of ethylene oxide; ethanol on wild type and a mutant of d' escherichia coli k 12 resistant to ethanol.
10	regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	The regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid methylase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Isolate mutants of idios; deoxyribonucleic acid methylase d' escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	reconstitution of nitrate reductase activity and formation of membrane particles from cytoplasmic extracts of chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Rebuilding of membranes; nitrate reductase activity and formation of membrane particles from extracts; cytoplasmic extracts of chlorate-resistant mutants; escherichia coli.
10	excretion of enterochelin by exba and exbb mutants of escherichia coli	Lapses; excretion of apos; enterocelin by exba and exb dapos mutants; escherichia coli.
10	pathway for ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 gene enzyme relationships and intermediates	Pathway for ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 gene relationships and intermediates.
10	increase in sensitivity to antibiotics and lysozyme on deletion of lipopolysaccharides in escherichia coli strains	Increased sensitivity to antibiotics and lysozyme in the deletion of lipopolysaccharides in the strains of d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic determination of the constitutive biosynthesis of phospho glucosidase a in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic determination of the constitutive biosynthesis of phospho glucosidase a in escherichia coli k 12.
10	comparison of the resa1 and pola1 mutations in isogenic strains of escherichia coli k 12	Comparison of the resa1 and pola1 mutations in isogenic strains of Escherichia coli.
10	effect of serine hydroxamate on phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli	The effect of serine hydroxamate on phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of a regulatory mutant of an aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of a regulatory mutant of amino acid transfer ribonucleic acid; aminoacyl synthetase in escherichia coli k 12.
10	location of promoter and operator sites in the biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	Localization of promoter and operator sites in the apo biota gene cluster; escherichia coli.
10	genetic fine structure of the leucine operon of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic structure of the organism; leucine operon of the organism; escherichia coli k 12.
10	bacterial cell division regulation lysogenization of conditional cell division lon mutants of escherichia coli by bacteriophage	Bacterial cell division regulation of lon lon mutants of l' escherichia coli by bacteriophage conditional cell division.
10	control of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli characterization of arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants	Mastery of apos biosynthesis; arginine in escherichia coli characterization of apos mutants; ribonucleic acid synthetase by arginyl transfer.
10	a polypeptide bacteriophage receptor modified cell wall protein subunits in bacteriophage resistant mutants of bacillus sphaericus strain p 1	Under-cell wall protein units modified by a polypeptide bacteriophage receptor in bacteriophage-resistant mutants of Bacillus sphaericus strain p 1.
10	biosynthetic pathway of thiamine pyrophosphate a special reference to the thiamine monophosphate requiring mutant and the thiamine pyrophosphate requiring mutant of escherichia coli	The thiamine pyrophosphate biosynthetic pathway is a special reference to the thiamine monophosphate mutant and the escherichia coli thiamine pyrophosphate mutant.
10	enterochelin system of iron transport in escherichia coli mutations affecting ferric enterochelin esterase	Enterochelin of iron transport in apo mutation; escherichia coli affecting apo; esterase of apo; ferric enterocelin.
10	excision repair characteristics of recb res and uvrc strains of escherichia coli	Repair characteristics of apo; excision of recb res and uvrc dapos; escherichia coli.
10	l arabinose isomerase formation in a conditional mutant of gene araa of escherichia coli b r	Formation of apos; isomerase of apos; arabinosis in a conditional mutant of araa d' escherichia coli b r.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with derepressed levels of the biotin biosynthetic enzymes	A mutant of apos; escherichia coli with derepressed levels of biogenic enzymes of biotin.
10	phleomycin stimulated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Phleomycin stimulated the degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	studies on sex pili mutants of the sex factor f in escherichia coli defective in bacteriophage adsorbing function of f pili	Studies of sexual pili mutants of the sex factor f in escherichia coli having a function of d' bacterial adsorption of the pili in escherichia coli.
10	relation between protein synthesis and phospholipid synthesis and turnover in escherichia coli	Relationship between protein synthesis and phospholipid synthesis and turnover in escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of thiamine transport by chloroethylthiamine in escherichia coli	L' inhibition of thiamine transport by chloroethylthiamine in Escherichia coli.
10	effects of proline analogues on the formation of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	Effects of proline analogs on the formation of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting amino sugar metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting amino sugar metabolism in escherichia coli k 12.
10	de novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants lacking quinolinate phosphoribosyl transferase	De novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants without quinolinate phosphoribosyl transferase.
10	genetic analysis of bacteriophage mu induced flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	L' genetic analysis of bacteriophage mu induced flagellar mutants in Escherichia coli.
10	transport systems for alanine serine and glycine in escherichia coli k 12	Systems for transport of alanine serine and glycine in apos; escherichia coli k.
10	turnover of phosphatidylglycerol in escherichia coli	The turnover of phosphatidylglycerol in escherichia coli.
10	duplication translocations of tryptophan operon genes in escherichia coli	Duplication of translocations of tryptophan operon genes in escherichia coli.
10	glycolaldehyde is a precursor of pyridoxal phosphate in escherichia coli b	Glycolaldehyde is a precursor of pyridoxal phosphate in escherichia coli b.
10	degradation of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid after gamma irradiation of spheroplasted escherichia coli cr thy cells	Apos dehydration; cellular deoxyribonucleic acid after gamma irradiation of apos; escherichia coli cr thy spheroplastic cells.
10	biotin uptake in biotin regulatory mutant of escherichia coli	Lapos; uptake of biotin by biotin regulatory mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	mutation to erythromycin dependence in escherichia coli k 12	Erythromycin to apos dependence in escherichia coli k 12.
10	studies with a gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase mutant in escherichia coli strain c	Studies with a gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase mutant of strain c d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic characterization of mutations which affect catabolite sensitive operons in escherichia coli including deletions of the gene for adenyl cyclase	Genetic characterization of mutations affecting catabolite sensitive operons in escherichia coli, including deletion of the l' adenyl cyclase gene.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 defective in the transport of basic amino acids	Mutant d' escherichia coli k 12 defective in the transport of basic amino acids.
10	basic amino acid transport in escherichia coli properties of canavanine resistant mutants	Basic amino acid transport in the escherichia coli properties of canavanin-resistant mutants.
10	deletion mapping and orientation of the histidine operon of escherichia coli on a transducing bacteriophage	Mapping by deletion and orientation of cells; histidine operon d'apos; escherichia coli on a transducer bacteriophage.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport systems for oligo and dipeptides	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 were altered in the transport systems of oligo and dipeptides.
10	repression of enzymes of arginine biosynthesis by l canavanine in arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants of escherichia coli	The repression of enzymes of biosynthesis of apos; arginine by canavanine in mutants of apos; escherichia coli for transfer of apos; arginyl to apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xix inhibition of isoleucine biosynthesis by glycyl leucine	Isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xix inhibition of isoleucine biosynthesis by glycyl leucine.
10	degradation of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid after restriction by escherichia coli k 12	L&apos degradation; lambda bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acid after restriction by escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of macromolecular synthesis by putrescine in a conditional escherichia coli putrescine auxotroph	The regulation of macromolecular synthesis by putrescine in a conditional auxotroph d' escherichia coli putrescine.
10	chemotaxis toward amino acids in escherichia coli	Chemotaxis to amino acids in Escherichia coli.
10	nonidentity of the aspartate and the aromatic aminotransferase components of transaminase a in escherichia coli	The identity of the components of aspartate and apos; aromatic aminotransferase of transaminase a in escherichia coli.
10	restoration of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase activity of a neurospora mutant by extracts of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Recovery of apos; reduced activity of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase d' a neurospora mutant by extracts of various chlorate-resistant mutants; escherichia coli.
10	characterization of escherichia coli mutants tolerant to bacteriocin jf246 two new classes of tolerant mutants	Characterization of mutants of d' escherichia coli tolerant to bacteriocin jf246 two new classes of tolerant mutants.
10	outer penetration barrier of escherichia coli k 12 kinetics of the uptake of gentian violet by wild type and envelope mutants	External penetration barrier of apo; escherichia coli k 12 kinetics of apo; uptake of gentian violet by wild type and apo mutants; sheath.
10	suppression of lex mutations affecting deoxyribonucleic acid repair in escherichia coli k 12 by closely linked thermosensitive mutations	Suppression of lex mutations affecting deoxyribonucleic acid repair in escherichia coli k 12 by closely related thermosensitive mutations.
10	pleiotropic properties and genetic organization of the tola b locus of escherichia coli k 12	Pleiotropic properties and genetic organization of the tola b locus; escherichia coli c.
10	multivalent repression of aspartic semialdehyde dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Multitivalent repression of aspartic semialdehyde dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 exhibiting enhanced sensitivity to 5 methyltryptophan	The mutant strains of escherichia coli k12 showed increased sensitivity to 5 methyltryptophan.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage coded gene products during infection of escherichia coli with amber mutants of t3 and t7 defective in gene 1	Synthesis of bacteriophage-encoded gene products during infection of escherichia coli by defective mutants of t3 and t7 in gene 1.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with a new highly efficient promoter for the lactose operon	A d&apos mutant; escherichia coli with a new promoter for lactose operon.
10	isolation of a mutant of escherichia coli defective in cytosine specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase activity and in partial protection of bacteriophage lambda against restriction by cells containing the n 3 drug resistance factor	Isolation of apos; mutant of apos; escherichia coli deficient in apos; activity of apos; cytosine-specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase and in partial protection of lambda bacteriophage against restriction by cells containing drug resistance factor 3.
10	tyrosine and phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 complementation between different tyrr alleles	Tyrosine and phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 complementation between different tyrr alleles.
10	nucleoid condensation and cell division in escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 after inhibition of protein synthesis	Nucleoid condensation and cell division in escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 after inhibition of protein synthesis.
10	rapid method for isolation of large quantities of outer membrane from escherichia coli k 12 and its application to the study of envelope mutants	Rapid method for isolation of large amounts of outer membrane d' escherichia coli k 12 and its application to apos; study of mutants of apos; envelope.
10	isolation of the nonviable cells produced during normal growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolate the nonviable cells produced during normal growth of recombinant deficient strains of escherichia coli.
10	cross feeding of escherichia coli mutants defective in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Mutants of d' escherichia coli defective in the biosynthesis of dinucleotide adenine nicotinamide.
10	the gua operon of escherichia coli k 12 evidence for polarity from guab to guaa	Escherichia coli 12 is evidence of the existence of parasites; polarity between guab and guaa.
10	reactivation of photoinactivated single stranded dna bacteriophage phi x174 by uv irradiated escherichia coli cells	Reactivation of photoinactivated single-stranded DNA bacteriophage phi x174 by apos-irradiated Escherichia coli; uv.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage and host dna in toluene treated cells prepared from t4 infected escherichia coli role of bacteriophage gene d2a	Bacteriophage and apo synthesis; host in toluene-treated cells prepared from t4 infected cells; escherichia coli role of d2a gene of bacteriophage.
10	polyamine synthesis and accumulation in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage r17	Polyamine synthesis and accumulation in Escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage r17.
10	transcellular ion flow in escherichia coli b and electrical sizing of bacterias	Transcellular ion flow in Escherichia coli b and electrical sizing of the bacteria.
10	electrophoretic variation in escherichia coli from natural sources	The electrophoretic variation in escherichia coli from natural sources.
10	defective transamination a mechanism for resistance to ketomycin in escherichia coli	Defective transfer a mechanism for resistance to ketomycin in escherichia coli.
10	f factor mediated immunity to lethal zygosis in escherichia coli k 12	F-mediated immunity to lethal zygosis in apos; escherichia coli k 12 is induced by a factor.
10	mapping of the structural genes of the three aspartokinases and of the two homoserine dehydrogenases of escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of the structural genes of the three aspartokinases and of the two homoserine dehydrogenases of l'apos; escherichia coli k.
10	role for free isoleucine of glycyl leucine in the repression of threonine deaminase in escherichia coli	The role of glycyl leucine-free isoleucine in the repression of threonine deaminase in escherichia coli.
10	malb region in escherichia coli k 12 characterization of new mutations	Malb region in escherichia coli k 12 characterization of new mutations.
10	genetic analysis of the leucine region in escherichia coli b r gene enzyme assignments	Genetic analysis of the leucine region in the apos; assignment of bios r gene enzymes; escherichia coli.
10	positioning flagellar genes in escherichia coli by deletion analysis	Position flagellar genes in Escherichia coli by deletion analysis.
10	reconstitution of oxidative phosphorylation and the adenosine triphosphate dependent transhydrogenase activity by a combination of membrane fractions from unca and uncb mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	Oxidative phosphorylation and apo- and apo-dependent adenosine triphosphate transhydrogenase activity by a combination of membrane fractions from unca and uncapos mutant strains; escherichia coli k12 were reconstituted.
10	use of escherichia coli mutants to evaluate purines purine nucleosides and analogues	Use of d' escherichia coli mutants to evaluate purine nucleosides and analogs.
10	thermal enhancement of ultraviolet mutability in a tif 1 uvra derivative of escherichia coli b r evidence that ultraviolet mutagenesis depends upon an inducible function	Ultraviolet (UV) mutagenesis in an ultraviolet (UV) derivative; escherichia coli b r shows that ultraviolet mutagenesis depends on an inducible function.
10	the nucleotide sequence of the lactose messenger ribonucleic acid transcribed from the uv5 promoter mutant of escherichia coli	The nucleotide sequence of the lactose messenger ribonucleic acid transcribed from the mutant promoter uv5 d' escherichia coli.
10	excision of thymine dimers in vitro by extracts of bacteriophage infected escherichia coli	L' excision of thymine dimers in vitro by extracts of escherichia coli-infected bacteriophages.
10	nucleotide sequences from tryptophan messenger rna of escherichia coli the sequence corresponding to the amino terminal region of the first polypeptide specified by the operon	Nucleotide sequences from the tryptophan messenger rna of escherichia coli correspond to the amino region-terminal of the first polypeptide specified by the operon.
10	description of an incompatibility mutant of escherichia coli	A mutant of apos; incompatibility of escherichia coli.
10	genetic and biochemical investigation of the escherichia coli mutant hfl 1 which is lysogenized at high frequency by bacteriophage lambda	L' genetic and biochemical study of the bacteriophage lambda mutant hfl 1 d' Escherichia coli which is lysogenized at high frequencies.
10	properties of metk mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Properties of the meta- and escherichia coli mutants.
10	repair of dna containing interstrand crosslinks in escherichia coli sequential excision and recombination	DNA containing cross-links between strands in the apos; sequential excision and recombination of apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by mutator gene muth1 in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Mutagenesis by muth1 mutator gene in continuous cultures of escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of replication gap closure in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet light photoproducts of l tryptophan	L' inhibition of replication gap closure in Escherichia coli by tryptophan photoproducts @-@1 in near-lapo light; ultraviolet.
10	effect of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide on growth and membrane mediated processes in wild type and heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide on growth and membrane mediated processes in heptose and wild-type mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	beta beta subunits of ribonucleic acid polymerase in episome free minicells of escherichia coli	Under-units beta of l' ribonucleic acid polymerase in free episomatic minicells d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli ruv mutant which forms nonseptate filaments after low doses of ultraviolet light irradiation	Isolation and characterization of escherichia coli, an escherichia coli ruv mutant, which forms non-@-seven filaments after low doses of apo, and ultraviolet irradiation.
10	three different missense suppressor mutations affecting the trna ggg gly species of escherichia coli	Three different false-sense suppressor mutations affect the trna ggg gly d' escherichia coli species.
10	multiplicity of isoleucine leucine and valine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	Multiplicity of the leucine and valine transport systems in escherichia coli k.
10	mutations affecting the different transport systems for isoleucine leucine and valine in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting the different transport systems of isoleucine leucine and valine in escherichia coli.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophages for gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gnd of escherichia coli	Isolation of specialized bacteriophages for gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gd d' escherichia coli.
10	localization of two functions of the phosphoribosyl anthranilate transferase of escherichia coli to distinct regions of the polypeptide chain	The localization of two functions of phosphoribosyl anthranilate transferase d' escherichia coli in distinct regions of the polypeptide chain.
10	alterations in the outer membrane of the cell envelope of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Alterations were observed in the outer membrane of the cell envelope of heptose-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	divergent orientation of transcription from the arginine gene ecbh cluster of escherichia coli	Distinct orientation of transcription from the ecbh group of the gene for l' arginine in escherichia coli.
10	modified map positions for lac and the pro markers in escherichia coli k 12	Modified lake position and pro markers in escherichia coli k 12 on the map.
10	gross map distances and hfr transfer times in escherichia coli k 12	Gross map distance and transfer time in escherichia coli k 12.
10	metabolism of d arabinose by escherichia coli b r	Metabolism of d arabinosis by escherichia coli b r.
10	properties of a d glutamic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	Properties of glutamic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli.
10	cell division of escherichia coli control by membrane organization	Cell division of escherichia coli is controlled by membrane organization.
10	cyclic adenosine monophosphate independent mutants of the lactose operon of escherichia coli	Apos-independent mutants; cyclic adenosine monophosphate of apos; lactose operon of apos; escherichia coli.
10	d serine transport system in escherichia coli k 12	Serine transport system in escherichia coli k 12 d.
10	metabolism of d serine in escherichia coli k 12 mechanism of growth inhibition	Serine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12; mechanism of inhibition of growth.
10	loss of an essential function of escherichia coli by deletions in the thya region	Loss of esapos; an essential function of escherichia coli by deletion in the thya region.
10	stringent control of intracellular proteolysis in escherichia coli	Strict control of intracellular proteolysis in escherichia coli.
10	multiplicity of leucine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	Multiplicity of leucine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12.
10	effect of rifampin on the structure and membrane attachment of the nucleoid of escherichia coli	The effect of rifampin on the structure and tissues; membrane attachment of the nucleoid d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation of the bacteriophage lambda receptor from escherichia coli	Isolate the lambda receptor from the bacteriophage d'apos; Escherichia coli.
10	phospholipid turnover in a conditional polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	Phospholipid cycling in a conditional polyamine auxotroph d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of lipopolysaccharide protein from escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of lipopolysaccharide protein of escherichia coli.
10	transport of biosynthetic intermediates homoserine and threonine uptake in escherichia coli	Transport of d' homoserine biosynthetic intermediates and threonine uptake in Escherichia coli.
10	effect of photoreactivation on the filling of gaps in deoxyribonucleic acid synthesized after exposure of escherichia coli to ultraviolet light	The effect of photoreactivation on the filling of spaces in membranes; deoxyribonucleic acid synthesized after exposure of escherichia coli to ultraviolet light.
10	genetic analysis of cold sensitive ribosome maturation mutants of escherichia coli	L' genetic analysis of cold-sensitive ribosomal maturation mutants of l' escherichia coli.
10	growth of ribonucleic acid bacteriophage f2 in a conditional putrescine auxotroph of escherichia coli evidence for a polyamine role in translation	The growth of the ribonucleic acid bacteriophage f2 in a putrescine-conditional auxotroph d' Escherichia coli demonstrates the apos; existence of apos; a role of polyamines in translation.
10	chromosomal location of the tolg locus for tolerance to bacteriocin jf246 in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of the tolg locus for tolerance to bacteriocin jf246 in escherichia coli k.
10	proteins of the inner membrane of escherichia coli identification of succinate dehydrogenase by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis with sdh amber mutants	The proteins of the inner membrane of d' escherichia coli identify succinate dehydrogenase by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis with sdh amber mutants.
10	decay of ribonucleic acid synthesis in amino acid starved escherichia coli after rifampin treatment	Decomposition of ribonucleic acid synthesis in amino acids deprived escherichia coli of food after rifampin treatment.
10	reversion of frameshift mutations by mutator genes in escherichia coli	Reversal of frameshift mutations by mutant genes in escherichia coli.
10	complementation between different mutations in the ilva gene of escherichia coli k 12	Escherichia coli k 12 Complementation between different mutations in the vas defera gene.
10	evolution of a second gene for beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Evolution of a second gene for beta galactosidase in escherichia coli.
10	con mutants class of mutants in escherichia coli k 12 lacking a major cell wall protein and defective in conjugation and adsorption of a bacteriophage	Class of mutants con in escherichia coli k 12, lacking major cell wall protein and defective in conjugation and apos; adsorption of bacteriophage.
10	quantal behavior of a diffusible factor which initiates septum formation at potential division sites in escherichia coli	Quantum behavior of a diffusible factor which initiates the formation of apos; a septum at potential division sites in escherichia coli.
10	complementation in vitro between mutationally altered beta2 subunits of escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase	In vitro complementation between beta2 subunits that have been altered by esteros; escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase mutation.
10	negative chemotaxis in escherichia coli	A negative chemotaxis in Escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of the locus for detergent resistant phospholipase a plda in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mapping of the detergent-resistant locus of phospholipase a plda in escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic regulatory mechanisms and the ecological niche of escherichia coli	Genetic regulation mechanisms and the ecological niche of Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of prototrophic mutants of escherichia coli unable to support the intracellular growth of t7	The isolation and characterization of prototrophic mutants of escherichia coli unable to support the intracellular growth of t7.
10	reconstitution of the energy linked transhydrogenase activity in membranes from a mutant strain of escherichia coli k12 lacking magnesium ion or calcium ion stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	Reconstitution of apo; transhydrogenase activity; apo-membrane energy; a mutant strain of apos; escherichia coli k12 lacking apos; magnesium ion or apos; calcium ion stimulates apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	size distribution and molecular polarity of newly replicated dna in escherichia coli	Particle size distribution and molecular polarity of newly replicated DNA in escherichia coli.
10	an escherichia coli mutant with an altered elongation factor tu	An Escherichia coli mutant with an altered elongation factor.
10	interaction of bacterial and lambda phage recombination systems in the x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12	Interaction of phage lambda and bacterial recombination systems in the x-ray sensitivity of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	studies on in vitro dna synthesis isolation of dna b gene product from escherichia coli	Studies of in vitro synthesis of apos; DNA for isolation of b gene product from apos; escherichia coli.
10	stereospecificity of tripeptide utilization in a methionine auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	Stereosospecificity; tripeptide utilization in a methionine auxotroph d' escherichia coli k12.
10	mapping of a mutation polb100 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of a mutation polb100 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii in escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with cold sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli with cold-sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis.
10	release of polarity in escherichia coli by gene n of phage lambda termination and antitermination of transcription	Liberation of polarity in escherichia coli by the lambda phage termination n gene and anti-transcription termination.
10	genetic studies on ribose 5 phosphate isomerase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic studies on mutants of the isomerase ribose 5 phosphate d' escherichia coli k 12 were performed.
10	mapping loci for surface exclusion and incompatibility on the f factor of escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of loci; exclusion of surface and surface; incompatibility on the factor; escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of one carbon biosynthesis and utilization in escherichia coli	Regulation of biosynthesis of carbon and utilization in escherichia coli.
10	proline excretion and indirect suppression in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Proline excretion and indirect suppression in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium.
10	threonine locus of escherichia coli k 12 genetic structure and evidence for an operon	The threonine site of apos; escherichia coli k 12 genetic structure and operon evidence.
10	pleiotropic effects of mutations involved in the regulation of escherichia coli k 12 alkaline phosphatase	Pleiotropic effects of the mutations involved in the regulation of escherichia coli k 12 alkaline phosphatase.
10	polyamine limitation of growth slows the rate of polypeptide chain elongation in escherichia coli	Growth limitation by polyamines slows the rate of polypeptide chain elongation in escherichia coli.
10	the reconstitution of oxidase activity in membranes derived from a 5 aminolaevulinic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	Reconstitution of apos; oxidase activity in membranes derived from a 5 aminolaevulinic acid requiring a dapos; escherichia coli mutant.
10	the 3 terminal sequence of escherichia coli 16s ribosomal rna complementarity to nonsense triplets and ribosome binding sites	L&apos 3 terminal sequence; escherichia coli 16s ribosomal rna complementarity with absurd triplets and ribosome binding sites.
10	regulation of the pool size of valine in escherichia coli k 12	Regulation of pool size of valine in escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of escherichia coli flagellar mutants that are insensitive to catabolite repression	Characterization of escherichia coli flagellar mutants that are insensitive to catabolite repression.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid directed in vitro synthesis of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli k 12	L' deoxyribonucleic acid directed in vitro synthesis of ilev-specific messenger ribonucleic acid by extracts of d' escherichia coli k12.
10	r6k plasmid replication influence of chromosomal genotype in minicell producing strains of escherichia coli k 12	The influence of chromosomal genotype on r6k plasmid replication in d&apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 producing minicells has been demonstrated.
10	role of atp in excision repair of ultraviolet radiation damage in escherichia coli	Role of apo; atp in excision repair of ultraviolet radiation damage in escherichia coli.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 missing acetolactate synthase activity	The mutant d' escherichia coli k 12 does not have any acetolactate synthase activity.
10	streptomycin induced synthesis of abnormal protein in an escherichia coli mutant	Streptomycin induced synthesis of abnormal proteins in a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	lactose permeation via the arabinose transport system in escherichia coli k 12	Permeation of lactose via the arabinose transport system in escherichia coli k.
10	interrelationship of repair mechanisms in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	Interrelation of repair mechanisms in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli.
10	thymineless mutagenesis in escherichia coli	Thymine-free mutagenesis in Escherichia coli.
10	effect of r factor mediated genes on some surface properties of escherichia coli	The effect of r factor mediated genes on certain surface properties of escherichia coli has been studied.
10	genetic mapping of the antigenic determinants of two polysaccharide k antigens k10 and k54 in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of the antigenic determinants of two polysaccharide antigens k10 and k54 in escherichia coli.
10	evidence for specific control of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Evidence for specific control of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	transcriptional control in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	Transcriptional control in the arabinose l operon of the apos; escherichia coli b r.
10	influence of protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis on the replication of the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in escherichia coli cells and minicells	L' influence of protein synthesis and apos; ribonucleic acid on the replication of bacteriocinogen factor clo df13 in apos cells and minicells; Escherichia coli.
10	identification of messenger ribonucleic acids and proteins synthesized by the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in purified minicells of escherichia coli	Identification of the ribonucleic acids and proteins synthesized by the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in purified minicells of d' escherichia coli.
10	nonreplicated dna and dna fragments in t4 r bacteriophage particles phenotypic mixing of a phage protein	DNA and DNA fragments; non-replicated DNA in bacteriophage t4 r particles phenotypic mixture d'apos; phagic protein.
10	asparagine utilization in escherichia coli	Apos; asparagine in escherichia coli.
10	analysis of the growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	Analysis of the growth of recombinant-deficient strains of escherichia coli.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 biochemical and genetic characterization of a mutant unable to convert chorismate into 4 hydroxybenzoate	Apos biosynthesis; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12 and biochemical and genetic characterization of apos; a mutant unable to convert chorismate to 4 hydroxybenzoates.
10	studies on l serine deaminase in escherichia coli k 12	Studies of serine deaminase in estuos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic analysis of thymidine resistant and low thymine requiring mutants of escherichia coli k 12 induced by bacteriophage mu 1	Genetic analysis of thymidine resistance and low thymine requiring d&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 induced by bacteriophage mu 1 was performed.
10	effect of a leu linked mutation on the valine sensitivity of acetohydroxy acid synthase activity in escherichia coli	Effect of leu mutation on valine sensitivity of apos; acetoxy synthase activity in escherichia coli.
10	mutation affecting regulation of synthesis of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting regulation of biosynthesis; acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12.
10	enzymatic production of deoxyribonucleic acid double strand breaks after ultraviolet irradiation of escherichia coli k 12	The enzymatic production of deoxyribonucleic acid (DAC) double strands breaks down after apos; ultraviolet irradiation of apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	mut 25 a mutation to mutator linked to pura in escherichia coli	A mutation to a mutant linked to pura in Escherichia coli.
10	growth of bacteriophages ms2 and t7 on streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Growth of bacteriophages ms2 and t7 on streptomycin-resistant mutants of d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet light sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying ruv mutations in combination with uvra or lon mutant alleles	The ultraviolet sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying ruv mutations in combination with uvra or lon mutant alleles.
10	the fate of ribosomes in escherichia coli cells starved for a carbon source	The fate of ribosomes in Escherichia coli cells is a carbon source.
10	the recbc deoxyribonuclease of escherichia coli isolation and characterization of the subunit proteins and reconstitution of the enzyme	Deoxyribonuclease recbc of apos; isolation of escherichia coli and characterization of sub@-@unit proteins and reconstitution of the enzyme.
10	host dna degradation after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4 dependence of the alternate pathway of degradation which occurs in the absence of both t4 endonuclease ii and nuclear disruption on t4 endonuclease iv	The degradation of the host's DNA after infection; escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4 depends on the other degradation pathway that occurs in the absence of apos; endonuclease ii t4 and nuclear disorganization on apos; endonuclease iv.
10	induction by mutagens of tandem gene duplications in the glys region of the escherichia coli chromosome	Induction by mutagens of tandem gene duplications in the gly-region of the d' escherichia coli chromosome.
10	biological activity of t4 dna synthesized in toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Biological activity of t4 DNA synthesized in toluene-treated cells; escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in leucyl phenylalanyl trna protein transferase	A mutant d' escherichia coli defective in leucyl phenylalanyl trna protein transferase.
10	translational reinitiation reinitiation of lac repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the lac i gene of escherichia coli	Translational reboot of repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the lac i gene of l' escherichia coli.
10	the roles of the lambda c3 gene and the escherichia coli catabolite gene activation system in the establishment of lysogeny by bacteriophage lambda	The roles of the lambda c3 gene and the apos system; activation of the catabolite d&apos gene; Escherichia coli in the apos; establishment of the lysogeny by the lambda bacteriophage.
10	divergent operons and the genetic structure of the maltose b region in escherichia coli k12	Divergent operations and genetic structure of the maltose b region in escherichia coli k12.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli mutant with a lesion in stable rna turnover	DNA analysis of a Escherichia coli mutant with a lesion in stable rna turnover.
10	oxidative phosphorylation in escherichia coli k12 an uncoupled mutant with altered membrane structure	Oxidative phosphorylation in escherichia coli k12 is a decoupled mutant with altered membrane structure.
10	the threonine sensitive homoserine dehydrogenase and aspartokinase activities of escherichia coli k12 distribution and accessibility to antibodies of some epitopes of the bifunctional enzyme	The threonine sensitive homoserine dehydrogenase and aspartokinase activities of the d&apos distribution; escherichia coli k12 and their availability to antibodies of certain epitopes of the bifunctional enzyme.
10	comparison of the mutagenic effects of 35s decay in escherichia coli strains wp 2 and wp 2s	Comparison of the mutagenic effects of 35s decomposition in strains wp 2 and wp 2s d' escherichia coli.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group a	The genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k12 crossbreeds resistance among colicins in group a.
10	dnab gene of escherichia coli k 12 affects superinfection inhibition between f plasmids	The gene dnab d' escherichia coli k 12 affects the ability to inhibit superinfection between plasmids f.
10	effect of uncouplers on downhill beta galactoside transport in energy depleted cells of escherichia coli	Effect of uncouplers on beta-galactoside downward transport in energy depleted cells of d' escherichia coli.
10	lambda bacteriophage gene produces and x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli comparison of red dependent and gam dependent radioresistance	The lambda bacteriophage gene produces and x sensitivity to apos; escherichia coli by comparison of red- and gamma-dependent radioresistance.
10	amplification of sex repressor function of one fi r factor during anaerobic growth of escherichia coli	Enhancement of sex repressive function of apo; a reliable factor during anaerobic growth of apo; escherichia coli.
10	variation in expression of sex factor genes in the proteus providencia group relative to escherichia coli	Variation of l' expression of sex factor genes in the providencia proteus group relative to escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerance and map location of conjugation deficient mutants	Colicin tolerance and map location of conjugative deficient mutants.
10	quantitation of the loss of the bacteriophage lambda receptor protein from the outer membrane of lipopolysaccharide deficient strains of escherichia coli	Quantification of loss of the lambda receptor protein from the outer membrane bacteriophage of lipopolysaccharide-deficient strains of d' escherichia coli.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli methylgalactoside transport system by gene mgld	Regulation of the methylgalactoside transport system by the mgld gene; escherichia coli.
10	genetic and physiological analysis of an envb spherelike mutant of escherichia coli k 12 and characterization of its transductants	Genetic and physiological analysis of a spherical-type mutant of escherichia coli k 12 and characterization of its transducers.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group b	The genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k12 crossbreeds resistance among colicins in group b.
10	tryptophan operon read through isolation and characterization of an abnormally long tryptophan synthetase alpha subunit from a frame shift mutant of escherichia coli	L' tryptophan operon reads throughout; isolation and characterization of apos; an abnormally long tryptophan synthetase alpha unit from apos; a mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage t7 deoxyribonucleic acid replication in vitro a protein of escherichia coli required for bacteriophage t7 dna polymerase activity	In vitro replication of bacteriophage t7 in apos; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) protein; escherichia coli required for apos; bacteriophage t7 dna polymerase activity in vitro.
10	isolation and characterization of mutator strains of escherichia coli k 12	The isolation and characterization of mutant strains of Escherichia coli.
10	regulation of galactose operon at the gal operator promoter region in escherichia coli k 12	Apos regulation; galactose operon in the promoter region of apos; gal operator in escherichia coli k 12.
10	five control systems preventing transfer of escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	Five control systems preventing transfer of escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f.
10	rapid cessation of phospholipid synthesis in fructose 1 6 diphosphate aldolase mutants of escherichia coli	Rapid cessation of phospholipid synthesis in fructose 16 diphosphate aldolase mutants of escherichia coli.
10	location of the escherichia coli k 12 ruv gene affecting septum formation after inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Location of apos ruv gene; escherichia coli k 12 affecting septum formation after inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis.
10	a third kasugamycin resistance locus ksgc affecting ribosomal protein s2 in escherichia coli k 12	A third kasugamycin resistance locus, ksgc, affects ribosomal protein s2 of l' escherichia coli k12.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k12 unable to grow on non fermentable carbon substrates	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 unable to grow on nonfermentable carbon substrates.
10	restriction of dna in yersinia enterocolitica detected by recipient ability for a derepressed r factor from escherichia coli	Limiting dosage; DNA in yersinia enterocolitica detected by recipient ability to derepress the r factor of dosage; escherichia coli.
10	inhibition and amplification of the radiation induced degradation of dna in escherichia coli	Inhibition and amplification of the degradation of radiation-induced DNA in escherichia coli.
10	male specific bacteriophage ms2 propagation in fluorophenylalanine resistant escherichia coli k12	Male specific bacteriophage ms2 propagation in fluorophenylalanine resistance escherichia coli k12.
10	does phospholipase have a role in killing and sodium dodecyl sulfate lysis of t4 ghost infected escherichia coli	Phospholipase plays a role in the elimination and lysis of sodium dodecyl sulfate from apos; escherichia coli t4 infected by a phantom?
10	ultraviolet mutagenesis and its repair in an escherichia coli strain containing a nonsense codon	Ultraviolet mutagenesis and its repair in an Escherichia coli strain containing an absurd codon.
10	regulation of the beta glucoside system in escherchia coli k 12	Regulation of the beta system-glucoside in escherchia coli k 12.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 detection and measurement of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid	Isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12, detection and measurement of lacid; specific messenger ribonucleic acid; ilv.
10	the rep mutation iii altered structure of the replicating escherichia coli chromosome	The repi mutation altered the structure of the replicating d' escherichia coli.
10	source of energy for the escherichia coli galactose transport systems induced by galactose	E. coli is a source of energy for the galactose-induced transport systems; E. coli.
10	dna synthesis dependent cell division of escherichia coli 15 tau after arginine and uracil starvation	DNA synthesis is dependent on cell division of escherichia coli 15 tau after arginine and uracil deprivation.
10	chemical studies on damages of escherichea coli by the immune bactericidal reaction ii release of phosphatidylethanolamine from a phospholipase a deficient mutant of e coli during the immune bactericidal reaction	Chemical studies of damage caused to escherichea coli by the immune bactericidal reaction release of phosphatidylethanolamine from apos; phospholipase, a mutant defective from apos; e coli, during the bactericidal immune response.
10	isolation of a metabolite capable of differentially supporting the growth of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Isolation of a metabolite capable of differentially supporting the growth of auxotrophs; adenine dinucleotide nicotinamide; escherichia coli.
10	the reconstitution of functional respiratory chains in membranes from electron transport deficient mutants of escherichia coli as demonstrated by quenching of atebrin fluorescence	The reconstitution of functional respiratory chains in the membranes of mutants defective in electron transport of escherichia coli was demonstrated by the extinction of spinal fluorescence.
10	recombination and the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	Recombination and escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f.
10	characteristics of cold sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12 defective in deoxyribonucleic acid replication	Characteristics of cold-sensitive mutants d'apos; escherichia coli k 12 defective in deoxyribonucleic acid replication.
10	evidence for common binding sites for ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in the cell envelope of escherichia coli	Evidence of common binding sites for ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in apos; cell envelope of apos; escherichia coli.
10	anaerobic cytochrome b1 in escherichia coli association with and regulation of nitrate reductase	Anerobic cytochrome b1 in escherichia coli association with nitrate reductase and nitrate reductase control.
10	synthesis of nitrate reductase components in chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Synthesis of nitrate reductase components in chlorate-resistant mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	biochemistry and genetics of klebsiella pneumoniae mutant strains unable to fix n2	Biochemistry and genetics of klebsiella pneumoniae mutant strains unable to bind n2.
10	regulation of branched chain aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in an ilvdac deletion strain of escherichia coli k 12	The regulation of branched amino-chain transfer ribonucleic acids synthetases (RACs) in a dolphin-deleted strain of escherichia coli k12; ilvdac.
10	bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli k 12 general pattern of resistance	Bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli k 12 general pattern of resistance.
10	modification of escherichia coli membranes in the prereplicative phase of phage t4 infection specificity of association and quantitation of bound phage proteins	Modification of membranes; escherichia coli in the pre-replicative phase of phage t4 specificity; association and quantification of phage t4 bound proteins for phage t4; phage t4 infection.
10	escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acids are not cut from an intact precursor molecule	Escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acids are not cut from intact precursor molecules.
10	induction and mutagenesis of prophage lambda in escherichia coli k12 by metabolites of aflatoxin b1	Lambda prophage induction and mutagenesis in escherichia coli k12 by metabolites of l' aflatoxin b1.
10	pleiotropic effects of a dna adenine methylation mutation dam 3 in escherichia coli k12	Pleiotropic effects of apos methylation mutation; adenine of apos; DNA, dam 3 in escherichia coli k12.
10	effects of dna polymerase defective and recombination deficient mutations on the ultraviolet sensitivity of bacillus subtilis spores	Effects of DNA- and recombinant-deficient mutations on the ultraviolet sensitivity of bacillus subtilis spores.
10	mutagenic properties of cis plantinum ii diammino dichloride in escherichia coli	Mutagenic properties of cis plantinum ii diammino dichloride in escherichia coli.
10	stringent control of ribosomal protein gene expression in escherichia coli	Strict control of ribosomal protein gene expression in escherichia coli.
10	a new relaxed mutant of escherichia coli with an altered 50s ribosomal subunit	A new, relaxed mutant of escherichia coli with an altered 50s ribosomal unit (RU) under.
10	direction of transcription of the regulatory gene arac in escherichia coli b r	Direction of transcription of the arac regulatory gene in escherichia coli b r.
10	fine structure mapping complementation and physiology of escherichia coli hfl mutants	Fine structure mapping, complementation and physiology of hfl d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	an endonuclease from escherichia coli that acts preferentially on uv irradiated dna and is absent from the uvra and uvrb mutants	An escherichia coli endonuclease that acts preferentially on the apos-irradiated DNA; uv and is absent from the uvra and uvrb mutants.
10	biogenesis of membrane lipids mutants of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive phosphatidylserine decarboxylase	Biogenesis of membrane lipids with heat-sensitive phosphatidylserine decarboxylase mutants; escherichia coli.
10	metabolites influence control of lysine transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli k 12	Metabolites influence the control of lysine transfer synthetase formation in escherichia coli k 12.
10	a ribonucleoprotein precursor of both the 30s and 50s ribosomal sunbunits of escherichia coli	It is a ribonucleoprotein precursor to the sunflowers of the 1930s and 1950s.
10	inhibition of polypeptide chain initiation in escherichia coli by elongation factor g	Apos inhibition; polypeptide chain initiation in escherichia coli by apos-factor; g-elongation.
10	effect of a low molecular weight dna binding protein h1 factor on the in vitro transcription of the lactose operon in escherichia coli	The effect of a h1 binding protein on the in vitro transcription of apos; a low molecular weight DNA; a lactose operon in escherichia coli.
10	a deletion mutation placing the galactokinase gene of escherichia coli under control of the biotin promoter	A deletion mutation placing the galactokinase gene under the control of the biotin promoter.
10	accumulation of toxic concentrations of methylglyoxal by wild type escherichia coli k 12	Accumulation of toxic concentrations of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli k 12 of the wild type.
10	ribosomal proteins in plastids of a mendelian and a nonmendelian streptomycin resistant mutant of chlamydomonas reinhardii determined by two dimensional gel electrophoresis	The ribosomal proteins in the plastids of Mendelian and d' a non-Mendelian streptomycin-resistant mutant of Chlamydomonas reinhardii were determined by two-dimensional gel electrophoresis.
10	the development and the reversion of spheroplasts of a diaminopimelic acid auxotrophic mutant of escherichia coli	The development and reversion of spheroplasts d'apos; a mutant auxotrophic to l'apos; diaminopimelic acid d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	metabolite transport in mutants of escherichia coli k12 defective in electron transport and coupled phosphorylation	Metabolite transport in mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 is deficient in electron transport and coupled phosphorylation.
10	biosynthesis of bacterial menaquinones menaquinone mutants of escherichia coli	Menaquinones menaquinone mutants of escherichia coli for bacterial biosynthesis.
10	alteration of regulation of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli w by mutation to rifampin resistance	Modification of the regulation of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli w by mutation to rifampin resistance.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in normal and t4 infected escherichia coli effect of pola and other mutations	L' excision of pyrimidine dimers in normal and t4 escherichia coli infected strains; effects of pola and d' other mutations.
10	stimulatory effect of hydrostatic pressure on cell division in cultures of escherichia coli	An effect of hydrostatic pressure on cell division in cultures of escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of excision repair without influence upon uv sensitivity and uv mutability in escherichia coli b r hcr	Repair inhibition; excision without influence on sensitivity to apos; uv and mutability of apos; uv in escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in removing 3 terminal nucleotides from some transfer rna precursor molecules	An escherichia coli mutant that does not remove 3 terminal nucleotides from some precursor molecules of the transfer.
10	effect of procaine hydrochloride on dna repair in escherichia coli	Effect of procaine hydrochloride on DNA repair in Escherichia coli.
10	mutations in escherichia coli k 12 decreasing the rate of streptomycin uptake synergism with r factor mediated capacity to inactivate streptomycin	Mutations in escherichia coli k 12 have decreased the level of drug synergy; sorption of streptomycin with r-factor-mediated capacity; inactivation of streptomycin.
10	energy linked reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in membranes derived from normal and various respiratory deficient mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	The reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in membranes derived from normal mutant strains and various respiratory deficient strains of escherichia coli k12 is energy dependent.
10	the atp dependent dnaase from escherichia coli rora a nuclease with changed enzymatic properties	Apos-dependent dnaase; dapos; escherichia coli rora a nuclease whose enzymatic properties have changed.
10	30 s pre ribosomal rna of escherichia coli primary and secondary processing	Thirty s pre ribosomal rna of primary and secondary transformation of d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and initial characterization of glutathione deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and initial characterization of glutathione deficient d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophage lambda carrying genes of the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	Isolate the specialized transducing bacteriophage lambda carrying the genes of l' operon arabinose l; escherichia coli b r.
10	role of pyrimidine dimer excision in loss of potential streptomycin resistance mutations of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli on phosphate buffered agar	Role of apos; pyrimidine dimer excision in loss of potential streptomycin-resistant mutations of apos; apos irradiated escherichia coli; ultraviolet on phosphate-buffered agar.
10	two modes of excision repair in toluene treated escherichia coli	Two modes of repair of l' excision in escherichia coli treated with toluene.
10	individuality of mannonate and altronate hydro lyases in escherichia coli k 12	The individuality of mannonate and altronate hydrolyses in escherichia coli k 12 is demonstrated.
10	n terminal amino acid sequences of d serine deaminases of wild type and operator constitutive strains of escherichia coli k 12	N serine deaminase terminal amino acid sequences from wild-type serine deaminases and component strains of apos; operators; and escherichia coli k 12.
10	inhibition of escherichia coli isoleucine biosynthesis by isoleucine tetrazole	Inhibition of biosynthesis isoleucine dos; escherichia coli by apos; tetrazole isoleucine.
10	accumulation of arginine precursors in escherichia coli effects on growth enzyme repression and application to the forward selection of arginine auxotrophs	Accumulation of apo precursors; arginine in effects of escherichia coli on growth enzyme repression and their application to direct selection of auxotrophs; arginine.
10	genetic analyses of an amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid ligase and viability	Genetic analysis showed that an amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affected deoxyribonucleic acid ligase and viability.
10	production of cells without deoxyribonucleic acid during thymidine starvation of lexa cultures of escherichia coli k 12	Production of cells without deoxyribonucleic acid during thymidine deprivation in lexa d' escherichia coli k 12 cultures.
10	ribosomal distribution in a polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	Ribosomal distribution in a polyamine auxotrophic bacterium; escherichia coli.
10	operator constitutive mutants in the threonine operon of escherichia coli k 12	Mutant constitutive operator in the threonine operon of escherichia coli k 12.
10	translocation of the tetracycline resistance determinant from r100 1 to the escherichia coli k 12 chromosome	Translocation of the tetracycline resistance determinant from r100 1 to the k chromosome 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	uroporphyrin accumulating mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Mutant d'apos; escherichia coli k 12 accumulating uroporphyrin.
10	physiological suppression of a transport defect in escherichia coli mutants deficient in ca2 mg2 stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	Physiological suppression of a transport defect in ca2 mg2-deficient Escherichia coli mutants stimulated apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	anaerobic energy yielding reaction associated with transhydrogenation from glycerol 3 phosphate to fumarate by an escherichia coli system	Anerobic energy associated with the transhydrogenation of glycerol 3 phosphate to fumarate by an escherichia coli system.
10	electron transport chain from glycerol 3 phosphate to nitrate in escherichia coli	Electrons from glycerol 3 phosphate to nitrate in escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid modification by intermediate type modification mutants of escherichia coli k 12 and b	Modification of the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid by intermediate modification mutants; escherichia coli k 12 and b.
10	comparison of lipopolysaccharides from agmenellum quadruplicatum to escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium by using thin layer chromatography	Compare lipopolysaccharides of apos; agmenellum quadruplicatum with those of escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium by thin-layer chromatography.
10	unusual membranous structures in minicells and minicell producing strains of escherichia coli	Unusual membranous structures in minicells and minicells producing strains of d' escherichia coli.
10	regulation of methionine transport activity in escherichia coli	The regulation of methionine transport activity in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of lambda transducing bacteriophages for the su1 supd minus amber suppressor of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of the lambda transducing bacteriophages for the suppressor su1 sup d less amber of l'apos; escherichia coli.
10	maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	Escherichia coli maltosis chemoreceptor.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the electrophoretic mobility of malate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of mutations affecting the electrophoretic mobility of malate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12.
10	analysis of glutamate exit in escherichia coli	Analysis of glutamate output in escherichia coli.
10	deletion of the escherichia coli crp gene	Deletion of the escherichia coli gene.
10	properties of alpha dehydrobiotin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Properties of d' escherichia coli k 12 resistant; alpha @-dehydrobiotin.
10	xanthosine 5 phosphate amidotransferase from escherichia coli	Xanthosine 5 phosphate amidotransferase from Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis effect of cessation of net phospholipid synthesis on cytoplasmic and outer membranes	The effect of d' escherichia coli mutants defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis was a cessation of net phospholipid synthesis on cytoplasmic and outer membranes.
10	transport of purines and deoxyadenosine in escherichia coli	Transport of purines and deoxyadenosine in escherichia coli.
10	transfection of escherichia coli spheroplasts vi transfection of nonpermissive spheroplasts by t5 and bf23 bacteriophage dna carrying amber mutations in dna transfer genes	Transfection of d' Escherichia coli spheroplasts vi transfection of non-permissive spheroplasts by bacteriophages t5 and bf23 carrying amber mutations in d' DNA transfer genes.
10	a new method for the isolation of methionyl transfer rna synthetase mutants from escherichia coli	A novel method for the isolation of methionyl transfer rna synthetase mutants from l' escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the regualtion of biotin synthesis in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of mutations affecting the regualization of biotin synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	effect of l azetidine 2 carboxylic acid on growth and proline metabolism in escherichia coli	Effect of lazetidine 2 carboxylic acid on growth and proline metabolism in escherichia coli.
10	inducibility of beta glucuronidase in wild type and hexuronate negative mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The indutibility of beta glucuronidase in wild-type and hexuronate negative mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 is confirmed.
10	selection procedure for mutants defective in the beta methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli utilizing the compound 2r glyceryl beta d galactopyranoside	Procedure for the selection of mutants defective in the beta transport system-methylgalactosides d' escherichia coli using 2r glyceryl beta d galactopyranoside.
10	changes in the biochemical properties of shigella flexneri la as a result of recombination with escherichia coli k12	Changes in the biochemical properties of shigella flexneri resulting from the recombination with escherichia coli k12.
10	mutations affecting aromatic amino acid transport in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Mutations affecting aromatic amino acid transport in escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	r factor tetracycline and chloramphenicol resistance in escherichia coli k12 cmlb mutants	R factor tetracycline and chloramphenicol resistance in escherichia coli k12 cmlb mutants.
10	genes involved in the uptake and catabolism of gluconate by escherichia coli	The genes involved in the uptake and catabolism of gluconate by escherichia coli.
10	effect of inorganic phosphate on acridine inhibition and plasmid curing in escherichia coli	Effect of inorganic phosphate on apos, acridine inhibition and plasmid cure in escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by nitrosoguanidine ethyl methanesulfonate and mutator gene muth in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Mutagenesis by nitrosoguanidine ethyl methanesulfonate and mutator gene muth in continuous cultures of escherichia coli.
10	use of repair deficient strains of escherichia coli and liver microsomes to detect and characterise dna damage caused by pyrrolizidine alkaloids heliotrine and monocrotaline	Use of repair-deficient strains of d' escherichia coli and liver microsomes to detect and characterize DNA damage caused by pyrrolizidine alkaloids, l' heliotrin and monocrotaline.
10	mutation and dna replication in escherichia coli treated with low concentrations of n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	DNA replication and mutation in Escherichia coli treated with low concentrations of n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine.
10	ultraviolet light induced responses of an mfd mutant of escherichia coli b r having a slow rate of dimer excision	Ultraviolet light induced responses to a mfd dapos mutant; escherichia coli b r with a slow rate of dapos; excision of dimers.
10	regulation of early mrna synthesis after bacteriophage t4 infection of escherichia coli	Regulation of early mrna synthesis after bacteriophage t4 infection d' escherichia coli.
10	studies on the de novo biosynthesis of nad in escherichia coli the separation of the nadb gene product from the nada gene product and its purification	Studies of de novo nad biosynthesis in escherichia coli, the separation of the nadb gene product from the nada gene product, and its purification.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 synthesis of rna and protein in t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	F-factor-mediated restriction of the synthesis of rna and bacteriophage t7 proteins in f and f cells; escherichia coli infected by t7.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 protein synthesis in cell free systems from t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	F-factor-mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 protein synthesis in cell-free systems of f- and f- infected cells; escherichia coli.
10	experimental escherichia coli urinary infection in the rat	Experimental urinary infection with Escherichia coli in the rat.
10	comparative analysis of deletion and base change mutabilities of escherichia coli b strains differing in dna repair capacity wild type uvra pola reca by various mutagens	Comparative analysis of deletion and base-change mutabilities of dapos strains; escherichia coli b strains with a DNA repair capacity different from that of lapos; uvra pola reca wild type by various mutagens.
10	isolation and characteristics of uv resistant revertants of reca strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characteristics of resistant revertants; uv strains recovered; and escherichia coli k.
10	endonucleolytic incision of x irradiated deoxyribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli	Endonucleolytic incision of deoxyribonucleic acid x irradiated by extracts of apos; escherichia coli.
10	dna synthesis involving a complexes form of dna polymerase i in extracts of escherichia coli	DNA synthesis involving a complex form of DNA; DNA polymerase i in extracts of escherichia coli.
10	permeability lesions in male escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t7	Permeability damage in male escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t7.
10	elevated mutability of pola derivatives of escherichia coli b r at sublethal doses of ultraviolet light evidence for an inducible error prone repair system sos repair and its anomalous expression in these strains	Increased mutability of polar derivatives of escherichia coli b r at sublethal doses of ultraviolet light demonstrates the existence of apos; an inducible and error-prone repair system and its abnormal expression in these strains.
10	model for regulation of escherichia coli dna repair functions	Model for regulation of repair functions of apos; d*apos DNA; escherichia coli.
10	transport properties of merodiploids covering the daga locus in escherichia coli k 12	Transport properties of merodiploids covering the daga locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	suppression of spectinomycin resistance in a mutant of escherichia coli k 12	The suppression of spectinomycin resistance in a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 was carried out.
10	genetic characterization of the metk locus in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic characterization of the metk locus in escherichia coli k 12.
10	specialized peptide transport system in escherichia coli	Specialized peptide transport system in escherichia coli.
10	multiplicity of oligopeptide transport systems in escherichia coli	The multiplicity of oligopeptide transport systems in escherichia coli.
10	d alanine requiring cell wall mutant of escherichia coli	Alanine requiring a cell wall mutant of escherichia coli.
10	derivation of glycine from threonine in escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Derivation of glycine from threonine in 12-dos; escherichia coli mutants.
10	relationship between chromosome replication and cell division in a thymineless mutant of escherichia coli b r	Relationship between chromosomal replication and cell division in a thymine-free mutant d' escherichia coli b r.
10	transport of l 4 azaleucine in escherichia coli	Transport of azaleucine in escherichia coli.
10	utilization of selected leucine peptide amides by escherichia coli	Use of selected leucine peptide amides by escherichia coli.
10	regulation of the lysine biosynthetic pathway in escherichia coli k 12 isolation of a cis dominant constitutive mutant for ak iii synthesis	The regulation of the lysine biosynthetic pathway in escherichia coli k 12 isolates d&apos, a dominant constitutive mutant for ak iii synthesis.
10	induction of lactose transport in escherichia coli during the absence of phospholipid synthesis	Induction of lactose transport in escherichia coli during the absence of phospholipid synthesis.
10	mating aggregates in escherichia coli conjugation	Aggregates; mating in Escherichia coli conjugation.
10	genes for ribitol and d arabitol catabolism in escherichia coli their loci in c strains and absence in k 12 and b strains	The genes responsible for ribitol and d arabitol catabolism in escherichia coli are their loci in c strains and their absence in k12 and b strains.
10	intrinsic and extrinsic light responses of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli	Salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli are intrinsic and extrinsic reactions.
10	enhanced level and metabolic regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in different strains of escherichia coli k 12	Rate and metabolic regulation of methionyltransfer of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase in different strains of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	unusual sensitivity of escherichia coli to adenine or adenine plus histidine	Unusual sensitivity of apo; Escherichia coli to adenine or adenine; adenine plus histidine.
10	effect of tsl mutations on col e1 expression in a reca strain of escherichia coli k 12	Effect of mutations on colon expression in a recipient strain; escherichia coli k 12 of receipt.
10	evidence for binding protein independent substrate translocation by the methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli k12	Translocation of the substrate independent of the binding protein by the methylgalactoside transport system of apos; escherichia coli k12.
10	production and biological properties of l like mutants 11r of escherichia coli	Production and biological properties of the mutants 11r d' escherichia coli.
10	effect of different mutations in ribosomal protein s5 of escherichia coli on translational fidelity	Effect of different mutations in ribosomal protein s5 d' escherichia coli on translational fidelity.
10	distribution in nature of r factors that increase susceptibility to rifampin of rif r mutants in escherichia coli	Distribution in nature of r factors that increase the susceptibility to rifampin of r mutants in escherichia coli.
10	genetical studies of serum resistance in escherichia coli	Genetic studies of serum resistance in escherichia coli.
10	integration at hag or elsewhere of h2 phase 2 flagellin genes transduced from salmonella to escherichia coli	Integration of salmonella to escherichia coli phase 2 h2 flagellin genes at the wizard level or elsewhere.
10	effect of some aminoglycosides upon a drug dependent escherichia coli strain	The effect of certain aminoglycosides on a drug-dependent strain of Escherichia coli.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides relationship between the synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid and the thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12	Studies of the relationship between intracellular thymidine nucleotides and the synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid and the thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12.
10	plasmid incompatibility and control of replication copy mutants of the r factor r1 in escherichia coli k 12	Plasmid incompatibility and control of replication of mutant copies of r1 factor in escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	further characterization of a non essential mutator gene in escherichia coli k 12	Further characterization of a mutant gene not essential in escherichia coli k 12.
10	relationship between the tonb locus and iron transport in escherichia coli	Relationship between the tonb locus and iron transport in escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and mapping of escherichia coli mutants blocked in the synthesis of ornithine decarboxylase	Characterization and mapping of d&apos mutants; escherichia coli blocked in the synthesis of ornithine decarboxylase.
10	tryptophan synthetase alpha 5 7 s novel molecular species formed within escherichia coli	The tryptophan synthetase alpha 5 s forms new molecular species in escherichia coli.
10	identification of the dicyclohexylcarbodiimide reactive protein component of the adenosine 5 triphosphate energy transducing system of escherichia coli	Identification of the dicyclohexylcarbodiimide reactive protein of the l&apos transduction system; l&apos triphosphate energy; adenosine 5 in escherichia coli.
10	interaction of p2 bacteriophage with the dnab gene of escherichia coli	Interaction of p2 with the dnab gene of Escherichia coli.
10	genetic control of multiple pathways of post replicational repair in uvrb strains of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mastery of multiple repair pathways in uvrb d&apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 in uvrb strains.
10	sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Sucrose-dependent mutants of spectinomycin-resistant escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii activity in an escherichia coli mutator strain	A deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii activity in a mutant strain of Escherichia coli.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in toluene treated escherichia coli	L' excision of pyrimidine dimers in toluene treated escherichia coli.
10	cis dominant transfer deficient mutants of the escherichia coli k 12 f sex factor	Words-key: dominant cis mutants deficient in sex factor transfer k 12 f of l' escherichia coli.
10	isolation of escherichia coli k 12 mutants with altered level of beta n acetylglucosaminidase	To isolate mutants k 12 d' escherichia coli that have an altered level of acetylglucosaminidase beta.
10	increased loss of duplicated genes in streptomycin resistant stra mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Increased loss of duplicated genes in d' escherichia coli k 12 streptomycin-resistant stratiform mutants.
10	genetic study of escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to 2 6 diaminopurine	Genetic study of d' escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to 26 diaminopurine.
10	a further study of the nature of phenotypical reversions in thymidine phosphorylase deletion mutants of escherichia coli k 12	A further study of the nature of phenotypic reversions in thymidine phosphorylase deletion mutants of l' escherichia coli k 12 was carried out.
10	coupling of rates of transcription translation and messenger ribonucleic acid degradation in streptomycin dependent mutants of escherichia coli	Coupling of rats of translational and messenger ribonucleic acid degradation in streptomycin dependent mutants of escherichia coli.
10	nature of the energy requirement for the irreversible adsorption of bacteriophages t1 and phi80 to escherichia coli	Nature of the energy required; irreversible adsorption of bacteriophages t1 and phi80 to Escherichia coli.
10	coordinated alterations in ribosomes and cytoplasmic membrane in sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Coordinated alterations of the ribosomes and cytoplasmic membrane were observed in sucrose-dependent, spectinomycin-resistant Escherichia coli mutants.
10	suppressor induced structural changes in a missense l ribulokinase of escherichia coli	The suppressor induced structural changes in a missense d' escherichia coli ribulokinase.
10	effect of enrichment procedure upon auxotroph recovery in escherichia coli k 12	Effect of procedure; enrichment on recovery of apotism; auxotrophs in escherichia coli.
10	reca dependent inactivation of the lambda repressor in escherichia coli lysogens by gamma radiation and by tif expression	Inactivation by gamma radiation and by tif expression of the lambda repressor in the lysogens d' escherichia coli.
10	is1 and is2 mutations in the ribosomal protein genes of e coli k 12	Est1 and est2 mutations in the ribosomal protein genes of e coli k 12 k.
10	alteration of ribosomal proteins in revertants of a valyl trna synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Modification of ribosomal proteins in the valyl trna synthetase mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	analysis of ribosomal proteins in streptomycin resistant and dependent mutants isolated from streptomycin independent escherichia coli strains	L' analysis of ribosomal proteins in streptomycin-dependent and streptomycin-resistant mutants isolated from streptomycin-independent Escherichia coli strains.
10	cooperative control of translation fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli i properties of ribosomal mutants whose resistance to neamine is the cumulative effect of two distinct mutations	Co-operative verification of translation fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli i properties of ribosomal mutants with l*apos resistance to neamin; cumulative effect of two distinct mutations.
10	non enzymatic translocation in ribosomes from streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Non-enzymatic transfer in ribosomes of streptomycin-resistant mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	phileomycin induced lethality and dna degradation in escherichia coli k12	Phileomycin induced lethality and DNA degradation in escherichia coli k12.
10	strains of escherichia coli diploid for the chromosomal origin of dna replication	Diploid strains of escherichia coli for apos; chromosomal origin of apos replication; DNA.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli auxotrophic for organic phosphates evidence for two defects in inorganic phosphate transport	An auxotrophic escherichia coli mutant for organic phosphates demonstrates two defects in inorganic phosphate transport.
10	induction of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Induction of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	infectivity of different forms of lambda bacteriophage dna in transfection of calcinated escherichia coli	Infectivity of different forms of apo; lambda bacteriophage DNA in transfection of calcined escherichia coli.
10	the regulation of transcription in bacteriophage t5 infected escherichia coli	Regulation of transcription in bacteriophage t5 infected escherichia coli.
10	overproduction of lysine by mutant strains of escherichia coli with defective lysine transport systems	Overproduction of lysine by mutant strains of escherichia coli with defective lysine transport systems.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis mutations distant from the tryptophanase gene	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis mutations remotely from the tryptophanase gene.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis tryptophanase promoter like mutations	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis promoter, such as mutation-like mutations.
10	energy requirements for biosynthesis of dna in escherichia coli role of membrane bound energy transducing atpase coupling factor	The energy requirements for biosynthesis of proteins; DNA in cells; escherichia coli play the role of the coupling factor of the apos; transducer atpase of the apos; membrane energy in the apos; escherichia coli.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 vii purification of the soluble atpase of supernatant extracts and kinetics of incorporation into reconstituted particles	Membrane reconstruction in chl os mutants; escherichia coli k 12 vii purification of apos; soluble apos apase; kinetic and supernatant extracts of apos; incorporation into reconstituted particles.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 viii purification and properties of the fa factor the product of the chl b gene	Membrane reconstruction in purification chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 viii and fa factor properties, the product of the chl b gene.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 ix part played by phospholipids in the complementation process	Membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants d' escherichia coli k 12 ix plays a role in the complementation process by phospholipids.
10	the maintenance of the energized membrane state and its relation to active transport in escherichia coli	The tensioning of the membrane state and its relation to active transport in escherichia coli.
10	synthesis of heteropolyribonucleotides by toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Synthesis of apos; heteropolyribonucleotides by toluene treated cells of apos; escherichia coli.
10	transcription termination factor rho activity is altered in escherichia coli with sua gene mutations	L&apos rho transcription termination factor activity is altered in escherichia coli with sua gene mutations.
10	progress in the resolution of the cytoplasmic membrane dna initiation complex of escherichia coli	Progress in the resolution of the apo complex; initiation of apo; cytoplasmic membrane DNA of apo; escherichia coli.
10	mechanism of growth delay induced in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet radiation	Mechanisms of growth retardation induced in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet radiation.
10	chemostat culture of escherichia coli k 12 limited by the activity of alkaline phosphatase	The chemostat culture of escherichia coli k 12 is limited by alkaline phosphatase activity.
10	transience of the donor state in an escherichia coli k12 strain carrying a repressed r factor	The transition of the donor state in an Escherichia coli k12 strain carrying apos; a repressed factor.
10	dna degradation in minicells of escherichia coli k 12 ii effect of reca1 and recb21 mutations on dna degradation in minicells and detection of exonuclease v activity	Apo degradation; apo mini-cell DNA; escherichia coli k 12 effect of reca1 and recb21 mutations on apo degradation; minicellin DNA and apo detection; exonuclease activity v.
10	isolation and characterization of mutants with a feedback resistant n acetylglutamate synthase in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and characterization of mutants with retolerant acetylglutamate synthase in escherichia coli k 12 were isolated and characterized.
10	transcriptional control of the isoleucine valine messenger rna s in e coli k 12	Transcriptional monitoring of apo; isoleucine valine messenger rna s in e coli k 12 k.
10	escherichia coli mutants uvr d and uvr e deficient in gene conversion of lambda heteroduplexes	Escherichia coli mutants uvr d and uvr deficient in the gene conversion of lambda heteroduplexes.
10	induction of prophage lambda during the division cycle of escherichia coli	Induction of the prophage lambda during the cycle of division of escherichia coli.
10	replication of phia and phix174 in escherichia coli mutants thermosensitive in dna synthesis	Replication of phia and phix174 in thermosensitive d' escherichia coli mutants during DNA synthesis.
10	effects of some antibiotics on the stringent control of rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Effect of certain antibiotics on the strict control of rna synthesis in escherichia coli bacteria.
10	polynucleotide phosphorylase can participate in decay of mrna in escherichia coli in the absence of ribonuclease ii	Polynucleotide phosphorylase can participate in mrna decomposition in escherichia coli in the absence of ribonuclease ii.
10	parameters of gene expression in the bipolar argecbh operon of e coli k12 the question of translational control	E coli parameters; gene expression in the bipolar e coli k12 arctic operon the question of translation control.
10	proteinchemical studies on ribosomal proteins s4 and s12 from ram ribosomal ambiguity mutants of escherichia coli	Protein-chemical studies of ribosomal proteins s4 and s12 from mutants of d' escherichia coli with ribosomal ambiguities ram.
10	chelocardin inducible resistance in escherichia coli bearing r plasmids	Chelocardin-induced resistance in escherichia coli r plasmids.
10	phospholipids and atpase activity of wild type and atpase deficient and uncoupled mutants of e coli	Phospholipids and l' activity of wild-type atpase and of atpase-deficient and uncoupled mutants of e coli.
10	the mutagenic effect of pesticides on escherichia coli wp2 try	L' mutagenic effect of pesticides on escherichia coli wp2 try.
10	comparison of mutagenic efficiency of decay of 32p incorporated in e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s cells	Comparison of l' mutagenic efficiency of 32p decay incorporated into e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s cells.
10	reversible inactivation of vectorial phosphorylation by hydroxybutynoate in escherichia coli membrane vesicles	Reversible inactivation of vector phosphorylation by hydroxybutynoate in the membrane vesicles of l' escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli stringent factor binds to ribosomes at a site different from that of elongation factor tu or g	Escherichia coli binds to ribosomes at a site different from that of elongation factor.
10	differentiation between mutants of escherichia coli k defective in oxidative phosphorylation	Differentiation between d&apos mutants; escherichia coli strains defective in oxidative phosphorylation.
10	dna synthesis in vitro in lysates of escherichia coli	Synthesis of DNA in vitro in apo lysates; escherichia coli.
10	inducible gluconate permease in a gluconate kinase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Inducible gluconate permease in a gluconate kinase deficient mutant; escherichia coli.
10	isolation and properties of escherichia coli atpase mutants with altered divalent metal specificity for atp hydrolysis	Isolation and properties of mutants of escherichia coli with modified specificity for divalent metals during apos; hydrolysis of apos; atp.
10	very stable prokaryotic messenger rna in chromosomeless escherichia coli minicells	Rna, a very stable prokaryotic messenger in apos chromosomal minicells; escherichia coli.
10	bidirectional replication of plasmid r6k dna in escherichia coli correspondence between origin of replication and position of single strand break in relaxed complex	Two-way replication of apos; plasmid DNA r6k in apos correspondence; Escherichia coli between apos; origin of replication and position of cleavage; single strand in relaxed complex.
10	lipoic acid content of escherichia coli and other microorganisms	Lipoic acid content of escherichia coli and other microorganisms.
10	soluble tri and dipeptidases in escherichia coli k 12	Sorting and soluble dipeptidases; escherichia coli k 12.
10	a 30 s precursor of 30 s ribosomes in a mutant of escherichia coli	A 30 s precursor of 30 s ribosomes in mutant d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of a bacteriophage infective for a udp galactose 4 epimeraseless mutant of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of an infectious bacteriophage for an epimerless mutant udp galactose 4 d' Escherichia coli.
10	repair of heat injury in thymine auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Reparation of heat damage to the thymine auxotrophs of d' Escherichia coli.
10	relationship between ppgpp levels and rates of protein and rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Relationship between levels of ppgpp and rates of protein and rna synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	the influence of differences in the rec genotype of e coli cells on the function of sex factor f	L' influence of differences in rec genotype of e coli cells on the function of sex factor f f.
10	effects of rifampicin on synthesis and functional activity of dna dependent rna polymerase in escherichia coli	The effects of rifampicin on synthesis and apos; the functional activity of apos-dependent rna polymerase; DNA in escherichia coli.
10	expression of the plasmid pkm101 determined dna repair system in reca and lex strains of escherichia coli	L' plasmid expression pkm101 determined the DNA repair system in reca and lex d' escherichia coli.
10	the influence of mutations upon the synthesis of rna polymerase subunits in escherichia coli cells	L' influence mutations on the synthesis of rna polymerase sub-units in d' escherichia coli.
10	formaldehyde induced dna protein crosslinks in escherichia coli	Formaldehyde induced DNA cross-linking of escherichia coli proteins.
10	partial suppression of the lexa phenotype by mutations rnm which restore ultraviolet resistance but not ultraviolet mutability to escherichia coli b r uvr a lexa	The partial suppression of the phenotype revealed by rnm mutations that restore resistance to ultraviolet, but not mutability to ultraviolet; ultraviolet de l'apos; escherichia coli b uvr a lexa.
10	reversion induction in phage t4 mutants in escherichia coli strains with defective rna polymerase	Induction of reversion in phage t4 mutants of Escherichia coli and d&apos strains with defective rna polymerase.
10	processing of the 17 s escherichia coli precursor rna in the 27 s pre ribosomal particle	Treatment of the 17 s pre ribosomal precursor; 27 s pre ribosomal particle escherichia coli.
10	carcinogen induced dna repair in nucleotide permeable escherichia coli cells analysis of dna repair induced by the carcinogens n acetoxy n 2 acetylaminofluorene and 7 bromomethyl benz a anthracene	Cell repair; carcinogen-induced DNA in apo cells; nucleotide permeable escherichia coli; DNA repair analysis; DNA induced by the n-acetoxy carcinogens n 2 acetylaminofluorene and 7 bromomethyl benz anthracene.
10	the major proteins of the escherichia coli outer cell envelope membrane heterogeneity of protein i	The major proteins of the outer cell envelope of Escherichia coli are heterogeneous.
10	purification by immunoadsorbtion chromatography of the normal and a mutant form of the b2 subunit of escherichia coli tryptophan synthase	Purification by chromatography of normal and d' a mutant form of the subs-unit b2 of the tryptophan synthase d' escherichia coli.
10	an inhibitory effect of thymidine on its own conversion to nucleotide in escherichia coli	An inhibitory effect of thymidine on its own conversion to the nucleotide in Escherichia coli.
10	preparation of enterochelin from escherichia coli	Preparation of enterocelin from dapos; escherichia coli.
10	hydrogen donor system for escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase dependent upon glutathione	Glutathione-dependent phosphate reductase-dependent escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase donor system.
10	elimination of lethal and pre mutational dna lesions during the photoreactivation of uv irradiated escherichia coli	Elimination of lethal and pre-@ lethal lesions; DNA during photoreactivation of apo; irradiated escherichia coli; uv.
10	cross resistance of escherichia coli b r to cis platinum ii diamminochloride uv light and alkylating agents	Cross resistance of cis-platinum diminochloride; escherichia coli b r to uv light and alkylating agents.
10	properties of a mutant of streptococcus mutans altered in glucosyltransferase activity	The properties of a mutant of streptococcus mutans altered the apos; glucosyltransferase activity.
10	threonine deaminase from a nonsense mutant of escherichia coli requiring isoleucine or pyridoxine evidence for half of the sites reactivity	Threonine deaminase d' a non-@ sense d&apos mutant; Escherichia coli requires apos; isoleucine or pyridoxine data for half of the reactive sites.
10	biosynthesis of membrane bound nitrate reductase in escherichia coli evidence for a soluble precursor	The biosynthesis of membrane-bound nitrate reductase in escherichia coli demonstrates the existence of a soluble precursor.
10	escherichia coli mutants altered in murein lipoprotein	Mutants of d' escherichia coli altered in lipoprotein of murein.
10	mode of insertion of lipopolysaccharide into the outer membrane of escherichia coli	Procedure; insertion of lipopolysaccharide into the outer membrane of escherichia coli.
10	threonine deaminase from escherichia coli feedback hypersensitive enzyme from a genetic regulatory mutant	The threonine deaminase of escherichia coli is a hypersensitive feedback enzyme from a genetic regulatory mutant called threonine deaminase.
10	siderophore protection against colicins m b v and ia in escherichia coli	Siderophore protection against colicins m b v and ia in Escherichia coli.
10	mapping of two loci affecting the regulation of branched chain amino acid transport in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of two loci affecting the regulation of branched chain amino acid transport in escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of an escherichia coli k 12 f con mutant	Characterization of an escherichia coli k 12 f con.
10	effect of colicin k on a membrane associated energy linked function	The effect of colicin k on a function related to l' membrane energy.
10	methyl methane sulfonate sensitive mutant of escherichia coli deficient in an endonuclease specific for apurinic sites in deoxyribonucleic acid	Mutant sensitive to methylmethane sulfonate d' escherichia coli deficient in endonuclease specific to apurinic sites in the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	chea cheb and chec genes of escherichia coli and their role in chemotaxis	Checks chea and genes of escherichia coli and their role in chemotaxis.
10	role of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases and deoxyribonucleic acid ligase in x ray induced repair synthesis in toluene treated escherichia coli k 12	The role of deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, and deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases in X-rays induced a restorative synthesis in toluene-treated escherichia coli k 12.
10	thymidine uptake and utilization in escherichia coli a new gene controlling nucleoside transport	Absorption and apo; thymidine utilization in escherichia coli, a novel gene controlling nucleoside transport, were determined.
10	periplasmic protein related to the sn glycerol 3 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	Periplasmic protein related to the transport system of snylcerol 3 phosphate d' escherichia coli.
10	in vivo methylation by escherichia coli k 12 mec deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase protects against in vitro cleavage by the rii restriction endonuclease r eco rii	In vivo methylation by esterichia coli k 12 mec deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase protects against in vitro cleavage by the restriction endonuclease rii r eco rii.
10	altered deoxyribonucleotide pools in p2 eductants of escherichia coli k 12 due to deletion of the dcd gene	Modification of deoxyribonucleotide pools in p2 educators; escherichia coli k 12 due to deletion of the dcd gene.
10	effects of antibodies to various molecular forms of a mutationally altered escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase on its activation by zinc	Mutually altered effects of antibodies against various molecular forms of apos; an alkaline phosphatase d'apos; escherichia coli on its activation by zinc.
10	mu induced polarity in the escherichia coli k 12 ent gene cluster evidence for a gene entg involved in the biosynthesis of enterochelin	Mu-induced polarity in the escherichia coli k12 gene cluster indicates the existence of apos; an entg gene involved in apos biosynthesis; enterocelin.
10	role of the receptor for bacteriophage lambda in the functioning of the maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	The role of the receptor of the bacteriophage lambda in the functioning of the chemoreceptor of maltosis d' Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of an escherichia coli mutant deficient in glutathione synthesis	Isolate an escherichia coli mutant defective in glutathione synthesis.
10	operator promoter functions in the threonine operon of escherichia coli	The promoter operates in the threonine operon of the apos; Escherichia coli.
10	syntheses of elongation factors tu and g are under stringent control in escherichia coli	The syntheses of the factors d' elongation tu and g are subject to strict control in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of succinate utilization in enzyme i mutants of the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis; succinate utilization in mutants of lacid; enzyme i of the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in escherichia coli.
10	genetic mapping of a mutation that causes ribonucleases iii deficiency in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of a mutation causing a ribonuclease deficiency iii in escherichia coli.
10	co2 production from galactose in galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase deficient escherichia coli	Co2 production from galactose in galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase deficient escherichia coli.
10	recipient ability of bacteriophage resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Ability to receive mutants of escherichia coli k 12 that are resistant to bacteriophages.
10	bacteriophage mu 1 induced permeability mutants in escherichia coli k 12	Bacteriophage mu 1 induced permeability mutants in Escherichia coli k 12 mutants.
10	transductional mapping of gene trma responsible for the production of 5 methyluridine in transfer ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	Transductional mapping of the gene trma responsible for the production of 5 methyluridine in apos; d&apos transfer ribonucleic acid; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis phenotypic suppression of sn glycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase km mutants by loss of feedback inhibition of the biosynthetic sn glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Mutants of d' escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis phenotypically suppress the 3 phosphate acyltransferase km glycerol mutants by losing the feedback inhibition of the biosynthetic glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
10	the in vitro translation of a terminating signal by a single escherichia coli ribosome the fate of the subunits	The in vitro translation of apos; a termination signal by a single ribosome d' escherichia coli as to the fate of the sub @-@units.
10	biochemical genetics of chinese hamster cell mutants with deviant purine metabolism biochemical analysis of eight mutants	Biochemical genetics of Chinese hamster cell mutants with purine-deviating biochemical analysis of eight mutants.
10	r factor mediated resistance to ultraviolet light in strains of escherichia coli deficient in known repair functions	The r factor mediated resistance to ultraviolet light in strains of d'apos; escherichia coli deficient in known repair functions.
10	variants of escherichia coli giving the appearance of mixed growths in urine	Variants of escherichia coli producing apos; appearance of mixed growths in the apos; urine.
10	adp ribosylation of dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli by an nad protein adp ribosyltransferase from bacteriophage t4	Apos DNA; escherichia coli d&apos RNA adp ribosylation of rna polymerase by nad protein adp ribosyltransferase from bacteriophage t4.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides thymineless death and the recovery after re addition of thymine in escherichia coli k 12	Studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides of thymine-free death and recovery after re-addition of thymine in escherichia coli k 12.
10	regulation of escherichia coli k10 aminoendopeptidase synthesis effects of mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase	Effects of regulation of apos synthesis; amino endopeptidase k10 d' escherichia coli on mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase.
10	biosynthesis of a specific lipoprotein of the escherichia coli outer membrane on polyribosomes	Biosynthesis of apos; an outer membrane specific lipoprotein of apos; escherichia coli on polyribosomes.
10	the escherichia coli uv endonuclease correndonuclease ii	The endonuclease of apos; Escherichia coli uv ii.
10	involvement of escherichia coli dna polymerase i associated 5 in equilibrium 3 exonuclease in excision repair of uv damaged dna	L' involvement of polymerase enzymes; DNA; Escherichia coli associated with 5 in apos; exonuclease d' balance 3 in repair of apos; excision of apos; DNA damaged by apos; u.
10	exonuclease vii of escherichia coli	Exonuclease vii dapos; escherichia coli.
10	repair replication in permeabilized escherichia coli	Repair replication in permeabilized escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet light induced incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine into parental dna of an excision defective mutant of escherichia coli	Ultraviolet light induces apos; incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine into parental DNA; excision-defective mutant; escherichia coli.
10	distribution of pyrimidine dimers during postreplication repair in uv irradiated excision deficient cells of escherichia coli k12	Distribution of pyrimidine dimers during post-replication repair in uv irradiated excision deficient cells of escherichia coli k12.
10	postreplication repair gap filling in an escherichia coli strain deficient in dnab gene product	After replication, a strain of escherichia coli deficient in dnab gene product fills the repair space.
10	the role of dna polymerase i in genetic recombination and viability of escherichia coli	The role of DNA polymerase i in genetic recombination and viability of escherichia coli.
10	the role of the rec genes in the viability of escherichia coli k12	The role of the rec genes in the viability of escherichia coli k12.
10	dna repair in dna polymerase deficient mutants of escherichia coli	DNA repair in DNA polymerase-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	maltose transport in escherichia coli k12 a comparison of transport kinetics in wild type and lambda resistant mutants as measured by fluorescence quenching	Maltosis transport in escherichia coli k12, a comparison of transport kinetics in wild-type and lambda-resistant mutants as measured by fluorescence quenching.
10	isolation and genetic characterization of the nita mutants of escherichia coli affecting the termination factor rho	The isolation and genetic characterization of nita d&apos mutants; escherichia coli affecting rho rho-termination factor.
10	isolation of rec mutants from an f prime merodiploid strain of escherichia coli k 12	To isolate mutants recovered from a merodiploid strain of escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	rna polymerase mutants of escherichia coli iii a temperature sensitive rifampicin resistant mutant	Mutants rna polymerase d' escherichia coli iii, a heat-sensitive mutant resistant to rifampicin.
10	expression of a valine resistant acetolactate synthase activity mediated by the ilv o and ilv g genes of escherichia coli k 12	Apos expression; valine-resistant acetolactate synthase mediated by the genes ilv o and ilv g of the apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	radiation sensitivity of a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 associated with dna replication evidence for a new repair function	The radiosensitivity of apos; a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 associated with DNA replication demonstrates the existence of apos; a new repair function.
10	r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in escherichia coli k12 dominance of some tetracycline sensitive mutants and relief of dominance by deletion	The r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in escherichia coli k12 dominance of some tetracycline-sensitive mutants and relief of dominance by deletion.
10	intracellular distribution of 8 14c puromycin aminonucleoside in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	Intracellular distribution of apos; puromycin aminonucleoside 8c in apos; ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli.
10	fate of thymine containing dimers in the deoxyribonucleic acid of ultraviolet irradiated mutator t1 escherichia coli transductants	Chemin of thymine-containing dimers in apos; deoxyribonucleic acid of t1 transducers d' escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet.
10	intragenic complementation by gene 42 amber mutations of bacteriophage t4	Intragenic complementation by amber mutation of bacteriophage t4 gene 42.
10	phospholipase activity in bacteriophage infected escherichia coli iii phopholipase a involvement in lysis of t4 infected cells	L' phospholipase activity of bacteriophage infected cells; bacteriophage infected escherichia coli iii phopholipase is involved in the lysis of t4 infected cells.
10	an amber suppressor of escherichia coli strain ko1	A suppressor of escherichia coli strain ko1 d&apos.
10	synthesis of ribosomal proteins l7l12 in relaxed and stringent strains of escherichia coli	Synthesis of ribosomal proteins l7l12 in relaxed and severe strains of escherichia coli.
10	in vitro synthesis and repression of argininosuccinase in escherichia coli k12 partial purification of the arginine repressor	In vitro synthesis and repression of argininosuccinase in escherichia coli k12 partial purification of the repressor of the apos; arginine.
10	a yeast mutant defective in the processing of 27s r rna precursor	A yeast mutant defective in the treatment of 27s rna precursor rna.
10	cooperative control of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli iii a ram mutation in the structural gene for protein s5 rpx e	Cooperative control of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli iii, a ram mutation in the structural gene of s5 rpx e protein.
10	conjugation in escherichia coli a study of recombination and the fate of donor dna at the level of the zygote	The conjugation in escherichia coli a study of recombination and the fate of donor DNA at the zygote level.
10	the regulatory nature of the phob gene for alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	The regulatory nature of the phob gene for alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	a new gene for ribosomal restriction in escherichia coli	New gene for ribosomal restriction in escherichia coli.
10	tetracycline sensitive mutants of the f like r factors r100 and r100 1	Tetracycline-sensitive mutants of factors r100 and r100 1 similar to f.
10	regulation of enzyme formation in klebsiella aerogenes by episomal glutamine synthetase of escherichia coli	Regulation of apos formation; enzyme in klebsiella aerogenes by episomal glutamine synthetase d' escherichia coli.
10	characterization of group b colicin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 colicin resistance and the role of enterochelin	Characterization of group b colicin resistant mutants of estos; escherichia coli k12 and the role of enterocelin.
10	isolation and genetic characterizaion of escherichia coli k 12 mutations affecting bacteriophage t5 restriction by the colib plasmid	Genetic isolation and characterization of escherichia coli k12 mutations affecting bacteriophage t5 restriction by colib plasmid.
10	relationship between the transport of iron and the amount of specific colicin ia membrane receptors in escherichia coli	Relationship between the transport of iron and the amount of colicin ia specific membrane receptors in escherichia coli.
10	repression of escherichia coli carbamoylphosphate synthase relationships with enzyme synthesis in the arginine and pyrimidine pathways	Repression of carbamoylphosphate synthase d' escherichia coli relationships and enzyme synthesis in the arginine and pyrimidine pathways.
10	isolation and characterization of t even ghost tolerant mutants of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of even phantom tolerant mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	regulation of beta glucuronidase synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting uxu and uida expression	Regulation of beta glucuronidase synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting the apos; jusu and uida expression.
10	r factor mediated polarized chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli c	The r factor favored polarized chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli c.
10	comparative study of r1 specific chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli k 12 and salmonella typhimurium lt2	Comparative study of r1-specific transfer in escherichia coli k 12 and Salmonella typhimurium lt2.
10	control of the synthesis of alkaline phosphatase and the phosphate binding protein in escherichia coli	Control of synthesis of alkaline phosphatase and phosphate-binding protein in escherichia coli.
10	isolation by tetracycline selection of small plasmids derived from r factor r12 in escherichia coli k 12	Isolation by tetracycline selection of small plasmids derived from r12 factor in escherichia coli k 12 was carried out.
10	co regulation of the phosphate binding protein and alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Co-regulation of phosphate binding protein and alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	phosphatidylserine synthetase mutants of escherichia coli genetic mapping and membrane phospholipid composition	Phosphatidylserine synthetase mutants of apos; escherichia coli genetic mapping and membrane phospholipid composition.
10	a timing control of cell division in escherichia coli	The timing of cell division in escherichia coli.
10	isolation and partial characterization of an escherichia coli mutant resistant to colicin a	Isolation and partial characterization of a colicin-resistant Escherichia coli mutant a.
10	fragments of beta galactosidase from escherichia coli fragmentation purification characterization and in vitro complementation	Fragmentation of beta galactosidase from escherichia coli fragmentation characterization and in vitro complementation.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli conditions for error free filling of daughter strand gaps	Mutagenic repair of proteins; DNA under laboratory conditions; escherichia coli to fill strand gaps without error.
10	mutants of escherichia coli which block head formation of lambda	Dapos mutants; escherichia coli which block head formation in lambda.
10	biochemical and genetic characterization of a carbamyl phosphate synthetase mutant of escherichia coli k12	Biochemical and genetic characterization of a carbamyl phosphate synthetase mutant d'apos; escherichia coli k12 mutant.
10	in vitro synthesis of enzymes of the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli	In vitro synthesis of apos; enzymes of apos; operon tryptophan d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	the nature of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	The nature of the gal3 dapos; escherichia coli mutation.
10	mechanism of reversion of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	Mechanism of reversion of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli.
10	the nature of the product of the cys b gene of escherichia coli	Nature of the product of the cys b gene of escherichia coli.
10	unaltered stability of newly synthesized rna in strains of escherichia coli missing a ribonuclease specific for double stranded rna	Unaltered stability of newly synthesized rna in dapos strains; escherichia coli in the absence of dapos; ribonuclease specific for double-stranded rna.
10	two ribose 5 phosphate isomerases from escherichia coli k12 partial characterisation of the enzymes and consideration of their possible physiological roles	Two ribose 5 phosphate isomerases d' escherichia coli k12 characterizing partially the enzymes and considering their possible physiological roles.
10	altered synthesis and stability of rna polymerase holoenzyme subunits in mutants of escherichia coli with mutations in the beta or beta subunit genes	Modified synthesis and stability of rna polymerase holoenzyme units in mutants d' escherichia coli with mutations in genes under-beta or beta units.
10	expression of the guanine operon of escherichia coli as analyzed by bacteriophage lambda induced mutations	Escherichia coli as analyzed by lambda bacteriophage induced mutations.
10	evidence that the gene uvrb is indispensable for a polymerase i deficient strain of escherichia coli k 12	Evidence that the uvrb gene is essential for a polymerase deficient strain of escherichia coli k 12.
10	heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 deficient in up to three major outer membrane proteins	Heptose-deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 were deficient in up to three major outer membrane proteins.
10	mapping of the pola locus of escherichia coli k12 orientation in the amino and carboxy termini of the cistron	Mapping of the pola locus of the apos; k12 orientation of the apos; escherichia coli in the amino and carboxy ends of the cistron.
10	cole plasmid replication in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Replication of cole plasmids in DNA-deficient strains of escherichia coli i.
10	characterization of a ts beta mutant rna polymerase of escherichia coli	Characterization of a mutant rna polymerase beta d' escherichia coli.
10	coumermycin a1 a preferential inhibitor of replicative dna synthesis in escherichia coli i in vivo characterization	Coumermycin a1, a preferential inhibitor of replicative synthesis of escherichia coli i DNA, was characterized in vivo.
10	polarity in segments of the escherichia coli trp operon with deleted intraoperonic translational initiation signals	Polarity in segments of the epos; escherichia coli with suppression of signals; initiation of intra@ operonic translation.
10	new types of streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	New types of streptomycin resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	role of lysyl trna in the regulation of lysine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k12	The role of lysyl trna in the regulation of lysine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k12.
10	escherichia coli k12 mutant with increased rna content and messenger rna stability	Mutant k12 d' escherichia coli with increased rna content and messenger stability.
10	rapid test for assay of ozone sensitivity in escherichia coli	Rapid sensitivity testing of escherichia coli (ES coli) for ozone.
10	lamb mutations in e coli k12 growth of lambda host range mutants and effect of nonsense suppressors	Mutations of e coli k12; lamb in e coli k12 growth of lambda mutants in the host range and effect of absurd suppressors.
10	evidence against autorepression of the betabeta operon in escherichia coli	Evidence against self-repression in betabeta operon in escherichia coli.
10	the absence of caffeine inhibition of post replication repair in excision deficient strains of escherichia coli b and k12	L' absence of apos; caffeine inhibition of replication repair in excision-deficient d&apos strains; escherichia coli b and k12.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli ii factors affecting loss of photoreversibility of uv induced mutations	Repair of apo; mutagenic DNA in escherichia coli ii factors affecting loss of photoreversibility of apo-induced mutations; uv.
10	genetic analysis of mutants of escherichia coli defective in dicarboxylate transport	Genetic analysis of mutants of escherichia coli defective in the transport of dicarboxylate.
10	prophage induction and cell division in e coli iii mutations sfia and sfib restore division in tif and lon strains and permit the expression of mutator properties of tif	Prophetic induction and cell division in sfia and sfib d&apos mutations; e coli iii restore division in tif and lon strains and allow expression of mutant properties of tif.
10	dna repair in proteus mirabilis iii survival dimer excision and uv reactivation in comparison with escherichia coli k12	Apo repair; apo DNA; mirabilis iii survival dimer excision and reactivation of apos; uv vs. apos; escherichia coli k12.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli deficient in pyruvate formate lyase	A mutant of apos; escherichia coli deficient in pyruvate formate lyase.
10	mapping of gsha a gene for the biosynthesis of glutathione in eschericha coli k12	Mapping of gsha, a gene for the biosynthesis of glutathione in l'apos; eschericha coli k12.
10	hyperproduction of the sigma subunit of rna polymerase in a mutant of escherichia coli	Hyperproduction of the-unit sigma rna polymerase in a mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	the effect of lexa and recf mutations on post replication repair and dna synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	The effect of mutations on replication repair and biosynthesis; DNA in escherichia coli k 12 was studied.
10	localized mutagenesis of the aroe stra section of the escherichia coli chromosome coding for ribosomal proteins	Localized mutagenesis of the aroe stratigraphic section of the d' escherichia coli ribosomal protein coding chromosome.
10	increased spontaneous reversion of certain frameshift mutations in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Increased spontaneous reversion of certain frameshift mutations in DNA polymerase deficient strains of d' escherichia coli i.
10	effects of sodium arsenite on the survival of uv irradiated escherichia coli inhibition of a reca dependent function	The effects of sodium arsenite on the survival of apos; escherichia coli irradiated at apos; uv, lapos; inhibition of apos; a function dependent on reca.
10	the effect of streptomycin resistance caffeine and acriflavine on ultraviolet light induced reversion to tryptophan independence in strains of escherichia coli b r	The effect of caffeine and acriflavin, which are resistant to streptomycin, on ultraviolet light induced reversion to apos; independence from tryptophan in strains of escherichia coli b r.
10	increased isoleucine acceptance by sulfur deficient transfer rna from escherichia coli	Increase in apo; acceptance of apo; isoleucine by apo's sulfur deficient transfer rna; escherichia coli.
10	transport of pyrimidine nucleosides in cells of escherichia coli k 12	The transport of pyrimidine nucleosides in d' escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	polarity and the regulation of the ilv gene cluster in escherichia coli strain k 12	Polarity and regulation of the biosystem gene cluster in strain k 12 d' escherichia coli.
10	induction kinetics of mutagenic dna repair activity in e coli following ultraviolet irradiation	Apos kinetics; apo induction; apo repair activity; mutagenic DNA in e coli following ultraviolet irradiation.
10	efficient suppression of the requirement for n function of bacteriophage lambda by a rho defective e coli sua mutant	Efficient suppression of the n-function of the bacteriophage lambda by a defective e coli sua rho mutant.
10	specificity of polarity suppression in e coli correction of defects in gene n but not in gene q of phage lambda	The specificity of polarity suppression in e coli correction of defects of the n but not q gene of lambda phage.
10	genetic mapping of chromosomal mutations affecting the replication of the f factor of escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of chromosomal mutations affecting the replication of the f factor of escherichia coli.
10	identification of genes for elongation factor ts and ribosomal protein s2 in e coli	Identification of genes for the factor d' elongation ts and ribosomal protein s2 in e coli.
10	mutations affecting the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase complex of escherichia coli	Mutations affecting the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase complex of escherichia coli.
10	changes in membrane proteins of escherichia coli k12 mediated by bacteriophage ike specific plasmids	Changes in membrane proteins of escherichia coli k12 mediated by ike bacteriophage-specific plasmids.
10	effects of bacteriophage t4 induced modification of escherichia coli rna polymerase on gene expression in vitro	The effects of bacteriophage t4 induced modification of escherichia coli rna polymerase on apos gene expression in vitro.
10	alterations in envelope structure of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli as revealed by freeze etching	Structural alterations in the cell envelope of heptose mutants of d' escherichia coli were revealed by freeze-etching.
10	peptidoglycan biosynthesis in a thermosensitive division mutant of escherichia coli	Peptidoglycan biosynthesis in a heat-sensitive mutant of escherichia coli.
10	freeze etch morphology of outer membrane mutants of escherichia coli k12	Freeze etch morphology of outer membrane mutants of escherichia coli k12.
10	evaluation of a dna polymerase deficient mutant of e coli for the rapid detection of carcinogens	Evaluation of a mutant and DNA polymerase deficient coli for the rapid detection of carcinogens.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor system for vitamin b12 and bacteriophage bf23 on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	Transport of vitamin b12 into the common receptor system for vitamin b12 and bacteriophage bf23 on the outer membrane of the cell envelope.
10	role of d tryptophan oxidase in d tryptophan utilization by escherichia coli	Role of tryptophan oxidase in apos; tryptophan utilization by escherichia coli.
10	in vivo transcription of r plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli strains with altered antibiotic resistance levels and or conjugal proficiency	In vivo transcription of plasmid r, l' deoxyribonucleic acid into d&apos strains; escherichia coli with altered antibiotic resistance or conjugal competence.
10	effect of mutations in deoxyribonucleic acid repair pathways on the sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains to nitrofurantoin	Effect of mutations in apos repair pathways; deoxyribonucleic acid on the sensitivity of d&apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 to nitrofurantoin.
10	expression of the arga gene carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage of escherichia coli	An expression of the arga gene carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage of d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	lowered levels of colicin ia membrane receptors in an escherichia coli mutant defective in heme biosynthesis	Reduced colicine membrane receptors in an apos mutant; escherichia coli defective in the biosynthesis of apos; heme.
10	galactoside accumulation by escherichia coli driven by a ph gradient	Galactoside accumulation by escherichia coli under gradient; influence of gradient.
10	glutamate transport in membrane vesicles of the wild type strain and glutamate utilizing mutants of escherichia coli	Glutamate transport in membrane vesicles of the wild-type strain and glutamate using d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	isolation and characterization of escherichia coli k 12 f mutants defective in conjugation with an i type donor	Mutant isolation and characterization of mutants k 12 f d' escherichia coli defective in conjugation with a type i donor.
10	phospholipid composition and phenotypic correction of an envc division mutant of escherichia coli	Phospholipid composition and phenotypic correction of a division mutant of escherichia coli.
10	initiation of protein synthesis without formylation in a mutant of escherichia coli that grows in the absence of tetrahydrofolate	Initiation of protein synthesis without formylation in a mutant of escherichia coli growing in apos; absence of tetrahydrofolate.
10	number of mutations required to evolve a new lactase function in escherichia coli	The number of mutations required to develop a novel lactase function in escherichia coli.
10	pleiotropic phenotype of an escherichia coli mutant lacking leucyl phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid protein transferase	Pleiotropic phenotype of apos; an escherichia coli mutant lacking leucyl phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid transfer proteinase.
10	threonyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and the regulation of the threonine operon in escherichia coli	Threonyl transferring l'apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase and the regulation of l'apos; threonine operon in escherichia coli.
11	common errors in the management of acute myocardial infarction a critical analysis of 58 fatal cases	Common errors in the treatment of acute myocardial infarction (AMI), a critical analysis of 58 fatal cases.
11	induced malignancy in cells from rat myocardium subjected to intermittent anaerobiosis during long propagation in vitro	Induced malignancy in cells of the rat myocardium subjected to intermittent anaerobic conditions during prolonged propagation in vitro.
11	rheumatic lesions in left atrial appendages pathologic studies of material removed during mitral commissurotomy	Rheumatic lesion in left atrial appendages Pathological studies of material collected during mitral commissurotomy.
11	selective inhibition by preparations of streptococcal filtrates of the oxidative metabolism of mitochondria procured from rabbit myocardium	L' selective inhibition by preparations of streptococcal filtrates of oxidative metabolism of mitochondria obtained from rabbit myocardium.
11	an integrated morphological and biochemical study of a purified preparation of the succinate and dpnh oxidase system	An integrated morphological and biochemical study of a purified preparation of the succinate and dpnh oxidase system.
11	high energy phosphates during long term hibernation	High energy phosphates during slow; long term hibernation.
11	the rate of oxygen uptake of quiescent cardiac muscle	Rate of death; resting cardiac muscle oxygen absorption.
11	choline acetylase activity in the atria and its possible relation to the maintenance of the membrane potential	L' choline acetylase activity in the atria and its possible relation to the maintenance of membrane potential.
11	enzymatic activity in the m band	Enzyme activity in the m band.
11	cat heart muscle in vitro i cell volumes and intracellular concentrations in papillary muscle	Cat cardiac muscle, cell volume i in vitro and intracellular concentrations in papillary muscle.
11	reversible inhibition of beef heart cytochrome c oxidase by polyionic macromolecules	Reversible inhibition of beef heart cytochrome c oxidase by polyionic macromolecules.
11	effect of reserpine on ventricular escape	The effect of reserpine on ventricular leakage.
11	increase of labeled calcium uptake in heart muscle during potassium lack contracture	L' increase in labelled calcium uptake in cardiac muscle during n' has no contracture.
11	a simple method of weighing the heart	A simple way of weighing the heart.
11	calcium flux in the mammalian ventricular myocardium	Calcium flux in the mammalian ventricular myocardium.
11	the human pacemaker and its pathology	Uh, the human pacemaker and its pathology.
11	muscle action potentials a technique for recording in situ	The potential of muscle action is a technique of recording in situ.
11	fine structural localization of adenosinetriphosphatase activity in heart muscle myofibrils	The fine structural localization of apos; activity of apos; adenosine triphosphatase in cardiac muscle myofibrils.
11	immunologic studies of heart tissue iii occurrence of bound gamma globulin in auricular appendages from rheumatic hearts relationship to certain histopathologic features of rheumatic heart disease	Immunological studies of cardiac tissue iii occurrence of bound gamma globulin in the atrial appendages of rheumatic hearts in relation to certain histopathological features of rheumatic heart disease.
11	on the structural continuities of the transverse tubular system of rabbit and human myocardial cells	On the structural continuities of the transverse tubular system of human and rabbit myocardial cells.
11	sex hormone studies the effects on the cellular membrane potentials and contractility of isolated rat atrium	L' sexual hormone studies the effects on the cellular membrane potentials and contractility of isolated rat atria.
11	a quantitative description of the relationship between the area of rabbit ventricular action potentials and the pattern of stimulation	Quantitative description of the relationship between the region of rabbit ventricular action potentials and stimulation pattern.
11	participation of an intermediate of oxidative phosphorylation in ion accumulation by mitochondria	Participation of an intermediate of oxidative phosphorylation in mitochondrial ion accumulation.
11	the cardiomyopathy of muscular dystrophy report of two cases with a review of the literature	The cardiomyopathy of muscular dystrophy reports two cases and a review of the literature.
11	effect of reserpine on the acetylcholine content of the heart the ileum and the hypothalamus of the dog	The effect of reserpine on the acetylcholine content of the ileum and ileum; hypothalamus of the dog.
11	is the fundamental electrical response of the single heart muscle cell a spike potential	It is the fundamental electrical response of the single heart muscle cell to peak potential.
11	reserpine its effect on silver stained structures of the heart	Reserpine its effect on the colorful structures of the heart.
11	oxidation of carbon 14 labeled endogenous lipids by isolated perfused rat heart	L' 14C oxidation labeled endogenous lipids by isolated perfused rat heart.
11	plague toxin its effect in vitro and in vivo	Plague toxin effect in vitro and in vivo.
11	hypothermia asphyxia and cardiac glycogen in guinea pigs	Hypothermia, asphyxiation and cardiac glycogen in guinea pigs.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens ii cross reaction of antisera to mammalian heart tissue with a cell wall constituent of certain strains of group a streptococci	Immunological relationships between streptococcal and tissue antigens ii cross-reactivity of antisera to mammalian cardiac tissue with a component of the cell wall of certain strains of group a streptococci.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens iii presence in human sera of streptococcal antibody cross reactive with heart tissue association with streptococcal infection rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis	Immunologic relationship between streptococcal and tissue antigens iii present in human serum d' streptococcal antibody cross-reactive with l' cardiac tissue association with human streptococcal rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis.
11	some observations on the fine structure and metabolic activity of normal and glycerinated ventricular muscle of toad	Observations on the fine structure and metabolic activity of normal and glycerinated toad ventricular muscle.
11	the staining of lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes after electrophoretic separation on cellulose acetate	Staining of lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes after electrophoretic separation on cellulose acetate.
11	action of plague murine toxin on mitochondria from resistant and susceptible animals	Action of plague murine toxin on the mitochondria of resistant and susceptible animals.
11	the effects of synthetic eledoisin on the systemic and coronary haemodynamics and metabolism of the intact dog	Effects of the drug; synthetic eledoisin on the hemodynamics and systemic metabolism of the intact dog.
11	cardiac myoglobin in myoglobinuria	I mean, cardiac myoglobin in myoglobinuria.
11	rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 a regulatory enzyme	The rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 is a regulatory enzyme.
11	a comparison of the effects of the plasma kinins bradykinin and kallidin on myocardial blood flow and metabolism	Comparison of the effects of the plasma kinins bradykinin and kallidin on myocardial blood flow and metabolism.
11	the mechanism of adhesion of cells to glass a study by interference reflection microscopy	The mechanism of adhesion of cells to glass, a study by elapsos; interference reflection microscopy.
11	an attempt to infer the electrophysiological functions of some intracellular structures in cardiac cells by an electronic analogue	An attempt to infer the electrophysiological functions of certain intracellular structures in cardiac cells by an electronic analog.
11	nucleoside phosphatase activities in rat cardiac muscle	L' rat cardiac muscle nucleoside phosphatase activity.
11	the localization of cholinesterase activity in rat cardiac muscle by electron microscopy	Localization of cholinesterase activity in rat cardiac muscle by electron microscopy.
11	the effect of beta sitosterol on the metabolism of cholesterol and lipids in rats on a diet containing coconut oil	L' effect of beta sitosterol on the metabolism of cholesterol and lipids in rats fed a diet containing coconut oil.
11	labelling of dna and cell division in so called non dividing tissues	Marking of DNA and cell division in so-called non-divisive tissues.
11	the effect of sonic oscillation on the structure and function of beef heart mitochondria	The effect of sonic oscillation on the structure and function of bovine heart mitochondria.
11	a macromolecular repeating unit of mitochondrial structure and function correlated electron microscopic and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria and submitochondrial particles of beef heart muscle	A macromolecular repetition unit of mitochondrial structure and function correlated electron microscopic and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria and mitochondrial particles of bovine heart muscle.
11	an example of information retention in rabbit ventricular muscle fibres	An example of information retention in rabbit ventricular muscle fibers.
11	mitochondrial dna in yeast and some mammalian species	Mitochondrial DNA in yeast and some mammalian species.
11	an immunological relationship between the group a streptococcus and mammalian muscle	An immunological relationship between the strep group and the mammalian muscle.
11	steroid stimulation of beating of cultured rat heart cells	Steroid stimulation of cultured rat heart cell beats.
11	synchronous assisted circulation	Okay, synchronous circulation.
11	current status of counterpulsation in cardiac assistance a summary of experimental experience in the dog	Current status of counter-pulse in the apos; cardiac assistance a summary of apos; experimental experience in the dog.
11	metmyoglobin oxidation during electron transport reactions in mitochondria	Oxidation of metamyoglobin during electron transport reactions in mitochondria.
11	propagation of action potentials and the structure of the nexus in cardiac muscle	The propagation of nexus potentials; action and structure of the nexus in the cardiac muscle.
11	studies on the in vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and ca movement in sarcoplasmic reticulum	Ecosystem studies; in vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and ca movement in sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	isozymes of aldolase	Apos; aldolase enzymes.
11	purification and general properties of aspartate aminotransferase of ox heart	Purification and general properties of aspartate aminotransferase from beef heart.
11	amino acid composition and terminal residues of aspartate aminotransferase from ox heart	Amino acid composition and terminal residues of aspartate aminotransferase from beef heart.
11	two dimensional chromatography on silica gel loaded paper for the microanalysis of polar lipids	Two-dimensional paper chromatography with silica gel for the microanalysis of polar lipids.
11	effect of diabetes on the concentration of amino acids in plasma and heart muscle of rats	The effect of diabetes on the concentration of amino acids in the plasma and heart muscle of rats.
11	fatty acid components of rat tissue lipids	The fatty acid components of rat tissue lipids.
11	fine structure of lipid depleted mitochondria	The fine structure of lipid depleted mitochondria.
11	preparation from human serum of an alpha one protein which induces the immediate growth of unadapted cells in vitro	Prepared from human serum d' an alpha 1 protein that induces the immediate growth of in vitro maladaptive cells.
11	isolation and analysis of free fatty aldehydes from rat dog and bovine heart muscle	Isolation and analysis of free fatty aldehydes from rat and bovine muscle.
11	mammalian ribosomal protein analysis by electrophoresis on polyacrylamide gel	Mammalian ribosomal protein analysis by electrophoresis on polyacrylamide gel.
11	organ specificity and lactate dehydrogenase activity differential inhibition by urea and related compounds	Organ specificity and lactate dehydrogenase activity differed from apos; inhibition by urea and related compounds.
11	camel myoglobin	Uh, camel myoglobin.
11	calcium induced activation of phosphorylase in rat hearts	Calcium induced activation of phosphorylase in rat hearts.
11	regulation of renal citrate metabolism by bicarbonate ion and ph observations in tissue slices and mitochondria	Regulation of renal citrate metabolism by observation of bicarbonate ion and ph in tissue slices and mitochondria.
11	the control of rat heart phosphofructokinase by citrate and other regulators	Control of rat cardiac phosphofructokinase by citrate and other cardiac regulators.
11	mitochondria in cardiac muscle cells of the canary and some other birds	Mitochondria in the heart muscle cells of the canary and some other birds.
11	rabbit lactate dehydrogenase isozymes effect of ph on activity	Effect of ph on rabbit lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity.
11	genetic control of lactate dehydrogenase formation in the hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Genetic control of lactate dehydrogenase formation in the hagfish eptatretus stoutii.
11	lipid composition of mitochondria from bovine heart liver and kidney	Lipid composition of bovine heart liver and kidney mitochondria.
11	glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase variants in phyletically diverse organisms	Key words @-@: glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase phyletically diverse organisms.
11	passive transport of 5 5 dimethyl 2 4 oxazolidinedione into beef heart mitochondria	Passive transport of 5 dimethyl-2-4 oxazolidinedione into beef heart mitochondria.
11	alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in tissues of the weddell seal	L' alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase and glucose-6 phosphate dehydrogenase in tissues of Weddell seals.
11	competent chick ectoderm nonspecific response to rna	Non-specific response to ectoderma d' a competent rna chick.
11	cross reactive antigen shared by streptococcus agalactiae and certain bovine tissues	Cross-reactive antigen common to streptococcus agalactiae and certain bovine tissues.
11	an electron microscope study of canine cardiac myosin and some of its aggregates	An electron microscopic study of canine cardiac myosin and some of its aggregates.
11	transverse tubule apertures in mammalian myocardial cells surface array	Transverse tubule apertures in mammalian myocardial cells surface array.
11	rheumatic like cardiac lesions in mice	Rheumatism is similar to that of a cardiac lesion in the mouse.
11	the mechanics of left ventricular contraction in acute experimental cardiac failure	Mechanics of left ventricular contraction in acute experimental heart failure.
11	control of myocardial contraction the sensitivity of cardiac actomyosin to calcium ion	Control of myocardial contraction, sensitivity of cardiac actomyosin to calcium ion.
11	detection and isolation of minor lipid constituents	Detection and isolation of minor lipid components.
11	effect of streptococcus pyogenes on tissue cells	The effect of streptococcus pyogenes on tissue cells.
11	the ubiquinone content of animal tissues a survey of the occurrence of ubiquinone in vertebrates	The ubiquinone content of animal tissues is a study of the occurrence of ubiquinone in vertebrates.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin ii protein synthesis in primary heart cell cultures	Studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin ii protein synthesis in primary cardiac cell cultures.
11	the uncoupling of respiratory chain phosphorylation by 4 5 6 7 tetrachloro 2 trifluoromethylbenzimidazole	The decoupling of respiratory chain phosphorylation by 4,56,7 tetrachloro 2 trifluoromethylbenzimidazole.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of chick embryo response to variations of ambient oxygen tension	Lapos response lactate dehydrogenase enzymes; chick embryo to changes in cell voltage; ambient oxygen.
11	evolution of malate dehydrogenase in birds	Evolution of malate dehydrogenase in birds.
11	peafowl lactate dehydrogenase problem of isoenzyme identification	Issue; peafowl lactate dehydrogenase identification of isozymes.
11	macroscopic identification of early myocardial infarction by dehydrogenase alterations	Macroscopic identification of early apo stages; myocardial infarction by dehydrogenase alteration.
11	structural modulations of plasmalemmal vesicles	Structural modifications of plasmalemmal vesicles.
11	control of myocardial oxygen consumption relative influence of contractile state and tension development	Control of myocardial oxygen consumption, relative influence of the apos, contractile state and tension development.
11	chromatography of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c on carboxymethylcellulose	Chromatography of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c on carboxymethylcellulose.
11	the localization of circulating immune complexes in experimental serum sickness the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces	The localization of circulating immune complexes in experimental serum disease the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces.
11	mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase reversible denaturation studies	Mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase reversible denaturation studies.
11	cardiac autoantibodies i immunodiffusion analysis of multiple responses evoked homologously and heterologously	Lapos; immunodiffusion analysis of multiple homologously evoked and heterologous responses by auto-cardiac antibody.
11	a species comparison of the effects of changing perfusion pressure on blood flow and metabolic heat production in the myocardium	Specific comparison of the effects of a change in perfusion pressure on blood flow and metabolic heat production in the myocardium.
11	utilization of endogenous lipid by the isolated perfused rat heart	Use of endogenous lipids by the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	the reversal of phenylarsenoxide inhibition of keto acid oxidation in mitochondrial and bacterial suspensions by lipoic acid and other disulphides	Lapos inversion; oxidation of apos; ketonic acid by phenylarsenolate in mitochondrial and bacterial suspensions by apos; lipoic acid and d*apos; other disulfides.
11	effect of removal of cholesterol diet upon serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	The effect of cholesterol poisoning; elimination of cholesterol diet on serum cholesterol disease has induced apos; atherosclerosis.
11	characterization and metabolism of ovine foetal lipids	Characterization and metabolism of ovine fetal lipids.
11	the functional status of lipoprotein lipase in rat liver	L' functional status of lipoprotein lipase in rat liver.
11	energetics of cardiac contractions	Uh, cardiac contractions energy.
11	autoantibodies reacting with heart muscle tissue in coronary heart disease	Auto-reacts with heart muscle tissue in coronary heart disease.
11	pathological findings in three cases of fungal endocarditis complicating open heart surgery	Pathological findings in three cases of fungal endocarditis complicating open heart surgery.
11	determination of extracellular space in amphibian muscle	Dos determination; extracellular space in muscle d' amphibian.
11	lipofuscinosis of the gastrointestinal tract in man	Lipofuscinosis of the gastrointestinal tract,-intestinal in men.
11	disproportionately higher levels of myocardial docosahexaenoate and elevated levels of plasma and liver arachidonate in hyperthyroid rats	Abnormally high levels of myocardial docosahexaenoate and high levels of plasma and hepatic arachidonate in hyperthyroid rats.
11	a reappraisal of some structural features of bovine heart malate dehydrogenase	Reassessment of some structural features of malate dehydrogenase from bovine heart.
11	the effect of werum on the uptake of thyroid hormones by the perfused rat heart	The effect of the werum on the uptake of thyroid hormones by the perfused heart.
11	the effect of fatty acid on the uptake of thyroxine by the perfused rat heart	L' effect of fatty acids on apos; absorption of thyroxine by the perfused rat heart.
11	metabolism of triglyceride fatty acid by the perfused rat heart	Metabolism of triglyceride fatty acids by the perfused rat heart.
11	isolation and identification of cholesteryl alkyl ethers from bovine cardiac muscle	Isolation and identification of cholesterylalkyl ethers from bovine cardiac muscle.
11	calcium current and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibers	Calcium current and activation of the contraction in the ventricular myocardial fibers.
11	mitral stenosis together with a giant cell myocarditis limited to the left atrium	Mitral stenosis and giant cell myocarditis limited to the left atrium.
11	phenoxyethanol protein preservative for taxonomists	Phenoxyethanol, protein preservative for taxonomists.
11	the ultrastructure of frog ventricular cardiac muscle and its relationship to mechanism of excitation contraction coupling	L' ultrastructure of frog ventricular cardiac muscle and its relationship to the coupling mechanism of contraction; excitation.
11	the influence of ouabain and alpha angelica lactone on calcium metabolism of dog cardiac microsomes	L' influence of ouabain and l' angelic lactone alpha on calcium metabolism of dog cardiac microsomes.
11	molecular species of lecithins of rat heart kidney and plasma	Molecular species of lecithins from rat heart kidney and plasma.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in human cardiac transplantation	Isozymes of lactate dehydrogenase in human heart transplant.
11	the growth of the muscular and collagenous parts of the rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly	The growth of the muscle and collagen parts of the rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in parthenogenetic teiid lizards cnemidophorus	Lactate dehydrogenase Isozymes in parthenogenetic teiid lizards cnemidophorus.
11	effects of guanidine derivatives on mitochondrial function i phenethylbiguanide inhibition of respiration in mitochondria from guinea pig and rat tissues	Effects of guanidine derivatives on mitochondrial function i phenethylbiguanide inhibition of respiration in mitochondria of guinea pig and rat tissue.
11	the oxidation of exogenous and endogenous cytochromec in mitochondria a biochemical and ultrastructural study	Oxidation of exogenous and endogenous cytochromec in mitochondria was studied in a biochemical and ultrastructural study.
11	experience with three brescia cimino shunts	Experience with three brescia cimino shunts.
11	the effect of quinidine on calcium accumulation by isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscle	Lapos; effect of quinidine on plaques; calcium accumulation by isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscle.
11	diagnosis of pericardial effusion by ultrasound	Diagnosis of eposes; pericardial effusion by ultrasound examination.
11	free fatty acid metabolism of the human heart at rest	Resting free fatty acid metabolism of the human heart.
11	internal redistribution of tissue protein synthesis in uremia	Internal distribution of tissue protein synthesis in uremia.
11	effect of reserpine on the subcellular distribution of 3h alpha methylnoradrenaline in the mouse heart	The effect of reserpine on the subcellular distribution of the alpha methylnoradrenaline 3 h in the mouse heart.
11	factors controlling the washout of the interstitial space of the isolated perfused rat heart	Factors controlling rinse of the apos; interstitial space of the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	relationship between the uptake binding and pharmacological action of procaine in the isolated heart	Ratio between uptake binding and l' pharmacological action of procaine in the isolated heart.
11	the roles of synthesis and degradation in determining tissue concentrations of lactate dehydrogenase 5	The roles of synthesis and degradation in determining tissue levels of lactate dehydrogenase 5.
11	toxic effects of glucagon induced acute lipid mobilization in geese	The toxic effects of glucagon induced acute lipid mobilization in geese.
11	biological properties of cell wall mucopeptide of hemolytic streptococci	Biological properties of cell wall mucopeptide of hemolytic streptococci.
11	the use of beef liver catalase as a protein tracer for electron microscopy	L' use of beef liver catalase as a protein tracer for electron microscopy.
11	energized configurations of heart mitochondria in situ	Energetic configuration of cardiac mitochondria in situ.
11	metabolism of cholesterol in the tissues and blood of the chick embryo	Cholesterol metabolism in the tissues and blood of the chicken embryo.
11	the inhibition of pyruvate and ls isocitrate oxidation by succinate oxidation in rat liver mitochondria	Apos; apos inhibition; pyruvate and apos oxidation; apos isocitrate; succinate oxidation in rat liver mitochondria.
11	relation between plasma lignocaine levels and induced haemodynamic changes	Relationship between plasma lignocaine concentrations and induced hemodynamic changes.
11	gene dosage at the lactate dehydrogenase b locus in triploid and diploid teiid lizards	Genetic dose at the lactate dehydrogenase b locus in triploid and diploid teiid lizards.
11	hemodynamic changes following correction of severe aortic stenosis using the cutter smeloff prosthesis	Hemodynamic changes following correction of severe aortic stenosis at apos; aid from cutter smelter.
11	a study of the t system in rat heart	It's a study of the t-system in rat heart.
11	gradient thickness thin layer chromatography for the isolation and analysis of trace amounts of free fatty acids in large lipid samples	Thin-layer gradient chromatography; thickness for apo, isolation and apo; trace analysis of apo; free fatty acids in large lipid samples.
11	embryonic cell adhesiveness do species differences exist among warm blooded vertebrates	L' embryonic cell adhesion differs-t-it d' a species at birth; another in warm-blooded vertebrates?
11	calcium exchange and contraction strength of guinea pig atrium in normal and hypertonic media	L' calcium exchange and force of contraction of guinea pig atrium in normal and hypertonic environments.
11	the uptake of thyroxine and tri iodothyronine by perfused hearts	L' absorption of thyroxine and of triiodothyronine by perfused hearts.
11	effect of peruvosid cd412 on excitability and functional refractory period of atrial and ventricular tissues in cardiomyopathy caused by trypanosoma cruzi	Effect of peruvoside cd412 on excitability and functional refractory period of atrial and ventricular tissues in trypanosome cruzi cardiomyopathy.
11	a case of fatal peri partum cardiomyopathy	Perinatal fatal cardiomyopathy.
11	localization of cytochromes in intact and fragmented mitochondrial membranes	Localization of cytochromes in intact and fragmented mitochondrial membranes.
11	tissue iodoprotein formation during the peripheral metabolism of the thyroid hormones	Formation of tissue iodoproteins during the peripheral metabolism of thyroid hormones.
11	the significance of the incorporation of 14c leucine into different protein fractions by isolated ox heart mitochondria	L' importance of apos; incorporation of leucine 14c into different protein fractions by isolated beef heart mitochondria.
11	a contribution to the study of cardiac lipofuscin fluorescence	Contribution to the study of cardiac lipofuscin fluorescence levels.
11	horseshoe crab lactate dehydrogenases evidence for dimeric structure	Horseshoe crab lactate dehydrogenase demonstrated the existence of dimeric structure.
11	effect of organic nitrates on myocardial oxygen consumption in vitro	Effect of organic nitrates on myocardial oxygen consumption in vitro.
11	glycerol kinase activities in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	Glycerol kinase activity in muscles of vertebrates and invertebrates.
11	spontaneous rhythmic contraction of separated heart muscle cells	Spontaneous rhythmic contraction of separated cardiac muscle cells.
11	the mitochondrial oxidation of quinol monophosphates	L' mitochondrial oxidation of quinol monophosphates.
11	the effect of fasting on the utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids in relation to clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase releasable by heparin in the perfused rat heart	L' effect of fasting on appetite; utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids in relation to the apos-released clear factor lipoprotein lipase; heparin in the perfused rat heart.
11	the effect of physical training upon the mechanical and metabolic performance of the rat heart	L' effect of the; physical training on the mechanical and metabolic performance of the rat heart.
11	biochemical properties of trypanosomatid lactate dehydrogenases	The biochemical properties of trypanosomatides lactate-dehydrogenases.
11	membrane studies with polarity dependent and excimer forming fluorescent probes	Membrane studies with polarity dependent excimer-forming fluorescent probes.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from the tissues of intoxicated guinea pigs and rats	Studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from tissues of intoxicated guinea pigs and rats.
11	the toxicity of streptolysin o for beating mammalian heart cells in tissue culture	The toxicity of streptolysin or for batting mammalian heart cells in tissue culture.
11	augmentation of the virulence of murine coxsackie virus b 3 myocardiopathy by exercise	Increased virulence of cardiomyopathy due to the murine coxsackie virus b 3 by exercise.
11	the activities of some enzymes concerned with energy metabolism in mammalian muscles of differing pigmentation	L' activity of certain enzymes involved in energy metabolism in mammalian muscles of different pigmentation.
11	beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase lack in ruminant liver mitochondria	Absence of beta-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in ruminant liver mitochondria.
11	ribonuclease inhibitor system abnormality in dystrophic mouse skeletal muscle	Ribonuclease inhibitory system abnormality in mouse dystrophic skeletal muscle.
11	effect of fasting on the clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase activity of fresh and defatted preparations of rat heart muscle	Effect of fasting on appetite; lipoprotein lipase activity of the clear factor in fresh and degreased preparations of rat heart muscle.
11	c3 leukotactic factors produced by a tissue protease	Leukotactic factors c3 produced by a tissue protease.
11	the rsr pattern in left surface leads in ventricular aneurysm	The rsr pattern of the left surface leads to ventricular aneurysm.
11	wilms tumour propagated through the inferior vena cava into the right heart cavities	A wilms s&apos tumor is spread through the inferior vena cava into the right cardiac cavity.
11	composition of alkoxylipids of human heart and aorta	Composition of alkoxylipids of human heart and human aorta.
11	novel preparation of cardiolipin from beef heart	New preparation of cardiolipin from Beef Core.
11	energy coupling mechanisms in mitochondria kinetic spectroscopic and thermodynamic properties of an energy transducing form of cytochrome b	Energy coupling mechanisms in the spectroscopic and thermodynamic properties of d&apos mitochondria; a transducing form d' energy of cytochrome b.
11	pathology of experimental trypanosomiasis in the albino rat rabbit goat and sheep a preliminary report	Pathology of experimental trypanosomiasis in albino rabbits and goats and sheep a preliminary report.
11	rheumatoid heart disease with complete heart block	Rheumatoid heart disease with complete heart block.
11	osmotically induced alterations in volume and ultrastructure of mitochondria isolated from rat liver and bovine heart	Osmotic alterations in volume and ultrastructure of mitochondria isolated from rat liver and bovine heart have been induced.
11	creatine regulation in the embryo and growing chick	Creatine regulation in the embryo and growing chick.
11	microfilaments in cellular and developmental processes	The microfilaments in cellular and developmental processes.
11	giant peaked upright t waves in cerebrovascular accident	The giant t waves peaked vertically during a stroke.
11	control of the tricarboxylate cycle and its interactions with glycolysis during acetate utilization in rat heart	Control of the tricarboxylate cycle and its interactions with glycolysis during apos utilization; acetate in rat heart.
11	further studies on the reversibility of serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	Other studies on the reversibility of serum cholesterol induced apos; atherosclerosis.
11	ketone body and fatty acid metabolism in sheep tissues 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase a cytoplasmic enzyme in sheep liver and kidney	Ketone and fatty acid metabolism in sheep 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase tissue, a cytoplasmic enzyme of sheep liver and kidney.
11	interconversion of cyclic nucleotide activated and cyclic nucleotide independent forms of a protein kinase from beef heart	Interconversion of independent and activated cyclic nucleotide forms of apos, a protein kinase of the bovine heart.
11	elevation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate in rat heart after perfusion with acetylcholine	L' elevation of guanosine cyclic phosphate 3-5 in rat heart after acetylcholine infusion.
11	neurally mediated increase in dopamine beta hydroxylase activity	Mediated neuronal increase in dopamine beta hydroxylase activity.
11	cineangiography of the coronary arteries clinical function and anatomic correlation in patients with chronic chest pain	Cineangiography of clinical function of the coronary arteries and anatomical correlation in patients with chronic chest pain.
11	enzyme inactivation with ultraviolet laser energy 2650 angstroms	Enzyme inactivation with ultraviolet laser energy 2650 angstroms.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on myocardial oxygen consumption in the presence of isoproterenol	Effect of apos; inhibition of lipolysis on appetite; myocardial oxygen consumption in the presence of apos; isoproterenol.
11	the effects of intra aortic counterpulsation on cardiac performance and metabolism in shock associated with acute myocardial infarction	The effects of intra-aortic pulsation on cardiac performance and shock metabolism associated with acute myocardial infarction.
11	studies of cardiac muscle with a high permeability to calcium produced by treatment with ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid	Cardiac muscle studies with a high permeability to calcium produced by treatment with ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid.
11	excitation contraction coupling in heart vii calcium accumulation in subcellular particles in congestive heart failure	Excitation contraction coupling in heart vii calcium accumulation in subcellular particles in congestive heart failure.
11	glutamine synthetase in muscle and kidney	Glutamine synthetase in muscle and kidneys.
11	haem a cytochrome c and total protein turnover in mitochondria from rat heart and liver	Hem, a cytochrome c and total protein turnover in rat heart and liver mitochondria.
11	thyroxine convesion to triiodothyronine by isolated perfused rat heart	Convesion of thyroxine to triiodothyronine by isolated perfused rat heart.
11	comparison of glycerol treatment in frog skeletal muscle and mammalian heart an electrophysiological and morphological study	Comparison of glycerol treatment in frog skeletal muscle and mammalian heart tissue, electrophysiological and morphological study.
11	in vitro organization of dissociated rat cardiac cells into beating three dimensional structures	In vitro organization of dissociated rat heart cells into threedimensional beats.
11	studies on the pathogenesis of experimental epizootic hemorrhagic disease of white tailed deer	Studies on the pathogenesis of experimental epizootic hemorrhagic disease in white-tailed deer.
11	effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and oxygen consumption in intact dogs	The effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and oxygen consumption in intact dogs.
11	action of fenfluramine on monoamine stores of rat tissues	L' action of fenfluramine on monoamine stores of rat tissue.
11	transitional cardiac cells of the conductive system of the dog heart distinguishing morphological and electrophysiological features	The transitional cardiac cells of the conducting system of the dog heart distinguish morphological and electrophysiological characteristics.
11	cardiac muscle its ultrastructure in the finch and hummingbird with special reference to the sarcoplasmic reticulum	L' cardiac muscle ultrastructure in finches and hummingbirds, especially in the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	the course of ketosis and the activity of key enzymes of ketogenesis and ketone body utilization during development of the postnatal rat	L' ketosis evolution and l' activity of key enzymes of ketogenesis and l' ketone body utilization during postnatal rat development.
11	regulation of coronary blood flow	Post post post pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos
11	study of soluble lipoprotein in rat liver mitochondria	L' study of soluble lipoproteins in rat liver mitochondria.
11	the fine structure and electrophysiology of heart muscle cell injury	Fine structure and electrophysiology of injury to heart muscle cells.
11	further studies on histamine catabolism in vivo	D' further studies on catabolism of histamine in vivo were completed.
11	improved techniques for the preparation of ultrathin frozen sections	Improved techniques for the preparation of thin, frozen sections.
11	comparative studies of light meromyosin paracrystals derived from red white and cardiac muscle myosins	Comparative studies of light meromyosin paracrystals derived from white myosin and cardiac muscle myosin.
11	importance of the carotid sinus baroreceptors in the regulation of myocardial performance	The importance of the carotid sinus baroreceptors in the regulation of myocardial performance.
11	endocardial fibroelastosis in children with special reference to the lesions of cardiac ganglia	Fibro-endocardial elastosis in children, particularly lesions of cardiac glands.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle growth and physiological implication	Synthetic strands of cardiac muscle growth and physiological implications.
11	quantitative study of infarcted myocardium in cardiogenic shock	Cardiogenic shock is a quantitative study of infarcted myocardium.
11	changes of myocardial enzyme activities in atrial fibrillation	Modifications of myocardial enzyme activities in atrial fibrillation.
11	cardiac lesions in fatal cases of recent myocardial ischaemia from a coronary care unit	Cardiac injury in cases of recent myocardial ischemia in a coronary care unit.
11	the identification of the site of action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as a proteolipid in mitochondrial membranes	Identification of the d&apos site; action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as a proteolipid in mitochondrial membranes.
11	aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in pigeon heart mitochondria succinate cytochrome c1 reductase stopped flow kinetics	Aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in pigeon heart mitochondria succinate cytochrome c1 reductase stopped the flow kinetics.
11	activities of enzymes of ketone body utilization in brain and other tissues of suckling rats	Lapses; enzymes activity; use of the keto body in the brain and other tissues of lactating rats.
11	light and electron microscopy of diet induced atrial thrombosis in swiss mice ii recovery on return to a balanced diet	Light and electron microscopy of the diet induced atrial thrombosis in Swiss mice ii recovery after a return to a balanced diet.
11	angiotensin ii rapid localization in nuclei of smooth and cardiac muscle	L' angiotensin ii is rapidly localized to the nuclei of smooth and cardiac muscles.
11	histochemistry of lactic dehydrogenase in heart and pectoralis muscles of rat	L' histochemistry of lactic dehydrogenase in rat heart and pectoral muscles.
11	the isotope exchange reactions of ox heart phosphofructokinase	D&apos reactions; isotope exchange of beef heart phosphofructokinase.
11	light chains of myosins from white red and cardiac muscles	Myosin light chains from white red and cardiac muscle.
11	metabolism of lysolecithin in vivo effects of hyperlipemia and atherosclerosis in squirrel monkeys	Metabolism of lysolecithin In vivo effects of hyperlipemia and apos; atherosclerosis in squirrel monkeys.
11	quantitative assessment of the extent of myocardial infarction in the conscious dog by means of analysis of serial changes in serum creatine phosphokinase activity	Quantitative assessment of apos; extent of myocardial infarction in conscious dogs using apos; analysis of serial changes in apos; serum creatine phosphokinase activity.
11	fluorescent probe environment and the structural and charge changes in energy coupling of mitochondrial membranes	L' fluorescent probe environment and structural and charge changes in energy coupling of mitochondrial membranes.
11	coronary blood flow oxygen delivery rate and cardiac performance	Coronary blood flow, coronary blood flow, cardiac oxygen and cardiac performance.
11	modification of the cardiovascular effects of l dopa by decarboxylase inhibitors	Modification of the cardiovascular effects of l dopa by decarboxylase inhibitors.
11	myocardial and skeletal muscle concentrations of digoxin in patients on long term therapy	Levels of digoxin in the myocardium and skeletal muscles of patients following long-term treatment.
11	reconstitution of horse heart cytochrome c interaction of the components obtained upon cleavage of the peptide bond following methionine residue 65	Reconstitution of l' interaction of horse heart cytochrome c with the components obtained by cleavage of the peptide bond following the methionine residue 65.
11	the sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b electron microscopy polarized light z bands heartbeat	The sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b electron microscopically polarizes the z luminous bands of heartbeats.
11	the progression of interstitial myocarditis to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis	The progression of interstitial myocarditis to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis.
11	effects of isoprenaline and aminophylline on the chronotropic responses of the isolated guineapig heart to vagal stimulation and acetylcholine	Effects of isoprenaline and apos; aminophylline on the chronotropic responses of the isolated guinea-pig heart to vagal stimulation and apos; acetylcholine.
11	myocardial fibrosis and smooth muscle cell hyperplasia in coronary arteries of allylamine fed rats	Myocardial fibrosis and smooth muscle cell hyperplasia in coronary arteries of exposed rats.
11	equivalent circuit of frog atrial tissue as determined by voltage clamp unclamp experiments	An equivalent circuit of frog atrial tissue as determined by tension clamp experiments.
11	decrease in liver aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase produced by chronic administration of l dopa	Acute decrease in hepatic aromatic amino acid decarboxylase induced by etapos; chronic administration of dopa l.
11	the effects of posture and isoproterenol on the velocity of left ventricular contraction in man the reciprocal relationship between left ventricular volume and myocardial wall force during ejection on mean rate of circumferential shortening	The effects of posture and isoproterenol on the rate of left ventricular contraction in men, the interrelationship between left ventricular volume and myocardial wall strength during apo; ejection on mean circumferential shortening rate.
11	ethanol acetaldehyde and myocardial protein synthesis	L' ethanol acetaldehyde and myocardial protein synthesis.
11	bone and soft tissue changes with oral phosphate supplements	Bone and soft tissue changes with oral phosphate supplements.
11	the use of autologous fascia lata for cardiac valve replacement preliminary results	L' use of autologous fascia lata for preliminary cardiac valve replacement (CPR) results.
11	magnesium exchange in rat ventricle	L' magnesium exchange in rat ventricle.
11	change in the glycogen level in the liver heart and skeletal muscles of rodents during exposure to plague toxin	Changes in liver glycogen levels in the heart and skeletal muscles of rodents exposed to plague toxin.
11	left ventricular performance and coronary flow after coronary embolization with plastic microspheres	Left ventricular performance and coronary flow after coronary embolization with plastic microspheres.
11	on the analysis of long chain alkane diols and glycerol ehters in biochemical studies	On l' analysis of long chain alkanes and glycerol ehters in biochemical studies.
11	effect of physostigmine on ventricular fibrillation and myocardial glycogen in hypothermic dogs	The effect of physostigmine on ventricular fibrillation and myocardial glycogen in hypothermic dogs.
11	the inducible alkaline phosphatase of rat heart some properties of the enzyme and factors influencing its activity	The inducible alkaline phosphatase of rat heart has certain properties of the enzyme and factors that influence its activity.
11	free fatty acid oxidation and carnitine levels in diphtheritic guinea pig myocardium	L' free fatty acid oxidation and carnitine levels in guinea pig diphtheria.
11	brain response to protein undernutrition mechanism of preferential protein retention	Cerebral response to sub-protein feeding mechanism of preferential protein retention.
11	direct counting and sizing of mitochondria in solution	Direct counting and sizing of mitochondria in solution.
11	ferrochelatase and aminolaevulate synthetase in brain heart kidney and liver of normal and porphyric rats the induction of aminolaevulate synthetase in kidney cytosol and mitochondria by allylisopropylacetamide	Ferrochelatase and apo; aminolaevulate synthetase in cerebral heart kidney and liver of normal and porphyric rats; induction of aminolaevulated synthetase in renal cytosol and mitochondria by allylisopropylacetamide.
11	coordinated development of glucuronidase and galactosidase in mouse organs	Coordination of the development of glucuronidase and galactosidase in mouse organs.
11	a method for the determination of lipoprotein lipase in postheparin plasma and body tissues utilizing a triolein coated celite substrate	A method for the determination of lipoprotein lipase in plasma and body tissue post-heparin using a celitic substrate coated with triolein.
11	natural occurrence of free fatty aldehydes in bovine cardiac muscle	Natural occurrence of free fatty aldehydes in bovine cardiac muscle.
11	influence of dietary fat on the concentration of long chain unsaturated fatty acid families in rat tissues	The influence of dietary fat on the concentration of long-chain unsaturated fatty acids in rat tissues.
11	the effect of drugs on stress induced changes of myocardial glycogen and blood glucose concentration in rats	The effect of drugs on stress induced changes in myocardial glycogen and blood glucose concentration in rats.
11	a binding protein for fatty acids in cytosol of intestinal mucosa liver myocardium and other tissues	A fatty acid binding protein in the cytosol of intestinal mucosa of liver and other tissues.
11	clearing factor lipase in obese hyperglycaemic mice ob ob	Clear factor lipase in obese hyperglycaemic mice ob obese.
11	cell sorting in the presence of cytochalasin b	Screening in the presence of cytochalasin b.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle formation and ultrastructure	Synthetic strands of cardiac muscle formation and ultrastructure.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinone reduction by reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in rat liver and ox heart mitochondria	Proton translocation was coupled to quinone reduction by reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in rat liver and beef heart mitochondria.
11	coronary vasodilator responses to hypoxia before and after aminophylline	Coronary vasodilator responses to hypoxia before and after aminophylline.
11	coronary artery reperfusion i early effects on local myocardial function and the extent of myocardial necrosis	Liposal perfusion; coronary artery; early effects on local myocardial function and liver function; extent of myocardial necrosis.
11	coronary artery reperfusion ii reduction of myocardial infarct size at 1 week after the coronary occlusion	Reperfusion of the apos; coronary artery ii reduction of the aposal size; myocardial infarction 1 week after the aposal infarction; coronary occlusion.
11	endothelial cell membranes polarity of particles as seen by freeze fracturing	Polarity of particles in endothelial cell membranes as observed by freeze-fracture.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction of the inner mitochondrial membrane i general characterization	Apos nucleotides; adenine induce contraction of the inner mitochondrial membrane i general characterization.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction on the inner mitochondrial membrane ii effect of bongkrekic acid	Apos-induced contraction; nucleotide adenine on the inner mitochondrial membrane ii effect of bongkrekic acid.
11	3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in tissues from normal and ketonaemic sheep	Three hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in normal sheep and ketoneemic sheep tissue.
11	synthesis of plastoquinone analogs and inhibition of photosynthetic and mammalian enzyme systems	Apos synthesis; plastoquinone analogs and inhibition of photosynthetic and mammalian enzyme systems.
11	reversible transformation by urea of contact inhibited fibroblasts	The reversible transformation by the urea of contact inhibits the fibroblasts.
11	intramitochondrial glycogen in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of patients with congenital heart diseases	Intramitochondrial glycogen in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of patients with congenital heart disease.
11	platelets in hyperacute rejection of heterotopic cardiac allografts in presensitized dogs an experimental study	Randomized trial of a hyperacute rejection of heterotopic heart allografts in a presensizing dog.
11	lanthanum in heart cell culture effect on calcium exchange correlated with its localization	The effect of lanthanum on apos; calcium exchange was correlated with its localization in cardiac cell cultures.
11	calcium as mediator of isoproterenol induced myocardial necrosis	Calcium as a mediator of isoproterenol induced myocardial necrosis.
11	acute villous inflammation in the placenta following intrauterine transfusion	Acute villositary inflammation of the placenta following intrauterine transfusion.
11	role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in regulation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content in mammalian brain heart muscle and intestinal smooth muscle	Role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in the regulation of guanosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate content in mammalian cerebral cardiac and intestinal smooth muscle.
11	light and electron microscopic changes in the myocardium of influenza infected turkeys	Changes in the myocardium of turkeys infected by light and electron microscopy.
11	responses of the protein deficient rabbit to staphylococcal bacteremia	Reactions of the protein-deficient rabbit to staphylococcal bacteremia.
11	myocardial aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and aminoacyl transferring enzyme activity	L' myocardial aminoacyl transfer l' ribonucleic acid synthetase and l' aminoacyl transfer l' enzyme activity.
11	kinetics of calcium accumulation in acute myocardial ischemic injury	Apos kinetics; calcium accumulation in acute myocardial ischemic injury.
11	reduction of experimental myocardial infarct size by corticosteroid administration	Bowel size reduction; experimental myocardial infarction by apos; corticosteroid administration.
11	development of sensitivity to tetrodotoxin in beating chick embryo hearts single cells and aggregates	The development of sensitivity to tetrodotoxin in the hearts of chickens beating individual cells and aggregates.
11	evidence for boundary lipid in membranes	Membrane evidence for the presence of boundary lipids.
11	the pathological diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction preliminary results of a who cooperative study	Pathological diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction Preliminary results from a collaborative study by Who.
11	carnitine and brown adipose tissue metabolism in the rat during development	Brown adipose tissue and carnitine metabolism in the rat during development.
11	a morphometric study on the nexus of rat cardiac muscle	A morphometric study of the relationship between rat cardiac muscle and rat cardiac muscle.
11	characterization of adrenoceptors in the myocardium	Characterization of adrenoceptors in the myocardium.
11	the activities of phosphorylase hexokinase phosphofructokinase lactate dehydrogenase and the glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenases in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	L' activity of phosphorylase hexokinase phosphofructokinase lactate dehydrogenase and glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase in muscles of vertebrates and invertebrates.
11	cell free protein synthesis in heart and skeletal muscles from polymyopathic hamsters	Cell-free protein synthesis in the heart and skeletal muscles of polymyopathic hamsters.
11	evidence for defective transfer ribonucleic acid in polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis	Defective transfer of l' ribonucleic acid in polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis.
11	the effect of sulfonylurea drugs on rabbit myocardial contractility canine purkinje fiber automaticity and adenyl cyclase activity from rabbit and human hearts	The effect of sulfonylurea drugs on myocardial contractility canine purkinje fiber automaticity and adenyl cyclase activity from rabbit and human heart.
11	a quantitative assay for intercellular adhesion	It's called a quantitative dose of lapos; it's called intercellular adhesion.
11	the enzymic properties of a modified ox heart myosin adenosine triphosphatase on covalent binding to an insoluble cellulose matrix	The enzymatic properties of modified bovine heart myosin adenosine triphosphatase on covalent binding to an insoluble cellulose matrix.
11	ultrastructural studies of beef heart mitochondria 3 the inequality of gross morphological change and oxidative phosphorylation	Ultrastructural studies of beef heart mitochondria 3, inequality of crude morphological changes and oxidative phosphorylation.
11	heart failure and neonatal hypocalcaemia	He's got heart failure and neonatal hypocalcemia.
11	specificity of serum creatine kinase isoenzymes in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Specificity of serum creatine kinase isoenzymes in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction.
11	transcription of spontaneously released bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid in frog auricles	Transcription of l' bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid spontaneously released in frog auricles.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet ii effect of repeatedly injected foreign protein in rabbits fed a lipid rich cholesterol poor diet	Experimental induction of apo; atherosclerosis by the synergy of apo; an allergic lesion to arteries and to a high-fat diet ii effect; repeated injections of foreign proteins in rabbits fed a low-cholesterol, high-fat diet.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet 3 the role of earlier acquired fibromuscular intimal thickening in the pathogenesis of later developing atherosclerosis	Experimental induction of apo; atherosclerosis by the synergism of allergic lesions to arteries and the lipid-rich diet 3 the role of apo; intimal fibrospuscular thickening acquired earlier in the pathogenesis of later apo development; atherosclerosis.
11	oscillation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate concentration during the myocardial contraction cycle	Oscillation of d' cyclic adenosine monophosphate during the myocardial contraction cycle.
11	experimental calcification of the myocardium ultrastructural and histochemical investigations	An experimental calcification of ultrastructural and histochemical studies of the myocardium.
11	evidence for delayed development of the glucagon receptor of adenylate cyclase in the fetal and neonatal rat heart	Evidence of delayed development of the glucagonic receptor of the adenos; adenylate cyclase in the fetal and neonatal rat heart.
11	ultrastructural changes of coronary artery endothelium associated with biliary obstruction in the rat	Ultrastructural changes of the cardiac endothelium associated with biliary obstruction in the rat.
11	total and effective coronary blood flow in coronary and noncoronary heart disease	Total and effective coronary blood flow in coronary and non-coronary diseases.
11	evidence against the incorporation into protein of amino acids directly from the membrane transport system in rat heart	Evidence against apos; incorporation into protein from amino acids directly from the membrane transport system into rat heart.
11	the changing pattern of ischemic heart disease	Evolution of ischemic heart disease in Canada.
11	the calcium pump of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum functional alterations at different levels of thyroid state in rabbits	Calcium pump of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum functional alterations at different levels of lidos; thyroid status in rabbits.
11	the effect of prolonged administration of ethanol on cardiac metabolism and performance in the dog	The effect of prolonged administration of ethanol on cardiac metabolism and performance in dogs.
11	the neurogenic vasoconstrictor effect of digitalis on coronary vascular resistance	L' the neurogenic vasoconstrictor effect of digitalis on coronary vascular resistance.
11	radiation induced cardiomyopathy i an electron microscopic study of cardiac muscle cells	Radiation induced cardiomyopathy i an electron microscopic study of cardiac muscle cells.
11	significance of multiple intercalated discs in hypertrophied human myocardium	L' importance of multiple intercalated discs in hypertrophied human myocardium.
11	tissue distribution and metabolism of aflatoxin b 1 14 c in broiler chickens	Tissue distribution and metabolism of aflatoxin b 114 c in broiler chickens.
11	the apparent stimulation of proteolysis by adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates	The apparent stimulation of proteolysis by adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates.
11	the interaction of the calcium binding protein troponin c with bivalent cations and the inhibitory protein troponin i	Troponin c, a calcium-binding protein, interacts with divalent cations and inhibitory protein troponin i with troponin i.
11	studies on partially reduced mammalian cytochrome oxidase reactions with carbon monoxide and oxygen	Studies of partially reduced mammalian cytochrome oxidase reactions with carbon monoxide and oxygen.
11	isolation of nuclear acidic proteins from rat tissues characterization of acetylated liver nuclear acidic proteins	Isolate nuclear acidic proteins from rat tissue for characterization of acetylated hepatic acidic nuclear proteins.
11	the myocardial interstitium its structure and its role in ionic exchange	L' myocardial interstium is structured and plays a role in the ion exchange.
11	spheroidal bodies in the junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum of lizard myocardial cells	Spheroidal body in the junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum of lizard myocardial cells.
11	membrane junctions in the intermembrane space of mitochondria from mammalian tissues	The membrane junctions in the intermembrane space of mammalian tissue mitochondria.
11	dna synthesis and mitosis in well differentiated mammalian cardiocytes	Apos synthesis; DNA and mitosis in well differentiated mammalian cardiocytes.
11	changes in enzyme activities in tissues of rats exposed to hypoxia	Changes in enzyme activities in tissues of exposed rats; hypoxia.
11	the specific radioactivity of the precursor pool for estimates of the rate of protein synthesis	The specific radioactivity of the precursor pool for estimates of the rate of protein synthesis.
11	inhibition of cell proliferation in the livers of hepatectomized rats by a rabbit hepatic chalone	L' inhibition of cell proliferation in liver of hepatectomized rats by a rabbit hepatic chalone.
11	cytochrome c observation of numerous single carbon sites of the reduced and oxidized species by means of natural abundance 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	In addition to the natural abundance 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy, there are numerous single carbon sites of the reduced and oxidized species that are observed by cytochrome c.
11	morphometric data on the endothelium of blood capillaries	Morphometric data on the endothelium of the blood vessels.
11	microbodies peroxisomes containing catalase in myocardium morphological and biochemical evidence	Peroxisome microbodies containing catalase in myocardium showed both morphological and biochemical evidence.
11	the effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and oxygen handling in the acutely ischaemic and normal canine myocardium	The effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and oxygen handling in the acute and normal ischemic canine myocardium.
11	pathology of murine cytomegalovirus infection in newborn mice muscle heart and brown fat lesions	Murine cytomegalovirus infection in the muscle heart and brown fat lesions of mice again-born.
11	tetrodotoxin desensitization in aggregates of embryonic chick heart cells	Tetrodotoxin desensitization in aggregates of embryonic chicken heart cells.
11	sudden death in infancy a study of cardiac specialized tissue	Sudden death in infancy, study of specialized cardiac tissue.
11	a study of human cardiac allograft in a patient with four year survival	A study of a human cardiac allograft in a patient with a survival of four years.
11	histopathology of early myocardial infarcts a new approach	L' histopathology of early myocardial infarction is novel.
11	detection of protein subunits of ferritin in situ in cells by immunofluorescence	In situ detection of ferritin protein units in cells by immunofluorescence.
11	primary neuropathic amyloidosis in three brothers	It's called primary neuropathic amyloidosis in three siblings.
11	the organic inorganic relationship in calcified mitochondria	The organic inorganic relationship in the calcified mitochondria.
11	the inhibition of histamine uptake and metabolism by burimamide in the guinea pig atrium and in mouse neoplastic mast cells in vitro	Absorption and metabolism of apos; histamine by burimamide in the apos; guinea pig atrium and neoplastic mast cells in mice in vitro.
11	synthesis and degradation of mitochondrial components in hypertrophied rat heart	Synthesis and degradation of mitochondrial components in rat heart hypertrophies.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinol oxidation in ox heart mitochondria	The proton translocation coupled to the oxidation of quinol in bovine heart mitochondria.
11	studies in rheumatic fever vi ultrastructure of chronic rheumatic heart disease	Studies in rheumatic fever vi ultrastructure of chronic rheumatic heart disease.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on infarct size after experimental coronary artery occlusion	Effect of apo; inhibition of lipolysis on size; infarction after experimental apo occlusion; coronary artery.
11	reduction of ferricytochrome c by dithionite ion electron transfer by parallel adjacent and remote pathways	Reduction of ferricytochrome c by dithionite ion transfer by adjacent and distant parallel channels.
11	rate of uptake of endogenous cortisol by the left ventricle of the anaesthetized dog during ventilation with ambient air and during hypoxia	Absorption of endogenous cortisol by the left ventricle of anesthetized dog during ventilation with the apos; ambient air and during hypoxia.
11	effect of a transient period of ischemia on myocardial cells ii fine structure during the first few minutes of reflow	Effect of a transient period of time; ischemia on myocardial cells ii fine structure during the first minutes of reflux.
11	intracytoplasmic junctions in cardiac muscle cells	Intracytoplasmic junctions in cardiac muscle cells.
11	investigation of the physiological basis for increased exercise threshold for angina pectoris after physical conditioning	Examination of the physiological basis of symptoms; an increase in the threshold for effort; angina pectoris after physical condition.
11	the molecular weight and thiol residues of acetyl coenzyme a synthetase from ox heart mitochondria	The molecular weight and thiol residues of acetyl coenzyme a synthetase from bovine heart mitochondria.
11	relatedness among contractile and membrane proteins evidence for evolution from common ancestral genes	Relationship between contractile and membrane proteins indicates evolution from common ancestral genes.
11	intracellular calcium binding and release in frog heart	Intracellular calcium binding and release in frog heart.
11	mechanisms for intracellular calcium regulation in heart i stopped flow measurements of ca uptake by cardiac mitochondria	Mechanisms of intracellular calcium regulation in heart i stopped measurements of ca uptake by the cardiac mitochondria.
11	myocardial function and lipid metabolism in the chronic alcoholic animal	Myocardial functions and lipid metabolism in the chronic alcoholic animal.
11	coronary hemodynamics and regional myocardial metabolism in experimental aortic insufficiency	Acute coronary hemodynamics and regional myocardial metabolism in experimental aortic failure.
11	antigenic cross reaction between mouse intestine and a member of the autochthonous microflora	Antigenic cross reaction between mouse intestine and a member of the indigenous microflora.
11	electron transfer reactions in biological systems the reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromous ions	Electron transfer reactions in biological systems and the reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromium ions.
11	the effect of acute fatigue on organ proteins and protein fractions	L' effect of acute fatigue on organic proteins and protein fractions.
11	synthesis and properties of some cyclic amp alkyl phosphotriesters	Synthesis and properties of some cyclic phosphotriester ampoules.
11	subendocardial ischemia provoked by tachycardia in conscious dogs with coronary stenosis	Endocardial ischemia caused by tachycardia in conscious dogs with coronary stenosis.
11	cor triatriatum study of 20 cases	Cor triatriatum study of 20 cases.
11	primary cardiomyopathy in identical twins	Acute primary cardiomyopathy in identical twins.
11	bacterial endocarditis in subjects 60 years of age and older	Bacterial endocarditis in people 60 years of age and over.
11	anatomically corrected malposition of the great arteries s d l	Anatomically corrected malposition of the major arteries.
11	ultrastructure of crista supraventricularis muscle in patients with congenital heart diseases associated with right ventricular outflow tract obstruction	Ultrastructure of crista supraventricularis muscle in patients with congenital heart diseases associated with right ventricular outflow tract obstruction.
11	clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in chronic ischemic heart disease effects on peripheral vascular resistance and venous tone and on ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance	Clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in effects of chronic ischemic heart disease on peripheral vascular resistance and venous tone as well as on ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance.
11	de subitaneis mortibus x familial congential heart block	Subsentianeis mortibus x familial congential heart block.
11	electrophoresis on cellulose acetate and chromatography on deae sephadex a 50 compared in the estimation of creatine kinase isoenzymes	Cellulose acetate electrophoresis and chromatography on deae sephadex a 50 were compared in the apos; creatine kinase isoenzyme estimates.
11	improvement of myocardial and other vital organ functions and metabolism with a simple method of pulsatile flow iabp during clinical cardiopulmonary bypass	Improvement of myocardial and d&apos metabolism and function by a simple method of pulsatile iabp flow during clinical bypass cardio-pulmonary.
11	further characterization of tissue distribution and metabolism of 14c aflatoxin b1 in chickens	Further characterization of tissue distribution and metabolism of aflatoxin b1-14c in chickens.
11	hypercalcemia and calcinosis in florida horses implication of the shrub cestrum diurnum as the causative agent	L' hypercalcemia and calcinosis in Florida horses involve the apos; shrub cestrum diurnum as causative agent.
11	the development of cardiac myxomas and papillary endocardial lesions from mural thrombus	The development of cardiac myxomas and endocardial papillary lesions from the wall thrombus.
11	influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial flow in the collateralized heart with chronic coronary occlusion	The influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial output in the collateralized heart with chronic coronary occlusion.
11	effect of stimulation site on ventricular threshold in dogs with heart block	Effects of apo; a stimulating site on the ventricular threshold in dogs with a cardiac block.
11	comparison of the effects of histamine and tolazoline on adenylate cyclase activity from guinea pig heart	Comparison of the effects of histamine and tolazoline on guinea-pig heart adenylate cyclase activity.
11	inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by hydroxy substituted 1 4 quinones	L' inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by 14-quinone substituted hydroxyquinones.
11	the actions of a new beta adrenoceptor blocking drug ici 66082 on the rabbit papillary muscle and on the dog heart	The actions of d' a new drug beta blocking the adrenoreceptors here 66082 on the rabbit papillary muscle and on the dog heart.
11	studies on cytochrome oxidase interactions of the cytochrome oxidase protein with phospholipids and cytochrome c	Studies of the cytochrome oxidase interactions of protein cytochrome oxidase with phospholipids and cytochrome c.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of salmonid fish evidence for unique and rapid functional divergence of duplicated h 4 lactate dehydrogenases	The lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in salmonids reflect a unique and rapid functional divergence of duplicated h4 lactate dehydrogenases.
11	myocardial and total body extractions of radiorubidium in anesthetized dogs	Myocardial and total body extractions of radiorubidium from anesthetized dogs.
11	relationship between theophylline uptake and inotropic effect in the guinea pig heart	Ratio between l' absorption of theophylline and l' inotropic effect in the guinea pig heart.
11	amyloid in the aged heart frequency and clinical significance	Heart rate amyloid in the elderly and clinical significance.
11	myocardial infarction complicating bacterial endocarditis in rheumatic heart disease report of a case and review of the literature	Complicating myocardial infarction; bacterial endocarditis in rheumatic heart disease patients: a case report and literature review.
11	competitive inhibition of beef heart cyclic amp phosphodiesterase by cytokinins and related compounds	L' competitive inhibition of bovine heart phosphodiesterase by cytokinins and related compounds.
11	aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the hearts and vessels of hypertensive rats	Aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the hearts and vessels of hypertensive rats.
11	direct selective myocardial revascularization by internal mammary artery coronary vein anastomosis	Direct selective myocardial revascularization by coronary vein anastomosis of l' internal mammary artery.
11	cardiovascular calcification associated with nephritis in a badger	Cardiovascular calcification associated with nephritis in a badger.
11	identification and measurement of plasticizer in neonatal tissues after umbilical catheters and blood products	Identification and measurement of plasticizer in neonatal tissue; umbilical catheters and blood products.
11	prediction of secondary structure of proteins a comparison of the phi psi angles previously predicted for cytochrome c with recent x ray crystallographic findings	Prediction of secondary protein structure by comparing the phi psi angles previously predicted for cytochrome c with recent results of X-ray crystallography.
11	scanning electron microscopy of the heart after coronary occlusion	Scanning electron microscopy of the heart after coronary occlusion.
11	mitochondrial changes in dog myocardium induced by lowered ph in vitro	Mitochondrial changes in dog myocardium induced by in vitro ph depletion.
11	the mechanism of myocardial protection from ischemic arrest by intracoronary tetrodotoxin administration	The mechanism of myocardial protection against apos; ischemic arrest by apos; intracoronary tetrodotoxin administration.
11	hemodynamic characteristics of critical stenosis in canine coronary arteries	Hemodynamic characteristics of critical stenosis in canine coronary arteries.
11	a method of closed chest cannulation of the left atrium for left atrial femoral artery bypass	A method of closed chest canalation of the apos; left atrium for bypass of the apos; left femoral artery.
11	differences in amine storage in rat heart and brain	Differences in amine storage in rat heart and brain.
11	comparative effects of left atrial or left ventricular bypass on coronary sinus flow and oxygen usage in dogs	Comparative effects of left atrial or left ventricular bypass graft on coronary sinus flow and lapos; use of apos; oxygen in dogs.
11	isotonic contraction and contracture of the isolated right rat ventricle effect of la3 prenylamine atp mg2 author s transl	Isotonic contraction and contracture of the apos; isolated right ventricular effect of translator la3 prenylamine atp mg2.
11	endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate in tissues of rabbits fed an atherogenic diet	Endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate in tissues of rabbits fed an atherogenic diet.
11	investigation of the evi antibody in parasitic diseases other than american trypanosomiasis an anti skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis	Study of the apos; antibody found in parasitic diseases other than American trypanosomiasis, an anti-@-@ skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis.
11	individual organ contributions to the decrease in whole body vo2 with isoflurane	Contribution of each organ to the decrease in whole body vo2 with isoflurane, isoflurane and isoflurane.
11	myocardial injury from transthoracic defibrillator countershock	Myocardial damage from transthoracic defibrillator shock.
11	reticulum cell sarcoma of the heart	Reticulum cell sarcoma of the heart.
11	distribution and properties of cholinesterases in subcellular fractions from rat jejunum and heart tissue	Distribution and properties of cholinesterases in subcellular fractions of rat jejunum and cardiac tissue.
11	conformational studies of equilibrium structures in fragments of horse heart cytochrome c	Conformational studies of d&apos structures; equilibrium in horse heart cytochrome c fragments.
11	dependence of the cardiac uptake of digitalis glycosides on the extracellular calcium concentration in guinea pig isolated hearts	The dependence of cardiac uptake of digital glycosides on the extracellular calcium concentration in isolated guinea pig hearts.
11	the present status of heart transplantation	L-apos; current status of heart transplant.
11	the inhibition of c amp phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone	L' inhibition of c amp phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone.
11	myocardial lactate metabolism during isometric hand grip test comparison with pacing tachycardia	Myocardial lactate metabolism during isometric hand grip test comparison with tachycardia stimulation.
11	conformational isomerism and effective redox geometry in the oxidation of heme proteins by alkyl halides cytochrome c and cytochrome oxidase	Conformational isomerism and efficient redox geometry in apos; oxidation of heme proteins by d&apos halides; alkyl, cytochrome c and cytochrome oxidase.
11	effects of physical training on several glycolytic enzymes in rat heart	Apos effects; physical training on several glycolytic enzymes in rat heart.
11	x ray diffraction study of muscles in disease	Study of X-ray diffraction of muscles in disease.
11	wolff parkinson white syndrome a fatal case in a girl with no other heart disease	Parkinson's-Wolff is a fatal case in a young girl who has no other heart disease.
11	distribution and excretion of two chlorinated biphenyl isomers 4 chlorobiphenyl and decachlorobiphenyl in lactating bovine	Distribution and excretion of two chlorinated biphenyl isomers chlorobiphenyl 4 and decachlorobiphenyl in lactating cattle.
11	systolic time intervals in domestic ponies alterations in a case of coarctation of the aorta	Serologic time intervals in domestic ponies alterations in a case of coarctation of the aorta.
11	immunofluorescent localization of glycogenolytic and glycolytic enzyme proteins and of malate dehydrogenase isozymes in cross striated skeletal muscle and heart of the rabbit	Immunofluorescence localization of glycogenolytic and glycolytic enzyme proteins and malate dehydrogenase isozymes in crossed-strain skeletal muscle and heart of rabbit.
11	the ultra structural localization of enzyme activity in unfixed sections	Ultrastructural localization of the enzyme activity in unfixed sections.
11	myocardial infarction in the newborn a case report complicated by cardiogenic shock and associated with normal coronary arteries	Myocardial infarction in the new-ne, a case report complicated by cardiogenic shock and associated with normal coronary arteries.
11	cardiac pathology after aortic valve replacement using hufnagel trileaflet prostheses a study of 20 necropsy patients	Cardiac pathology after aortic valve replacement at apos; hufnagel trileaflet prosthetic aid, study of 20 necropical patients.
11	scanning electron microscopy of cardiac endothelium of the dog	Scanning electron microscopy of apos; cardiac endothelium of the dog.
11	the heart in systemic lupus erythematosus and the changes induced in it by corticosteroid therapy a study of 36 necropsy patients	The heart in the systemic lupus erythematosus and the changes induced by corticosteroid treatment in a study of 36 necropsy patients.
11	dissociations between changes in myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility	Dissolution between changes in myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility.
11	a permeability test for the study of mitochondrial injury in in vitro cultured heart muscle and endothelioid cells	A permeability test for the apo; study of the mitochondrial lesions in cardiac muscle and endotheloid cells cultured in vitro.
11	the lysosomal permeability test modified for toxicity testing with cultured heart endothelioid cells	Lysosomal permeability testing has been modified for toxicity testing of cultured cardiac endothelial cells.
11	localization in cardiac muscle of some enzymes related to glutamate metabolism	Localization in cardiac muscle of some enzymes related to glutamate metabolism.
11	lipid specificity of beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase activation	Lipid specificity of apo; beta activation-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase.
11	regulation of long chain fatty acid activation in heart muscle	L&apos regulation; long chain fatty acid activation in cardiac muscle.
11	purification and regulatory properties of chicken heart prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase	Purity and regulatory properties of chicken heart prostaglandin and ketoreductase 9.
11	kinetics of adenosine triphosphate synthesis in bovine heart submitochondrial particles	Kinetics of adenosine triphosphate synthesis in the heart of bovine particle submitochondrials.
11	chemical modification of bovine heart mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase selective modification of cysteine and histidine	Chemical modification of bovine heart mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase, selective modification of cysteine and histidine.
11	acyl coa inhibition of adenine nucleotide translocation in ischemic myocardium	L' acyl coa inhibits nucleotide translocation of l' adenine in ischemic myocardium.
11	reciprocal synapses between cholinergic axons and small granule containing cells in the rat cardiac ganglion	Reciprocal synapses between cholinergic axons and small granules containing cells in the rat cardiac ganglion.
11	halothane and the beating response and atp turnover rate of heart cells in tissue culture	Halothane and beat response and atp turnover rate of heart cells in tissue cultures.
11	golgi organelle response to the antibiotic x537a	Reaction of golgi organelles to the antibiotic x537a.
11	effects of magnesium on the kinetic properties of bovine heart glycogen synthase d	Effects of magnesium on the kinetic properties of beef heart glycogen synthase d.
11	effects of thyroid hormones on enzymes involved in fatty acid and glycerolipid synthesis	The effects of thyroid hormones on enzymes involved in fatty acid and glycerolipid synthesis.
11	the role of extracellular materials in cell movement i inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis does not stop ruffling membrane activity or cell movement	The role of extracellular materials in cell movement, l' inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis, n' does not inhibit membrane activity or cell movement.
11	studies of intercellular invasion in vitro using rabbit peritoneal neutrophil granulocytes pmns i role of contact inhibition of locomotion	Apo studies; intercellular invasion in vitro at apo; assistance of rabbit peritoneal neutrophil granulocytes; inhibition of locomotion contact.
11	characteristics of mitochondrial and microsonal monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate biosynthesis in rabbit heart	Characteristics of mitochondrial and microsonal monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate biosynthesis in rabbit heart.
11	myocardial perfusion and metabolism at normothermic and hypothermic levels	Myocardial perfusion and metabolism at normothermic and hypothermic levels.
11	distribution of coronary arterial flow in acute myocardial ischemia	Distribution of coronary arterial flow in acute myocardial ischemia ischia.
11	preliminary results of examinations of rats after a 22 day flight aboard the cosmos 605 biosatellite	Preliminary results from the study of rats after a 22-day flight aboard the 605 cosmos biosatellite.
11	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase location of sulfhydryl groups and disulfide bonds in soluble enzyme from beef heart	Mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase location of sulfhydryl groups and disulfide links in soluble enzyme from beef heart.
11	beef heart submitochondrial particles a mixture of mitochondrial inner and outer membranes	Beef heart contains mitochondrial particles, a mixture of mitochondrial inner and outer membranes.
11	kinetics of carbon monoxide binding and electron transfer by cytochrome c polymers	The kinetics of carbon monoxide binding and electron transfer by cytochrome c polymers.
11	viable amphibian hybrids produced by circumventing a block to cross fertilization rana clamitans female x rana catesbeiana male	Viable hybrids of amphibians were produced by circumventing a block of cross fertilization rana clamitans female x rana catesbeiana male.
11	hypersensitivity of delayed type manifested during the development of allergic lesions of the myocardium	Delayed hypersensitivity occurs during the development of allergic lesions of the myocardium.
11	how does angiotensin ii increase cardiac dopamine beta hydroxylation	How does l' angiotensin ii increase-t-it; cardiac dopamine beta hydroxylation?
11	fatty acid binding protein in small intestine identification isolation and evidence for its role in cellular fatty acid transport	The fatty acid binding protein in the apo; identification of small intestine and evidence of its role in cellular fatty acid transport.
11	cellular reactivity studies to streptococcal antigens migration inhibition studies in patients with streptococcal infections and rheumatic fever	Cellular reactivity studies to streptococcal antigens Dapos studies; inhibition of migration in patients with apo; streptococcal infections and rheumatic fever.
11	effects of verapamil on myocardial contractility cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and heart phosphorylase	Effects of verapamil on myocardial myocardial contractility Adenosine 3:5 monophosphate and cardiac phosphorylase.
11	alteration in oxyhemoglobin equilibrium p 50 and myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 by nitroglycerin gtn	Change of dosage; balance of apo; oxygen p 50 and myocardial consumption of apo; oxygen mvo2 by nitrogen glycerin.
11	time course for reversal of electrophysiological and ultrastructural abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibers surviving extensive myocardial infarction in dogs	The reversal of electrophysiological and ultrastructural abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibers survived a major myocardial infarction in the dog.
11	a model of psychosocial hypertension showing reversibility and progression of cardiovascular complications	D&apos model; psychosocial hypertension showing reversibility and progression of cardiovascular complications.
11	effect of the thyroid state on the enzymatic characteristics of cardiac myosin a difference in behavior of rat and rabbit cardiac myosin	Effect of l' thyroid state on the enzymatic characteristics of cardiac myosin, a difference in the behavior of cardiac myosin of rabbit and rat.
11	anoxia induced release of prostaglandins in rabbit isolated hearts	Anoxia induced release of prostaglandins into isolated rabbit hearts.
11	the heart as a target organ in systemic allergic reactions comparison of cardiac analphylaxis in vivo and in vitro	The heart as a target organ in systemic allergic reactions; comparison of cardiac analphylaxis in vivo and in vitro.
11	in vitro acetylcholine biosynthesis in normal and failing guinea pig hearts	In vitro biosynthesis of acetylcholine in normal and failing guinea pig hearts.
11	persistence of mb isoenzyme of creatine phosphokinase in the serum after minor iatrogenic cardiac trauma absence of postmortem evidence of myocardial infarction	The persistence of isoenzyme mb of creatine phosphokinase in serum after minor iatrogenic cardiac injury; absence of signs post @-@mortem d' myocardial infarction.
11	thallium 201 for myocardial imaging relation of thallium 201 to regional myocardial perfusion	Thallium 201 for myocardial imaging of thallium 201 to regional myocardial infusion.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xi young girl with palpitations	From subitaneis mortibus xi young girl with palpitations.
11	identification of nerve fibres in the scanning electron microscope	Identification of nerve fibres in the scanning electron microscope.
11	effect of exercise on tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins of rats fed two levels of fat	Lapos; effect of apos; exercise on tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins of rats fed two fat levels.
11	modifications of plasma post heparin lipolytic activity and tissue lipoprotein lipase activity induced in the rat by acute administration of ethanol or propan 2 ol	Changes in apo; post-lipolytic activity of plasma heparin and apo; tissue lipoprotein lipase activity induced by apo; acute administration of apo, ethanol or propan 2 o.
11	selective coronary perfusion scintigraphy ii abnormal coronary perfusion pattern author s transl	Translative selective coronary perfusion scan ii Abnormal pattern of coronary perfusion.
11	cardiac side effects of bencyclan	Possible cardiac side effects of bencyclan.
11	contractile myocardial proteins and their enzymatic activity in hypertensive disease and coronary atherosclerosis	Contractile myocardial proteins and their enzymatic activity in hypertensive and coronary atherosclerosis.
11	characteristics of reaction of the coronary vessels and metabolism of the myocardium in changing over from high to low frequency electric stimulation of the heart	Changing from high-frequency electrical stimulation to low-frequency electrical stimulation of the heart is characteristic of coronary vessel response and myocardial metabolism.
11	importance of determination of the content of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with myocardial infarct complicated by rupture of the heart	Importance of determining the content of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with apo; myocardial infarction complicated by heart failure.
11	cardiac responses to snout immersion in trained dogs	Heart responses to snout immersion in dogs dressed.
11	depression of contractile function and decrease of the effectiveness of oxygen utilization during compensatory heart hypertrophy	Decrease in contractile function and decrease in weight; effectiveness of the implant; use of the implant; oxygen during the implant; compensatory cardiac hypertrophy.
11	effect of trypsin like enzyme inhibitor on certain metabolic processes in the acute period of experimental myocardial ischemia	Apos effect; trypsin enzyme inhibitor on certain metabolic processes during the acute period of apos; experimental myocardial ischemia.
11	the cardiac muscle in the pulmonary vein of the rat a morphological and electrophysiological study	The cardiac muscle in the pulmonary vein of the rat was studied morphologically and electrophysiologically.
11	autoantibodies against heartmuscle sarcolemma in sera of patients with an idiopathic cardiomyopathy author s transl	Auto-antibody to heart muscle sarcolemma in serum of patients with idiopathic cardiomyopathy transl.
11	production and utilization of acetate in mammals	Production and use of acetate in mammals.
11	the specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid pool as a basis for measuring the rate of protein synthesis in the rat in vivo	The specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid pool as the basis for measuring the rate of protein synthesis in the rat in vivo.
11	comparative studies on 3 oxo acid coenzyme a transferase from various rat tissues	Comparative studies on 3 oxo-acid coenzyme a transferase from various rat tissues.
11	carnitine and trimethylaminobutyrate synthesis in rat tissues	Carnitine and trimethylaminobutyrate synthesis in rat tissues.
11	cardiomegaly in chronic anemia in ratsman experimental study including ultrastructural histometric and stereologic observations	Cardiomegaly in chronic anemia in ratsman experimental study including ultrastructural histometric and stereological observations.
11	the surgical anatomy of pulmonary atresia with ventricular septal defect pseudotruncus	Surgical anatomy of the apos; pulmonary atresia with ventricular septal defect pseudotruncus.
11	the relationship between the bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase lipophilic compounds and oligomycin	The relationship between bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase lipophilic compounds and oligomycin.
11	complexation of iron hexacyanides by cytochrome c evidence for electron exchange at the exposed heme edge	Complexation of iron hexacyanides by cytochrome c suggests electron exchange at the exposed end of the heme.
11	the role of cyclic gmp in the regulation of cyclic amp hydrolysis	The role of cyclic gmp in the regulation of ampoule cyclic hydrolysis.
11	concentration of digoxin methyldigoxin digitoxin and ouabain in the myocardium of the dog following coronary occulsion	Concentration of digoxin methyldigoxin digitoxin and d*apos; ouabain in dog myocardium following coronary occlusion.
11	effects of zinc copper and manganese supplementation of high concentrate ration on digestibility growth and tissue content of holstein calves	Effects of zinc copper and manganese supplementation of high-concentration diets on growth and tissue content of holstein calves.
11	isolation of a major cell surface glycoprotein from fibroblasts	Isolate a major cell surface glycoprotein from fibroblasts.
11	the calcium antagonistic fundamental effects of verapamil on myocardial fibers and smooth muscle cells of the blood vessels	The fundamental calcium antagonistic effects of verapamil on myocardial fibers and smooth muscle cells of blood vessels.
11	key role of intracellular calcium overload in acute necrosis of the myocardium cardioprotection with verapamil	The key role of intracellular calcium overload in acute necrosis of myocardial cardioprotection by verapamil.
11	verapamil in the study and treatment of supraventricular tachycardias with special reference to pre excitation	Vérapamil in the study and treatment of supraventricular tachycardia, in particular the pre-excitation.
11	membrane response to current pulses in spheroidal aggregates of embryonic heart cells	Membrane response to current pulses in spheroidal aggregates of embryonic cardiac cells.
11	an asparagine requirement in young rats fed the dietary combinations of aspartic acid glutamine and glutamic acid	The requirement for asparagine was observed in young rats fed the combinations of aspartic acid, glutamine, and glutamic acid.
11	fatal iron heart in an adolescent biochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the heart	"""Fatal iron heart in an adolescent biochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the heart,"" Obstet Gynecol, Am."
11	contractile function of the myocardium of the right ventricle in thyrotoxicosis	Acute contractile functions of the right ventricular myocardium in thyrotoxicosis.
11	experimental thyrotoxicosis under conditions preventin hyperlipacidemia	Experimental thyrotoxicosis under conditions preventing hyperlipacidemia.
11	cardiac hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Acute cardiac hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
11	prevention of hereditary cardiomyopathy in the hamster by verapamil and other agents	Prevention of hereditary cardiomyopathy in the hamster by verapamil and d' other agents.
11	apparent volumes of distribution of 125 i lothalamate and inulin in chickens	Apparent volume of distribution of 125 i lothalamate and inulin in chickens.
11	tolerance of altitude acclimatized rats to exercise in the cold	The tolerance of acclimatized rats at altitude encouraged them to exercise in the cold.
11	effects of obstruction of cardiac lymphatics	Effects of apo; obstruction of lymphatic heart.
11	increased collagen synthesis in blood vessels of hypertensive rats and its reversal by antihypertensive agents	Increased collagen synthesis in blood vessels from hypertensive rats and its inversion by antihypertensive agents were increased.
11	macroscopic enzyme mapping verification of large homogeneous experimental myocardial infarcts of predictable size and location in dogs	Verification of macroscopic enzyme mapping of large homogeneous experimental myocardial infarcts of expected size and location in the dog.
11	the effect of different methods of protecting the myocardium on lysosomal activation and acid phosphatase activity in the dog heart after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass	The effect of different methods of protecting the myocardium on the apos; activation of the lysosomal and lapos; acid phosphatase activity in the dog heart after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass.
11	a mitochondrial carnitine acylcarnitine translocase system	This is the mitochondrial carnitine acylcarnitine translocase system.
11	on the question of translocation of heart camp dependent protein kinase	On the question of translocation of protein kinase from cardiac camp.
11	myocardial extraction of labeled long chain fatty acid analogs 38509	Myocardial extraction of 38509 labelled long chain fatty acid analogs.
11	release of prostaglandin from the rabbit isolated heart following vagal nerve stimulation or acetylcholine infusion	Release of prostaglandin from isolated rabbit heart following vagus nerve stimulation or acetylcholine infusion.
11	nature of alkanes in beef heart lipids	Nature of alkanes in beef heart lipids.
11	a23187 a calcium ionophore that directly increases cardiac contractility 38704	A23187, a calcium ionophore that directly increases cardiac contractility 38704.
11	characteristics of artefacts following fixation with glutaraldehyde and osmium tetroxide	Characteristics of artifacts following fixation with glutaraldehyde and d*apos; osmium.
11	anoxic myocardial lesions in man developed during extracorporeal circulation studied by electron microscopy	Human anoxic myocardial lesions developed during the extracorporeal circulation studied by electron microscopy.
11	early ischemic lesion of the myocardium in a case of unusual developmental anomaly of the coronary vessels and coronary thrombosis	Early ischemic injury of the myocardium in a case of apos; abnormal development of coronary vessels and coronary thrombosis.
11	changes in the ultrastructure of cardiac muscle in steers deprived of copper	Changes in the apos; ultrastructure of cardiac muscle in copper-deprived steers.
11	potentation of the cardiac response to aminophylline by oxyfedrine	Potent of the cardiac response to apos; aminophylline by apos; oxyfedrin.
11	change in myoglobin content in rabbit and chicken muscles in ontogenesis	Change in myoglobin content of rabbit and chicken muscles during ontogenesis.
11	histometrical estimation of scar tissue in hypertrophied human heart muscle	Histometric estimate of scar tissue in hypertrophied human heart muscle.
11	rna content in the heart muscle cells following adrenalectomy and additional overload in the rat	Level of rna in the heart muscle cells following adrenalectomy and additional overload in the rat.
11	pathogenesis of mural thrombi in idiopathic cardiomyopathy	Pathogenesis of mural thrombi in idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the growth of heart cells	Lactate dehydrogenase enzymes in the growth of cardiac cells.
11	catecholamine release as mediator of intracellular enzyme activation in ischaemic perfused rat hearts	Release of catecholamines as mediator of intracellular enzyme activation in perfused hearts from ischemic rats.
11	effects of pharmacological myocardial depression on coronary artery collateral formation	Effects of pharmacological myocardial depression on coronary artery collateral formation.
11	some aspects of lipid metabolism in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Some aspects of lipid metabolism in foie gras and kidney syndrome in chicks.
11	tissue lipid composition in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Tissue lipid composition in foie gras and kidney syndrome in chicks.
11	the effect of microbial contemination of the air on metabolic indices in broiler chickens	L' effect of microbial tale of apo; air on metabolic indices in broiler chickens.
11	histochemical and histoenzymatic study of experimental myocardial infarction in the rat by temporary and permanent ligation of the left coronary artery author s transl	Histochemical and histoenzymatic study of apos; experimental myocardial infarction in the rat by temporary and permanent ligation of apos translocation; left coronary artery of apos; author.
11	cardiac heterotransplantation morphological and immunohistological studies	Morphological and immunohistological studies of cardiac heterotransplantation.
11	anomalous coronary artery origin and bicuspid aortic valve	Abnormal apos origin; coronary artery and bicuspid aortic valve.
11	acetylcholine content in the brain and heart of developing rats	Acetylcholine content in the brain and heart of developing rats.
11	ca 2 mg 2 dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase and its activator protein	About 2 mg 2 cyclic nucleotides dependent on phosphodiesterase and its activating protein.
11	relationship between cyclic amp metabolism and inotropic response of perfused rat hearts to phenylephrine and other adrenergic amines	Ratio between cyclic ampulla and inotropic response of perfused rat hearts to phenylephrine and d' other adrenergic amines.
11	cardia venous blood flow in atrial pacing versus exercise induced angina pectoris	Sarcophagous venous blood flow in atrial stimulation versus exercise induced angina of the chest.
11	human intramyocardial oxygen detected through chronic polarographic electrodes	Human intramyocardial oxygen detected by chronic polarographic electrodes.
11	alkaline isomerization of ferricytochrome c identification of the lysine ligand	Alkaline isomerization of ferricytochrome c identification of the lysine ligand.
11	metabolic stability of the protein synthesizing system of the myocardium in compensatory cardiac hyperfunction in actinomycin d block of rna synthesis	Metabolic stability of the protein synthesis system of the myocardium in the apos; compensatory cardiac hyperfunction of the apos; actinomycin blocking rna synthesis.
11	lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium and liver of rabbits with thyrotoxicosis	Isoenzymes of lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase in the myocardium and liver of rabbits with thyrotoxicosis.
11	citrate content in the myocardium and liver of rabbits in starvation and thyrotoxicosis	Citrate content in the myocardium and liver of rabbits in fasting and thyrotoxicosis.
11	ischemia in aortic stenosis hemodynamic prediction	Ischemia in aortic stenosis hemodynamic prediction hemodynamic prediction.
11	effects of hypoxemia on the extent of myocardial necrosis after experimental coronary occlusion	Effects of apos; hypoxemia on apos; extent of myocardial necrosis after experimental coronary occlusion.
11	continuous measurement of myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 and hemodynamic response during transapical left ventricular bypass talvb	Ongoing measurement of mvo2 myocardial oxygen consumption and hemodynamic response during transapical left ventricular bypass surgery.
11	thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura in four siblings	Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura in four sisterings.
11	relations between development of the capillary wall and myoarchitecture of the rat heart	Relationship between development of the capillary wall and myoarchitecture of the rat heart.
11	a new method for determination of postmortem left ventricular volumes clinico pathologic correlations	A new method for determination of clinical pathological correlations-ventricles of left ventricular volumes post-mortem.
11	effects of myocardial hypoxia and ischemia on myocardial scintigraphy	Efficacy of hypoxia and myocardial ischemia on myocardial scintigraphy.
11	inotropic and intracellular acid base changes during metabolic acidosis	The inotropic and intracellular acid bases change during metabolic acidosis.
11	effects of physical training on cardiac myosin atpase activity	Effects of apo; physical training on apo; cardiac myosin apase.
11	survival of cardiac xenografts effect of antithymocyte serum and enhancing heteroantiserum	The survival of cardiac xenografts, the effects of antithymocyte serum and the apos; increase of the apos; heterantiserum.
11	the effects of long term administration of 3h digoxin to the pregnant ewe upon the cardiovascular hemodynamics of the fetal lamb	Effects of apos; prolonged administration of 3 h of digoxin to the pregnant sheep; cardiovascular hemodynamics of apos; fetal lamb.
11	adenosine metabolism in cultured chick embryo heart cells	Metabolism of apos; adenosine in cultured chicken embryo heart cells.
11	the nuclear membranes in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle cells	The nuclear membranes in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle cells.
11	functional architecture of the ligamentum arteriosum in adults	Functional architectures of the ligamentum arteriosum in the adult.
11	arteriopathia calcificans infantum	Arteriopathia calcificans infantum.
11	mitochondrial respiration in the ventricular myocardium and in the white and deep red myotomal muscles of juvenile tuna fish thunnus thynnus l	Mitochondrial respiration in the ventricular myocardium and in the muscles of red and white myotoma of juvenile thunnus thynnus l.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium i effects on isometric tension development at different contraction frequencies	Changes in acid bases and coupling of d&apos contraction; excitation in rabbit myocardium have effects on isometric tension development at different contraction frequencies.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium ii effects on resting membrane potential action potential characteristics and propagation velocity	Acid base changes and coupling of contraction; excitation in rabbit myocardium ii effects on characteristics of d&apos potential; resting membrane potential action and propagation rate.
11	effects of myocardial infarction on adrenergic nerves of the rat heart muscle a histochemical study	Effects of myocardial infarction on adrenergic nerves of rat heart muscle, histochemical study.
11	a mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter in rat liver and heart and its possible function in cell control	A mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter in rat liver and heart and its possible role in cell regulation.
11	the mitochondrial pyruvate carrier kinetics and specificity for substrates and inhibitors	Mitochondrial pyruvate carrier kinetics and specificity for substrates and inhibitors.
11	toxicology of epidithio dioxopiperazines 1 studies on toxicity of cyclosarcosylsarcosineepitetrasulfide in guinea pigs and rats	Toxicology of epidithio dioxopiperazines 1 studies on the toxicity of cyclosarcosylsarcosine epitetrasulfide in guinea pigs and rats.
11	effects of an abdominal left ventricular assist device on myocardial oxygen supply demand ratios in normally perfused and ischemic bovine myocardium	Efficacy of an abdominal device; left ventricular assistance on demand reports; myocardial oxygen in normal perfused and ischemic bovine myocardium.
11	aortic bacterial endarteritis	You know, aortic bacterial endarteritis.
11	single coronary artery with myocardial infarction and av block	Single coronary artery with myocardial infarction and bblock.
11	basic fuchsin picric acid method to detect acute myocardial ischemia an experimental study in swine	Acute myocardial ischemia, an acute myocardial ischemia, an experimental study in swine.
11	experimental shwartzman phenomenon in the heart muscle	Experimental shwartzman phenomenon in heart muscle.
11	experimental revascularization of acute myocardial infarct	Experimental revascularization of acute myocardial infarction.
11	changes in the specific activity and content of free nucleotides and polyamines of the infarct and pre infarct area of the revascularized dog heart	Changes in the specific activity and content of free nucleotides and polyamines; infarcts and pre @-@infarct region of the revascularized dog heart.
11	the mitotic division of cardiac muscle cells	The mitotic division of cardiac muscle cells.
11	histoenzymatic characteristics of fibroblasts during organization of myocardial micronecroses	Histoenzyme characteristics of fibroblasts during apos; organization of myocardial micronecrosis.
11	morphogenesis of coronarosclerosis in rheumatism	Coronary osclerosis morphogenesis in rheumatism.
11	occurrence of coronary ostial stenosis in a necropsy series of myocardial infarction sudden death and violent death	Coronary osteal stenosis in a series of necropsies of myocardial infarction sudden death and violent death.
11	idiopathic giant cell myocarditis a distinctive clinico pathological entity	Idiopathic giant cell myocarditis is a clinically distinct entity,-pathological.
11	the role of protein and lipids in stabilizing the activity of bovine heart succinate dehydrogenase	The role of proteins and lipids in the stabilization of bovine heart succinate dehydrogenase activity.
11	surface properties of monomolecular films of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c and f	Surface properties of monomolecular films of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c and f.
11	kinetic and equilibrium studies of the ligand binding reactions of eight electrophoretic components of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Kinetic and d&apos studies; equilibrium of the ligand binding reactions of eight electrophoretic components of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin.
11	ballistocardiographic and electrocardiographic changes in men working with lead	Ballistocardiographic and electrocardiographic changes in men working with lead.
11	contractility and ultrastructure of cardiac muscle of guinea pigs treated with diphtheria toxin	Contractility and l' cardiac muscle ultrastructure of guinea pigs treated with diphtheria toxin.
11	interaction between spin labeled acyl coenzyme a and the mitochondrial adenosine diphosphate carrier	Interaction between spin labeled acyl coenzyme and the mitochondrial transporters of l' adenosine diphosphate.
11	isothiocyanates a new class of uncouplers	Isothiocyanate a new class of uncouplers.
11	cytochemical localization of lysosomal enzyme activity in normal and ischemic dog myocardium	Cytochemical localization of lysosomal enzyme activity in normal and ischemic dog myocardium.
11	alkali induced reduction of the beta cytochromes in purified complex iii from beef heart mitochondria	The alkali induced reduction of beta cytochromes in purified beef heart mitochondrial complex iii.
11	the activation of short chain fatty acids by the soluble fraction of guinea pig heart and liver mitochondria the search for a distinct propionyl coa synthetase	L' activation of short chain fatty acids by the soluble fraction of guinea pig heart and liver mitochondria is searching for a distinct propionyl coa synthetase.
11	colloidal lanthanum as a marker for impaired plasma membrane permeability in ischemic dog myocardium	Colloidal Lanthanum as a marker of l' alteration of plasma membrane permeability in ischemic dog myocardium.
11	mitochondrial permeability to chloride ion	Mitochondrial permeability to chloride ion and chloride ion.
11	prolyl hydroxylase and collagen metabolism after experimental mycardial infarction	Prolyl hydroxylase and collagen metabolism after experimental mycardial infarction.
11	influence of pituitary growth hormone on dna synthesis in rat tissues	Influence of apo; pituitary growth hormone on rat tissue DNA synthesis.
11	uptake of adenosine by dispersed chich embryonic cardiac cells	Capture of apos; adenosine by dispersed embryonic cardiac cells.
11	left anterior hemiblock masking inferior myocardial infarction	Anterior left hemiblock masking inferior myocardial infarction.
11	a comparison of concentrations of lead in human tissues	Comparison of levels of lead in human tissue.
11	on the application of affinity chromatography to turnover studies on the lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes	On the basis of the application of apos chromatography; affinity for lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme turnover studies.
11	studies on the mechanism of the inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine in rat heart mitochondria	Studies on the mechanism of the inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine in rat heart mitochondria.
11	effect of decapitation and acth on somatic development of the rabbit fetus	Effect of decapitation and acth on somatic development of fetal rabbit.
11	fetal and maternal lesions in pregnant ewes ingesting locoweed astragalus lentiginosus	Fetal and maternal lesions in pregnant sheep ingesting lidos; astragale lentiginosus localized.
11	experimentally induced sarcocystis infection in calves pathology	Experimentally induced sarcocystis infection in calf pathology.
11	molecular and biological studies on cardiac muscle calcium binding protein tn c	Molecular and biological studies of calcium binding protein tn c in cardiac muscle.
11	tissue water content and nuclear magnetic resonance in normal and tumor tissues	Tissue water content and nuclear magnetic resonance in normal and tumor tissue.
11	relationship of intramyocardial oxygen tension and epicardial st segment changes following acute coronary artery ligation effects of coronary perfusion pressure	The relationship between intramyocardial oxygen tension and changes in the epicardial st segment following acute effects of coronary perfusion on coronary ligation.
11	myocardial lesions induced by prolonged alcohol feeding in rhesus monkeys	Myocardial lesion induced by apos; prolonged ingestion of apos; alcohol in rhesus monkeys.
11	mitochondria from the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis oxidative phosphorylation and related processes	Mitochondria of lamprey lampetra fluviatilis oxidative phosphorylation and related processes.
11	variations in the lipid and fatty acid composition of cardiac tissue during perfusion of hearts isolated from rats on a high colza oil diet	Changes in the lipid and fatty acid composition of cardiac tissue during perfusion of isolated hearts from rats fed a high rapeseed oil diet.
11	cardiac specific creatine phosphokinase isoenzyme in the diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Cardiac creatine phosphokinase enzyme specific for the diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction.
11	ultrastructure development and nucleic acid of the s virus from the decapod crustacea macropipus depurator l	Development of the ultrastructure and nucleic acid of the virus from the crustacean macropipus l scavenger.
11	interaction between cyclic adenosine monophosphate and cyclic gunaosine monophosphate in guinea pig ventricular myocardium	Interaction between cyclic adenosine monophosphate and cyclic gunaosine monophosphate in guinea-pig ventricular myocardium.
11	myocardial damage in combined valvular and coronary bypass surgery	Myocardial lesion in patients with combined valvular and coronary bypass graft.
11	histochemical and structural changes in human myocardial cells after cardiopulmonary bypass	Histochemical and structural changes in human myocardial cells after cardiopulmonary bypass surgery.
11	blood flow and vasoactive drug effects in internal mammary and venous bypass grafts	Effects of blood flow and vasoactive drugs on bypass grafts.
11	improved angina threshold and coronary reserve following direct myocardial revascularization	Improved angina threshold and coronary reserve following direct myocardial revascularization.
11	reduction of infarct size by oxygen inhalation following acute coronary occlusion	Size reduction; inhalation infarction of apo; oxygen following apo; acute coronary occlusion.
11	hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside on the performance and metabolism of regional ischemic myocardium	The hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside on the performance and metabolism of regional ischemic myocardium.
11	morphologic correlates of technetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of acute myocardial infarcts in dogs	"""Technnetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of acute myocardial infarction in dogs"", Arch."
11	de subitaneis mortibus xiv bacterial arteritis in whipple s disease	Subsentianeis mortibus xiv bacterium arteritis in whipple s disease.
11	depolarization induced movement of mn 2 cations across the cell membrane in the guinea pig myocardium	Depolarization induced movement of mn 2 cations across the cell membrane in the guinea pig myocardium.
11	the effect of cold air inhalation on again pectoris and myocardial oxygen supply	Effects of inhalation; cold air on the pectoral and respiratory tract; myocardial oxygen.
11	pathology of stable and unstable angina pectoris	Acute gastrointestinal illness; stable and unstable angina.
11	compensatory changes of the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive coronary constriction	Compensatory changes in the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive coronary constriction.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xii asymmetrical hypertrophy of the heart	Of subitaneis mortibus xii asymmetrical hypertrophy of the heart.
11	the preparation of crystalline human l lactate nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase isoenzyme 1 involvoing preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Preparation of crystalline human lactate l nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase isoenzyme 1 by preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
11	cardiac involvement in whipple s disease	Acute cardiac involvement in whipple s disease.
11	hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease associated with patent ductus arteriosus primary or secondary	A hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease associated with the primary or secondary pulmonary arterial canal.
11	evaluation of precordial electrocardiographic mapping as a means of assessing changes in myocardial ischemic injury	Evaluation of precordial electrocardiographic mapping as a means of evaluating changes in myocardial ischemic injury.
11	rapid separation of plasma creatine kinase isoenzymes by batch adsorption on glass beads	Rapid separation of plasma creatine kinase isoenzymes by batch adsorption to glass beads.
11	detection of cardiac specific creatine kinase isoenzyme in sera with normal or slightly increased total creatine kinase activity	Detection of apos; specific cardiac creatine kinase isoenzyme in serum with normal or slightly increased total creatine kinase activity.
11	simultaneous separation of serum creatine kinase and lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes by ion exchange column chromatography	Simultaneous separation of serum creatine kinase and lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes by d' ion exchange column chromatography.
11	malignant mesenchymoma of the heart	Uh, malignant mesenchymoma of the heart.
11	myocardial sarcoidosis pathological studies on 7 autopsy cases with particular reference to histological variations	Myocardial sarcoidosis pathological studies on 7 cases of apos; autopsy, especially histological variations.
11	relationship between heart weight and the cross sectional area of the coronary ostia	A relationship between heart weight and coronary artery cross section.
11	flavoxate a potent phosphodiesterase inhibitor	Flavoxate, a potent phosphodiesterase inhibitor.
11	myocarditis induced by coxsackie b3 virus in mature mice	Myocarditis induced by coxsackie b3 virus in mature mice.
11	studies elucidating the importance of thymus on the degree of increased blood pressure and vascular disease in renal hypertensive mice a comparison of the disease in nude and haired littermates	Studies to elucidate apo; importance of thymus on degree of apo; increased blood pressure and vascular disease in renal hypertensive mice; comparison of naked and naked littermates.
11	characterization of the metabolism of exogenous cyclic amp by perfused rat heart and incubated prepubertal rat ovary	Characterization of metabolism of the exogenous cyclic bulb by perfused rat heart and lidos; prepubertal rat ovary incubated.
11	inhibition of the soluble adenosine triphosphatase from mitochondria by adenylyl imidodiphosphate	Inhibition of apos; soluble adenosine triphosphatase of mitochondria by epos; imidodiphosphate adenylyl.
11	postnatal persistence of spongy myocardium with embryonic blood supply	Postnatal persistence of spongy myocardium with embryonic blood supply.
11	coronary hemodynamics during positive g z acceleration	Coronary hemodynamics during vomiting; positive g z acceleration.
11	echocardiographic findings of ventricular septal rupture in acute myocardial infarction	Echocardiographic findings of ventricular septal rupture in acute myocardial infarction.
11	consequences of coronary arterial occlusion on remote myocardium effects of occlusion and reperfusion	Consequences of apo; coronary artery occlusion on remote myocardial effects of occlusion and reperfusion.
11	myocardial revascularization after acute infarction	Myocardial revascularization after acute infarction of myocardium.
11	multiple cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activities from rat tissues and occurrence of a calcium plus magnesium ion dependent phosphodiesterase and its protein activator	Multiple cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase in rat tissues and presence of apos; a loos-dependent phosphodiesterase; more magnesium calcium ion and its protein activator.
11	the calcium paradox a reaffirmation	Well, the calcium paradox is a reaffirmation.
11	voltage clamp simulation	Okay, voltage simulation clamp.
11	modification of the cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of isopreenaline caused by etafenone	Change of dosage; cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of apos; isopreenaline caused by apos; stamenone.
11	electron microscopical study of myocardial biopsy material in congenital heart block	Electron microscopy study of myocardial biopsy material in congenital cardiac block.
11	effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients with recent myocardial infarction	The effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients with recent myocardial infarction.
11	clinical presentation of a myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma	Clinical presentation of a myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma.
11	systemic and coronary haemodynamic effects of ketamine in intact anaesthetized and unanaesthetized dogs	Systemic and coronary hemodynamic effects of ketamine in intact anesthetized and unanaesthetized dogs.
11	case report fetal cardiac failure resulting from endocardial fibroelastosis	Case report; fetal heart failure resulting from endocardial fibroelastosis.
11	the response of the right ventricle to experimentally induced pulmonary artery obstruction	The response of the right ventricle to experimental obstruction of the pulmonary artery.
11	effects of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 on coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism	Effects of 5 tert hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2 hydroxypropoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085 on coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism.
11	the two step reversible denaturation of lactate dehydrogenase at low ph	Two-step reversible denaturation of the low-php lactate dehydrogenase.
11	substrate activity of structural analogs of isocitrate for isocitrate dehydrogenases from bovine heart	Substrate activity of structural analogs of isocitrate isocitrate for isocitrate dehydrogenases of beef heart.
11	pathologic anatomy of the cardiomyopathies idiopathic dilated and hypertrophic types infiltrative types and endomyocardial disease with and without eosinophilia	A pathological anatomy of the idiopathic type dilated and hypertrophic types infiltrating and endomyocardial with and without eosinophilia.
11	assay of cardiotonic steroids based on a 2 compartment model	This is a test of cardiotonic steroids based on a two-compartment model.
11	effect of l dopa administration to fine structures of brain heart and kidney in rats with special reference to appearance of microvascular thrombosis and its pathological significance	Effect of dopa; administration of dopa on fine structures of the cerebral heart and kidney in rats, particularly lacidosis; appearance of microvascular thrombosis and its pathological significance.
11	the crystal structure of bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c at 2 3 a resolution ii structure and function	The crystal structure of bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c at 2 a resolution ii structure and function.
11	effect of eltroxine and neomercazol on monoamine oxidase from rat tissues	Effect of eltroxine and neomercazol on monoamine oxidase in rat tissues.
11	regulation of postocclusive hyperemia by endogenously synthesized prostaglandins in the dog heart	The regulation of hyperemia post-occlusive by endogenously synthesized prostaglandins in the dog heart.
11	paramyxovirus avian cell relationship discrepant impact of 6 azauridine on virus production by susceptible and less susceptible cells	The differential impact of 6 azauridine on virus production by susceptible and less susceptible cells.
11	effectiveness of prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride in prolonging the survival of vascularized cardiac hamster to rat xenograft	Efficacy of prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride in prolonging survival of apos; a vascularized cardiac hamster to rat xenograft.
11	distribution of the action of creatine kinase amp aminohydrolase and atpase and absorption of ca n microsomal fractions of skeletal muscles	Distributions of apos; action of creatine kinase amp aminohydrolase and of apos; apase and absorption of microsomal fractions from skeletal muscles.
11	effect of pyrogenes on the activity and isoenzyne spectrum of lactate dehydrogenase in tissues and blood serum of guinea pigs	Effect of pyrogens on the activity and isoenzene spectrum of lactate dehydrogenase in tissues and blood serum of guinea pigs.
11	failure of dietary erucic acid to impair oxidative capacity or apt production of rat heart mitochondria isolated under controlled conditions	Apos failure; dietary erucic acid to alter oxidative capacity or apt production of isolated rat heart mitochondria under controlled conditions.
11	the effect of sulphide on cytochrome aa3 isosteric and allosteric shifts of the reduced alpha peak	L' effect of sulfide on isosteric and allosteric shifts of the reduced alpha peak of cytochrome aa3.
11	experimentally induced vitamin e selenium deficiency in the growing dog	Experimental induction of apo; selenium deficiency in the growing dog.
11	gas liquid chromatography of non esterified fatty acids of the rat myocardium	A liquid gas chromatography of the nonesterified fatty acids of rat myocardium.
11	oxidation of erucic acid and erucyl coa by isolated rat heart mitochondria comparison to oleic acid	Oxidation of erucic acid and erucyl coa by comparison with isolated rat heart mitochondria; oleic acid.
11	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent lipid peroxidation by beef heart submitochondrial particles	Reduction of dinucleotide-dependent nicotinamide adenine phosphate-dependent lipid peroxidation by beef heart mitochondrial particles.
11	fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of dpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues	Fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of l' dpn-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues.
11	photoreduction of cytochrome c1	Photoreduction of cytochrome c1 by photoreduction.
11	identification of essential arginyl residues in cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase with butanedione	Identification of essential arginyl residues in cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase with butanedione.
11	alpha methylisocitrate a selective inhibitor of tpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart and rat liver	L' alpha methylisocitrate is a selective inhibitor of bovine heart and rat liver tpn isocitrate dehydrogenase.
11	apparent auricular paralysis and disorders of auriculo ventricular conduction anatomo clinical study	Apparent atrial paralysis and impaired atrial ventricular conduction anatomo clinical study.
11	14 cases of constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis	Fourteen cases of constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis.
11	papyraceous right ventricle of the adult apropos of an anatom clinical case observed in a man suffering from spondylo epiphyseal dysplasia	Papyracial right ventricle of the apos; adult related to clinical case of apos; anatomy observed in a man with spondylo-epiphyseal dysplasia.
11	interaction of adenine nucleotides with multiple binding sites on beef heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase	Interaction of apo nucleotides; adenine with multiple binding sites on apos; beef heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase.
11	guanosine triphosphate binding sites in solubilized myocardium relation to adenylate cyclase activity	Guanosine triphosphate binding sites in solubilized myocardium are linked to etapos; l&apos activity; adenylate cyclase.
11	the steady state concentrations of coenzyme a sh and coenzyme a thioester citrate and isocitrate during tricarboxylate cycle oxidations in rabbit heart mitochondria	Concentrations at apo; apo state; equilibrium of coenzyme a sh and coenzyme a thioester citrate and isocitrate during tricarboxylic cycle oxidation in rabbit heart mitochondria.
11	ion transport and respiratory control in vesicles formed from reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzyme q reductase and phospholipids	Ion transport and respiratory control in vesicles are formed following reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzyme q reductase and phospholipids.
11	comparative evaluation of 2 methods for the determination of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in tissues in avitaminosis b 1 induced by various methods	Comparative evaluation of 2 methods for the determination of apo; pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in apo tissues; avitaminosis b 1 induced by various methods.
11	freeze fracturing and freeze etching of cardiac myosin filaments	Freezing fracture and freeze etching of cardiac myosin filaments.
11	phosphorylation of a 22 000 dalton component of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum by adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	The phosphorylation of apos; a 22,000 dalton component of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum by apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-protein kinase dependent.
11	functional intermediates in the reaction of membrane bound cytochrome oxidase with oxygen	Functional intermediates in the reaction of membrane-bound cytochrome oxidase with oxygen.
11	control of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in intact cardiac mitochondria regulation of the inactivation and activation of the dehydrogenase	Control of apos; pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in intact cardiac mitochondrial regulation of apos; inactivation and apos; dehydrogenase activation.
11	effect of acetylcholine on changes in contractility heart rate and phosphorylase activity produced by isoprenaline salbutamol and amino phylline in the perfused guinea pig heart	Effect of acetylcholine on changes in contractile heart rate and lapos; phosphorylase activity induced by isoprenaline salbutamol and lapos; amino phylline in the perfused guinea pig heart.
11	myocardial failure with altered response to adrenaline in endotoxin shock	Myocardial failure with altered response to adrenaline during endotoxic shock.
11	oxidation of nadph by submitochondrial particles from beef heart in complete absence of transhydrogenase activity from nadph to nad	L' oxidation of nadph by particles under-mitochondrial beef heart in complete absence of l' transhydrogenase activity from nadph to nad.
11	the genetics and developmental regulation of l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Genetics and developmental regulation of glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
11	in vivo myocardial cell ph in the dog response to ischemia and infusion of alkali	In vivo myocardial cell ph in the dog response to ischemia and infusion of alkali.
11	induced ischemic cardiac arrest clinical and experimental results with magnesium aspartate procaine solution cardioplegin	Ischemic cardiac arrest induced and clinical and experimental results with magnesium cardioplegin procaine aspartate solution.
11	divalent ions and myocardial function during cardiopulmonary by pass cpb changes of total calcium ionized calcium and magnesium in plasma	The cardiopulmonary divalent ions and myocardial function pass through the cpb changes of total ionized calcium and magnesium in the plasma.
11	coronary circulation and myocardial oxygen consumption after extracorporeal circulation and after cardioplegic arrest	Coronary circulation and myocardial oxygen consumption after extracorporeal circulation and cardioplegic arrest.
11	anoxic cardiac arrest its effect on myocardial mitochondrial metabolism	Anoxic cardiac arrest, its effect on myocardial mitochondrial metabolism.
11	mobility of normal and virus transformed cells in cellular aggregates	The mobility of normal and virus-transformed cells in cell aggregates.
11	desmosterol accumulation in rats with experimental myotonia	L' desmosterol accumulation in rats with experimental myotonia.
11	coronary disease ii analysis of diastolic pressure volume correlations and left ventricular elasticity in 110 patients	Coronary heart disease ii analyses diastolic pressure volume correlations with left ventricular elasticity in 110 patients.
11	consumption of classical complement components by heart subcellular membranes in vitro and in patients after acute myocardial infarction	Consumption of classical complement components by cardiac subcellular membranes in vitro and in patients following acute myocardial infarction.
11	effect of collateral flow on epicardial and endocardial lysosomal hydrolases in acute myocardial ischemia	Effect of collateral flow on epicardial, epicardial and endocardial lysosomal hydrolases in acute myocardial ischemia.
11	catecholamine binding to plasma membrane enriched fractions of heart and skeletal muscle	Catecholamine binding to the plasma membrane enriched heart and skeletal muscle fractions.
11	the mechanism of action of bencyclane on smooth musculature	The action of bencyclane on smooth musculature.
11	the effect of a combination of 1 4 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride with a nucleotide containing heart muscle extract on the heart and circulatory system of the dog	In addition, a combination of 14 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride and d' a nucleotide containing a cardiac muscle extract on the heart and circulatory system of the dog.
11	a study of the effects of propranolol and or k 1366 on the distribution of rb86 clearance in the canine heart under selective coronary hypotension	A study of the effects of propranolol or k 1366 on the distribution of rb86 clearance in the dog heart subjected to selective coronary hypotension.
11	the effect of oxyfedrine on cardiac performance in coronary patients tests using electrocardiographic and metabolic parameters in atrial stimulation	Effect of oxyfedrine on cardiac performance in coronary patients using electrocardiographic and metabolic parameters in the atrial stimulation.
11	31 p nuclear magnetic resonance studies of the interaction of pyridine nucleotide coenzymes with dehydrogenases	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies at 31% of apos; interaction of pyridine nucleotide coenzymes with dehydrogenases.
11	characterization of autoantigenic sites on isolated dog heart mitochondria	Characterization of auto-antigenic sites on isolated dog heart mitochondria.
11	superoxide radicals and hydrogen peroxide formation in mitochondria from normal and neoplastic tissues	Superoxide radicals and hydrogen formation in the mitochondria of normal and neoplastic tissues.
11	isozymes of rat amp deaminase	Isozymes of rat apos; ampamidase.
11	the coating of mouse myocardial cells a cytochemical electron microscopical study	The coating of mouse myocardial cells was studied by cytochemical electron microscopy.
11	acetoacetate coenzyme a transferase activity in rat hepatomas	Acetoacetate coenzyme a transferase activity in rat hepatomas.
11	the role of myocardial biopsy in cardiac diagnosis	The role of myocardial biopsy in cardiac diagnosis.
11	the ultracytochemical demonstration of a formaldehyde resistant dehydrogenase of leuco nitroxyl analogues	The ultracytochemical demonstration of a formaldehyde-resistant dehydrogenase of nitroxylated leuco analogs.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda	The membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cells of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda.
11	cardiac histamine ouabain interaction potentiation by ouabain of the arrhythmogenic effects of histamine	Cardiac ouabain interaction by ouabain of the arrhythmogenic effects of l'apos; histamine.
11	anatomical and neurohistological observations on the heart of the spiny lizard uromastix hardwickii	Anatomical and neurohistological observations on the heart of the spiny lizard uromastix hardwickii.
11	myocardial uptake of labeled oleic and linoleic acids	Labelled oleic and linoleic acids are myocardial uptake.
11	comparison of the effects of physical exercise cold acclimation and repeated injections of isoprenaline on rat muscle enzymes	Comparison of the effects of cold acclimation, exercise and exercise; repeated injections of apos; isoprenaline on rat muscle enzymes.
11	major deficiency in serum lactate dehydrogenase 1 and 2 isoenzymes a possible pathogenesis for angina pectoris with normal coronarography	A major deficiency of serum lactate dehydrogenase 1 and 2 isoenzymes could result in l' angina pectoris with normal coronary angina.
11	effect of metabolism on the electrical and mechanical activities of the frog atrium	Effect of metabolism on the electrical and mechanical activities of the frog atrium.
11	control of myocardial oxygen tension by sympathetic coronary vasoconstriction in the dog	Pressure control of apos; myocardial oxygen by sympathetic coronary vasoconstriction in dogs.
11	reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilation elicited from cardiac receptors in the dog	Reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilation was induced by cardiac receptors in the dog.
11	regional differences in myocardial performance in the left ventricle of the dog	Regional differences in myocardial performance in the left ventricle of dogs.
11	analysis of components in a cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex	Components analysis of d' a cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex.
11	electrophysiologic and pathologic correlations in two cases of chronic second degree atrioventricular block with left bundle branch block	Electrophysiological and pathological correlations in two cases of chronic second-degree atrioventricular block with left-beam branch block.
11	three dimensional geometry of acutely ischemic myocardium	Three-dimensional geometry of the acute ischemic myocardium.
11	right ventricular dysfunction detected by gated scintiphotography in patients with acute inferior myocardial infarction	Right ventricular dysfunction detected by barrier scintiphotography in patients with acute lower myocardial infarction.
11	the pathophysiology of idiopathic mitral valve prolapse	The pathophysiology of idiopathic mitral valve prolapse.
11	clinical conference de subitaneis mortibus xiii multifocal purkinije cell tumors of the heart	Clinical conference of subitaneis mortibus xiii multifocal purkinije cell tumors of the heart.
11	erucic acid metabolism by rat heart preparations	Metabolism of etapos; erucic acid by rat heart preparations.
11	the origin of the elevated activities of creatine kinase and other enzymes in the sera of patients with myxoedema	L' origin of apos; high activity of creatine kinase and d' other enzymes in the serum of patients with myxoedema.
11	diagnosis of cardiac amyloidosis by myocardial biopsy	Apos diagnosis; cardiac amyloidosis by myocardial biopsy.
11	homologs of dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine as potential cardiovascular drugs	The homologs of dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine as potential cardiovascular drugs.
11	effects of seven anthracycline antibiotics on electrocardiogram and mitochondrial function of rat hearts	Effects of seven anthracycline antibiotics on electrocardiogram and mitochondrial function of rat hearts.
11	genesis of fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig	Genesis of foie gras and l' hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig.
11	effects of blockade of extraneuronal uptake on responses to isoprenaline in perfused rat heart	The effects of blockade of extraneuronal uptake on responses to isoprenaline in the perfused rat heart.
11	the steady state activity of succinate dehydrogenase in the presence of opposing effectors 1 the effect of l malate and coqh2 on the enzymic activity	Lapos; activity at apos; state; equilibrium of succinate dehydrogenase in the presence of opposites effectors; effect of malate and coqh2 on enzyme activity.
11	congenital left atrial enlargement a case report with special reference to myocardial fine structure	Congenital enlargement of the apos; left atrium, a case report with a focus on myocardial fine structure.
11	regulatory factors on immunocytolysis of cardiac cells and mesenchymal cells	Regulators of the apo; immunocytolysis of cardiac and mesenchymal cells.
11	studies on myocarditis in childhood with special reference to the possible role of immunological process and the thymus in the chronicity of the disease	Studies on childhood myocarditis, in particular on the possible role of the immunological process and of the thymus in the chronicity of the disease.
11	cardiac lesions in collagen disease	Uh, cardiac lesion in collagen disease.
11	myocardial transcapillary exchange in the hypertrophied heart of the dog	Myocardial transcapillary exchange in the hypertrophied heart of the dog.
11	effects of mannitol on cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation following anoxia	Effects of mannitol on cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation after apos; anoxia.
11	nutritional effects on heart acetylcholinesterase and butyrocholinesterase activity	Nutritional effects on heart function; activity of cardiac acetylcholinesterase and butyrocholinesterase.
11	adriamycin induced cardiac damage in the mouse a small animal model of cardiotoxicity	L' adriamycin induced cardiac injury in the mouse, an animal model of cardiotoxicity.
11	ultrastructural histogenesis of chicken myocardium	L' ultrastructural histogenesis of chicken myocardium.
11	problem of increasing the viability of the ischemic myocardium in the light of experimental studies	The problem of l'apos; increase of the viability of the ischemic myocardium in the light of experimental studies.
11	effect of heparin on certain indicators of oxidating and energetic processes in experimental endomyocarditis	Effect of heparin on certain indicators of oxidative and energetic processes in experimental endomyocarditis.
11	effect of large doses of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and contractile function of an intact heart	The effect of high doses of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and contractile function of an intact heart.
11	fatty acid and ketone body metabolism in the rat response to diet and exercise	Fatty acid metabolism and keto body metabolism in the rat response to diet and exercise.
11	cardiac structure and function in vitamin b 12 deprived rats	The cardiac structure and function of vitamin b12 deprived rats were depressed.
11	the pathology of type ii skeletal muscle glycogenosis a light and electron microscopic study	The pathology of type II skeletal muscle glycogenosis was studied by electron and light microscopy.
11	primary epithelial tumour in the right atrium of the heart and inferior vena cava in nzr gd inbred rats pathology of 18 cases	Primary epithelial tumour in the right atrium of the heart and inferior vena cava in inbred rats in 18 cases.
11	esterase polymorphism in the adriatic sardine sardina pilchardus walb 1 electrophoretic and biochemical properties of the serum and tissue esterases	Esterase polymorphism in sardine sardine pilchardus walb 1 electrophoretic and biochemical properties of serum and tissue esterases.
11	localization of acetylcholinesterase in granule containing cells of glomus like bodies in pre and postnatal rabbits by electron microscopy	Electron microscopy revealed the localization of etapos; acetylcholinesterase in granules containing glomus-like body cells of pre- and post-natal rabbits.
11	troponin bound calcium in electron micrographs of myocardial cells as demonstrated by the potassium antimonate technique	Troponin binds calcium in electron micrographs of myocardial cells as demonstrated by the potassium antimonate technique.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of cirolana borealis lilljeborg crustacea isopoda	Membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of cirolana borealis lilljeborg crustacea isopoda.
11	effect of vanadium on tissue respiration in organs and on cholesterol metabolism in guinea pigs with experimental atheroclerosis	The effect of vanadium on tissue respiration in organs and on cholesterol metabolism in guinea pigs with d'apos; experimental atherosclerosis.
11	myocardial and plasma levels of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate studies in experimental myocardial ischemia	Plasma and myocardial levels of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic phosphate in experimental myocardial ischemia studies.
11	tricuspid and pulmonary valve atresia with aortopulmonary fistula survival of a patient to 21 years of age	Pulmonary valve atresia and tricuspid with aortopulmonary fistula survival in a 21-year-old patient.
11	effect of albuterol and terbutaline synthetic beta adrenergic stimulants on the cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate system in smooth muscle	Effect of albuterol and terbutaline synthetic beta adrenergic stimulants on the cyclic 3 @-@5 adenosine monophosphate system in smooth muscle.
11	torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complicating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine case report with discussion of antifungal chemotherapy	Torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complexating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine case report with discussion of antifungal chemotherapy.
11	lipid overload induced in myocardial cells by vegetable oils observation using electron microscopy	Lipid overload induced in myocardial cells by electron microscopy of vegetable oils.
11	transmural gradients in ventricular tissue metabolites produced by stopping coronary blood flow in the dog	Transmural gradients in ventricular tissue metabolites are produced by stopping coronary blood flow in the dog.
11	changes in intramyocardial st segment voltage and gas tensions with regional myocardial ischemia in the dog	Changes in voltage and gas tensions of the intramyocardial stasis segment with regional myocardial ischemia in the dog.
11	plasma and atrial propranolol after preoperative withdrawal	Plasma and atrial propranolol after preoperative withdrawal.
11	postmortem tissue digoxin concentrations in infants and children	Post- @-@mortem concentrations of digoxin in infants and children.
11	anatomical pathology of sudden unexpected cardiac death	Anatomical pathology of sudden unexpected cardiac death.
11	arteriosclerosis of coronary arteries in sudden unexpected deaths	Coronary artery arteriosclerosis in sudden unexpected death.
11	pathology of the myocardium and the conduction system in sudden coronary death	A disorder of the myocardium and the conduction system in sudden coronary death.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death i organizing thrombosis and acute coronary vessel lesions	Pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death organizing thrombosis and acute coronary vessel damage.
11	myocardial cell necrosis and sudden death in humans	Myocardial cell necrosis and sudden death in humans.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death ii the significance of myocardial infarction	Pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death syndrome; importance of stroke; myocardial infarction.
11	methodological considerations for the study of sudden cardiac death an autopsy protocol	Methodological considerations for the study of sudden cardiac death protocol; autopsy.
11	possible electrophysiological mechanisms for lethal arrhythmias accompanying myocardial ischemia and infarction	Possible electrophysiological mechanisms of lethal arrhythmias accompanying ischemia and myocardial infarction.
11	the myofibrillar m band in the cryo section analysis of section thickness	The myofibrillar band in the apos; analysis of cryogenic sections; section thickness.
11	oxidation of succinate in heart brain and kidney mitochondria in hypobaria and hypoxia	L' oxidation of succinate in cardiac brain and renal mitochondria; hypobaric and hypoxic.
11	iron sulfur components of succinate dehydrogenase stoichiometry and kinetic behavior in activated preparations	Iron sulfide components of succinate dehydrogenase stoichiometry and kinetic behavior in activated preparations.
11	mitral insufficiency complicating acute myocardial infarction	Mitral insufficiency complicating seizures; acute myocardial infarction.
11	effects of intra aortic balloon pumping on experimental acute myocardial ischaemia	Effects of intra-@aortic balloon pumping on experimental acute myocardial ischemia.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to occupational physical activity in male violent deaths	Coronary atherosclerosis and apos; aortic atherosclerosis and apos; occupational physical activity in men who die violently.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to body build factors	Coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to body building.
11	effect of anoxia on the excitability of the canine ventricular muscle author s transl	Episode; anoxia on the apos; excitability of translation of the apos; canine ventricular muscle.
11	the effect of cardiopulmonary bypass perfusion pressure on myocardial gas tensions in the presence of coronary stenosis	The effect of perfusion pressure on myocardial gas tensions in the presence of coronary stenosis.
11	a study on the rehabilitation of ischemic heart disease patients the heart rate beta receptor blocking agents and strength duration relationship of exercise	A study of ischemic heart disease rehabilitation, heart rate beta receptor inhibitors and the relationship between duration of force and exercise.
11	effects of beta blockers on cardiac function and myocardial oxygen consumption in the isolated supported heart preparation of the dog	The effects of beta-blockers on cardiac function and myocardial oxygen consumption in the isolated heart preparation were supported by dogs.
11	ultrastructural changes of hypertrophied myocardium in severe experimental hypoxia effects of diphosphothiamine and of an antagonist of the vitamin b1 author s transl	Ultrastructural changes of hypertrophied myocardium in severe experimental hypoxia effects of diphosphothiamine and of an antagonist of the vitamin b1 author s.
11	contractile myocardial proteins in patients with acquired heart defects	Contractile myocardial proteins in patients with acquired heart defects.
11	the effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the heart rate and coronary flow of the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	L' effect of sulfhydryl reagents on heart rate and coronary flow in the isolated perfused guinea pig heart.
11	influence of halothane on calcium movements in isolated heart muscle and in isolated plasma membranes	Halothane influences calcium movement in isolated cardiac muscle and in isolated plasma membranes.
11	changes in cyclic nucleotide metabolism in aorta and heart of neurogenically hypertensive rats possible trigger mechanism of hypertension	Changes in cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the aorta and heart of neurogenic hypertensive rats may trigger the hypertension mechanism.
11	decompression induced bubble formation in salmonids comparison to gas bubble disease	Decompression induced bubble formation in salmonids compared with gas bubble disease.
11	prevention of exercise induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by chemical sympathectomy guanethidine treatment	The prevention of exercise induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by chemical treatment with guanethidine sympathectomy.
11	hypoxia of high altitudes as a theoretical method of treatment of angina pectoris influence on cardiac metabolism	Lapos; hypoxia of high altitudes as a theoretical method of treatment for apos; angina of the chest influences cardiac metabolism.
11	studies on the therapeutic use of mercurascar part iii influence of mercurascan on some metabolic changes in experimental myocardial ischaemia in dogs section i energetic and ionic metabolism	Studies on os; therapeutic use of mercurascar part iii influences mercurascan on some metabolic changes in experimental myocardial ischemia in dogs energy and ion metabolism.
11	phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzed dephosphorylation of the 22 000 dalton phosphoprotein of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum	Phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzed the dephosphorylation of 22,000 daltons of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	oppositional effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and cyclic nucleotide concentrations in rabbit atria	Adverse effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and cyclic nucleotide concentrations in rabbit atria.
11	comparison of the reaction of cultured smooth and cardiac muscle cells and fibroblasts to specific antibodies to myosin	Comparison of the response of cultured cardiac and smooth muscle cells and fibroblasts to specific antibodies to myosin.
11	ruptured coronary aneurysm and valvulitis in an infant with polyarteritis nodosa	Ruptured coronary aneurysm and valvulitis in an infant with polyarteritis nodosa.
11	ways of drug action on the restorative processes in the myocardium in experimental myocardial infarct	Modes of action of drugs on the restoration processes in the myocardium in experimental myocardial infarction.
11	morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in the ventricular myocardium of adult rat a light microscopic study	Morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in the ventricular myocardium of adult rats.
11	a controlled sequential morphologic study of hyperacute cardiac allograft rejection in the rat	A sequential morphological study of the rejection of hyperacute cardiac allograft in rats.
11	myocardial cell damage during experimental infective endocarditis	Experimental myocardial cell damage during apo; infectious endocarditis.
11	myocardium of hypothermic rats with and without administration of dextran electrocardiographic and electron microscopic studies	Myocardium of hypothermic rats with and without dextran administration, and electrocardiographic and electron microscopic studies.
11	determination of intracapillary hbo2 saturation with a cryo microphotometric method applied to the rabbit myocardium author s transl	Determination of intracapillary hbo2 saturation at apos; assistance; a cryo microphotometric method applied to the translation of apos; rabbit myocardium author.
11	cardiac injuries in aircraft occupants resulting from aircraft accidents	Cardiac injuries to occupants of aircraft resulting from aircraft accidents.
11	relationship between oxygen tension coronary vasodilation and prostaglandin biosynthesis in the isolated rabbit heart	Coronary vasodilatation of serum oxygen tension and prostaglandin biosynthesis in the isolated rabbit heart.
11	non invasive myocardial scanning with thallium 201 basic principles and methods author s transl	Noninvasive myocardial scanner with thallium 201 basic principles and methods author.
11	raised camp content of striated muscle in experimental chronic renal failure author s transl	An experimental study of chronic renal failure increased the camp content of striated muscle.
11	comparison between muscle and liver enolases and their behavior during differentiation and growth	Comparison between muscle and liver enolases and their behavior during differentiation and growth.
11	interpreting cardiac catheterization data part 2	Cardiac catheterization data interpretation Part 2.
11	molecular interactions of adenosine triphosphatase with the mitochondrial membrane as revealed by a spin label study	The molecular interactions of adenosine triphosphatase with the mitochondrial membrane were revealed by a spin label study.
11	decrease in oxygen affinity of myoglobin by formylation of vinyl groups of heme	Reduction of the apos; affinity of the myoglobin for the apos; oxygen by formylation of the vinyl groups of the apos; heme.
11	preparation of a homogeneous soluble d beta hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase from mitochondria	Preparation of d' a homogeneous soluble d beta-hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase from mitochondria.
11	effect of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed a diet rich in rapeseed oil	Effects of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed a diet rich in rapeseed oil.
11	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by polyamines reversal by spermine of inhibition by methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone of ribonucleic acid synthesis and histone acetylation in rabbit heart	Regulation of l&apos synthesis; reverse polyamine ribonucleic acid by spermine l' inhibition by methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone of l&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid and l' histone acetylation in rabbit heart.
11	tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites after administration of double labelled retinol	Tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites after administration of double labelled retinol.
11	tolerance and resistance of myocardium to anoxia experimental studies	Tolerance and resistance of myocardium to experimental studies on anoxia.
11	resistance and tolerance of the myocardium to ischemia	Resistance and tolerance of the myocardium to infection; ischemia.
11	inability of angiotensin to stimulate rna synthesis in isolated rat atria 38551	Failure of apos; angiotensin to stimulate rna synthesis in isolated rat atria 38551.
11	tolerance of isolated cardiac muscle to hypoxia force frequency interrelationships 38566	Tolerance of isolated cardiac muscle to apos; hypoxia Relationships between force frequencies 38566 and 38566.
11	the renin angiotensin system in rats made hypertensive by ligation of the kidney poles 38584	The renin angiotensin system in rats became hypertensive by ligation of the renal poles 38584.
11	the renin and iso renin angiotensin system in rats with experimental pitutary tumors 38585	The renin system-iso renin-angiotensin in rats with experimental pituitary tumors.
11	ischemia tolerance following cardioplegic arrest in human patients and in experimental animals	Tolerance to apos; ischemia following apos; cardiac arrest in human patients and in laboratory animals.
11	a diurnal rhythm of incorporation of l 3h leucine in myocardium of the rat	Routine diurnal rhythm of onset; incorporation of leucine 1 h into rat myocardium.
11	lysosomal and neutral hydrolase activity during the regression of cardiac hypertrophy	Lysosomal and neutral hydrolase activity during the regression of the apos; cardiac hypertrophy.
11	beta hydroxy fatty acid production during fatty acid oxidation by heart mitochondria	D&apos production; beta-hydroxy fatty acids during apo; fatty acid oxidation by cardiac mitochondria.
11	inhibited adenine nucleotide translocation in mitochondria isolated from ishcemic myocardium	Nucleotide translocation of l' adenine was inhibited in mitochondria isolated from the ishcemic myocardium.
11	energy metabolism in the infarcted cardiac muscle the interaction of contractile protein and mitochondria	Energy metabolism in the infarcted cardiac muscle; interaction of contractile protein and mitochondria.
11	correlation between biochemical and contractile changes after myocardial ischemia and revascularization	Relationship between biochemical and contractile changes following myocardial ischemia and revascularization.
11	release of 14c adenosine from the guinea pig heart during autoregulation	Release of adenosine 14c from the guinea pig heart during self-regulation.
11	creatine release from the isolated perfused rat heart	Creatin release from the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	uptake and phosphorylation of 14c creatine by mouse cardiac muscle in vivo	Uptake and phosphorylation of 14c creatine by mouse cardiac muscle in vivo.
11	myocardial high energy phosphates in experimental thyrotoxicosis in guinea pigs	Myocardial high energy phosphates in experimental thyrotoxicosis in guinea pigs.
11	utilization of endogenous lipids and glycogen in the perfused rat heart effects of hypoxia and epinephrine	Use of endogenous lipids and glycogen in the perfused rat heart effects of epinephrine; hypoxia and epinephrine.
11	transmural gradients in the ischemic dog left ventricle metabolism of endogenous triglycerides and glycogen	Transmural gradients in the ischemic dog left ventricle metabolism of endogenous triglycerides and glycogen.
11	the uptake of free fatty acid in the rat heart	L'absorption of free fatty acids in the heart of the rat.
11	effect on myocardial metabolic pattern of local complete and incomplete ischemia	Effect on myocardial metabolic profile of complete and incomplete local ischemia.
11	early changes in myocardial hypoxia relations among mechanical function ph and intracellular redox states	Early changes in myocardial hypoxic relationships between ph and intracellular redox states of mechanical function.
11	inhibition of glycolysis in hearts during ischemic perfusion	Inhibition of glycolysis in hearts during ischemic perfusion.
11	mitochondrial metabolism in infarcting myocardium	Acute mitochondrial metabolism in the apos; myocardial infarction.
11	erucic acid metabolism by cultured beating heart cells of the postnatal rat	Apos metabolism; erucic acid by cultured beating heart cells of postnatal rat.
11	on the formation of hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radicals in heart mitochondria	On the formation of hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radicals in heart mitochondria.
11	cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions of serum aspartate aminotransferase in the early phase of myocardial infarction	Cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions of serum aspartate aminotransferase in the early phase of the liver; myocardial infarction.
11	carnitine palmityltransferase activity during myocardial ischemmia and at low ionic strengths	Lapos; carnitine palmityltransferase activity during low ionic strength myocardial ischemia.
11	protein synthesis in cell free systems from totally ischemic rat myocardium	Protein synthesis in the cell-free systems of fully ischemic rat myocardium.
11	attenuation of beta adrenergic cardiac responses in chronically hypoxic rats with right ventricular hypertrophy	The attenuation of beta-adrenergic cardiac responses in chronically hypoxic rats with right ventricular hypertrophy.
11	selective control of fibroblast proliferation and its effect on cardiac muscle differentiation in vitro	Selective control of fibroblast proliferation and its effect on cardiac muscle differentiation in vitro.
11	purification of creatine kinase from beef heart mitochondria	The purification of creatine kinase from beef heart mitochondria.
11	the effect of sugar phosphates phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylic acid on muscle brain and heart creatine kinases	L' effect of phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylate sugars on muscle brain and heart creatine kinases.
11	hypoxic isolated rat heart hemodynamic and metabolic effects of nitroglycerin	Hemodynamic and metabolic effects of nitroglycerin on hypoxic isolated rat heart.
11	distribution of lysosome populations in rat cardiac tissue	Distribution of lysosome populations in rat cardiac tissue.
11	alcoholic cardiomyopathy the effect of ethanol and acetaldehyde on cardiac protein synthesis	Alcoholic cardiomyopathy, the effect of ethanol and acetaldehyde on cardiac protein synthesis.
11	myocardial cell damage due to ethanol	Myocardial cell damage due to apos; ethanol.
11	hemodynamic metabolic and ultrastructural consequences of hyperosmolal mannitol after myocardial anoxia	Hemodynamic, metabolic and ultrastructural effects of hyperosmolar mannitol after myocardial anoxia.
11	phospholipase a and acid lipase activity during release of lysosomal hydrolases	Phospholipase a and l' acid lipase activity during release from the lysosomal hydrolases.
11	the effects of polyamines on cardiac protein biosynthesis	The effects of polyamines on cardiac protein biosynthesis.
11	some properties of rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase and the in vitro effects of nucleotides	Some properties of rat ornithine decarboxylase and the in vitro effects of nucleotides.
11	the effects of hypoxia hypertrophy and diet on rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase activity	Effects of hypoxic hypertrophy and diet on rat ornithine decarboxylase activity.
11	polyamine and nucleoprotein correlations in hypertrophied and perfused heart	Polyamine and nucleoprotein correlations in hypertrophied and perfused heart muscle.
11	comparative aspects of buffering capacity in muscle	Comparison of buffering capacity in muscles.
11	congenital rhabdomyoma of the heart	Congenital rhabdomyoma of the heart.
11	effects of iproveratril on isolated heart mitochondria	Effects of iproveratril on isolated heart mitochondria.
11	thrombolytic therapy and myocardial infarction	Uh, thrombolytics and myocardial infarction.
11	metabolic and histopathologic changes in arteriosclerotic versus nonarteriosclerotic rats following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction with superimposed diabetes	Metabolic and histopathological changes in arteriosclerotic versus nonarteriosclerotic rats following myocardial infarction induced by isoproterenol and superimposed diabetes.
11	myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever followed by regeneration of cardiac muscle and origin of aschoff bodies	Myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever followed by regeneration of the heart muscle and lapos; origin of aschoff bodies.
11	evaluation of potassium 43 scintillation images during early myocardial ischemia in an animal model	An evaluation of potassium 43 scintillation images during early myocardial ischemia in an animal model.
11	subendocardial origin of ventricular arrhythmias in 24 hour old experimental myocardial infarction	Endocardial origin of ventricular arrhythmias in the 24-hour experimental myocardial infarction.
11	streptococcal pancarditis	Uh, strep-coccal pancarditis.
11	preparation of isolated cells by alkaline dissociation of formalin fixed tissue	Preparation of isolated cells by alkaline dissociation of the formalin-attached tissue.
11	effects of heparin on lipolytic enzyme activities in vivo and in vitro	Effects of heparin on lipolytic enzyme activities in vivo and in vitro.
11	changes in biochemical properties of myocardial lactate dehydrogenase during exposure of rats to high altitude	Changes in the biochemical properties of myocardial lactate dehydrogenase during apo; exposure of rats to high altitude.
11	cardiac pathologic findings in patients treated with bone marrow transplantation	Evidence of cardiac pathology in patients receiving bone marrow transplant.
11	regulation by calcium of the proliferation of heart cells from young adult rats	Calcium regulation of the proliferation of young adult rat heart cells.
11	hemorrhagic infarction a reperfusion injury following prolonged myocardial ischemic anoxia	Hemorrhagic infarction, reperfusion injury following prolonged ischemic myocardial anoxia.
11	short term effects of docosenoic acid containing oils on rat cardiac lipids colza oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil	Short-term effects of oil, rapeseed oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil; docosenoic acid containing oils on rat heart lipids.
11	a complex of cardiac cytochrome c1 and cytochrome c	A cardiac cytochrome c1 and cytochrome c complex.
11	comparative 131 cesium scintigraphic and electrocardiographic studies of patients following the acute phase of myocardial infarct	Cesium electrocardiography in patients after the acute phase of lupus; myocardial infarction; cardiomyopathy and myocardial infarction.
11	arrhythmias in inflammatory heart disease author s transl	The arrhythmias in inflammatory heart disease translated.
11	inotropic action myocardial uptake and subcellular distribution of ouabain digoxin and digitoxin in isolated rat hearts	Inotropic action, myocardial uptake and subcellular distribution of digoxin and digitoxin d' ouabain in isolated rat hearts.
11	the time course of the effects of beta and alpha adrenoceptor stimulation by isoprenaline and methoxamine on the contractile force and camp level of the isolated rabbit papillary muscle	L' temporal evolution of the effects of stimulation of beta and alpha adrenergic receptors by isoprenaline and methoxamine on the contractile force and camp level of isolated rabbit papillary muscle.
11	radioautographic and cytometric analysis of myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration in rats	Radioautographic and cytometric analysis of myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration in rats.
11	the effect of triiodothyronine on myocardial protein kinases	The effect of triiodothyronine on myocardial protein kinases.
11	cardiac tumour in infant	Cardiac Tumor in Infants?
11	clinico biochemical immunological and morphological assessment of myocardial inflammatory reactions in myocardial necroses	Clinical immunological and morphological evaluation-biochemical of myocardial inflammatory reactions in myocardial necrosis.
11	fractional composition and metabolism of proteins and levels of polynucleotides in canine heart in experimental myocardial infarction	Protein metabolism and fractional composition and polynucleotide levels in the canine heart during an experimental myocardial infarction.
11	the development of intramyocardial haemorrhages or fluidaccumulation in the extracellular space	The development of intra- or intra-cardiac hemorrhages; fluid accumulation in the extracellular space.
11	functional replacement of the left heart with an intrathoracally implantable ventricular aortic blood pump author s transl	Functional replacement of the left heart with an intrathoracic implantable ventricular aortic blood pump.
11	the production of cardiac hypertrophy by tri iodothyroacetic acid	The production of cardiac hypertrophy by triiodothyroacetic acid (triiodothyroacetic acid) by apos.
11	effects of reserpine and propranolol on anoxia induced enzyme release from the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	The effects of reserpine and propranolol on anoxia induced enzyme release from the perfused isolated guinea pig heart.
11	comparative histopathological effects of aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on some organs of different strains of the newly hatched chick gallus domesticus	Comparative histopathological effects of aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on organs of different strains of newly hatched chick gallus domesticus.
11	influence of biophysical factors on redox processes and biological oxidation 20 tissue temperatures under ultrasonic administration	Influence of biophysical factors on redox and l&apos processes; biological oxidation 20 tissue temperatures under ultrasonic administration.
11	ultrastructural studies on the myocardial capillaries of the experimentally lathyritic rat protective effect of certain flavonoids	Ultrastructural studies on the myocardial capillaries of l' protective effect of certain flavonoids on the lathyric rat.
11	moschcowitz syndrome with involvement of the central nervous system light optical studies on the genesis of hemolytic anemia and vascular changes	Moschcowitz syndrome involving optical studies of the central nervous system on the genesis of l' hemolytic anemia and vascular changes.
11	prevalence of cardiac tumours at autopsy in ibadan	Prevalence of cardiac tumours at apos; autopsy in ibadan.
11	cardiac conduction abnormalities produced by chronic alcoholism	Cardiac conduction abnormalities produced by chronic alcoholism.
11	supravalvular mitral stenosis associated with tetralogy of fallot	Supravalvular mitral stenosis associated with tetralogy of the fallot.
11	cardiovascular effects of long term cigarette smoking and nicotine administration	Cardiovascular effects of long-term cigarette smoking and nicotine administration.
11	emergency myocardial revascularization with assisted circulation for early extension of infarction	Myocardial revascularization d' emergency with assisted circulation for early extension of infarction.
11	changes in the glycogen content of the dog myocardium at various phases of the cardiac cycle with a normal coronary blood flow	Changes in the glycogen content of dog myocardium at various stages of the cardiac cycle with normal coronary blood flow.
11	study of some properties of rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in adrenaline myocarditis	Study of certain properties of rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in adrenaline etapos myocarditis.
11	progeny pregnancy and phenylketonuria	Descendants pregnancy and phenylketonuria.
11	effects of carbon monoxide inhalation on ventricular fibrillation	Effects of carbon monoxide inhalation on ventricular fibrillation.
11	hyperacute rejection of guinea pig to rat cardiac xenografts i morphology	Hyperacute rejection of guinea pig to rat cardiac xenografts i morphology.
11	myocardial biopsy in a case of cardiomyopathy and partial alpha a antitrypsin deficiency with liver engagement	Myocardial biopsy in one case of cardiomyopathy and partial alpha deficiency-antitrypsin with liver commitment.
11	deaths from ischemic heart disease in persons aged 65 or younger in helsinki in 1970 with special reference to patho anatomic findings in hearts 211	Deaths from ischemic heart disease in persons 65 years of age or younger in Helsinki in 1970, in particular due to patho-anatomy of the heart 211.
11	isolated valvular aortic stenosis clinico pathological findings in an autopsy material of elderly patients	Valve aortic stenosis clinically isolated pathologically from post-necropsy material of elderly patients.
11	incomplete rupture of the heart with diverticulum formation	Incomplete rupture of the heart with diverticulum formation.
11	secretory granules in cardiomyocytes	Uh, secretory granules in cardiomyocytes.
11	growth hormone cyclic nucleotides and the rapid control of translation in heart muscle	Cyclic nucleotides; growth hormone and rapid control of translation in cardiac muscle.
11	prinzmetal s variant angina hemodynamic and angiographic observations during pain	Imprizmetal s hemodynamic angina angina and angiographic observations during pain.
11	myocardial ultrastructure in patients with chronic aortic valve disease	Acute myocardial ultrastructure in patients with chronic aortic valvular disease.
11	influence of carbon monoxide hypoxic hypoxia or potassium cyanide pretreatment on acute carbon monoxide and hypoxic hypoxia lethality	Influence of glucose; hypoxic hypoxia of carbon monoxide or potassium cyanide pretreatment on acute carbon monoxide and hypoxic hypoxia.
11	creatine kinase isoenzymes in baboon tissues and organs	Creatin kinase enzymes in baboon tissues and organs.
11	half life of rabbit heart mitochondria under normal conditions and in experimental allergic lesions of the heart	Half the life of rabbit heart mitochondria under normal conditions and in experimental allergic lesions of the heart.
11	the effect of strophanthin following administration of homocardiac antigen to animals with experimental myocardial infarct	The effect of strophanthin following administration of homocardiac antigen on animals with experimental myocardial infarction.
11	effect of morphine in vitro on the oxidative phosphorylation in rat liver mitochondria	The effect of morphine in vitro on oxidative phosphorylation in rat liver mitochondria.
11	functional characteristics of light and dark cells	The functional characteristics of light and dark cells.
11	activity of nad and nadp dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium of rabbits with alloxan diabetes	L' larval- and larval-dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity in the myocardium of rabbits with alloxan diabetes mellitus.
11	a cytoplasmic body in human fetal endothelium	It's called a cytoplasmic body in the apos; a human fetal endothelium.
11	effect of triiodothyronine on chick embryo heart cells maintained in tissue culture	The effect of triiodothyronine on heart cells in embryonic chickens maintained in tissue culture.
11	changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels induced by enantiomers of isoproterenol in isolated rat atria and uteri	Changes in mechanical events and in rates of apo; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate induced by enantiomers of l' isoproterenol in isolated rat atria and uteri.
11	stimulation of ion transport by ascorbic acid through inhibition of 3 5 cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in the corneal epithelium and other tissues	Stimulation of ionic transport by apos; ascorbic acid by apos; inhibition of 3 5 cyclic phosphodiesterase ampoules in apos; corneal epithelium and dapos; other tissues.
11	alterations in myocardial and plasma cyclic adenosine monophosphate in experimental myocardial ischemia	Changes in myocardial and plasma cyclic adenosine monophosphate in experimental myocardial ischemia.
11	the rate of calcium uptake into sarcoplasmic reticulum of cardiac muscle and skeletal muscle effects of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase and phosphorylase b kinase	The rate of calcium absorption in the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the effects of cardiac muscle and skeletal muscle of the d&apos-dependent protein kinase; a cyclic bulb and phosphorylase b kinase on skeletal muscle.
11	characterization of soluble and microsomal adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit heart	Characterization of soluble and microsomal monophosphate-dependent protein kinases in rabbit heart; adenosine 3-5.
11	reversible autophosphorylation of a cyclic 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Reversible autophosphorylation of a cyclic-dependent protein kinase of 3,5 amperes from bovine cardiac muscle.
11	comparison of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit skeletal and bovine heart muscle	Comparison of the monophosphate-dependent protein kinases of l' rabbit skeletal muscle and bovine heart muscle adenosine 3.5.
11	restoration of the automatic contractile activity of k arrested heart muscle cells in culture by means of dibutyryl 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	The restoration of the automatic contractile activity of k stops the heart muscle cells in culture with dibutyryl 3,5 adenosine monophosphate.
11	studies on the effects of coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on the interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated rat heart mitochondria	Studies on the effects of coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on apos; interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated rat heart mitochondria.
11	the release of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate from the isolated perfused rat heart	The release of etapos; adenosine 3,5 cyclic monophosphate from the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	dissociation and reassociation of the phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Dissociation and reassociation of the phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of the monophosphate-dependent protein kinase from l' adenosine 3/5 from bovine cardiac muscle.
11	isolation of stimulatory modulator of guanosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from mammalian heart devoid of inhibitory modulator of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Insulation of the guanosine-dependent protein kinase modulator 3-5 monophosphate from apos; a mammalian heart devoid of inhibitory protein kinase modulator; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for cyclic amp and cyclic gmp after 2 0 acetylation by acetic anhydride in aqueous solution	Femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for apos; cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp after apos acetylation 20; acetic anhydride in aqueous solution.
11	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in perfused rat hearts exposed to isoprenaline and dopamine	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in perfused rat hearts exposed to etapos; isoprenaline and dopamine.
11	certain characteristics of myocardial metabolism in long term experimental hypotension and the effect of administration of adenosine triphosphate and fructose 1 6 diphosphate	Certain characteristics of myocardial metabolism in apos; long-term experimental hypotension and apos; effect of apos; administration of adenosine triphosphate and fructose 16 diphosphate.
11	the 3 amido and 5 amido analogues of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate interaction with camp specific proteins	The 3 amido and 5 amido analogues of apos; interaction of adenosine 3 monophosphate with specific camp proteins.
11	binding of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase regulatory subunit to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives	The binding of adenosine 3 @-@5 monophosphate to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives under the apos-dependent protein kinase regulatory unit.
11	localization of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in cardiac and skeletal muscle immunocytochemical demonstration	The localization of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in cardiac and skeletal muscle immunocytochemical demonstration.
11	mechanism of self phosphorylation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Mechanisms of apo; auto-apos-dependent protein kinase phosphorylation; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from bovine cardiac muscle.
11	cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate free and bound forms in the isolated rat atrium	L' free and bound cardiac adenosine 3,5 monophosphate is formed in the isolated rat atrium.
11	characterization and regulation of heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase isozymes	Characterization and regulation of the adenosine 3 monophosphate-dependent protein kinase isozymes of the heart.
11	concentrations of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase subunits in various tissues	Concentrations of protein kinase (PK) dependent protein kinase (PK) sub-@-@ units; cyclic ampoule in various tissues.
11	the effect of carbocromen on cardiac cyclic adenosine monophosphate	L' effect of carbocromene on cardiac cyclic adenosine monophosphate.
11	a quench flow kinetic investigation of calcium ion accumulation by isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum dependence of initial velocity on free calcium ion concentration and influence of preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and cyclic amp	A kinetic study of apo quench flux; calcium ion accumulation by isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum depends on initial velocity on the concentration of apos; free calcium ions and apos; influences preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and a cyclic ampoule.
11	myocardial degeneration in mice treated with dibutyryl cyclic amp and or theophylline	Myocardial degeneration in mice treated with dibutyryl cyclic bulbs and/or theophylline.
11	influence of prostaglandins upon adenosine release and of adenosine upon prostaglandin release in the isolated rabbit heart	L' influence of prostaglandins on the release of apos; adenosine and apos; adenosine on prostaglandin release in the isolated rabbit heart.
11	purification of phosphoprotein phosphatase from bovine cardiac muscle that catalyzes dephosphorylation of cyclic amp binding protein component of protein kinase	Purification of bovine cardiac muscle phosphoprotein phosphatase that catalyzes dephosphorylation of the protein binding l' protein kinase cyclic ampoule.
11	an adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from human heart	An adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-dependent protein kinase from the human heart.
11	effects of adrenaline and methylisobutylxanthine on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in cultures of beating heart cells of the newborn rat	Effects of apos; adrenaline and methylisobutylxanthine on apo levels; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in rat heart cell cultures in the newborn @-@born.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase under the influence of neurohormone c	Inhibition of the apos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase 3-5 of rat heart and brain under apos; influence of neurohormone c.
11	cyclic nucleotide levels in the perfused rat heart subjected to hypoxia	Hypoxia-induced cyclic nucleotide levels in the perfused rat heart.
11	participation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the pathogenesis of myocardial hypertrophy in experimental hypertension	Participation of cyclic adenosine 3-5 in the pathogenesis of apos; myocardial hypertrophy in apos; experimental hypertension.
11	diabetes and the control of pyruvate dehydrogenase in rat heart mitochondria by concentration ratios of adenosine triphosphate adenosine diphosphate of reduced oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and of acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a	Diabetes and control of pyruvate dehydrogenase in rat heart mitochondria by concentration ratios of d' adenosine triphosphate adenosine diphosphate of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and d' acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a coenzyme a.
11	inhibition of the cyclic amp splitting myocardial nucleotide gydrolase by 5 methyl 7 diethylamino s triazol 1 5 alpha pyrimidine rocornal	L' inhibition of the myocardial nucleotide gydrolase by 5 methyl diethylamino 7 triazol 1-5 alpha pyrimidine rocornal.
11	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases of myocardial non histone nuclear proteins	Adenosine 3,5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases of nonhistone myocardial nuclear proteins.
11	effects of isoproterenol on cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase in developing chick myocardium	The effects of apos; isoproterenol on apos; cyclic ampoule and protein kinase dependent on apos; cyclic ampoule in developing chicken myocardium.
11	phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins by cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	The phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins by cyclic protein kinase.
11	interrelations of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and calcium in regulating glycogen synthetase in developing skeletal and cardiac muscles in chickens	Relationships between cyclic adenosine monophosphate and calcium in the regulation of glycogen synthetase during chicken skeletal and cardiac muscle development.
11	studies on beta adrenoceptors mediating changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels rat atria	Beta-adrenergic receptor studies mediating changes in mechanical events and d' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate levels in rat atria.
11	chronotropic and cyclic adenosine monophosphate response of fetal rat heart in organ culture to isoproterenol quinidine and a dysrhythmogenic agent	Cyclic and chronotropic reaction of fetal rat heart adenosine monophosphate in organic culture with isoproterenol quinidine and a dysrhythmogenic agent.
11	effects of zinc chloride on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Effects of zinc chloride on apo; hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and apo; cyclic ampoule by apo-dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase; bovine heart activator.
11	influence of phenylephrine on levels of cyclic 3 5 amp in the heart of rats in vivo	L' influence of phenylephrine on the levels of 35 amperes cyclic in the heart of rats in vivo.
11	the sites of phosphorylation of rabbit cardiac troponin i by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate dependent protein kinase effect of interaction with troponin c	The sites of phosphorylation of rabbit cardiac troponin i by epos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate kinase effect; interaction with troponin c.
11	phosphorylation of the inhibitory subunit of troponin in perfused hearts of mice deficient in phosphorylase kinase evidence for the phosphorylation of troponin by adenosine 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase in vivo	Phosphorylation of the inhibitory unit of troponin in perfused hearts of phosphorylase kinase-deficient mice revealed the phosphorylation of troponin by the protein kinase; adenosine 3-5 phosphate in vivo.
11	studies in vitro of the effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of nuclear proteins in isolated rat heart nuclei	In vitro studies of the effects of l' adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of nuclear proteins in isolated rat heart nuclei.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in vitro under the influence of neurohormone c	In vitro, under the influence of neurohormone c, l, and apos; inhibition of apos; adenosine 3-5 rat heart and brain cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase.
11	compartmentalization of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase in heart tissue	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of protein kinase in heart tissue.
11	stimulation of calcium uptake into aortic microsomes by cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Stimulation of calcium uptake in aortic microsomes by a cyclic ampoule and protein kinase d' a cyclic ampoule.
11	mechanism of action of ouabain and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate on calcium ion transport in rat cardiac mitochondria	Mechanism of action of ouabain and monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 on calcium ion transport in rat cardiac mitochondria.
11	autophosphorylation of cardiac 3 5 cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase kinetic evidence for the regulatory subunit directly acting at the active site in the r2c2 complex	L' apos autophosphorylation; cardiac cyclic ampulla 3-5 stimulated apos; protein kinase kinetic evidence for the sub-regulatory unit operating directly at the active site in the r2c2 complex.
11	isoprenaline induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	L' isoprenaline induced release of cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the intact, anesthetized dog.
11	the effect 3 5 3 triiodo l thyronine on the kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured chick embryo heart cells	L' effect 3 3 triiodo l thyronine on the kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured chick embryo heart cells.
11	organ and tissue cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during the process of the body s adaptation to extreme factors	Adenosine 3,5 cyclic organ and tissue monophosphate during the process of apos; adaptation of the organism to extreme factors.
11	purification of a protein inhibitor of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine myocardium by a non denaturing procedure	The purification of apos, a protein kinase inhibitor dependent on apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from bovine myocardium by a non-denaturing method.
11	effect of adenosine and catecholamines on cyclic amp levels in guinea pig heart	Effect of adenosine and catecholamines on cyclic apo levels in guinea pig heart.
11	properties of epinephrine induced activation of cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	The properties of epinephrine induced apos-dependent protein kinase activation; cardiac adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	effects of phosphodiesterase inhibitors imidazole and phosphate on cyclic cmp phosphodiesterase are different from those on cyclic amp and cyclic gmp phosphodiesterases	The effects of phosphodiesterase inhibitors imidazole and phosphate on cyclic cmp phosphodiesterase are different from those of cyclic ampulla and cyclic gmp phosphodiesterases.
11	adenosine induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	Adenosine induced release of cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the anesthetized intact dog.
11	inhibition of mammalian protein kinase and phosphodiesterase activities by a cyclic amp like compound isolated from higher plants	L' mammalian protein kinase and phosphodiesterase inhibition by a cyclic bulb similar to a compound isolated from higher plants.
11	cyclic amp dependent atpase activity of bovine heart protein kinase	Apos-dependent atpase activity; cyclic ampoule of bovine cardiac protein kinase.
11	the role of creatine kinase and arginine kinase in muscle	The role of creatine kinase and arginine kinase in muscle.
11	sulfhydryl group reactivity of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine heart a probe of holoenzyme structure	Sulfhydryl group reactivity of protein kinase; adenosine 3-5 bovine heart monophosphate, a probe of the structure of l' holoenzyme.
11	lack of altered cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity in the aorta and heart of the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Absence of altered cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity in the aorta and heart of spontaneously hypertensive rat.
11	saturable adenosine 5 triphosphate independent binding of 3h ouabain to brain and cardiac tissue in vitro	Adenosine 5 saturable triphosphate binding independent of ouabain 3h to brain and cardiac tissue in vitro.
11	somatostatin selective inhibition of cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase	L' somatostatin selective inhibition of protein kinase stimulated by apos; cyclic ampoule stimulated protein kinase.
11	effect of taurine on cyclic amp and gmp levels in the hearts of rats exposed to stress	Effect of taurine on cyclic ampoules and gmp levels in the heart of stressed rats.
11	effects of cucl2 on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Effects of cucl2 on apos; hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and apos; cyclic ampulla by cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase of apos; activator from beef heart.
11	the role of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in adrenergic effects on ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation in the isolated perfused rat heart	The role of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in adrenergic effects on ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation in isolated perfused rat heart.
11	interaction of aza and deaza analogs of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate with some enzymes of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate metabolism evidence that the lone pair electrons of n 3 are involved in the binding of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate to type ii adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase	L' interaction of the analogs aza and deaza of phosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3 with some enzymes of phosphate metabolism d' cyclic adenosine 3 5 shows that the electrons of the d&apos pair; free electrons of n 3 are involved in the binding of cyclic phosphate 3-5 of l' adenosine to the protein kinase dependent on l' cyclic adenosine 3-5 phosphate type ii.
11	phosphorylation of synthetic peptide analogs of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory subunit by the cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Phosphorylation of synthetic peptide analogs of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory units by the cyclic ampullae protein kinase.
11	studies on the inhibition by beta adrenergic receptor agonists of cyclic amp phosphodiesterase activity of rat heart	Studies on the inhibition by beta-adrenoceptor agonists of l' activity of l' cyclic phosphodiesterase of rat heart.
11	dissociation between the electrophysiological properties and total tissue cyclic guanosine monophosphate content of guinea pig atria	Dissociation between the electrophysiological properties and total tissue cyclic guanosine monophosphate content of guinea pig atria.
11	tyrosine hydroxylase and the conversion of l thyroxine into 3 3 5 triiodo l thyronone in the rat	Tyrosine hydroxylase and the conversion of the thyroxine to 3-3-5 triiodo lthyronone in the rat.
11	sequence of two phosphorylated sites in the catalytic subunit of bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Sequence of two phosphorylated sites in the <-@ catalytic unit of l' adenosine 3-5 bovine cardiac muscle dependent monophosphate kinase.
11	stereochemistry of hydrolysis of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphorothioate by the cyclic phosphodiesterase from beef heart	The stereochemistry of apos; hydrolysis of adenosine 3-5 cyclic phosphorothioate by cyclic bovine heart phosphodiesterase.
11	effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides the concentrations of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp in canine coronary artery and left ventricular muscle following the administration of various coronary vasodilators	Effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides; concentrations of luteal; cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp in apos; canine coronary artery and left ventricular muscle after apos; administration of various coronary vasodilators.
11	purification and properties of two forms of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from rabbit myocardium	Purification and properties of two forms of soluble 3-5 ampere-dependent protein kinase from rabbit myocardium.
11	correlation of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp levels with changes in contractile force of dog ventricular myocardium during cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of histamine glucagon theophylline and papaverine	Correlation between dapos and cyclic gmp levels; cyclic ampoule and changes in contractile force of dog ventricular myocardium during apo; cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of apo; histamine glucagon theophylline and papaverine.
11	effects of phenylephrine and isoproterenol on the activity of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase of hypothyroid rat tissues	Effects of phenylephrine and apos; isoproterenol on apos; protein kinase activity; a cyclic ampoule in hypothyroid rat tissue.
11	catalytic properties of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase of rabbit myocardium	Catalytic properties of the soluble protein kinase of 3,5 amperes from rabbit myocardium.
11	in vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of a cyclic amp phosphodiesterase inhibitor structurally related to natural cardenolides	The in vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of apos, a cyclic phosphodiesterase inhibitor structurally related to natural cardenolides.
11	independent expression of cardiac type i and ii cyclic amp dependent protein kinase during murine embryogenesis and postnatal development	An independent expression of protein kinase dependent on the apos; cyclic ampulla type i and ii during the apos; murine embryogenesis and postnatal development.
11	inhibitory effect of a lethal toxic fragment of staphylococcal alpha toxin on cyclic amp dependent protein kinase activity	Dapos inhibitory effect; a lethal toxic fragment of staphylococcal alpha toxin on apos; apos-dependent protein kinase activity; a cyclic ampoule.
11	re evaluation of the relationship between the positive inotropic effect of ouabain and its inhibitory effect on na k dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts	Reassessment of the relationship between apos; positive inotropic effect of ouabain and its inhibitory effect on apos; na k-dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts.
11	affinity labeling of catalytic subunit of bovine heart muscle cyclic amp dependent protein kinase by 5 p fluorosulfonylbenzoyladenosine	Labelling of apos; affinity of sub@-@lapos-dependent protein kinase catalytic unit; bovine cardiac muscle cycling ampoule by 5 p fluorosulfonylbenzoylladenosine.
11	studies on functional domains of the regulatory subunit of bovine heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Studies of functional domains of the l&apos monophosphate-dependent protein kinase regulatory unit under @-@; bovine heart adenosine 3.
11	decreased myocardial and renal content of 3 5 amp in genetically hypertensive rats effects of pge2 and pgf2 alpha	The renal and myocardial content of 3,5 amperes decreased in genetically hypertensive rats, while the effects of pge2 and pgf2 alpha were decreased.
11	prostacyclin induced coronary vasodilation interactions with adenosine cyclic amp and energy charge in the rat heart in vitro	Prostacyclin induced coronary vasodilation interactions with a d&apos cyclic ampoule; adenosine and an energy charge in the rat heart in vitro.
12	the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline by rats under various experimental conditions	L' urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline by rats under various experimental conditions.
12	increased urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline after phenoxybenzamine	Apos increase; urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline after phenoxybenzamine.
12	potentiation of epinephrine and norepinephrine by iproniazid	The potential of epinephrine and norepinephrine by iproniazid and its metabolites.
12	inhibitor of o methylation of epinephrine and norepinephrine in vitro and in vivo	Methylation o inhibitor of l' epinephrine and norepinephrine in vitro and in vivo.
12	the action of antisympathomimetic drugs on the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline	L' action of antisympathomimetic drugs on the apos; urinary excretion of epos; adrenaline and noradrenaline.
12	effect of psychotropic drugs on the uptake of h3 norepinephrine by tissues	The effect of psychotropic drugs on the uptake of norepinephrine by the tissues.
12	effect of noradrenaline on the action of nicotine and tyramine on isolated atria	The effect of noradrenaline on the apos; the action of nicotine and tyramine on isolated atria.
12	the release of adrenaline and noradrenaline from the adrenal medulla of the cat during splanchnic stimulation	The release of adrenaline and noradrenaline from the adrenal medulla of the cat during splanchnic stimulation.
12	the uptake of adrenaline and noradrenaline by blood platelets of the pig	The uptake of adrenaline and noradrenaline by the blood platelets of the pig.
12	role of myocardial catecholamines in cardiac contractility	The role of myocardial catecholamines in cardiac contractility.
12	role for ganglionic norepinephrine in sympathetic synaptic transmission	Role of ganglionic norepinephrine in sympathetic synaptic transmission.
12	epinephrine norepinephrine and acetylcholine as conditioned stimuli for avoidance behavior	Epinephrine, norepinephrine and acetylcholine are stimuli conditioned to avoidance.
12	effect of noradrenaline bretylium and cocaine on the blood pressure response to tyramine in the rat	Effect of noradrenaline-bretylium and cocaine on the blood pressure response to tyramine in the rat.
12	responses of the isolated sympathetic nerveductus deferens preparation of the guinea pig	The responses of the isolated sympathetic nerve defer the preparation of the guinea pig.
12	depletion and replacement of the adrenaline and noradrenaline contents of the rat adrenal gland following treatment with reserpine	Depletion and replacement of the adrenaline and noradrenaline contents of the rat adrenal gland following reserpine treatment.
12	is reserpine tranquilization linked to change in brain serotonin or brain norepinephrine	Reserpine tranquilization is linked to a change in brain serotonin or brain norepinephrine.
12	effect of reserpine on release of noradrenaline from transmitter granules in adrenergic nerves	Effect of reserpine on release of noradrenaline from transmitter granules in adrenergic nerves.
12	effect of drugs on the noradrenaline content of brain and peripheral tissues and its significance	Effect of drugs on the noradrenaline content of the brain and peripheral tissues and its importance.
12	retention of injected catechol amines by the mouse	Retention of catechol amine injected by the mouse.
12	effect of hexamethonium on the vascular response to noradrenaline in man	Effect of hexamethonium on the vascular response to noradrenaline in humans.
12	reversal of phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis by norepinephrine	Inversion of phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis by norepinephrine.
12	interactions between cocaine tyramine and noradrenaline at the noradrenaline store	Acute interactions between cocaine tyramine and noradrenaline at the noradrenaline store.
12	effect of guanethidine hemicholinium and mebutamate on the hypertensive response to eserine and catechol amines	Effect of hemicholinium and guanethidine mebutamate on the hypertensive response to apos; eserine and catecholic amines.
12	effect of antisympathomimetic drugs on the plasma concentrations of catechol amines	Effect of antisympathomimetic drugs on the plasma concentrations of catechol amines.
12	localizing tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons by electron microscopic autoradiography	Localization of tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons by electron microscopy.
12	pharmacological responses of thiamine deficient rat tissues	The pharmacological responses of rat thiamine-deficient tissues.
12	neurochemical differences between two strains of mice	Neurochemical differences between two strains of mice.
12	effect of chlorpromazine and reserpine on the catechol amine content of different areas of the central nervous system of the dog	The effect of chlorpromazine and reserpine on the concentration of catecholamines in different regions of the central nervous system of dogs.
12	tissue levels of norepinephrine and epinephrine in hemorrhagic shock	Tissue levels of norepinephrine and d*apos; epinephrine in hemorrhagic shock.
12	action of sympathomimetic drugs on the isolated junction of the bile duct and duodenum	The action of sympathomimetic drugs on the isolated junction of the bile duodenum and ductum.
12	the effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the pressor responses to noradrenaline and angiotensin	The effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the pressor responses to noradrenaline and angiotensin.
12	the action of histamine on the isolated heart	L' action of histamine on isolated heart.
12	the subcellular localization of dopamine and acetylcholine in the dog caudate nucleus	The subcellular localization of dopamine and acetylcholine in the caudate nucleus of dogs.
12	the effects of nialamide on adrenergic functions	The effects of nialamide on adrenergic functions.
12	urinary excretion of metabolites of catecholamines in normal individuals and hypertensive patients	L' urinary excretion of metabolites of catecholamines in normal and hypertensive patients.
12	bacteremic shock a medical emergency	Bacteriological shock, a medical emergency.
12	guanethidine and pupillary reaction	Uh, guanethidine and pupillary reaction.
12	drug administration to neonatal rats effects on later emotionality and learning	Drug administration to neonatal rats has effects on emotional and emotional well-being; subsequent learning.
12	iontophoretic release of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine from micropipettes	The iontophoretic release of adrenaline, noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine from micropipettes.
12	mechanism of the positive inotropic responses to bretylium and guanethidine	Mechanisms of the positive inotropic responses to bretylium and guanethidine.
12	effect of some blocking drugs on the pressor response to physostigmine in the rat	Effect of certain blocking drugs on the pressor response to physostigmine in the rat.
12	potentiation of some catechol amines by phenoxybenzamine guanethidine and cocaine	The potential of some catechol amines by phenoxybenzamine guanethidine and cocaine.
12	norepinephrine and 3 4dihydroxyphenethylamine turnover in guinea pig brain in vivo	Norepinephrine and 4dihydroxyphenethylamine turnover occurs in guinea pig brain in vivo.
12	prostaglandin release from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Release of prostaglandins from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragmatic preparation.
12	septic shock	Uh, septic shock.
12	participation of an unusual ganglionic pathway in the mediation of the pressor effect of physostigmine in the rat	An unusual ganglionic pathway in the mediation of apos; pressor effect of physostigmine in the rat.
12	the effects of bethanidine on the peripheral circulation in man	The effects of bethanidine on peripheral circulation in humans.
12	innervation of the large intestine of the toad bufo marinus	Innervation of the large intestine of the toad bufo marinus.
12	a preliminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human isolated taenia coli preparation	A preliminary investigation of the pharmacology of the preparation of taenia coli isolated from humans.
12	effects of bretylium and guanethidine on human hand and forearm vessels and on their sensitivity to noradrenaline	Effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the human hand and shoulder vessels, and their sensitivity to noradrenaline.
12	the increase in the toxicity of yohimbine induced by imipramine and other drugs in mice	L' increased toxicity of yohimbine induced by imipramine and d' other drugs in mice.
12	tremorine its effect on amines of the central nervous system	Tremorine its effect on the amines of the central nervous system.
12	early developmental stress and later behavior	This is early developmental stress and delayed behavior.
12	a comparison of platelet aggregation produced by seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors	A comparison of platelet aggregation produced by seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors.
12	the part played by calcium in determining the response to stimulation of sympathetic postganglionic fibres	The role played by calcium in the response to stimulation of sympathetic postganglionic fibers.
12	histochemical demonstration of uptake of exogenous norepinephrine by adrenergic fibers in vitro	Histochemical demonstration of apos; uptake of exogenous norepinephrine by adrenergic fibers in vitro.
12	a nuclear membrane change after partial hepatectomy	A change in the nuclear membrane after partial hepatectomy.
12	production of inflammatory changes in the microcirculation by cationic proteins extracted from lysosomes	Production of inflammatory changes in the microcirculation by cationic proteins extracted from lysosomes.
12	shock caused by continuous infusion of metaraminol bitartrate aramine	Shock caused by continuous infusion of metaraminol bitartrate aramine.
12	adrenaline synthesis control by the pituitary gland and adrenal glucocorticoids	The synthesis of adrenaline is controlled by the pituitary gland and adrenal glucocorticoids.
12	peripheral vascular effects of mixtures of isoprenaline and noradrenaline in man	The peripheral vascular effects of mixtures of isoprenaline and noradrenaline in humans.
12	secretory responses of extramedullary chromaffin tissue	Secretory reactions of extramedullary chromaffin tissue.
12	a sensitive method for the assay of catechol amines	This is a sensitive method for the determination of catechol amines.
12	the effect of fasting on the hyperglycaemic responses to catechol amines in rats	The effect of fasting on the hyperglycemic responses to the catecholic amines in rats.
12	effects of amphetamine on the responses of the guinea pig isolated vas deferens preparation to hypogastric nerve stimulation	Effects of l' amphetamine on the responses of the isolated guinea pig vas deferens to hypogastric nerve stimulation.
12	acidosis effect on lipolytic activity of norepinephrine in isolated fat cells	Norepinephrine effect; acidosis; lipolytic activity of norepinephrine in isolated fat cells.
12	adrenaline and noradrenaline relation to performance in a visual vigilance task	Relationship between adrenaline and noradrenaline and performance in a visual vigilance task.
12	an investigation of the adrenergic blocking action of chlorpromazine	A study of the adrenergic blocking action of chlorpromazine.
12	urinary excretion of catechol amines in the rat after their liberation by reserpine or dexamphetamine	L' urinary excretion of catechol amines in the rat after release by reserpine or dexamphetamine.
12	chemical tests for phaeochromocytoma	Uh, chemical tests for the pheochromocytoma.
12	the action of sympathomimetic amines on the outflow of aqueous humour from the eye	The action of sympathomimetic amines on the elliptic flow; aqueous humour of the eye.
12	inhibition of sympathomimetic effects on the heart	Inhibition of sympathomimetic effects on the heart.
12	the effects of drugs on the uptake of amines by mast cells	The effects of drugs on the apos; absorption of amines by mast cells.
12	unconditioned response to electric shock mechanism in planarians	Unconditional reaction to electric shock mechanism in planarians.
12	the effect of some anticholinesterases on the response of the taenia to sympathetic nerve stimulation	L' effect of certain anticholinesterases on the response of the taenia to sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	the development of the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born calf	The development of the adrenal medulla of the new born fetus and calf.
12	neuromuscular transmitter substance in insect visceral muscle	Neuromuscular transmitter substance in visceral muscle of insects.
12	studies on the renal excretion of norepinephrine	Studies on apos; renal excretion of norepinephrine.
12	comparison of effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine	Comparison of effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine.
12	the influences of andrenotropic drugs and noradrenaline on the histamine release in cardiac anaphylaxis in vitro	The influence of andrenotropic drugs and noradrenaline on histamine release in cardiac anaphylaxis in vitro.
12	modification by beta adrenergic blockade of the circulatory respones to acute hypoxia in man	Beta-adrenergic blockade of the circulatory functions responsible for acute hypoxia in men.
12	the innervation of sheep mesenteric veins	L' innervation of sheep mesenteric veins.
12	cardiovascular and metabolic responses to noradrenaline in man before and after acclimatization to cold in antarctica	The cardiovascular and metabolic responses to noradrenaline in men before and after birth; cold acclimation in the Antarctic.
12	the blood flow and oxygen consumption of brown adipose tissue in the new born rabbit	Blood flow and oxygen consumption of brown adipose tissue in the newborn rabbit.
12	food and water intake after intrahypothalamic injections of carbachol in the rabbit	Absorption of apos; food and water after intrahypothalamic injections of carbachol in rabbits.
12	norepinephrine methylation in fetal rat adrenals	Norepinephrine methylation in fetal rat adrenals.
12	mast cells and necrosis	Uh, mast cells and necrosis.
12	the effects of pressure and pharmacologically active substances on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation	The effects of pressure and pharmacologically active substances on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation.
12	effects on temperature of monoamines injected into the cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized dogs	Effects on the temperature of monoamines injected into the cerebral ventricles of anesthetized dogs.
12	monoamines and their metabolites in the avian brain	The monoamines and their metabolites in the bird brain.
12	diagnostic value of detailed metabolic pathway investigations in two cases of phaeochromocytoma with minimal increase in total catecholamine output	Diagnostic value d' detailed studies of metabolic pathways in two cases of pheochromocytoma with minimal increase in total catecholamine production.
12	the determination of urinary amines by one dimensional paper chromatography	Determination of urinary amines by one-dimensional paper chromatography.
12	systemic vasoconstrictor and renal vasodilator effects of plv 2 octapressin in man	Systemic vasoconstrictor and renal vasodilator effects of octapressin plv 2 in men.
12	effects of alpha adrenergic blockade and tissue catecholamine depletion on pulmonary vascular response to hypoxia	Effects of alpha adrenergic blockade and tissue catecholamine depletion on pulmonary vascular response to l' hypoxia.
12	effects of adrenergic receptor activation and blockade on the systolic preejection period heart rate and arterial pressure in man	Effects of apo; adrenergic receptor activation and blockade on heart rate and blood pressure during the systolic pre-ejection period in men.
12	light induced changes in pineal hydroxyindole o methyltransferase abolition by lateral hypothalamic lesions	The light induced changes in the elimination of the pineal hydroxyindole o methyltransferase by lateral hypothalamic lesions.
12	vascular smooth muscle quantitation of cell thickness in the wall of arterioles in the living animal in situ	The quantification of the thickness of the cells in the walls of the arterioles of vascular smooth muscle of l'apos; living animal in situ.
12	neural correlates of food and water intake in the rat	Neural correlates of food and water consumption in rats.
12	localization of the adrenergic feeding system in the rat diencephalon	Localization of the d&apos system; adrenergic feeding system in the rat diencephalon.
12	plasma lipids and urinary excretion of catecholamines in man during experimentally induced emotional stress and their modification by nicotinic acid	Plasma lipids and l-apos; urinary excretion of catecholamines in men during experimentally induced emotional stress and their modification by nicotinic acid.
12	observation of changes in volume of a congested limb as a means of studying the behaviour of capacity vessels	Observing changes in volume; a congested limb as a means of detecting; studying the behaviour of vessels of capacity.
12	the effect of intraventricular injections of noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine on the ox bos taurus at different environmental temperatures	L' effect of intraventricular injections of noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine at different ambient temperatures on beef bosurus.
12	concealed glomerular filtration	Hidden glomerular filtration.
12	mechanisms of reflex vasodilation assessment of the role of neural reuptake of norepinephrine and release of histamine	Mechanisms of onset; evaluation of reflex vasodilation of the role of neural norepinephrine reuptake and histamine release.
12	metabolism of alpha methyltyrosine in man relationship to its potency as an inhibitor of catecholamine biosynthesis	Metabolism of alpha methyltyrosine in relation to its potency as an inhibitor of catecholamine biosynthesis.
12	the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on hormone secretion and blood flow from the thyroid vein in sheep with exteriorized thyroids	The effect of adrenaline and norepinephrine on the hormonal secretion and blood flow of the thyroid vein in exiterated thyroid sheep.
12	studies on the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesentric artery of the domestic fowl	Studies of the longitudinal muscle of the intestine; anterior mesenteric artery of domestic poultry.
12	electrical and mechanical activity of the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesenteric artery of the domestic fowl	Electrical and mechanical activity of the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesenteric artery of domestic poultry.
12	adenyl cyclase activity in rat pineal gland effects of chronic denervation and norepinephrine	Effects of chronic denervation and norepinephrine on apos; rat pineal gland epicotyl cyclase activity.
12	central temperature regulation in the conscious rabbit after monoamine oxidase inhibition	Regulation of the central temperature in the conscious rabbit after the apos; inhibition of monoamine oxidase.
12	effects of adrenaline on human blood platelets	Apos effects; adrenaline on human blood platelets.
12	some properties of the smooth muscle of rabbit portal vein	Some properties of the smooth muscle of rabbit portal vein.
12	studies of the mitochondrial energy transfer system of brown adipose tissue	Study of brown adipose tissue mitochondrial energy.
12	in vivo and in vitro manifestations of adrenergic blockade in bordetella pertussis vaccinated mice	In vivo and in vitro manifestations of adrenergic blockade in pertussis-vaccinated mice.
12	inhibition of gastrointestinal movement by sympathetic nerve stimulation the site of action	L' inhibition of gastro-intestinal movement by sympathetic nerve stimulation is the site of action.
12	the mechanism of body temperature changes induced by intraventricular injections of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the ox bos taurus	The mechanism of body temperature changes induced by intraventricular injections of epos, epinephrine, noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the bos bosom muscle.
12	intrastrain difference in serotonin and norepinephrine in discrete areas of rat brain	Intrarain difference in serotonin and norpinephrine in discrete areas of rat brain.
12	evoked release of norepinephrine and serotonin from brain slices inhibitoon by lithium	Evoked release of norepinephrine and serotonin from brain slices inhibited by lithium.
12	histochemical fluorescence after application of neurochemicals to caudate nucleus and septal area in vivo	In vivo histochemical fluorescence after application of neurochemicals to the caudate nucleus and septal region.
12	inhibition of lipolytic action of growth hormone and glucocorticoid by ultraviolet and x radiation	Apos inhibition; lipolytic action of the growth hormone and glucocorticoids by ultraviolet and x-rays.
12	action of various sympathomimetic amines on the isolated stripped vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' action of various sympathomimetic amines on the isolated vas deferens of the guinea pig.
12	the effects of drugs inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline induced contractions of the isolated rat vas deferens	The effects of drugs inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline induced contractions of the isolated rat vas deferens.
12	the interaction between angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	L' interaction between apos; angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in the apos; isolated artery of the apos; rabbit ear.
12	the release of 3h dopamine from the isolated rabbit ileum	The release of 3h dopamine from isolated rabbit ileum.
12	pharmacological modifications of sympathetic responses elicited by hypothalamic stimulation in the rat	Pharmacological changes in sympathetic responses induced by hypothalamic stimulation in the rat.
12	the potentiation of rat uterine inhibitory responses to noradrenaline by theophylline and nitroglycerine	The potentiation of rat uterine inhibitory responses to noradrenaline by theophylline and nitroglycerine.
12	effect of rabbit antibodies against angiotensin ii on the pressor response to angiotensin ii and renal hypertension in the rat	Effect of rabbit antibodies against angiotensin ii on the pressor response to apos; angiotensin ii and apos; renal hypertension in rats.
12	interaction between desipramine tyramine and amphetamine at adrenergic neurones	The interaction between desipramine tyramine and l' amphetamine with adrenergic neurons.
12	the pattern and control of sweating in the sheep and the goat	The pattern and the control of perspiration in the sheep and goats.
12	the inhibitory action of noradrenaline and adrenaline on acetylcholine output by guinea pig ileum longitudinal muscle strip	L' inhibitory action of noradrenaline and l' adrenaline on d&apos production; acetylcholine by the longitudinal muscle band of l' guinea pig ileum.
12	antagonism of the response of human isolated arteries to noradrenaline	L' antagonism of the response of isolated human arteries to noradrenaline.
12	the pharmacological properties of fibrinogen degradation products	The pharmacological properties of fibrinogen degradation products.
12	effect of norepinephrine epinephrine and angiotensin on blood flow in the internal carotid artery of man	Effect of norepinephrine-epinephrine and angiotensin on blood flow in the apos; internal carotid artery of the apos; man.
12	facilitation of brain self stimulation by central administration of norepinephrine	Ease of apo; auto-brain stimulation by apo; central administration of norepinephrine.
12	semi automated method for the differential determination of plasma catecholamines	Semi-automatic method for the differential determination of plasma catecholamines.
12	studies on renal vasomotion	Acute renal vasomotion studies.
12	thyroxine deiodination during cold exposure in the rat	Tyroxine deiodination during cold exposure in the rat.
12	circadian rhythms in rat mid brain and caudate nucleus biogenic amine levels	Circadian rhythms in the rat brain medium and caudate nucleus biogenic amine levels.
12	epinephrine effect on uptake of iodine by dispersed cells of calf thyroid gland	Effect of apos; epinephrine on uptake of iodine by dispersed calf thyroid gland cells.
12	localization of tritiated norepinephrine in vascular sympathetic axons of the rat intestine and mesentery by electron microscope radioautography	Localization of tritiated norepinephrine in vascular sympathetic axons of the intestine and mesentery by radioautographic electron microscopy.
12	rat brain amines blood histamine and glucose levels in relationship to circadian changes in sleep induced by pentobarbitone sodium	Rat brain alters histamine and glucose blood levels in relation to circadian changes in sleep induced by sodium pentobarbitone.
12	the reversal of the central effects of noradrenaline by antidepressant drugs in mice	L' reversal of the central effects of noradrenaline by antidepressants in mice.
12	evidence for a central 5 hydroxytryptamine receptor stimulation by lysergic acid diethylamide	Evidence of central stimulation of d*apos receptors; hydroxytryptamine 5 by lysergic acid; diethylamide.
12	the effects of intracerebroventricularly administered noradnamine and other sympathomimetic amines upon leptazol convulsions in mice	Apos effects; intracerebroventricular administration of noradnamine and d' other sympathomimetic amines on leptazol convulsions in mice.
12	restoration of the chronotropic effect of tyramine on rat atria after reserpine	Recovery of apos; chronotropic effect of tyramine on rat atria after apos; reserpine administration.
12	neurohumoral interaction in the rat amygdala after central chemical stimulation	Neuro interaction-humoral in the rat amygdala after central chemical stimulation.
12	action of a pyrimido pyrimidine compound on platelet behaviour in vitro	The action of a pyrimido pyrimidine compound on platelet behaviour in vitro.
12	shivering and non shivering therogenesis during summit metabolism in young lambs	Nonchilling, shivering therogenesis during peak metabolism in young lambs.
12	changes in plasma glucose lactate and free fatty acids in lambs during summit metabolism and treatment with catecholamines	Changes in plasma glucose lactate and free fatty acids in lambs during peak metabolism and treatment with catecholamines.
12	the mechanism of the pyrogenic effect of streptococcus cell wall mucopeptide	The mechanism of l' the pyrogenic effect of the cell wall mucopeptide of streptococcus.
12	control of body temperature in the unanaesthetized monkey by cholinergic and aminergic systems in the hypothalamus	Control of body temperature in monkeys not anesthetized by cholinergic and aminergic systems of the hypothalamus.
12	the systolic blood pressure response of depressed patients to infused norepinephrine	The systolic blood pressure response of depressed patients to norepinephrine infusion.
12	adipose tissue and heat production in the new born ox bos taurus	Adipose tissue and heat production in the new-ne bos bos bos taurus.
12	the effect of noradrenaline on the end plate potential in twitch fibres of the frog	L' effect of noradrenaline on the terminal plate potential in frog twitch fibers.
12	generation of adrenergic and cholinergic potentials in sympathetic ganglion cells	The generation of adrenergic and cholinergic potentials in sympathetic ganglion cells.
12	beta receptor mechanisms in the superficial limb veins of the dog	Beta receptor mechanisms in the superficial veins of the dog limbs.
12	unexpected adrenergic effects of chlorpromazine eating elicited by injection into rat hypothalamus	Apos-induced unintended adrenergic effects of chlorpromazine use injection into rat hypothalamus.
12	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine in acute cardiac tamponade	The hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine in acute cardiac tamponade.
12	1 delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol neurochemical and behavioral effects in the mouse	The neurochemical and behavioral effects of delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol in mice.
12	effects of catecholamines on the cholinergic neuromuscular transmission in fish red muscle	The effects of catecholamines on cholinergic neuromuscular transmission in fish red muscle.
12	effects of reserpine on the disposition of sympathomimetic amines in vascular tissue	The effects of reserpine on the disposition of sympathomimetic amines in vascular tissue.
12	mechanism of cocaine potentiation of responses to amines	The mechanism of apos; increase of apos; enzyme activity; linked to apos; increase of apos; activity of apos; enzyme.
12	effects of a haloalkylamine on responses to and disposition of sympathomimetic amines	Effects of haloalkylamine on responses to and disposition of sympathomimetic amines.
12	brain monoamines and adrenocortical activation	Brain monoamines and adrenocortical activation.
12	hormonal regulation of rat seminal vesicle sensitivity to adrenaline noradrenaline acetylcholine and acetyl beta methylcholine	Hormonal regulation of rat seminal vesicle sensitivity to norepinephrine acetylcholine and l' acetyl beta methylcholine.
12	lysergic acid diethylamide dissociation of its behavioral and hyperthermic actions by dl alpha methyl p tyrosine	Lysergic acid lysergic diethylamide dissociation of its behavioral and hyperthermic actions by dl alpha methyl tyrosine.
12	a study of the role of noradrenaline in behavioral changes produced in the rat by psychotomimetic drugs	A study of the role of noradrenaline in the behavioral changes produced in the rat by psychotomimetic drugs.
12	behavioural and biochemical effects of 2 2 6 dichlorophenylamino 2 imidazoline hydrochloride st 155 on the central nervous system	Behavioral and biochemical effects of dichlorophenylamino hydrochloride-2 imidazoline 2 2 2 26 on the central nervous system.
12	adenyl cyclase in human platelets activity and responsiveness	Adenyl cyclase in human platelet activity and reactivity.
12	preiminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human internal anal sphincter	Preliminary study of the pharmacology of the human internal anal sphincter.
12	interactions of ouabain and noradrenaline in isolated rabbit s atria	Interactions of orabain and noradrenaline in isolated rabbit s atria.
12	effects of chlorpromazine on the metabolism of catecholamines in dog brain	Effects of chlorpromazine on the metabolism of catecholamines in the brain of dogs.
12	studies of the effect of natural and synthetic polypeptide type ergot compounds on a peripheral vascular bed	The effect of natural and synthetic polypeptides of the ergot type on a peripheral vascular bed.
12	steroid potentiation of responses to sympathomimetic amines in aortic strips	The steroid potentiation of responses to sympathomimetic amines in aortic strips.
12	reversal by pronethalol of dibenamine blockade a study on the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig	Inversion by pronethalol of blockade by dibenamine d' a study on the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig.
12	kinetic studies of plasma free fatty acid and triglyceride metabolism in man	Kinetic studies of plasma free fatty acid and triglyceride metabolism in men.
12	stimulation of c14 melatonin synthesis from c14 tryptophan by noradrenaline in rat pineal in organ culture	Stimulation of c14 melatonin synthesis from c14 tryptophan by norepinephrine in l' organ cultured rat epinephrine.
12	norepinephrine turnover in rat brains after gonadectomy	Norepinephrine turnover in rat brain after gonadectomy.
12	influence of prostaglandin e1 on the terminal vascular bed	L' influence of prostaglandin e1 on the terminal vascular bed.
12	tricyclic antidepressants evidence for an intraneuronal site of action	Tricyclic antidepressants indicate the existence of a site of death, an intraneuronal action.
12	olfactory bulb removal effects on brain norepinephrine	The effects of olfactory bulb suppression on cerebral norepinephrine.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of brown fat cells	Norepinephrine induced depolarization of brown fat cells.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of melatonin and serotonin synthesis in cultured rat pineals	Cyclic stimulation of melatonin and serotonin synthesis by adenosine monophosphate in rat pineal cultures.
12	a comparison of sweat gland activity in eight species of east african bovids	Sweat gland activity in eight species of cattle from Apos; Africa; East.
12	modulation of noradrenaline incorporation by nerve activities in the rat submaxillary gland	Modulation of the apos; noradrenaline incorporation by nerve activities in the gland under rat maxillary @-@.
12	function of smooth muscle of the rat renal pelvis response of the isolated pelvis muscle to angiotensin and some other substances	Function of the smooth muscle of the rat renal pelvis, response of isolated muscle from the pelvis to angiotensin and other substances.
12	phase separation in solutions of noradrenaline and adenosine triphosphate influence of bivalent cations and drugs	Phase separation in solutions of noradrenaline and d' adenosine triphosphate influences divalent cations and drugs.
12	interactions of inhibitors of noradrenaline uptake and angiotensin on the sympathetic nerves of the isolated rabbit heart	Interactions of inhibitors of noradrenaline uptake and angiotensin on the sympathetic nerves of isolated rabbit heart.
12	the effects of adrenaline noradrenaline and isoprenaline on inhibitory alpha and beta adrenoceptors in the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig ileum	The effects of adrenaline, norepinephrine and isoprenaline on alpha and beta inhibitors in the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig ileum.
12	intraneural distribution of exogenous norepinephrine in the central nervous system of the rat	Intraneural distribution of exogenous norepinephrine in the central nervous system of the rat.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathetic nerve and adrenal medullary depletions after prolonged thermal injury	Dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathetic nerve and adrenal medullary depletions after prolonged thermal injury.
12	action of dopamine on the human iris	The action of dopamine on the human bloodstream.
12	responses of saphenous and mesenteric veins to administration of dopamine	Reactions of the saphenous and mesenteric veins to apos; dopamine administration.
12	autonomic reflexes and vascular reactivity in experimental scurvy in man	Autonomous reflexes and vascular reactivity in experimental scurvy in men.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine metabolism in parkinsonism	Dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine metabolism in parkinsonism.
12	incorporation of 14c tryptophan into 14c protein by cultured rat pineals stimulation by l norepinephrine	L' incorporation of tryptophan 14c into protein 14c by stimulation of rat pineals grown with norepinephrine.
12	a method for the estimation of the catecholamines and their metabolites in brain tissue	Methods used; estimation of catecholamines and their metabolites in brain tissue.
12	effects of chronic administration of nicotine on storage and synthesis of noradrenaline in rat brain	Effects of Apos; chronic administration of nicotine on storage and synthesis of noradrenaline in rat brain.
12	immunohistochemical localizatio of protein components of catecholamine storage vesicles	Immunohistochemical localization of protein components of catecholamine storage vesicles.
12	nerve mediated excitation and inhibition of the smooth muscle cells of the avian gizzard	Nerve-mediated excitation and inhibition of smooth muscle cells of the avian gizzard.
12	melatonin synthesis adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and norepinephrine stimulate n acetyltransferase	Melatonin synthesis, l' adenosine 35 monophosphate and norepinephrine stimulate acetyltransferase.
12	the mobilization of free fatty acids in relation to adipose tissue triglyceride fatty acids in the rat	The mobilization of free fatty acids relative to triglyceride fatty acids in rat adipose tissue.
12	inhibition of the carotid sinus reflex by the chronic administration of propranolol	Inhibition of the carotid sinus reflex by lidos; chronic administration of propranolol.
12	effects of amphetamine derivatives on brain dopamine and noradrenaline	Effects of amphetamine on brain dopamine and noradrenaline.
12	effect of a new series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the reserpine resistant uptake mechanism of central and peripheral monoamine neurones in vivo and in vitro	Effects of apos; a new series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the mechanism of apos; in vivo and in vitro reserpine absorption of central and peripheral monoamino neurons.
12	the effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on the release of acetylcholine from the guinea pig colon	The effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on the release of acetylcholine from the guinea pig colon.
12	the effect of cocaine and imipramine on tyramine induced release of noradrenaline 3h from the rat vas deferens in vitro	L' effect of cocaine and apos; imipramine on tyramine induced release of 3h noradrenaline from rat vas deferens in vitro.
12	the interactions of noradnamine and imipramine like antidepressant drugs	The interactions of noradnamine and imipramine like antidepressants.
12	the effect of morpine dependence on the vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in relation to arteriolar smooth muscle in the pancreas of the rat	L' effect of morpine dependence on the vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in relation to arteriolar smooth muscle in the rat pancreas.
12	actions of phenylephrine on beta adrenoceptors in guinea pig trachea	L' action of phenylephrine on guinea pig trachea beta-adrenergic receptors.
12	the pharmacological nature of the response of the reserinized guinea pig vas deferens to postganglionic nerve stimulation	The pharmacological nature of the response of the reserized guinea pig vas deferens to postganglionic nerve stimulation.
12	the metabolism of orally administered l dopa in parkinsonism	The metabolism of orally administered dopa in parkinsonism.
12	blockade of biogenic amine synthesis its effect on the responses to leptazol and dexamphetamine in rats	Blocking the synthesis of biogenic amines its effect on the responses to leptazol and dexamphetamine in rats.
12	the spontaneous release of prostaglandins into the cerebral ventricles of the dog and the effect of external factors on this release	The spontaneous release of prostaglandins into the cerebral ventricles of the dog and l' effect of external factors on this release.
12	the effects of cholinomimetic drugs on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation and noradrenaline in the rabbit ear artery	The effects of cholinomimetic drugs on the responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation and noradrenaline in the rabbit ear.
12	the antagonism of adrenergic neurone blockade by amphetamine and dexamphetamine in the rat and guinea pig	Apos; antagonism of adrenergic neuronal blockade by amphetamine and dexamphetamine in rat and guinea pig.
12	the role of brown adipose tissue in the calorigenic effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold acclimated rats	The role of brown adipose tissue in the calorigenic effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold acclimated rats.
12	pineal gland dibutyryl cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of labeled melatonin production	Apos-stimulated dibutyryl cyclic adenosine monophosphate from pineal gland of labelled melatonin production.
12	alkaloids from catecholamines in adrenal tissue possible role in alcoholism	Alkaloids of catecholamines in adrenal tissues may play a role in apo; alcoholism.
12	the pharmacology of ambenoxan 2 3 6 dioxaheptyl aminomethyl 1 4 benzodioxane a centrally acting muscle relaxant	The pharmacology of l' ambenoxane 2 3 6 dioxaheptyl aminomethyl 1 4 benzodioxane, a muscle relaxant; central action.
12	catecholamine biosynthesis in brains of rats treated with morphine	Catecholamine biosynthesis in the brain of rats treated with morphine.
12	norepinephrine turnover and metabolism in rat brain after long term administration of imipramine	Norepinephrine turnover and metabolism in rat brain after prolonged imipramine administration.
12	miosis during l dopa therapy	Miosis during the dopa therapy.
12	intracranial self stimulation and wakefulness effect of manipulating ambient brain catecholamines	Auto-intracranial stimulation and d&apos effect; alert handling of ambient cerebral catecholamines.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in rat pineal gland increase induced by light	Adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in rat pineal gland light-induced increase.
12	antiparkinsonian drugs inhibition of dopamine uptake in the corpus striatum as a possible mechanism of action	Parkinson's drugs inhibit dopamine absorption into the corpus striatum as a possible mechanism of action.
12	amphetamine differentiation by d and l isomers of behavior involving brain norepinephrine or dopamine	Amphetamine differentiation by isomers d and l of the behavior involving brain norepinephrine or brain dopamine.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate possible mediator for norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells	Cyclic adenosine monophosphate possible mediator for the effects of norepinephrine on cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	brain norepinephrine enhanced turnover after rubidium treatment	Brain norepinephrine increased turnover after rubidium treatment.
12	guanethidine and related agents 3 antagonism by drugs which inhibit the norepinephrine pump in man	Guanethidine and related antagonists 3 by drugs which inhibit the norepinephrine pump in men.
12	polyol pathway in aorta regulation by hormones	Polyol pathway in the regulation of the aorta by hormones.
12	idiopathic postural hypotension physiologic observations and report of a new mode of therapy	Physiological observations; idiopathic postural hypotension and ratio; a new mode of treatment.
12	the delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous noradrenaline in conscious rabbits	The delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous noradrenaline in conscious rabbits.
12	prejunctional actions of some beta adrenoreceptor antagonists in the vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	L' prejunctional action of some beta adrenergic receptor antagonists in the preparation of guinea pig vas deferens.
12	influence of halothane and catecholamines on heart rate and rhythm in the horse	The influence of halothane and catecholamines on heart rate and rhythm in horses.
12	the effects of carbon disulphide exposure on brain catecholamines in rats	The effects of apos; exposure to carbon disulfide on cerebral catecholamines in rats.
12	influence of thyroid hormones on the sensitivity of cardiac and smooth muscle to biogenic amines and other drugs	The influence of thyroid hormones on the sensitivity of cardiac and smooth muscle to biogenic amines and other drugs.
12	the pharmacology of salivary myoepithelial cells in dogs	The pharmacology of salivary myoepithelial cells in dogs.
12	the release of prostaglandin e1 from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	The release of prostaglandin e1 from the rat phrenic nerve (RNP) diaphragmatic preparation.
12	behavioural and somatic effects of bradykinin injected into the cerebral ventricles of unanaesthetized rabbits	Behavioral and somatic effects of bradykinin injected into the cerebral ventricles of unanaesthetized rabbits.
12	the release of catecholamines by shocks and stimuli paired with shocks	The release of catecholamines by shock and shock-induced stimuli.
12	norepinephrine metabolism in brainstem of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Norepinephrine metabolism in the brainstem of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	a cntral site for the hypothermic effects of amphetamine sulphate and p hydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide in mice	Cntral site of the hypothermic effects of d&apos sulfate; amphetamine and phydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide in mice.
12	effects of hemicholinium and bretylium on the release of autonomic transmitters in the isolated sino atrial node	Effects of l' hemicholinium and bretylium on the release of apos; self-contained emitters in the isolated atrial node.
12	effect of acute hypoxia on vascular responsiveness in man i responsiveness to lower body negative pressure and ice on the forehead ii responses to norepinephrine and angiotensin 3 effect of hypoxia and hypocapnia	Acute hypoxia on vascular reactivity in adults; man reactivity to lower body negative pressure and ice on the forehead ii responses to norepinephrine and apos; angiotensin 3 effect of apos; hypoxia and apos; hypocapnia.
12	lesions of central norepinephrine terminals with 6 oh dopamine biochemistry and fine structure	Damage to the central norepinephrine terminals with 6 oh dopaminergic biochemistry and fine structure.
12	vascular smooth muscle reactivity in normotensive and hypertensive rats	Vascular smooth muscle reactivity in normotensive and hypertensive rats.
12	prostaglandins e1 and e2 antagonize norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells microelectrophoretic study	Prostaglandins e1 and e2 antagonize the effects of norepinephrine on apos; microelectrophoretic study of cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	hydrocortisone mediated increase of norepinephrine uptake by brain slices	Apos; hydrocortisone promoted apos; increase in apos; norepinephrine uptake by brain slices.
12	urinary adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in the switch process from depression to mania	Adenosine urinary 3 5 monophosphate in the process of transition from depression to mania.
12	the mechanism of functional vasodilatation in rabbit epigastric adipose tissue	The mechanism of functional vasodilation in rabbit epigastric adipose tissue.
12	electrical activity of the hypothalamus effects of intraventricular catecholamines	L' electrical activity of the hypothalamic effects of intraventricular catecholamines.
12	norepinephrine reversal of anorexia in rats with lateral hypothalamic damage	Norepinephrine apos reversal anorexia in rats with lateral hypothalamic damage.
12	indole metabolism in the pineal gland a circadian rhythm in n acetyltransferase	Metabolism of indole in the pineal gland, circadian rhythm of nacetyltransferase.
12	a comparison of the sensitivities of innervated and denervated rat vasa deferentia to agonist drugs	Comparison of the sensitivities of vas deferentia of innervated and denervated rats to agonists.
12	adrenoceptors of the chick rectum	Adrenoreceptors of the chicken rectum?
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine effects on transmembrane properties of cerebellar purkinje cells	Effects of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine on transmembrane properties of cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	an analysis of the coronary vascular responses to catecholamines using a modified langendorff heart preparation	Analysis of the coronary vascular responses to catecholamines at apos; aid; a modified langendorff heart preparation.
12	central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on the body temperature of the rat	Central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on the body temperature of the rat.
12	effects of catecholamines infused into the brain of young chickens	Effects of catecholamines infused into the brains of young chickens.
12	time course of the effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine containing neurones in rat hypothalamus and striatum	L' the time course of the effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine-containing neurons in the rat epos; hypothalamus and striatum.
12	uptake of monoamines into central neurones and the blood brain barrier in the infant rat	Uptake of monoamines in central neurons and blood barrier-encephalic in the new rat-born.
12	effects of intraventricular 2 4 5 trihydroxyphenylethylamine 6 hydroxydopamine on rat behaviour and brain catecholamine metabolism	The effects of trihydroxyphenylethylamine-6 intraventricular hydroxydopamine 2-45 on rat behaviour and brain catecholamine metabolism.
12	a simple method for measuring a picogram of acetylcholine using the clam mya arenaria heart	A simple method for measuring a picogram of soft tissue, acetylcholine, and soft tissue; mya arenaria heart aid.
12	l dihydroxyphenylalanine effect on s adenosylmethionine in brain	Impact of dihydroxyphenylalanine on epos; adenosylmethionine in the brain.
12	prostaglandin e1 and noradrenaline at the neuromuscular junction	Prostaglandin e1 and noradrenaline at the neuromuscular junction.
12	effect of tyramine on human umbilical artery in vitro	The effect of tyramine on the human umbilical artery in vitro.
12	cardiovascular reactivity in the experimental hypertensive rat	Acute cardiovascular reactivity in the experimental hypertensive rat.
12	depletion of brain noradrenaline and dopamine by 6 hydroxydopamine	Depletion of brain noradrenaline and dopamine by 6 hydroxydopamine.
12	eeg responses in regularly menstruating women and in amenorrheic women treated with ovarian hormones	Eeg in women with regular menstruation and in amenorrheic women treated with ovarian hormones.
12	norepinephrine biosynthesis inhibition effects on memory in mice	Effects of apos; inhibition of norepinephrine biosynthesis on memory of mice.
12	behavioral activation of rats during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine	L' behavioral activation of rats during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine.
12	the effect of isoprenaline on adrenoceptors in human saphenous vein	Lapos; effect of isoprenaline on adrenoceptors in human saphenous vein.
12	relaxations of the isolated portal vein of the rabbit induced by nicotine and electrical stimulation	Relaxations of the isolated portal vein of the rabbit induced by nicotine and electrical stimulation.
12	the inactivation of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in dogs	Inactivation of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in the dog.
12	adrenergic activity in hypothalamus and ovulation	Adrenergic activity in hypothalamus and ovulation.
12	effect of heparin on serum free fatty acids plasma catecholamines and the incidence of arrhythmias following acute myocardial infarction	Effect of apo; heparin on serum free plasma catecholamines; serum fatty acids and apo; incidence of arrhythmias following acute myocardial infarction.
12	the concentration of catecholamines in the brain of the domestic fowl gallus domesticus	The concentration of catecholamines in the brain of gallus domesticus in the case of domestic poultry.
12	relationship between renin and intrarenal hemodynamics in hemorrhagic hypotension	Relationship between renin and apos; intrarenal hemodynamics in apos; hemorrhagic hypotension.
12	catecholamine secretion by the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born foal	Catecholamine secretion by the adrenal medulla of the fetus and the new born @-@.
12	responses of coronary vessels to adrenergic stimuli	Reactions of the coronary vessels to adrenergic stimuli.
12	human norepinephrine metabolism its evaluation bydministration of tritiated norepinephrine	Human norepinephrine metabolism its evaluation by tritiated norepinephrine administration.
12	norepinephrine pools in rat brain differences in turnover rates and pathways of metabolism	Norepinephrine pools in rat brain differences in turnover rates and metabolic pathways.
12	hemodynamic effects of phenoxybenzamine in anesthetized dogs	The hemodynamic effects of phenoxybenzamine in anesthetized dogs.
12	beta adrenoceptor antagonist activity of 3 methoxyisoprenaline	Adrenergic beta-adrenoceptor antagonist activity of 3 methoxyisoprenaline.
12	effect of inhibition of catecholamine synthesis on central catecholamine containing neurones in the developing albino rat	Effect of apo; inhibition of catecholamine synthesis on catecholamine-containing central neurons in the developing albino rat.
12	influence of ambient temperature on the thermoregulatory responses to 5 hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricles of sheep goats and rabbits	Influence of ambient temperature on thermoregulatory responses to 5 hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricles of goats and rabbits.
12	the discharge of sweat in welsh mountain sheep	The welsh mountain sheep is located in the heart of the mountain.
12	responses of mean arterial pressure to pressor agents and diuretics in renal hypertensive and salt hypertensive rats	The effect of a diuretic diuretic on hypertension on the rate of hypertension, J. Toxicol.
12	antinociceptive activity of morphine after injection of biogenic amines in the cerebral ventricles of the conscious rat	L' antinociceptive activity of morphine after injection of biogenic amines into conscious rat cerebral ventricles.
12	pharmacological properties of centrally administered ouabain and their modification by other drugs	The pharmacological properties of centrally administered ouabain and their modification by other drugs.
12	effect of frequency of stimulation on the inhibition by noradrenaline of the acetylcholine output from parasympathetic nerve terminals	Effect of frequency of stimulation on apos; norepinephrine inhibition of the production of d' acetylcholine of parasympathetic nerve terminals.
12	evidence for inhibition of the reuptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline by tetrahydronaphthylamine in rat brain	Evidence of the inhibition of the uptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline by tetrahydronaphthylamine in rat brain.
12	effects of progesterone on cardiovascular responses to amines and to sympathetic stimulation in the pithed rat	Effects of progesterone on the cardiovascular responses to amines and to sympathetic stimulation in the decerebrate rat.
12	some neurochemical effects of amphetamine methylamphetamine and p bromomethylamphetamine in the rat	Neurochemical effects of amphetamine methylamphetamine and p bromomethylamphetamine in rats.
12	inhibitory and excitatory effects of sympathomimetic amines on muscle strips from the stomach of the guinea pig	Inhibitory and excitatory effects of sympathomimetic amines on muscle strips of the guinea pig stomach.
12	evidence that angiotensin enhances transmitter release during sympathetic nerve stimulation	Apos; evidence that angiotensin stimulates transmitter release during sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	effect of plus or minus dihydroxy ephedrine and plus or minus dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on adrenergic transmission in mesenteric arteries	Effect of more or less dihydroxy ephedrine and more or less dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on adrenergic transmission in mesenteric arteries.
12	stimulating action of catecholamines on isolated preparations of the rat colon and human and rabbit taeniae coli	Stimulate the action of catecholamines on isolated preparations of rat colon and human and rabbit taeniae coli.
12	evidence for the presence of adrenoceptors in the central thermoregulatory mechanism of rabbits	Evidence for the presence of adrenoceptors in the central thermoregulatory mechanism of rabbits.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation in the rabbit ear artery	Effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn 343 on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation in the apos; rabbit artery.
12	effects of isoxazolium cations on some isolated muscle preparations	Effects of isoxazolium cations on some isolated muscle preparations.
12	effect of central catecholamine alterations on the hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine treated rats	Effect of changes in central catecholamines on the hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine treated rats.
12	mechanism of potentiation of contractor responses to catecholamines by methylxanthines in aortic strips	Mechanisms of potentiation of contractor responses to catecholamines by methylxanthines in aortic bands.
12	thick filaments in vascular smooth muscle	Thick filaments in vascular smooth muscle tissue.
12	central neural regulation by adrenergic nerves of the daily rhythm in hepatic tyrosine transaminase activity	Central neural regulation by adrenergic nerves of the daily rhythm of hepatic tyrosine transaminase.
12	excitatory input from the distal colon to the inferior mesenteric ganglion in the guinea pig	Excitatory intrusion of the distal colon to the inferior mesenteric ganglion in the guinea pig.
12	operant behavior changes norepinephrine metabolism in rat brain	Operating behavior alters norepinephrine metabolism in rat brain.
12	changes in the physiology and fine structure of the taenia of the guinea pig caecum following transplantation into the anterior eye chamber	Changes in the physiology and fine structure of the taenia of the guinea-pig caecum following transplantation into the anterior ocular cavity.
12	brain amine concentrations after monoamine oxidase inhibitor administration	Cerebral amine concentrations after dosing; monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies of the human oviduct	Physiological and pharmacological studies of the human oviduct.
12	thyroid state effects on pre and postsynaptic central noradrenergic mechanisms	Effects of l' thyroid state on the central noradrenergic mechanisms pre and post-synaptic.
12	action of 6 hydroxydopamine on lamb sympathetic ganglia vas deferens and adrenal medulla a combined histochemical ultrastructural and biochemical comparison with the effects of reserpine	L' action of 6 hydroxydopamine on l&apos sympathetic ganglia; lamb, vas deferens, and adrenal medullo were compared with the effects of reserpine histochemically, ultrastructurally, and biochemically.
12	changes in systolic time intervals in acute myocardial infarction	Changes in systolic time intervals in acute myocardial infarction.
12	enhancement of methyldopa metabolism with barbiturate	Increase in methyldopa metabolism with barbiturates.
12	the inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamines on the dog heart	The inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamines on the dog heart.
12	effect of p nitromethylamphetamine on biogenic amines and their amino acid precursors in rat brain	Effect of p nitromethylamphetamine on biogenic amines and their precursors; amino acids in rat brain.
12	a new dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor effects on the noradrenaline concentration and on the action of l dopa in the spinal cord	A new dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor has effects on the concentration of noradrenaline and on the action of dopa in the spinal cord.
12	modification by choline of adrenergic transmission in rat mesenteric arteries	Choline modification of adrenergic transmission in rat mesenteric arteries.
12	monoamine oxidase in sympathetic nerves a transmitter specific enzyme type	The monoamine oxidase in sympathetic nerves is a transmitter-specific enzyme.
12	aortic reactivity and electrophysiology in normotensive rats spontaneously hypertensive rats and rats made hypertensive with desoxycorticosterone plus salt	Aortic reactivity and l' electrophysiology in normotensive rats, in spontaneously hypertensive rats, and in rats made hypertensive by deoxycorticosterone plus salt.
12	action of thymoxamine on mydriasis induced by levodopa and dopamine	The action of thymoxamine on mydriasis induced by levodopa and dopamine.
12	decreased noradrenaline norepinephrine synthesis in familial dysautonomia	Reduced noradrenaline and norepinephrine synthesis in family dysautonomy.
12	reciprocal hunger regulating circuits involving alpha and beta adrenergic receptors located respectively in the ventromedial and lateral hypothalamus	Reciprocal regulatory circuits involving alpha and beta adrenergic receptors located in the apos; ventromedial hypothalamus and lateral hypothalamus respectively.
12	dopamine as a synaptic transmitter and modulator in sympathetic ganglia a different mode of synaptic action	Dopamine as a synaptic transmitter and modulator in sympathetic ganglia has a different mode of synaptic action.
12	inhibition of biogenic amine uptake by hydrogen peroxide a mechanism for toxic effects of 6 hydroxydopamine	The mechanism responsible for the toxic effects of 6 hydroxydopamine is nitrogen; inhibition of apos; absorption of biogenic amines by d*apos peroxide; hydrogen.
12	norepinephrine stinulated increase of cyclic amp levels in developing mouse brain cell cultures	Norepinephrine inhibited apos; increased cyclic light levels in developing mouse brain cell cultures.
12	adrenoceptors in the human foetal small intestine	Adrenoceptors in the human fetal small intestine.
12	catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in nervous tissue of cephalopods	Catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the nervous tissue of the cephalopods.
12	evidence against adrenergic motor transmission in the guinea pig vas deferens	Evidence against adrenergic motor transmission in the guinea pig vas deferens.
12	abnormal hormone responses of an adrenocortical cancer adenyl cyclase	Abnormal hormonal responses to adenocortico cancer adenyl cyclase @-@adrenergic.
12	re investigation of the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on renal function in situ	Review the apos; effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on renal function in situ.
12	the effect of angiotensin noradrenaline and vasopressin on blood flow distribution in the rat kidney	L' effect of norepinephrine angiotensin and vasopressin on blood flow distribution in the rat kidney.
12	peristalsis in the rabbit distal colon	Peristalsis in the rabbit distal colon.
12	melatonin metabolism neural regulation of pineal serotonin acetyl coenzyme a n acetyltransferase activity	Metabolism of melatonin neural regulation of pineal etapos; acetyl serotonergic coenzyme and l' n acetyltransferase activity.
12	acetoxycycloheximide induced transient amnesia protective effects of adrenergic stimulants	L' acetoxycycloheximide induced transient amnesia of protective effects of adrenergic stimulants.
12	inhibition of release of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b hypogastric nerve stimulation exocytosis microtubules microfilaments guinea pig	Inhibition of release of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b, hypogastric nerve stimulation, d&apos microtubules; exocytosis, guinea pig microfilaments.
12	nerve growth factor stimulation of regenerative growth of central noradrenergic neurons	Nerve growth factor stimulation of regenerative growth of central noradrenergic neurons.
12	6 7 dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline uptake and storage by peripheral sympathetic nerve of the rat	Capture and storage of dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline by peripheral sympathetic nerve of rat.
12	effect of blood on the response of the rabbit ear artery to noradrenaline and angiotensin ii	Effect of blood on the response of apos; apos artery; rabbit ear to noradrenaline and apos; angiotensin ii.
12	effect of free fatty acid mobilization on the electrophoretic mobility of alpha lipoproteins in the dog	Effect of free fatty acid mobilization on the electrophoretic mobility of alpha-lipoproteins in dogs.
12	effect of tetrabenazine and alpha methyl m tyrosine on exploratory activity and brain catecholamines in rats	Effect of tetrabenazine and apos; alpha methyl m tyrosine on apos; exploratory activity and brain catecholamines in rat.
12	importance of noradrenaline found in a functional pool in maintaining spontaneous locomotor activity in rats	L' importance of noradrenaline found in a functional pool in apos maintenance; spontaneous locomotor activity in rats was demonstrated.
12	rat superfused aortic strip for the bioassay of noradrenaline and adrenaline	The rat superfused an aortic band for bioassay of noradrenaline and epinephrine.
12	effect of catecholamines on the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations of clonal satellite cells of neurons	The effect of catecholamines on the concentrations of adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate in satellite cells of neurons.
12	enhanced release of dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine and its reversal by prostaglandins	Increased release of dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine and its reversal by prostaglandins.
12	lipolytic response and adenyl cyclase activity of rat adipocytes as related to cell size	The lipolytic response and l' adenyl cyclase activity of rat adipocytes are related to cell size.
12	effects of adrenergic stimulation on ventilation in man	The effects of adrenergic stimulation on ventilation in men.
12	comparison of the hyperglycaemic and glycogenolytic responses to catecholamines with those to stimulation of the hepatic sympathetic innervation in the dog	Comparison of the glycogenolytic and hyperglycemic responses to catecholamines with those to stimulation of the hepatic sympathetic innervation in dogs.
12	uterine blood flow and uterine renin secretion	Uh, uterine blood flow and uterine renin secretion.
12	angiotensin and renin in rat and dog brain	Lapses; angiotensin and renin in rat and dog brain.
12	stimulation by dopamine of adenylate cyclase in retinal homogenates and of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate formation in intact retina	Dopamine stimulation of l' adenylate cyclase in retinal homogenates and of d&apos formation; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in intact retina.
12	assessment of autonomic function in patients with a parkinsonian syndrome	Evaluation of self-sustaining function in patients with Parkinson's Syndrome.
12	ca concentration and flux in ca deprived arteries	Concentration and flux in private arteries ca.
12	adrenal catecholamine secretion during stimulation of the nasal mucous membrane in the rabbit	Adrenal catecholamine secretion during stimulation of the nasal mucosa in rabbits.
12	tone and reactivity of vascular smooth muscle in germfree rat mesentery	The tone and reactivity of vascular smooth muscle in the germless rat mesentery.
12	catecholamine synthesis and excretion in rats exposed intermittently to cold	Catecholamine synthesis and excretion in rats intermittently exposed to cold.
12	lasting biological effects of early environmental influences 8 effects of neonatal infection perinatal malnutrition and crowding on catecholamine metabolism of brain	Sustained biological effects of early stages of the environment influence 8 effects of neonatal infections, perinatal malnutrition and crowding on catecholamine metabolism of the brain.
12	evaluation of mechanisms controlling the release and inactivation of the adrenergic transmitter in the rabbit portal vein and vas deferens	Evaluation of mechanisms controlling the release and inactivation of the adrenergic transmitter in rabbit portal vein and vas deferens.
12	effects of catecholamines and adrenergic blocking agents on plasma and urinary cyclic nucleotides in man	Effects of catecholamines and adrenergic blockers on plasma and urinary cyclic nucleotides in men.
12	norepinephrine and dopamine assay by mass fragmentography in the picomole range	Norepinephrine and dopamine measurements by mass fragmentography in the picomolar range.
12	cardiac responses to thermal physical and emotional stress	Cardiac responses to thermal physical and emotional stress.
12	angiotensin ii like activity in circulating arterial blood in immature and adult rabbits	Angiotensin ii in circulating arterial blood is similar in immature and adult rabbits.
12	glial cell function uptake of transmitter substances	Acceptance of transmitter substances by cellular glial function.
12	regulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentration in cultured human astrocytoma cells by catecholamines and histamine	Regulation of the concentration of d' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in cultured human astrocytoma cells by catecholamines and histamine.
12	plasma catecholamines in long term diabetics with and without neuropathy and in hypophysectomized subjects	Plasma catecholamines in long-term diabetics with and without neuropathy and in hypophysectomized subjects.
12	effects of catecholamines and their interaction with other hormones on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate of the kidney	The effects of catecholamines and their interaction with d' other hormones on d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3-5 of the kidney.
12	release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery	Endogenous noradrenaline release from an isolated muscle artery Release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscle artery.
12	benzodiazepines anxiety reducing activity by reduction of serotonin turnover in the brain	Anxiety-reducing benzodiazepines; activity by reduction of serotonin turnover in brain.
12	dopamine sensitive adenyl cyclase possible role in synaptic transmission	Dopamine-sensitive adenyl cyclase may play a role in synaptic transmission.
12	proportional release of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves	A proportional release of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves.
12	central cholinergic and adrenergic mechanisms in the release of antidiuretic hormone	Central cholinergic and adrenergic mechanisms in the release of antidiuretic hormone.
12	the pharmacology of the rat ureter in vivo	The pharmacology of the rat ureter in vivo.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e 1 and f 2 on the on the perfused vessels of the isolated rabbit ear	The actions of prostaglandins e 1 and f 2 on the perfused vessels of the isolated rabbit ear.
12	effects of amphetamine on the turnover rate of brain catecholamines and motor activity	Effects of amphetamine on the turnover rate of cerebral catecholamines and on motor activity.
12	effect of cigarette smoking on human precapillary sphincters	Effect of cigarette smoking on human precapillary sphincters.
12	effect of amphetamine on the transmission of repetitive impulses through the isolated superior cervical ganglion of the rat	Effect of apos; amphetamine on transmission of repetitive impulses by the isolated superior cervical ganglion of the rat.
12	effects of the inhibition of noradrenaline uptake and synthesis on the maintenance of the response to continuous nerve stimulation in the central artery of the rabbit ear	Effects of apos; inhibition of synthesis and uptake of noradrenaline on the maintenance of the response to continuous nerve stimulation in the apos; central artery of the apos; rabbit ear.
12	the presence of adrenoceptors in the guinea pig seminal vesicle	The presence of adrenoceptors in the guinea pig seminal vesicle.
12	some evidence of the active uptake of noradrenaline in the guinea pig isolated trachea	Some indication of active uptake of noradrenaline in the guinea pig isolated trachea.
12	noradrenaline uptake by non innervated smooth muscle	Noradrenaline uptake by noninnervated smooth muscle was elevated.
12	role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine induced temperature changes in the rat	The role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine induced temperature changes in the rat.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on electrical self stimulation of the brain	The effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on the epos; auto-electrical stimulation of the brain.
12	drug induced changes in the release of 3 h noradrenaline from field stimulated rat iris	The drug induced changes in the release of 3 h of noradrenaline from the field-stimulated rat iris.
12	catecholamines and the hydroxylation of tyrosine in synaptosomes isolated from rat brain	Catecholamines and l' tyrosine hydroxylation in synaptosomes isolated from rat brain.
12	a unique synaptosomal fraction which accumulates glutamic and aspartic acids in brain tissue	A unique synaptosomal fraction which accumulates glutamic and aspartic acids in brain tissue.
12	sympathetic reinnervation of the rat iris in organ culture	It's a good idea to have a nice reinnervation of the rat irises in a culture of organs.
12	purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis interconversion and catabolism in mouse brain in vitro	Purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis interconversion and catabolism in mouse brain in vitro.
12	effect of prostaglandins e 1 e 2 and a 2 on vascular resistance and responses to noradrenaline nerve stimulation and angiotensin in the dog hindlimb	The effect of prostaglandins 1 and 2 on vascular resistance and responses to noradrenaline nerve stimulation and l' angiotensin in the dog hindlimb.
12	the role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in the hyperthermic reaction induced by pethidine in rabbits pretreated with pargyline	The role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in the hyperthermal reaction induced by pethidine in rabbits pretreated with pargyline.
12	the effect of cold storage on the adrenergic mechanisms of intestinal smooth muscle	The effect of cold storage on the adrenergic mechanisms of intestinal smooth muscle.
12	augmentation of drug induced blood pressure increases in rats by amorbarbital	In rats, l' amorbarbital increases blood pressure induced by the drug.
12	effect of synthetic bradykinin on contractile tension of human saphenous vein strips	Effect of synthetic bradykinin on contractile tension of human saphenous vein strips.
12	antagonism of noradrenaline and histamine by desipramine in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	L' antagonism of noradrenaline and apos; histamine by desipramine in the apos; isolated artery of the apos; rabbit ear.
12	on the role of central nervous system catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the nialamide induced behavioural syndrome	About the role of central nervous system catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in nialamide-induced behavioral syndrome.
12	an analysis of central adrenoceptors for control of cardiovascular function	An analysis of central adrenoceptors for control of cardiovascular function.
12	effects of perivascular nerve stimulation on the contraction and automaticity of the blood perfused canine papillary muscle	Epis; a perivascular nerve stimulation on the contraction and apos; automaticity of the canine papillary muscle perfused in the blood.
12	effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and release of noradrenaline from the sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart.
12	pharmacology of ah 5158 a drug which blocks both and adrenoceptors	Pharmacology of ah 5158 a drug which blocks both adrenoceptors and adrenoceptors.
12	central adrenoceptors concerned in the release of adrenocorticotrophic hormone	Central adrenoreceptors involved in the release of l' adrenocorticotrophic hormone.
12	studies of isolated fetal mouse hearts in organ culture evidence for a direct effect of triiodothyronine in enhancing cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine	Studies of isolated fetal mouse hearts in organ cultures demonstrated a direct effect of triiodothyronine on cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine.
12	studies of blood flow in aorta to coronary venous bypass grafts in man	Studies of blood flow in the aorta to coronary venous bypass in men.
12	water soluble derivatives of 1 tetrahydrocannabinol	Water-soluble derivatives of 1 tetrahydrocannabinol.
12	degeneration of sympathetic nerves in vitro and development of smooth muscle supersensitivity to noradrenaline	Degeneration of sympathetic nerves in vitro and development of the smooth muscle hypersensitivity to noradrenaline.
12	deficits in feeding behavior after intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Insufficient feeding behaviour after intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine in the rat.
12	rat fighting behavior serum dopamine hydroxylase and hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase	Fighting behavior in serum dopamine hydroxylase and hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase rats.
12	hypothalamic norepinephrine circadian rhythms and the control of feeding behavior	Hypothalamic norepinephrine circadian rhythms and control of feeding behavior.
12	control of circadian change of serotonin n acetyltransferase activity in the pineal organ by the beta adrenergic receptor	Control of circadian variation of the apos; serotonin n acetyltransferase activity in the apos; pineal organ by the beta-adrenergic receptor.
12	the use of dopamine hydroxylase as a marker for the central noradrenergic nervous system in rat brain	L' use of dopamine hydroxylase as a marker for the central noradrenergic system in rat brain.
12	mechanism of effect of alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine on renal water excretion	Mechanisms of onset; effect of alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine on apos; excretion of apos; renal water.
12	preliminary observations on the mechanical and electrical activity of the rat ureter	Preliminary observations on the mechanical and electrical activity of rat ureter.
12	6 hydroxydopa depletion of brain norepinephrine and the function of aggressive behavior	Six hydroxydopa depletion of brain norepinephrine and aggressive behavior.
12	rapid axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase in relation to other cytoplasmic constituents	Fast axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase to other cytoplasmic components.
12	tyrosine hydroxylase in human adrenal and pheochromocytoma localization kinetics and catecholamine inhibition	Tyrosine hydroxylase in human adrenal and pheochromocytoma localization kinetics and catecholamine inhibition.
12	inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in vas deferens by indirectly acting sympathomimetic drugs	L' inhibition of ganglionic post-ganglionic motor transmission in vas deferens by indirectly acting sympathomimetic drugs.
12	constrictor and compliance responses of some arteries to nerve or drug stimulation	Constrictor responses and adherence of some arteries to nerve or drug stimulation.
12	eating caused by 6 hydroxydopamine induced release of noradrenaline in the diencephalon of the rat	L' ingestion of 6 hydroxydopamine caused release of noradrenaline in the diencephalon of the rat.
12	differences in sensitivity to vasoconstrictor drugs within the wall of the sheep carotid artery	Differences in sensitivity to vasoconstrictor drugs in the wall of the ewe carotid artery.
12	some observations on the intrinsic nervous mechanism in hirschsprung s disease	Some observations on the intrinsic nervous mechanism of hirschsprung s disease.
12	the effect of efferent discharges in renal nerves on the activity of arterial mechanoreceptors in the kidney in rabbit	The effect of efferent discharges in the renal nerves on the apos; activity of arterial mechanoreceptors in the kidney in rabbits.
12	noradrenaline nerve terminals in human cerebral cortices first histochemical evidence	The nerve terminals of noradrenaline in human cerebral cortices are the first histochemical evidence.
12	possible mechanism for the antiarrhythmic effect of helium in anesthetized dogs	Possible mechanisms; antiarrhythmic effect of helium in anesthetized dogs.
12	axonal transport of dopamine hydroxylase by human sural nerves in vitro	In vitro axonal transport of dopamine hydroxylase by human supernerves.
12	interactions between sympathomimetic amines and antidepressant agents in man	Human interactions between sympathomimetic amines and antidepressants.
12	a neuronal basis for the alerting action of amphetamine	A neural basis for apos; action of apos; apos alert; amphetamine.
12	the rat anococcygeus muscle and its response to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	The rat anococcygeus muscle and its response to nerve stimulation and certain drugs.
12	studies of the interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamine and the perivascular innervation of the guinea pig caecum	Studies of l' interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamine and l' perivascular innervation of the guinea pig cecum.
12	a comparison of the pharmacological and biochemical properties of substrate selective monoamine oxidase inhibitors	Comparison of the pharmacological and biochemical properties of the selective monoamine oxidase inhibitors as substrate.
12	the nature of the adrenoceptors in the post partum rat uterus	The nature of the adrenoceptors in the rat uterus post @-@partum.
12	effects of a false neurotransmitter p hydroxynorephedrine on the function of adrenergic neurons in hypertensive patients	Effects of apos; a false neurotransmitter p hydroxynorephedrine on the function of adrenergic neurons in hypertensive patients.
12	evidence for stimulation of renal gluconeogenesis by catecholamines	Evidence of stimulation of renal gluconeogenesis by catecholamines.
12	central noradrenergic neurones and the cardiovascular actions of clonidine in the rabbit	The central noradrenergic neurons and the cardiovascular actions of clonidine in the rabbit.
12	effect of centrally acting drugs on the uptake of gamma aminobutyric acid gaba by slices of rat cerebral cortex	Effect of drugs with central action on apo; absorption of gamma aminobutyric acid gaba by slices of rat cerebral cortex.
12	a comparison of the effects of chemical sympathectomy by 6 hydroxydopamine in newborn and adult rats	Comparison of the effects of d' chemical sympathectomy by 6 hydroxydopamine in newborn and adult rats.
12	the effect of immunosympathectomy and of 6 hydroxydopamine on the responses of the rat anococcygeus to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	L' effect of apos; immunosympathectomy and 6 hydroxydopamine on the responses of the rat anococcygeus muscle to nerve stimulation and certain drugs.
12	interaction of bretylium and guanethidine on the relaxations of the rat isolated fundal strip preparation evoked by indirect stimulation	Interaction of bretylium and guanethidine on the relaxations of the indirect stimulation-evoked isolated rat flute preparation.
12	effects of histamine on hepatic volume outflow block in anaesthetized dogs	Effects of apos; histamine on hepatic volume flow block in anesthetized dogs.
12	structure activity relations for the inhibition of catecholamine uptake into synaptosomes from noradrenaline and dopaminergic neurones in rat brain homogenates	Structure activity relationships for the inhibition of catecholamine uptake in synaptosomes from noradrenaline and dopaminergic neurones in rat brain homogenates.
12	the separation of epinephrine from norepinephrine and dopamine from dopa on sephadex g 10	Separation of epinephrine from norepinephrine and dopamine from dopa on Sephadex g 10.
12	permanent alterations in catecholamine concentrations in discrete areas of brain in the offspring of rats treated with methylamphetamine and chlorpromazine	Permanent changes in catecholamine concentrations in distinct areas of the brain in the offspring of rats treated with methylamphetamine and chlorpromazine.
12	differential labelling of intraneuronal noradrenaline stores with different concentrations of 3h noradrenaline	Differential labelling of intraneuronal noradrenaline stores with different concentrations of noradrenaline 3 h.
12	dopaminergic and noradrenergic substrates of positive reinforcement differential effects of d and l amphetamine	Dopaminergic and noradrenergic substrates of differential effects of positive reinforcement of d and l amphetamines.
12	noradrenergic stimulation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in rat purkinje neurons an immunocytochemical study	Noradrenergic stimulation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in rat purkinje neurons, immunocytochemical study.
12	depressor responses to spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Depressive responses to spinal stimulation in the spinal cord rat.
12	comparison of the dose response effects of morphine on brain amines analgesia and activity in mice	Comparison of the dose response of morphine to analgesia and lacidosis; brain amine activity in mice.
12	assessment of the effectiveness of adrenoceptor blocking agents towards cardiac and bronchiolar responses of the pithed guinea pig to electrical stimulation of the spinal outflow	Evaluating the efficacy of adrenoceptor blocking agents on the cardiac and bronchiolar responses of the decerebrate guinea pig to electrical stimulation of the spinal flow.
12	feeding produced in the satiated rat by elevating the concentration of calcium in the brain	Food produced in the satiated rat by increasing the calcium concentration in the brain.
12	secretion of dopa in phaeochromocytoma	The secretion of dopa in the phaeochromocytoma.
12	effect of catecholamines on the bactericidal activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes	The effect of catecholamines on the apos; the bactericidal activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
12	histochemical localization of adrenergic nerves in the guinea pig trachea	Histochemical localization of adrenergic nerves in the guinea pig trachea.
12	an assessment of sympathetic function in isolated tissues from mice given nerve growth factor antiserum and 6 hydroxydopamine	Evaluation of sympathetic function in isolated tissues of mice treated with nerve growth factor antiserum and 6 hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of drugs and of electrical stimulation on the muscularis mucosae of rabbit large intestine	The effects of drugs and electrical stimulation on the muscle mucosa of the rabbit large intestine.
12	effects of oxyfedrine on isolated portal vein and other smooth muscles	Effects of apos; oxyfedrin on isolated portal vein and other smooth muscles.
12	dopamine mediator of brain polysome disaggregation after l dopa	Dopaminergic mediator of brain polysomal disintegration after dopa l.
12	cardiovascular effects of amphetamine in the horse	Cardiovascular effects of amphetamine on horse.
12	the role of circulating catecholamines in sweat production in man	The role of circulating catecholamines in sweat production in men.
12	functional relationship of longitudinal and circular layers of the muscularis externa of the rabbit large intestine	Functional relationships between the longitudinal and circular layers of the muscularis externa of the large intestine of rabbit.
12	biologically active catecholamines covalentyly bound to glass beads	The biologically active catecholamines are covalently bound to glass beads.
12	accumulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in clonal glial cells labeling of intracellular adenine nucleotides with radioactive adenine	L' accumulation of apos; cyclic adenosine 3,5 cyclic monophosphate in clonal glia labeled the apos nucleotides; intracellular adenine with radioactive adenosine.
12	axonal sprouts and 3 h norepinephrine uptake by superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	In organ cultures, axonal germ and 3 h norepinephrine uptake by superior cervical ganglia are present.
12	role of brain monoamines in the fatal hyperthermia induced by pethidine or imipramine in rabbits pretreated with a monoamine oxidase inhibitor	Role of cerebral monoamines in apos; fatal hyperthermia induced by pethidine or lacidosis; imipramine in rabbits pretreated with a monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
12	effect of depletion of cerebral monoamines on the concentration of glycogen and on amphetamine induced glycogenolysis in the brain	Effect of depletion of cerebral monoamines on glycogen concentration and on glycogenolysis induced by apos; amphetamine in the brain.
12	effect of long term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on sperm transport and fertility of rats	Apos effect; long term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on sperm transport and rat fertility.
12	myogenic peristalsis in isolated preparations of chicken oesophagus	Myogenic peristalsis in isolated preparations of chicken oesophagus.
12	a tion of drugs on denervated myoepithelial cells of salivary glands	An amount of drugs on denervated myoepithelial cells of salivary glands.
12	impaired learning and decreased cortical norepinephrine after bilateral locus coeruleus lesions	Learning and depression of cortical norepinephrine after bilateral locus coeruleus lesions.
12	the effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline on pentagastrin stimulated gastric acid secretion and mucosal blood flow in the dog	The effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline on pentagastrin stimulated gastric acid secretion and mucous blood flow in the dog.
12	a comparison of the excitatory and inhibitory effects of non adrenergic non cholinergic nerve stimulation and exogenously applied atp on a variety of smooth muscle preparations from different vertebrate species	Comparison of the excitatory and inhibitory effects of apos; non-adrenergic, noncholinergic nerve stimulation and apos; an exogenous application of apos; atp on various smooth muscle preparations of different vertebrate species.
12	the nature of adrenergic mechanisms involved in anaphylatoxin activity in the guinea pig	The nature of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in anaphylatoxin activity in the guinea pig.
12	acceleration of catecholamine biosynthesis in sympathetically innervated tissues by angiotensin ii amide	L' angiotensin ii amide accelerates catecholamine biosynthesis in sympathetically innervated tissue.
12	stimulation of the production of unesterified fatty acids in nerve endings of guinea pig brain in vitro by noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Stimulation of d&apos production; nonesterified fatty acids in nerve endings of guinea pig brain in vitro by noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine.
12	vascular responses in the hands of patients suffering from migraine	The vascular responses in the hands of migraine patients.
12	facilitation of recovery by methyl p tyrosine after lateral hypothalamic damage	Recovery facilitated by methyl p tyrosine after lateral hypothalamic injury.
12	spontaneous activity in isolated bovine mesenteric lymphatics	Spontaneous activity in isolated bovine mesenteric lymphatics.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the storage and release of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	An electrophysiological analysis of the storage and release of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the uptake of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	An electrophysiological analysis of the uptake of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals.
12	potentiation of the contractile effects of norepinephrine by hypoxia	The potentiation of the contractile effects of norepinephrine by hypoxia.
12	glyceride lipases in nerve endings of guinea pig brain and their stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and adrenaline	Glyceride lipases in nerve terminals of guinea pig brain and their stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and l' adrenaline.
12	the interaction of catecholamines and adrenal corticosteroids in the induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and adipose tissue	L' interaction of catecholamines and adrenal corticosteroids in the liver; induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and adipose tissue.
12	effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in combination with and receptor blocking substances on the action potential of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effects of noradrenaline and apos; isoprenaline, combined with receptor blocking substances, on the potential of apos; action of cardiac purkinje fibres.
12	selective inhibition of angiotensin pressor responses in the pithed rat by tetraethylthiuram disulphide disulfiram and sodium diethyldithiocarbamate ddc	Selective inhibition of angiotensin pressor responses in the rat decerebrown by tetraethylthiuram disulfide disulfiram and sodium diethyldithiocarbamate dcd.
12	effect of sympathomimetic drugs in eliciting hypertensive responses to reserpine in the rat after pretreatment with monoamineoxidase inhibitors	Effect of sympathomimetic drugs on hypertensive responses to reserpine in the rat after pretreatment with inhibitors of monoamine-oxidase.
12	long lasting peripheral and central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Long-term peripheral and central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats.
12	effects of formyl tetrahydrofolic acid and noradrenaline on the oxygen consumption of rat brain synaptosome mitochondrial preparations	Effects of apos; formyltetrahydrofolic acid and noradrenaline on the consumption of apos; oxygen from rat brain synaptosomal mitochondrial preparations.
12	clinical investigation of an antagonist at alpha and beta adrenoceptors ah5158a	Clinical examination of an antagonist of the alpha and beta receptors ah5158a.
12	comparison of blockade at alpha adrenoceptors by thymoxamine and phentolamine in peripheral arteries and veins of man	Comparison of blockade of alpha-adrenoceptors by thymoxamine and phentolamine in peripheral arteries and veins of men.
12	dopaminergic terminals in the rat cortex	Dopaminergic endpoints in the rat cortex.
12	dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in caudate nucleus of rat brain and its similarity to the dopamine receptor	Dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in caudate nucleus of rat brain and its similarity to dopaminergic receptor.
12	induction and superinduction of serotonin n acetyltransferase by adrenergic drugs and denervation in rat pineal organ	Induction and superinduction of serotonin n acetyltransferase by adrenergic drugs and denervation in a rat pineal organ.
12	changes in human plasma catecholamines and dopamine beta hydroxylase produced by prostaglandin f2 alpha	Changes in human plasma catecholamines and dopamine beta hydroxylase produced by prostaglandin f2 alpha.
12	adaptation of the adrenal medulla sustained increase in choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation	L' adaptation of the adrenal medulla maintained apos; increase of choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation.
12	biochemical evidence of anxiety in dental patients	Biochemical evidence of anxiety in dental patients.
12	dopamine beta hydroxylase evidence for increased activity in sympathetic neurons during psychotic states	L' increased dopamine beta hydroxylase activity in sympathetic neurons during psychotic states was demonstrated.
12	effects of clonidine withdrawal possible mechanisms and suggestions for management	Effects of clonidine withdrawal possible mechanisms and suggestions for management.
12	effects of catecholamines and adenosine derivatives given into the brain of fowls	The effects of catecholamines and derivatives of the adenosine given in the brain of poultry.
12	effect of drugs on the synthesis of noradrenaline in guinea pig vas deferens	Effect of drugs on the synthesis of noradrenaline in guinea pig vas deferens.
12	effects of clozapine on cerebral catecholaminergic neurone systems	Effects of clozapine on cerebral catecholaminergic neural system.
12	a new example of a morphine sensitive neuro effector junction adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens	A new example of adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens; a morphine-sensitive neurological effector in the mouse vas deferens.
12	cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in cloned astrocytoma cells norepinephrine induces a specific enzyme form	Apos phosphodiesterase; cyclic ampulla in cloned astrocytoma cells Norepinephrine induces a specific enzyme form.
12	maturation of responsiveness to cardioactive drugs differential effects of acetylcholine norepinephrine theophylline tyramine glucagon and dibutyryl cyclic amp on atrial rate in hearts of fetal mice	Maturity of responsiveness to cardioactive drugs Differential effects of l' acetylcholine norepinephrine theophylline tyramine glucagon and dibutyryl cyclic amp on atrial frequency in the hearts of fetal mice.
12	the adrenergic control of lower esophageal sphincter function an experimental model of denervation supersensitivity	The adrenergic control of the lower esophageal sphincter functions as an experimental model of denervation hypersensitivity.
12	dopamine synthesis stimulation by a hypothalamic factor	Stimulation of dopamine synthesis by a hypothalamic factor.
12	a comparison of the effects of adenosine triphosphate with noradrenaline and with the inhibitory potential of the guinea pig taenia coli	Comparison of the effects of adenosine triphosphate with noradrenaline and the inhibitory effect of guinea pig taenia coli.
12	the effect of tranquillizing drugs on the concentration of the sulphate ester of 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenylethane 1 2 diol in rat brain	Effect of tranquilizing drugs on the concentration of the sulfate ester of 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenylethane 2 diol in rat brain.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e2 and f2alpha on human foetal intestine	The actions of prostaglandins e2 and f2alpha on the human fetal intestine.
12	morphine and neurotransmitter substances microiontophoretic study in the rat brain stem	Morphine and neurotransmitters study microiontophoretics in the rat brain stem.
12	transmission to the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig vas deferens the effect of pretreatment with guanethidine	The transmission of guanethidine to the longitudinal muscle of the vas deferens of guinea pigs.
12	hyperactivity and brain catecholamines in lead exposed developing rats	The hyperactivity and brain catecholamines in lead exposed developing rats.
12	the effects of dopamine on cardiogenic and endotoxin experimental shock	The effects of dopamine on cardiogenic and endotoxic experimental shock.
12	mechanism of suppression of vasopressin during alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine	Norepinephrine alpha adrenergic stimulation vasopressin suppression mechanisms.
12	effects of pyridoxine deficiency and dl p chlorophenylalanine administration to rats on 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline concentrations in brain and 5 hydroxytryptamine concentration in blood	Apos; pyridoxine deficiency and apos; chlorophenylalanine administered to rats on 5 concentrations of apos; hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in brain and 5 concentrations of apos; hydroxytryptamine in blood.
12	specific leukocyte receptors for small endogenous hormones detection by cell binding to insolubilized hormone preparations	Specific leukocyte receptors for the detection of small endogenous hormones by cell binding to insolubilized hormone preparations.
12	acute parathyroid hormone response to epinephrine in vivo	Acute parathyroid hormone response to epinephrine in vivo.
12	norepinephrine uptake into cerebral cortical synaptosomes after one fight or electroconvulsive shock	Norepinephrine uptake in cerebral cortical synaptosomes after electroconvulsive shock or struggle.
12	systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks and the consequences of their denervation on some cardiovascular responses to diving	Systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks and the consequences of their denervation on certain cardiovascular responses to diving.
12	interaction of amphetamine with cerebral dopaminergic neurones in two strains of mice that show different temperature responses to this drug	Apos interaction; amphetamine with cerebral dopaminergic neurons of two strains of mice that show different thermal responses to this drug.
12	the effects of drugs on the sensitivity of the rat anococcygeus muscle to agonists	The effects of the drugs on the sensitivity of the rat anococcygeus muscle to agonists.
12	comparison of effects of six cholinomimetic drugs on inhibition of uptake of 3 h noradrenaline by guinea pig atria	Comparison of effects of six cholinomimetic drugs on apos; inhibition of noradrenaline uptake by guinea pig atria 3 h.
12	electrophysiology of cardiac function in teleosts cholinergically mediated inhibition and rebound excitation	Cholinergy-mediated inhibition and rebound excitation of cardiac function in teleosts.
12	plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase a possible aid in the study and evaluation of hypertension	Plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase could aid in the study and evaluation of apos; high blood pressure.
12	the accumulation and metabolism of noradrenaline by cells in culture	L' accumulation and metabolism of noradrenaline by the cells in culture.
12	adrenergic control of tendon jerk reflexes in man	The adrenergic control of tendon twitch reflexes in men.
12	the effect of desensitization to adenosine triphosphate on the peristaltic reflex in guinea pig ileum	Effect of desensitization adenosine triphosphate on the peristaltic reflex in the guinea pig ileum.
12	supersensitivity and subsensitivity of the beta adrenergic receptor in pineal gland regulated by catecholamine transmitter	Hypersensitivity and subsensitivity of the beta-adrenergic receptor in the pineal gland regulated by a transmitter of catecholamines.
12	effects of dobutamine on left ventricular performance coronary dynamics and distribution of cardiac output in conscious dogs	Effects of dobutamine on coronary dynamics in left ventricular performance and distribution of cardiac output in conscious dogs.
12	the response to distension of the pulmonary vein left atrial junctions in dogs with spinal section	The response to distension of the left atrial junctions of the pulmonary vein in dogs with a spinal section.
12	failure to confirm cyclic amp as second messenger for norepinephrine in rat cerebellum	Failing to confirm that the cyclic ampoule is the second messenger of norepinephrine in rat cerebellum.
12	binding of catecholamines to connective tissue and the effect upon the responses of blood vessels to noradrenaline and to nerve stimulation	The binding of catecholamines to connective tissue and l' effect on the responses of blood vessels to noradrenaline and nerve stimulation.
12	acidaemia produced by spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Acidemia caused by spinal stimulation in the spinal cord rat.
12	effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine implanted in the median eminence on the estrous cycle of the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine implanted in the epitome; median eminence on the estrous cycle of the rat.
12	catecholamine uptake in cerebral cortex adaptive change induced by fighting	Catecholamine uptake in cerebral adaptive cortex.
12	the maturation of neuromuscular function in a multiply innervated structure development of the longitudinal smooth muscle of the foetal mammalian gut and its cholinergic excitatory adrenergic inhibitory and non adrenergic inhibitory innervation	The maturation of neuromuscular function in the development of a multiple innervated structure of the longitudinal smooth muscle of the fetal mammalian intestine and its inhibitory adrenergic, cholinergic, and nonadrenergic inhibitory innervation.
12	3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release evoked by electrical field stimulation perivascular nerve stimulation and nicotine from the taenia of the guinea pig caecum	Three-h nucleotide release from d' adenine and three-h noradrenaline, induced by electrical field stimulation of the perivascular nerve and nicotine from the taenia of the guinea pig caecum.
12	effects of biogenic amines on central thermoresponsive neurones in the rabbit	Effects of biogenic amines on central thermoresponsive neurons in the rabbit.
12	enzyme release from polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomes regulation by autonomic drugs and cyclic nucleotides	Enzyme release from polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomes by both autonomic drugs and cyclic nucleotides.
12	modification of the responses of brain stem neurones to transmitter substances by anaesthetic agents	Modification of the responses of neurons in the brainstem to transmitters by anaesthetic agents.
12	nerve mediated inhibition of mechanical activity in rabbit duodenum and the effects of desensitization to adenosine and several of its derivatives	Nerve-mediated inhibition of l' mechanical activity in rabbit duodenum and effects of desensitization to adenosine and several of its derivatives.
12	thermogenic alterations in the woman i interaction of amines ovulation and basal body temperature	Thermogenic changes in apo; apo interaction; amine ovulation and basal body temperature in women i.
12	a new enzymatic assay for guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and its application to the ductus deferens of the rat	A new enzyme assay for guanosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate and its application to the rat vas deferens.
12	correlation of the directly observed responses of mesenteric vessles of the rat to nerve stimulation and noradrenaline with the distribution of adrenergic nerves	Correlation between the directly observed responses of the rat mesenteric to nerve stimulation and noradrenaline and the distribution of adrenergic nerves.
12	characterization of a unique muscle cell line	Characterization of a unique muscle cell line.
12	resolution of three distinct populations of nerve endings from rat brain homogenates by zonal isopycnic centrifugation	Solution of three distinct populations of nerve terminals of rat brain homogenates by isopycnic zonal centrifugation.
12	the influence of centrally applied noradrenaline on shivering and body temperature in the pigeon	L' influence of centrally applied noradrenaline on shivering and body temperature in the pigeon.
12	the importance of central adrenergic neurones in renal hypertension in rabbits	L' importance of central adrenergic neurons in apos; renal hypertension in rabbits.
12	neurochemical correlate of a spatial preference in rats	Neurochemical correlation of apo; spatial preference in rats.
12	an inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in the mammalian vas deferens by d lysergic acid diethylamide	An inhibition of post-ganglionic motor transmission in the mammalian vas deferens by dysergic acid diethylamide.
12	demonstration of dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in malignant neuroblastoma cells and change in sensitivity of adenylate cyclase to catecholamines in differentiated cells	Demonstration of apos; dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in malignant neuroblastoma cells and modification of l&apos sensitivity; adenylate cyclase to catecholamines in differentiated cells.
12	biogenic amines and control of melanophore stimulating hormone release	Biogenic amine and control of release of melanophore-stimulating hormones.
12	biogenic amines in cultured neuroblastoma and astrocytoma cells	Biogenic amines in cultured neuroblastoma and d' astrocytoma.
12	lowering of kininogen in rat blood by adrenaline and its inhibition by sympatholytic agents heparin and aspirin	The reduction of kininogen in rat blood by adrenaline and its inhibition by sympatholytic heparin and aspirin.
12	pineal gland 24 hour rhythm in norepinephrine turnover	Twenty-four hour pineal rhythm in norepinephrine turnover rate.
12	norepinephrine sensitive adenylate cyclases in rat brain relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase	Norepinephrine sensitive adenylate cyclases in rat brain in relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase.
12	lysosomal physiology in tetrahymena 3 pharmacological studies on acid hydrolase release and the ingestion and egestion of dimethylbenzanthracene particles	Lysosomal physiology in tetrahymena 3 pharmacological studies on acid hydrolase release and apos; ingestion and apos; emesis of dimethylbenzanthracene particles.
12	monoamine oxidase and cerebral uptake of dopaminergic drugs	Uh, monoamine oxidase and cerebral uptake of dopaminergic drugs.
12	primary cultures of dissociated sympathetic neurons ii initial studies on catecholamine metabolism	Primary cultures of dissociated sympathetic neurons ii Initial catecholamine metabolism studies.
12	studies of the mechanism of oliguria in a model of unilateral acute renal failure	Investigation of the mechanism of oliguria in an acute unilateral renal failure model.
12	fluid replacement monitoring effect of dextran overload norepinephrine drip and positive pressure ventilation on systemic arterial right atrial pulmonary wedge and left atrial pressures in dogs	Effects of norepinephrine infusion and positive pressure ventilation on the right atrial lung corner and left atrial pressures in dogs; systemic arterial artery.
12	the cardiovascular effects of morphine the peripheral capacitance and resistance vessels in human subjects	The cardiovascular effects of morphine peripheral capacitance and resistance vessels in human subjects.
12	adrenergic coagulation and fibrinolytic responses to heat	Acute adrenergic coagulation and fibrinolytic responses to heat.
12	cardiovascular responses to noradrenaline in the rat before and after administration of various anaesthetics	The cardiovascular responses to noradrenaline in the rat before and after dosing; administration of various anesthetics.
12	oestrogen induced sensitization of the uterine artery of the guinea pig to acetylcholine	L'estrogen induced sensitization of the uterine artery of the guinea pig to acetylcholine.
12	effects of narcotic analgesics and their antagonists on the rabbit isolated heart and its adrenergic nerves	Effects of narcotic analgesics and their antagonists on rabbit isolated heart and its adrenergic nerves.
12	3h adenosine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline uptake by cold stored guinea pig taenia caecum mechanical effects and release of 3h adenosine nucleotide by noradrenaline papaverine and nitroglycerine	Nucleotide d' adenosine 3 h and noradrenaline uptake 3 h by mechanical effects of cold stored guinea pig taenia caecum and nucleotide release d' adenosine 3 h by noradrenaline papaverine and nitroglycerine.
12	kinetics of the release of noradrenaline from micropipettes interaction between ejecting and retaining currents	The kinetics of release of noradrenaline from micropipettes interaction between ejection and retention currents.
12	some actions of sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on mouse superfused ileum	Some actions of sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on mouse superfused ileum.
12	inhibition of noradrenaline release by lysergic acid diethylamide	L' inhibition of noradrenaline release by lysergic acid.
12	monoamine oxidase in rat arteries evidence for different forms and selective localization	Monoamine oxidase in rat arteries shows the existence of different forms and d' selective localization.
12	interaction between tyramine and iproniazid on guinea pig atria	Interaction between tyramine and iproniazide on guinea pig atrium.
12	current spread in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	The current spreads in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta.
12	interventions with drugs on blood deposits	Interventions with drugs on blood deposits.
12	the uptake of norepinephrine by rat uterine subepithelial cells under normal and experimental conditions	The uptake of norepinephrine by rat epithelial uterine-cells under normal and experimental conditions.
12	the effect of shock on the inflammatory response a reevaluation of the role of platelets in the active arthus reaction	The effect of shock on the inflammatory response was a reassessment of the role of platelets in active osteoarthritis.
12	ultrastructural and histochemical study of the adrenal medulla in normal and cold stressed syrian hamsters	Ultrastructural and histochemical study of the adrenal medulla in normal and cold-stressed Syrian hamsters.
12	effect of acylation with eleostearic acids on the monoamine oxidase inhibitory potency of some hydrazine antidepressants in mice	Effect of apos; acylation by fatty acids on the inhibitory effect of monoamine oxidase on certain apos antidepressants; hydrazine in mice.
12	absence of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone lh rh from catecholaminergic neurons	Absence of apo; apo release hormone; luteinizing hormone lh rh in catecholaminergic neurons.
12	vascular responses to anaesthetic agents	Vascular reactions to anaesthetic agents.
12	vasopressors for treating shock	Vasopressors for the shock treatment.
12	studies on the metabolism of catecholamines in the central nervous system of the mouse	Studies of the metabolism of catecholamines in the central nervous system of the mouse.
12	modification by drugs of the secretagogue effect of dopamine on the pancrease	Drug-induced alteration of dopamine; the secretagogue effect of dopamine on the pancreas.
12	measurement of renal blood flow with the anger scintillation camera after selective intra arterial injections of 133xenon and 99mtechnetium	Measurement of renal blood flow with the anger scintillation camera after intra--selective arterial injections of 133xenon and 99mtechnetium.
12	angiographic technique in assessment of renal mass lesions	Apos angiographic technique; assessment of renal mass damage.
12	effect of p chlorophenylalanine on brain monoamines and behaviour during ethanol withdrawal in mice	Effect of p chlorophenylalanine on brain monoamines and behaviour during l' ethanol in mice.
12	biogenic amines and head twitches in mice during ethanol withdrawal	Biogenic amine and head convulsions in mice during ethanol withdrawal.
12	pharmacological observations on the hypotensive action of extracts of teleost fish urophyses urotensin i in the rat	Pharmacological observations on the hypotensive action of extracts of urophyses urotensin and urophyses of fishes in rats.
12	on the mechanism of action of clonidine effects on single central neurones	On the mechanism of d' action of clonidine effects on single central neurons.
12	variation in noradrenaline output with changes in stimulus frequency and train length role of different noradrenaline pools	Changes in the production of noradrenaline as a function of stimulus frequency and train length in different noradrenaline pools.
12	a new approach to the measurement and classification of forms of supersensitivity of autonomic effector responses	A new approach to the measurement and classification of self-contained effector response patterns.
12	investigations on the mode of action of ergotamine in the isolated femoral vein of the dog	Examine the mode of action of ergotamine in the isolated femoral vein of the dog.
12	sensitization of noradrenaline responses by inhibitors of extraneuronal uptake in a coronary artery preparation	The sensitization of responses to noradrenaline by inhibitors of extraneuronal uptake in a coronary artery preparation.
12	the action of indoramin and other compounds on the uptake of neurotransmitters into rat cortical slices	L' action of l' indoramine and d' other compounds on the apos; absorption of neurotransmitters in rat cortical slices.
12	the cardiovascular effects of l dopa in the pithed rat	The cardiovascular effects of dopa l in the spinal cord rat.
12	evidence for participation of catecholamines in cardiac action of ouabain positive chronotropic effect	Evidence of participation of catecholamines in apos; cardiac action of apos; positive chronotropic effect of ouabain.
12	effects of catecholamines on thermoregulation in pigeons	Effects of catecholamines on thermoregulation in pigeons.
12	modification of responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation by the renin angiotensin system in rats	Modification of responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation by the renin-angiotensin system in rats.
12	actions of putative transmitters in the chicken vagus nerve oesophagus and remak nerve rectum preparations	Action of putative transmitters in the chicken vagus nerve esophagus and remakes nerve rectum preparations.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on 3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release from the guinea pig taenia caecum evoked by electrical field stimulation nicotine and perivascular nerve stimulation	Effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on the 3 h nucleotide adenine and 3 h noradrenaline release from guinea pig taenia caecum evoked by nicotine electric field stimulation and perivascular nerve stimulation.
12	a vasodilator innervation to the central artery of the rabbit ear	Vasodilator innervation of the central artery of the apos; rabbit ear.
12	selective parasympathectomy of the heart	A selective parasympathectomy of the heart.
12	the effects of indomethacin and eicosa 5 8 11 14 tetraynoic acid on the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation	The effects of eicosa 5, 8, 11 and 14 tetraynoic acid on the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation.
12	mechanism of catecholamine antagonism in rat heart produced by pilocarpine and related drugs	Apos mechanisms; catecholamine antagonism in rat heart produced by pilocarpine and related drugs.
12	the effects of acutely administered analgesics on the turnover of noradrenaline and dopamine in various regions of the rat brain	The effects of acutely administered analgesics on the turnover of noradrenaline and dopamine in various regions of the rat brain.
12	effect of sympathomimetic amines on the histamine forming capacity of human leucocytes	Effect of sympathomimetic amines on the ability of human leukocytes to form histamine.
12	the effect of delta1 tetrahydrocannabinol on the release of 3h noradrenaline from the isolated vas deferens of the rat	L' effect of delta1 tetrahydrocannabinol on the release of 3h noradrenaline from the isolated vas deferens of the rat.
12	significance of plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as an index of sympathetic neuronal function	Importance of plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as an index of sympathetic neuronal function.
12	catecholamine levels in the injured spinal cord of monkeys	Acute catecholamine levels in the spinal cord of injured monkeys.
12	coexistence of several putative neurotransmitters in single identified neurons of aplysia	The coexistence of several putative neurotransmitters in single neurons identified from l'apos; aplysia.
12	in vitro interaction of prostaglandin f2alpha and oxytocin in placental vessels	In vitro interaction of prostaglandin f2alpha and l' oxytocin in placental vessels.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to the serotonin receptor a possible site of action of lysergic acid diethylamide	Serotonin-sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to the serotonin receptor, a d&apos site; possible action of lysergic acid.
12	alteration of vein cyclic 3 5 nucleotide concentrations during changes in contractility	Changes in venous cyclic nucleotide concentrations at 35 during changes in contractility.
12	vascular reactivity in spontaneously hypertensive normotensive and hypotensive rats	Vascular reactivity in spontaneously hypertensive normotensive and hypotensive rats.
12	the use of stereotactic dissection followed by fluorimetric assay to determine the distribution of noradrenaline dopamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the preoptic hypothalamic area of rabbit brain an alternative approach to histochemistry	A stereotactic dissection followed by a fluorimetric test to determine the distribution of noradrenaline dopamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the preoptic hypothalamic area of rabbit brain, an alternative approach to histochemistry.
12	effects of vinblastine on noradrenergic axons	The effects of vinblastine on noradrenergic axons.
12	mechanism of the pro inflammatory activity of sympathomimetic amines in thermic oedema of the rat paw	Mechanisms; pro-inflammatory activity of sympathomimetic amines in the apos; thermal edema of the rat paw.
12	effect of selective destruction of central and peripheral catecholamine containing neurones with 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine excretion in the rat	Effect of selective destruction of central and peripheral catecholamine containing neurons with 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine excretion in the rat.
12	thermoregulatory responses to the injection of monoamines acetylcholine and prostaglandins into a lateral cerebral ventricle of the echidna	Reactions thermoregulatory to the apos; injection of monoamines, acetylcholine and prostaglandins into a lateral cerebral ventricle of the apos; echidna.
12	effect of noradrenaline on triglyceride and glycogen concentrations in liver and muscle from man	Effect of noradrenaline on triglyceride and glycogen concentrations in liver and liver muscles; man.
12	plasma catecholamine response of coronary prone subjects type a to a specific challenge	The response to plasma catecholamines in subjects susceptible to coronary artery disease (CAD) type a to a specific challenge.
12	2 3 diphosphoglycerate a physiological inhibitor of platelet aggregation	Diphosphoglycerate 2-3 diphosphoglycerate a physiological inhibitor of l' platelet aggregation.
12	growth behavior and brain catecholamines in lead exposed neonatal rats a reappraisal	The growth behaviour and brain catecholamines of new-lead-exposed rats were reassessed.
12	biochemical mapping of the noradrenergic projection from the locus coeruleus a model for studies of brain neuronal pathways	Biochemical mapping of the noradrenergic projection of locus coeruleus, a model for the brain neural pathways.
12	effects of halothane on automaticity and contractile force of isolated blood perfused canine ventricular tissue	Apos effects; halothane on apos; automaticity and contractile force of isolated blood perfused canine ventricular tissue.
12	antagonism between parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine on cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate camp levels in isolated tubules from rat kidney cortex	L' antagonism between parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine on cyclic levels of d' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate camp in isolated tubules of rat renal cortex.
12	time and rate dependence of the inotropic action of noradrenaline in the isolated guinea pig s atrium	L' the inotropic action of noradrenaline in the isolated guinea pig atrium is time dependent and rate dependent.
12	cyclic amp and cyclic gmp may mediate opposite neuronal responses in the rat cerebral cortex	A cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp may mediate opposite neuronal responses in the rat cerebral cortex.
12	neurotransmitter control of thyrotropin secretion in the rat	The neurotransmitter controls thyrotropin secretion in the rat.
12	direct myocardial depressant effects of gentamicin	The direct myocardial depressant effects of gentamicin.
12	prostaglandins antipyretic analgesics and adrenergic stimuli on the isolated artery	Antipyretic analgesic prostaglandins and adrenergic stimuli on the isolated artery.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of skeletal muscle cells	Norepinephrine induced depolarization of skeletal muscle cells.
12	influence of the adrenal gland on the pressor effect and antagonistic potency of angiotensin ii analogs	L' influence of the adrenal gland on the apos; pressor effect and antagonistic potency of analogs of l' angiotensin ii.
12	effects of hexamethonium and other ganglionic blocking agents on electrical activity of the esophagus induced by vagal stimulation in the dog	Effects of hexamethonium and dapos; other ganglionic blockers on the apos; electrical activity of the apos; esophagus induced by vagal stimulation in dogs.
12	influence of estrogen and progesterone treatment on ovarian contractility in the monkey	L' influence of estrogen and progesterone treatment on ovarian contractility in the monkey.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies on the motility of isolated guinea pig ovaries	Physiological and pharmacological studies on the motility of isolated guinea pig ovaries.
12	the influence of prolonged painful stimulation on adrenaline and noradrenaline concentration in different regions of the brain and in the adrenals of white rats before and after removal of the superior cervical sympathetic ganglia	L' influence of prolonged painful stimulation on the concentration of adrenaline and noradrenaline in different regions of the brain and in the adrenals of white rats before and after the apo; ablation of the upper sympathetic nodes of the cervix; uterus.
12	melatonin effects on brain interaction with microtubule protein inhibition of fast axoplasmic flow and induction of crystaloid and tubular formations in the hypothalamus	Effects of melatonin on apos; brain interaction with microtubule proteins, inhibition of fast axoplasmic flux and induction of crystalloid and tubular formation in the hypothalamus.
12	3h norepinephrine binding by rat glial cells in culture lack of correlation between binding and adenylate cyclase activation	Three-h binding to norepinephrine by rat glial cells in culture is uncorrelated with apos activation; adenylate cyclase.
12	the pharmacological and anatomical substrates of the amphetamine response in the rat	The pharmacological and anatomical substrates of the amphetamine response in the rat.
12	5 ht and norepinephrine induced release of ach from the thalamus and mesencephalon of the monkey during thermoregulation	Norepinephrine and 5 ht induced release of apos; ach from the thalamus and mesencephalon of the monkey during thermoregulation.
12	the effects of psychomotor stimulants on stereotypy and locomotor activity in socially deprived and control rats	Effects of psychomotor stimulants on stereotypy and locomotor activity in socially deprived and control rats.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase activity of immature rat brain	Serotonin-sensitive adenylate cyclase activity of immature rat brain.
12	accumulation of cyclic amp in hypothyroidism decreased sensitivity to norepinephrine in rat adipocytes	Lupus; accumulation of cyclic blisters in apo; hypothyroidism decreases susceptibility to norepinephrine in rat adipocytes.
12	vascular reactivity to norepinephrine and hemodynamic parameters in borderline hypertension	Effect of norepinephrine on the vascular response to norepinephrine and its hemodynamic parameters.
12	rabbit testicular contractions bimodal interaction of prostaglandin e1 with other agonists	Testisular contractions of rabbits bimodal interaction of prostaglandin e1 with d' other agonists.
12	improvement of parkinsonism in depressed patients treated with ect	Improvement of Parkinson's disease in depressed patients treated with ect.
12	fluorimetric assay of dopamine norepinephrine and their 3 o methyl metabolites by using fluorescamine	Fluorimetric assay of dopamine norepinephrine and their 3 o methyl metabolites using fluorescamin.
12	norepinephrine depletion in idiopathic orthostatic hypotension	Norepinephrine depletion in idiopathic orthostatic hypotension.
12	localization and characterization of carbohydrates in adrenal medullary cells	Localization and characterization of carbohydrates in adrenal adrenal medulla cells.
12	catecholamines in experimental brain ischemia	Catecholamines in experimental brain ischemia.
12	effect of a general aviation trainer on the stress of flight training	General training at the airport; aviation on the stress of the aircraft; flight training.
12	catecholamine and phagocytic responses in infected mice exposed to hyperbaric helium oxygen atmospheres	Catecholamine and phagocytic responses in infected mice exposed to hyperbaric helium oxygen atmosphere.
12	effects of morphine on coronary and left ventricular dynamics in conscious dogs	The effects of morphine on coronary and left ventricular dynamics in conscious dogs.
12	the effect of dietary lipids on lipolysis in rat adipose tissue	Effect of dietary lipids on lipolysis in rat adipose tissue.
12	catecholamine content of serum and adrenals in protracted anaphylactic shock of guinea pigs	Catecholamine content of serum and adrenals during prolonged anaphylactic shock in guinea pig.
12	mechanisms of contractile response of cerebral artery to externally applied fresh blood	Mechanisms of contractile response of cerebral artery to apos; external application of fresh blood.
12	effects of putative neurotransmitters on neuronal activity in monkey auditory cortex	Effects of putative neurotransmitters on neuronal activity in the ape auditory cortex.
12	6 hydroxydopa during development of central adrenergic neurons produces different long term changes in rat brain noradrenaline	L' hydroxydopa-6 during development of central adrenergic neurons produces different long-term changes in rat brain noradrenaline.
12	evidence for a central alpha sympathomimetic action of clonidine in the rat	Evidence of a central alpha sympathomimetic action of clonidine in the rat.
12	morphine analgesia and the bulbospinal noradrenergic system increase in the concentration of normetanephrine in the spinal cord of the rat caused by analgesics	L' morphine analgesia and the bulbospinal noradrenergic system increase the concentration of normetanephrine in the rat spinal cord caused by the analgesics.
12	the effect of nerve stimulation on the axonal transport of noradrenaline and dopamine beta hydroxylase	The effect of neuronal stimulation on the axonal transport of noradrenaline and dopamine beta hydroxylase.
12	the effect of ethacrynic acid on the guinea pig and rat isolated vas deferens	Apos; effect of ethacrynic acid on guinea pig and rat isolated vas deferens.
12	the effect of pithing and of nerve stimulation on the depletion of noradrenaline by reserpine in the rat anococcygeus muscle and vas deferens	L' effect of brain death and nerve stimulation on the depletion of noradrenaline by reserpine in rat anococcygeus muscle and vas deferens.
12	supersensitivity to isoprenaline induced in rats by prolonged isolation	Susceptibility to isoprenaline induced in rats by prolonged isolation.
12	analysis of the effect of 5 hydroxykynurenamine a serotonin metabolite on isolated cerebral arteries aortas and atria	Analysis of apo; effect of 5 hydroxykynurenamine, a serotonin metabolite, on isolated cerebral arteries.
12	sex and estrogens and responsiveness of terminal arterioles to neurohypophyseal hormones and catecholamines	Sex, estrogen, and responsiveness of terminal arterioles to neurohypophysial hormones and catecholamines.
12	effect of castration on the smooth muscle cells of the internal sex organs of the rat influence of the smooth muscle on the sympathetic neurons innervating the vas deferens seminal vesicle and coagulating gland	L' effect of castration on the smooth muscle cells of the internal organs of the rat influences smooth muscle on sympathetic neurons innervating the vas deferens seminal vesicle and clotting gland.
12	antihypertensive drugs and catecholamine metabolism effects of reserpine and hydralazine on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	The effects of reserpine and hydralazine on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in the spontaneously hypertensive rat, on the metabolism of catecholamines and on antihypertensives.
12	characterization by cyproheptadine of the dopamine induced contraction in canine isolated arteries	Cyproheptadine characterization of the dopamine-induced contraction in isolated canine arteries.
12	mechanical response in the wall of ovarian follicles mediated by adrenergic receptors	Mechanical response in the ovarian follicle wall mediated by adrenergic receptors.
12	biochemical and histofluorescence studies of catecholamines in superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	Biochemical and histofluorescent studies of catecholamines in upper cervical ganglia in organ culture.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in rat cerebral cortical slices by methoxamine interaction with an alpha adrenergic receptor	Stimulation of adenosine 35 monophosphate formation in rat cerebral cortical slices by interaction of methoxamine with an adrenergic alpha receptor.
12	effects of noradrenaline infused into the chick hypothalamus on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality	Effects of noradrenaline infused into the chick hypothalamus on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality.
12	increased plasma catecholamine concentrations and vas deferens norepinephrine biosynthesis in men with elevated blood pressure	Increases in plasma catecholamine concentrations and vas deferens norepinephrine biosynthesis in men with elevated blood pressure.
12	effect of alterations of arterial blood pressure and heart rate on segmental dyskinesis during acute myocardial ischemia and following coronary reperfusion	Effect of apo; alterations in blood pressure and heart rate on segmental dyskinesia during apo; acute myocardial ischemia and coronary reperfusion.
12	dobutamine development of a new catecholamine to selectively increase cardiac contractility	Dobutamine development d' a new catecholamine to selectively increase cardiac contractility.
12	octopamine presence in single neurons of aplysia suggests neurotransmitter function	The presence of apos; octopamine in unique neurons of apos; aplysia suggests neurotransmitter function.
12	effects of cocaine on a hypogastric nerve vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	The effects of cocaine on a vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig hypogastric nerve.
12	evidence for a significant contribution from central effects of angiotensin in the development of acute renal hypertension in the greyhound	Evidence of a significant contribution of the central effects of angiotensin in the development of apos; acute renal hypertension in greyhound.
12	iron deficiency anemia and increased urinary norepinephrine excretion	Iron deficiency anemia and increased norepinephrine urinary excretion.
12	free catecholamine excretion in the urine in normal infants and in those with marasmus or kwashiorkor	Lapos; catecholamine-free excretion in apos; urine in normal infants and in those with marasmus or kwashiorkor.
12	a case of secondary aldosteronism induced by pheochromocytoma	A case of secondary aldosteronism induced by a pheochromocytoma.
12	in vitro studies on the human renal calices	In vitro studies on the human renal calyces.
12	reduced level of uterine norepinephrine transmitter during hcg induced pseudopregnancy in the rabbit	A reduction in the level of uterine norepinephrine transmitter during the hcg gland resulted in a pseudo-pregnancy in rabbits.
12	the electrical basis of excitation and inhibition in the rat anoccygeus muscle	The electrical basis of excitation and apos; inhibition in rat anocygus muscle.
12	membrane properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rat anococcygeus muscle	Membrane properties of the smooth muscle cells of rat anococcygeus muscle.
12	motility of the oviduct and uterus of the cow during the oestrous cycle	The motility of the oviduct and uterus of the cow during the estrous cycle.
12	regeneration of the noradrenergic innervation of the cardiovascular system of the chick following treatment with 6 hydroxydopamine	Treatment with 6 hydroxydopamine to regenerate the intestine; noradrenergic innervation of the cardiovascular system of the chick.
12	intravenous tyramine pressor response in depression	Intravenous tyramine pressor response in depression.
12	active and passive immunization to angiotensin in experimental acute renal failure	Acute experimental acute renal failure; active and passive immunization with angiotensin; experimental acute renal failure.
12	growth hormone and catecholamine response to exercise in relation to physical training	Growth hormone and catecholamine response to apos; exercise in relation to apos; physical training.
12	biphasic effect of the alpha adrenolytic phentolamine on hormone stimulated formation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in isolated fat cells of rats	L' biphasic effect of adrenolytic phentolamine alpha on apos formation; adenosine 3-5 rat-stimulated cyclic monophosphate; hormone in isolated fat cells of rats.
12	factors influencing the effect of hormones on the accumulation of cyclic amp in cultured human astrocytoma cells	Factors influencing apo; effect of hormones on apo; accumulation of cyclic blisters in cultured human astrocytoma cells.
12	effects of norepinephrine on cyclic nucleotide levels in the ductus deferens of the rat	The effects of norepinephrine on cyclic nucleotide levels in the rat vas deferens.
12	modulation of human neutrophil chemotactic responses by cyclic 3 5 guanosine monophosphate and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	Modulation of human neutrophil chemotaxic responses by cyclic guanosine monophosphate 3-5 and d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3.
12	sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during glucopenia in man	The sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during glucopenia in men.
12	effects of depletion of brain catecholamines during the development of morphine dependence on precipitated withdrawal in rats	The effects of depletion of cerebral catecholamines during the development of morphine dependence on precipitated withdrawal in rats were observed.
12	cardiac action potential and inotropic effect of noradrenaline and calcium	Cardiac action and inotropic effect of noradrenaline and calcium.
12	in vivo rates of tyrosine and tryptophan hydroxylation in regions of rat brain at four times during the light dark cycle	In vivo rate of tyrosine and tryptophan hydroxylation in regions of rat brain four times during cycle of apos; slight obscurity.
12	influence of glyceryl trinitrate on force of contraction and action potential of guinea pig myocardium	The influence of glyceryl trinitrate on the force of contraction and the potential of apos; action of guinea pig myocardium.
12	the biphasic effect of small doses of tranylcypromine on the spontaneous motor activity and learned conditioned behaviour in rats	L' the biphasic effect of small doses of tranylcypromine on the apos; the spontaneous motor activity and conditioned behaviour acquired in rats.
12	the effects of microiontophoretically applied morphine and transmitter substances in rats during chronic treatment and after withdrawl from morphine	The effects of microiontoporetically applied morphine and transference substances in rats during chronic treatment and after withdrawal of morphine.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on the release by sympathetic nerve stimulation of 3h noradrenaline from rabbit isolated ear arteries and guinea pig atria	Effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on the release of noradrenaline 3h by sympathetic nerve stimulation from isolated arteries of rabbit ears and guinea pig atria.
12	role of endogenous catecholamines in the anti inflammatory activity of alpha adrenoceptor blocking agents	The role of endogenous catecholamines in the apos; anti-@-@ inflammatory activity of alpha-adrenoceptor inhibitors.
12	cyclic amp mediated induction of the cyclic amp phosphodiesterase of c 6 glioma cells	A cyclic ampoule induced apos; induction of the phosphodiesterase of apos; cyclic ampoule of c 6 glioma cells.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in incubated rat hypothalamus by estrogenic compounds relationship to biologic potency and blockade by anti estrogens	Stimulation of d&apos formation; adenosine 35 monophosphate in rat hypothalamus incubated by estrogenic compounds in relation to biological potency and blockade by anti-estrogen.
12	use of plasma catecholamine values in diagnosing pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma	Use of plasma catecholamine values for pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma.
12	car factor deficiency revisited	Car factor deficiency revisited.
12	the involvement of corticosteroids in the supersensitivity produced in the rat anococcygeus muscle by morphine withdrawal thyroidectomy or a single dose of reserpine	L' involvement of corticosteroids in the vas; hypersensitivity produced in rat anococcygeus muscle by a morphine withdrawal thyroidectomy or a single dose of reserpine.
12	antagonism of the uterotonic action of oxytocin in vitro	Apos; antagonism of apos; uterotonic action of apos; in vitro oxytocin.
12	brain monoamine levels in the cow during oestrus and metoestrus	Cerebral monoamine levels in the cow during estrus and metaestrus.
12	comparative responses of the isolated human testicular capsule to autonomic drugs	Comparison of responses of the isolated human testicular capsule to autonomic drugs.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal and pituitary adrenocortical systems during chronic neuro emotional stress	Lapse; functional state of the sympathetic and hypophyseal adrenal systems during a hypophyseal event; chronic neuroemotional stress.
12	effect of serotonin depletion on the central regulation of the carotid sinus reflex in rats	The effect of serotonin depletion on the central regulation of the carotid sinus reflex in the rat.
12	preservation of estrogen induced increase of uterine blood volume following catechlamine and mast cell histamine depletion	Preservation of estrogen induced an increase in uterine blood volume after catechlamine and mast cell histamine depletion.
12	effects of nicotine on plasma corticosterone and brain amines in stressed and unstressed rats	The effects of nicotine on plasma corticosterone and cerebral amines in stressed and unstressed rats.
12	behavioral and electrocortical activity in rats after neonatal intraventricular 6 hydroxydropamine administration	L' behavioral and electrocortical activity in rats after apos; intraventricular neonatal administration; hydroxydropamine 6.
12	discriminated escape learning and response to electric shock after 6 hydroxydopamine lesions of the nigro neostriatal dopaminergic projection	After 6 hydroxydopamine lesions from neostriatal Negro dopaminergic projection, apos; learning apos; escapism; and response to electric shock could be distinguished.
12	blood pressure response to both carotid occlucion and asphyxia as influenced by intracerebroventricular injection of norepinephrine or epinephrine	The blood pressure response to carotid occlusion and asphyxiation is influenced by apos; intracerebroventricular injection of norepinephrine or d*apos; epinephrine.
12	the ability of collecting veins to sustain sympathetic constriction	The ability of collecting veins to maintain sympathetic constriction.
12	the cardiovascular effects of ergometrine in the experimental animal in vivo and in vitro	The cardiovascular effects of etapos; ergometrine in apos; in vivo and in vitro experimental animals.
12	increased hypothalamic norepinephrine in genetically hypertensive rats following administration of diphenylhydantoin 38407	Augmentation of hypothalamic norepinephrine in genetically hypertensive rats following diphenylhydantoin administration 38407.
12	contractility of renal cortex following complete ureteral obstruction	Renal cortical contractility following complete ureteral obstruction.
12	enhancement of neural and thermal vasoconstriction by prostaglandin b1	Augmentation of neural and thermal vasoconstriction by prostaglandin b1.
12	uric acid kinetic studies in the immediate post myocardial infarction period	Apos kinetics studies; uric acid in the immediate post-mortem period; myocardial infarction.
12	concentration of serotonin in intestine and factors affecting its release	Concentration of serotonin in the intestine and factors affecting its release.
12	differentiation of nephrotensin from the renin angiotensin system	Differentiation of nephrotensin from the renin system @-@angiotensin.
12	use of an angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	Use of an angiotensin antagonist; angiotensin ii, saralasin, to identify angiotensin-induced hypertension.
12	alterations in brain monoaminergic functioning associated with septal lesion induced hyperreactivity	Cerebral monoaminergic function alterations associated with septal lesion induced hyperresponsiveness.
12	comparison of 2 5 dimethoxy 4 methylamphetamine dom and d amphetamine for in vivo efflux of catecholamines from rat brain	Comparison of 25 dimethoxy-4 methylamine dom and amphetamine for apos; in vivo efflux of catecholamines from rat brain.
12	anorexigenic effects of d amphetamine and l dopa in the rat	Anorexogenic effects of d and dopa l amphetamine in rats.
12	the hepatic uptake of individual free fatty acids in sheep during noradrenaline infusion	The hepatic uptake of individual free fatty acids in sheep during noradrenaline infusion.
12	studies on the synthesis and subcellular distribution of dopamine in the rat adrenal medulla	Studies on the synthesis and subcellular distribution of dopamine in the rat adrenal medulla.
12	appearance of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase in the developing human heart	The appearance of hormone-sensitive adenylate cyclase in the developing human heart system.
12	effect of circulating norepinephrine on the renin release from the denervated kidney	The effect of circulating norepinephrine on renin release from the denervated kidney.
12	strain differences during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine possible role of receptor sensitivity	Differences between strains during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine possible role of receptor sensitivity.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the cephalic and cerebral circulations of the subhuman primate	Adrenergic mechanisms in the cerebral and cerebral circulation of the primate at @-@human.
12	plasma fatty acids and the control of lipolysis by cathecholamines	Plasma fatty acids and the control of catecholamine lipolysis.
12	the effect of visual sexual stimulation on urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline in impotent patients	Dapos; effect of sexual visual stimulation on appetite; urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline in impotent patients.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the hindlimb circulation of baboons	Adrenergic mechanisms in the hind limb circulation of baboons.
12	pharmacological analysis of dopamine action on the isolated dog atrium	Pharmacological analysis of apos; dopamine action on apos; isolated dog atrium.
12	eccrine sweat gland sensitivity to catecholamines in patients with pheochromocytoma and primary aldosteronism	Eccrine sweatshirt sensitivity to catecholamines in patients with pheochromocytoma and d' primary aldosterone.
12	a kinetic evaluation of monoamine oxidase activity in rat liver mitochondrial outer membranes	A kinetic evaluation of monoamine oxidase activity in rat liver mitochondrial outer membranes.
12	a pharmacological study of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the stretch reflex of the decerebrate rat	A pharmacological study of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the reflex of the retracted rat.
12	studies of rectal mucosal catecholamines in ulcerative colitis	Studies of rectal mucosal catecholamines in ulcerative colitis.
12	acute and chronic morphine treatment and the hydroxylation of 1 14c l tyrosine in the mouse brain	Acute and chronic morphine treatment and 114-cl hydroxylation of tyrosine in the mouse brain.
12	the effects of gonadectomy on monoamine metabolism in three regions of mouse brain	The effects of gonadectomy on monoamine metabolism in three regions of mouse brain.
12	effects of drugs and sympathetic nerve stimuation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs with experimental coronary occlusion	The effects of drugs and sympathetic nerve stimulation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs with experimental coronary occlusion.
12	inhibition of lipolysis and cyclic amp accumulation in white fat cells by tetracycline	Lipolysis inhibition and apos; cyclic ampoules accumulation in white fat cells by tetracycline.
12	the effects of 5 hydroxy 5 4 chlorophenyl 2 3 dihydro 5h imidazo 2 1 a isoindole mazindol sah 42 548 on the metabolism of brain norepinephrine	The effects of 5 hydroxy 5 4 chlorophenyl 2 3 dihydro 5 h imidazo 2 1 a isoindole mazindol sah 42,548 on the metabolism of brain norepinephrine.
12	unusual mechanism of hypotensive activity exerted by erytrho 1 1 2 1 4 benzodioxan 2 yl 2 oh et a1 4 piperidyl 2 benzimidazolinone r 28935	Unusual mechanism of onset; hypotensive activity exerted by the apo; erytrho 1 1 2 1 4 benzodioxane 2 yl 2 oh and 4 piperidyl 2 benzimidazolinone r 28935.
12	noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare tumor with cyclic change of blood pressure	Noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare tumor with cyclic change in blood pressure.
12	effects of gastrointestinal hormones on vascular smooth muscle	Effects of gastro hormones on vascular smooth muscle.
12	fetal stress from methadone withdrawal	You know, fetal stress from methadone withdrawal.
12	dopamine sensitive adenylyl cyclase in human caudate nucleus a study in control subjects and schizophrenic patients	Dopamine-sensitive adenylyl cyclase in the human caudate nucleus studied in control subjects and schizophrenic patients.
12	cerebrospinal fluid amine metabolites in acute schizophrenia	Amino metabolites of cerebrospinal fluid in acute schizophrenia.
12	dynamic analysis of gravimetric response of isolated dog hindlimb	Dynamic analysis of gravimetric response of isolated dog hind limb.
12	calcium and angiotensin tachyphylaxis in rat uterine smooth muscle	Tachchyphylaxis with calcium and angiotensin in rat uterine smooth muscle.
12	salicylate tryptophan and tyrosine hypothermia	Tryptophan salicylate and tyrosine hypothermia.
12	distribution of biogenic amines in the hippocampal formation in the rabbit	Distribution of biogenic amines in hippocampal formation in rabbit.
12	mechanism of cholecystokinin inhibition of lower esophageal sphincter pressure	Esophageal mechanisms; cholecystokinin inhibition of lower esophageal sphincter pressure.
12	plasma hormone and renal function changes in unrestrained dogs exposed to cold	L' plasma hormone and renal function changes in free-ranging dogs exposed to cold.
12	effects of alveolar and perfusion hypoxia and hypercapnia on pulmonary vascular resistance in the lamb	Effects of apo; hypoxia and apo; alveolar and perfusion hypercapnia on pulmonary vascular resistance in the mouse; lamb.
12	cardiovascular responsiveness to beta adrenergic stimulation and blockade in chronic hypoxia	Cardiovascular responsiveness to beta-adrenergic stimulation and blockade in apos; chronic hypoxia.
12	hypothalamic heating and cooling in monoamine depleted rabbits	Hypothalamic heating and cooling in monoamine depleted rabbits.
12	postnatal development of adenylate cyclase in rat salivary glands patterns of hormonal sensitivity	The postnatal development of adenylate cyclase in rat salivary glands shows hormonal sensitivity.
12	effect of methylprednisolone upon arterial pressure and the renin angiotensin system in the rat	The effect of methylprednisolone on blood pressure and the renin system-angiotensin in rats.
12	bioassay of oxytocin on the superfused mammary gland of the mouse using an automatic apparatus	Biological test of apos; oxytocin on the superfused mammary gland of the mouse at apos; help of apos; automatic device.
12	influence of halothane on the effects of endogenous and exogenous noradrenaline on the isolated rabbit heart perfused at constant pressure	L' influence of l' halothane on the effects of endogenous and exogenous noradrenaline on the isolated constant pressure perfused rabbit heart.
12	prevention of decompression sickness during a simulated space docking mission	Preventing decompression sickness during a simulated mooring mission in space.
12	analysis of the dynamic action of vasoactive substances on the blood pressure of rabbits author s transl	Blood pressure analysis; the dynamic action of vasoactive substances on the blood pressure of donor rabbits.
12	selective denervation of the autonomic nerve supply of the nasal mucosa	Selective denervation of the autonomic nervous supply of the nasal mucosa.
12	rate limiting factors in sympathetic neurotransmitter secretion	Speed limiting factors in sympathetic neurotransmitter secretion.
12	control of the neurotoxicity of 6 hydroxydopamine by intraneuronal noradrenaline in rat iris	Control of the neurotoxicity of 6 hydroxydopamine by intraneuronal noradrenaline in rat irises.
12	psychophysiological and neurophysiological aspects of schizophrenia	The psychophysiological and neurophysiological aspects of schizophrenia.
12	biochemical research into psychosis	Biochemical research into psychosis.
12	effectiveness of prodigiozan in the therapy of chronic nonspecific diseases of the lungs	Effectiveness of prodigiozan in the treatment of non-specific chronic lung diseases.
12	the stimulation by transmitter substances and putative transmitter substances of the net activity of phospholipase a2 of synaptic membranes of cortex of guinea pig brain	Stimulation by transmitter substances and putative transmitter substances in guinea-pig brain; net phospholipase a2 activity of synaptic membranes.
12	photically induced epilepsy in papio papio as a model for drug studies	Photically induced epilepsy in papio papio as a model for drug studies.
12	effect of reserpine on the potency of alpha receptor blockers	Effect of reserpine on the potency of alpha receptor blockers.
12	drug interactions with dopamin stimulated adenylate cyclasses of caudate nucleus and retina direct agonist effect of a piribedil metabolite	Drug interactions with dopamine stimulated d' caudate nucleus adenylate and l' direct agonist effect of d&apos retina; a piribedil metabolite.
12	an abdominal left ventricular assist device preclinical studies	Preclinical studies on an abdominal left ventricular support device.
12	failure of methylhistidines to inhibit platelet aggregation at concentrations found in uremic plasma	Platelet aggregation at concentrations found in uremic plasma is not inhibited by methylhistidines.
12	dopamine in essential arterial hypertension excretion of its metabolite homovanillic acid	Dopamine in apos; essential arterial hypertension excretion of its metabolite homovanillic acid.
12	studies on the carbohydrate moiety of dopamine beta hydroxylase interaction of the enzyme with concanavalin a	Studies on the carbohydrate moiety of the extracts; interaction of dopamine beta hydroxylase of the extracts; enzyme with concanavalin a.
12	simulation of catecholamine action in an improved electrical model	Simulation of catecholamine action in an improved electric model.
12	enhancement of hypothalamic pressor responses in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Stimulation of hypothalamic pressor responses in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	catecholamine release mechanism of mercury induced vascular smooth muscle contraction	Mercury catecholamine release mechanism induced vascular smooth muscle contraction.
12	amphetamine and apomorphine responses in the rat following 6 ohda lesions of the nucleus accumbens septi and corpus striatum	Amphetamines and l' apomorphine responses in the rat following 6 ohda lesions of the nucleus accumbens septi and the corpus striatum.
12	differentiation of calcium activation mechanisms in vascular smooth muscle by selective suppression with verapamil and d 600 1	Differentiation of d&apos mechanisms; calcium activation in vascular smooth muscle by selective suppression with verapamil and d 600.1.
12	pharmacological receptors of the cerebral arteries of the goat	Pharmacological receptors of the cerebral arteries of the goat.
12	ajamline induced changes in mechanical and electrical activity of vascular smooth muscle	L' ajamline induced changes in the mechanical and electrical activity of vascular smooth muscle.
12	plasma catecholamines in severely injured patients a prospective study on 45 patients with multiple injuries	Plasma catecholamines in severely injured patients, a prospective study of 45 patients with multiple injuries.
12	noradrenaline and motor transmission in the vas deferens of the mouse	Motor transmission and noradrenaline in the vas deferens of the mouse.
12	effect of morphine on adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens assessment of agonist and antogonist potencies of narcotic analgesics	Effect of morphine on adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens evaluation of agonist and antogonist potencies of narcotic analgesics.
12	the effect of some bacterial products on temperature and sleep in rat	L' effect of certain bacterial products on temperature and sleep in rat.
12	on the phospholipase activity in bovine seminal vesicles and its possible role in the regulation of the prostaglandin biosynthesis	On the apos; phospholipase activity in bovine seminal vesicles and its possible role in the regulation of prostaglandin biosynthesis.
12	urine norepinephrine excretion in patients undergoing mitral or aortic valve replacement with morphine anesthesia	L' urinary norepinephrine excretion in patients undergoing mitral or aortic valve replacement with morphine anesthesia.
12	venomotor changes caused by halothane acting on the sympathetic nerves	Vomotor changes caused by halothane acting on sympathetic nerves.
12	neurons from fetal rat brain in a new cell culture system a multidisciplinary analysis	The neurons of fetal rat brain in a new cell culture system a multidisciplinary analysis.
12	effect of withdrawal from chronic ethanol ingestion on the camp response of cerebral cortical slices using the agonists histamine serotonin and other neurotransmitters	Effect of withdrawal; chronic ingestion of apos; ethanol on the camp response of cerebral cortical slices using histamine serotonin and dapos agonists; other neurotransmitters.
12	dopamine b hydroxylase and catecholamines in an olfactory esthesioneuroma	Both dopamine b hydroxylase and catecholamines in an olfactory esteuroma.
12	vascular reactivity to noradrenaline potassium chloride and angiotensin ii in the rat perfused mesenteric vasculature preparation during the development of renal hypertension	Norepinephrine's vascular reactivity to potassium chloride and angiotensin ii in the perfused rat mesenteric vascular preparation during the development of renal hypertension.
12	chronotropic response to acetylcholine injected into the sinus node artery of the isolated atrium of the dog	Chronotropic response to acetylcholine injected into the apos; artery of the sinus node of the apos; isolated atrium of the dog.
12	thick filaments in vertebrate smooth muscle	Thick filaments in vertebrate smooth muscle.
12	catecholamine fluorescence in the pituitary of the eel anguilla anguilla with special reference to its variation during background adaptation	Catecholamine fluorescence in the apos; pituitary of the eel eel eel eel eel, with particular attention to its variation during the apos; background adaptation.
12	the aminergic innervation of the pituitary gland in the roach leuciscus rutilus	L' aminergic innervation of the pituitary; pituitary in the roach leuciscus rutilus.
12	effect of some autonomic drugs on heat defence in the pigeon	Effect of certain self-contained drugs on thermal defense in the pigeon.
12	the effect of exogenous catecholamines on the cardiac rhythm and thermoregulation of hibernating hedgehogs erinaceus europaeus l	L' effect of exogenous catecholamines on heart rate and thermoregulation of hibernating hedgehogs erinaceus europaeus l.
12	modulation by prostaglandins of adrenergic transmission in the isolated perfused rabbit and rat kidney	Prostaglandin modulation of adrenergic transmission in the isolated perfused rabbit and rat kidney.
12	histamine potentiation of nerve and drug induced responses of a rabbit cerebral artery	Potentiation by nerve histamine and drug elicited responses from a rabbit cerebral artery.
12	correlation between the response of the heart to sympathetic stimulation and the release of endogenous catecholamines into the coronary sinus of the dog	There is a correlation between the response of the heart to sympathetic stimulation and the release of endogenous catecholamines into the coronary sinus of the dog.
12	bronchopulmonary arterial shunting without anatomic anastomosis in the dog	Bronchopulmonary arterial shunt with no anatomic anastomosis in the dog.
12	direct effect of beta adrenergic stimulation on renin release by the rat kidney slice in vitro	Direct effect of beta adrenergic stimulation on renin release from rat kidney slice in vitro.
12	changes in rat adrenal medulla following delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol treatment a histochemical study	Histochemical study of changes in rat adrenal medulla following delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol treatment.
12	catecholamines in urine an evaluation of alumina trihydroxyindole methods and a description of an improved method	Catecholamines in urine, evaluation of alumina trihydroxyindole methods and description of apos; an improved method.
12	results of a study on the circadian rhythm of catecholamine excretion on normal subjects and those with high excretion levels author s transl	Results from a study of the circadian rhythm of apos; catecholamine excretion in normal subjects and subjects with high apo levels; excretion.
12	mechanism of vascular hyperresponsiveness in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Mechanisms of vascular hyperresponsiveness in the spontaneously hypertensive rat.
12	pharmacological effects of alpha methyldopa alpha methylnorepinephrine and octopamine on rat arteriolar arterial and terminal vascular smooth	Pharmacologic effects of lacidosis; alpha methyldopa alpha methylnorepinephrine and lacidosis; octopamine on rat arteriolar artery and vascular end.
12	possible contributions of endogenous prostaglandins to the control of blood pressure	Possible contribution of endogenous prostaglandins to the control of blood pressure.
12	rise in plasma free norepinephrine during anesthetic induction with ketamine	Increase of plasma free norepinephrine during anesthetic induction by ketamine.
12	effect of low dose intra arterial reserpine on vascular wall norepinephrine content	Effect of low dose intraarterial reserpine on vascular wall norepinephrine content.
12	role of noradrenaline and serotonin in the central control of blood pressure in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The role of noradrenaline and serotonin in the central control of blood pressure in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	central nervous systen alpha adrenergic mechanisms and cardiovascular regulation in rats	Central nervous system, alpha adrenergic mechanisms and cardiovascular regulation in rats.
12	centrally induced hypotension unreleated to alpha adrenergic stimulation	L' centrally induced hypotension was not reduced to adrenergic alpha stimulation.
12	left ventricular pressure mural force relationship during sympathetic stimulation	Ratio of left ventricular pressure wall force during sympathetic stimulation.
12	comparison of central effects of noradrenaline and dopamine injected into the lateral brain ventricle in rats	Comparison of central effects of noradrenaline and dopamine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricle of rats.
12	rapid transport of noradrenaline in adrenergic axons of rat sciatic nerve distal to a crush	Rapid transport of noradrenaline in adrenergic axons of distal rat sciatic nerve upon crushing.
12	on the noradrenaline loading in axonal amine storage granules in rat crushed sciated nerves	On the noradrenaline charge in the storage granules of rat crushed sawn nerves.
12	synthesis of catecholamines in the eye after local injection of 3h precursors	Synthesis of catecholamines in the eye after local injection of precursors 3h.
12	vasomotor nerve control of isolated arteries and veins	Vasomotor nerve control of isolated arteries and veins.
12	intracellular distribution of amines taken up by rat mast cells	Intracellular distribution of amines taken up by rat mast cells.
12	specific and unspecific removal of circulating noradrenaline in pulmonary and systemic vascular beds in man	Specific and nonspecific elimination of circulating noradrenaline in pulmonary and systemic vascular beds in men.
12	affinity of noradrenaline and dopamine for neural alpha receptors mediating negative feedback control of noradrenaline secretion in human vasoconstrictor nerves	L' affinity of noradrenaline and dopamine for neuronal alpha receptors mediating negative feedback control of noradrenaline secretion in human vasoconstrictor nerves.
12	clinical experimental studies in patients with asympathicotonic hypotension	Experimental clinical studies in patients with apo; hypotension asympathonic.
12	the nyctohemeral rhythm of plasma prolactin effects of ganglionectomy pinealectomy constant light constant darkness or 6 oh dopamine administration	Nycto-dominal rhythm of plasma prolactin effects of ganglionectomy Pinealectomy constant darkness constant light or administration of dopamine 6 oh.
12	narcotic withdrawal like mouse jumping produced by amphetamine and l dopa	Both narcotic withdrawal and mouse jumping produced by amphetamine and dopa l.
12	reactivity of isolated bovine mesenteric and hepatic veins to vasoactive agents and specific antigen	Reactivity of isolated bovine mesenteric and hepatic veins to vasoactive agents and l' specific antigen.
12	enterohepatic haemodynamics in calves during acute systemic anaphylaxis	Enterohepatic hemodynamics in calves during acute systemic anaphylaxis.
12	adrenergic lipolysis in human adipose tissue in vitro	Adrenergic lipolysis in human adipose tissue in vitro.
12	the central modulatory effect of clonidine on the cardiodepressor reflex after suppression of synthesis and storage of noradrenaline	L' a central modulatory effect of clonidine on the cardiodepressor reflex after suppression of synthesis and storage of norepinephrine.
12	effects of clonidine on baroreceptor function in anesthetized dogs	The effects of clonidine on baroreceptor function in anesthetized dogs.
12	comparison of structural and stereoisomers of apomorphine on stereotyped behavior of the rat	Comparison of the structure and stereoisomers of apomorphine on the stereotyped behaviour of the rat.
12	effects of clonidine on morphine withdrawal signs in the rat	The effects of clonidine on signs of morphine withdrawal in rats.
12	changes in imipramine induced noradrenaline potentiation by varying activity of gastric juice under oral medication	L' imipramine induced noradrenaline potentiation by variable gastric juice activity under oral medication.
12	elevated left ventricular stiffness by noradrenaline in myocardial ischaemia	Left ventricular stiffness elevated by noradrenaline in myocardial ischemia.
12	effects of phentolamine on the sa node of the dog heart in situ	The effects of phentolamine on the node of the dog heart in situ.
12	cardiovascular studies of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 a new potent beta adrenergic blocking agent	Cardiovascular studies of 5 tert hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2 hydroxypropoxy 3-4 dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085 a potent new adrenergic blocking agent beta.
12	mechanical responses to catecholamines in isolated strips of the guinea pig stomach muscle	Mechanical responses to catecholamines in isolated strips of the guinea pig gastric muscle.
12	effect of beta phenylethylamine derivatives on the central nervous system iii motor activity changes in mice due to the intracerebral administration of metaraminol	Effect of phenylethylamine beta derivatives on the central nervous system iii changes in lipos; motor activity in mice due to apos; intracerebral administration of metaraminol.
12	adrenoceptors and autonomic nerve control mechanisms in the biliary tract	Adrenoceptors and autonomic control mechanisms in the biliary tract.
12	effect of dopamine on perfusion pressure in rat peripheral blood vessels	Effect of dopamine on perfusion pressure in rat peripheral blood vessels.
12	spasmolytic activity of two synthetic anilide local anaesthetics	L' spasmolytic activity of two synthetic local anesthetic anesthetic anesthetic.
12	comparative circulatory effects of adrenaline and noradrenaline during intra osseous dental anaesthesia	Comparative circulatory effects of adrenaline and norepinephrine during oral intra-bone anesthesia.
12	effect of bordetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines on vascular permeability	Dosage effect; bordetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines on vascular permeability.
12	progesterone mediated increase in monoamine stores and the regulation of enzymes of biosynthesis and metabolism in the adrenal gland during late pregnancy in the rat	Progesterone promoted apos; increased monoamine reserves and the regulation of enzymes of biosynthesis and metabolism in the adrenal gland at the end of pregnancy in the rat.
12	some effects of pilocarpine and acetylcholine on the responses of the guinea pig vas deferens to hypogastric nerve stimulation and transmural stimulation and applied minus noradrenaline	Some effects of pilocarpine and l' acetylcholine on the responses of the guinea pig vas deferens to hypogastric and transmural nerve stimulation and applied less noradrenaline.
12	microiontophoretic studies of the effects of false transmitter candidates and amphetamine on cerebellar purkinje cells	Microiontophoretic studies of the effects of false transmitter candidates and l' amphetamine on cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	intra and extraneuronal formation of the two major noradrenaline metabolites in the cns of rats	Intra and extraneuronal formation of the two major noradrenaline metabolites in cn channels of rats.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate content in rat caudate nucleus demonstration of dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors	The adenosine 3-5 monophosphate content of rat caudate nucleus demonstrates the existence of dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors.
12	simple isolated perfused artery preparation vasoconstrictor evaluation	Simple vasoconstrictor evaluation of isolated perfused artery preparation.
12	specific effect of 5 6 dihydroxytryptamine on the monoamine fluorophore of the frog s gustatory cells	Specific effect of 56 dihydroxytryptamine on the monoamine fluorophore of frog gustatory cells.
12	effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on the actions of pentobarbital and other centrally acting drugs	Effect of thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on the actions of pentobarbital and d' other centrally acting drugs.
12	induction of tyrosine hydroxylase elicited by beta adrenergic receptor agonists in normal and decentralized sympathetic ganglia role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	Induction of tyrosine hydroxylase induced by beta-adrenoceptor agonists in normal and decentralized sympathetic ganglia of the role of monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine.
12	free fatty acids as feedback regulators of adenylate cyclase and cyclic 3 5 amp accumulation in rat fat cells	Free fatty acids as retrogressive regulators of apos; adenylate cyclase and apos; 3-5 amperes cyclic accumulation in rat fat cells.
12	simultaneous estimation of catecholamines and serotonin after purification on ion exchange resin	Simultaneous estimation of catecholamines and serotonin after purification on an ion exchange resin.
12	some physiological aspects of bone marrow pressure	Some physiological aspects of bone marrow pressure.
12	tryptamines and some other substances affecting waking and sleep in fowls	Tryptamines and d'apos; other substances affecting the wake and sleep of poultry.
12	discrimination of monoamine uptake by membranes of adrenal chromaffin granules	The discrimination of monoamine uptake by adrenal chromaffin granule membranes is evident.
12	the effects of catecholamines and adrenoceptor blocking drugs on the canine peripheral lymph flow	The effects of catecholamines and adrenoceptor inhibitors on the canine lymphatic periphery.
12	indomethacin potentiation of the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation effect of stimulus frequency and train length	Indomethacin potentiation of the response of rabbit portal vein to apos; electrical stimulation effect of stimulus frequency and train length.
12	evidence for prostaglandin mediated prejunctional control of renal sympathetic transmitter release and vascular tone	Evidence of prostaglandin-mediated prejunctional control of renal sympathetic transmitter release and vascular tone.
12	adrenergic and cholinergic receptors in the human prostate prostatic capsule and bladder neck	Adrenergic and cholinergic receptors in the human prostate prostatic capsule and the bladder neck.
12	plasma norepinephrine and epinephrine in acromegaly	Norepinephrine and epinephrine in acromegaly.
12	cardiovascular drug interactions	Acute cardiovascular drug interactions.
12	influence of sympathomimetic drugs on the motility of bovine teat muscles	Influence of sympathomimetic drugs on the motility of bovine teat muscles.
12	segmental analysis of spinal cord monoamines after thoracic transection in the dog	Segmental analysis of spinal cord monoamines after thoracic section in dog.
12	tuberoinfundibular neurons dopaminergic and norepinephrinergic sensitivity	Tuberoinfundibular neurons dopaminergic and norepinephrineergic sensitivity.
12	dopamine and norepinephrine levels in the nucleus accumbens olfactory tubercle and corpus striatum following lesions in the ventral tegmentalarea	Dopamine and norepinephrine levels in the nucleus accumbens striated body and olfactory tubercle following ventral tegmental lesions.
12	interactions between lysergic acid diethylamide and dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in rat brain	Interactions between dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in rat brain and lysergic acid.
12	monoaminergic mechanisms of stimulation produced analgesia	The monoaminergic mechanisms of stimulation caused analgesia.
12	the effect of monoamine oxidase inhibition on formation fixation and reproduction of temporary connections	The effect of monoamine oxidase inhibition on the formation, binding and reproduction of temporary connections.
12	the effect of caesium on adrenergic transmission in rabbit vas deferens	L' effect of cesium on adrenergic transmission in rabbit vas deferens.
12	neurochemical mechanisms of the inhibitory influence of the hippocampus on the conditioned food getting reaction in rats	Neurochemical mechanisms of the apos; inhibitory influence of the hippocampus on the conditioned food.
12	clopimozide r 29 764 a new highly potent and orally long acting neuroleptic of the diphenylbutylpiperidine series	Clopimozide r 29,764 is a new very potent long-acting oral neuroleptic of the diphenylbutylpiperidine series.
12	a comparison of his bundle electrograms recorded from the aortic root and from a plaque sutured near the his bundle	A comparison of its electrograms recorded from the aortic root and from a sutured plate near its bundle.
12	role of monoamines in the control by hormones of sexual receptivity in the female rat	The role of monoamines in the hormonal control of sexual receptivity in female rat.
12	degeneration and regeneration of adrenergic nerves in mesenteric blood vessels iris and atrium of the rat after 6 hydroxydopamine injection	The degeneration and regeneration of adrenergic nerves in the iris and atrium of the rat mesenteric blood vessels after 6 injections of apos; hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of increased arterial pressure on blood flow in the damaged brain	Effect of increased blood pressure on blood flow in the damaged brain.
12	concentration gradients of monoamine metabolites in human cerebrospinal fluid	Concentration gradient of monoaminated metabolites in human cerebrospinal fluid.
12	orthostatic hypotension associated with paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia	Acute orthostatic hypotension associated with paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia.
12	aminergic nuclei in the hypothalamus of the roach leuciscus rutilus	Amine nuclei in the hypothalamus of roach leuciscus rutilus.
12	the correlation between spontaneous contractions and postjunctional supersensitivity of the smooth muscle of the rat vas deferens	The correlation between spontaneous contractions and l' post hypersensitivity-junctional of the smooth muscle of the rat vas deferens.
12	inhibition of brain catecholamine synthesis and release of prolactin and luteinizing hormone in the ovariectomized rat	Inhibition of brain catecholamine synthesis and release of prolactin and luteinizing hormone d&apos in ovariectomized rat.
12	regulation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in guinea pig cerebral cortex by interaction of alpha adrenergic and adenosine receptor activity	The regulation of d' adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate levels in guinea pig cerebral cortex by the apos; l&apos interaction; alpha-adrenergic receptor activity and adenosine.
12	long term effects of p chloroamphetamine and related drugs on central serotonergic mechanisms	Long-term effects of p chloroamphetamine and related drugs on central serotonergic mechanisms.
12	brown adipose tissue in the new born calf bos taurus	Brown adipose tissue in the new-ne bos taurus taurus.
12	changes in monoamine concentrations in mouse brain associated with ethanol dependence and withdrawal	Changes in concentrations of monoamine in mouse brain associated with ethanol dependency and withdrawal.
12	analysis of the effects on body temperature of intracerebroventricular injection in anaesthetized dogs of gamma aminobutyric acid	Analysis of effects on body temperature of apo; intracerebroventricular injection of apo; aminobutyric gamma acid in anaesthetized dogs.
12	distribution of alpha and beta adrenoceptors in human urinary bladder	Distribution of alpha and beta adrenoceptors in human bladder.
12	atropine resistant effects of the muscarinic agonists mcn a 343 and ahr 602 on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of resistance to apos; atropine of muscarinic agonists mcn to 343 and ahr 602 on cardiac performance and release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart.
12	release of prostaglandins from the rabbit perfused kidney effects of vasoconstrictors	The release of prostaglandins from rabbit vasoconstrictors via their perfused renal effects.
12	virus infections in infant mice causing persistent impairment of turnover of brain catecholamines	Viral infections in newborn mice causing persistent alteration of cerebral catecholamine turnover.
12	the mechanism of renin release from the ischaemic kidney	The mechanism of renin release from the ischemic kidney.
12	secretion of anterior pituitary hormones in man effects of ethyl alcohol	The effects of alcohol; alcohol on the secretion of apes; anterior pituitary hormones in men.
12	n the mechanism of inhibitory action of vibrations as studied in a molluscan catch muscle and in vertebrate vascular smooth muscle	The mechanism of inhibitory action of vibration has been studied in a molluscan capture muscle and in vertebrate vascular smooth muscle.
12	effects of iprindole on responses of single cortical and caudate neurones to monoamines and acetylcholine	Effects of apos; iprindole on responses of caudate and cortical neurons to monoamines and apos; acetylcholine.
12	effects of norepinephrine and angiotensin ii on the determinants of glomerular ultrafiltration and proximal tubule fluid reabsorption in the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and apos; angiotensin ii on the determinants of apos; and glomerular ultrafiltration and proximal tubular fluid reabsorption in rats.
12	effects of neurotransmitters injected into the posterior and the anterior septal artery on the automaticity of the atrioventricular junctional area of the dog heart	Effects of neurotransmitters injected into the posterior and anterior septal artery on the apos; automaticity of the zone of atrioventricular junction of the dog heart.
12	interactions of morphine adenosine adenosine triphosphate and phosphodiesterase inhibitors on the field stimulated guinea pig ileum	The guinea-pig ileum is stimulated by interactions of morphine adenosine triphosphate and phosphodiesterase inhibitors in the field.
12	analysis of changes in reactivity of rabbit arteries and veins two weeks after induction of hypertension by coarctation of the abdominal aorta	Analysis of changes in reactivity of rabbit arteries and veins 2 weeks after onset; induction of apos; hypertension by coarctation of the apos; abdominal aorta.
12	effects of an inotropic agent ro 2 2985 x 537a on regional blood flow and myocardial function in chronically instrumented conscious dogs and anesthetized dogs	Apos; an inotropic agent ro 2,285 x 537a on regional blood flow and myocardial function in chronically instrumented conscious dogs and anesthetized dogs.
12	the development and evaluation of a semi automated assay for catecholamines suitable for plasma and urine	Development and evaluation of a semi-automatic assay of catecholamines suitable for plasma and urine.
12	behavior and the balance between norepinephrine and serotonin	Behaviour and balance between norepinephrine and serotonin.
12	formation of dopamine and noradrenaline in rat vas deferens comparison with guinea pig vas deferens	Comparison of the formation of dopamine and noradrenaline in rat vas deferens and guinea pig vas deferens.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of reserpine on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	An electrophysiological analysis of the effects of reserpine on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of amine uptake blockers and alpha adrenoceptor blockers on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	An electrophysiological analysis of the effects of amine uptake blockers and alpha-adrenoceptor blockers on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effect of ca ions on neuromuscular transmission in the mouse vas deferens	An electrophysiological analysis of the effect of ca ions on neuromuscular transmission in the mouse vas deferens.
12	physical and adrenergic factors affecting systemic vascular resistance in the rainbow trout a comparison with branchial vascular resistance	Physical and adrenergic factors affecting systemic vascular resistance in the rainbow trout-in-sky, as compared to gill vascular resistance.
12	effects of intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norepinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in the rat	Effects of intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norpinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in rat.
12	the relationship of plasma levels of pindolol in hypertensive patients to effects on blood pressure plasma renin and plasma noradrenaline levels	The relationship between plasma levels of pindolol in hypertensive patients and the effects of blood pressure on plasma renin and plasma noradrenaline levels.
12	cardiovascular effects of prazosin in normotensive and genetically hypertensive rats	Cardiovascular effects of prazosin in normotensive and genetically hypertensive rats.
12	9 chloro 2 3 dihydro 5h 1 4 dioxepino 6 5 b benzofuran a novel antilipidemic agent structurally related to clofibrate	Chloro 2 3 dihydro 5h 1h 4 dioxepino 6h 5b benzofuran, a novel antilipidemic agent structurally related to clofibrate.
12	behavioral and biochemical interactions of 5 7 dihydroxytryptamine with various drugs when administered intracisternally to adult and developing rats	Behavioral and biochemical interactions of 57 dihydroxytryptamine with various drugs when administered intracisternally to adult and developing rats.
12	catecholaminergic mechanisms of the lateral hypothalamus their role in the mediation of amphetamine anorexia	Catecholaminergic mechanisms of the lateral hypothalamus their role in the mediation of the apos; amphetamine anorexia.
12	tail pinch induced eating gnawing and licking behavior in rats dependence on the nigrostriatal dopamine system	Rats became dependent on the nigrostriatal dopaminergic system for gnawing and licking by pinching their tails.
12	effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on central noradrenaline neurons during ontogeny	Effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on central neurons of noradrenaline during ontogeny.
12	quantitative localization of biogenic amines in the spinal cord	The quantitative localization of biogenic amines in the spinal cord.
12	effect of hypothalamic implants changing monoamine levels on continuous estrus in rats induced by androgen treatment in the neonatal period	Effect of hypothalamic, monoamine-modifying implants on continuous estrus in rats induced by androgen treatment during the neonatal period.
12	thermoregulation in the rabbit following intracranial injection of norepinephrine	Thermoregulation in rabbits following intracranial injection of norepinephrine.
12	effects of phentolamine dihydroergocristine and isoxsuprine on the blood pressure and heart rate in normotensive hypotensive and hypertensive rats	The effects of phentolamine dihydroergocristine and isoxsuprine on blood pressure and heart rate in normotensive hypotensive and hypertensive rats.
12	discrepancies in the measurement of changes in blood flow using flow and velocity sensitive electromagnetic probes	Deviations in the measurement of changes in blood flow at the apo, using rate- and velocity-sensitive electromagnetic probes.
12	idiopathic orthostatic hypotension shy drager syndrome results of regional cerebral blood flow measurements author s transl	Idiopathic orthostatic hypotension: Bashful drager syndrome results from regional cerebral blood flow measurements.
12	central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and vascular permeability	The central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and vascular permeability.
12	the effect of glucagon on glomerular filtration rate in dogs during reduction of renal blood flow	L' effect of glucagon on glomerular filtration rate in dogs during reduction of renal blood flow.
12	the effect of noradrenaline adrenergic blocking agents and tyramine on the intrarenal distribution of blood flow in the baboon	L' effect of the adrenergic inhibitors of noradrenaline and tyramine on the intrarenal distribution of blood flow in baboons.
12	the effect of simultaneous administration of levarterenol and phentolamine on renal blood flow	Effect of apo; simultaneous administration of levartenol and phentolamine on renal blood flow.
12	effect of vasoactive agents on the distribution of renal cortical blood flow in dogs	The effect of vasoactive agents on the distribution of renal cortical blood flow in dogs.
12	effects of quinidine on blood flow rate and developed tension in blood perfused canine papillary muscle	The effects of quinidine on blood flow and developed tension in blood-perfused canine papillary muscle were observed.
12	neurogenic influence on local cerebral blood flow effect of catecholamines or sympathetic stimulation as correlated with the sympathetic innervation	L' neurogenic influence on apos; effect of catecholamines or sympathetic stimulation on local cerebral blood flow correlated with sympathetic innervation.
12	neural control of cochlear blood flow	The neural regulation of cochlear blood flow should be regulated.
12	time course changes in blood pressure urinary excretion of norepinephrine and dopamine after administration of fusaric acid in a single dose in elderly hypertensive patients	The urinary excretion of norepinephrine and dopamine after dosing; a single dose of fusaric acid to elderly hypertensive patients varies over time.
12	effect of prolonged administration of clonidine to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure cerebral norpinephrine content and angiographic finding in the kidney	Effect of oral norepinephrine; prolonged administration of clonidine to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure, cerebral norepinephrine content and kidney angiography.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal system and blood coagulation in transitory cerebral circulatory disorders	L' functional state of the sympathetic adrenal system and blood clotting in transitory circulatory disorders.
12	changes in local cerebral blood flow during increased general arterial pressure in animals	Changes in local cerebral blood flow during apo; increase in general arterial pressure in animals.
12	norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes of peripheral blood flow acceleration caused by changes of cardiac inotropy	Norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes in apos; peripheral blood flow acceleration caused by changes in apos; cardiac inotropy.
12	blood pressure responses to catecholamines during beta adrenergic blockade with propranolol in hypertensive subjects	"""Effect of propranolol on hypertension and hypertension"" in the Journal of the American Medical Association."
12	influence of adipose tissue blood flow on the lipolytic response to circulating noradrenaline at normal and reduced ph	Influence of adipose tissue blood flow on the lipolytic response to circulating noradrenaline to normal and reduced ph.
12	the effect of behavioral stimulant doses of amphetamine on blood pressure	The effect of high doses of amphetamine on blood pressure and blood pressure.
12	blood pressure responses to noradrenaline and dopamine infusions in parkinson s disease and the shy drager syndrome	Blood pressure responses to noradrenaline and dopamine infusions in Parkinson's disease and shy drager syndrome.
12	a method for determining segmental resistances in the microcirculation from pressure flow measurements	A method for determining the segmental resistances in the microcirculation from pressure-rate measurements.
12	role of endogenous prostaglandins in regulation of uterine blood flow and adrenergic neurotransmission	Role of endogenous prostaglandins in regulation of uterine blood flow and adrenergic neurotransmission.
12	blood pressure effects of lower abdominal aortic surgery with particular reference to the use of morphine and droperidol in modifying the responses	Effects of lower abdominal aorta surgery on blood pressure, especially the apos; use of morphine and droperidol to modify responses.
12	effect of norepinephrine on intramyocardial distribution of blood flow in normal and ischemic myocardium	The effect of norepinephrine on the intramyocardial distribution of blood flow in normal and ischemic myocardium.
12	cause of the disproportion between the vast increase in plasma renin and the only small if any increase in blood pressure after manipulation of the submaxillary gland	Cause of the disproportion between the apos; considerable increase in plasma renin and the only slight, if any, increase in blood pressure after manipulation of the gland under-maxillary.
12	effects of beta adrenergic blockade on diurnal variability of blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline levels	Effects of beta-adrenergic blockade on diurnal variability of blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline levels.
12	effect of cerebrospinal fluid removal on cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the baboon influence of tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on cerebrospinal fluid pressure autoregulation	Effect of apo; removal of cerebrospinal fluid-spinal fluid on cerebral blood flow and metabolism in baboon Tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on epos; self-regulation of cerebrospinal fluid pressure-spinal cord.
12	comparison of nerves to cerebral and extracerebral blood vessels a differential effect of alpha methyl tyrosine on norepinephrine content	Comparison of nerves to cerebral and extracerebral blood vessels of apos; a differential effect of alpha methyl tyrosine on norepinephrine content.
12	tissue blood flow in brain liver renal cortex and renal medulla in experimental hemorrhagic shock	Tissue blood flow into the brain's renal cortex and renal medulla during apos; experimental hemorrhagic shock.
12	role of prostaglandins in blood pressure regulation	The role of prostaglandins in blood pressure regulation.
12	effect of catecholamines in blood flow in arteries of distribution	The effect of catecholamines on blood flow in distribution arteries.
12	continuous measurement of renal blood flow changes to renal nerve stimulation and intra arterial drug administration in the rat	Ongoing measurement of changes in renal blood flow to renal nerve stimulation and renal arterial drug administration in the rat.
12	entry of 3h norepinephrine 125i albumin and evans blue from blood into brain following unilateral osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Entry of norepinephrine 125i albumin 3h and d' blue blood evans in the brain after unilateral osmotic opening of the blood barrier-encephalic.
12	influence of intravenously administered catecholamines on cerebral oxygen consumption and blood flow in the rat	L' influence of intravenously administered catecholamines on brain oxygen consumption and blood flow in rats.
12	the effects of lh adrenaline and noradrenaline on testicular blood flow and plasma testosterone concentrations in anaesthetized rats	The effects of l' adrenaline and noradrenaline on testicular blood flow and plasma testosterone concentrations in anesthetized rats.
12	dithiothreitol induced alterations of blood pressure vascular reactivity and aortic microsomal calcium uptake in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Dithiothreitol induced alterations in blood pressure vascular reactivity and aortic microsomal calcium uptake in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	effect of exogenous noradrenaline on local cerebral blood flow after osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier in the rat	Effect of exogenous noradrenaline on local cerebral blood flow after osmotic opening of the rat blood barrier-encephalic.
12	effect of adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and acetylcholine on the blood flow in the vascular bed of the bone marrow	Effect of l' adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and l' acetylcholine on blood flow in the vascular bed of the bone marrow.
12	influence of the cerebrovascular sympathetic innervation on regional flow autoregulation and blood brain barrier function	Apos influence; cerebrovascular sympathetic innervation on the apos; regional flow self-regulation and blood barrier function-encephalic.
12	autoregulation of cerebral blood flow during alcohol infusion	Self-regulation of cerebral blood flow during alcohol infusion.
12	interaction between noradrenergic and serotonergic mechanisms on the central regulation of blood pressure in the rat a study using experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of the locus coeruleus	Interaction of the noradrenergic and serotonergic mechanisms on the central regulation of blood pressure in the rat, using the experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of the locus coeruleus.
12	comparison of the effect of catecholamines on the blood flow in the coronary and in the femoral circulation	The effect of catecholamines on the blood flow in the coronary and femoral circulation.
12	influence of somatostatin on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in the rat	The influence of somatostatin on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in the rat.
12	amphetamine induced increase in rat cerebral blood flow apparent lack of catecholamine involvement	Amphetamine induced an increase in rat cerebral blood flow, suggesting an absence of apos; catecholamine involvement.
12	response of norepinephrine and blood pressure to stress increases with age	The response of norepinephrine and blood pressure to stress increases with age.
12	pressure flow relationships and effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline on the hepatic arterial and portal venous vascular beds of the dog	Pressure flow ratios and effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline on dog hepatic arterial and portal venous vascular beds.
12	blood pressure and mesenteric blood flow in rats during the infusion of biogenic amines effect of supralethal irradiation	Arterial pressure and mesenteric blood flow in rat during infusion of biogenic amines, effect of apos; supralethal irradiation.
12	the potentiating effect of clorgyline and pyrogallol on the blood pressure responses to norepinephrine	L' potentiating effect of clorgyline and pyrogallol on the blood pressure responses to norepinephrine.
12	alpha and beta receptor blockade of isoproterenol and norepinephrine induced effects on regional blood flow and blood flow acceleration	Alpha and beta receptor blockade of l' norepinephrine-induced isoproterenol and effects on regional blood flow and l' blood flow acceleration.
12	clinical assessment of sympathetic tone orthostatic blood pressure responses in borderline primary hypertension	Clinical evaluation of sympathetic tone orthostatic blood pressure responses in apos; primary hypertension limitation.
12	effect of immobilisation on the catecholamine and histamine induced responses of blood pressure and pulse rate in rats adapted to swimming and in controls	In rats adapted to swimming and in controls, histamine induced blood pressure and heart rate responses; the effect of apos; immobilization on catecholamines and histamine.
12	location of cns neurons mediating the blood pressure fall after shock induced fighting in the rat	The localization of cns neurons mediating the blood pressure drop following rat combat shock.
12	interaction studies between three antidepressant drugs chlorimipramine imipramine and zimelidine and noradrenaline tyramine and vagal stimulation on the heart rate and blood pressure in dogs	D&apos studies; interaction between three antidepressants chlorimipramine imipramine and zimelidine and noradrenaline tyramine and vagal stimulation on heart rate and blood pressure in dogs.
12	plasma catecholamines and blood pressure responses to the carotid baroreceptor reflex in essential hypertension	Plasma catecholamines and blood pressure responses to the carotid baroreceptor reflex in the apos; essential hypertension.
12	changes in plasma norepinephrine blood pressure and heart rate during physical activity in hypertensive man	The effect of norepinephrine on the rate of hypertensive maneuvers. s hypertensive activity.
12	effects of catecholamines on cardiovascular response and blood flow distribution to normal tissue and liver tumors in rats	Effects of catecholamines on cardiovascular response and blood flow distribution in normal tissues and liver tumours in rats.
12	estimation of cerebral extraction of circulating compounds by the brain uptake index method influence of circulation time volume injection and cerebral blood flow	Cerebral extraction of circulating compounds by the apo method; index of apo; cerebral absorption influences apo; volume injection in circulation time and cerebral blood flow.
12	uterine blood flow and plasma norepinephrine changes during maternal stress in the pregnant ewe	Uterine blood flow and plasma norepinephrine changes during maternal stress in pregnant sheep.
12	clonidine increases the rate of blood pressure recovery from splanchnic nerve stimulation	Clonidine increases the rate of blood pressure recovery from splanchnic nerve stimulation.
12	quantitative changes in regional cerebral blood flow of rats induced by alpha and beta adrenergic stimulants	Quantitative changes in regional cerebral blood flow in rats induced by alpha- and beta-adrenergic stimulants.
12	raised blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline concentrations in teenagers and young adults selected from an open population	Increased blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline levels in adolescents and young adults selected from an open-label population.
12	transient responses of rabbit cerebral blood vessels to norepinephrine correlation with intrinsic myogenic tone	Transient responses of rabbit cerebral blood vessels to norepinephrine correlation with intrinsic myogenic tone.
12	the concept of autoregulation of total blood flow and its role in hypertension	The concept of self-regulation of total blood flow and its role in hypertension.
12	effects of norepinephrine vasopressin isoproterenol and histamine on blood flow oxygen uptake and capillary filtration coefficient in the colon of the anesthetized dog	The effects of norepinephrine vasopressin isoproterenol and lidos; histamine on blood flow; oxygen in the blood flow and on the hair filtration coefficient in the colon of the anesthetized dog.
12	mechanism of enhanced blood pressure rise after reclipping following removal of a renal artery clip in rats	In rats, the mechanism of increase in arterial pressure increases after re-classification; a renal artery clip; a d&apos ablation.
12	effect of diphenylhydantoin on blood pressure of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of Diphenylhydantoin on blood pressure of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	a radioangiographic study of the effects of catecholamines on uteroplacental blood flow in the rhesus monkey	A radiographic study of the effects of catecholamines on utero-placental blood flow in the rhesus monkey.
12	ethnic differences in blood pressure with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 a working population	Ethnic differences in blood pressure with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 a working population.
12	increased sympathetic activity and blood pressure in young asymptomatic men with organic t wave aberrations in the electrocardiogram	Increased l' sympathetic activity and blood pressure in young asymptomatic men with organic aberrations of t waves in the apos; electrocardiogram.
12	renal blood flow and noradrenaline secretion during treatment with propranolol	Renal blood flow and noradrenaline secretion during treatment with propranolol.
12	effects of tiodazosin praxosin trimazosin and phentolamine on blood pressure heart rate and on pre and postsynaptic alpha adrenergic receptors in the rat	Effects of tiodazosine, praxosin, trimazosin and phentolamine on heart rate and on alpha-adrenergic pre- and post-> synaptic receptors in rats.
12	blood pressure plasma catecholamines and sympathetic outflow in pithed shr and wky rats	Blood pressure plasma catecholamines and l' sympathetic flow in decerebrate and wypsky rats.
12	effects of rate of blood flow on fractional extraction and on uptake of infused noradrenaline by brown adipose tissue in vivo	Effects of blood flow on fractional extraction and noradrenaline uptake perfused by brown adipose tissue in vivo.
13	changes in the potassium content of sea urchin eggs on fertilization	Change in the potassium content of sea urchin eggs at fertilization.
13	the loss of potassium from frog nerves in anoxia and other conditions	Loss of potassium from frog nerves in anoxia and other conditions.
13	clinical potassium problems	Uh, clinical potassium problems.
13	experiments on the role of potassium in the blocking of neuromuscular transmission by curare and other drugs	Experiments on the role of potassium in the blockage of neuromuscular transmission by curare and other drugs.
13	effect of potassium deficiency on carbon dioxide cation and phosphate content of muscle with a note on the carbon dioxide content of human muscle	Effect of potassium deficiency on carbon dioxide cation and phosphate content of muscle with a note on carbon dioxide content of human muscle.
13	potassium transport in human erythrocytes evidence for a three compartment system	Potassium transport in human erythrocytes indicates apos; a three-compartment system.
13	apparent violations of the all or none law in relation to potassium in the protoplasm	Apparent violations of the law... all or nothing with respect to potassium in the protoplasm.
13	permeation and diffusion of k ions in frog muscle	Permeability and diffusion of k ions in frog muscle.
13	studies on the sodium and potassium transport in rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Studies of sodium and potassium transport in rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
13	intracellular potassium compartments in nitella axillaris	The intracellular potassium compartments of nitella axillaris.
13	potassium ion current in the squid giant axon dynamic characteristic	Potassium ion current in the giant axon characteristic dynamical squid.
13	average potassium concentration of the human body as a function of age	Average potassium concentration in the human body as a function of age.
13	potassium ions and the inhibitory process in the crayfish stretch receptor	Potassium ions and the inhibitory process in the cell receptor; crayfish stretch.
13	an all ornone response in thh release of potassium by yeast cells with methylene blue and other basic redox dyes	An all ornone response in potassium release from yeast cells with methylene blue and d' other basic redox dyes.
13	the efflux of potassium from electroplaques of electric eels	L' efflux of potassium from electroplates of electric eels.
13	rate of antagonism of tubocurarine by potassium ions	D' antagonism of tubocurarine by potassium ions.
13	estimation of total body fat from potassium 40 content	Estimation of total body fat from the potassium content 40.
13	potassium and the recovery of arterial smooth muscle after cold storage	Potassium and the recovery of arterial smooth muscle from cold storage.
13	radiocalcium release by stimulated and potassium treated sartorius muscles of the frog	The release of radiocalcium from the sartorius muscles of frogs, stimulated and treated with potassium.
13	accumulation of potassium anaerobically by renal medullary slices	Anaerobic accumulation of potassium by renal medullary slices.
13	the role of calcium ions in the acceleration of resting muscle glycolysis by extracellular potassium	The role of calcium ions in the acceleration of resting muscle glycolysis by extracellular potassium.
13	role of potassium in the oxidative metabolism of micrococcus sodonensis	The role of potassium in the oxidative metabolism of micrococcus sodonensis micrococcus.
13	factors influencing germination and outgrowth of bacillus popilliae spores i effect of potassium ions	Factors influencing germination and spore growth of the bacillus popilliae effect of potassium ions.
13	effect of high oxygen tension on potassium retentivity and colony formation of baker s yeast	The effect of high oxygen tension on potassium retention and baker yeast colony formation.
13	lysosomes in the renal papillae of rats formation induced by potassium deficient diet	The lysosomes in the renal papillae of rats form formation induced by a potassium-deficient diet.
13	some differences in the action of penicillin bacitracin and vancomycin on bacillus megaterium	Some differences in the action of penicillin bacitracin and vancomycin on megaterium bacillus.
13	nasal salt excretion and the possible function of the cloaca in water conservation	L' nasal salt excretion and possible role of the cloaca in water conservation.
13	action of the calcium antagonists cocaine and ethanol on contraction and potassium efflux of smooth muscle	L' action of the calcium antagonists cocaine and ethanol on contraction and l' potassium efflux of smooth muscle.
13	delayed rectification and anomalous rectification in frog s skeletal muscle membrane	Frog skeletal muscle membrane delayed rectification and abnormal rectification.
13	hospital experience with cardiac resuscitation	Uh, hospital-based cardiac resuscitation experiment.
13	antibiotic sensitivity of proteus species	The antibiotic sensitivity of protein species.
13	the enzymatic response of astrocytes to various ions in vitro	The enzymatic response of astrocytes to various ions in vitro.
13	time factors in interhemispheric transfer of learning	Temporal factors in inter-hemispheric transfer of learning.
13	the genus veillonella 3 hydrogen sulfide production by growing cultures	Production of d&apos sulfide; growing cultures of the genus veillonella 3 hydrogen.
13	potassium loss during galvanotaxis of slime mold	Loss of potassium during galvanotaxis of the myxomycetes.
13	the metabolism of the volatile amines vii the clinical significance of two components of the blood ammonia level	The metabolism of volatile amines vii the clinical significance of two components of the ammonia concentration in blood.
13	density gradient centrifugation of a murine leukemia virus	Dapos density gradient centrifugation is a murine leukemic virus.
13	phosphate incorporation in desheathed nerves effects of potassium and calcium ions	L' phosphate incorporation in effects of potassium and calcium ions on depleted nerves.
13	the relation of potassium to digitalis effectiveness and toxicity	Relationship between potassium and digitalis; effectiveness and toxicity of digitalis.
13	electrophorus adenosine triphosphatase sodium activated exchange after n ethylaleimide treatment	L' exchange activated by apos; electrophoresis of apos; adenosine triphosphatase sodium after treatment with apos; ethylaleimide is activated.
13	erythritol production by a yeastlike fungus	Apos; erythritol produced by a yeastlike fungus.
13	the after potential that follows trains of impulses in frog muscle fibers	L' after-potential that follows the trains d' impulses in frog muscle fibers.
13	the recovery of contractile ability following a contracture in skeletal muscle	Recovery of contractile capacity following contracture in skeletal muscle.
13	photosensitivity of the frog iris	Photosensitivity of the leaf; frog irises.
13	the interaction of some stimulant and depressant drugs on the frog heart	L' the interaction of certain stimulants and depressant drugs on frog heart muscle.
13	elasticity of articular cartilage effect of ions and viscous solutions	Apos elasticity; articular cartilage effect of ions and viscous solutions.
13	studies on the pathogenesis of fever xii electrolytic factorys influencing the release of endogenous pyrogen from polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Studies on the pathogenesis of fever xii plants d' electrolysis influencing the release of endogenous pyrogens from polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
13	correlation of speciation with lytic responses of the achromobacter	Speciation correlates with lytic responses of the achromobacterium.
13	glycolic acid oxidation by escherichia coli adapted to glycolate	Glycolic acid by escherichia coli adapted to glycolate.
13	nutrition of leptospira pomona iii calcium magnesium and potassium requirements	Nutrition of leptospira pomona iii calcium magnesium and potassium requirements.
13	blood free medium for the rapid growth of pasteurella tularensis	Bloodless environment for the rapid growth of pasteurella tularensis.
13	changes in serum and urinary potassium levels during profound hypothermia in man	Changes in serum and urinary potassium levels during severe hypothermia in men.
13	infectivity of histone poliovirus ribonucleic acid preparations	Infectivity of ribonucleic acid preparations of poliovirus histones.
13	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xii ion activation of adenosine triphosphatase in membranes of marine bacterial cells	Nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xii ion activation of adenosine triphosphatase in membranes of marine bacterial cells.
13	environmental radiation measurements of dose rates	Measurements of dose rates by ambient radiation.
13	the mechanism of isotonic water transport	The mechanism of isotonic transport of l' water.
13	specificity of potassium activated phosphodiesterase of escherichia coli	The specificity of the potassium-activated phosphodiesterase of escherichia coli was demonstrated.
13	effect of ions on the efflux of acetylcholine from peripheral nerve	The effect of ions on the peripheral nerve; efflux of d' acetylcholine.
13	anion permeability of the olfactory receptive membrane	Anionic permeability of the olfactory receptive membrane.
13	time course of tea induced anomalous rectification in squid giant axons	L' time course of tea induced an abnormal rectification in squid giants.
13	the electroosmotic effects arising from the interaction of the selectively anion and selectively cation permeable parts of mosaic membranes	The electroosmotic effects arising from the interaction of the selectively permeable parts with the anion and the cations selectively permeable to the mosaic membranes.
13	factors which modify the effect of sodium and potassium on bacterial cell membranes	Factors modifying the apos; effect of sodium and potassium on bacterial cell membranes.
13	influence of the physical state of the bacterial cell membrane upon the rate of respiration	L' influence of the apos; physical state of the bacterial cell membrane on respiration rate.
13	the suppression of the late after potential in rubidium containing frog muscle fibers	Removal of the late potential in rubidium containing frog muscle fibers.
13	effects of internal and external ionic environment on excitability of squid giant axon a macromolecular approach	Apos effects; internal and external ionic environment on apos; apos excitability; squid giant axon using macromolecular approach.
13	reisolation and emendation of description of vibrio marinus russell ford	Reisolation and modification of description of vibrio marinus russell Ford.
13	small bowel ulceration associated with enteric coated potassium chloride and hydrochlorothiazide	Ulceration of the intestine; small intestine associated with enteric potassium chloride and hydrochlorothiazide.
13	stabilization of pertussis vaccine in the presence of benzethonium chloride	Stabilization of pertussis vaccine in the presence of benzethonium chloride.
13	tracer and non tracer potassium fluxes in frog sartorius muscle and the kinetics of net potassium movement	Tracer and non-tracer potassium fluxes in frog sartorius muscle and kinetics of net potassium movement.
13	response of the infant kidney to diuretic drugs	Reaction of the infant kidney to diuretics.
13	the role of the microbial flora in uremia ii uremic colitis cardiovascular lesions and biochemical observations	The role of the microbial flora in uremia ii Cardiovascular lesions and biochemical observations of uremic colitis.
13	relation between membrane potential changes and tension in barnacle muscle fibers	Relationship between membrane potential changes and tension in barnacle muscle fibers.
13	the relation between the late after potential and the size of the transverse tubular system of frog muscle	The relationship between the late potential and the size of the transverse tubular system of frog muscle.
13	treatment of congestive heart failure with triamterene	Treatment of congestive heart failure with triamterene.
13	cationic glass electrode response in aqueous solutions of sodium chloride and potassium chloride	Cationic glass electrode in aqueous solutions of sodium chloride and potassium chloride.
13	serotonin and adenosine triphosphate synergistic effect on the beat frequency of cilia of mussel gills	Synergistic effect of serotonin and apos; adenosine triphosphate on the beat frequency of gill cilia of mussels.
13	gastric secretion mechanism for production of hydrogen ions	Gastric secretion mechanisms for production of hydrogen ions.
13	the time course of the loss and recovery of contracture ability in frog striated muscle following exposure to ca free solutions	L' temporal evolution of loss and restoration of contracture capacity in frog striated muscle following exposure to free Ca solutions.
13	anomalous rectification in the squid giant axon injected with tetraethylammonium chloride	Abnormal correction in the squid giant axon injected with tetraethylammonium chloride.
13	studies on ion accumulation in muscle cells	Studies on the accumulation of ions in muscle cells.
13	reversal response elicited in nonbeating cilia of paramecium by membrane depolarizatin	Membrane depolarizatin induced by induced depolarization in nonbeating cilia of paramecium causes an inverse reaction.
13	effects of minerals on neomycin production by streptomyces fradiae	Effects of minerals on neomycin production by streptomyces fradiae.
13	synthesis of malformin by an enzyme preparation from aspergillus niger	Synthesis of malformin by an enzyme preparation from d'apos; aspergillus niger.
13	microbial metabolism of amino ketones aminoacetone formation from 1 aminopropan 2 ol by a dehydrgenase in escerichia coli	Microbial aminoketone metabolism D' aminoacetone formation from 1 aminopropane 2 o by dehydrgenase in escerichia coli.
13	in vivo stability of bacteriophage t4 messenger ribonucleic acid	In vivo stability of bacteriophage t4 messenger ribonucleic acid.
13	nutritional requirements for germination outgrowth and vegetative growth of putrefactive anaerobe 3679 in a chemically defined medium	The nutritional requirements for germination of vegetative and vegetative growth of the putrefied anaerobe 3679 in a chemically defined medium.
13	induced and spontaneous movements of potassium ions into mitochondria	Spontaneous induced movements of potassium ions in mitochondria.
13	the action of ketonic prostaglandins on the guinea pig myometrium	L' action of ketone prostaglandins on the guinea pig myometrium.
13	the effect of membrane fixed charges on diffusion potentials and streaming potentials	L' effect of membrane fixed charges on diffusion and flux potentials.
13	tracer and nontracer potassium fluxes in squid giant axons and the effects of changes in external potassium concentration and membrane potential	Tracer and non-tracer potassium fluxes in the giant squid axons and the effects of changes in external potassium concentration and membrane potential.
13	enhanced permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction studies of the role of ca	Increased permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction studies on the role of ca.
13	the electrical and mechanical activity of the esophageal cell of ascaris lumbricoides	L' the electrical and mechanical activity of the esophageal cell of l' ascaris lumbricoides.
13	the further preparation of inorganic cationic yeasts and some of their chief properties	Further preparation of inorganic cationic yeasts and some of their major properties.
13	iodide transport inhibition by agents reacting at the membrane	Lapos; iodide transport inhibition by membrane-reactive agents.
13	experimental pain in general practice	The experimental pain in general practice.
13	altered effect of potassium ions on cerebral respiration in vitro following subcortical lesions	Modified effect of potassium ions on cerebral respiration in vitro following cerebral injury at-corticalales.
13	contribution of protein and lipid components to the salt response of envelopes of an extremely halophilic bacterium	Contribution of protein and lipid components to the saline response of an extremely halophilic bacterium.
13	actions of calcium and certain multivalent cations on potassium contracture of guinea pig s taenia coli	Action of calcium and certain multivalent cations on potassium contracture of guinea pig taenia coli.
13	release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	D'apos release; neurohypophysial hormones in vitro.
13	the distribution of 14c sucrose within the skeletal muscle of the rat in vitro	The distribution of sucrose 14c in the skeletal muscle of the rat in vitro.
13	mechanism of action of phenethyl alcohol breakdown of the cellular permeability barrier	Mechanisms of cellular permeability barrier decomposition; action of phenethyl alcohol.
13	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus ii synthetic media for the production of streptomycin	Fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus ii synthetic media for the production of streptomycin.
13	effects of univalent cations on the inductive formation of nitrate reductase	Effects of univalent cations on the inductive formation of nitrate reductase.
13	caffeine and potassium induced contractures of frog striated muscle fibers in hypertonic solutions	Both caffeine and potassium induced contractions of frog striated muscle fibers in hypertonic solutions.
13	analysis of depolarizing and hyperpolarizing inactivation responses in gymnotid electroplaques	Analysis of depolarizing and hyperpolarizing inactivation responses in daily electroplasques.
13	cation effects on chloride fluxes and accumulation levels in barley roots	Cation effects on chloride fluxes and chloride levels; root accumulation in barley.
13	nickel substitution for calcium in excitation contraction coupling of skeletal muscle	Nickel substitution for calcium in excitation coupling-skeletal muscle contraction.
13	active transport by the cecropia midgut ii fine structure of the midgut epithelium	Active transport by the intestine; middle intestine ii fine structure of the intestine; middle intestine.
13	the relation between external potassium concentration and the relaxation rate of potassium induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The relationship between external potassium concentration and the relaxation rate of frog skeletal muscle potassium-induced contractions.
13	the effect of ph on the 36 cl efflux from frog skeletal muscle	L' effect of ph on apos; 36 cl efflux of frog skeletal muscle.
13	potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the crayfish	Potassium shrinkage in single muscle fibers of crayfish.
13	the effects of urea and hydrochlorothiazide on the renal functions of rat and domestic fowl	The effects of urea and epos; hydrochlorothiazide on the renal function of rats and domestic poultry.
13	the distribution of free amino acids in subcellular fractions of guinea pig brain	The distribution of free amino acids in subcellular fractions of guinea pig brain.
13	cation transport in escherichia coli vi k exchange	Cation transport in escherichia coli exchange vi k k.
13	the influence of the intracellular potential on potassium uptake by beetroot tissue	L' influence of the intracellular potential on apos; absorption of potassium by beet tissue.
13	excitation of mytilus smooth muscle	Excitation of mytilus smooth muscle.
13	alcohol dehydrogenase activity and electron transport in living yeast	Apos activity; alcohol dehydrogenase and electron transport in live yeast.
13	neurosecretory cell capable of conducting impulse in rats	A neurosecretory cell capable of conducting impulses in rats.
13	application of the sucrose gap method to determine the ionic basis of the membrane potential of smooth muscle	Application of the sucrose gap method to determine the ionic basis of the membrane potential of smooth muscle.
13	light enhanced potassium absorption by corn leaf tissue	Light increased l' potassium absorption by maize leaf tissue.
13	ammonium ion concentration in the primitive ocean	Concentration of ammonium ions in the primitive ocean.
13	effects of external calcium deprivation on single muscle fibers	Effects of external calcium deficiency on simple muscle fibres.
13	the function of antidiuretic hormone in the sheep	The function of antidiuretic hormone in sheep.
13	factors modifying renal tubular bicarbonate reabsorption in the dog	Factors modifying renal tubular bicarbonate reabsorption in dogs.
13	control of glycolysis in cerebral cortex slices	Control of glycolysis in cerebral cortical slices.
13	foam separation of pseudomonas fluorescens and bacillus subtilis var niger	Separation of pseudomonas fluorescens and bacillus subtilis var niger mosses.
13	the effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the potassium exchange of human platelets	L' effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the apos; potassium exchange of human platelets.
13	metabolic effects of human growth hormone in corticosteroid treated children	Metabolic effects of human growth hormone in children treated with corticosteroids.
13	the effect of water diuresis on electrolyte excretion in unanaesthetized dogs	The effect of water diuresis on the immune system; excretion of electrolytes in unanaesthetized dogs.
13	potassium stimulated respiration and intra cellular calcium releae in from skeletal muscle	Potassium stimulated respiration and intracellular calcium was released from skeletal muscle.
13	membrane currents at large positive internal potentials in single myelinated nerve fibres of rana pipiens	Membrane currents with large positive internal potentials in individual rana pipiens myelinated nerve fibers.
13	phospholipids of thiobacillus thiooxidans	The phospholipids of thiobacillus thiooxidans.
13	the dependence on external cations of the oxygen consumption of mammalian non myelinated fibres at rest and during activity	The dependence on external cations of the consumption of nonmyelinated mammalian fibers at rest and during pregnancy; activity.
13	quinine and caffeine effects on 45ca movements in frog sartorius muscle	Effects of quinine and caffeine on 45ca movements in frog's sewing muscle.
13	acetylcholine and calcium on membrane permeability and contraction of intestinal smooth muscle	Acetylcholine and calcium on membrane permeability and contraction of the intestinal smooth muscle.
13	binding of ca ions by paramecium caudatum	The binding of ca ions by paramecium caudatum.
13	effects of atp on the interaction of ca mg and k with fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Effects of apos; apos on apos; interaction of ca mg and k with fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle.
13	the action of caffeine on the activation of the contractile mechanism in straited muscle fibres	L' action of caffeine on the apos; activation of the contractile mechanism in stratified muscle.
13	resting and action potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method in the superior cervical ganglion of the rabbit	Action recorded by the sucrose partition method in the upper cervical ganglion of the rabbit.
13	calcium binding properties of sarcoplasmic reticulum as influenced by atp caffeine quinine and local anesthetics	The calcium binding properties of sarcoplasmic reticulum are influenced by l&apos quinine caffeine; atp and local anesthetics.
13	changes of total water and sucrose space accompanying induced ion uptake or phosphate swelling of rat liver mitochondria	Changes in total apo, water and sucrose space accompanying apo, phosphate absorption, or swelling in rat liver mitochondria induce changes in apo; space.
13	resting and spike potentials of skeletal muscle fibres of salt water elasmobranch and teleost fish	Resting potential and peak potential of skeletal muscle fibers in saltwater and teleost fish elasmobranchs.
13	permeability changes associated with the action potential in procaine treated crayfish abdominal muscle fibers	Procaine-treated crayfish; action in the abdominal muscle fibers; permeability changes associated with the potential for d*apos.
13	the influence of ionic strength on potassium contractures and calcium movements in frog muscle	L' the influence of ionic strength on potassium contractions and calcium movements in frog muscle.
13	resting and stimulated respiration in vitro in the central nervous system regional distribution and relation to cell density	Resting and stimulated respiration in vitro in the regional distribution of the central nervous system and cell density dependence.
13	removal of potassium negative resistance in perfused squid giant axons	Suppression of negative potassium resistance in perfused giant squid axons.
13	decreased k conductance produced by ba in frog sartorius fibers	Ba-induced k conductance decreased in frog sartorius fibres.
13	an extrarenal mechanism of potassium adaptation	An extrarenal mechanism of potassium adaptation.
13	morphological and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria from fetal neonatal and adult liver and from neoplastic tissues	Morphological and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria from neonatal and adult fetal liver and neoplastic tissues.
13	adrenaline mechanism of action on the pacemaker potential in cardiac purkinje fibers	Mechanism(s); action of epos; adrenaline on the pacemaker potential in cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	salt transport in valonia inhibition of potassium uptake by small hydrostatic pressures	Salt transport in the valon inhibits potassium uptake by small hydrostatic pressures.
13	4 leucine oxytocin natriuretic diuretic and antivasopressin polypeptide	Diorotic natriuretic leucine oxytocin and antivasopressin polypeptide.
13	cytochemistry of phosphatases in myxococcus xanthus	The cytochemistry of phosphatases in xanthus myxococcus.
13	electrical signs of new membrane production during cleavage of rana pipiens eggs	Electrical signs of production of new membrane during cleavage of rana pipiens eggs.
13	a proton spin echo study of the state of water in frog nerves	Study of apos; state of apos; water in frog nerves by proton spin echo.
13	ionic mechanisms controlling behavioral responses of paramecium to mechanical stimulation	Ionic mechanisms controlling behavioral responses of paramecia to mechanical stimulation.
13	exchangeable potassium study in patients undergoing chronic haemodialysis	Traceable potassium study in patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis.
13	action of steroidal diamines on active transport and permeability properties of escherichia coli	Action of steroidal diamines on active transport and permeability properties of escherichia coli.
13	morphology and electrophysiological properties of squid giant axons perfused intracellularly with protease solution	The morphology and electrophysiological properties of squid giant axons perfused intracellularly with protease solution.
13	stomatal opening role of potassium uptake by guard cells	Role of cells; stomatal opening of cells; potassium absorption by guard cells.
13	ventricular function in noncardiacs with alcoholic fatty liver role of ethanol in the production of cardiomyopathy	Ventricular function in non-cardiac with the alcoholic fatty liver role of ethanol in the production of cardiomyopathy.
13	potential responses of nutrient membrane of frog s stomach to step changes in external k and cl concentrations	Potential responses of the nutritive membrane of the frog stomach to gradual changes in external k and cl.
13	exchangeability of radioactive acetylcholine with the bound acetylcholine of synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles	Exchange of radioactive acetylcholine with the bound acetylcholine of synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles.
13	thermal metabolic blood and circulatory adjustments in prolonged outdoor exercise	Thermal adjustments to blood and circulatory metabolism during prolonged outdoor exercise.
13	actions of some anions on electrical properties and mechanical threshold of frog twitch muscle	Action of some anions on the electrical properties and mechanical threshold of frog-striking muscle.
13	effects of potentiators of muscular contraction on binding of cations by sarcoplasmic reticulum	Effects of potentiators of muscle contraction on cation binding by the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
13	potassium in gastric juice under non steady state conditions	Potassium in gastric juice under unstable conditions.
13	a note on transmembrane potential in dermal melanophores of the frog and movement of melanin granules	A note on transmembrane potential in frog dermal melanophores and movement of melanin granules.
13	expansion of the inner membrane compartment and its relation to mitochondrial volume and ion transport	Expansion of the inner membrane compartment and its relation to mitochondrial volume and ion transport.
13	ionic conductances of the surface and transverse tubular membranes of frog sartorius fibers	The ionic conductances of the superficial and transverse tubular membranes of frog sartorius fibers.
13	action potentials afterpotentials and excitation contraction coupling in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules	"""Actions potentials afterpotentials and excitation contraction coupling in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules."""
13	adipose tissue pyruvate kinase properties and interconversion of two active forms	Fat tissue pyruvate kinase properties and interconversion of two active forms.
13	the dependence on dicarboxylic acids and energy of citrate accumulation in depleted rat liver mitochondria	Dependence on acid; on dicarboxylic acids and acid; energy of acid; citrate accumulation in depleted rat liver mitochondria.
13	biophysical and mechanical properties of red and white muscle fibres in fish	The biophysical and mechanical properties of red and white muscle fibers in fish.
13	a pharmacological study of the toxin in a cnidarian chironex fleckeri southcott	A pharmacological study of the toxin in a chironex fleckeri Southcott cnidary.
13	control of teichoic acid and teichuronic acid biosyntheses in chemostat cultures of bacillus subtilis var niger	Control of the biosynthesis of teichoic acid and teichuronic acid in chemostat cultures of bacillus subtilis var niger.
13	vitamin d intoxication with hypernatraemia potassium and water depletion and mental depression	Vitamin D poisoning with potassium hypernatraemia and vomiting; mental depression and water exhaustion.
13	the attachment of polyuridylic acid to reticulocyte ribosomes	L' attachment of l' polyuridylic acid to reticulocyte ribosomes.
13	the influence of h on the membrane potential and ion fluxes of nitella	L' influence of h on the membrane potential and ionic fluxes of nitella.
13	the role of calcium in excitation contraction coupling of lobster muscle	The role of calcium in the excitation coupling-contraction of lobster muscle.
13	the clinical spectrum of renal potassium wasting	Well, the clinical spectrum of renal potassium loss.
13	inhibition of membrane transport in streptococcus faecalis by uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation and its relationship to proton conduction	L' inhibition of membrane transport in streptococcus faecalis by uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation and its relation to proton conduction.
13	the interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying spontaneous transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	L' interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying spontaneous transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals.
13	evidence for one functional phenylalanyl trna binding site on the 30s ribosomal subunit	Evidence of the existence of a functional phenylalanyl trna binding site on the 30s ribosomal unit.
13	use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems for biophysical studies of rhinoviruses	Use of d&apos systems; ultracentrifugation zonal for biophysical studies of rhinoviruses.
13	accumulation of caesium and rubidium in vivo by red and white muscles of the rat	Cesium and rubidium accumulation in vivo by the red and white muscles of the rat.
13	ventricular arrhythmias related to antibiotic usage in dogs	Apos-related ventricular arrhythmia; use of antibiotics in dogs.
13	potassium corticosterone and adrenocorticotropic hormone release in vitro	In vitro studies of the effects of potassium corticosterone and adrenocorticotropic hormones.
13	the effects of calcium and magnesium ions on the adenosine triphosphatase and inosine triphosphatase activities of myosin a	Effects of calcium and magnesium ions on apos; adenosine triphosphatase and apos; inosine triphosphatase activities of myosin a.
13	quantitative determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in rat brain	Quantitative determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in rat brain.
13	adenohypophysial transmembrane potentials polarity reversal by elevated external potassium ion concentration	The polarity of adenohypophysial transmembrane potentials is reversed by increasing external potassium ion concentration.
13	effect of divalent cations on potassium conductance of squid axons determination of surface charge	Effect of divalent cations on potassium conductance of squid axons surface charge determination.
13	a theoretical examination of ionic interactions between neural and non neural membranes	A theoretical examination of ionic interactions between neural and non-neural membranes.
13	influence of calcium and magnesium on manganese absorption	L' influence of calcium and magnesium on apos; manganese absorption.
13	potassium inactivation and impedance changes during spike electrogenesis in eel electroplaques	L' inactivation and apo; potassium impedance changes during apo; peak electrogenesis in eel electroplates.
13	striated muscle fibers inactivation of contraction induced by shortening	Inactivation by striated muscle fibers of contraction induced by shortening.
13	regulation of protein synthesis in zoospores of blastocladiella	The regulation of protein synthesis in zoospores of blastocladiella.
13	intersubstrate competitions and evidence for compartmentation in mitochondria	Substrate competition and evidence for mitochondrial compartmentalization.
13	neuroglia gliosis and focal epilepsy	Neuroglie gliosis and focal epilepsy.
13	effect of chemicals on the early stages of tobacco mosaic virus protein polymerization	Effect of chemicals on the early stages of tobacco mosaic virus protein polymerization.
13	ionic permeability of the inhibitory postsynaptic membrane of lobster muscle fibers	Ion permeability of lobster muscle fibers post-inhibitory synaptic membrane.
13	analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage clamp currents in perfused squid axons bathed in solutions of high potassium	Analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage clamp currents in perfused squid axons bathed in potassium-rich solutions.
13	changes in extracellular potassium concentration produced by neuronal activity in the central nervous system of the leech	Impulse-induced changes in extracellular potassium concentration; neural activity in the central nervous system of the leech.
13	after effects of nerve impulses on signalling in the central nervous system of the leech	After the effects of nerve impulses on signalling in the central nervous system of the leech.
13	oesophageal obstruction and ulceration caused by oral potassium therapy	Esophageal obstruction and ulceration caused by potassium oral therapy.
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes i	Co-operative effects in transport models; state of repair; equilibrium across membranes i.
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes 3 simulation of potassium ion transport in nerve	Co-operative effects in models of transport to l'apos; steady state across membranes 3 simulation of transport of l'apos; potassium ion in the nerve.
13	the steps between depolarization and the increase in the respiration of frog skeletal muscle	The steps between depolarization and l' increase in the respiration of frog skeletal muscle.
13	a lesion of the transverse tubules of skeletal muscle	The lesion of the transverse tubules of the skeletal muscle.
13	some effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscles	Some effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction and contraction coupling were observed in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the pharmacology of the cholinoceptor in muscle preparations of ascaris lumbricoides var suum	Pharmacology of cholinoceptor in muscle preparations of ascaris lumbricoides var suum.
13	solution conformation of valinomycin potassium ion complex	Conformation of the valinomycin potassium ion complex in solution.
13	modified two phase system for partition of bacillus macerans spores	A modified two-phase system for the distribution of Maceran's bacillus spores.
13	potassium balance and acid base changes in patients undergoing regular haemodialysis therapy	Pesticide balance and acid base changes in patients with regular haemodialysis therapy.
13	effects of caffeine on crayfish muscle fibers ii refractoriness and factors influencing recovery repriming of contractile responses	Effects of caffeine on muscle fibers; crayfish ii refractory and factors influencing recovery of contractile responses.
13	falsely high plasma potassium values in patients with hyperaldosteronism	Falsely elevated plasma potassium values in patients with hyperaldosterone.
13	antagonism by ddt of the effect of valinomycin on a synthetic membrane	Ddt antagonist of the apos; effect of valinomycin on a synthetic membrane.
13	ultrastructural studies on mitochondrial swelling	Ultrastructural studies on mitochondrial swelling.
13	the mechanism of the paralysing action of tetramisole on ascaris somatic muscle	The mechanism of l' paralyzing action of tetramisole on ascaris somatic muscle.
13	drinking and eating elicited by cortical spreading depression	You know, drinking and eating caused by the depression spread by the cortex.
13	independence of antimineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of various steroids	Anti-mineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of various steroids independent.
13	inactivation of the potassium conductance and related phenomena caused by quaternary ammonium ion injection in squid axons	Inactivation of the potassium conductance and related phenomena caused by the apos; quaternary ammonium ion injection into the squid axons.
13	effect of potassium supplements on the exchangeable potassium in chronic heart disease	Effect of potassium supplements on exchangeable potassium in chronic heart disease.
13	mode of action of vibriocin	This is the mode of action of the vibriocin.
13	mechanical threshold as a factor in excitation contraction coupling	Mechanical threshold as a factor in d&apos contraction coupling.
13	slow synaptic excitation in sympathetic ganglion cells evidence for synaptic inactivation of potassium conductance	L' slow synaptic excitation in sympathetic ganglion cells suggests synaptic inactivation of potassium conductance.
13	calcium and potassium currents of the membrane of a barnacle muscle fibre in relation to the calcium spike	The amount of calcium and potassium in the membrane of a barnacle muscle fiber relative to the peak of calcium.
13	structure and some contractile properties of fast and slow muscles of the chicken	Chicken structure and some contractile properties of fast and slow muscles.
13	urine concentration and dilution in hypokalemic and hypercalcemic dogs	Disposition and dilution of urine concentration in hypokalemic and hypercalcemic dogs.
13	ventricular parasystole in acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction is ventricular parasystole.
13	the effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on the ion distribution in the vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on the ion distribution in the vas deferens of the guinea pig.
13	electrocardiographic changes and plasma potassium levels in patients on regular haemodialysis	Electrocardiographic changes and plasma potassium levels in patients on routine hemodialysis.
13	uptake of antimony potassium tartrate by mouse liver slices	Dapos tartrate; antimony tartrate, potassium, uptake by thin slices of mouse liver.
13	partial purification and properties of carbamoyl phosphate synthetase of alaska pea pisum sativum l cultivar alaska	Partial purification and properties of carbamoyl phosphate synthetase from alaska pea cultivar pisum sativum l.
13	digoxin intoxication the relationship of clinical presentation to serum digoxin concentration	Digoxin toxicity the relationship between serum digoxin concentration and clinical presentation.
13	effect of potassium ions on the attachment of polyribosomes to the membranes in lysates of exponential phase cells of bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Effect of potassium ions on apos; attachment of polyribosomes to membranes in lysates of exponential phase cells of the amyloliquefacian bacillus.
13	shark pit organs enhancement of mechanosensitivity by potassium ions	Shark pit organs increase mechanosensitivity by potassium ions.
13	ribonucleic acid dependent deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase in visna virus	Lapos polymerase; deoxyribonucleic acid dependent on apos; ribonucleic acid in visna virus.
13	the effects of probenecid and thiazides and their combination on the urinary excretion of electrolytes and on acid base equilibrium	The effects of probenecides and thiazides and their combination on the urinary excretion of electrolytes and lytes; acid balance-base.
13	properties and substrate specificities of the phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases of aesculus species	Properties and substrate specificity of the phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases of l&apos species; esculus.
13	cyclic adenosine and guaosine monophosphates and gucagon effect on liver membrane potentials	Cyclic adenosine and guaosine monophosphates and effect of gucagon on hepatic membrane potentials.
13	conditions for activity of glutaminase in kidney mitochondria	The conditions of l' glutaminase activity in the renal mitochondria.
13	renal tubular acidosis and autoimmune liver disease	Auto liver disease and renal tubular acid-immune.
13	potassium transport in neurospora evidence for a multisite carrier at high ph	Neurospore potassium transport indicates the existence of apos; a high ph multisite transporter.
13	fetal kidney in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased amounts of potassium	Anomalies in the development of the fetal kidney in potato cultures; organs induced by reduced amounts of potassium.
13	cyclic adenosine monophosphate potassium dependent action on vascular smooth muscle membrane potential	Potassium-dependent action of cyclic adenosine monophosphate on vascular smooth muscle membrane potential.
13	concentration of rift valley fever and chikungunya viruses by precipitation	Concentration of rift valley fever and chikungunya viruses by precipitation.
13	structural and nonstructural proteins of saint louis encephalitis virus	Structural and nonstructural proteins of potato viruses; Saint-Louis encephalitis.
13	epinephrine induced vacuole formation in parotid gland cells and its independence of the secretory process	Epinephrine induced vacuole formation in parotid gland cells and its independence from the secretory process.
13	cooperative control of potassium accumulation by ouabain in vascular smooth muscle	The cooperative control of potassium accumulation by etapos; ouabain in vascular smooth muscle.
13	inhibition of host protein synthesis during infection of escherichi coli by bacteriophage t4 3 inhibition by ghosts	Inhibition of protein synthesis of the host during apo; infection of escherichi coli by apo; inhibition of bacteriophage t43 by phantoms.
13	a dipole model for negative steady state resistance in excitable membranes	A dipole model for negative resistance to apos; d&apos state; equilibrium in excitable membranes.
13	preganglionic stimulation increases calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia	Preganglionic stimulation increases calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia.
13	the effects of papaverine on the electrical and mechanical activity of the guinea pig taenia coli	The effects of papaverine on the electrical and mechanical activity of guinea pig taenia coli.
13	metabolic hormonal and vascular changes after synthetic oestrogen therapy in oophorectomized women	Effect of estrogen therapy on oophorectomized women, Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
13	two fast transient current components during voltage clamp on snail neurons	Two fast transient current components during voltage imposed on the snail neurons.
13	potassium uptake during microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	L' potassium uptake during microcyst formation in xanthus myxococci.
13	on the adaptation in potassium excretion associated with nephron reduction in the dog	On apos; adaptation of apos; potassium excretion associated with reduction in nephron.
13	the effect of quinine on tension development membrane potentials and excitation contraction coupling of crab skeletal muscle fibres	L' effect of quinine on membrane tension development potentials and contraction coupling; excitation of crab skeletal muscle fibers.
13	salt and water permeability of the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Permeability to epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in in vivo perfusion studies of gallus domesticus in normal and dehydrated poultry.
13	sodium chloride absorption and solute linked water flow across the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Sodium chloride absorption and solute bound the flow of water through the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in in in vivo perfusion studies of gallus domesticus in normal and dehydrated poultry.
13	analysis of clostridium botulinum toxigenic types a b and e for fatty and carbohydrate content	Fat and carbohydrate analysis of toxigenes a b and e of Clostridium botulinum types a b and e.
13	ultrastructure of azotobacter vinelandii	L' ultrastructure of potato; azotobacter vinelandii.
13	structural properties and features of parasitic bdellovibrio bacteriovorus	Structural properties and characteristics of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus parasite.
13	interaction of tetraethylammonium ion derivatives with the potassium channels of giant axons	Interaction of tetraethylammonium ion with potassium channels of giant axons.
13	cooperative aspects of small ion small molecule interactions with nucleic aicds potassium polyriboadenylic acid polyribouridylic acid	Cooperative aspects of small ion – small molecule interactions with polyriboadenylic acid nucleic acid polyriboadenylic acid.
13	characterization of the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase of aspergillus nidulans	Characterization of reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase d' aspergillus nidulans.
13	potassium sparing agents during diuretic therapy in hypertension	Potassium-saving agents during diuretic treatment of high blood pressure.
13	electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in hereditary motor end plate disease of the mouse	Electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in hereditary plaque disease of mice.
13	the relative contribution of k and cl to the total increase of membrane conductance produced by adrenaline on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	The relative contribution of k and cl to the total increase in membrane conductance produced by epos; adrenaline on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli.
13	action potentials and release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	Possible action and release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro.
13	effect of electrical stimulation and high potassium concentrations on the effux of 14c glycine from slices of spinal cord	Effect of electrical stimulation and high potassium concentrations on glycine 14c efflux from slices of the spinal cord.
13	gas exchange in renal failure i dangers of hyperkalaemia during anaesthesia	Gas exchange in kidney failure; danger of hyperkalemia during anesthesia; anesthesia.
13	calcium carbonate concretions cyclic occurrence in the hamster vagina	The cyclic presence of calcium carbonate in the hamster vagina becomes a reality.
13	loss of membrane components in the pathogenesis of antibody induced spherocytosis	Loss of membrane components in the pathogenesis of antibody induces spherocytosis.
13	polypeptide secretion from the isolated parietovisceral ganglion of aplysia californica	Polypeptide secretion of the isolated parietovisceral ganglion from l'apos; aplysia californica.
13	biophysical effects of adrenaline on the smooth muscle of the rabbit common carotid artery	Apos biophysical effects; adrenaline on the smooth muscle of the apos; common carotid artery of rabbit.
13	effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias after coronary artery occlusion and on ventricular automaticity in the dog	Effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias after coronary artery occlusion and on apos; ventricular automaticity in dogs.
13	biosynthesis of rat serum albumin	Biosynthesis of rat serum albumin.
13	exchangeable and total body potassium in patients with chronic renal failure	Total and exchangeable body potassium in patients with chronic renal failure.
13	ultrastructure and contractures of the pigeon iris striated muscle	Ultrastructural features and contractures of the pigeon muscle stripe.
13	chloride conductance in normal and myotonic muscle fibres and the action of monocarboxylic aromatic acids	The conduct of chlorides in normal and myotonic muscle fibers and the action of monocarboxylic aromatic acids.
13	release of an antidiuretic substance by bradykinin in the rat	Dapos release an antidiuretic substance by bradykinin in the rat.
13	studies on prostaglandin antagonists	Studies on the antagonists of prostaglandins.
13	potassium effect on dna synthesis and multiplication of baby hamster kidney cells cell cycle membrane potential synchronization transformation	Effect of potassium on DNA synthesis and enhancement of membrane synchronization potential of baby hamster kidney cells.
13	binding of thyrotropin releasing hormone to plasma membranes of bovine anterior pituitary gland hormone receptor adenylate cyclase equilibrium constant 3 h thyrotropin	Apos binding; thyrotropin-releasing hormone to plasma membranes of apos receptor; apos adenylate cyclase; constant anterior bovine pituitary hormone; 3 h thyrotropin balance.
13	the effect of an intrauterine thread on tissue changes in the endometrium of the pseudopregnant rat	An intra@-@ uterine thread on tissue changes in the endometrium of the pregnant pseudo-rat was observed.
13	an unusual case of self induced electrolyte depletion	It's an unusual case of an auto-depletion disorder, caused by the presence of electrolytes.
13	effects of removing the external potassium on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	Effects of leprosy; elimination of external potassium on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli.
13	voltage clamp studies of a transient outward membrane current in gastropod neural somata	Voltage clamp studies of a transient outward membrane current in gastropod neural somata.
13	prediction of repetitive firing behaviour from voltage clamp data on an isolated neurone soma	Prediction of repetitive discharge behaviour from voltage clamp data on an isolated neuronal soma.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane ii potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane ii kinetic of l' potassium ion and cooperativity with x 4.
13	stimulation of rna transcription from pea and corn dna by protein retained on sepharose coupled to 2 4 dichlorophenoxyacetic acid	Stimulation of rna transcription from pea and maize DNA by the protein retained on sepharose coupled to 24 dichlorophenoxyacetic acids.
13	automated method for the determination of phenol in biological products	An automated method for the determination of phenol in biological products.
13	characterization of ribonucleic acid from visna virus	Characterization of yeasts; visna virus ribonucleic acid.
13	the effect of supplemental oral phosphate on the bone mineral changes during prolonged bed rest	A supplement of oral phosphate on bone minerals changes during prolonged bed rest.
13	conformational model of active transport	The conformational model of active transport.
13	chloride and potassium activities in luminal fluid of turtle thyroid follicles as determined by selective ion exchanger microelectrodes	Chloride and potassium activity in the luminal fluid of turtle thyroid follicles was determined by selective ion exchange microelectrodes.
13	spasmolytic effects of cadmium and zinc ions upon the guinea pig isolated ileum preparation	Spasmolytic effects of cadmium and zinc ions on the isolated guinea pig preparation.
13	helical nucleocapsid structure of the oncogenic ribonucleic acid viruses oncornaviruses	Helicoidal nucleocapsid structure of oncornavirus ribonucleic acid oncornavirus oncogenic viruses.
13	the arrangement of ribosomes in ribosome tetramers from hypothermic chick embryos	L' arrangement of ribosomes in tetramers of ribosomes; hypothermic chick embryos.
13	on the presynaptic acetylcholine receptors in sympathetic ganglia of the frog	On presynaptic receptors of l' acetylcholine in sympathetic ganglia of frog.
13	potassium ion release and enzyme secretion adrenergic regulation by alpha and beta receptors	L&apos release; potassium ion and adrenergic regulation of enzyme secretion by alpha and beta receptors.
13	comparison by gas liquid chromatography of the fatty acids acids of mycobacterium avium and some other nonphotochromogenic mycobacteria	Comparison of the fatty acids of avium and d' other non-photochromogenic mycobacteria by liquid gas chromatography.
13	lipids of a t strain of mycoplasma	D'apos lipid; a t strain of mycoplasma.
13	the effect of low level activation on the mechanical properties of isolated frog muscle fibers	L' effect of low level activation on the mechanical properties of isolated frog muscle fibers.
13	the effect of prolonged depolarization on synaptic transfer in the stellate ganglion of the squid	The effects of prolonged depolarization on synaptic transfer in the stellar ganglion of the squid.
13	structure of concanavalin a at 4 25 ngstr m resolution	Structure of concanavalin a at a resolution of 425 ngstr m.
13	turnover of genetically defined catalase isozymes in maize	The turnover of genetically defined catalase isozymes in maize.
13	variation in the toxicity of arsenic compounds to microorganisms and the suppression of the inhibitory effects by phosphate	Variation in the toxicity of the phosphate compounds; arsenic to microorganisms and suppression of phosphate inhibitory effects.
13	trypsin action on the growth of sendai virus in tissue culture cells i restoration of the infectivity for l cells by direct action of tyrpsin on l cell borne sendai virus	Action of trypsin on the growth of sendai virus in tissue culture cells; infectivity to l cells by direct action of tyrpsin on sentai virus transmitted by l cells.
13	proteins of vesicular stomatitis virus and of phenotypically mixed vesicular stomatitis virus simian virus 5 virions	Proteins of vesicular stomatitis virus and simian vesicular stomatitis virus 5 phenotypically mixed virions.
13	potassium uptake in synchronous and synchronized cultures of escherichia coli	Absorption of potassium in synchronous and synchronized cultures of escherichia coli.
13	the distribution of chloride ions in the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig s taenia coli	The distribution of chloride ions in the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig taenia coli.
13	the effect of potassium and chloride ions on the volume and membrane potential of single barnacle muscle cells	The effect of potassium and chloride ions on the volume and membrane potential of single barnacle muscle cells.
13	effect of administered mineralocorticoids or acth in pregnant women attenuation of kaliuretic influence of mineralocorticoids during pregnancy	Effect of apo; administration of mineralocorticoids or dolipids; acth in pregnant women attenuation of apo; kaliuretic influence of mineralocorticoids during pregnancy.
13	germination and outgrowth of single spores of saccharomyces cerevisiae viewed by scanning electron and phase contrast microscopy	Germination and outgrowth of individual spores of saccharomyces cerevisiae by scanning electron microscopy and phase contrast microscopy.
13	site of stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by angiotensin and potassium	The site of stimulation of the biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone by apos; angiotensin and potassium.
13	the effect of diffusible acids on potassium ion uptake by yeast	L' effect of diffusible acids on yeasts; absorption of potassium ion.
13	genetic approaches to the nosology of muscular disease myotonias and similar diseases	Genetic approaches to the nosology of muscular myotonic and related diseases.
13	the effect of low temperature on the excitation contraction coupling phenomena of frog single muscle fibres	L' effect of low temperature on the coupling phenomena of contraction; excitation of frog single muscle fibers.
13	the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	L&apos is a time course of potassium contractions in single muscle fibers.
13	electromechanochemical model of mitochondrial structure and function	Electromechanochemical model of mitochondrial structure and function.
13	pyruvate phosphate dikinase from bacteroides symbiosus	Pyruvate phosphate dikinase from bacteroides symbiosus.
13	oxalate silica gel thin layer system for free 2 hydroxy fatty acids and for fatty acyl coenzyme a	Silica oxalate thin-layer gel system for 2 free hydroxylic fatty acids and for l' fatty acyl coenzyme a.
13	reversal of digoxin toxicity with specific antibodies	Reversal of digoxin toxicity with specific antibodies.
13	the effect of type d botulinum toxin on frog neuromuscular junctions	L' effect of d-type botulinum toxin on frog neuromuscular junctions.
13	rectification in instantaneous potassium current voltage relations in myxicola giant axons	Correcting the instantaneous potassium current relationships in giant axons of myxicole.
13	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers ii the effects of osmotic strength ionic concentration and ph upon the unit cell volume	Myofilament network studies on isolated fibers ii the effects of osmotic strength and ph ion concentration on unit cell volume.
13	ionic basis of the photoresponse of aplysia giant neuron k permeability increase	The ionic basis of the photoresponse of giant apos neurons increases k permeability.
13	interaction of prostaglandin e 1 and calcium in the guinea pig myometrium	The interaction of prostaglandin e 1 and calcium in the guinea pig myometrium.
13	total body potassium in non dialysed and dialysed patients with chronic renal failure	Total body potassium in nondialysed and dialysed patients with chronic renal failure.
13	effect of hydroxybutyrate on the release of monoamines from the rat striatum	Effect of hydroxybutyrate on the release of monoamines from rat striatum.
13	modification by calcium ions of adenine nucleotide translocation in rat liver mitochondria	Alteration of nucleotide translocation of l' adenine in rat liver mitochondria by calcium ions.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane 3 potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4 6 9	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane 3 kinetics of l' potassium ion and cooperativity with x 46.
13	cushing s syndrome complicating pregnancy a case report	It's a cushing syndrome that complicates pregnancy.
13	an active electrical response in fibroblasts	It's an active electrical response in fibroblasts.
13	activation heat activation metabolism and tension related heat in frog semitendinosus muscles	D'apos metabolism; heat activation and tension-related heat in frog-tendinous semi-@ muscles.
13	transport of potassium at the blood brain barrier	Transport of potassium to the blood barrier-encephalic.
13	control of pancreatic amylase release in vitro effects of ions cyclic amp and colchicine	Control of pancreatic amylase release in vitro effects of cyclic ampoules and colchicine.
13	the inner quaternary ammonium ion receptor in potassium channels of the node of ranvier	The inner quaternary ammonium ion receptor in the potassium channels of the ranvier node.
13	rhodopsin of the larval mosquito	Rhodopsin of the larval mosquito.
13	active transport of chloride by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	Active transport of chloride by the giant neuron of the apos's abdominal ganglion.
13	active transport of potassium by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	Active transport of potassium by the giant neuron of the abdominal ganglion aplysia.
13	hodgkin huxley axon increased modulation and linearity of response to constant current stimulus	L' hodgkin huxley axon increased modulation and linearity of response to constant current stimulus.
13	the relation of total body potassium to height weight and age in normal adults	Ratio of total body potassium to height, weight and age in normal adult.
13	isolation and characterization of myosin from cloned mouse fibroblasts	Isolate and characterize myosin from cloned mouse fibroblasts.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane iv noise from the open close kinetics of k channels	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane iv noise of the open kinetics near k channels.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane v two models for the cole moore k hyperpolarization delay	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane v two models for the delay d' hyperpolarization cole moore k.
13	glycerol as an enzyme stabilizing agent effects on aldehyde dehydrogenase	Glycerol's enzymatic stabilizing effects on aldehyde dehydrogenase.
13	regeneration of cation transport capacity in hela cell membranes after specific blockade by ouabain	Regeneration of cation transport capacity in helical cell membranes after specific blockade by etapos; ouabain.
13	laboratory mill for pulverizing and homogenizing nail specimens as an aid to microscopy and culture confirmation of onychomycosis	Laboratory mill to spray and homogenize samples of nails to aid in microscopy and culture confirmation of onychomycosis.
13	relationship between sporulation specific 20s ribonucleic acid and ribosomal ribonucleic acid processing in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Relationships between l' sporulation-specific 20s ribonucleic acid and transformation of l' ribonucleic acid in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
13	inducible and constitutive galactosidase formation in cells recovering from protein synthesis inhibition	Inducible and constitutive galactosidase formation in recovery cells; protein synthesis inhibition.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane vii cooperativity between channels of a large square lattice	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane, vii cooperativity between d&apos channels; a large square lattice.
13	effect of several clay minerals and humic acid on the survival of klebsiella aerogenes exposed to ultraviolet irradiation	Effects of several clay minerals and humic acid on the survival of klebsiella aerogenes exposed to ultraviolet irradiation.
13	the efflux of calcium from single crab and barnacle muscle fibres	Efflux of calcium from crab and barnacle muscle fibers.
13	the voltage dependence of the chloride conductance of frog muscle	The dependence of-to-on tension depends on the chloride conductance of the frog's muscle.
13	the nature of the renal adaptation to chronic hypocapnia	Nature of the apos; renal adaptation to chronic hypocapnia.
13	on the mechanism of rhabdomyolysis in potassium depletion	About the mechanism of rhabdomyolysis in potassium depletion.
13	an effect of extrarenal beta adrenergic stimulation on the release of renin	An effect of d' an adrenergic stimulation beta extra-renal on renin release.
13	the interactions of thiazide diuretics with parathyroid hormone and vitamin d studies in patients with hypoparathyroidism	The interactions of thiazide diuretics with parathyroid hormone and vitamin d studies in patients with hypoparathyroidism.
13	electrolytes and water in the brain and cerebrospinal fluid of the foetal sheep and guinea pig	Electrolytes and lytes; water in the brain and cerebrospinal fluid of sheep and guinea pig fetuses.
13	fluorometric determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria with ethidium bromide	Fluorometric determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria containing d*apos bromide; ethidium.
13	malignant hyperpyrexia further muscle studies in asymptomatic carriers identified by creatinine phosphokinase screening	Lapses; malignant hyperpyrexia was the subject of further muscle studies in asymptomatic carriers identified by creatinine phosphokinase testing.
13	the effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and on the morphology of motor end plates in slow and fast skeletal muscle of the mouse	The effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and the morphology of end-flat motor in slow and fast skeletal muscle of the mouse.
13	protein kinase and specific phosphate acceptor proteins associated with vaccinia virus cores	Protein kinase and specific phosphate acceptor proteins associated with vaccine virus nuclei.
13	kinetic studies on the regulation of rabbit liver pyruvate kinase	Kinetic studies on the regulation of rabbit liver pyruvate kinase activity.
13	cumulative and persistent effects of nerve terminal depolarization on transmitter release	Cumulative and persistent effects of nerve terminal depolarization on transmitter release.
13	the specific effect of potassium on transmitter release by motor nerve terminals and its inhibition by calcium	L' specific effect of potassium on transmitter release from motor nerve terminals and its inhibition by calcium.
13	the role of calcium in depolarization secretion coupling at the motor nerve terminal	The role of calcium in depolarization secretory coupling at the motor nerve end.
13	early biochemical consequences of denervation in fast and slow skeletal muscles and their relationship to neural control over muscle differentiation	Early biochemical consequences of denervation in fast and slow skeletal muscles and their relation to the neural control of muscle differentiation.
13	virus associated nucleases location and properties of deoxyribonucleases and ribonucleases in purified frog virus 3	Localization of virus-associated nucleases and properties of deoxyribonucleases and ribonucleases in purified frog virus 3.
13	double blind trial of carbenoxolone sodium capsules in duodenal ulcer therapy based on endoscopic diagnosis and follow up	Double-blind test of carbenoxolone sodium capsules in duodenal ulcer based on endoscopic diagnosis and follow-up.
13	axon schwann cell interaction in the squid nerve fibre	Axonal schwann cell interaction in squid nerve fiber.
13	initiation of protein synthesis in hela cells	Initiation of protein synthesis in helical cells.
13	tension in isolated frog muscle fibers induced by hypertonic solutions	The tension in isolated frog muscle fibers is induced by hypertonic fibers.
13	transport of axonal enzymes in surviving segments of frog sciatic nerve	The transport of axonal enzymes in surviving segments of frog sciatic nerve.
13	the proton translocating nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase of rat liver mitochondria	The proton translocating nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase from rat liver mitochondria.
13	adrenocortical steroidogenesis the effects of prostaglandins	Adrenalocortical steroidogenesis, the effects of prostaglandins.
13	tracer microinjection study of renal tubular phosphate reabsorption in the rat	Tracer microinjection study of renal tubular phosphate reabsorption in the rat.
13	rapid changes of potassium concentration at the outer surface of exposed single neurons during membrane current flow	Rapid changes in potassium concentration at the outer surface of isolated neurons exposed during membrane current flow.
13	conductance change during the inhibitory potential in the guinea pig taenia coli	Change of conductance during inhibitory potential in the guinea pig taenia coli.
13	control of moderately raised blood pressure report of a co operative randomized controlled trial	Control of moderately high blood pressure ratio d' a randomized controlled trial co@-@operator.
13	the fine structure potassium content and respiratory activity of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells prepared by improved enzymatic techniques	Fine structure potassium content and respiratory activity of isolated rat liver parenchymatous cells were prepared using improved enzymatic techniques.
13	proton coupled accumulation of galactoside in streptococcus lactis 7962	Proton-coupled accumulation of galactoside in Streptococcus lactis 7962.
13	inhibitory and excitatory effects of dopamine on aplysia neurones	Inhibitory and excitatory effects of dopamine on apos neurons.
13	human embryonic kidneys in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased potassium	Developmental abnormalities induced by a decrease in potassium occur in human embryonic kidneys in organ cultures.
13	simplified method for producing pyocins from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Simplified production of pyocins from pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	two malic enzymes in pseudomonas aeruginosa	There are two malic enzymes in pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	transmission on an active electrical response between fibroblasts l cells in cell culture	Cell-cultured transmission on an active electrical response between the l fibroblasts.
13	potassium content during growth and sporulation in bacillus subtilis	Potassium content during growth and sporulation of bacillus subtilis.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium deficient rat i	Changes in renal medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium-deficient rat i.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium depleted rat ii	Changes in renal medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium-depleted rat kidney ii.
13	potassium accumulation in smooth muscle and associated ultrastructural changes	L' potassium accumulation in smooth muscle and associated ultrastructural changes.
13	actions of the selective inhibitor of cholinesterase tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide on the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Action of l' selective inhibitor of tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide cholinesterase on rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation.
13	the actions of dehydroemetine on isolated guinea pig atria influence of ouabain and calcium	The actions of dehydroemetine on isolated guinea pig atria influence ouabain and calcium.
13	microbial degradation of crude oil factors affecting the dispersion in sea water by mixed and pure cultures	Microbial deterioration of crude oil factors affecting dispersion in seawater by mixed and pure cultures.
13	mobility of potassium ion in frog muscle cells both living and dead	Mobilization of potassium ion in the muscle cells of both live and dead frogs.
13	halobacterium cutirubrum ribosomes properties of the ribosomal proteins and ribonucleic acid	Halobacterium cutirubrum ribosomes properties of ribosomal proteins and l' ribonucleic acid.
13	the effect of oxygen concentration on the growth and metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae grown with excess of potassium or in potassium deficient media	The effect of oxygen concentration on the growth and metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of excess potassium or in potassium-poor media.
13	circadian rhythm of plasma aldosterone concentration in patients with primary aldosteronism	Circadian rhythm of plasma apos; aldosterone concentration in patients with apos; primary aldosterone.
13	studies on the tachyphylaxis to nicotinic stimulant drugs in the perfused hypogastric ganglion of the guinea pig	Studies of the nicotinic stimulant tachyphylaxis in the perfused hypogastric ganglion of the guinea pig.
13	relaxation spectra of potassium channel noise from squid axon membranes	Squid axonal membrane potassium channel noise relaxation spectrum.
13	a micropuncture study of potassium excretion by the remnant kidney	Micropuncture study of potassium excretion by the remaining kidney.
13	cation reversal of inhibition of growth by valinomycin in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes	Cationic reversal of apos; inhibition of growth by valinomycin in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes.
13	localization of transport adenosine triphosphatase in rat cornea	Localization of l&apos transport; adenosine triphosphatase in rat cornea.
13	renal bicarbonate wasting during phosphate depletion a possible cause of altered acid base homeostasis in hyperparathyroidism	Loss of renal bicarbonate during phosphate depletion is a possible cause of apo-alteration; acid base homeostasis in the apo; hyperparathyroidism.
13	biogenesis of mitochondria the effects of altered membrane lipid composition on cation transport by mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mitochondrial biogenesis, effects of alteration of membrane lipid composition on cation transport by mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
13	scanning transmission electron microscope studies of deep frozen unfixed muscle correlated with spatial localization of intracellular elements by fluorescent x ray analysis	Scanning electron microscopy studies of deep frozen unattached muscle correlated with the spatial localization of intracellular elements by etapos; fluorescent X-ray analysis.
13	growth requirements of pathogenic leptospira	Growth requirements of pathogenic leptospira.
13	direct effects of salicylate on renal function in the dog	Direct effects of salicylate on renal function in dogs.
13	properties and mechanism of action of creatine kinase from ox smooth muscle anion effects compared with pyruvate kinase	In comparison with pyruvate kinase, the anionic effects of bovine smooth muscle on the properties and mechanism of the action of creatine kinase are similar.
13	extracellular acidosis protects ehrlich ascites tumor cells and rat renal cortex against anoxic injury	Extracellular acidosis protects ehrlich ascites tumor cells and the rat renal cortex from anoxic lesions.
13	some effects of histamine in the depolarized rat uterus	Some effects of histamine in the depolarized rat uterus.
13	effects of an isolated toxin from australian tiger snake notechis scutatus scutatus venom at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	Effects of a toxin isolated from Australian tiger snake notechisatus scutatus venom at the mammalian neuromuscular junction.
13	red face and reduced plasma volume	Uh, red face and reduced plasma volume.
13	membrane currents carried by ca sr and ba in barnacle muscle fiber during voltage clamp	The membrane currents carried by ca sr and ba in the goose muscle fibers during voltage clamping.
13	improved kcn medium	Kcn medium upgrade.
13	primer requirement and template specificity of a dna polymerase of chick embryo	Required primers and model specificity for DNA polymerase from the chick embryo.
13	the sensitivity of helix aspersa neurones to injected calcium ions	The sensitivity of aspersa neurons to injected calcium ions.
13	ionic basis of hyperpolarizing receptor potential in scallop eye increase in permeability to potassium ions	The ionic basis of the apo potential; receptor hyperpolarization in the scallop eye increases the permeability to potassium ions.
13	mechanical and electrical oscillations in cardiac muscle of the turtle	It's got mechanical and electrical oscillations in the heart muscle of the turtle.
13	k permeability of nitella clavata in the depolarized state	Permeability k of nitella clavata to apos; depolarized state.
13	disruptive action of potassium phosphotungstate on phit the temperate bacteriophage of bacillus megaterium 899a	Potassium phosphotungstate disruptive activity on the phit of the temperate bacteriophage of bacillus megaterium 899a.
13	a calcium ionophore simulating the action of epinephrine on the alpha adrenergic receptor	A calcium ionophore simulating the action of epinephrine on the alpha-adrenergic receptor.
13	phosphate induced protein chromatography	Phosphate induced protein chromatography.
13	nodal gap substance in diabetic nerve	Nodal gap substance in the diabetic nerve.
13	attenuated vasodilator responses to k in essential hypertensive men	Mitigated vasodilator responses to k in essential hypertensive men.
13	differential effects of glycerol treatment on membrane capacity and excitation contraction coupling in toad sartorius fibres	Differential effects of glycerol treatment on membrane capacity and contraction coupling; excitation in toad sartorius fibres.
13	speed of repolarization and morphology of glygerol treated frog muscle fibres	Rapid repolarization and morphology of frog muscle fibers treated with glygerol.
13	effects of manganese on the electrical and mechanical properties of frog skeletal muscle fibres	The effects of manganese on the electrical and mechanical properties of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	prevention of endemic goitre with iodized salt	Prevention of endemic goitre with iodized salt.
13	potassium chloride absorption and excretion	Potassium chloride absorption and excretion.
13	properties of physarum myosin purified by a potassium iodide procedure	Properties of physarum myosin purified by a phosphate–potassium iodide procedure.
13	nature of the specificity of alcohol coupling to l alanine transport into isolated membrane vesicles of a marine pseudomonad	The nature of the specificity of the alcohol – alanine coupling in isolated membrane vesicles of the marine pseudomonad.
13	specific electron donor energized transport of alpha aminoisobutyric acid and k into intact cells of a marine pseudomonad	A specific electron donor activated alpha aminoisobutyric acid and k transport in intact cells of apos; a marine pseudomonad.
13	calcium entry in response to maintained depolarization of squid axons	Calcium entry in response to maintenance depolarization of squid axons.
13	effects of membrane depolarization on light scattering by cerebral cortical slices	The effects of membrane depolarization on light scattering by cerebral cortical slices.
13	kinetic analysis of the delayed outward currents in frog atrium existence of two types of preparation	Kinetic analysis of the delayed outward currents in the frog atrium of the apos; existence of two types of preparation.
13	light and x ray diffraction studies on chick skeletal muscle under controlled physiological conditions	X-ray and light diffraction studies on chicken skeletal muscle under controlled physiological conditions.
13	total body potassium in long term frusemide therapy is potassium supplementation necessary	The total body potassium in the frusemide long-term treatment is a necessary supplement of potassium.
13	the effect of bathing solution tonicity on resting tension in frog muscle fibers	L' effect of bath solution tonicity on resting tension in frog muscle fibers.
13	control of membrane n permeability in a hyperpolarizing photoreceptor similar effect of light and metabolic inhibitors	Control of n-membrane permeability in a hyperpolarizing photoreceptor system, similar effect of light and metabolic inhibitors.
13	non transmitting neuromuscular junctions during an early stage of end plate reinnervation	Non-emitting neuromuscular junctions early in the reinnervation of the terminal plate.
13	on the repetitive discharge in myotonic muscle fibres	On the repetitive discharge in myotonic muscle fibers.
13	noncovalent modification of deoxyhemoglobin s solubility and erythrocyte sickling	Non-covalent modification of solubility of deoxyhemoglobin and lapos; draft erythrocytes.
13	laxative induced diarrhoea a continuing clinical problem	A persistent clinical problem is laxative-induced diarrhea.
13	effect of calcitonin on the formation composition and enzymatic activity of the hepatic bile in guinea pgs	The effect of calcitonin on the composition and enzymes; the enzymatic activity of the hepatic bile in guinea pgs.
13	protein synthesis in bacillus subtilis differential effect of potassium ions on in vitro peptide chain initiation and elongation	Protein synthesis in subtilis bacillus, differential effect of potassium ions on initiation and elongation of peptide chains in vitro.
13	enhancement by carbachol of transmitter release from motor nerve terminals	Carbachol increases transmitter release from motor nerve terminals.
13	influence of external potassium on the synthesis and deposition of matrix components by chondrocytes in vitro	L' influence of external potassium on the synthesis and deposition of matrix components by chondrocytes in vitro.
13	structure activity relations for caffeine a comparative study of the inotropic effects of the methylxanthines imidazoles and related compounds on the frog s heart	A comparative study of the inotropic effects of methylxanthines imidazoles and related compounds on the frog heart was carried out.
13	analysis of hyperpolarizations induced by glutamate and acetylcholine on onchidium neurones	Analysis of hyperpolarizations induced by glutamate and l' acetylcholine on onchid neurons.
13	calcium influxes and tension development in perfused single barnacle muscle fibres under membrane potential control	Calcium influx and tension development in d&apos muscle fibers; a single perfused ring under membrane potential control.
13	the effect of glucagon on the liver cell membrane potential	L' effect of glucagon on the liver cell membrane potential.
13	inhibition of carbonic anhydrase by parathyroid hormone and cyclic amp in rat renal cortex in vitro	Inhibition of apo; carbonic anhydrase by apo; parathyroid hormone and apo; cyclic ampoule in rat renal cortex in vitro.
13	potassium and amino acid transport in human leukocytes exposed to phagocytic stimuli	Potassium and d&apos transport; amino acids in human leukocytes exposed to phagocytic stimuli.
13	potassium flux and leaf movement in samanea saman i rhythmic movement	Potassium flow and leaf movement in samanea saman i rhythmic movement.
13	diuretic induced hypokalemia	The diuretic induced hypokalemia.
13	twitch potentiation by potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the frog	The potentiation of potassium contractions in single muscle fibers of frogs.
13	direct effect of prostaglandins in renal function and renin release in the presence of renal ischemia in the dog	Direct effect of prostaglandins on renal function and renin release in the presence of renal ischemia in dogs.
13	the effects of certain anaesthetic and anti convulsant drugs on the csf potassium fluxes of the dog	The effects of some anti--anesthetic convulsants on the csf potassium fluxes of the dog.
13	energy coupling in the uptake of hexose phosphates by escherichia coli	Energy coupling in the uptake of hexose phosphates by escherichia coli.
13	influence of glutaraldehyde and or osmium tetroxide on cell volume ion content mechanical stability and membrane permeability of ehrlich ascites tumor cells	The influence of glutaraldehyde and/or tetroxide on the mechanical stability of ionic cell volume and membrane permeability of ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
13	a bone calcium index based on partial body calcium measurements by in vivo activation analysis	Bone calcium index based on partial body calcium measurements by in vivo activation analysis.
13	tyrosine hydroxylase activation by nerve stimulation	L' tyrosine hydroxylase activation by nerve stimulation.
13	paired moving charges in mitochondrial energy coupling	Twinned mobile charges in mitochondrial energy coupling.
13	antibiotics as probes of ribosome structure binding of chloramphenicol and erythromycin to polyribosomes effect of other antibiotics	Antibiotics as probes for ribosomal structure binding of chloramphenicol and l' erythromycin to polyribosomes; other antibiotics.
13	differences in action potentials and accommodation of sensory and motor myelinated nerve fibres as computed on the basis of voltage clamp data	Differences in potentials, action and adaptation of sensory and motor myelinated nerve fibers calculated on the basis of voltage clamp data.
13	energy provision tissue utilization and weight loss in prolonged starvation	Prolonged food deprivation, tissue utilization and weight loss during pregnancy.
13	restoration of potassium stimulated respiration of glycerol treated muscle	Recovery of potassium stimulated respiration of glycerol-treated muscle.
13	the action of amantadine on the rat uterus its interaction with oxytocin and the effects of several ionic modifications of the medium	L' action of amantadine; action of amantadine on rat uterus, its interaction with estos; oxytocin and the effects of several ionic modifications of the medium.
13	effect of different doses of chlorthalidone on blood pressure serum potassium and serum urate	The effect of different doses of chlorthalidone on blood pressure, serum potassium and serum urate.
13	ionic excitation of a clone of mouse neuroblastoma	Ion excitation of a clone of mouse neuroblastoma.
13	pointers to possible malnutrition in the elderly at home	Clues about the possibility of malnutrition in the elderly at home.
13	carbamylation of alkaline mesentericopeptidas	Calcium carbamylation of alkaline mesentericopeptidae.
13	renal response to secretin	Uh, renal response to secretin.
13	collaborative study of a semiautomated method for the analysis of acenocoumarol phenprocoumon and potassium warfarin tablets	An automated semi-administrative method for the analysis of tablets; aceenocoumarol phenprocoumon and warfarin potassium tablets.
13	cardiac arrest due to oral potassium administration	Cardiac arrest due to oral potassium administration.
13	pathogenesis of hypertension in cushing s syndrome	Pathogenesis of apo; hypertension in cushing syndrome.
13	glycogen its chemistry and morphological appearance in the electron microscope 11 the complex formed in the selective contrast staining of glycogen	The complex formed by the selective contrast staining, chemical composition, and morphological appearance of glycogen by electron microscopy 11 is the result of selective staining of glycogen.
13	identical behavior of the two active sites of myosin with respect to trinitrophenylation	Identical behaviour of the two active sites of myosin with respect to trinitrophenylation.
13	effect of osmolarity on intracellular ph of rat diaphragm muscle 22	Effect of apos; osmolarity on intracellular phage of rat diaphragm 22.
13	potassium translocation in yeast mitochondria and its relationship to ergostrol biosynthesis	Potassium translocation in yeast mitochondria and its relation to l' ergostrol biosynthesis.
13	endogenous messenger ribonucleic acid directed polypeptide chain elongation in a cell free system from the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	An endogenous ribonucleic acid messenger, l&apos, directed polypeptide chain elongation in a cell-free system of saccharomyces cerevisiae yeast.
13	laser induced spreading arrest of mytilus gill cilia	Laser caused mytilus gill cilia to stop gradually.
13	synthesis of superhelical simian virus 40 deoxyribonucleic acid in cell lysates	L&apos synthesis; superhelical simian virus 40 deoxyribonucleic acid in cell lysates.
13	release of growth hormone from ox pituitary slices after pronase treatment	L'apos release; growth hormone of slices d'apos; pituitary after treatment with pronase.
13	enhanced phosphatidylinositol labelling in rat parotid fragments exposed to alpha adrenergic stimulation	Increased phosphatidylinositol labeling in rat parotid fragments exposed to alpha-adrenergic stimulation.
13	effect of potassium depletion in normal males an apollo 15 simulation	The effect of potassium depletion in normal males is not known.
13	seasonal and nutritional effects on serum proteins and urea concentration in the reindeer rangifer tarandus tarandus l	Seasonal and nutritional effects on serum protein and urea concentration in reindeer rangifer tarandus l tarandus.
13	ion effects on protein nucleic acid interactions the disassembly of the 50 s ribosomal subunit from the halophilic bacterium halobacterium cutirubrum	Ion effects on protein nucleic acid interactions: disassembly of the 50 s sub-ribosomal unit of halophilic bacterium halobacterium cutirubrum.
13	release of corticotrophin releasing factor and other hypophysiotropic substances from isolated nerve endings synaptosomes	Release of corticotropin-releasing factor and other hypophysiotropic substances from isolated synaptosome nerve terminals.
13	microbial oxidation of amines partial purification of a trimethylamine mono oxygenase from pseudomonas aminovorans and its role in growth on trimethylamine	Microbial oxidation of amines partial purification of d'apos; trimethylamine monooxygenase from pseudomonas aminovorans and its role in growth on trimethylamine.
13	polyene sensitivity during germination of conidia of aspergillus fumigatus	Polyene sensitivity during germination of conidia of d' aspergillus fumigatus.
13	comparative enzymology of the adenosine triphosphate sulphurylases from leaf tissue of selenium accumulator and non accumulator plants	Comparison of apos; adenosine triphosphate sulfurylase enzyme enzyme from leaf tissue of selenium accumulating and non-accumulating plants.
13	product inhibition studies on bovine liver carbamoyl phosphate synthetase	Apos study; product inhibition by bovine liver carbamoyl phosphate synthetase.
13	nicotine induced relaxation in isolated canine cerebral arteries	Well, nicotine induced relaxation in isolated canine cerebral arteries.
13	excitation and contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	L' bovine tracheal smooth muscle excitation and contraction.
13	voltage current relationship of a carbachol induced potassium ion pathway in aplysia neurones	The voltage current relationship of a carbachol-induced ionic potassium pathway in apos neurons.
13	genetic studies on the mechanism of action of aldosterone in mice	Genetic studies on the mechanism of action of aldosterone in mice.
13	mechanical responses to linearly rising currents in the red and white muscles of the silver carp	Mechanical reactions to the linear updraft in the red and white muscles of the silver carp.
13	cloacal resorption of salt and water in the galah cacatua roseicapilla	Cloacal resorption of salt and water in the galah cacatua roseicapilla.
13	pancreatic secretion of patients with chronic renal insufficiency author s transl	Translation of the pancreatic secretion of patients with chronic apo placenta; translative chronic renal failure.
13	increase in pituitary adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content and potentiation of growth hormone release from heifer anterior pituitary slices incubated in the presence of 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine	Increased cyclic monophosphate content of apos; pituitary adenosine 3-5 and potentiation of apos release; d&apos slice growth hormone; anterior pituitary of heifers incubated in the presence of 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine.
13	the effects of potassium 5 hydrocytryptamine adrenocorticotrophin and angiotensin ii on the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in suspensions of dispersed rat adrenal zona glomerulosa and zona fasciculata cells	The effects of potassium 5 hydrocytryptamine, adrenocorticotropin, and l' angiotensin ii on the concentration of apos; adenosine 3, cyclic monophosphate, in suspensions of dispersed cells from the adrenal glomerular zone and from the fascicular zone of the rat.
13	sucrose in oral therapy for cholera and related diarrhoeas	Sucrose in oral therapy for cholera and related diarrhoea.
13	antivenom in sea snake bit poisoning	L' antivenom in the sea snake bit the poisoning.
13	the role of calcium and cyclic nucleotides in alpha amylase release from slices of rat parotid studies with the divalent cation ionophore a 23187	The role of calcium and cyclic nucleotides in alpha amylase release from rat slices parotid studies with the divalent cation ionophore 23187.
13	possible role of laxatives in analgesic nephropathy	The possible role of laxatives in analgesic nephropathy.
13	effects of epinephrine on the pacemaker potassium current of cardiac purkinje fibers	Effects of epinephrine on cardiac pacemaker current of cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	on the presence of a msh release inhibiting system in the rat neurointermediate lobe	On the presence of apos, a msh release inhibitory system in the neuro-lobe-intermediate of the rat.
13	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the regulation of plasma potassium in chronic renal disease	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the regulation of plasma potassium in chronic renal disease.
13	changes in some plasma parameters in the course of dextran 40	Changes in some plasma parameters during dextran treatment.
13	genetics of chemical induction of conjugation in paramecium aurella	The chemical induction of conjugation in paramecium aurella.
13	integrative recombination of bacteriophage lambda dna in vitro	Integrative recombination of apos; DNA of bacteriophage lambda in vitro.
13	electroimpulse therapy of auricular fibrillation	Electro treatment-impulses of atrial fibrillation.
13	cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalemia in adrenalectomized dogs	Heart sensitivity to hyperkalemia in adrenalectomized dogs.
13	donnan potential of rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils i electrofluorochromometric detection of potential	Potential for rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils i electrofluorochromometric detection of potential.
13	role of vasoactive substances in active hyperemia in skeletal muscle 38520	The role of vasoactive substances in skeletal muscle function; active hyperemia.
13	kaluresis and cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalaemia in intact and adrenalectomized rabbits	Kaleuresis and cardiac sensitivity to apos; hyperkalemia in intact and adrenalectomized rabbits.
13	pancreatic cholera benefical effects of treatment with streptozotocin	Adverse effects of treatment with streptozotocin on the pancreatic cholera.
13	eosinophilic gastroenteritis report of a clinical case	Gastro-eosinophilic eosinophilic enteritis: a clinical case report.
13	intracellular distribution of free potassium in chironomus salivary glands	Intracellular distribution of free potassium in chironomus salivary glands.
13	role of adenosine or amp as a probable mediator of blood flow regulation in canine hindlimb muscles	The role of adenosine or dapos; an ampoule as a probable mediator of blood flow regulation in canine hindlimb muscles.
13	dimethyl adipimidate a new antisickling agent	Dimethyl adipimidate a new antisickling agent.
13	mode of action of chronotropic agents in cardiac purkinje fibers does epinephrine act by directly modifying the external surface charge	The mode of action of chronotropic agents in cardiac purkinic fibers acts on epinephrine by directly modifying the external surface charge.
13	a survey of asthma mortality in patients between ages 35 and 64 in the greater london hospitals in 1971	A study of the incidence of asthma in patients aged 35-64 in major hospitals in London in 1971.
13	effects of drugs and environmental factors on ciliary movement author s transl	Translated effects of drugs and environmental factors on ciliary movement.
13	ureteroileosigmoidostomy long term results	Long-term results of ureterooileosigostomy.
13	exchange transfusions with concentrated acd blood ii effects on bilirubin total protein chloride phosphate calcium magnesium and potassium	Exchange of transfusions with concentrated blood from animals; effects on bilirubin total protein calcium magnesium phosphate and potassium chloride.
13	structural and functional asymmetries of myelinated branches in the frog muscle spindle	Structural and functional asymmetries of myelinated branches in the spindle muscle of frogs.
13	induction of a myogenic response in tonic airway smooth muscle by tetraethylammonium	Induction of apos; a myogenic response in tonic airway smooth muscle by tetraethylammonium.
13	the force velocity relation in phasic contractions of venous smooth muscle	The force-velocity relation in phasic contractions of venous smooth muscle.
13	isometric and isotonic relaxation in venous smooth muscle	Isometric and isotonic relaxation in venous smooth muscle.
13	association of basal atpase activity and cholesterol with a distinct group of rabbit skeletal muscle microsomal particles	Association of l' activity of basal atpase and cholesterol with a distinct group of rabbit skeletal muscle microsomal particles.
13	interaction of o2 and co2 in sustained exercise hyperemia of canine skeletal muscle	Interactions of o2 and co2 in long exercise hyperemia of dog skeletal muscle.
13	swelling and loss of potassium in perfused livers following the influence of the vapours of carbon tetrachloride chloroform and halothane on the perfusion medium author s transl	Influences on the perfusion medium include swelling and loss of potassium in the perfused liver, the influence of the vapours of chloroform carbon tetrachloride and d&apos, and halothane.
13	effects of hypoxia cyanide and ischaemia on myocardial contraction observations in isolated muscle and intact heart	Effects of apos; cyanide and apos hypoxia; ischemia on myocardial contraction observations in isolated muscle and intact heart.
13	altered ion transport in aortic smooth muscle during deoxycorticosterone acetate hypertension in the rat	Change in ion transport in aortic smooth muscle during apos; apos hypertension; deoxycorticosterone acetate in rat.
13	inotropic effects of different calcium ion concentration on the embryonic chick ventricle comparison of single cultured cells and intact muscle strips	Inotropic effects of different calcium ion concentrations on embryonic chick ventricle comparison of single culture cells and intact muscle strips.
13	dual action of chloroquine on frog s skeletal muscle contraction	Double action of chloroquine on frog skeletal muscle contraction.
13	role of potassium and calcium ions in changes in the membrane potential of secretory cells of the mammary glands	Role of potassium and calcium ions in changes in the membrane potential of mammary gland secretory cells.
13	barbiturates and aortic and venous smooth muscle function	Barbiturates and aortic and venous smooth muscle function.
13	the reversibility of skeletal muscle pyruvate kinase and an assessment of its capacity to support glyconeogenesis	Reversibility of skeletal muscle pyruvate kinase and an assessment of its ability to support glyconeogenesis.
13	acetylcholine contracture of the fast muscle fibers in the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis	The contraction by l' acetylcholine of fast muscle fibers in the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis.
13	magnitude and location of surface charges on myxicola giant axons	The magnitude and location of surface charges on giant myxicola axons.
13	contractile inactivation in frog single denervated muscle fibers	Contractile inactivation in frog denervated single muscle fibers.
13	contractile repriming of single muscle fibers inactivation and tubular diffusion	Contractile apo repair; inactivation and tubular diffusion of single muscle fibers.
13	evidence for a transient potassium membrane current dependent on calcium influx in crab muscle fibre	Evidence of a transient membrane current of potassium dependent on calcium influx into crab muscle fibers.
13	a comparison of radioactive thallium and potassium fluxes in the giant axon of the squid	A comparison of radioactive thallium and potassium fluxes in the giant squid axon.
13	correlation between skeletal calcium mass and muscle mass in man	Correlation between skeletal calcium mass and muscle mass in men.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Effect of dantrolene sodium on contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle.
13	total body potassium potassium retention and potassium intake in protein energy malnutrition	Total body potassium retention and potassium intake in protein energy malnutrition.
13	effect of naphthenic acids on the permeability of ascitic tumor cells to potassium ions	The effect of naphthenic acids on the permeability of ascitic tumor cells to potassium ions.
13	interactions of aminopyridines with potassium channels of squid axon membranes	Interactions of aminopyridines with potassium channels of squid axonal membranes.
13	dual effects of calcium ions on pacemaker activity in guinea pig taenia coli	Dual effect of calcium ions on pacemaker activity in guinea pig taenia coli.
13	modification of potassium current by 4 aminopyridine case of the isolated giant axon of the cockroach periplaneta americana	Modification of potassium current by 4 cases; aminopyridine apos; giant axon isolated from the cockroach periplaneta americana.
13	barbiturates block calcium uptake by stimulated and potassium depolarized rat sympathetic ganglia	Barbiturates block calcium uptake by stimulated potassium depolarized sympathetic ganglia.
13	initial and delayed membrane currents in crab muscle fibre under voltage clamp conditions	Initial and delayed membrane currents in crab muscle fibers under voltage clamp conditions.
13	the effect of zinc ions on the gating of the delayed potassium conductance of frog sartorius muscle	The effect of zinc ions on the binding of the delayed potassium conductance of frog sartorius muscle.
13	ultrastructure of frog muscle fiber thick filaments at rest and during potassium contracture	Ultrastructure of thick frog muscle fiber filaments at rest and during potassium contracture.
13	ethanol and contraction of venous smooth muscle	L' ethanol and contraction of the venous smooth muscle.
13	99mtc diphosphonate uptake in skeletal muscle a quantitative index of acute damage	L' absorption of 99 mtc diphosphonate into skeletal muscle is a quantitative index of acute damage.
13	stimulation of 45ca efflux from smooth muscle cells by metabolic inhibition and high k depolarization	L&apos stimulation; 45ca efflux of smooth muscle cells by metabolic inhibition and high k depolarization.
13	stacking of safranine in liposomes during valinomycin induced efflux of potassium ions	The accumulation of safranin in liposomes during valinomycin induced apos; efflux of potassium ions.
13	the effect of biologically active substances acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin on depolarization of taenia coli smooth muscle	The effect of biologically active substances acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin on the depolarization of taenia coli smooth muscle.
13	the effects of ammonium inorganic phosphate and potassium ions on the activity of phosphofructokinases from muscle and nervous tissues of vertebrates and invertebrates	Effect of inorganic phosphate, ammonium, and potassium ions on the activity of phosphofructokinases in the muscle and nervous tissues of vertebrates and invertebrates.
13	voltage dependent potassium fluxes and the significance of action potentials in acetabularia	Voltage-dependent potassium flow and the significance of d&apos potentials; acetabular action.
13	influence of potassium and calcium ions on the phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine metabolism in rat fibroblasts after growth stimulation by calf serum	L' influence of potassium and calcium ions on phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine metabolism in rat fibroblasts after growth stimulation by calf serum.
13	effects of cytochalasin b on the electrical activity of frog muscle fibers	The effects of cytochalasin b on apos; electrical activity of frog muscle fibers.
13	the effect of verapamil on potassium fluxes in canine cardiac purkinje fibres	L' effect of verapamil on potassium fluxes in canine cardiac purkinje fibres.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration i movement of potassium accompanying ions and water	An abnormal relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with decreasing intracellular potassium concentration i movement of potassium accompanying the ions and water.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration ii rate of forward and reverse k42 transport through muscle fiber membranes in saccharose sulfate solutions with potassium concentrations of 2 5 and 75 mm	The abnormal relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decrease in the intracellular potassium concentration ii the rate of transport of k42 to and before and after muscle fiber membranes in sucrose sulfate solutions with potassium concentrations of 2.5 and 75 mm.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration iii change in the membrane potential during prolonged muscle incubation in saccharose sulfate media containing 2 5 or 75 mm of potassium	The abnormal relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers, with a decrease in the intracellular potassium concentration, changes the membrane potential during apos; prolonged muscle incubation in sucrose sulfate medium containing 25 or 75 mm of potassium.
13	separation of two voltage sensitive potassium currents and demonstration of a tetrodotoxin resistant calcium current in frog motoneurones	Separation of two voltage-sensitive potassium currents and demonstration of a tetrodotoxin-resistant calcium current in frog motoneurons.
13	potassium activation in helix aspersa neurones under voltage clamp a component mediated by calcium influx	Krotic activation in the aspersa neurons of l' helix under voltage closes a component mediated by l' calcium influx.
13	calcium binding of synaptosomes isolated from rat brain cortex iii binding with some divalent heavy metal ions and calcium binding sites	The calcium binding of synaptosomes isolated from rat cerebral cortex iii binds to some divalent heavy metal ions and calcium binding sites.
13	interaction between drugs and potassium rich solutions in producing contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle studies in normal and calcium depleted tissues	Interaction between drugs and potassium-rich solutions to produce contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle studies in normal and calcium-depleted tissues.
13	effects of ph and ionic strength on the potassium system in the internally perfused giant barnacle muscle fibre	The effects of ph and ionic strength on the potassium system of the internally perfused giant bernacular muscle fibers.
13	voltage clamp analysis of transmembrane ionic currents in guinea pig myometrium evidence for an initial potassium activation triggered by calcium influx	L' voltage clamp analysis of transmembrane ion currents in guinea-pig myometrium revealed an initial potassium activation elicited by calcium influx.
13	potassium influx in the frog atrium during the cardiac cycle	Injection of potassium into frog atrium during the cardiac cycle.
13	the effect of caffeine on excitation contraction coupling in skeletal and smooth muscle	L' effect of caffeine on contraction coupling; excitation in skeletal and smooth muscle.
13	potassium current and the effect of cesium on this current during anomalous rectification of the egg cell membrane of a starfish	The potassium current and lapos; the effect of cesium on this current during recovery; an abnormal rectification of the lapos membrane; ova; a starfish.
13	role of superficially membrane bound calcium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	The role of surface membrane bound calcium in frog skeletal muscle contraction coupling; excitation.
13	effect of conditioning potential on potassium current kinetics in the frog node	Effect of conditioning potential on potassium current kinetics in frog knot.
13	radiation induced decrease in influx rates of potassium ions into thymocytes in vitro in relation to decreased intracellular adenosine triphosphate concentrations	Radiation induced decreased levels of apos; potassium ions in in in vitro thymocytes in relation to decreased intracellular adenosine triphosphate concentrations.
13	reversible inhibition of potassium contractures by optical isomers of verapamil and d 600 on slow muscle fibres of the frog	Reversible inhibition of potassium contractions by the optical isomers of verapamil and d 600 on slow muscle fibers of frogs.
13	cesium induced rectifications in frog myelinated fibres	Cesium induces rectifications in frog myelinated fibers.
13	the role of potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and glycolysis	The role of potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and glycolysis.
13	influence of magnesium on calcium and potassium related responses in vascular smooth muscle	L' influence of magnesium on calcium and potassium responses in vascular smooth muscle.
13	depolarization induced calcium release from sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments i release of calcium taken up upon using atp	Depolarization induced calcium release from sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments i release of absorbed calcium using apos; atp.
13	the effect of caffeine and tetracaine on the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	L' the effect of caffeine and tetracaine on apos; the time course of potassium contractions of single muscle fibers.
13	potassium and calcium conductance in slow muscle fibres of the toad	The potassium and calcium conductance in slow muscle fibers of toads.
13	adenosine and active hyperemia in dog skeletal muscle	Well, adenosine and active hyperemia in dog skeletal muscle.
13	an evaluation of the membrane constants and the potassium conductance in metabolically exhausted muscle fibres	An evaluation of the membrane constants and potassium conductance in metabolically depleted muscle fibers was performed.
13	active transport of calcium across the isolated midgut of hyalophora cecropia	Active transport of calcium through the isolated midgut of the apos; hyalophora cecropia.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling of frog toe muscle	Effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation coupling-contraction of frog toe muscle.
13	contractile responses to epinephrine serotonin and potassium in arterial smooth muscle	Reptile responses to epinephrine serotonin and potassium in arterial smooth muscle.
13	aminopyridines and sparteine as inhibitors of membrane potassium conductance effects on myxicola giant axons and the lobster neuromuscular junction	aminopyridines and sparteine as inhibitors of the effects of membrane-bound potassium conductance on myxicola giant axons and the lobster neuromuscular junction.
13	influence of changes in external potassium and chloride ions on membrane potential and intracellular potassium ion activity in rabbit ventricular muscle	L' influence of changes in external potassium and chloride ions on membrane potential and l' intracellular potassium ion activity in rabbit ventricular muscle.
13	effect of calcium ions on potential dependent potassium channels in the membrane of the soma of giant mollusc neurons	Effect of calcium ions on potential potassium-dependent channels in the soma membrane of neurons of giant molluscs.
13	physostigmine induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	Physostigmine induced contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	voltage current relationships in skeletal muscles of rats	Stress patterns in skeletal muscles of rats.
13	myosin and actomyosin from human skeletal muscle	Both myosin and actomyosin from human skeletal muscle.
13	pulsed nuclear magnetic resonance study of 39k in frog striated muscle	Pulsed nuclear magnetic resonance of 39k in frog striated muscle was studied.
13	electrochemical profile of k and cl ions across the proximal tubule of bullfrog kidneys a study using double barreled ion sensitive microelectrodes	The electrochemical profile of k and cl ions in the proximal tubule of bullfrog kidneys, using two-barrel ion-selective microelectrodes.
13	hepatic drug metabolism in iron magnesium and potassium deficient rats	Hepatic drug metabolism in iron magnesium and potassium deficiency rats.
13	calcium and the contractile response to prostaglandin in the smooth muscle of guinea pig stomach	Calcium and contractile response to prostaglandins in the smooth muscle of guinea pig stomach.
13	a comparison of effects of skf 525 a and procaine on excitation contraction coupling in single crayfish muscle fibers	Comparison of effects of skf 525 a and procaine on contraction coupling; excitation in single muscle fibers; crayfish.
13	depolarization induced phosphorylation of specific proteins mediated by calcium ion influx in rat brain synaptosomes	Depolarization induced phosphorylation of specific proteins mediated by calcium influx into rat cerebral synaptosomes.
13	characteristics of response of isolated smooth muscle cells to cholinergic drugs	Characteristics of response of isolated smooth muscle cells to cholinergic drugs.
13	effects of intracellular ph on plateau formation following the action potential of squid giant axons	Intracellular phantom effects on plateaus formation depending on the potential of the squid giant axons.
13	release of proteins from the inner surface of squid axon membrane labeled with tritiated n ethylmaleimide	Release of proteins from the inner surface of the squid axonal membrane labelled with tritiated nethyl maleimide.
13	potassium current kinetics in myxicola axons effects of conditioning prepulses	Potassic current kinetics in myxicola axons effects of pre--impulse pre-impulse conditioning.
13	dynamics of aminopyridine block of potassium channels in squid axon membrane	L' aminopyridine blocks the potassium channels in squid axonal membrane.
13	investigation of the relationship between cell surface calcium ion gating and phosphatidylinositol turnover by comparison of the effects of elevated extracellular potassium ion concentration on ileium smooth muscle and pancreas	The relationship between cell surface calcium ion binding and phosphatidylinositol turnover was studied by comparing the effects of apos; high concentration of apos; extracellular potassium ion on the smooth muscle and pancreas of the ileum.
13	the effect of extracellular potassium on the intracellular potassium ion activity and transmembrane potentials of beating canine cardiac purkinje fibers	L' effect of extracellular potassium on the apos; activity of the apos; intracellular potassium ion and transmembrane potentials of beating canine cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	control of the delayed outward potassium currents in bursting pace maker neurones of the snail helix pomatia	Control of the delayed outward potassium currents in the rhythmic pacemaker neurons of the pomatia snail propeller.
13	extracellular potassium and trasmitter release at the giant synapse of squid	Release of extracellular potassium and trasmitter during the giant synapse of squid.
13	diazepam blockade of repetitive action potentials in skeletal muscle fibres a model of its membrane action	Diazepam blockade of repetitive d&apos potentials in skeletal muscle fibers is a model of its membrane action.
13	depletion and accumulation of potassium in the extracellular clefts of cardiac purkinje fibers during voltage clamp hyperpolarization and depolarization	Depletion and accumulation of potassium in extracellular clefts of cardiac purkin fibers during apo; hyperpolarization and depolarization of voltage imposed.
13	differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium channels and displacement currents in frog skeletal muscle	The differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium channels and displacement currents in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of internal and external 4 aminopyridine on the potassium currents in intracellularly perfused squid giant axons	L' effect of inner and outer 4 aminopyridine on the potassium currents in intracellularly perfused squid giants.
13	continuous direct measurement of intracellular chloride and ph in frog skeletal muscle	Continuous direct measurement of intracellular chloride and ph in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effects of certain cations on the formation and infectivity of phytophthora zoospores 1 effects of calcium magnesium potassium and iron ions	Effects of certain cations on formation and infectivity of phytophthora zoospores 1 effects of potassium calcium magnesium and iron ions.
13	influence of calcium and potassium ions on the parasympathetic stimulation secretory response of the isolated and perfused submandibular gland author s transl	Influence of calcium and potassium ions on the secretory response of the parasympathetic stimulation of l&apos translocation; author of isolated perfused, mandibular-gland.
13	studies on normal human skeletal muscle in relation to the pathopharmacology of malignant hyperpyrexia	Studies of normal human skeletal muscle in relation to the pathopharmacology of malignant hyperpyrexia.
13	calcium requirement for activation of intact aortic smooth muscle	Need calcium for the apos; activation of intact aortic smooth muscle.
13	the facilitatory actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility in avian muscle	Facilitating actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility in avian muscle.
13	calcium modulation in brain extracellular microenvironment demonstrated with ion selective micropipette	The selective ion micropipette was used to demonstrate calcium modulation in the cerebral extracellular microenvironment.
13	activation of gastro intestinal smooth muscle induced by the calcium ionophore a23187	Gastro smooth muscle activation-intestinal induced by the apos; calcium ionophore a23187.
13	cardiac purkinje fibres ca2 i controls the potassium permeability via the conductance components gk1 and gk2	Cardiac purkinje fibers ca2i control the potassium permeability via the intermediate conductance components gk1 and gk2.
13	model of the effect of 4 aminopyridine at the level of potassium channels of the giant axon of the squid logigo forbesi l	L&apos model; effect of 4 aminopyridine at the potassium channels of l' giant axon of the squid logigo forbesi l.
13	internal calcium concentration and potassium permeability in paramecium	Internal calcium concentration and potassium permeability in paramecium.
13	influence of muscle length on the force velocity relation of k contractures in smooth muscle from rabbit urinary bladder	L' influence of muscle length on the relationship between force velocity and contractions k in rabbit bladder smooth muscle.
13	effects of strychnine on the potassium conductance of the frog node of ranvier	The effects of strychnine on the potassium conductance of the rancher frog knot.
13	delayed rectification in the transverse tubules origin of the late after potential in frog skeletal muscle	Delayed correction in the apos; transverse tubular origin of the late potential in frog skeletal muscle.
13	lanthanum block of contraction and of relaxation in response to serotonin and dopamine in molluscan catch muscle	A block of contraction and relaxation of lanthanum in response to serotonin and dopamine in the shellfish harvesting muscle.
13	oscillation of membrane potential in l cells iii k current voltage curves	Oscillation of membrane potential in l iii k current voltage curves cells.
13	inhibitory action of dantrolene sodium on the activation of excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Inhibitive action of dantrolene sodium on the apos; activation of contraction coupling; frog skeletal muscle excitation.
13	k localization in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of k adsorbing sites in living muscle cells with uranium binding sites in electron micrographs of fixed cell preparations	Localization of k in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of sites; adsorption of k in living muscle cells with loos-binding sites; uranium in electron micrographs of fixed cell preparations.
13	voltage sensitive potassium channels in limulus ventral photoreceptors	Voltage-sensitive potassium channels in limulus ventral photoreceptors.
13	permeability and phase boundary potentials determined from conductance in a transmitter activated potassium channel in aplysia californica in the absence of a constant field	Phase boundary permeability and potentials determined from conductance in a transmitter-activated potassium channel in apos; apos California aplysia; absence of apos; a constant field.
13	prenylamine induced contracture of frog skeletal muscle	Prenylamine induced contracture of frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of tetraethylammonium on electrophysiologic properties of pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells	Effect of tetraethylammonium on the electrophysiological properties of pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells.
13	effects of caffeine and procaine on the membrane and mechanical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rabbit main pulmonary artery	Effects of caffeine and procaine on the membrane and mechanical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the lapos; main pulmonary artery of the rabbit.
13	experimental investigations on the contraction induced by lead in arterial smooth muscle	Experimental studies on lead-induced contraction in arterial smooth muscle are described.
13	the potassium metabolism of typical northern algerian soils i global evaluation of the potassium supply of soils	Potassium metabolism of typical soils in the north of the country; global evaluation of the potassium supply of the soils.
13	solid state physical replacement of hodgkin huxley theory phase transformation kinetics of axonal potassium conductance	Physical replacement at apos; solid state phase transformation kinetics of hodgkin huxley axonal potassium conductance theory.
13	a calcium dependent inward current in frog skeletal muscle fibres	Calcium-dependent inward current in frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	effect of low concentration potassium ion solution on the frog neuromuscular synapse	Effect of low concentration potassium ion solution on frog neuromuscular synapse.
13	comparative evaluation of the in vitro effects of hydralazine and hydralazine acetonide on arterial smooth muscle	A comparative evaluation of the in vitro effects of apos; hydralazine and apos; d*apos acetonide; hydralazine on arterial smooth muscle.
13	collecting duct hydrogen ion secretion in the rabbit role of potassium	Collect canal hydrogen ion secretion in the role of potassium rabbit.
13	desensitization onset and recovery at the potassium depolarized frog neuromuscular junction are voltage sensitive	Early desensitization and recovery at the depolarized frog neuromuscular junction are sensitive to tension.
13	blocking of the squid axon potassium channel by external caesium ions	Blocking of the potassium canal of the squid axon by external cesium ions.
13	inhibition by hypertonic solutions of ca dependent electrogenesis in single crab muscle fibers	L' inhibition by hypertonic solutions of elicitation ca-dependent in simple crab muscle fibers.
13	calcium and the control of potassium efflux in the sublingual gland	Calcium and the control of l' potassium efflux in the sublingual gland.
13	species differences in sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase activity in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig and rat vas deferens	Specific differences in the apos; lacidase activity; adenosine triphosphatase sodium in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig and rat vas deferens.
13	a potassium conductance activated by hyperpolarization in paramecium	Potassic conductance activated by hyperpolarization paramecium.
13	influences of extracellular calcium and potassium concentrations on adrenaline release and membrane potential in the perfused adrenal medulla of the rat	Influences of extracellular calcium and potassium concentrations on adrenaline release and membrane potential in the adrenal medulla of the rat.
13	ion selective electrode studies on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the intracellular level of potassium in an insect salivary gland	Ion-selective electrodes on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the intracellular potassium level in the salivary gland of one insect.
13	the compensation of potential changes produced by trivalent erbium ion in squid giant axon with applied potentials	Compensation for potential changes produced by trivalent erbium ion in squid giant axon with applied potentials.
13	effects of diltiazem and lanthanum ion on the potassium contracture of isolated guinea pig smooth muscle	Effects of diltiazem and lapos; lanthanum ion on the potassium contraction of isolated guinea pig smooth muscle.
13	selective inhibition of the tonic component of portal vein smooth muscle cell potassium contracture by verapamil	Selective inhibition of the tonic component of potassium contraction of portal vein smooth muscle cells by verapamil.
13	3 4 diaminopyridine a potent new potassium channel blocker	The diaminopyridine 3-4 is a powerful new potassium channel blocker product.
13	the toxicity of thallium i to cardiac and skeletal muscle	The toxicity of thallium i to cardiac and skeletal muscle.
13	potassium activation associated with intraneuronal free calcium	Potassium activation associated with intraneuronal free calcium.
13	contraction of detergent treated smooth muscle	Contraction of smooth muscle treated with detergent.
13	relaxation of the ach induced potassium current in the rabbit sinoatrial node cell	Relaxation of l' ach induced potassium current in the rabbit atrial node cell.
13	inward rectification in skeletal muscle a blocking particle model	Internal rectifying in the skeletal muscle of a blocking particle model.
13	response of delayed k channels to the time dependent clamping functions in squid giant axon ii descending ramps hyperbolae and exponentials	The response of delayed k channels to the time-dependent clamping functions in the giant squid axon ii hyperbolae and exponential descending ramps.
13	membrane currents in a calcium type muscle membrane under voltage clamp	The membrane currents in a calcium-like muscle membrane under tension clamp.
13	protein release from the internal surface of the squid giant axon membrane during excitation and potassium depolarization	Release of proteins from the inner surface of the squid giant axonal membrane during excitation and potassium depolarization.
13	reactivation of membrane charge movement and delayed potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibres	Reactivation of membrane charge movement and delayed potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibers.
13	cs causes a voltage dependent block of inward k currents in resting skeletal muscle fibres	The cs causes voltage-dependent blockade of inward k currents in resting skeletal muscle fibers.
13	change in nuclear potassium electrochemical activity and puffing of potassium sensitive salivary chromosome regions during chironomus development	Changes in apos; nuclear potassium electrochemical activity and swelling of potassium-sensitive salivary chromosome regions during chironomus development.
13	modified k channel gating by exhaustion and the block by internally applied tea and 4 aminopyridine in muscle	Modified k-channel gating by exhaustion and blockade by internal application of tea and 4 aminopyridine in the muscle.
13	the properties of the extraocular muscles of the frog iii morphological mechanical and pharmacological properties of the isolated retractor bulbi muscle	The properties of the extraocular muscles of the frog iii the morphological, mechanical, and pharmacological properties of the isolated retractor bulb.
13	the interactions of protons calcium and potassium ions on cardiac purkinje fibres	Interactions of protons, calcium and potassium ions, on cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	the effect of acid base changes on skeletal muscle twitch tension	The effect of acidic base changes on skeletal muscle twitch tension was studied.
13	potassium contracture of smooth muscle in the presence of dextran	Potassium contracture of smooth muscle in the presence of dextran.
13	influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k induced responses in vascular smooth muscle	L' influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k induced responses in vascular smooth muscle.
13	metabolic correlates of fatigue and of recovery from fatigue in single frog muscle fibers	The metabolic correlates of fatigue and recovery from fatigue in frog muscle fibers; a single frog muscle.
13	separation of potassium and calcium channels in the nerve cell soma membrane	Separation of potassium and calcium channels in the soma membrane of nerve cells.
13	inhibitory action of hypertonic urea solution on the potassium contracture of the heart ventricular muscle	Inhibitor action of apos; hypertonic urea solution on the potassium contraction of the cardiac ventricular muscle.
13	glutamate secretion and nad p h levels during calcium dependent depolarization of slices of the dentate gyrus	Glutamate secretion and nad p-h levels during calcium-dependent depolarization of slices of the serrated gyrus.
13	increased sensitivity of frog skeletal muscle to procaine in the presence of organic anions	Increased sensitivity of frog skeletal muscle to procaine in the presence of organic anions.
13	transient potassium currents in slow muscle fibers	The transient potassium currents in slow muscle fibers.
13	changes in the contractile properties of tonic muscle fibers following denervation	Changes in the contractile properties of tonic muscle fibers after denervation.
13	effects of some vasodilators on calcium translocation in intact and fractionated vascular smooth muscle	Effects of certain vasodilators on calcium translocation in intact and fractionated vascular smooth muscle.
13	intestinal and renal excretion of phosphorus and calcium in rats receiving potassium metabisulfite tannic acid and ethanol alone or in combination	L' intestinal and renal excretion of phosphorus and calcium in rats receiving apos; potassium metabisulfite tannic acid and apos; ethanol alone or in combination.
13	the role of membrane electrical activities and extracellular calcium in high k induced contracture of guinea pig ureter	The role of membrane electrical activities and extracellular calcium in high k-induced contraction caused contraction of the guinea pig ureter.
13	dissociation between ion permeability and the lethal action of polyene antibiotics on candida albicans	Dissociation between ionic permeability and l' lethal action of polyene antibiotics on candida albicans.
13	relationship between theophylline induced relaxation and excitation contraction coupling in intestinal smooth muscle	The relationship between theophylline induced relaxation and contraction coupling in intestinal smooth muscle.
13	reversible depletion of synaptic vesicles induced by application of high external potassium to the frog neuromuscular junction	Reversible depletion of synaptic vesicles induced by application of high external potassium at the frog neuromuscular junction.
13	interrelationship between the striated structure of muscle and the distribution of calcium in it i the changes in the protofibrillary structure of the frog fast muscle fibers in steady potassium contracture	Interrelation between the skeletal structure of the muscle and the distribution of calcium in the @-@, i changes in the protofibrillary structure of frog fast muscle fibers in stable potassium contraction.
13	some properties of potassium stimulated calcium influx in presynaptic nerve endings	Certain properties of potassium stimulated apos; calcium influx in presynaptic nerve terminals.
13	distribution of potassium and chloride permeability over the surface and t tubule membranes of mammalian skeletal muscle	Distribution of potassium and chloride permeability on the surface and membranes of mammalian skeletal muscle t-tubules.
13	effect of scn on potassium contracture in twitch muscle fibers of the frog	Effect of scn on potassium contraction in twitch muscle fibers of frog.
13	biphasic time course of inactivation of potassium contractures in single twitch muscle fibers of the frog	A biphasic time course of inactivation of potassium contractures in single twitch muscle fibers of the frog.
13	contractility of the frog ventricular myocardium in sodium free lithium solution	The contractility of the frog ventricular myocardium in a lithium solution without sodium.
13	the calcium current and the activation of a slow potassium conductance in voltage clamped mouse neuroblastoma cells	The calcium current and l' activation of d' a slow potassium conductance in mouse neuroblastoma cells with voltage clamp.
13	contractile responses to direct stimulation of frog slow muscle fibres before and after denervation	Contractile responses to direct stimulation of frog slow muscle fibers before and after denervation.
13	extracellular calcium and potassium changes in hippocampal slices	Extracellular calcium and potassium changes in slices; seahorse.
13	voltage dependent calcium and potassium ion conductances a contingency mechanism for an associative learning model	Tension-dependent conductances of calcium and potassium ions are a contingency mechanism for an associative learning model.
13	the effect of septic shock on skeletal muscle action potentials in the primate	L' effect of septic shock on muscle potentials; skeletal muscle action in primate.
13	after hyperpolarization conductance time course and repetitive firing in a motoneurone model with early inactivation of the slow potassium conductance system	After apo; temporal behavioral evolution of apo; hyperpolarization and repeated discharge in a motor neuron model with early inactivation of the slow potassium conductance system.
13	in vitro effects of desoxycorticosterone on vascular smooth muscle	The in vitro effects of deoxycorticosterone on vascular smooth muscle.
13	electrophysiological properties of resting secretory membranes of lamellibranch mantles interaction between calcium and potassium	Electrophysiological properties of resting secretory membranes of interaction between calcium and potassium lamellibranchs.
13	survival of k permeability and gating currents in squid axons perfused with k free media	Survival of k permeability and barrier currents in squid axons perfused with k-free medium.
13	influence of chloride potassium and tetraethylammonium on the early outward current of sheep cardiac purkinje fibers	L' influence of potassium chloride and tetraethylammonium on the early outward current of sheep cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	naloxone and naltrexone actions and interactions at an opiate drug receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	Action and interaction of naloxone and naltrexone on frog skeletal muscle fibers at an opiate receptor.
13	a dual effect of formaldehyde on the inwardly rectifying potassium conductance in skeletal muscle	A double effect of formaldehyde on internal rectifying potassium conductance in skeletal muscle.
13	extracellular potassium accumulation in voltage clamped frog ventricular muscle	Extracellular potassium accumulation in frog ventricular muscle at voltage clamp.
13	potassium channels in nodal and internodal axonal membrane of mammalian myelinated fibres	Potassium channels in nodal and internodal axonal membranes of mammalian myelinated fibres.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contractions by some non specific spasmolytics in depolarized smooth muscles	L' calcium antagonism induced contractions by nonspecific spasmolytics in depolarized smooth muscles.
13	on the possible role of potassium ions in the action of terbutaline on skeletal muscle contractions	On the possible role of potassium ions in the action of terbutaline on skeletal muscle contractions.
13	some determinants of latency of off response to electrical field stimulation in circular layer of smooth muscle of opossum esophagus	Determinants of latency of response without electrical field stimulation in the circular layer of smooth muscle of the oesophagus of l' opossum.
13	muscarinic suppression of a novel voltage sensitive k current in a vertebrate neurone	The muscarinic suppression of a new voltage voltage-sensitive current in a vertebrate neuron.
13	the effects of calcium deprivation upon mechanical and electrophysiological parameters in skeletal muscle fibres of the frog	The effects of calcium deficiency on the mechanical and electrophysiological parameters in skeletal muscle fibers of frogs.
13	the effect on plasma potassium of a combined preparation of frusemide and slow release potassium chloride diumide k continus tablets	The effect on plasma potassium of a combination of frusemide and slow release potassium chloride, continuous tablets.
13	functional profile of the isolated uremic nephron potassium adaptation in the rabbit cortical collecting tubule	Functional dosage profile; uremic nephron potassium adaptation isolated from rabbit cortical collecting tubule.
13	prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in vascular smooth muscle of the rat the role of na k atpase	Prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in the vascular smooth muscle of the rat the role of na k atpase.
13	a histoenzymatic study of rat intrafusal muscle fibres	A histoenzymatic study of rat intrafusal muscle fibers.
13	coupling of electrical processes on the membrane to the contractile activity of anococcygeus smooth muscle cells	Coupling of the electrical processes of the membranous membrane to the l' contractile activity of the smooth anococcygeal muscle cells.
13	control of ion distribution in isolated smooth muscle cells i potassium	Control of ion distribution in isolated smooth muscle i potassium cells.
13	potassium concentration changes in the transverse tubules of vertebrate skeletal muscle	Changes in potassium concentration in the transverse tubules of vertebrate skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of gramicidin a on the k conductance of the membrane of isolated frog skeletal muscle fibres	L' effect of gramicidin a on the membrane conductance k of isolated frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	a voltage dependent gate in series with the inwardly rectifying potassium channel in frog striated muscle	A voltage-dependent door in series with the internal rectified potassium channel in frog striated muscle.
13	conditioning hyperpolarization induced delays in the potassium channels of myelinated nerve	Hyperpolarization induced delays in the potassium channels of the myelinated nerve.
13	single channel recordings of k currents in squid axons	Single channel recordings of k currents in squid axons.
13	activation of contraction of arterial smooth muscle in the presence of nitrate and other anions	Activation of contraction of arterial smooth muscle in the presence of nitrate and other anions.
13	comparative studies on muscle amp deaminase ii regulation by monovalent cations atp and orthophosphate of the enzyme from hen frog and pikeperch muscle	Comparative studies of the regulation of l' muscle deaminase ii by monovalent cations atp and l' l&apos orthophosphate; frog and pike muscle enzyme.
13	action of salicylate ions on the electrical properties of sheep cardiac purkinje fibres	The action of salicylate ions on the electrical properties of sheep cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	effects of smooth muscle stimulants on 1 isoprenaline beta adrenoceptor interaction in taenia from guinea pig caecum	The effects of smooth muscle stimulants on the brain; interaction between beta-the eposadrenoceptor; isoprenaline and adrenergic receptors in guinea pig caecal taenia.
13	circumstantial evidence for increased potassium conductance of membrane of cardiac muscle by 2 nicotinamidoethyl nitrate sg 75	Circumstantial evidence of increased potassium conductance of cardiac muscle membrane by 2 nicotinamidoethyl nitrate sg.
13	effect of gramicidin on the potassium conductance of an isolated frog muscle fiber	Effect of gramicidin on the potassium conductance of an isolated frog muscle fiber.
13	on the kinetics of the potassium channel activated by acetylcholine in the s a node of the rabbit heart	The kinetics of the potassium channel activated by acetylcholine in a node of the rabbit heart.
13	separation of current induced by potassium accumulation from acetylcholine induced relaxation current in the rabbit s a node	The current separation induced by potassium accumulation and acetylcholine synthesis induces a relaxation current in the rabbit a node.
13	effects on muscle electrolytes of potassium and magnesium infusions spironolactone medication and operation in a case of primary aldosteronism	Effects on muscle electrolytes of apos; potassium and magnesium spironolactone infusion drug and lytes; operation in a case of apos; primary aldosterone.
13	transmembrane ion currents in pulmonary artery smooth muscle	The transmembrane ion currents in the smooth muscle of the lung artery.
13	renal potassium adaptation na k atpase activity along the nephron after chronic potassium loading	Adaptation of renal potassium to apos; na k atpase activity along the nephron after chronic potassium loading.
13	effects of phasic and tonic activation on contraction dynamics in smooth muscle	Effects of apos; phasic and tonic activation on contraction dynamics in the smooth muscle.
13	effect of potassium ions on electrogenesis and contraction of ureter smooth muscle	Effect of potassium ions on electrogenesis and contraction of urethral smooth muscle.
13	mechanism of opiate induced permeability of mitochondrial membranes for potassium ions	The opiate mechanism induces permeability of mitochondrial membranes to potassium ions.
13	fast photo induced changes in the light scattering of vertebrate photoreceptor membrane preparations study of suspensions of vesicles obtained by ultrasonic treatment of the outer segments of retinal rods	Rapid photos induce changes in the light scattering of vertebrate photoreceptor membrane preparations by studying the apos and by studying vesicle suspensions obtained by ultrasonic treatment of the outer segments of retinal rods.
13	smooth muscle membrane vesicle orientation a study on intactness and sidedness of rat myometrium plasma membrane vesicles	L' orientation of the smooth muscle membrane vesicles was studied on the intact state and pattern of rat myometrium plasma membrane vesicles.
13	the contractile response of smooth muscle to immersion in hypertonic solutions	The contractile response of smooth muscle to immersion in hypertonic solutions.
13	calcium action potentials and potassium permeability activation in pancreatic beta cells	Potentials of apo; calcium action and potassium permeability activation in pancreatic beta cells.
13	rectifying properties of the membrane of single freshly isolated smooth muscle cells	Correct the membrane properties of isolated, freshly isolated smooth muscle cells.
13	neocortical pyramidal cells a model with dendritic calcium conductance reproduces repetitive firing and epileptic behavior	The neocortical pyramidal cells, a model with dendritic calcium conductance, mimicked a repetitive discharge and epileptic behaviour.
13	potassium chloride versus voltage clamp contractures in ventricular muscle	Potassium chloride versus voltage clamp contractures in ventricular muscle.
13	intracellular chloride concentration and evidence for the existence of a chloride pump in frog skeletal muscle	Intracellular chloride concentration and evidence of apos; existence of a chloride pump in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of energy deprivation and hyperosmolarity upon tubular structures and electrophysiological parameters of muscle fibres	Energy deprivation and hyperosmolarity affect tubular structures and electrophysiological parameters of muscle fibers.
13	the effects of temperature local anaesthetics ph divalent cations and group specific reagents on repriming and repolarization induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The effects of local bivalent cation anesthetic temperature and group-specific reagents on repriming and repolarization induced contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	pgf2 alpha on drug induced contractile responses of frog rectus abdominis muscle	Pgf2 alpha on drug-induced contractile responses of frog rectus abdominis muscle.
13	effects of monochromatic x radiation on the membrane of nodes of ranvier under voltage and current clamp conditions	Effects of monochromatic radiation on the membrane of ranvier nodes under voltage and clamp current conditions.
13	interaction of calcium and potassium with neuromuscular blocking agents	Interaction of calcium and potassium with neuromuscular blocking agents.
13	absence of potassium conductance in central myelinated axons	Absence of potassium conductance in central myelinated axons.
13	comparison between the delayed outward current in slow and fast twitch skeletal muscle in the rat	Comparison of the delayed outward current in skeletal muscle with slow and fast contraction in the rat.
13	effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on tissue concentrations of high energy phosphates and mechanical activity of normal polarized and depolarized intestinal smooth muscles from guinea pig	Effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on tissue high-energy phosphate concentrations and l' mechanical activity of normal guinea pig polarized and depolarized intestinal smooth muscles.
13	effect of ruthenium red on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Effect of ruthenium red on contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of diazepam on tension and electrolyte distribution in frog muscle	L' effect of diazepam on tension and electrolyte distribution in frog muscle.
13	calcium metabolism in the young adult male as affected by level and form of phosphorus intake and level of calcium intake	Calcium metabolism in the young adult male is influenced by the level and form of phosphorus and calcium intake.
13	membrane electrical properties of frog slow muscle fibres	Membrane electrical properties of frog slow muscle fibers.
13	interaction of barium ions with potassium channels in squid giant axons	Interaction of barium ions with potassium channels in squid giant axons.
13	inhibition of potassium conductance with external tetraethylammonium ion in myxicola giant axons	Inhibition of potassium conductance by external tetraethylammonium ion in myxicol giant axons.
13	a dichtomy of the membrane potential response of rat soleus muscle fibers to low extracellular potassium concentrations	A dichtomy of the membrane potential response of rat soleus muscle fibers to low extracellular potassium concentration.
13	potassium induced cardioplegia in patients undergoing correction of congenital heart defects	Potassium induced cardioplegia in patients undergoing congenital cardiac correction.
13	rubidium block and rubidium permeability of the inward rectifier of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Rubidium block and rubidium permeability of the inward rectifier of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	extracellular potassium activity during frequency dependent conduction block of giant axons in the metathoracic ganglion of the cockroach	L&apos extracellular potassium activity during frequency-dependent conduction blockade of giant axons in the metathoracic ganglion of the cockroach.
13	mechanisms of activation of coronary vessel smooth muscle contraction	Mechanisms of apo; activation of coronary vessel smooth muscle contraction.
13	inhibitors of mitochondrial ca uptake dissociate potassium induced tension responses from increased 45ca retention in rabbit aortic smooth muscle	Mitochondrial uptake inhibitors dissociate responses to apos-induced tension; increased 45ca retention in rabbit aortic smooth muscle.
13	effect of transmembrane ph gradient changes on potassium induced relaxation in vascular smooth muscle	L' effect of transmembrane pharyngeal gradient changes on potassium induced relaxation in vascular smooth muscle.
13	use of aequorin to study excitation contraction coupling in mammalian smooth muscle	Use of equiporine to study coupling of contractions; excitation in mammalian smooth muscle.
13	biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers and effects of various agents on the contractures	Biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers and effects of various agents on contractions.
13	epileptiform burst afterhyperolarization calcium dependent potassium potential in hippocampal ca1 pyramidal cells	Epileptiform pulse following apos; hyperolarization, calcium-dependent potassium potential in hippocampal ca1 pyramidal cells.
13	potassium maintenance potassium supplements or potassium sparing agents	Supplements of potassium d' maintenance or potassium saving agents.
13	current recorded from a cut open giant axon under voltage clamp	Recorded current d' a giant axon cut and opened under voltage clamp.
13	effect of homologous n alkanoic acids on the function of isolated skeletal muscles v relations between twitch tetanus and contracture	Effect of homologous n alkanoic acids on the function of isolated skeletal muscles v relations between twitch tetanus and contracture.
13	bound potassium in muscle ii	Bound potassium in muscle ii.
13	carbon dioxide membrane potential and intracellular potassium activity in frog skeletal muscle	Carbon dioxide membrane potential and intracellular potassium activity in frog skeletal muscle tissue.
13	protein from beef heart mitochondria inducing the potassium channel conductivity of bilayer lipid membrane	Beef heart mitochondrial protein inducing potassium channel conductivity of bilayer lipid membrane.
13	apical k channels in frog skin rana temporaria cation adsorption and voltage influence gating kinetics	The apical k channels of frog skin rana temporaria, l' cation adsorption and tension influence block kinetics.
13	voltage oscillations in the barnacle giant muscle fiber	Stress oscillations in the barnacle giant muscle fiber.
13	voltage clamp of single freshly dissociated smooth muscle cells current voltage relationships for three currents	Pressure clamp of the current relations of freshly dissociated smooth muscle cells for three currents.
13	potassium conductance and internal calcium accumulation in a molluscan neurone	Potassium conductance and internal calcium accumulation in a mollusc neuron.
13	evidence that histamine and carbachol may open the same ion channels in longitudinal smooth muscle of guinea pig ileum	Evidence indicates that histamine and carbachol may open the same ion channels in longitudinal smooth muscle of guinea pig ileum.
13	direct measurement of the increase in intracellular free calcium ion concentration in response to the action of complement	Direct measurement of apos; increase in intracellular concentration of free calcium ions in response to complement action.
13	synaptic excitation may activate a calcium dependent potassium conductance in hippocampal pyramidal cells	L' synaptic excitation may activate a calcium-dependent potassium conductance in hippocampal pyramidal cells.
13	myelinated central vertebrate axon lacks voltage sensitive potassium conductance	The central axon of rapidly synthesized myelinated vertebrates has no voltage sensitive potassium conductance.
13	intracellular and exchangeable potassium in cirrhosis evidence against the occurrence of potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites	The intracellular and exchangeable potassium in cirrhosis proves that there is no potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites.
13	the initiation of phasic and tonic contraction by potassium and the effect of calcium multivalent cations and ca antagonist on potassium contracture in guinea pig vas deferens	The initiation of phasic and tonic contraction by potassium and the effect of multivalent calcium cations and ca antagonist on potassium contracture in coinea vas deferens.
13	deleterious effects of calcium deprivation on freshly isolated hepatocytes	The deleterious effects of calcium deprivation on freshly isolated hepatocytes.
13	unidirectional flux ratio for potassium ions in depolarized frog skeletal muscle	The unidirectional flux ratio for potassium ions in depolarized frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of short term co2 breathing on the co2 content and intracellular ph in skeletal muscle of man	Effect of short-term co2 respiration on co2 content and intracellular phloem in skeletal muscle of male rat.
13	transient and steady state kinetic studies of sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase using beta 2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as chromophoric substrate assay	Kinetic studies; transient and apo-state; apo-state; protein balance; sodium adenosine triphosphatase using beta-2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as chromophoric substrate.
13	calcium dependent slow action potentials in potassium depolarized guinea pig ventricular myocardium enhanced by barium ions	Potentials of calcium-dependent slow action in guinea pig ventricular myocardium depolarized by potassium and stimulated by barium ions.
13	electrophysiology of phagocytic membranes iii evidence for a calcium dependent potassium permeability change during slow hyperpolarizations of activated macrophages	L' electrophysiology of phagocytic membranes iii indicates a calcium-dependent change in potassium permeability during slow hyperpolarizations of activated macrophages.
13	actions of various muscarinic agonists on membrane potential potassium efflux and contraction of longitudinal muscle of guinea pig intestine	Action of various muscarinic agonists on the apos; potassium efflux of membrane potential and contraction of longitudinal muscle of the apos; guinea pig intestine.
13	potassium stimulated calcium dependent release of 3h gaba from neuron and glia enriched cultures of cells dissociated from rat cerebellum	Potassium stimulated calcium-dependent release of 3-h-gaba from neurons, and cultures of dissociated cells from rat cerebellum were enriched with glial cells.
13	evidence for a sodium electrogenic pump in airway smooth muscle	Evidence of a sodium generator pump in airway smooth muscle.
13	the selective inhibition of serotonin induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle by calcium antagonistic dihydropyridines an investigation of the mechanism of action of nimodipine	The selective inhibition of serotonin induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle by calcium antagonist dihydropyridines, a study of the mechanism of nimodipine action.
13	nickel substitution for calcium and the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	Calcium substitution by nickel and l' temporal evolution of potassium contractions of single muscle fibers.
13	field potential induced by injection of potassium ion into the frog retina a test of current interpretations of the electroretinographic erg b wave	Field potential induced by apos; injection of potassium ion into frog retina, a test of current interpretations of apos; erg b electroretographic wave.
13	localization of calcium in an annelid visceral muscle by pyroantimonate deposition and by x ray microprobe analysis	The localization of calcium in annelid visceral muscle by pyroantimonate deposition and X-ray microprobe analysis.
13	blockage of squid axon potassium conductance by internal tetra n alkylammonium ions of various sizes	Blocking of the phosphate potassium conductance; squid axon by tetra-n alkylammonium ions of various sizes.
13	a new interpretation of the pace maker current in calf purkinje fibres	This is a new interpretation of the pacemaker current in calf purkinje fibers.
13	electrical current induced contraction in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	Electrical current induced contraction in the smooth muscle of rabbit aorta.
13	effects of external calcium reduction on the kinetics of potassium contractures in frog twitch muscle fibres	Effects of external calcium reduction on the kinetics of potassium contractions in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	slow calcium and potassium currents across frog muscle membrane measurements with a vaseline gap technique	Slow calcium and potassium currents flow through frog muscle membrane at apos; assistance; a vascular opening technique.
13	ca k bi ionic action potential in squid giant axons	Ca k potential d' ionic action in squid giant axons.
13	a k selective three state channel from fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum of frog leg muscle	A three-state selective k channel from the fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum of frog leg muscle.
13	a comparison of the differential effects of nitroglycerin nifedipine and papaverine on contractures induced in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle by potassium and lanthanum	Comparison of the differential effects of nitroglycerine nifedipine and papaverine on contractions induced in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle by potassium and lanthanum.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contraction in potassium depolarized rabbit detrusor muscle strips by dicyclomine hydrochloride and rociverine	L' antagonism of calcium-induced contraction in depolarized rabbit detritic muscle strips by dicyclomine hydrochloride and rociverine caused potassium depolarization.
13	fast outward current controlling electrical activity in rat uterine smooth muscle during gestation	Fast outward current controls electrical activity in rat uterine smooth muscle during pregnancy.
13	tris does not inhibit isolated vascular or intestinal smooth muscle contraction	Tris n&apos does not inhibit isolated vascular or intestinal smooth muscle contraction.
13	manifestation of latent alpha excitatory response in the canine tracheal smooth muscle preparation relation to basal tone	Evidence of a latent alpha excitatory response in canine tracheal smooth muscle preparation in relation to basal tone.
13	inactivation of voltage gated delayed potassium current in molluscan neurons a kinetic model	L' inactivation of voltage retarded potassium current in molluscan neurons is a kinetic model.
13	a theoretical study on the sucrose gap technique as applied to multicellular muscle preparations ii methodical errors in the determination of outward currents	A theoretical study of the sucrose gap technique applied to multicellular muscle preparations ii methodical errors in the determination of outward currents.
13	dynamics of potassium ion currents in squid axon membrane a re examination	Dynamics of potassium ionic currents in squid axonal membrane reexamined.
13	potassium ion currents in the crayfish giant axon dynamic characteristics	D'apos currents; potassium ions in giant axon dynamic characteristics of crayfish.
13	biological activities of cystic fibrosis serum iv stimulation of the calcium mediated k efflux from rat submandibular gland fragments	L' biological activity of cystic fibrosis serum IV stimulates calcium-mediated efflux from gland fragments under rat mandibular.
13	time dependence of the calcium activated potassium current	The time dependence of the calcium-activated potassium current.
13	alteration of smooth muscle contractility after muscarinic agonist induced k loss	Modification of smooth muscle contractility after muscarinic agonist k-induced loss.
13	reconstitution in planar lipid bilayers of a ca2 dependent k channel from transverse tubule membranes isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Reconstitution of a ca2-dependent k channel from transverse tubular membranes isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle in planar lipid bilayers.
13	role of the medullary collecting duct in potassium excretion in potassium adapted animals	Role of the medullary collecting duct in potassium excretion in potassium-adapted animals.
13	potassium ion influx and na k atpase activity are required for the hamster sperm acrosome reaction	Apos; potassium ions and apos; na katpase activity are required for the reaction of apos; hamster sperm acrosome.
13	inactivation of potassium current in squid axon by a variety of quaternary ammonium ions	Inactivation of potassium current in squid axon by various ammonium ions quaternary.
13	acute effects of hemodialysis on echographic determined cardiac performance improved contractility resulting from serum increased calcium with reduced potassium despite hypovolemic reduced cardiac output	The acute effects of hemodialysis on ultrasound determined cardiac performance improved contractility resulting from an increase in serum calcium with a reduction in potassium despite a hypovolemic reduction in cardiac output.
13	role of calcium in the contraction of normal tonic muscle fibers and following denervation	The role of calcium in contraction of normal tonic muscle fibers and after denervation.
13	potassium contracture in the tonic bundle isolated from the enlarged flexor carpi radialis muscle of the frog	Potassium contracture in the tonic bundle isolated from the enlarged carpi radialis flexor muscle of the frog.
13	potassium recycling in the renal medulla effects of acute potassium chloride administration to rats fed a potassium free diet	Potassium recycling in renal medulla effects of apos; acute potassium chloride administration to rats fed a potassium-free diet.
13	steady state effects of extracellular potassium concentration on vascular smooth muscle reactivity	Balance of extracellular potassium concentration on vascular smooth muscle reactivity.
13	modulation of synaptic output by the transient outward potassium current in aplysia	Modulation of synaptic flow by the transient outward potassium current in aplysia.
13	intracellular local changes of resistance in muscle fibers in relation to membrane potential	Local intracellular changes in resistance in muscle fibers in relation to membrane potential.
13	ba2 ions block k induced contractures by antagonizing k induced membrane depolarization in frog skeletal muscle fibres	The ba2 ions blocked k-induced contractions by antagonizing k-induced membrane depolarization in frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	single k channel currents of anomalous rectification in cultured rat myotubes	Dapos currents; single k channel; abnormal rectification in cultured rat myotubes.
13	potassium current suppression by quinidine reveals additional calcium currents in neuroblastoma cells	Suppression of potassium current by quinidine reveals additional calcium currents in neuroblastoma cells.
13	magnesium increases rate of onset of desensitization in frog muscle	Magnesium increases the rate of desensitization in frog muscle.
13	membrane properties of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary hypertensive rats	The membrane properties of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary hypertensive rats.
13	stereoselective and non stereoselective effects of d 600 methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle preparations	Non-stereoselective and stereoselective effects of d 600 methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle preparations.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on potassium permeability in the smooth muscle cell membrane of canine trachea	The effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on potassium permeability in the canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane.
13	transient and delayed potassium currents in the egg cell membrane of the coelenterate renilla koellikeri	Transient and delayed potassium currents in the cell membrane of the coelenterate renilla koellikeri egg.
13	simultaneous changes in the equilibrium potential and potassium conductance in voltage clamped ranvier node in the frog	Simultaneous changes in d&apos potential; equilibrium and potassium conductance in the tension-imposed rudder node in frog.
13	evidence for the existence of three types of potassium channels in the frog ranvier node membrane	Three types of potassium channels were found to be present in the frog's range node membrane.
13	tension stiffness unloaded shortening speed and potentiation of frog muscle fibres at sarcomere lengths below optimum	Load-free tension stiffness reduced the rate of shortening and potentiation of frog muscle fibers to sarcomere lengths below the optimum.
13	the t sr junction in contracting single skeletal muscle fibers	The t sr junction in contraction of single skeletal muscle fibers.
13	properties of a calcium and voltage activated potassium current in helix pomatia neurons	The properties of a calcium- and voltage-activated potassium current in the neurons of the pomatia helix were activated.
13	activation characteristics of the calcium dependent outward potassium current in helix	D&apos characteristics; calcium-dependent activation of outward potassium current in the helix.
13	dissociation of k induced tension and cellular ca2 retention in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle in normoxia and hypoxia	Dissociation of k induced cellular tension and ca2 retention in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle tissue during normoxia and l' hypoxia.
13	effect of procaine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle	Effect of procaine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	evidence for the presence of potassium channels in the internode of frog myelinated nerve fibres	Evidence of the presence of potassium channels in the apos; between-node of frog myelinated nerve fibers.
13	calcium currents in internally perfused nerve cell bodies of limnea stagnalis	Calcium currents in perfused nerve cell bodies; interior limnea stagnalis.
13	assessment of ca2 antagonist effects of drugs in k depolarized smooth muscle differentiation of antagonist subgroups	Evaluation of the ca2 antagonistic effects of drugs on the differentiation of depolarized smooth muscle antagonists k.
13	divalent cations and the activation kinetics of potassium channels in squid giant axons	Divalent cations and kinetics d' activation of potassium channels in giant squid axons.
13	gk ca dependent cyclic potential changes in the sensory nerve terminal of frog muscle spindle	Gk ca-dependent cyclic potential changes in the sensory nerve end of frog muscle spindle.
13	stimulation by calcium and other cations of the cholesterol binding to steroid free cytochrome p 450scc purified from bovine adrenocortical mitochondria the implication of acth mediated calcium homeostasis on the cholesterol availability	Calcium stimulation and d' other cations of the binding of cholesterol to purified free cytochrome p 450scc steroid from bovine adrenal cortical mitochondria, l' l&apos involvement; apos-mediated calcium homeostasis; acth on cholesterol availability.
13	slowing effects of dopamine and calcium channel blockers on frequency of sodium spikes in rat pars intermedia cells	Slowing effects of dopaminergic and calcium channel blockers on frequency of sodium spikes in rat pars intermedia cells.
13	mechanisms of relaxation induced by activation of beta adrenoceptors in smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig mesenteric artery	Ease-induced relaxation mechanisms; activation of beta-adrenergic receptors in smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig mesenteric artery.
13	extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in rabbit gastrocnemius muscle during tourniquet ischemia	Extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in rabbit gastrocnemius muscle during tourniquet ischemia.
13	effects of flurazepam and diazepam in isolated guinea pig taenia coli and longitudinal muscle	The effects of flurazepam and diazepam on isolated guinea pig taenia coli and longitudinal muscle.
13	apamin as a selective blocker of the calcium dependent potassium channel in neuroblastoma cells voltage clamp and biochemical characterization of the toxin receptor	L' apamin as a selective blocker of the potassium channel dependent on calcium in neuroblastoma cell voltage and biochemical characterization of the toxin receptor.
13	electrogenesis and contraction of smooth muscle taenia coli kept in a solution with elevated concentration of potassium ions	The electrogenesis and contraction of taenia coli smooth muscle are maintained in a solution containing a high concentration of potassium ions.
13	some effects of carbon dioxide on intracellular potassium in frog muscle	Some effects of carbon dioxide on intracellular potassium in frog muscle.
13	calcium activated and voltage dependent potassium conductances in clonal pituitary cells	Tension-dependent and calcium-activated potassium responses in clonal pituitary cells.
13	the behavioral effects of phencyclidines may be due to their blockade of potassium channels	The behavioral effects of phencyclidines may be due to their blockage of potassium channels.
13	effect of concentration of potassium salts on the activity of the n ethylmaleimide treated hemin controlled translational inhibitor	Effect of concentration of potassium salts on appetite; activity of glucose; translational inhibitor controlled by glucose; hemin treated with glucose; ethylmaleimide.
13	the stimulation of protein degradation in muscle by ca2 is mediated by prostaglandin e2 and does not require the calcium activated protease	The stimulation of protein degradation in muscle by ca2 is mediated by prostaglandin e2 and does not require protease activated by calcium.
13	physiological and ultrastructural studies on the longitudinal retractor muscle of a sea cucumber stichopus japonicus ii intracellular localization and translocation of activator calcium during mechanical activity	Physiological and ultrastructural studies on the longitudinal retractor muscle of a sea cucumber stichopus japonicus ii Intracellular localization and translocation of activating calcium during mechanical activity.
13	single calcium dependent potassium channels in clonal anterior pituitary cells	Single calcium-dependent potassium channels in previous clonal anterior pituitary cells.
13	block of squid axon k channels by internally and externally applied barium ions	Blocking of k channels of l' squid axon by barium ions applied to interior and exterior.
13	calcium and potassium currents in muscle fibres of an insect carausius morosus	Calcium and potassium currents in the muscle fibers of an insect carausius morosus.
13	calmodulin dependent regulation of calcium activated outward current in frog atrial membrane	Calcium-dependent regulation of calmodulin activated outward current in frog atrial membrane.
13	interaction of acidosis and increased extracellular potassium on action potential characteristics and conduction in guinea pig ventricular muscle	Interaction of acidosis and lacidosis; increase of extracellular potassium on characteristics and conduction of potential d' action in guinea pig ventricular muscle.
13	the activation and inactivation in biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers	L' activation and l' inactivation of biphasic potassium contractions in single muscle fibers in frog twitch.
13	the effects of reducing the extracellular calcium concentration on the twitch in isolated frog s skeletal muscle fibres	The effects of reduced extracellular calcium concentration on the twitch in isolated frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	calcium antagonists and alpha 2 adrenoceptors possible role of extracellular calcium ions in alpha 2 adrenoceptor mediated vasoconstriction	Calcium antagonists and alpha 2 adrenoceptors may play a role in alpha 2 adrenoceptor mediated vasoconstriction.
13	effects of hypertonicity on frog muscle contractures induced by quinine	Effects of apos; hypertonicity on frog muscle contractions induced by quinine.
13	slow inward calcium currents have no obvious role in muscle excitation contraction coupling	Slow inward calcium currents have no obvious role in muscle excitation coupling.
13	effect of carbacholine on miniature potentials and currents of rat skeletal muscle endplates	Effect of carbacholine on miniature potentials and currents of rat skeletal muscle end plates.
13	relation between mineral fertilization and supply of potassium calcium magnesium and phosphorus to the population under conditions of intensive plant production in east germany	Relationship between mineral fertilization and potassium calcium magnesium and phosphorus supply to the population under conditions of intensive plant production in Germany.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium and the decrease in the extracellular chloride concentration on membrane depolarization and contraction of skeletal muscle fiber induced by a hyperpotassium solution	The effect of tetraethylammonium and the decrease in extracellular chloride concentration on membrane depolarization and contraction of skeletal muscle fibers induced by a d*apos solution; hyperpotassium.
13	a comparison of the effect of combined frusemide and controlled release potassium tablets diumide k continus tablets and frusemide and slow k tablets in elderly patients with cardiac failure	Comparison of the effect of continuous diumide-k-controlled frusemide and potassium tablets, and frusemide and slow k tablets in elderly patients with diabetes mellitus; heart failure.
13	a late increase in potassium conductance follows synaptic stimulation of granule neurons of the dentate gyrus	A late increase in potassium conductance parallels synaptic stimulation of granular neurons of serrated gyrus.
13	protein kinase injection reduces voltage dependent potassium currents	L' protein kinase injection reduces voltage-dependent potassium currents.
13	skeletal muscle injury after magnesium depletion in the dog	Skeletal muscle injury after magnesium depletion in the dog.
13	brain potassium ion homeostasis anoxia and metabolic inhibition in turtles and rats	Cerebral potassium ion and metabolic inhibition in turtles and rats.
13	calcium mediated decrease of a voltage dependent potassium current	Calcium-mediated decrease d' voltage dependent potassium current.
13	the calcium activated potassium conductance in guinea pig myenteric neurones	Calcium-activated potassium conductance in guinea pig myenteric neurons.
13	block and activation of the pace maker channel in calf purkinje fibres effects of potassium caesium and rubidium	Blockage and activation of the pacemaker channel in calf purkinje fibers effects of potassium cesium and rubidium.
13	effects of thyroxine on transmembrane resting potentials of skeletal muscle cells in culture	Effects of thyroxine on transmembrane resting potentials of skeletal muscle cells in culture.
13	calcium ions and calcium antagonists in ischaemia	Calcium ions and calcium antagonists in ischemia.
13	specific drug sensitive transport pathways for chloride and potassium ions in steady state ehrlich mouse ascites tumor cells	Drug-specific transport pathways for chloride and potassium ions in ehrlich mouse ascites to apos; state of equilibrium.
13	effects of dantrolene and d2o on k stimulated respiration of skeletal muscle	The effects of dantrolene and d2o on k stimulate respiration of skeletal muscle.
13	net metabolic changes of zinc copper nitrogen and potassium balances in skeletal trauma patients	Net metabolic changes in zinc and copper nitrogen and potassium budgets in skeletal trauma patients.
13	regenerating mammalian nerve fibres changes in action potential waveform and firing characteristics following blockage of potassium conductance	After the blockage of potassium conductance, the regenerating mammalian nerve fibers change the form of d' wave of the d&apos potential; action and firing characteristics.
13	the effect of x 537a lasalocid on potassium contracture in rat ventricular muscle	L' effect of x 537a lasalocidal on potassium contraction in rat ventricular muscle.
13	t system optical signals associated with inward rectification in skeletal muscle	T-system optical signals are associated with internal rectification in skeletal muscle.
13	conditioning prepulses and kinetics of potassium conductance in the frog node	Prepare prepulsations and kinetics of potassium conductance in the frog knot.
13	single potassium channel currents in cultured mouse oligodendrocytes	A unique potassium channel in cultured mouse oligodendrocytes.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine on inward rectifying and pacemaker currents of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effects of 4 aminopyridine on inward rectifying and pacemaker currents of cardiac purkinje fibres.
13	time courses of late after potentials following tetanus or single shock in skeletal muscle fibers	Post-potential period after tetanus or single shock in skeletal muscle fibers.
13	effects of calmodulin antagonists on tension and cellular calcium content in depolarized vascular and intestinal smooth muscles	Effects of calmodulin antagonists on cellular calcium tension and content in depolarized vascular and intestinal smooth muscle.
13	physiological synaptic interactions mediated by potassium ions	Physiological synaptic interactions mediated by potassium ions.
13	long term measurement of skeletal and lean body mass in paget s disease of bone treated with synthetic human calcitonin	Long-term measurement of skeletal and lean mass in paget bone disease treated with human synthetic calcitonin.
13	the effect of external potassium on the blockade of the inward going rectification by cesium ions in the frog atrial trabeculae	L' effect of external potassium on the block of internal rectification by cesium ions in frog atrial trabeculae.
13	activity induced potassium accumulation and its uptake in frog ventricular muscle	L' activity induced potassium accumulation and its uptake in frog ventricular muscle.
13	contractures produced by carbamate anticholinesterases in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	Correlations by carbamate anticholinesterases in bovine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	calcium and excitation contraction coupling in vascular smooth muscles	Key words: calcium and contraction; excitation in vascular smooth muscle.
13	calcium in excitation contraction coupling of frog skeletal muscle	Calcium in contraction; excitation coupling of frog skeletal muscle.
13	calcium currents of frog and insect skeletal muscle fibres measured during voltage clamp	Calcium currents of frog and d&apos skeletal muscle fibers measured during voltage clamp.
13	external calcium and contractile activation during potassium contractures in twitch muscle fibres of the frog	External calcium and contractile activity during potassium contractions in twitch muscle fibers of frogs.
13	acetylcholine and potassium 42 movements in right atrial muscle of the guinea pig	D' acetylcholine and potassium movements 42 in the right atrial muscle of the guinea pig.
13	aminopyridine block of transient potassium current	L' aminopyridine blocks transient potassium current.
13	calcium channel and calcium pump involved in oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of l strain mouse fibroblasts	The calcium channel and calcium pump are involved in oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of strain l mouse fibroblasts.
13	voltage activated and calcium activated currents studied in solitary rod inner segments from the salamander retina	Stress- and calcium-activated currents were studied in inner segments of solitary rods of the salamander retina.
13	activation of contraction and atpase activity in intact and chemically skinned smooth muscle of rat portal vein dependence on ca and muscle length	The activation of contraction and apos; the activity of apos; atpase in intact and chemically denuded smooth muscle depends on the muscle length and ca of the portal vein of the rat.
13	membrane potential in smooth muscle cells from hypertrophic rat portal vein	Membrane potential in smooth muscle cells in hypertrophic rat portal vein.
13	potassium mediation of calcium induced terminal differentiation of epidermal cells in culture	Potassium mediation of calcium induced terminal differentiation of epidermal cells in culture.
13	nature of electromechanical connections in the smooth muscle cells of the pulmonary artery	Nature of the electromechanical connections in the smooth muscle cells of the lung artery.
13	site of action and active form of aminopyridines in squid axon membranes	Site of action and active form of aminopyridines in squid axonal membranes.
13	transport of ornithine carbamoyltransferase precursor into mitochondria stimulation by potassium ion magnesium ion and a reticulocyte cytosolic protein s	Transport of the precursor of ornithine carbamoyltransferase in mitochondrial stimulation by apos; potassium ion magnesium ion and a reticulocyte cytosolic protein.
13	correlation between manifestations of digoxin toxicity and serum digoxin calcium potassium and magnesium concentrations and arterial ph	Correlation between manifestations of digoxin toxicity and serum calcium digoxin, potassium and magnesium and arterial pharynx.
13	interaction of internal anions with potassium channels of the squid giant axon	Interaction of internal anions with potassium channels of the giant squid axon.
13	gating kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rat muscle incorporated into planar lipid bilayers evidence for two voltage dependent ca2 binding reactions	The kinetics of blockade of ca2-activated k channels of rat muscle incorporated into planar lipid bilayers demonstrated the existence of two voltage-dependent ca2 binding reactions.
13	kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rabbit muscle incorporated into planar bilayers evidence for a ca2 and ba2 blockade	The kinetics of ca2-activated k channels of rabbit muscle incorporated into planar bilayers indicate the existence of ca2 and ba2 blockade.
13	diazepam a highly effective twitch potentiator in isolated muscle fibres of the frog	Diazepam is a highly effective twitch potentiator in isolated frog muscle fibers.
13	the actions of sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractile responses in isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	The actions of sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem on calcium, potassium, and histamine induced contractile responses in apos; apos aorta; isolated rabbit basilar artery, taenia coli, and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	perchlorate induced alterations in electrical and mechanical parameters of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Perchlorate induced changes in electrical and mechanical parameters of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	the influence of the permeant ions thallous and potassium on inward rectification in frog skeletal muscle	L' influence of thallus permeant ions and potassium on the internal rectification in frog skeletal muscle.
13	potassium propionate causes preferential loss of bound acetylcholine in frog muscle	Potassium propionate causes preferential loss of bound etapos; acetylcholine from frog muscle.
13	slow components of potassium tail currents in rat skeletal muscle	The slow components of potassium tail currents in rat skeletal muscle.
13	acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit muscle contractions caused by the actions of acetylcholine and raised potassium ion concentrations	Acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit muscle contractions caused by the actions of acetylcholine and acetylcholine and increase potassium ion concentrations.
13	liver and skeletal muscle metabolism extracellular k concentrations and survival in spontaneously hypertensive rats following acute blood loss	Liver and skeletal muscle metabolism, extracellular k-concentration and survival in spontaneously hypertensive rats following acute blood loss.
13	basolateral potassium channel in turtle colon evidence for single file ion flow	The basolateral potassium channel in the turtle colon indicates the existence of a single-tailed ion flow.
13	chemical modification of potassium channel gating in frog myelinated nerve by trinitrobenzene sulphonic acid	Chemical modification of potassium channel blockade in frog myelinated nerve by trinitrobenzene sulfonic acid.
13	depression of calcium dependent potassium conductance of guinea pig myenteric neurones by muscarinic agonists	Decreased calcium-dependent potassium conductance of guinea pig myenteric neurons by muscarinic agonists.
13	mammalian skeletal muscle long lasting contractures and potentiated tetani produced by conditioning with weak acid anions	Long-term contractions of mammalian skeletal muscle and potentiated tetani produced by conditioning with weak acidic anions.
13	properties of caffeine and potassium contractures in fatigued frog single twitch muscle fibers	The effect of caffeine and potassium contractures on the fatigue of frog single twitch muscle fibers.
13	nicardipine actions on smooth muscle cells and neuromuscular transmission in the guinea pig basilar artery	Nicardipine action on smooth muscle cells and neuromuscular transmission in the guinea pig basilar artery.
13	structural changes in nerve endings of rat median eminence superfused with media rich in potassium ions	Structural changes in nerve endings of rat eminence; median eminence of rats superfused with potassium ion-rich media.
13	nalorphine actions at an opiate receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	Nalorphin action on frog skeletal muscle fiber opiate receptor.
13	voltage and ca2 activated k channel in baso lateral acinar cell membranes of mammalian salivary glands	Voltage and ca2-activated k channel in baso lateral acinar cell membranes of mammalian salivary glands.
13	dissociation of calcium and barium induced contractions of the rat duodenum smooth muscle	Dissociation of calcium and barium induced contractions of the rat duodenum smooth muscle.
13	asymmetrical charge movement in slow and fast twitch mammalian muscle fibres in normal and paraplegic rats	Asymmetric charge movements in muscle fibers from slow- and fast-twitch mammals in normal and paraplegic rats.
13	k depolarization and phospholipid metabolism in frog sartorius muscle	K depolarization and phospholipid metabolism in frog couturier muscle.
13	excitation contraction coupling role of k activation within the transverse tubular system	Coupling role of contraction; excitation of the apos; transverse tubular system activation k.
13	influence of length of aortic occlusion with cold potassium cardioplegia on early and late mortality in cardiac valve replacement	Influence of length of aortic occlusion with cold potassium cardioplegia on early and late mortality in cardiac valve replacement.
13	influence of divalent cations on potassium contracture duration in frog muscle fibres	L' influence of divalent cations on the duration of frog muscle contraction.
13	effects of 3 4 diaminopyridine on mechanical and electrical responses of frog single muscle fibres	Effects of diaminopyridine on mechanical and electrical responses of single frog muscle fibers.
13	patch clamp studies of slow potential sensitive potassium channels in longitudinal smooth muscle cells of rabbit jejunum	Patch clamp studies of slow potential sensitive potassium channels in longitudinal smooth muscle cells of rabbit jejunum.
13	effects of an outward water flow on potassium currents in a squid giant axon	An external water flow on the potassium currents in a giant squid axon.
13	opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits calcium action potentials in rat locus coeruleus neurones	L' opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits calcium action in rat locus coeruleus neurons.
13	alpha adrenergic stimulation of potassium efflux in guinea pig hepatocytes may involve calcium influx and calcium release	Alpha-adrenergic stimulation of potassium efflux in guinea pig hepatocytes may involve calcium influx and calcium release.
13	characterization of benextramine as an irreversible alpha adrenergic blocker and as a blocker of potassium activated calcium channels	Characterization of benextramine as an alpha-adrenergic irreversible blocker and as a blocker of potassium-activated calcium channels.
13	effect of ascorbate on the contractile response induced by dmpp in guinea pig ileal longitudinal muscle strip	Effect of ascorbate on the contractile response induced by dmpp in the guinea-pig ileal longitudinal muscle.
13	adenosine activates a potassium conductance in guinea pig atrial heart muscle	L' adenosine activates a potassium conductance in guinea pig atrial muscle.
13	predominant blocking of fast potassium current channels in mollusk neurons by 4 aminopyridine	Prevalent blockage of fast potassium current channels in mollusk neurons by 4 aminopyridines.
13	the resting membrane parameters of human intercostal muscle at low normal and high extracellular potassium	The resting membrane parameters of human intercostal muscle with high and low extracellular potassium levels.
13	isolation and contractile properties of single smooth muscle cells from guinea pig taenia caeci	Isolation and contractile properties of guinea pig taenia caeci simple smooth muscle cells.
13	activation of calcium channels by novel 1 4 dihydropyridines a new mechanism for positive inotropics or smooth muscle stimulants	L' activation of calcium channels by new dihydropyridines 1-4 is a new mechanism for positive inotropes or smooth muscle stimulants.
13	on the physiological role of internodal potassium channels and the security of conduction in myelinated nerve fibres	On the physiological role of internodal potassium channels and the safety of conduction in myelinated nerve fibers.
13	functional interactions of calcium antagonists in k depolarized smooth muscle	Functional interactions of calcium antagonists in k k k depolarized smooth muscle.
13	the inhibitory effects of n2 dansyl l arginine 4 t butylpiperidine amide ti233 on contraction of vascular and intestinal smooth muscle	The inhibitory effects of n2 inyl l arginine 4 t butylpiperidine amide ti233 on the vascular and intestinal smooth muscle contraction.
13	electrophysiological study of frog eggs at different stages of development iii ionic currents activated by intense hyperpolarization and depolarization of the oocyte at the final stage of vitellogenesis	Electrophysiological study of frog eggs at different stages of development iii ionic currents activated by intense hyperpolarization and depolarization of the apos; oocyte at the final stage of vitellogenesis.
13	the contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of adrenaline on smooth muscle cells of the portal vein pulmonary artery and taenia caeci of the guinea pig	The contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of epos; adrenaline on smooth muscle cells of the portal pulmonary venous artery and taenia caeci of the guinea pig.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine and tetraethylammonium chloride on the electrical activity and cable properties of canine tracheal smooth muscle	Effects of 4 aminopyridine and tetraethylammonium chloride on the electrical activity and cable properties of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	calcium dependence of open and shut interval distributions from calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	The calcium dependence of d' open and closed intervals of activated calcium potassium channels in cultured rat muscle.
13	burst kinetics of single calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	D&apos kinetics; burst of calcium-activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle tissue.
13	nature of the dual caffeine sodium benzoate effect on the tonic component of the potassium contracture of the myocardium in the frog	Nature of the protein; effect of double caffeine sodium benzoate on the tonic component of the potassium contraction of the myocardium in frogs.
13	inhibition by ba of background current and of its modifications by carbachol in frog atrium	Ba-induced inhibition of the bottom current and its modifications by carbachol in frog atria.
13	calcium action potentials in rat fast twitch and slow twitch muscle fibres	Potential d' calcium action in rat fast twitch and slow twitch muscle fibers.
13	the effect of cellular energy reserves and internal calcium ions on the potassium conductance in skeletal muscle of the frog	L' effect of cellular energy reserves and internal calcium ions on the potassium conductance in frog skeletal muscle.
13	kinetic properties of calcium channels of twitch muscle fibres of the frog	Kinetic properties of the calcium channels of twitch muscle fibers of frogs.
13	voltage dependent k conductance at the apical membrane of necturus gallbladder	Conductance k is voltage-dependent at the apical membrane of the necturus gallbladder.
13	the actions of d 600 aspaminol and papaverine on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractions of isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	L' aspaminol and papaverine 600 action on calcium, potassium and l' histamine induced contractions of rabbit basilar aorta, taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	potassium induced depolarizations and generation of tension in barnacle muscle fibres effects of external calcium strontium and barium	Potassium induced depolarizations and the production of tension in barnacle muscle fibers, the effects of external strontium calcium and barium.
13	effect of 4 aminopyridine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane	Effect of 4 aminopyridine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane.
13	ruthenium red differential effects on excitation and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Ruthenium red differential effects on excitation-contraction d&apos coupling; excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effects of ouabain and potassium on rabbit arterial smooth muscle cells in culture	The effects of ouabain and potassium on rabbit arterial smooth muscle cells in culture.
13	effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction of frog tonic muscle fibers	Effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction of frog tonic muscle fibers.
13	calcium mediates the light induced decrease in maintained k current in limulus ventral photoreceptors	Calcium mediates the photoreceptor-induced decrease of the k current in the ventral photoreceptors of limulus.
13	intracellular injection of guanyl nucleotides alters the serotonin induced increase in potassium conductance in aplysia neuron r15	L' intracellular injection of guanyl nucleotides alters l' serotonin-induced increase in potassium conductance in apos r15 neuron; aplysia.
13	non stationary fluctuations of the potassium conductance at the node of ranvier of the frog	Non-stationary fluctuations of the potassium conductance at the knot of the frog rump.
13	regulation of delayed afterdepolarizations and aftercontractions in dog ventricular muscle fibres	The regulation of delayed post-depolarizations and post-contractions in dog ventricular muscle fibers.
13	assessment of selective inhibition of rat cerebral cortical calcium independent and calcium dependent phosphodiesterases in crude extracts using deoxycyclic amp and potassium ions	Evaluation of apo; selective inhibition of rat cerebral cortical-dependent and -independent calcium phosphodiesterases in crude extracts at apo; deoxycyclic and apo-blisters; potassium ions.
13	potential and k activity in skinned muscle fibers evidence against a simple donnan equilibrium	Potency and activity in denuded muscle fibers indicate that there is no simple balance of data.
13	analysis of the effects of cesium ions on potassium channel currents in biological membranes	An analysis of the effects of cesium ions on potassium channel currents in biological membranes.
13	potassium channel kinetics in squid axons with elevated levels of external potassium concentration	Potassium channel kinetics in squid axons show high concentrations of external potassium.
13	hydrogen isotope effect on transport of potassium ion in rice seedlings equilibrated with deuterium oxide	Apos isotope effect; hydrogen transport of apos; potassium ion in rice seedlings equilibrated with apos; deuterium oxide.
13	potassium in skeletal muscle in untreated primary hypertension and in chronic renal failure studied by x ray fluorescence technique	Skeletal muscle potassium was studied in untreated primary hypertension and kidney failure; chronic renal failure was studied by the X-ray fluorescence technique.
13	localized ca2 and calcium activated potassium conductances in terminals of a barnacle photoreceptor	Ca2+- and calcium-activated potassium conductances localized in d&apos terminals; a barnacle photoreceptor was activated by calcium.
13	role of dietary potassium and magnesium in diuretic treated patients with cardiac insufficiency	Role of potassium and magnesium in diet; diuretics for patients with diabetes; cardiac insufficiency.
13	potassium conductivity of the plasma membrane of frog photoreceptor cells	Potassium conductivity of the plasma membrane of frog photoreceptor cells.
13	charge movement in skeletal muscle fibers paralyzed by the calcium entry blocker d600	Charge movement in skeletal muscle fibers paralysed by calcium entry blocker d600 d&apos.
13	asymmetric proton block of inward rectifier k channels in skeletal muscle	K channel asymmetric proton block of the rectifier entering skeletal muscle.
13	calcium channel activation in vascular smooth muscle by bay k 8644	Calcium channel activation in vascular smooth muscle by bay k 8644.
14	sequelae of bacterial meningitis in infants	Symptoms of bacterial meningitis in infants.
14	cryothalamectomy for parkinson s disease	It's called Cryothalamectomy for Parkinson's Disease.
14	interventricular communication with heart failure in newborn and older infants evaluation of medical treatment	Interventricular communication with heart failure in newborn and older infants Assessment of medical treatment.
14	a clinical study of chronic pancreatitis	A clinical study of chronic pancreatitis.
14	post necrotic cirrhosis with chronic cholestasis	Cirrhosis post-necrotic fever with chronic cholestasis.
14	adult coeliac disease	Celiac disease in adults.
14	the course and prognosis of ulcerative colitis	History and prognosis of ulcerative colitis.
14	prognostic value of high 10 minute i 131 uptake in non toxic goitres	The prognostic value of d' a high intake of 131 by non-toxic goiters for 10 minutes.
14	observations on the value of mitral commissurotomy an analysis of long term results	Observations on the value of mitral commissurotomy an analysis of long-term outcomes.
14	syringomyelia a clinical review of 75 cases	Syringomyelia a clinical review of 75 cases.
14	is phenacetin a nephrotoxin a report on twenty three users of the drug	C' is the phenacetin, a nephrotoxin, a report on twenty-three users of the drug.
14	acute purulent meningitis in alaska natives epidemiology diagnosis and prognosis	Acute purulent meningitis in indigenous people in Alaska, epidemiological diagnosis and epidemiologic prognosis.
14	a follow up evaluation of the treatment of chronic alcoholics	A follow-up evaluation of the treatment of chronic alcoholics.
14	skin homografts in patients with cancer of the cervix	Skin homografts in patients with cancer of the cervix; uterine cancer.
14	x ray pelvimetry	This is a pelvimetric X-ray.
14	the value of pulmonary function studies in the assessment of patients for cardiac surgery	The value of pulmonary function studies in the evaluation of cardiac heart surgery patients.
14	pathology of tumours in children	Pathology of tumours in children.
14	myeloma proteins and the clinical response to melphalan therapy	Myeloma proteins and the clinical response to melphalan treatment.
14	the significance of regional lumph node metastases in breast carcinoma	The importance of regional lumph node metastases in breast cancer.
14	sarcoidosis and polyarthritis	Uh, sarcoidosis and polyarthritis.
14	malignant neoplasms of the nasopharynx	Malignant neoplasms of the nasopharynx.
14	traumatic intrauterine adhesions the fritsch asherman syndrome	Intra-uterine adhesions to the Fritsch Asherman syndrome.
14	diagnosis and treatment of delirium	All right, diagnosis and treatment of delirium.
14	sarcoidosis	Uh, sarcoidosis.
14	the clinical spectrum of renal insufficiency during acute glomerulonephritis in the adult	Acute glomerulonephritis: the clinical spectrum of apos; renal insufficiency during acute glomerulonephritis in adults.
14	clinical results of thromboendarterectomy for peripheral atherosclerotic occlusive disease	Clinical results of thromboendarterectomy for peripheral atherosclerotic occlusive disease.
14	ovarian cancer at the ontario cancer foundation clinics 1938 1958	Cancer of the egg; ovary at cancer foundation clinics; Ontario 1938.
14	the prognostic significance of circulating tumour cells a five year follow up study of patients with cancer of the breast	Lapses; prognostic significance of circulating tumor cells in a 5-year follow-up study of patients with breast cancer.
14	dizziness and head injury	Uh, dizziness and head injuries.
14	the acid base status in cyanotic congenital heart disease	L' acid base status in cyanotic congenital heart defects.
14	the natural history of tumours of the urinary tract	L' natural history of tumors of the urinary tract.
14	gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma reappraisal of 12 cases of gastric lymphosarcoma	Both gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma re-evaluate 12 cases of gastric lymphosarcoma.
14	mammary tumor inhibition and lung adenoma induction by isonicotinic acid hydrazide	Breast tumour inhibition and induction of apo; lung adenomas by apo; hydrazide of apo; isonicotinic acid.
14	reticuloendothelial system phagocytic function in patients with hodgkin s disease	Reticulo phagocytic functions-endothelial in patients with Hodgkin's disease.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 7 application of life table methods for assessing the prognosis for tuberculosis patients	Epidemiological basis of apo; tuberculosis eradication 7 Application of life table methods to assess the prognosis of tuberculosis patients.
14	the management of acute leukemia	The management of acute leukemia.
14	the influence of morphology on prognosis in acute leukemia	L' influence of morphology on prognosis of acute leukemia.
14	prognosis for patients with ventricular septal defect and severe pulmonary vascular obstructive disease	Prognosis is established for patients with ventricular septal defects and severe pulmonary obstructive vascular disease.
14	ulcerative colitis with liver disease	You know, ulcerative colitis with liver disease.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 8 some factors of significance for the prognosis for a tuberculosis patient	Epidemiological basis of infection; tuberculosis eradication 8 Some important factors in the prognosis of a tuberculosis patient.
14	lethal complications of the ehlers danlos syndrome	Fatal complications of the ehlers danlos syndrome.
14	lactic acidosis in diabetes	L' lactic acidosis in diabetes.
14	acidaemia and salicylate poisoning in adults	Acemia and salicylate poisoning in adults.
14	carcinoma of the breast in women 35 years of age or younger	Breast cancer in women 35 years of age or less.
14	prognosis in tetraplegia	Uh, tetraplegia projection.
14	clinical classification of extent of disease in cancer of the breast	Clinical classification of the apo; extent of disease in breast cancer.
14	value of routine cardiac monitoring in the management of acute myocardial infarction outside a coronary care unit	Value of routine cardiac monitoring in the treatment of acute myocardial infarction outside of the coronary care unit.
14	erythraemia in renal transplantation	Lapos; erythraemia in renal transplants.
14	objectivized diagnosis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease diagnostic and prognostic value of routine laparoscopy	Objective diagnosis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease and prognostic value of routine laparoscopy.
14	return to work experiences of a hospital rehabilitation officer	Return to work from a hospital rehabilitation officer.
14	indirect assessment of left ventricular performance in acute myocardial infarction	Indirect assessment of left ventricular performance in acute myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis in early adult life of coeliac children treated with a gluten free diet	Screening early in adult life for celiac children treated with a gluten-free diet.
14	infection with the avian battey group of mycobacteria in england and wales	Infection by the group of bats-avian mice of the mycobacteria in England and Wales.
14	operative treatment of typhoid perforation of the bowel	Surgical treatment of perforation of the intestine by typhoid.
14	malignant degeneration of benign cystic teratomas of the ovary review of the literature and report of a chondrosarcoma and carcinoid tumor	Malignant degeneration of benign cystic teratoma of the ovary after literature review and report; chondrosarcoma and d' a carcinoid tumour.
14	myosarcomas of the bladder and prostate	Myosarcomas of the bladder and prostate.
14	lymphovenous shunts in man	Lymphoblastic bypass in men.
14	testing the vision of cataract patients by means of laser generated interference fringes	Testing the vision of cataract patients using laser-generated cataract fringe gauges.
14	cardiovascular state of newly discovered diabetic women	L' cardiovascular state of newly discovered women with diabetes.
14	gastrointestinal lymphoma in childhood	Gastro-intestinal lymphoma in children.
14	management of high risk pregnancy report of a combined obstetrical and neonatal intensive care unit	The management of high-risk pregnancies reported in a combined obstetric and neonatal intensive care unit.
14	enzyme activity acidic nuclear proteins and prognosis in human breast cancer	Enzymatic activity of acidic nuclear proteins and prognosis in human breast cancer.
14	earlier diagnosis and survival in lung cancer	Earlier diagnosis and survival of lung cancer.
14	natural history of diverticular disease of the colon a review of 521 cases	The natural history of diverticular bowel disease is a review of 521 cases.
14	reappraisal of clinical features of diverticular disease of the colon	Reassessment of the clinical characteristics of diverticular bowel disease.
14	long term prognosis after mitral annuloplasty for acquired mitral insufficiency clinical evaluation	In the long term, prognosis after apos; mitral annuloplasty for apos; acquired mitral insufficiency has been established.
14	long term follow up of direct current cardioversion after cardiac surgery with special reference to quinidine	Long-term follow-up of direct current cardioversion following cardiac surgery, particularly quinidine.
14	value of serial p wave changes in indicating left heart failure in myocardial infarction	Value of serial changes in apo; p-wave indicating left heart failure in myocardial infarction.
14	primary pulmonary hypertension eosinophilia and filariasis in ceylon	Primary pulmonary hypertension eosinophilia and filariasis in ceylon.
14	mesonephroid tumours of the ovary	Mesonephroid tumours of the ovary.
14	liquor bilirubin levels in normal pregnancy a reassessment of early prediction of haemolytic disease	Liqueur bilirubin during normal pregnancy; reassessment of early prediction of hemolytic disease.
14	accidental hypothermia	Uh, accidental hypothermia.
14	host resistance and survival in carcinoma of breast a study of 104 cases of medullary carcinoma in a series of 1 411 cases of breast cancer followed for 20 years	Resistance; host and survival to breast cancer: study of 104 cases of spinal cord carcinoma in a series of 1,411 cases of breast cancer followed for 20 years.
14	myelomatosis comparison of melphalan and cyclophosphamide therapy	A comparison of melphalan and cyclophosphamide myelomatosis.
14	medical presentations of choriocarcinoma	Medical evidence of choriocarcinoma.
14	bleeding from esophageal varices in cirrhosis of the liver hemodynamic and radiological criteria for the selection of potential bleeders through hepatic and umbilicoportal catheterization studies	Hemorrhage of esophageal varices in cirrhosis of the liver, hemodynamic and radiological criteria for the selection of potential bleeding by studies of hepatic and umbilicoportal catheterization.
14	growth of metastases from p 388 sarcoma in the rat followig whole body irradiation	Metastasis growth from p 388 sarcoma in the rat followed whole-body irradiation.
14	possible clinical implications of therapeutically induced temperature changes in continuously monitored tumour mass preliminary report	Possible clinical effects of changes in temperature; therapeutic origin in preliminary report of tumour mass under continuous monitoring.
14	pericarditis after acute myocardial infarction	Pericarditis after acute myocardial infarction.
14	natural history and treatment of wilms s tumour an analysis of 335 cases occurring in england and wales 1962 6	Natural history and treatment of wilms tumours an analysis of 335 cases in England and Wales in 1962.
14	management of breast cancer in old age	The management of breast cancer in the elderly.
14	long term prognosis following ventricular fibrillation in acute ischaemic heart disease	Long-term prognosis following ventricular fibrillation (VF) in acute ischemic heart disease.
14	the prognosis and risk of missing malignant disease in patients with unexplained and functional diarrhoea	The prognosis and risk of illness; absence of malignant disease in patients with unexplained and functional diarrhea.
14	neuraminidase activity in bacterial meningitis	L' neuraminidase activity in bacterial meningitis.
14	fate of surviving low birth weight infants with coagulation deficiencies on the first day of life	The fate of new-low birth weight infants with coagulation problems on the first day of life.
14	sudden death in hospital after discharge from coronary care unit	Sudden death in hospital after discharge from hospital; coronary care unit.
14	electroencephalographic prediction of fatal anoxic brain damage after resuscitation from cardiac arrest	Electroencephalographic prediction of fatal anoxic brain damage after resuscitation from heart arrest.
14	long term ventricular pacing in treatment of sinoatrial block	Long-term ventricular stimulation in the treatment of the blockage sino-atrial.
14	reliability of physical signs in patients with severe attacks of ulcerative colitis	The reliability of physical signs in patients with apo; severe ulcerative colitis.
14	ileo rectal anastomosis for crohn s disease of the colon	Isoo rectal anastomosis for Crohn's disease of the colon.
14	ventricular hypertrophy in cardiomyopathy	Uh, ventricular hypertrophy in cardiomyopathy.
14	prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in jamaica with reference to the coronary arteries and other factors	The prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in Jamaica with respect to coronary arteries and dapos; other factors.
14	prognosis in acute cerebrovascular accidents in relation to respiratory pattern and blood gas tensions	Acute stroke prognosis in relation to respiratory pattern and gas tensions in the blood.
14	a two year experience with human heart transplantation	Two years experience in the human heart transplant field.
14	indications for hypophysectomy in diabetic retinopathy and cancer of the breast and prostate	Indications of apo; hypophysectomy in diabetic retinopathy and breast and prostate cancer.
14	prediction of hypothyroidism after partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis	Apos prediction; hypothyroidism after partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis.
14	lignocaine therapy for ventricular ectopic activity after acute myocardial infarction a double blind trial	Lignocaine treatment of apos; ventricular ectopic activity after acute myocardial infarction in a double-blind trial.
14	factors influencing survival in carcinoma of the ovary	Factors influencing survival in carcinoma of the ovary.
14	spina bifida cystica an orthopaedic criterion for the early closure of myelomeningocoeles	Spina bifida cystica is an orthopaedic criterion for the early closure of myelomeningocles.
14	comparison of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of isolated acute massive pulmonary embolism	Comparison of streptokinase and apos; heparin in the treatment of isolated acute massive pulmonary embolism.
14	rheumatic diseases of the central nervous system in children	Rheumatic diseases of the central nervous system in children.
14	right bundle branch block and left axis deviation in acute myocardial infarction	Right bundle branch block and left axis in apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	classification of leukemias	A classification of leukemia.
14	histological diagnosis of precancerous and early stages in cancer of the cervix uteri	Histological diagnosis of precancerous and early stages of cancer of the cervical uterus.
14	trial of maintenance therapy in schizophrenia	Trial of apo-therapy; maintenance in schizophrenics.
14	an analysis of clinical and histopathological features in 101 cases of carcinoma of breast in women under 35 years of age	An analysis of the clinical and histopathological characteristics of 101 cases of breast carcinoma in women under 35 years of age.
14	the use of discriminant analysis for examining the histological feathers of oral keratoses and lichen planus	L' use of l' discriminant analysis to examine the histological feathers of oral keratoses and planus lichens.
14	adrenocortical activity in disseminated malignant disease in relation to prognosis	L' adrenocortical activity in disseminated malignant disease relative to prognosis.
14	peritoneal dialysis by indwelling catheter for chronic renal failure 1963 1968	Peritoneal dialysis by a permanent catheter for chronic renal failure 1963-1968.
14	polycythemia and budd chiari syndrome apropos of 17 cases	There are 17 cases of polycythemia and budding Chiari syndrome.
14	prognosis for patients with severe brain injuries	The prognosis for patients with severe brain damage.
14	kantamaneni bd curzon g comparison of benefit from l dopa in parkinsonism with increase of amine metabolites in the csf	Kantamaneni bd curzon g comparison of dopa benefits in parkinsonism with apos; increase of amine metabolites in csf.
14	closed head trauma and aphasia	He's got a closed head trauma and aphasia.
14	symptomatic cysts of the telencephalic choroid plexus	Symptomatic cysts of the telencephalic choroidal plexus.
14	congenital aortic stenosis follow up of surgical management	Follow-up of congenital aortic stenosis after surgical management.
14	spontaneous intracerebral haemorrhage in patients suspected of multiple sclerosis	Spontaneous intracerebral bleeding in patients suspected of multiple sclerosis.
14	complications of the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome	Complications of the Landry Guillain-Barr Strohl Stroboscopic Syndrome.
14	a combined clinical and histological assessment of survival of patients with hodgkin s disease	Combined clinical and histological assessment of survival in patients with Hodgkin's disease.
14	acute myocardial infarction home and hospital treatment	Home-acquired acute myocardial infarction and hospital treatment.
14	fat laden macrophages in cerebrospinal fluid as an indication of brain damage in children	Fat-laden macrophages in cerebrospinal fluid as an indication of brain damage in children.
14	recurrence of crohn s disease after primary excisional surgery	The recurrence of Crohn's disease after primary surgery; excision.
14	ischaemic heart disease a secondary prevention trial using clofibrate report by a research committee of the scottish society of physicians	Ischemic heart disease is a secondary prevention trial using clofibrate d&apos, a research committee of the Scottish Society of Physicians.
14	the pattern of female genital tuberculosis in ibadan	Profile of female genital tuberculosis in ibadan.
14	prognosis of pituitary adenomas with arteriographic abnormal vascularization	The prognosis of pituitary adenomas with abnormal arteriographic vasculature.
14	ependymal cyst of the spinal cord case report	Ependymal cyst of the spinal cord case report.
14	common carotid ligation for the treatment of ruptured posterior communicating aneurysms	Common carotid ligation for the treatment of ruptured aneurysms.
14	idiopathic polyneuritis serial studies of nerve and immune functions	Serial studies of neuronal and immune function idiopathic polynoeuritis.
14	histology in breast cancer prognosis	Lapos; breast cancer prognostic histology.
14	portal hypertension in primary biliary cirrhosis	L' portal hypertension in primary biliary cirrhosis.
14	the posterior operation in treatment of cervical spondylosis with myelopathy a long term follow up study	Subsequent operation in the treatment of cervical spondylosis with myelopathy a long-term follow-up study.
14	invasion of cranial nerves by salivary cylindroma four cases treated by radiotherapy	Infection of cranial nerves by salivary cylinder four cases treated with radiotherapy.
14	hormonal treatment of metastases of renal carcinoma	Hormonal treatment of metastases of hypernephrome.
14	breast cancer grading	Breast cancer classification.
14	survival of burkitt s lymphoma patients in ghana	Survival of burkitt lymphoma patients in the ghana.
14	the relative significance of prognostic factors in breast carcinoma	L'apos; relative importance of prognostic factors in breast cancer.
14	pathological factors in survival of lung tumours local extent size and nodal involvement	Nodal factors in the survival of lung tumours extended local size and weight; nodal involvement.
14	adenocarcinoma of the large bowel	Uh, adenocarcinoma of the large intestine.
14	duration of survival of children with acute leukaemia report to the medical research council from the committee on leukaemia and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	The Leukemia Committee and the Working Group on Childhood Leukemia report to the Medical Research Council on the duration of survival of children with acute leukemia.
14	factors influencing immediate prognosis in acute renal failure with special reference to prophylactic hemodialysis	Factors influencing immediate prognosis of apo; acute renal failure, especially apo; prophylactic hemodialysis.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of the eeg in the immediate aftermath of cranial trauma	The diagnostic and prognostic value of the apos; immediately after a head injury.
14	liquor bilirubin levels and false prediction of severity in rhesus haemolytic disease	Dapos; bilirubin alcohol and false prediction of severity of hemolytic rhesus disease.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer	A prognostic typing of breast cancer.
14	prognosis for the infertile couple	The prognosis for the infertile couple.
14	the effects of levodopa therapy in patients with parkinson s disease i clinical response	The effects of levodopa therapy in patients with Parkinson's disease (PD) on clinical response.
14	prognostic implications of electroencephalographic findings of hypsarrhythmia in first year of life	Prognostic effects of electroencephalographic findings of apo; hypsarrhythmia in first year of life.
14	recent advances in neuroblastoma	Recent advances in neuroblastoma.
14	efficacy of a regional poisoning treatment centre in preventing further suicidal behaviour	L'apos; effectiveness of a regional treatment centre; poisoning to prevent suicidal behaviour.
14	idiopathic palsy of the recurrent laryngeal nerve a transient cranial mononeuropathy	Idiopathic paralysis of the recurrent laryngeal nerve, transient cranial mononeuropathy.
14	natural history of patients with x ray negative dyspepsia in general practice	A natural history of patients with negative X-ray dyspepsia in general medicine.
14	outpatient treatment trial of mild and severe hypertension	Ambulatory treatment trial of l*apos; mild and severe hypertension.
14	relation between age of onset of obesity and size and number of adipose cells	Age of onset of obesity and size and number of fat cells.
14	accuracy of predictions of survival in later stages of cancer	L' accuracy of predictions of survival in later stages of cancer.
14	assisted circulation following myocardial infarction a review of 25 patients treated before 1971	Assisted circulation following myocardial infarction: examination of 25 patients treated before 1971.
14	nephrotic syndrome in adult africans in nairobi	Acute nephrotic syndrome in adult Africans in Nairobi.
14	analgesic nephropathy	Uh, analgesic nephropathy.
14	venous graft surgery in treatment of coronary heart disease	Replacement surgery for the treatment of coronary heart disease.
14	75 se selenomethionine scanning in the diagnosis of tumours of the pancreas and adjacent viscera the use of the test and its impact on survival	Scan 75 uses selenomethionine in the diagnosis of tumours of the pancreas and adjacent viscera; use of the test and its impact on survival.
14	alpha fetoprotein in abortion	L'apos; alpha fetoprotein in pregnancy; abortion.
14	the surgical significance of methaemalbuminaemia	This is the surgical significance of methemalbuminemia.
14	in vitro oestrogen sensitivity of breast cancer	Estrogen sensitivity of breast cancer.
14	neurophysiological identification of a late infantile form of neuronal lipidosis	Neurophysiological identification of a late infantile form of neuronal lipidosis.
14	factors in pathogenesis of central nervous system leukaemia	The pathogenesis factors of central nervous system leukemia.
14	plama estradiol estriol and progesterone in human pregnancy ii clinical applications in rh isoimmunization disease	Plama estradiol estriol and progesterone in human pregnancy ii Clinical applications of rh isoimmunization disease.
14	small strokes in the carotid territory associated with a normal carotid arteriogram	Small strokes in the carotid artery associated with a normal carotid arterogram.
14	impairment of memory functions after acute head injury	Deterioration of memory functions after acute head trauma.
14	cubital tunnel external compression syndrome	Cubital tunnel external compression syndrome.
14	chronic lumbar extradural haematoma simulating disc syndrome	It's a chronic lumbar extradural hematoma, simulating disc syndrome.
14	medulloblastoma treatment and prognosis a study of seventeen cases in ten years	The treatment and prognosis of medulloblastoma: study of ten-seven cases in ten years.
14	phenothiazine poisoning a review of 48 cases	Phenothiazine poisoning a review of 48 cases.
14	long term study of disodium cromoglycate in treatment of severe extrinsic or intrinsic bronchial asthma in adults brompton hospital medical research council collaborative trial	Long-term study of disodium cromoglycate in treatment of severe extrinsic or intrinsic bronchial asthma in adult brompton Hospital Medical Research Council Collaborative Trial.
14	cerebellar haematomas caused by angiomas in children	Brain hematoma caused by angiomas in children.
14	clinical features of yellow fever cases at vom christian hospital during the 1969 epidemic on the jos plateau nigeria	Clinical characteristics of yolk fever cases; Christian vomit hospital during apo; 1969 epidemic on the plateau jos nigeria.
14	evolution of the acid base status in cardiac arrest	Apos evolution; acid base status in the apos; cardiac arrest.
14	chronic budd chiari syndrome due to obstruction of the intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava	Chronic bud-chiari syndrome due to apos; obstruction of the intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava.
14	structural changes in the early stages of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Structural changes in the early stages of duchenne muscular dystrophy.
14	russell s diencephalic syndrome of early childhood	He has russell diencephalic early childhood syndrome.
14	pneumoencephalo roulette tomography of operated primary pontine haemorrhage with long survival report of two cases	Pneumoencephalo roulette tomography of l' primary bleeding pontic with long-term survival ratio of two cases.
14	national surgical breast project	This is a national breast surgery project.
14	placental lactogen levels as guide to outcome of threatened abortion	Post-natal lactogen rate as an indicator of birth outcome; threatened abortion.
14	herpesvirus hominis infection in patients with myeloproliferative and lymphoproliferative disorders	Herpesvirus hominis infection in patients with myeloproliferative and lymphoproliferative disorders.
14	spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma	Spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma of the liver.
14	evaluation of a rapid latex agglutination test for detection of alpha1 fetoprotein	Evaluation of a rapid latex agglutination test for fetoprotein alpha1.
14	cranial and spinal meningiomas in a pair of identical twin boys	Cranial and spinal meningiomas in a pair of identical twin siblings.
14	onset early stages and prognosis of rheumatoid arthritis a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 year follow up	The onset of early stages and prognosis of rheumatoid arthritis a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 years of follow-up.
14	prognosis of guillain barr syndrome in the african the nigerian experience	The Nigerian experience: the prognosis of the Guillain Barr syndrome in Africa.
14	relation between radiographic categories of coalworkers pneumoconiosis and expectation of life	Relationship between radiographic categories of pneumoconiosis and lifespan workers.
14	a comparison of two methods of prognostic typing in breast cancer	A comparison of two methods of prognostic typing breast cancer.
14	short and long term prognosis after myocardial infarction	Short and long term projection after myocardial infarction.
14	life threatening dermatoses	Uh, fatal dermatoses.
14	acute renal cortical necrosis variable course and changing prognosis	Variable acute renal cortical necrosis and prognostic change.
14	tubal ectopic pregnancy etiology and obstetric and gynecologic sequelae	Etiology of pregnancy Extra-uterine and obstetric and gynaecological consequences.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer further investigation of a necropsy series compared with recent surgical specimens	The prognostic typing of breast cancer has been the subject of further investigation in the framework of a series of necropsies compared to recent surgical procedures.
14	narcolepsy	Uh, narcolepsy.
14	the immediate antecedents of myocardial infarction in active men	Immediate history of myocardial infarction in active males.
14	motor neuron disease in nova scotia	Motor neuron disease in nova scotia scotia.
14	children with recurrent abdominal pain how do they grow up	Children with recurrent abdominal pain, how do they grow up @-@?
14	malignant testicular tumours	Uh, malignant testicular tumors.
14	sleep epilepsy its pattern and prognosis	L'apos; sleep epilepsy his pattern and prognosis.
14	mixed mesodermal tumors of the uterus	Mixed mesodermal tumors of the uterus.
14	kidney transplantation improvement in patient and graft survival	Improved patient and transplant survival following a kidney transplant.
14	influence of selection of patients on results of clinical trials	L' influence of selection of patients on clinical trial results.
14	comparison of mobilization after two and nine days in uncomplicated myocardial infarction	Comparison of mobilization after two and nine days of uncomplicated myocardial infarction.
14	talking with people about to die	Talking with people who are going to die.
14	recurrent haematuria and mesangial iga deposition	Recurrent hematuria and mesangial iga deposition.
14	influence of amniotic fluid volume on lecithin estimation in prediction of respiratory distress	L' influence of amniotic fluid volume on apos; estimation of lecithin in prediction of respiratory distress.
14	cerebral blood flow and oxygen uptake and cerebrospinal fluid biochemistry in severe coma	Cerebral blood flow, oxygen absorption, and cerebrospinal fluid biochemistry in a severe coma.
14	hypertrophic mononeuropathy	Uh, hypertrophic mono-neuropathy.
14	surgery in management of patients with leukaemia	Surgery in management of patients with leukemia.
14	neonatal necrotizing enterocolitis clinical and radiological features	Clinical and radiological characteristics of neonatal enterocolitis.
14	failure of cerebrospinal fluid homovanillic acid to predict levodopa response in parkinson s disease	Failure of l' cerebrospinal fluid homovanillic acid to predict the response of levodopa to Parkinson's disease.
14	group characteristics of children with cerebral and spinal cord tumours	Characteristics of groups of children with brain tumours and spinal cord tumours.
14	evaluation of tnm classification of carcinoma of the breast	Evaluation of tnm classification of carcinoma of the breast.
14	epidemiology and course of gastrointestinal haemorrhage in north east scotland	The epidemiology and course of gastrointestinal hemorrhage in North East Scotland.
14	fibrin degradation products in the serum and cerebrospinal fluid of patients with group a meningococcal meningitis	Products of fibrin degradation in serum and cerebrospinal fluid of patients with group apo; meningococcal meningitis.
14	proceedings clinical value of predictive tests for advanced breast cancer	Clinical value of screening procedures for advanced breast cancer screening.
14	screening for hypertension some epidemiological observations	Screening for hypertension Some epidemiological observations.
14	liver biopsy and prognosis in acute liver failure	Acute liver biopsy and prognosis; acute liver failure.
14	fibrosis as in indication of time in infiltrating breast cancer and its importance in prognosis	Fibrosis as an indication of time in breast cancer and its importance in prognosis.
14	survival rates of lung cancer according to histological type	Rates of survival for lung cancer by type of cancer.
14	a trial of corticotrophin gelatin injection in acute optic neuritis	Apos test; corticotropin gelatin injection in acute optic neuritis.
14	chlorodyne dependence	Uh, chlorodyne addiction.
14	benign rheumatoid arthritis of the aged	Benign rheumatoid arthritis in the elderly.
14	late residua of acute idiopathic polyneuritis	Late-stage apo residuals; acute idiopathic polyneuritis.
14	the electroencephalogram after resuscitation of cardiocirculatory arrest	Lapses; electroencephalogram after resuscitation of apos; cardiocirculatory arrest.
14	scleronodular type of hodgkin s disease experience at the sherbrooke university hospital center	Scleronodular type dapos; Hodgkinian experience at the University Hospital in Sherbrooke.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen in management of colorectal carcinoma	Carcinogenic antigen-embryonic antigen in the management of colorectal carcinoma.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Primary cancer of the gallbladder.
14	five to twenty year followup after surgery for chronic pancreatitis in 148 patients	Monitoring 5 to 20 years after onset; surgery for chronic pancreatitis in 148 patients.
14	short term course and prognosis of crohn s disease	Short-term course and prognosis of Crohn's disease.
14	retroperitoneal fibrosis associated with malignant disease	Acute retroperitoneal fibrosis associated with malignant disease.
14	selection for treatment in spina bifida cystica	Selection for spina bifida cystica treatment.
14	predictive factors in open myelomeningocele with special reference to sensory level	Predictive factors in open myelomeningocele, especially with regard to sensory level.
14	placental lactogen levels in rhesus isoimmunization	Level of placental lactogen in rhesus isoimmunizations-iso.
14	evaluation of hyperventilation in treatment of head injuries	Assessment of apo; hyperventilation in treatment of head injuries.
14	regional cerebral blood flow and intraventricular pressure in acute head injuries	Uh, regional cerebral blood flow and intraventricular pressure in acute head trauma.
14	thrombolytic therapy in haemolytic uraemic syndrome	Thrombolytics in the hemolytic uremic syndrome.
14	non specific factors that may influence significance of urinary steroid excretion in breast cancer	Non-specific factors that may influence the importance of urinary steroid excretion in breast cancer.
14	perforative carcinoma of colon and rectum	Pervasive cancer of the colon and the rectum.
14	the significance of post traumatic status epilepticus in childhood	The significance of epilepsy; post condition-epileptic traumatic in childhood.
14	posterior fossa aneurysms simulating tumours	Later pit aneurysms simulating tumors.
14	the nitroblue tetrazolium test following acute myocardial infarction	Nitroblue tetrazolium test following acute myocardial infarction.
14	treatment of bone metastases of breast cancer with progestogens	Treatment of the bone metastasis of breast cancer with progestin.
14	significance of intravascular coagulation and fibrinolysis in acute hepatic failure	Lapses; importance of intravascular coagulation and fibrinolysis in acute hepatic failure.
14	prognosis in coronary artery disease angiographic hemodynamic and clinical factors	Prognosis of coronary heart disease hemodynamic and clinical angiographic factors.
14	pancreatic disease	Uh, pancreatic disease.
14	prognostic significance of chronic versus acute bundle branch block in acute myocardial infarction	The prognostic significance of chronic versus acute bundle branch block in acute myocardial infarction.
14	effect of aprotinin in acute myocardial infarction clinical double bind study author s transl	Effect of apos; aprotinin in myocardial infarction; acute myocardial infarction (AMI), clinical double bonding, translation of apos; author of the study.
14	immunosuppressive therapy in pure red cell aplasia	Pure red cell aplasia: immunosuppressive therapy.
14	gastric polyps prognosis and treatment	Gastric polyps prognosis and treatment.
14	planned splenectomy in treatment of idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura	Splenectomy for treatment of idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
14	wilms tumour treatment of 113 patients from 1960 to 1971	Wilm tumour treatment for 113 patients from 1960 to 1971.
14	prognostically favorable immunogens of human breast cancer tissue antigenic similarity to murine mammary tumor virus	Pronospecifically, the immunogens of human breast cancer have an antigenic similarity to the mouse mammary tumour virus.
14	a clinicopathologic study of 92 cases of granulosa cell tumor of the ovary with special reference to the factors influencing prognosis	Clinicopathological study of 92 cases of granulosa cell-induced cancer of the ovary, particularly with respect to factors influencing prognosis.
14	total body irradiation tbi as primary therapy for advanced lymphosarcoma	T-cell apo; total body irradiation as primary therapy for advanced lymphosarcoma.
14	the in situ iud and pregnancy outcome	Lapses; pregnancy outcome and in situ assessment.
14	combined modality therapy of ewing s sarcoma	Combined modal therapy of d&apos sarcoma; Ewing s.
14	percoelioscopy biopsy of the ovary a propos of 121 cases	Percoelioscopic biopsy of the ovary of 121 cases.
14	delivery in cases with anomalous uterus	Birth in cases where uterus is abnormal.
14	the role of parental translocations in cases of repeated miscarriages	The role of parental translocations in repeated miscarriages.
14	present data on pathological anatomy of female breast carcinoma	Current data on the pathological anatomy of breast carcinoma in women.
14	statistical analysis of 1 430 determinations of 24 hour urinary estriol clinical conclusions	A statistical analysis of 1,430 determinations of 24-hour clinical findings on urinary estriol.
14	autoagglutinating sperm one form of immunological male sterility	Self-agglutinating sperm a form of immunological male sterility.
14	male breast cancer 6 factors influencing prognosis	Male breast cancer 6 factors that influence prognosis.
14	prognostic significance of subacute hepatic necrosis in acute hepatitis	Lapses; prognostic importance of subacute hepatic necrosis in acute hepatitis.
14	radiographs of the thorax in acute myocardial infarction	Chest X-ray of the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	experimental pyelonephritis in the monkey ii the prognostic value of radionuclide evaluation of the urinary tract	Experimental Pyelonephritis in the monkey ii the prognostic value of apos; assessment of radionuclides in the urinary tract.
14	the surgical correction of fallot s tetralogy	Tetralogy surgical correction of fallots.
14	long term results after closed mitral valvotomy	Long-term results after closed mitral valve.
14	an approach to the surgery of mitral valve disease in children	An approach to the surgery of mitral valvular disease in children.
14	long term results of valve replacement in children suffering from rheumatic heart disease	Long-term results of valve replacement in children with rheumatic heart disease.
14	the late fate of autologous fascia lata valve grafts in the aortic position	The late fate of autologous valve grafts fascia lata in the aortic position.
14	experience with tissue heart valves	Well, experience with tissue heart valves.
14	surgery for tricuspid valve disease	He's in surgery for tricuspid valvulopathy.
14	surgical therapy in acute ischemic syndromes	Acute ischemic syndromes: surgical therapy for acute ischemic syndromes.
14	postinfarction ventricular aneurysm	He's got a ventricular aneurysm post-infarction.
14	results of surgery for mitral insufficiency due to coronary artery disease	The results of the surgery for mitral insufficiency due to coronary artery disease.
14	revascularization via healthy myocardial arteriolar networks compared with that through diseased surface coronary arteries	Revascularization is mediated by healthy myocardial arteriolar networks as compared to diseased surface coronary arteries.
14	transposition with ventricular septal defect and pulmonary stenosis the rastelli operation	Transposition with defective ventricular septation and pulmonary stenosis l' operation rastelli.
14	the surgical treatment of total anomalous pulmonary venous connection	This is the surgical treatment of the entire abnormal pulmonary venous connection.
14	approach to assessment of risk factors in mild hypertension	Approach to diagnosis; assessment of risk factors in diabetes; mild hypertension.
14	the first urinary tract infection in the female infant prevalence recurrence and prognosis a 10 year study in private practice	The first urinary tract infection in the female child prevalence recurrent and prognosis d' a 10-year study in private practice.
14	methods of burn treatment comparison by probit analysis	The burn treatment methods were compared with the probit analysis.
14	early predictors of incomplete recovery in children with guillain barr e polyneuritis	Early Predictors of incomplete recovery in children with guillain barr and polyneuritis.
14	a clinical method for detecting subendocardial ischemia after cardiopulmonary bypass	A clinical method to detect apos; ischemia under-endocardial after cardio bypass-respiratory.
14	myocardial revascularization in patients with poor ventricular function	Acute myocardial revascularization in patients with impaired ventricular function.
14	diagnosis and prognosis in colon cancer based on a profile in immune reactivity	Diagnosis and prognosis of colon cancer based on a pattern of immune responsiveness.
14	renal pelvic tumors	Uh, renal pelvis tumors.
14	quantitative morphometry of glomerulonephritis with crescents diagnostic and predictive value	Quantitative morphometry of glomerulonephritis with diagnostic crescents and predictive value.
14	the value of radiation therapy in uterine sarcoma	This is the value of radiation therapy for the uterine sarcoma.
14	enzymatic alterations in reye s syndrome prognostic implications	Effect of enzyme changes on the prognosis of the disease.
14	optimal treatment for the technically resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the supraglottic larynx	Optimal treatment of the technically resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the supraglottic larynx.
14	mucosal melanomas of the head and neck	Melanoma of the head and neck.
14	therapy of consumption coagulopathy and hyperfibrinolysis with urokinase in a case of acute promyelocytic leukemia	Treatment of coagulopathy and apo; hyperfibrinolysis by apo; urokinase in case of acute promyelocytic leukemia.
14	did the introduction of rehabilitation improve the course and prognosis of myocardial infarct	L' introduction of rehabilitation a-t-it improves the course and prognosis of the disease; myocardial infarction?
14	predicting the duration of guam amyotrophic lateral sclerosis	Predict the duration of the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis in guam.
14	current trends in radiation therapy	Current trends in radiation therapy use.
14	perceived life stress and psychopathology among mothers of young children	Perception of stress and psychopathology among mothers of young children.
14	a comparison of voluntary and involuntary patients in a state hospital	Comparison of voluntary and involuntary patients in a state hospital.
14	a teaching drill in child psychiatry	An exercise in child psychiatry education.
14	difficulties in brief conjoint treatment of sexual dysfunction	Difficulties; brief treatment of joints or joints; sexual dysfunction.
14	the functions of medical care	The functions of medical care.
14	glomus tumors in the head and neck iii analysis of clinical manifestations	Tumours glomus in the head and neck iii analyses clinical manifestations.
14	radiotherapy combined with hormone therapy for prostate cancer	Combination radiation therapy with oral therapy; hormone therapy for prostate cancer.
14	monitoring myelomatosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	cellular kinetics in multiple myeloma a new approach to staging and treatment	Cell kinetics in multiple myeloma is a new approach to staging and treatment.
14	clinical classification of plasma cell myeloma	Clinical classification of plasma myeloma.
14	igd multiple myeloma review of 133 cases	A review of 133 cases of multiple igd myeloma involving 133 cases.
14	influence of left ventricular function on survival 3 to 4 years after aortocoronary bypass	L' influence of left ventricular function on survival 3 to 4 years after coronary artery bypass.
14	precocity of pulmonary vascular obstruction of down s syndrome	Early onset pulmonary vascular obstruction of Down S syndrome.
14	keloids in ibadan	The ibadan cheloids.
14	hypothermia in the tropics a review of 24 cases	Hypothermia in the tropics, hypothermia in the tropics.
14	premonitory sign of heart block in acute posterior myocardial infarction	Premonitory cardiac blockage in the apos; acute posterior myocardial infarction.
14	fibrin ogen split products of nephropathies	Fibrin ogen products of nephropathic nephropathy.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen test in renal cell carcinoma	Carcinoembryonic antigen test in renal cell carcinoma.
14	testicular lymphoma	He's got testicular lymphoma.
14	a clinicopathological review of 68 carcinomas of the gallbladder	A clinicalicopathological review of 68 carcinomas of the gallbladder.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Primary cancer of the gallbladder.
14	a clinical trial designed to discover if the primary treatment of varicose veins should be by fegan s method or by an operation	Clinical trial to determine if the primary treatment of varicose veins should be done by the french frying method or by a surgical procedure.
14	health hazard appraisal in patient counseling	Health risk assessment in patient counselling.
14	chronic granulocytic leukaemia effect of elective splenectomy on the course of disease	Effect of chronic granulocytic leukemia of elective splenectomy on disease course.
14	serum ferritin in acute leukaemia at presentation and during remission	Serum ferritin in acute leukaemia at presentation and during remission.
14	ski injuries during growth	Ski injuries during growth.
14	cancer of the breast a study of prognostic factors as a guide in selecting cases for conservative treatment	Breast Cancer A study of prognostic factors as a guide in selecting cases for conservative treatment.
14	prognosis and incidence of sex chromatin in breast cancer a preliminary report	Progress and incidence of sexual chromatin in breast cancer a preliminary report.
14	pulmonary mechanics in infants surviving severe neonatal respiratory insufficiency	Acute pulmonary mechanics in infants surviving severe neonatal respiratory failure.
14	the sick sinus syndrome in africans	Ill sinus syndrome in Africa.
14	transient st segment elevation with postmyocardial infarction angina prognostic significance	St-segment transient elevation with prognostic significance of apos; angina for apos; post-infarct-myocardium.
14	age and type of onset as critical variables in early infantile autism	The age and type of onset are critical variables in early childhood autism.
14	effect of long term treatment of hyperactive children with methylphenidate	Effect of long-term treatment of hyperactive children with methylphenidate.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma patterns of relapse from complete remission after combination chemotherapy	Patterns of relapse of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma following complete remission after combination chemotherapy.
14	the glycolytic enzyme activity of the human cervix uteri	Lapos; glycolytic enzyme activity of the cervix; human uterus.
14	prediction of the response to chemotherapy in acute leukemia	The prediction of the response to chemotherapy in acute leukemia.
14	hemangiosarcoma of spleen with spontaneous rupture	Hemangiosarcoma of the spleen with spontaneous rupture.
14	adrenal cortical carcinoma a study of 32 patients	Adrenal cortical carcinoma is a study of 32 patients.
14	carcinoid tumors of the gastrointestinal tract	Cervoidal tumours of the gastrointestinal tract @-@.
14	prognosis of the second breast cancer the role of previous exposure to the first primary	The prognosis of the second breast cancer the role of l'apos; exposure before the first primary.
14	malignant melanoma of the extremities a clinicopathologic study using levels of invasion microstage	Malignant melanoma of the extremities, clinicopathological study using levels of microstages invasion.
14	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland	Cervical cancer of the thyroid gland.
14	the pathologic behavior of primary vaginal carcinoma and its relationship to cervical cancer	Pathological behaviour of primary vaginal carcinoma and its relationship to cervical cancer.
14	management of the acute abdomen in children with leukemia	Management of abs; acute abdomen in children with leukemia.
14	cea as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy	This is like a monitor of gastro malignancy-intestinal.
14	primary fibrosarcoma of bone a clinicopathologic study of 130 patients	Primary Fibrosarcoma; bone a clinicopathologic study of 130 patients.
14	the treatment of acute childhood leukemia predictions for the future based on extrapolations from the past	Treatment of predictions of acute childhood leukemia based on extrapolations from the past.
14	new looks in leukemia	Uh, new look in leukemia.
14	trends in surgery for childhood rhabdomyosarcoma	Trends in surgery for childhood rhabdomyosarcoma.
14	spontaneous regression and leukoderma in malignant melanoma	The spontaneous regression and leucoderm in the malignant melanoma.
14	american burkitt s lymphoma a clinicopathologic study of 30 cases i clinical factors relating to prolonged survival	Burkitt's lymphoma soma americana a clinicopathologic study of 30 cases i clinical factors related to long-term survival.
14	significance of cervicovaginal cytology after radiation therapy for cervical carcinoma	L' importance of cervicovaginal cytology after radiotherapy for carcinoma of the cervix.
14	prediction of fetal outcome in threatened abortion by maternal serum placental lactogen and alpha fetoprotein	Prediction of fetal outcome in threatened abortion by maternal serental placental lactogen and alpha fetoprotein.
14	homologous mixed m llerian tumors carcinosarcomal confined to endometrial polyps	Carcinosarcoma homologous mixed llerian tumours confined to endometrial polyps.
14	krukenberg s spindles	The spindles of Krukenberg.
14	systemic endotheliomatosis a case report	Reported case history; systemic endotheliomatosis.
14	prognostic value of electroencephalography in cardiac surgery	The prognostic value of apos; cardiac surgery electroencephalography.
14	supervision of the initial interview a study of two methods	Supervision of the supervision of the work; initial interview of the work; initial interview of the work; analysis of the work; analysis of two methods; study of two methods; presence of work; change of two methods; absence of work; use of work; jjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjjj
14	diagnostic criteria and five year outcome in schizophrenia a report from the international pilot study of schizophrenia	Diagnostic criteria and five-year schizophrenia results A report from the international pilot study on schizophrenia.
14	intertrochanteric fractures the role of complications of fixation	Intertrochanteric fractures the role of complications of fixation.
14	hemipelvectomy	It's called a hemipelectomy.
14	perfusion of ischemic ulcers of the extremity a prognostic indicator of healing	Infusion of ischemic extremity ulcers is a prognostic indicator of healing.
14	herpes simplex encephalitis prognosis and long term follow up	The prognosis of herpes simplex encephalitis and long-term follow-up.
14	invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the conjunctiva	Invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the conjunctiva.
14	long term maintenance therapy with azathioprine in systemic lupus erythematosus	Long-term maintenance; azathioprine in systemic lupus erythematosus.
14	pneumococcal antigen in lobar pneumonia	Pneumococcal antigen in lobar pneumonia.
14	the prognosis in aplastic anemia	This is the prognosis of aplastic anemia.
14	quality of survival following direct surgery for anterior communicating artery aneurysms	Survival quality following direct surgery for aneurysms of the connective anterior artery.
14	complex surveillance of streptococcus pyogenes i immunological surveys of anti m antibodies and possibilities of long term epidemiological prognosis	Complex surveillance of streptococcus pyogenes i immunological studies of antibody-m and possibilities for long-term epidemiological prognosis.
14	capsular and vascular invasion important prognostic factors in wilms tumor	Capsular and vascular invasion important prognostic factors in wilms tumor.
14	the efficacy of combining radiation therapy with a surgical procedure in patients with cervical metastasis from squamous cancer of the oropharynx and hypopharynx	The effectiveness of radiation therapy combined with surgery in patients with cancer; cervical metastasis caused by squamous cell cancer; oropharynx and oropharyngeal; hypopharyngeal.
14	the possible prognostic usefulness of assessing serum proteins and cholesterol in malignancy	Lapses; possible prognostic usefulness of apo; serum protein and cholesterol testing in malignant tumours.
14	prognosis of squamous cell carcinoma of the gums with cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastases	Projection of squamous cell carcinoma of the gums by cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastases.
14	early childhood development of four boys with 47 xxy karyotype	The early childhood development of four boys with 47 xxy karyotypes.
14	psycho sexual disorders and their treatment part ii	Psychosocial-sexual disorders and their treatment ii.
14	the prognosis in pregnancy after threatened abortion	The prognosis of pregnancy after an abortion.
14	urinary oestrone and chorionic gonadotrophin in threatened abortion	Urinary anestrone and chorionic gonadotropin in pregnancies; abortion threatened.
14	bleeding in early pregnancy investigated by ultrasound plasma progesterone and oestradiol	Bleeding early in pregnancy by ultrasound plasma progesterone and estradiol.
14	evaluation of the outcome of pregnancy in threatened abortion by biochemical methods	Assessment of pregnancy outcome in cases of pregnancy; abortion threatened by biochemical methods.
14	constitutional narrowing of the cervical spinal canal radiological and clinical findings	Constitutional reduction of cervical spinal canal radiological and clinical results.
14	renal cell carcinoma natural history and chemotherapeutic experience	Natural history of apo; renal adenocarcinoma and chemotherapy experience.
14	nephrocalcinosis in infancy and childhood	Nephrocalcinosis in infancy and childhood.
14	angiographic study of congenital aortic stenosis author s transl	Acute angiographic study of congenital aortic stenosis.
14	recurrent acute renal failure with idiopathic paroxysmal myoglobinuria	Recurrent acute renal failure with idiopathic paroxysmal myoglobinuria.
14	prognosis of the immediate outcome of myocardial infarct according to data of acid base and blood oxygen balance	The prognosis of the immediate outcome of myocardial infarction based on acid-based and blood oxygen balance data.
14	survival and state of patients during the 1st year after myocardial infarct according to data of epidemiological study myocardial infarct register	Survival and condition of patients in the 1st year following myocardial infarction, according to data from the myocardial infarction registry; epidemiological study.
14	intraarterial vasopressin in the treatment of upper gastrointestinal hemorrhage a prospective controlled clinical trial	Intra-@-@ arterial vasopressin in the treatment of gastro hemorrhage-intestinal superior a prospective controlled clinical trial.
14	phlegmonous gastritis	Uh, phlegmatic gastriosis.
14	narrowing the gap between medical and mental health evaluation	To reduce the gap between medical assessment and assessment of mental health.
14	acute renal failure in multiple myeloma	He has acute renal failure in multiple myeloma.
14	mononeuritis multiplex a complication of open heart surgery	Mononeuritis multiplex, a complication of open heart surgery.
14	hepatic reaction in ulcerative colitis and crohn s disease author s transl	Hepatic reaction in ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease.
14	investigations on the heredity of the nephrotic syndrome author s transl	Studies on the apos; heredity of the apos; translator of the nephrotic syndrome.
14	long term results of surgical treatment of spinal tumours in children and adolescents	Long-term results of surgical treatment of spinal tumours in children and adolescents.
14	hemolytic uremic syndrome in families	Hemolytic, uremic syndrome in families.
14	clinical aspects of bilateral renal dysplasia in children	The clinical aspects of bilateral renal dysplasia in children.
14	prognosis of chronic renal failure iii survival after one peritoneal dialysis	The prognosis of chronic renal failure iii survival after peritoneal dialysis.
14	mycotic keratitis by fusarium a review and report of two cases	Fusarium mycotic ceratitis, review and report of two cases.
14	long term treatment and prognosis of malignant tumors of the nasopharynx	Long-term treatment and prognosis of malignant tumours of the nasopharynx.
14	malignant tumours of the oral cavity a study of 177 cases	Malignant tumours of the oral cavity: 177 cases.
14	clinical course of post traumatic coma	L' clinical evolution of coma post-traumatic.
14	prognosis of traumatic decerebrated rigidity	The prognosis of traumatic decerebrated stiffness.
14	computerized eeg predictor of outcome in schizophrenia	Eg, computerized predictor of apos; born of schizophrenia.
14	testicular tumors in childhood	Testicle tumors in childhood.
14	plasma gonadotropins and androgens in surgically treated cryptorchid patients	Plasma gonadotropins and androgens in surgically treated cryptorchid patients.
14	silastic abdominal patch for temporary hepatomegaly in stage iv s neuroblastoma	Silastic abdominal patch for temporary hepatomegaly in stage iv s neuroblastoma.
14	cancer of the transverse colon a cancer diagnosed too late	Transverse colon cancer, diagnosed too late in life.
14	hypovolemic shocks simulating severe pulmonary embolism 20 cases	Hypovolemic shock simulating severe pulmonary embolism 20 cases.
14	acute necrotizing enterocolitis in infancy a review of 64 cases	Acute necrotizing enterocolitis in infants, review of 64 cases.
14	new data about oligoblastic leukemias apropos of an analysis of 120 cases	New micronoblastic leukemia data about apo; an analysis of 120 cases.
14	correlation of pre treatment serum 17 hydroxycorticosteroid values with survival in patients with prostatic cancer	Correlation among 17 serum values; pre-treatment hydroxycorticosteroids and survival in patients with apo; prostate cancer.
14	acute pancreatitis	Uh, acute pancreatitis.
14	prognosis of the effect of cardiac glycosides on the extrasystole in ischemic heart disease	The prognosis of apothecia; the effect of cardiac glycosides on extrasystole in ischemic heart disease.
14	results of perforating keratoplasty in hereditary corneal diseases author s transl	The results of perforating keratoplasty in hereditary corneal diseases.
14	changinc concepts in malignant melanoma	Changinc concepts in malignant melanoma.
14	recent thoughts on the development of colorectal cancer	Recent thinking on the causes; development of colorectal cancer.
14	cancer of the thyroid	Cancer of the thyroid.
14	immediate prognosis in recurrent myocardial infarction	The immediate prognosis of a recurrent myocardial infarction.
14	the clinical application of neuronography in facial palsy author s transl	The clinical application of neuronography in facial palsy muscles.
14	current remarks for use of the tnm classification on head and neck author s transl	Current remarks for the apo; use of the tnm classification on head and neck translators.
14	delayed hypersensitivity to dncb and survival following radiation therapy in patients with solid malignant tumors	Hypersensitivity to dncb and survival were both delayed following radiation therapy in patients with solid malignant neoplasms.
14	prognosis of fertility of men with sperm agglutinins in the serum	Prospective fertility of men with sperm agglutinins in the serum.
14	radiation therapy of brain tumors in children	Radiotherapy of brain tumors in children.
14	primary carcinoma of the gastric stump after resection for peptic ulcer	Primary cancer of the gastric stump after resection of the gastric ulcer.
14	diagnosis of intrathoracic goiter	Diagnosis of intrathoracic goitre.
14	melanoma of the vulva	It's a melanoma of the vulva.
14	juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma localized in the hand presentation of 2 cases	Localized juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma in the manual presentation of 2 cases.
14	amniotic fluid lecithin to sphingomyelin ration of 3 5 and fetal pulmonary maturity	Amniotic fluid lecithin at a sphingomyelin ration of 35 and fetal lung maturity.
14	some etiologic and prognostic factors in early infantile autism and psychosis	Some etiological and prognostic factors in early childhood autism and psychosis.
14	the treatment of low differentiated germinal cancers of the testis using mithramycin	Treatment of poorly differentiated germ cancers of the testis with mithramycin.
14	carcinoma of the papilla bypass whipple or papillectomy	Cancer of the papillary bypass whipple or papillectomy.
14	needs of the grieving spouse in a hospital setting	The needs of the bereaved spouse in a hospital setting.
14	lysozyme in hematologic diseases	You know, lysozyme in hematological diseases.
14	prognostic significance of serum albumin urea ratio in suture line leakage of the alimentary tract	The prognostic significance of serum albumin urea ratio in leakage of the gut suture line.
14	diseases of the breast	Diseases of the breast.
14	changing concepts in breast cancer	Change in breast cancer concepts.
14	inferior vena caval extension of renal carcinoma a lost cause roentgenographic and pathologic findings in surgical patients	Lower extension of the vena cava; renal adenocarcinoma a lost cause roentgenography and pathological results in surgical patients.
14	a device for precision needle biopsy of the breast at mammography	Procedure for a precise needle biopsy of the breast during a mammogram.
14	social versus clinical prediction in minor psychiatric disorders	Social versus clinical prediction in minor psychiatric disorders.
14	an attempt to determine surgical indication for biliary atresia by laboratory examination	Attempt to determine apo; surgical indication for biliary atresia by laboratory investigation.
14	urinary gonadotropins in management and prognosis of testicular tumor	Urinary gonadotropins in management and prognosis of testicular tumor.
14	staged treatment of invasive carcinoma of bladder	Phased treatment of invasive bladder carcinoma.
14	kaposi s sarcoma of genitourinary tract	Kaposi sarcoma of the gut genito-urinary.
14	adrenocortical neoplasms prognosis and morphology	Adrenal neoplasms prognosis and morphology.
14	neuroblastoma its natural history and prognosis a study of 487 cases	Neuroblastoma its natural history and prognosis a study of 487 cases.
14	the effectiveness of treatment for breast cancer patients	L'apos; effectiveness of treatment for patients with breast cancer.
14	bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood leucocytes in relation to bacterial infections in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in childhood	The bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood relative to bacterial infections in acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
14	carcinoma in situ of the gallbladder a dilemma	In situ cancer of the gallbladder is a dilemma.
14	aspirin allergy a clinical study	Allergic to aspirin; aspirin: a clinical study.
14	biochemical monitoring of the surgical patient	Biochemical monitoring of the surgical patient.
14	technical improvements in the management of omphalocele and gastroschisis	Technical improvements in the management of omphalocele and gastroschisis.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma ii histopathology and survival	Ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma ii histopathology and survival.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma i diagnostic considerations and treatment	Ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma i diagnostic and treatment considerations.
14	cerebellar abscesses a review of seventeen cases	Cerebral abscess: a review of 17 cases.
14	course of coronary disease evaluation of prognosis and progression of coronary insufficiency with atrial pacing and ergometry	Assessment of prognosis and prognosis; stroke progression; coronary heart failure vs. stroke; CHD progression, with atrial pacing and ergometry.
14	twelve o clock sphincterotomy technique indications results abbreviated report	The 12-hour sphincterotomy technique gives abbreviated results.
14	mortality and life table in down s syndrome	Mortality and life table in low-level syndrome.
14	circulating renin in essential hypertension an evaluation of its significance in the japanese population	Circulating renin in the apos; essential hypertension an evaluation of its importance in the Japanese population.
14	anterior interosseous nerve palsy spontaneous recovery in two patients	Previously, spontaneous interosseous nerve paralysis in two different patients.
14	left axis deviation and left anterior hemiblock among 8 000 japanese american men	Deflection of the left axis and anterior left hemiblock in 8,000 Japanese-Americans.
14	nonparoxysmal junctional tachycardia in acute myocardial infarction computer assisted detection	Non-paroxysmal tachycardia of the junction in the apos; acute myocardial infarction computer-assisted detection.
14	surgical versus medical treatment of occlusive disease confined to the left anterior descending coronary artery	Surgical versus medical treatment of occlusive disease confined to the left anterior descending coronary artery.
14	urologic problems associated with imperforate anus	Urological problems associated with anus; anus imperforation.
14	the natural history of malignant melanoma of the choroid small vs large tumors	L' natural history of malignant melanoma of small choroid tumors compared to large tumors.
14	effects of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation ecmo on pulmonary hemodynamics gas exchange and prognose	Effects of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation ecmo on pulmonary hemodynamics gas exchange and prognosis.
14	central nervous system disease in systemic lupus erythematosus therapy and prognosis	Central nervous system disorder in systemic lupus erythematosus treatment and prognosis.
14	treatment of wegener s granulomatosis of lung	Acute treatment of lung granulomatosis.
14	prognosis of paranoid states in relation to the clinical features	The prognosis of paranoid states in relation to clinical characteristics.
14	predicting aniseikonia in anisometropia	Predict anisikonia in anisometropy.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of chromosome studies in cancer	The diagnostic and prognostic value of chromosomal cancer studies.
14	lobotomy in private practice	Lobotomy in private practice.
14	long thoracic nerve palsy a follow up study	Long-term thoracic nerve paralysis, a follow-up study.
14	natural history of aortic and mitral valve disease	Natural history of aortic and mitral valve disease.
14	long term follow up of isolated replacement of the aortic or mitral valve with the starr edwards prosthesis	Long-term follow-up of the isolated replacement of the aortic or mitral valve with the prosthesis towards the apos; front of the star.
14	influence of surgery on the natural history of rheumatic mitral and aortic valve disease	The influence of surgery on the apos; natural history of rheumatic mitrale and aortic valvulopathy.
14	solitary interruption of the arch of the aorta clinicopathologic review of eight cases	Solitary interruption of infection; bow of infection; eight cases are clinically examined.
14	dispersion analysis of prognostic and relapsing factors of duodenal ulcer by use of electron computer	Scatter analysis of prognostic and relapse factors; duodenal ulcer at apo; assistance from apo; electronic computer.
14	hormonal patterns in breast cancers	The hormonal patterns in breast cancer.
14	prognosis in colon cancer a pathologic reassessment	The colon cancer prognosis is a pathological reassessment.
14	serum prognostic indicators in experimental bacteroides peritonitis	Serum prognostic indicators in experimental bacteroides peritonitis.
14	erythroblastemia	Uh, erythroblastemia.
14	bilateral recurrent acute retinal pigment epitheliitis	Recurrent bilateral acute retinal epithelitis.
14	photocoagulation in venous occlusive disease	Photocoagulation in venous occlusive diseases.
14	hemangioma of the liver diagnosis with combined use of laparoscopy and hepatic arteriography	Liver hemangioma diagnosed by a combination of laparoscopy and lapos; hepatic arteriogram.
14	exchange transfusion in hepatic coma factors affecting results with long term follow up data	Exchange transfusion in hepatic coma factors influencing results with long-term follow-up data.
14	tracking respiratory therapy in the trauma patient	Follow-up of respiratory therapy in the traumatized patient.
14	prognosis and treatment of bacterial endocarditis review of 70 cases	Examination of prognosis and treatment of bacterial endocarditis in 70 cases.
14	malignant melanomas of lille 1967 1972 comparison between histoprognosis and actual outcome author s transl	Comparison between histoprognosis and translations of apos; author of results; study of malignant melanoma, 1967.
14	exfoliative cytology of malignant germ cell tumors	An exfoliative cytology of malignant germ tumors.
14	relation of neurological findings after cardiac arrest to outcome	Relationship between neurological findings after cardiac arrest and outcomes; cardiac arrest.
14	bilateral internal carotid artery thrombosis prognosis and risk factors	Diagnosis of bilateral internal carotid artery thrombosis and risk factors.
14	ectopic production of big acth in carcinoma of the lung its clinical usefulness as a biologic marker	Ectopic production of large acth in the carcinoma of the lung its clinical usefulness as a biological marker.
14	squamous cell carcinoma of the gingiva histological classification and grading of malignancy	Squamous cell carcinoma of the histological classification of gums and malignancy.
14	purulent meningitis in the newborn infant	Purulent meningitis in the new-born.
14	the philadelphia pulmonary neoplasm research project thwarting factors in periodic screening for lung cancer	Philadelphia's Pulmonary Neoplasm Research Project counteracts factors in the periodic screening for lung cancer.
14	importance of histologic classification of carcinoma of the gallbladder	The importance of the histological classification of carcinoma of the gallbladder.
14	follow up of 97 young non psychotic male opiate abusers relationship between achieving abstinence age and duration of abuse	Follow-up of association between age of onset; abstinence and duration of onset; abuse of opiates; opiates in 97 non-psychotically abusive young men; opiates.
14	multiple primary cutaneous melanomas	Multiple primary cutaneous melanoma.
14	long term prognosis in children with recurrent abdominal pain	Long-term prognosis in children with recurrent abdominal pain.
14	evaluation of various factors influencing the choice of therapy and the prognosis of the uterine corpus carcinoma	Assessment of various factors influencing the choice of therapy and prognosis of uterine carcinoma.
14	cancer of the bile ducts associated with ulcerative colitis	Cervical cancer of the bile ducts associated with ulcerative colitis.
14	prognosis and quality of survival in a hospitalized stroke population from the south	Prevalence and survival of a hospitalized stroke population in southern British Columbia.
14	echocardiography in acute myocardial infarction	Echocardiography in apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	olfactory neuroblastoma management and prognosis	Olfactory neuroblastoma management and prognosis.
14	prognosis of malignant tumors of the parotid gland with facial paralysis	The prognosis for malignant tumors of the parotid gland with facial paralysis.
14	differentiating criteria for acute chronic distinction in schizophrenia	Differentiation criteria for acute chronic distinction in schizophrenia.
14	further evaluation of total pancreatectomy	Further evaluation of total pancreatectomy.
14	aneurysmectomy in the aged	An aneurysmectomy in the elderly.
14	the solitary pulmonary nodule ten year follow up of veterans administration armed forces cooperative study	The solitary pulmonary nodule 10 years follow-up of the apos; administration of veterans cooperative study of the armed forces.
14	a series of 20 successful warren shunts	A series of 20 successful warren diversions.
14	conventional splenorenal shunts a reconsideration	The conventional splenorenal avoids re-examination.
14	hemorrhage due to diffuse erosive gastritis	Hemorrhage due to erosive gastritis, diffuse.
14	hepatic artery ligation and cytotoxic infusion in treatment of liver neoplasms	Ligation of the liver; hepatic artery and cytotoxic infusion in hepatic neoplasm.
14	his bundle electrogram in patients with acute myocardial infarction complicated by atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction disturbances	His bundle electrogram in patients with apos; acute myocardial infarction complicated by atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction disorders.
14	low voltage electrocardiogram after acute myocardial infarction	Low-tension cardiogram after acute myocardial infarction.
14	a six year prospective study of term breech deliveries utilizing the zatuchni andros prognostic scoring index	Six-year prospective study of term seat delivery in apo; assistance from apo; zatuchni andros prognostic index.
14	primary aldosteronism and malignant adrenocortical neoplasia	Primary Aldosterone and malignant adrenocortical neoplasia.
14	factors influenceing long term prognosis in male patients surviving a first coronary attack	Factors influencing long-term prognosis in male patients surviving a first coronary attack.
14	intermediate coronary care a controlled trial	Intermediate coronary care - a controlled trial.
14	giant retinal tears	The giant retinal tears.
14	antepartum diagnosis of the terminal fetal state by cardiotocography	Prenatal diagnosis of the apo; terminal fetal condition by cardiotoc.
14	fetal death in eclampsia ii the effect of non therapeutic factors	Fetal death in pregnancy; eclampsia ii lupus; effect of non-therapeutic factors.
14	schizophrenia and organic brain syndrome with trisomy 8 group c trisomy 8 47 xx 8	Schizophrenia and organic brain syndrome with Down syndrome 8 group c trisomy 8 47 x 8.
14	assessment of an in vitro screening test of cytotoxic agents in the treatment of advanced malignant disease	Evaluation of an in vitro screening program for cytotoxic agents in the treatment of advanced malignant diseases.
14	about the estimation of fetal risk by evalution of the serum amniotic liqour ratio of hpl during the pregnancy author s transl	Estimation of fetal risk by gestational age; assessment of serum amniotic ratio of gestational age; hpl.
14	malignant change in fibrous dysplasia author s transl	Malignant change in fibrous dysplasia transl.
14	the influence of total gastrectomy on survival in malignant zollinger ellison tumors	The influence of total gastrectomy on survival in malignant zollinger ellison tumors.
14	the long term influence of coronary bypass grafts on myocardial infarction and survival	L' long-term influence of coronary bypass graft on myocardial infarction and survival.
14	six families prone to ovarian cancer	Six families are prone to ovarian cancer.
14	insular carcinoid primary in the ovary a clinicopathologic analysis of 48 cases	Primary insular cancer in the ovary a clinicopathological analysis of 48 cases.
14	tubular carcinoma of the male breast report of a case	Tubular cancer of the breast in the apos; man.
14	survival with mammary cancer related to the interaction of germinal center hyperplasia and sinus histiocytosis in axillary and internal mammary lymph nodes	Surviving breast cancer related to osteoporosis; osteoporosis; germ-cell hyperplasia; sinus histiocytosis in axillary and internal mammary lymph nodes.
14	prognostic features of thyroid cancer a long term followup of 68 cases	Prognostic characteristics of thyroid cancer and long-term follow-up of 68 cases.
14	carcinoid tumors an analysis of 2 837 cases	Cervical cancer: analysis of 2,837 cases.
14	the management of hodgkin s disease	You know, the treatment for Hodgkin's disease.
14	the staging of renal parenchymal tumours	The introduction of renal parenchyma tumors.
14	conservative renal surgery for adenocarcinoma the place of bench surgery	Conservative renal surgery for adenocarcinoma, site of the laboratory surgery.
14	the diagnostic and prognostic significance of delayed hypersensitivity skin testing in patients with urological cancer	The diagnostic and prognostic importance of delayed hypersensitivity testing in patients with urological cancer.
14	individual differences in selecting patients for regular haemodialysis	Individual differences in selection of patients for regular hemodialysis.
14	cellular immunity in cancer comparison of delayed hypersensitivity skin tests in three common cancers	Lapses; cellular immunity in cancer compared with delayed skin hypersensitivity tests in three common cancers.
14	relative prognostic significance of vasospasm following subarachnoid hemorrhage	The relative prognostic significance of vasospasm following hemorrhage under-arachnoid.
14	anaplastic giant cell carcinoma of the thyroid a study of treatment and prognosis	Anaplastic giant cell carcinoma of the thyroid, a study of treatment and prognosis.
14	nonepithelial tumors of the nasal cavity paranasal sinuses and nasopharynx a clinicopathologic study iv smooth muscle tumors leiomyoma leiomyosarcoma	Paranasal sinus nonepithelial tumours of the nasal cavity and nasopharynx has clinicopathological study iv smooth muscle tumours leiomyosarcoma.
14	a staging system for hepatocellular carcinoma prognostic factors in ugandan patients	A staging system for hepatocellular carcinoma prognostic factors in Ugandan patients.
14	mesocolic lymph node histology is an important prognostic indicator for patients with carcinoma of the sigmoid colon an immunomorphologic study	Mesocolate lymph node histology is an important prognostic indicator for patients with apo; sigmoid colon carcinoma in apo; immunomorphological study.
14	lymphoma presenting as bone marrow failure	Lymphoma showing bone marrow failure.
14	consecutive primary carcinomas of the breast	Acute primary cancer of the breast.
14	sarcoma of soft tissue clinical and histopathologic parameters and response to treatment	Clinical soft tissue sarcoma and histopathological parameters and response to treatment.
14	serological examinations with apathogenic clostridia m 55 author s transl	Serological examinations with apathogenic clostridia m 55 author s transl.
14	results of a catamnestic examination of schizophrenic patients	The results of a catamnestic examination of schizophrenic patients.
14	long term survival following coronary bypass surgery in patients with significant impairment of left ventricular function	Long-term survival following coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) in patients with dementia; significant impairment of left ventricular function.
14	combined gas endarterectomy and coronary artery bypass graft a follow up study	A follow-up study combining gas endarterectomy and coronary artery bypass graft was conducted.
14	ascending aortic aneurysms review of 100 consecutive cases	Aortic ascending aneurysms: examination of 100 consecutive cases.
14	results of reoperation for unsuccessful coronary artery bypass surgery	The results of reoperation for unsuccessful coronary artery bypass graft.
14	changes in survival and symptom relief in a longitudinal study of patients after bypass surgery	Changes in survival and symptom relief in a longitudinal study of patients following bypass surgery.
14	prognosis in medically treated coronary artery disease influence of ejection fraction compared to other parameters	The prognosis of medically treated coronary heart disease affects the ejection fraction compared to other parameters.
14	short term survival after acute myocardial infarction predicted by hemodynamic parameters	Short-term survival after acute myocardial infarction predicted by hemodynamic parameters.
14	is chronic gastritis a reversible process follow up study of gastritis by step wise biopsy	Chronic gastritis is a reversible process of follow-up of the apos; study of gastritis by careful biopsy step.
14	results of primary surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma	Results of primary surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma.
14	prognosis of chronic glomerulonephritis in adult patients estimated on the basis of the markov process	The prognosis of chronic glomerulonephritis in adult patients was estimated from the Markov process.
14	thioridazine central dopamine turnover and clinical effects of antipsychotic drugs	Thioridazine central dopamine turnover and clinical effects of antipsychotic drugs.
14	a clinical and follow up study of right and left bundle branch block	Clinical and follow-up study of the bundle of right- and left-beam branches.
14	transient st segment in unstable angina clinical and hemodynamic significance	Transient phase of apos; clinical and hemodynamic importance of angina.
14	hemodynamic and prognostic findings in patients with transmural and nontransmural infarction	Hemodynamic and prognostic evidence in patients with transmural and nontransmural infarction.
14	anomalous left coronary artery originating from the pulmonary artery report on 15 cases	Analogous; left coronary artery from the report on apos; pulmonary artery in 15 cases.
14	orthopedic management of acquired cerebrospasticity in childhood	The orthopedic management of cerebrospasticity acquired during childhood.
14	brachial plexus palsy in the newborn incidence and prognosis	Brachial plexus palsy in the newborn incidence and prognosis.
14	value of suppression test as a guide to prognosis of hyper thyroidism treated with anti thyroid drugs author s transl	Value of suppression test as a guide to prognosis of symptoms; hyperthyroid treated with anti thyroid Therapies Translator.
14	prognosis of cirrhosis of the liver 15 year follow up from time of first manifestation author s transl	The prognosis of cirrhosis of the liver 15 years of follow-up from the time of the first translation.
14	treatment and prognosis of intrathoracic hodgkin s disease author s transl	The treatment and prognosis of intrathoracic Hodgkin's disease.
14	symptoms and clinical features of panarteritis nodosa author s transl	Symptoms and clinical characteristics of panarteritis nodosa (PNP nodosa) translator.
14	the angiographic findings in focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver author s transl	The angiographic findings in hyperplasia-focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver author transl.
14	neurogenic gastric tumours schwannomas and neurofibromas author s transl	Neurogenic Schwannomas and Neurofibromes Neurogenic gastric tumors Author transl.
14	urinary tract manifestations of ruptured infrarenal aortic aneurysms author s transl	Urinary manifestations of ruptured infra-renal aortic aneurysms The author is a translator.
14	aetiology therapeutics and prognosis of osteochondrosis dissecans of talar dome author s transl	Therapeutic etiology and prognosis of osteochondrosis; dissecting osteochondrosis; author of the translational talar dome.
14	results of a follow up study of small for date babies i physical development author s transl	Results from a follow-up study of small infants and physical development of the baby.
14	the problems and clinical aspects of primary malignancies of the small intestine author s transl	The problems and clinical aspects of primary malignancies in the small intestine author s.
14	recurrent urinary tract infection in childhood diagnosis treatment prognosis author s transl	Acute and chronic urinary tract infection in children Projection of the prognosis.
14	syndrome of touraine solente and gol report of two cases author s transl	Soluble tower syndrome and gol ratio of two translations.
14	20 min 99mtc thyroid uptake author s transl	In 20 min 99 mt of l' absorption of thyroid.
14	the pycnodysostosis author s transl	Translation of the pycnodysostosis author.
14	surgical treatment of carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	Surgical treatment of carcinoma of the stomach; translations.
14	postoperativ binocular function after full prismatic correction in patients with concomitant convergent strabismus and exuberance of convergence author s transl	Full postoperative binocular function after prismatic correction in patients with concomitant convergent strabismus and exuberant translation of l&apos.
14	prognosis and treatment of hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	The prognosis and treatment of Hodgkin's disease in children with Hodgkin's disease.
14	metastasizing carcinoma of the breast and diabetes mellitus a prognostically favourable combination author s transl	In addition, breast cancer and diabetes mellitus are associated with a prognostically favourable association.
14	mendelson s syndrome author s transl	Apos translation; author of mendelson syndrome.
14	evaluation of cell mediated immunity in the course of primary malignant tumors of the ovary cutaneous reactivity author s transl	An evaluation of cell-mediated immunity in the course of primary malignant neoplasms of the liver; translator of the ovarian skin reactivity.
14	results of non specific iliac crest biopsy in patients with bronchial carcinoma author s transl	The results of a nonspecific iliac crest biopsy in patients with apo; bronchial carcinoma were translated.
14	a discussion of the curability of childhood epilepsies author s transl	A discussion of the curability of children with epilepsy.
14	chemotherapeutic problems in surgically treated bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Chemotherapeutic problems in surgically treated bronchial carcinoma.
14	polychemotherapy for inoperable bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Translative polychemotherapy for inoperable bronchial carcinomas.
14	investigation to improve the survival of patients with bronchial carcinomas radically operated author s transl	A study to improve the survival of patients with radically operated bronchial carcinoma.
14	biologic factors and malignancy in mediastinal neoplasms author s transl	Biological factors and malignancy in mediastinal neoplasms.
14	some observations on prognosis in congenital hydrocephalus first report with reference to the preoperative evaluation of the hydrocephalic infants author s transl	Some observations on prognosis in apo; congenital hydrocephalus first report in reference to apo; preoperative assessment of hydrocephalic infants in translation.
14	the lymphocytoma of the lung etiology pathogenesis differential diagnosis and dignity author s transl	The lymphocytoma of the lung etiology pathogenesis Differential diagnosis and self-reported dignity.
14	aspects of bile acid metabolism in liver diseases author s transl	The aspects of bile acid metabolism in liver disease.
14	prognosis of colonic and rectal cancer under selection free conditions author s transl	The prognosis of colon and rectal cancer under non-selective conditions and conditions.
14	surgical treatment of lung cancer actual situation and perspective author s transl	Surgical treatment of lung cancer actual situation and point of view of the authors translate.
14	double and multiple carcinomas of the colon author s transl	Cancer double and multiple of l'apos; author of the translations.
14	a case of maffucci kast syndrome author s transl	This is a case of maffucci syndrome.
14	the capsule sign in severe hydronephrosis author s transl	The capsule sign in the translation of the apos, author of a severe hydronephrosis.
14	dynamic telethermography and strategy in cancerology author s transl	The dynamic telethermography and strategy in translated oncology.
14	the pseudolymphoma of the stomach author s transl	It's called the pseudolymphoma of the apos; author of the apos; translated stomach.
14	gastric carcinoma author s transl	Translation of apo; gastric carcinoma author.
14	present state of diagnosis and treatment of the adrenogenital syndrome author s transl	Current status of diagnosis and treatment of adrenogenital syndrome in adults; transl.
14	interruption of the aortic arch with tetralogy of fallot report of a successful one stage correction of both anomalies and review of the literature author s transl	Aortic arch with tetralogy of fallot report d' a successful correction d' stage of both anomalies and review of translation of l' author of the literature.
14	surgical treatment of acute dissection of the ascending aorta author s transl	Surgical treatment of acute dissection of the translation of the apos; author of ascending aorta.
14	problems of intracranial extension of malignant disease of the nose and sinuses author s transl	Nose and sinus malignancies; intracranial extension of the nose and sinus malignancies.
14	adenocarcinoma in situ and microinvasive adenocarcinoma of the cervix uteri author s transl	Adenocarcinoma in situ and microinvasive adenocarcinoma of the cervix; uterus.
14	surgical treatment of breast cancer present problems author s transl	The surgical treatment of breast cancer is problematic.
14	is the activity of rheumatoid arthritis affected by repeated surgical operations author s transl	L' activity of rheumatoid arthritis is affected by repeated surgery.
14	second and multiple operations on the biliary tract follow up of 90 patients author s transl	The second and multiple operations on the biliary tract, followed by 90 patients, translation of the text.
14	diagnostical and therapeutical aspects of post traumatical endobronchial bleeding author s transl	The author translates the diagnostic and therapeutic aspects of endobronchial bleeding post-traumatic.
14	ethiology and treatment of pleural empyema after thoracic surgery author s transl	Ethiology and treatment of apos; pleural empyema after thoracic surgery Translation of apos; author.
14	the influence of menopause on prognosis of breast cancer author s transl	Lapos; influence of menopause on prognosis of breast cancer translated.
14	clinical experiences with untreated homologous vein grafts in reconstruction of arteries author s transl	Clinical trials of untreated homologous vein transplants in reconstruction of the translative arteries.
14	do we have to treat non hodgkin s lymphomas the same as hodgkin s disease	Should we treat non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in the same way as we treat Hodgkin's lymphoma?
14	mediastinal tumors of childhood author s transl	Translation of childhood mediastinal tumours by authors.
14	pathobiochemistry of galactosemia and usefulness of the gt system in expert opinions author s transl	Pathobiochemistry of galactosemia and usefulness of the gt system in the galactosemia expert translations.
14	results obtained in the surgical treatment of right sided abomasal displacement and torsion of the abomasum in cattle author s transl	Results obtained during the surgical treatment of right side abomasal displacement and torsion of the abomasum in the translation of l&apos.
14	catamnestic studies of headache patients with pathological eeg author s transl	Catamnestic studies of headache patients with translation of apo; author; eg pathology.
14	damage to the spinal marrow in kyphoscoliosis author s transl	Uh, damage to the spinal cord caused by kyphoscoliosis.
14	primary hemangiopericytoma of the lung author s transl	Translated primary hemangiopericytoma of the lung.
14	isolated rupture of the interventricular septum after blunt chest trauma author s transl	Isolated rupture of the interventricular septum after translation of a blunt chest trauma article.
14	progress of untreated scoliosis following poliomyelitis up to the end of the growth period author s transl	Progress of untreated scoliosis following poliomyelitis up to the end of the growing period.
14	ischemic contractures of muscle and nerve lesions author s transl	Acute ischemic strains of muscle and nerve damage.
14	peripheral nerve injury due to total replacement of the hip joint author s transl	Peripheral nerve injury due to total translation replacement of the hip joint.
14	short and long term prognosis of intraventricular conduction disturbances in myocardial infarction author s transl	Short- and long-term prognosis of intraventricular conduction disorders in myocardial infarction.
14	prognostic significance of the intraventricular blocks during acute myocardial infarction author s transl	A prospective significance of intraventricular blocks during acute myocardial infarction transl.
14	evaluation of cardiac performace in 222 patients with pulmonary sarcoidosis author s transl	Assessment of cardiac performance in 222 patients with pulmonary sarcoidosis.
14	stenosis of the spinal canal after spondylodesis iatrogenic stenosis of the spinal canal author s transl	Stenosis of the spinal canal after iatrogenic stenosis of the spondylodesis; translator of the spinal canal.
14	pregnancy in spite of multiple factors of infertility in both marital partners author s transl	Pregnancy in spite of multiple factors; infertility in both partners.
14	results of a controlled clinical trial for evaluation of intensive preoperative irradiation in operable bronchial cancer author s transl	Results of a controlled clinical trial for evaluation of preoperative intensive preoperative irradiation in workers specializing in operable airway cancer.
14	mendelson s syndrome in coronary care units author s transl	Mendelson syndrome in coronary care units.
14	changes in responsivity to trh test and t3 suppression test after surgical treatment of hyperthyroidism author s transl	Changes in responsiveness to the HRT and suppression t3 test after surgical treatment of apo; translative hyperthyroidism Author.
14	clinical and prognostic significance of antinuclear factors during d penicillamine treatment author s transl	The clinical and prognostic significance of antinuclear factors during penicillamine treatment is described.
14	treatment follow up and prognosis of drug addiction author s transl	Monitoring and prognosis of substance abuse treatment services translated.
14	on the intracerebral hematoma clinical analysis of 105 operated cases author s transl	On the apos; clinical analysis of apos; intracerebral hematoma of 105 operated cases.
14	the angiographic diagnosis of trophoblastic tumours author s transl	Angiographic diagnosis of trophoblast tumours Translation of apos; author.
14	core and surface antigen of the dane particle in liver tissue relation to different forms of hepatitis b author s transl	Central and surface antigen of the dane particle in liver tissue in relation to different forms of hepatic translations.
14	intracranial and spinal hemorrhage in haemophilia author s transl	He's got intracranial and spinal hemorrhage in his brain.
14	the importance of magnification angiography as an investigation for the arterial supply of the femoral head after medial neck fracture author s transl	L' magnification angiography for apos; study of apos; arterial supply of the femoral head after translation of apos; author of apos; middle fracture of the neck.
14	prognostic assessment in peripheral facial nerve paralysis with particular reference to electroneurography author s transl	Prognostic evaluation of peripheral facial nerve paralysis with particular reference to translation of the apos; electrography.
14	septicaemia in the neonatal and infant period author s transl	Septicaemia in the new-born and the new-born.
14	operative therapy of ovaria carcinoma author s transl	Surgical treatment of carcinoma of the ovary in Canada.
14	osteomyelitis therapy and prognosis author s transl	Osteomyelitis therapy and prognosis translated by the authors.
14	endoscopic follow up studies of erosions of the gastric mucosa author s transl	Endoscopic erosion monitoring studies of the gastric mucosa author.
14	clinical pathology of the waterhouse friderichsen syndrome author s transl	This is a clinical pathology of Waterhouse Friderichsen Syndrome.
14	chiasma syndrome in arachnoidosis optochiasmatica author s transl	Arachnoidy optochiasmatica chiasma syndrome s transl.
14	on the so called posttraumatic headache author s transl	On the self-saying translation post-traumatic of the headache perpetrators.
14	osseous metaplasia of renal medulla author s transl	Bone metaplasia of the renal medulla translates.
14	severe course of an infection with leptospira grippotyphosa author s transl	Severe course of infection with translative leptospira flu.
14	life expectancy in acquired vitium cordis after operative treatment author s transl	L' life expectancy in vitium cordis acquired after surgical treatment translated by author.
14	electromyography and electroneurography in peripheral facial nerve paralysis author s transl	Translated electromyography and electroneurography in peripheral nerve paralysis.
14	the basis of diagnostic and therapeutic decisions author s transl	The basis of diagnostic and therapeutic decisions translations.
14	treatment and prognosis of osteosarcoma in childhood author s transl	The treatment and prognosis of osteosarcoma in children.
14	bilateral cancer of the kidney author s transl	Bilateral cancer of the kidney and kidney; translations.
14	humoral and cellular immune phenomena in an acute viral hepatitis author s transl	Translated acute viral hepatitis, humoral and cellular immune phenomena in an author on hepatitis.
14	humoral and cell bound immunological reactions in chronic hepatitis author s transl	Cell- and humour-related immunologic reactions in the authors' translation of chronic hepatitis.
14	diagnosis of vogt koyanagi harada syndrome uveoencephalitis author s transl	Diagnosis of vogt koyanagi harada uveoencephalitis transl.
14	actinomycin d therapy in testicular cancer author s transl	Actinomycin therapy in testicular cancer author s transl.
14	stauffer syndrome paraneoplastic hepatic dysfunction syndrome associated with renal cell carcinoma author s transl	Stauffer syndrome Paraneoplastic liver dysfunction syndrome associated with apos; renal cell carcinoma.
14	the syndrome of biliary atresia typical physiognomy anomalies of the pulmonary arteries and eventual other malformations author s transl	The biliary atresis syndrome is typical of abnormalities of the physiognomy of the pulmonary arteries and, eventually, of other malformations.
14	the prognosis of the transitory disturbances of av conduction following cardiac surgery author s transl	The prognosis of the transient disturbances of the apos; conduction following translation of the apos; author on cardiac surgery.
14	report on clinical positive evidence of the nerve excitability test in facial palsy author s transl	Report on positive clinical evidence of nerve excitability test in facial palsy author s transl.
14	determination of the latency for the prognosis of bell s palsy author s transl	Determination of the latency for the prognosis of the apos; paralytic speaker of the translations.
14	schmincke carcinoma of the nasopharynx author s transl	Schmincke carcinoma of the nasopharyngeal epithelium.
14	results of reconstructive vascular surgery author s transl	The results of reconstructive vascular surgery have been translated.
14	malignant bone tumours in childhood author s transl	Translation of malignant bone tumours in children.
14	coronary heart disease and bypass surgery a clinical cardiologist s view author s transl	Both coronary artery disease and bypass graft are performed by a clinical cardiologist.
14	juvenile bone cysts and giant cell tumors author s transl	The authors translate juvenile bone cysts and giant cell tumors.
14	improved prognosis of malignant oropharynx tumors by preoperative therapy author s transl	Improved prognosis of malignant neoplasms of the oropharynx by preoperative therapy.
14	pericarditis and fresh myocardial infarction author s transl	Pericarditis and fresh myocardial infarction Translation of apos; author.
14	malignant ovarian neoplasms in young women author s transl	Translation of malignant ovarian neoplasms in young women authors.
14	correlations between clinical control and histopathologic findings in breast cancer after irradiation and radical mastectomy author s transl	Correlations between clinical control and histopathological findings of breast cancer after exposure; irradiation and radical mastectomy after exposure.
14	prognosis of melanoma of the vulva author s transl	The prognosis of melanoma of the translator vulva.
14	hypertrophic obstructive cardiomyopathy author s transl	Cardiomyopathy: hypertrophic obstructive cardiomyopathy transl.
14	critical flicker frequency cff in the central and peripheral visual field author s transl	Critical flickering frequency in the central and peripheral visual field of the translations.
14	manifestation of diabetes in the first to third year of life later fates of 43 patients author s transl	Demonstration of diabetes in the first to third year of life later fate of 43 patients translator s patients.
14	chronic headache and abuse of phenacetin author s transl	Chronic headache and abuse of phenacetin author s transl.
14	the nosological position and histogenic origin of the so called cerebellar astrocytomas author s transl	The nosological position and the apos; the histogenic origin of the translating astrocytoma.
14	surgery of the tongue and floor of the mouth author s transl	Surgical surgery of the tongue and of the floor of the mouth of l' translates.
14	bronchial cancer in berlin capital of the g d r 2 communication lung cancer detection between 1955 and 1973 author s transl	Bronchial cancer in Berlin communication lung cancer capital 2 lung cancer detection between 1955 and 1973 transl.
14	prognostic value of histological rare breast cancer author s transl	The prognostic value of the authors on histological and rare breast cancer is translated into English.
14	massive hemorrhage caused by acute solitary gastric erosion dieulafoy change of prognosis due to preoperative endoscopy author s transl	Massive hemorrhage caused by the apos; acute, solitary gastric erosion diurnal change of prognosis due to the preoperative translation of the apos; author of the apos; endoscopy.
14	appearance of a localized peritoneal mesothelioma seven years after resection of pericardium on account of localized pericardial mesothelioma author s transl	L' appearance of apos; a peritoneal mesothelioma located seven years after pericardial resection is attributable to the localized translation of apos; pericardial mesothelioma study.
14	pathogenesis and clinic of pancreatic fistulas author s transl	Translated pathogenesis and clinical of pancreatic fistula.
14	prognosis of perforated appendicitis author s transl	Diagnosis of apo; translator perforated appendicitis.
14	improved prognosis of ewing sarcoma by combined irradiation and chemotherapy author s transl	Improved prognosis of the apos sarcoma ewing by combined irradiation and chemotherapy.
14	mediastinal and pulmonary complications of the sclerosing treatment of oesophageal varices author s transl	Mediastinal and pulmonary problems associated with the sclerosing treatment of esophageal varices.
14	the prognosis in and the limitations set to concervative treatment of occlusion of crural arteries author s transl	The prognosis and limitations of the concervative treatment of occlusion of the authors' cereal arteries.
14	combination chemotherapy of acute lymphoid leukaemia in children combined with prophylactic cranial irradiation author s transl	Combination of acute lymphocytic leukemia chemotherapy in children and d' prophylactic cranial irradiation.
14	observations in two cases of primary fibrosarcoma of the lung author s transl	Observations in two cases of primary fibrosarcoma of the lung translator.
14	bronchial carcinoma dependence of operationsuccess author s transl	Carcinoma bronchique dependence of the apos; operation success authors s translations.
14	rare kidney tumours author s transl	Translation of apos; rare kidney tumours authors.
14	aneurysms of the sinus of valsalva author s transl	Aneurysms of the sinus of the apos; translative valsalva.
14	the radiological diagnosis of calcifying coronary sclerosis author s transl	Authors radiological diagnosis of calcification of coronary sclerosis.
14	recurring clear cell leiomyoblastoma of the uterus author s transl	Recurrent clear cell leiomyoblastoma of the uterus.
14	a suggestion for the evaluation of the antepartal cardiotocogram author s transl	This is a suggestion for the evaluation of the translation of the antepartal cardiotocogram.
14	resection for pulmonary metastases results and prognosis author s transl	Resection for pulmonary metastasis results and prognosis author s transl.
14	usefulness of renal scinitigraphic scanning in the prognosis of acute renal failure author s transl	Lapses; usefulness of renal scans for prognosis; acute renal failure Translation of symptoms; author.
14	the results of galactography a contribution to the early diagnosis of carcinoma of the breast author s transl	The results of the galactography a contribution to the early diagnosis of carcinoma of the translated breast.
14	the severest form of co poisoning author s transl	The most severe form of co @-@poisoning is the author's translation.
14	applies phoniatry iii stuttering and cluttering author s transl	Application phoniatry iii stuttering and cluttering of translation of l' author.
14	to the differential diagnosis of bronchiolo alveolar cell carcinoma in early state author s transl	Differential diagnosis of bronchiolar alveolar cell carcinoma in the initial status of the translator.
14	radiological observations of the chest in progressive scleroderma author s transl	L' radiological observation of the chest in translational progressive scleroderma.
14	late diagnosis of malignant renal tumors review and case reports author s transl	Late diagnosis of malignant renal tumours Review and case reports Translation by the authors.
14	clinic and therapy of idiopathic hemochromatosis report of 51 cases author s transl	Clinic and treatment of idiopathic hemochromatosis report of 51 translator cases.
14	ascending choledochal papillomatosis author s transl	Translation of apo; author of apo; article on papillomatosis of ascending choledocol.
14	coronary heart disease and peripheral arterial occlusive disease with particular reference to myocardial infarction author s transl	Coronary heart disease and occlusive coronary artery disease; peripheral artery disease, especially apos; myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis of post traumatic anosimia author s transl	The prognosis of the post traumatic anosimia has been translated by the author.
14	preventive surgery in the treatment of severely injured eyes late results complications postoperative care author s transl	Preventive surgery in the treatment of serious, late-onset, post-operative complications resulting from the use of translations.
14	significance of antibody titers in recurrent urinary tract infection in children author s transl	L' importance of titre; antibody in recurrent urinary tract infections in children.
14	a method for studying social security records in epidemiology use in a study on the prognosis of chronic bronchitis author s transl	Abstract method; study of social security records in epidemiology used as part of a study on the prognosis of chronic bronchitis.
14	malignant synovialoma author s transl	The author of a malignant synovialoma.
14	clinic and therapy of acute pancreatitis author s transl	Clinical and therapy acute pancreatitis author s translation of pancreatitis.
14	continuous local application of cytostatics for bronchial carcinoma and mediastinal lymph node metastasisization author s transl	Continued, local application of cytostatics for bronchial carcinoma and mediastinal lymph node metastasis.
14	tuberculosis in developing countries compared to europe author s transl	Tuberculosis in developing countries compared to Europe.
14	refractory anemia with hypercellular bone marrow and preleukemia author s transl	Refractory anemia with hypercellular bone marrow and translative author preleukemia.
14	gallstone ileus author s transl	Translation of the apo; author of the apo; ileus bileary.
14	influence of pathogenesis of purulent meningitis on the prognosis author s transl	Influence of pathogenesis of purulent meningitis on translation of prognosis.
14	the importance of immune deficiency for the prognosis of purulent meningitis author s transl	Evidence; importance of the disease; immunodeficiency for prognosis of purulent meningitis.
14	importance of intensive therapy in the treatment of purulent meningitis author s transl	The importance of intensive therapy in the treatment of purulent meningitis.
14	therapy of meningitis author s transl	Treatment of Meningitis Translated.
14	therapy of myasthenia author s transl	Myasthenia translation therapy of apo; author s.
14	nosology of schizophrenia author s transl	Nosologie de schizophrenia author s transl.
14	analysis of operative therapy of carcinoma of the tongue author s transl	Analysis of the operative therapy of carcinoma of the author tongue.
14	generalized skeletal dysplasias author s transl	Apos translation; author of generalized skeletal dysplasia.
14	the so called chondrodystrophia of the newborn author s transl	This is called the chondrodystrophy of the new translator-based-ne translator.
14	ultrasound evaluation of heart disease with special reference to congenital and acquired lesions author s transl	An ultrasound evaluation of heart disease, particularly congenital and acquired lesions.
14	a case of systemic pfeiffer weber christian syndrome complicated by dic author s transl	It's a systemic case of Weber Christian syndrome, complicated by the translations of dic writers.
14	treatment and results of the first relapse of acute lymphatic leukemia in childhood author s transl	The treatment and outcome of the first relapse of acute lymphatic leukemia in children.
14	mineral oil pneumonia caused by throat gargles containing lipoid paraffin diagnosed by biochemical examination of the sputum author s transl	Apos pneumonia; mineral oil caused by throat gargles containing lipoid paraffin diagnosed by biochemical examination of the translations of apos; author of apos; expectoration.
14	the ecg on exercise author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of the apos; ECG on the apos; exercise.
14	surgical treatment of colitis author s transl	The surgical treatment of colitis translator.
14	atrial fibrillation and flutter as a complication of acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Atrial fibrillation and flutter as a complication of the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	results of surgical treatment of early carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	Results of surgical treatment of early carcinoma of the stomach; translations.
14	yersinia arthritis author s transl	Yersinia arthritis author s transl.
14	carcinoid tumours of the rectum author s transl	Cancer tumours of the rectum de l'apos; translates.
14	the carcinoma of the gastric stump clinical experiences and observations in 15 years author s transl	The carcinoma of gastic stump clinical experiences and observations in 15 years.
14	diagnosis of breast cancer metastatic to the chest author s transl	Determination of metastatic breast cancer at apos; translator of the thorax.
14	investigations of the clinical course of acute myocardial infarction ii epidemiological facts author s transl	Studies on apo; clinical development of apo; acute myocardial infarction ii Epidemiological studies.
14	idiopathic thrombosis of the superior vena cava author s transl	Identical thrombosis of the apos; author of the superior vena cava s transl.
14	results of radiotherapy of bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Results of radiotherapy of bronchial carcinoma author s.
14	a new immunochemical tube test for pregnancy using the latex agglutination inhibition reaction ii clinical results author s transl	A new immunochemical tube test for pregnancy using the reaction d' inhibition of l' agglutination of latex ii clinical results translator.
14	significance of the size of an acute infarct for left ventricular haemodynamics author s transl	Lapos; size significance; acute infarction to the apos; left ventricular hemodynamics of the authors; is translated.
14	spontaneous rupture of the oesophagus author s transl	Spontaneous rupture of the translation of the esophagus.
14	tricuspid atresia hemodynamic and surgical considerations author s transl	Tri-suspicious atresia hemodynamic and surgical considerations author translation of l' author.
14	occlusion of the basilar artery author s transl	Occlusion of translations of the apos and the basilar artery of the apos.
14	the angiographic picture of arteriovenous fistulae author s transl	L' angiographic image of arteriovenous fistula, translated by the author.
14	the prognosis of intrauterine fetal growth retardation author s transl	The prognosis of fetal growth retardation in the uterus.
14	the importance of the results of pretreatment pelvic lymphographies in the prognosis of carcinomas of the uterine cervix a critical evaluation of the proposal to classify these tumors according to the tnm system author s transl	The importance of the results of pre-treatment pelvic lymphography in the prognosis of cervical carcinomas; a critical evaluation of the proposal to classify these tumours according to the author system.
14	the prognosis of female genital sarcomas of the adult woman with special reference to sarcomas of the uterine corpus author s transl	The prognosis of the female genital sarcomas of the adult woman, especially the sarcomas of the uterus of the uterus.
14	the success prognosis of plastic diaphragma operation on women with stress incontinence author s transl a1	The success of a plastic diaphragm operation on women with stress incontinence author translation a1.
14	cytology and histology of vaginal leiomyosarcoma a rare tumor author s transl	Cytology and histology of vaginal leiomyosarcoma, a rare tumour maker, translated into English.
14	leiomyosarcomas of the inferior vena cava report of a case and review of the literature author s transl	Leiomyosarcomas of the inferior veina cava report of a case and review of the literature s transl.
14	results of surgical treatment of peptic ulcer in old age author s transl	Results of surgical treatment of apo; gastroduodenal ulcer in translation of apo; author on aging.
14	solitary plasmocytoma author s transl	The author of a solitary plasmocytoma.
14	radiologic signs of severe head transformation disorders arising with the treatment of the congenital dislocation of the hip author s transl	Radiological evidence of severe head transformation disorders arising from the treatment of congenital hip translational dislocation of l' author.
14	dissociation of maturity a typical variant of motor development author s transl	Dissociation of maturity a typical variant of the engine development transl s.
14	neuroblastoma diagnosis therapy and prognosis on the basis of 56 cases author s transl	The diagnosis and prognosis of neuroblastoma on the basis of 56 cases were translated by the authors.
14	radiotherapy of neuroblastoma author s transl	Neuroblastoma is a neuroblastoma of the liver.
14	dysplasia and pseudodysplasia of the infantile hip joint author s transl	Dysplasia and pseudodysplasia of the child hip co-author translations.
14	diagnosis and habilitation of hard of hearing children in the region of magdeburg gdr author s transl	Diagnosis and habilitation of children with hearing loss in the Magdeburg region.
14	the importance of height of parents for correct estimation of growth of their children author s transl	The importance of parental height in correctly estimating the growth of their children.
14	a contribution on the clinical pictures fluorescence angiography and histology oe essential progressive iris atrophy author s transl	A contribution on clinical images fluorescence angiography and essential histology o about apos; progressive atrophy of apos; iris translator.
14	cerebral tumours in infancy author s transl	Translation of brain tumours in children authors.
14	acute lymphoblastic leukemia and lymphoblastic lymphoma two names for one disease author s transl	Acute lymphoblastic leukemia and lymphoblastic lymphoma Two names for one author on the translative disease.
14	prognosis of prenatal varicella zoster infections in relation to their onset during pregnancy author s transl	The prognosis of prenatal infections due to varicella zoster relative to their onset during pregnancy has been established by the translator.
14	new views referred to gamma glutamyl transpeptidase author s transl	New views refer to translation of gamma glutamyl transpeptidase etapos.
14	the intraarticular fracture of the distal end of the tibia as a prognostic criterion author s transl	Intra-articular fracture of the spine, with the distal end of the tibia as a prognostic criterion.
14	classification of intracerebral hematoma lateral type on c t and its relation to the shift of the lenticulostriate arteries author s transl	Lateral classification of intracerebral hematoma on ct and its relation to the displacement of the articulated arteries at the time of translation of apos; author of the apos; lateral hematoma.
14	a contribution of the course of vitreous haemorrhage author s transl	A contribution of the apo; evolution of the apogee; glass haemorrhage translators.
14	a new case of leydigioma of the testis author s transl	This is a new case of the leydigiome of the leydigiome.
14	reoperations in cancer surgery author s transl	Re-operations in cancer surgery Translation of the authors.
14	surgery in recurrences of breast carcinoma author s transl	Surgery in case of recurrence of breast cancer; a breast carcinoma translator.
14	reoperation in bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Reoperation in bronchial carcinoma author s transl.
14	reoperation in recurrence of carcinoma of the esophagus cardia and stomach author s transl	Reactivity in the recurrence of carcinoma of the esophagus and the respiratory tract.
14	pseudarthrosis growth deformity and malpostioning after fractures in childhood author s transl	Faulty growth pseudo-arthrosis and malpostion after fractures in the apo; child translator.
14	postoperative acute renal failure author s transl	Translation of apo; author on apo; acute renal failure post-operative.
14	the prognostic evaluation of bell s palsy by combined functional diagnosis author s transl	A prognostic evaluation of bells paralysis by the author; a combined functional diagnosis translated.
14	the association scleroderma silicosis or erasmus syndrome author s transl	Lapses; translational scleroderma silicosis or erasmic syndrome association.
14	prognosis of hematopoietic dysplasia author s transl	The prognosis of hematopoietic dysplasia has been translated.
14	clinical signs and therapy of familial polyposis of the colon and recutum author s transl	Clinical signs and therapy of family colon and oral polyposes; author of translative recutum s.
14	surgical therapy of carcinoma of the colon and rectum author s transl	Surgical treatment of carcinoma of the colon and rectum.
14	carcinoma of the anus clinical signs and symptoms therapy and prognosis author s transl	Carcinoma of the clinical signs and symptoms of therapy and the translative prognosis.
14	short and long term prognosis of cardiac arrest in acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Short- and long-term prognosis of cardiac arrest in acute myocardial infarction.
14	corrected transposition of the great vessels a clinical review of 21 cases author s transl	Transposition corrected from large vessels a clinical review of 21 cases translating 21 cases.
14	precordial mapping and enzymatic analysis for estimating infarct size in man a comparative study author s transl	Pre-cordial mapping and enzymatic analysis to estimate size; infarct in humans; translations; comparative study.
14	spontaneous return of sinus rhythm in mitralic fibrillation of long duration author s transl	Spontaneous return of sinus rhythm in the mitral fibrillation of the author's long-term translation.
14	hodgkin s disease stage ivb survival for 12 years author s transl	Hodgkin's Stage IVb survival for 12 years.
14	cogans s syndrome in childhood author s transl	Grower's syndrome in childhood Author by author.
14	is there any evidence that the maternal hpl serum concentration is of prognostic value in cases of threatened abortion author s transl	There are indications that the serum concentration of maternal hpl serum has prognostic value in cases of threatened abortion?
14	multicentric chondro myxoid fibroma of bone with extraskeletal foci author s transl	Multi-centre myxoid fibroma of bone chondro with translative extraskeletal foci.
14	the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome prognosis in adults author s transl	The Landry Guillain Barr Strohl syndrome pronosis in the adult author s.
14	therapy and prognosis of obstetrical lesions of the brachial plexus author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of obstetrical lesions of the apos; author of the brachial plexus s transl.
14	male breast cancer author s transl	Apos translation; author on male breast cancer.
14	the disseminated intravascular coagulation diagnosis and therapy on a medical intensive care unit author s transl	Disseminated intravascular clotting diagnosis and therapy on a medical intensive care unit.
14	the problem of the internal mammary chain author s transl	The problem of the internal breast-chain of the apos; translations.
14	the problem of the treatment of the operable breast cancer author s transl	The problem of the treatment of l' operable author on breast cancer translated into English.
14	the tolosa hunt syndrome author s transl	L'apos translation; author of the tolosa hunting syndrome.
14	differential diagnosis of malignant and benign lymphomas of the cns author s transl	Distinctive diagnosis of malignant and benign lymphomas of the liver; author.
14	pulmonary artery end diastolic pressure recordings after myocardial infarction author s transl	Recordings of diastolic pressure of the apos; pulmonary artery after myocardial infarction.
14	gorlin goltz phakomatosis author s transl	Gorlin goltz phakomatosis author s translatosis.
14	a survey about findings and courses of 300 facial palsies a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological findings on computer author s transl	A survey of results and courses of 300 facial palsies a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological results on translations of l' computer.
14	the special position of primary lymphosarcoma of the lung author s transl	The special position of primary lymphosarcoma of the translated lung.
14	basic features of diphtheria author s transl	Basic characteristics of diphtheria translation by authors.
14	urothelial carcinoma in the prostate author s transl	Prostate urothelial carcinoma urothelial, translation by the author.
14	clinical pathology and treatment of upper urinary tract urothelial tumors a 10 year review author s transl	Clinical pathology and treatment of upper urinary tract urothelial (U.V.) tumours.
14	tomodensitometric appearances in medical cerebral haemorrhages author s transl	CT appearances in medical cerebral haemorrhages are reported.
14	generalized congenital fibromatosis a new case report author s transl	The generalized congenital fibromatosis is a new case and a case report.
14	myelomonocytic leukemia clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies of acute subacute and chronic forms author s transl	Myelomonocyte leukemia clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies of acute subacute and chronic translative forms.
14	bone tuberculosis of the bovine type after bcg vaccination author s transl	Bovine-like tuberculosis (BSE) following immunization with BCG vaccine.
14	non rheumatic carditis a diagnostic study in a period of 11 years author s transl	Cardiovascular System (CSNS): diagnostic study conducted over 11 years.
14	the mitral valve prolapse syndrome in childhood author s transl	The mitral valve prolapse syndrome in childhood author s translations.
14	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy malignant neoplasia or hyperimmune reaction author s transl	Malignant neoplastic immunoblastic adenopathy or hyperimmune reaction s translates.
14	bone marrow biopsy investigation an important prognostic factor in aplastic anaemia author s transl	Bone marrow biopsy, an important prognostic factor in the translation of apos; aplastic anemia.
14	prognosis of acute upper gastrointestinal bleeding before and after the introduction of emergency endoscopy author s transl	The prognosis of acute upper GI haemorrhage before and after apos; introduction of apos; apos endoscopy; urgency is translated by the author.
14	prognosis of occupational bronchial asthma after change of occupation and elimination of antigen author s transl	The prognosis of occupational bronchial asthma after change of profession and elimination of antigen s translations.
14	the determination of calcitonin for hospital use author s transl	The determination of calcitonin for hospital use author of l'apos; author.
14	grafting in dentistry today author s transl	Transplantation in dentistry is now the author's translation.
14	particular aspects of testicular tumor in the elderly author s transl	Some special features of the testis tumour in the elderly author translates older authors.
14	esophageal varices hemorrhage in portal hypertension author s transl	Varicular esophageal hemorrhage in the apos; translational portal hypertension.
14	a longterm rational control of the course of sarcoidosis in ambulatory practice author s transl	Long-term, rational control of the course of sarcoidosis in ambulatory practice.
14	surgical treatment of cerebral ischemia indications for surgery in carotid artery stenosis author s transl	Surgical treatment of cerebral ischemia for stenosis of the intestine; carotid artery.
14	treatment of breast cancer author s transl	Treatment of breast cancer and breast cancer.
14	changed aspects of gastric cancer author s transl	Change of name; gastric cancer aspects of the authors' translation.
14	carcinoma of the head of the pancreas diagnosis surgical indications and results author s transl	Cancer of the head of the pancreas diagnostic surgical indications and results author s s translations.
14	possibilities for operative therapy of carcinoma of the large intestine author s transl	Surgical therapies for the carcinoma of the large intestine of the apos; translator.
14	survival time and life quality after operative treatment of colonic cancer author s transl	Post-operative survival time and quality of life for the authors on colon cancer.
14	study on the surgery of malignant biliary tumors author s transl	Study of the surgery of malignant biliary tumors.
14	the prognostic value of the laser interference fringe test with cataract patients author s transl	The prognostic value of laser interference fringe test with authorized translational cataract patients.
14	research concerning the spontaneous course of 135 cases of meni re s disease critical study of operative indications author s transl	Research in the field; spontaneous evolution of 135 cases of meningeal disease critical study of the translational indications of the authors.
14	contribution to differential diagnostic validity of mmpi to prognosis of efficiency of autogeneous training author s transl	Contribution to differential diagnostic validity of mmpi to prognosis of apo s; effectiveness of autogenic author s formation.
14	breast cancer postoperative care author s transl	Translation of the breast cancer postoperative care author.
14	the dieulafoy s ulcer author s transl	Dieulafoy is the author of translations for this site.
14	long term radiological and clinical observations following surgery for tibio fibular syndesmosis after fractures of the upper ankle joint author s transl	Long-term radiological and clinical observations following surgery for fibular tibia syndesmosis after hip fractures; articulation of the upper ankle of translation of the apos; author.
14	lymphography in malignant ovarian tumours author s transl	Lymphography in malignant ovarian tumours Translation of apo; author by author.
14	contrast medium persistence in lymph nodes as a prognostic criterion in hodgkin s disease author s transl	In comparison, mean persistence in lymph nodes is a prognostic criterion in translations of Hodgkin's disease.
14	are clotting disorders a pathogenetic factor in nephrosclerosis and hypertension author s transl	Clotting disorders (CLDs) are a pathogenetic factor in nephrosclerosis and apos; hypertension.
14	immunological tests in the diagnosis and prognosis of disseminated lupus erythematosus before treatment author s transl	Immunological tests in diagnosis and prognosis of disseminated lupus erythematosus before translation of lupus; author of treatment.
14	alcoholic cardiomyopathies author s transl	Alcoholic cardiomyopathies author translations.
14	the e e g in ruptured cerebral aneurysms before operation use of carotid compression and the controlled hypotension test author s transl	Lapos; and g in brain aneurysms ruptured before surgery; use of carotid compression and the carotid artery test; controlled hypotension.
14	subacute cytosteatonecrosis of pancreatic origin surgical problem in 5 cases author s transl	Acute cytosteatonecrosis subacute d'apos; pancreatic origin Surgical problem in 5 cases.
14	surgical problems of the primary sclerosing cholangitis author s transl	Surgical problems of the apos; the first translation of cholangitis multiple sclerosis.
14	clinicopathological study of diffuse carcinoma of stomach author s transl	Clinical-psychological study of diffuse carcinoma of the oral cavity.
14	urologic aspects of retroperitoneal hematoma author s transl	Apos translation; author of urological aspects of apos; retroperitoneal hematoma.
14	varicocele spermiogram testicular biopsy plasma testosterone results of therapy author s transl	Spermiogram varicocoel testosterone biopsy plasma testosterone results from the translator therapy.
14	transurethral resection of bladder tumors indication technique and results author s transl	Procedure for the identification and translation of transurethral resection of bladder tumours.
14	bilateral intrauterine torsion of the spermatic cord case report author s transl	Intra @-@bilateral uterine Torsion; spermatic cord case report author.
14	a simple procedure to forecast the course of diseases author s transl	It's a simple procedure to predict the evolution of translator diseases.
14	the prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis on the basis of the clinical picture and the histological feature in the mediastinal lymph nodes author s transl	The prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis on the basis of the clinical presentation and the histological characteristics of the mediastinal lymph nodes is translated by the author.
14	colon carcinoma duration of anamnesis and survival time author s transl	The duration of colon carcinoma and survival time were translated by the authors.
14	malignant testicular tumours author s transl	Translation of malignant testicular tumours.
14	electron microscopic studies of lumbar sympathetic chains resected for arteritis of the lower limbs author s transl	Electron microscopy of lumbar sympathetic chains resected for apos; arteritis of the lower limbs of apos; transl.
14	is curative treatment of breast cancer necessarily connected with radical mastectomy after rotter halsted author s transl	The curative treatment of breast cancer necessarily linked to radical mastectomy after l'apos rot; weightlifting translator.
14	explorative laparotomy and splenectomy for staging hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	Exploratory Laparotomy and splenectomy to determine the stage of Hodgkin's disease in children.
14	exudative senile maculopathy clinical picture pathogenesis prognosis and therapy author s transl	Pathogenic exudative senile maculopathy clinical diagram prognosis and author therapies s transl.
14	spontaneous or idiopathic colonic perforation in the newborn author s transl	Spontaneous or idiopathic colonic perforation in the translation of l' new author-born.
14	prognostic value of the eeg in pre term and full term babies author s transl	The prognostic value of gestational diabetes mellitus; eg, preterm and term infants.
14	intravesical and intraurethral pressure studies significance for the prognosis and the treatment of children with myelomeningocele author s transl	Study of the effects of intravesical and intraurethral pressure on the prognosis and treatment of children with myelomeningocles.
14	prostate carcinoma determination of progression following high voltage therapy author s transl	Determination of prostate carcinoma progression following high-voltage prostate cancer therapy.
14	urologic symptoms in the abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome author s transl	Translated abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome urological symptoms.
14	epithelial tumors of the urinary bladder in the first twenty years of life author s transl	Epithelial tumours of the urinary bladder during the first 20 years of life of the individual.
14	hyperergic collagenoses clinical aspects differential diagnosis and therapy author s transl	Hyperergenic collagenosis clinical aspects Differential diagnosis and therapy by the author.
14	diabetes and pregnancy treatment and results author s transl	Diabetes and pregnancy treatment and translations.
14	experimental investigation on non specific foreign body sarcoma induction of al2o3 ceramic implants author s transl	Experimental implant study; non-specific foreign body sarcoma induction; al2o3 ceramic implants; translator.
14	interstitial pneumonia in children with malignancies during cytotoxic therapie clinical picture analysis of promoting factors and detailed discussion of etiology author s transl	Interstitial pneumonia in children with diabetes; malignancies during seizures; cytotoxic therapy Clinical analysis of promotion factors and detailed discussion of translation of seizures; etiology.
14	thygeson s superficial punctate keratitis author s transl	Striking, superficial therapeutics, author of the translation of l' author.
14	haematuria in children i differential diagnosis of haematuria in childhood author s transl	Hematography in children i differential diagnosis of apos; hematuria in translated children.
14	the influence of moderate intrauterine nutrition on later physical and mental development in twins author s transl	The influence of moderate intrauterine nutrition on later physical and mental development.
14	surgical management of liver trauma author s transl	The surgical management of liver injury.
14	whipple s disease a case of undiagnosed malabsorption with fatal outcome author s transl	Whipple disease - cases of undiagnosed malabsorption with fatal outcome.
14	non resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the bronchus study of the immunological status as prognosis factor and attempt at immunorestoration with b c g author s transl	Squamous cell carcinoma of the epidermis; bronchial study of the epidermis; immunologic status as prognostic factor and prognosis attempt; immunoremediation with bacteriologic translators.
14	cerebro costo mandibular syndrome three new cases author s transl	Cerebro Costo Mandibular Costo Syndrome-vascular Three new cases of translators.
14	complications and lethality after kidney grafts author s transl	Complications and lethality after translation of kidney transplant.
14	are convulsions on the fifth day of life a distinct clinical and electrophysiological entity author s transl	Seizures are the fifth day of life a distinct translative clinical and electrophysiological entity.
14	clinical course following a neonatal e e g recording reported as severely abnormal author s transl	Clinical course following a neonatal registration reported as a seriously abnormal translator.
14	hydronephrosis due to pelvi ureteric junction syndrome in the adult and child 3 reports 78 adults and 33 children representing 118 hydronephrosis author s transl	L' hydronephrosis caused by the pelvic ureteric junction syndrome in the apos; adult and l' child 3 reports 78 adults and 33 children representing 118 perpetrators; hydronephrosis.
14	controlling the course of arterial occlusive diseases in practice and prognostic aspects author s transl	Disease control; evolution of occlusive arterial diseases in practice and prognostic aspects author Translation of author.
14	radiation therapy of anal carcinome experiences in 28 cases during the years 1950 to 1975 author s transl	Radiotherapy of the anal carcinoma experiments in 28 cases during the years 1950 to 1975 translators.
14	perforating keratoplasty preconditions indications complications follow up treatment author s transl	Perforation of keratoplasty preconditions indicates complications following translation of the product.
14	statistics on 1231 patients with cancer of the larynx 1940 to 1974 author s transl	Statistics on 1,231 patients with cancer of the larynx from 1940 to 1974 Translation of the author.
14	splenectomy in idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura short and long term results author s transl	Short- and long-term splenectomy in idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
14	treatment of vulvar cancer author s transl	Treatment of vulvar cancer by the authors.
14	a scala of malignancy of the histomorphological forms of p rimary pulmonary sarcomas author s transl	A scal of malignancy of the histomorphological forms of pulmonary sarcomas author s transl.
14	hernia incarcerata in the aged author s transl	Hernia incarnata in the translation of l' author aged.
14	morbus wilson pathogenesis diagnosis therapy and course author s transl	Morbus Wilson pathogenesis diagnostic therapy and course authors translate s.
14	correlation of the cytochemical classification of acute leukemia in children with the course of their disease author s transl	The correlation between the cytochemical classification of acute leukemia in children and the progression of their disease.
14	bronchial carcinoma problems and treatment with special reference to radiotherapy author s transl	Bronchial carcinoma problems and treatment with special reference to radiation therapy.
14	a comparative clinical and pathological study on the classification and prognostic features of 57 thymomas ii prognostic features author s transl	A comparative clinical and pathological study on the classification and prognostic characteristics of 57 thymomasii prognostic characteristics.
14	eosinophilic meningitis author s transl	Translation of eosinophilic meningitis and eosinophilic meningitis.
14	radiologic diagnosis of injuries of the epiphyses in childhood author s transl	Diagnosis of lesions in the epiphysis of the epiphyseal system in children.
14	early post traumatic epilepsy in childhood significance and short term prognosis author s transl	Early post traumatic epilepsy in childhood significance and short term prognosis author s transl.
14	emg prognosis of facial palsy associated with herpes zoster oticus ramsay hunt s syndrome a longitudinal study of 11 cases author s transl	The prognosis of facial paralysis associated with herpes zoster oticus ramsay, a longitudinal study of 11 cases, was translated by the authors.
14	intraoperative measurements of prognostic value in coronary bypass surgery author s transl	Intraoperative measurements of prognostic value of coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) are provided by the author.
14	carcinoma of the penis symptomatics therapy and prognosis author s transl	Cancer of the symptomatic penis therapy and prognosis transl.
14	diagnostic laparotomy in hodgkin s disease indication management results author s transl	Diagnostic Laparotomy in the management results for indications of Hodgkin's disease was translated by the author.
14	polycystic liver report of one case and therapeutic discussion author s transl	Report of polycystic liver; one case and therapeutic discussion s translator.
14	eosinophil granuloma of bones report of 15 cases including 10 survivals with an average follow up of 4 years author s transl	Eosinophilic bone granuloma reports 15 cases including 10 survival cases with an average 4-year follow-up.
14	pancreatic reflux into wirsung s duct during peroperative biliary radiomanometry in acute and chronic pancreatitis author s transl	Pancreatic reflux into the cervical canal during surgery; intraoperative biliary radiomanometry in the apos; acute and chronic pancreatitis.
14	can one treat cases of multiple trauma in several stages author s transl	Can-treat cases of multiple trauma in several stages of the translation of l' author.
14	late ileal metastases from a skin melanoma with mainly hemorrhagic symptoms report of one case author s transl	A case for translation of a skin melanoma with mainly hemorrhagic symptoms was reported by the author of the report.
14	septic shock in the urologic patient iv monitoring and therapy author s transl	Treatment of septic shock in urological patient IV monitoring and therapy.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term i a cantamnestic reexamination of patients suffering from panhypopituitarism author s transl	Endocrine-mediated psychosyndrome (EDS) is a long-term cantamnestic reexamination of patients with panopituitarism.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term ii a catamnestic reexamination after treatment of patients suffering from cushing s syndrome author s transl	Endocrine psychosis in the long term ii a catamnestic re-examination after treatment of patients with transl Cushing syndrome.
14	dysostotic changes and the prognosis of perthes disease after operation author s transl	The author translates the dysostotic changes and prognosis of Perth's disease after the surgery.
14	the osteomyelitis of the hip in newborns and its functional treatment with extensionsreposition and hanausek retention author s transl	L' osteomyelitis of the hip in new-births and its functional treatment with extension-reposition and hanausek retention author s transl.
14	the results of radiotherapy managements in hodgkin s disease author s transl	The results of the management of Hodgkin's disease radiation are being translated.
14	left ventricular contraction reserve in coronary heart disease evaluation quantification and prognostic value author s transl	Left ventricular contraction reserve in the apos; evaluation of quantification and prognostic value of coronary artery disease.
14	first experiences with the fischer score for antepartal cardiotocograms author s transl	First experience with the translating fisherman's score for l' author of prenatal cardiotocograms.
14	prognosis and therapy of sporadic seizures author s transl	The prognosis and treatment of sporadic seizures are reported.
14	liver disease in homozygous alpha1 antitrypsin deficiency author s transl	Liver disease in adults; homozygous author; alpha1 antitrypsin deficiency transl.
14	considerations of malignant ocular tumours in children author s transl	Considerations on malignant eye tumours in children authors.
14	malignant tumours of the small intestine author s transl	Translation of malignant tumours of the intestine; author of small intestines.
14	the eeg in multiple sclerosis author s transl	Eg in multiple sclerosis in translations.
14	lactacidosis of the cerebrospinal fluid in apoplexy as indicator of prognosis author s transl	Lactacidosis of the cerebrospinal fluid in apoplexy as an indicator of translational pronosis.
14	the shy drager syndrome author s transl	Translation of the apos; author of the shy drager syndrome.
14	hemodynamic classification of acute myocardial infarction physiopathological aspects and prognostic implications considerations on 130 cases author s transl	Hemodynamic classification of the pathophysiological aspects of the disease; 130 cases of acute myocardial infarction and prognostic considerations.
14	reversible mental disturbances in craniocerebral injuries author s transl	Reversible mental disorders in craniocerebral injuries, translation from l&apos.
14	the prognostic value of the time of progression of symptoms and signs in carcinomas of the pharyngo larynx author s transl	The prognostic value of the time of progression of symptoms and signs in carcinomas of l' author of the pharyngo larynx translates.
14	coats disease early detection and early treatment author s transl	Early detection and early treatment of the disease.
14	epipleural branchiogenic cervical cyst author s transl	Translation by the authors of branchiogenic epipleural cervical cysts.
14	results of therapy in cases of tumors of the nasal cavity and paranasal sinuses in relation to different tumor classifications author s transl	Treatment outcomes for tumors of the nasal cavity and paranasal sinuses in relation to different tumour classifications Authors translate.
14	keratoplasty in complicated cases author s transl	Keratoplasty in complicated cases is the translation of the apos; author.
14	cerebral av fistula with cardiac insufficiency in newborns author s transl	Avian cerebral fistulas with heart failure in newborn avian cerebral fistulas.
14	intracranial saccular aneurysms in the first three decades of life author s transl	Saccular intracranial aneurysms during the first three decades of life of the apoE.
14	clinic and therapy of the lingual thyreoid author s transl	Language clinic and therapy; lingual thyroid translator s.
14	the cancer of the middle ear author s transl	Cancer of the Apostles; middle ear authors translate ss.
14	lymphogranulomatosis in infancy histology therapy and prognosis author s transl	Lymphogranulomatosis in early childhood histological therapy and prognosis of apos; translates.
14	diagnosis and therapy of acute penetrating myocardial injury author s transl	Diagnosis and treatment of acute penetrating myocardial lesions.
14	renal cell carcinoma in childhood case report and review of the literature author s transl	In addition to the above, there is a literature review of the literature on the subject.
14	herpes genitalis and herpes neonatorum author s transl	Herpes genitalis and herpes neonatorum s translat.
14	pathological anatomical aspects of organ preserving surgical procedures for breast carcinomas author s transl	Pathological anatomical aspects of the preservation of translatosed surgical procedures for breast carcinomas.
14	hypertension in old age author s transl	It's called hypertension in the elderly.
14	surgical treatment of gastric stump carcinoma causes of the poorer results compared with primary gastric carcinoma author s transl	Surgical treatment of gastric strain carcinoma has been delayed; results are poorer than those obtained by the lead author of the gastric carcinoma study.
14	results after resection of left ventricular aneurysm author s transl	Results after translation of left ventricular aneurysm and left ventricular aneurysm.
14	indications for rabies vaccination and prophylactic immunization in man author s transl	Indications for rabies and immunizations; prophylactic immunization in adults Translation of apo; author.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the seminoma results from radiation therapy in 100 patients author s transl	Therapy and prognosis of testicular tumours seminoma results from radiation therapy in 100 patient translator patients.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the teratocarcinoma results from 52 patients author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of testicular tumours The teratocarcinoma results from 52 patient translators.
14	generic symptoms of hodgkin s disease in relation to other prognostic criteries author s transl	Generic symptoms of Hodgkin's disease in relation to other prognostic criteria that have been translated.
14	results from radiation therapy of 68 inoperable brain tumors 1950 to 1975 author s transl	Results of radiation treatment of 68 inoperative brain tumours from 1950 to 1975 Authors' translation.
14	hodgkin s disease the value of prognostic criteria and of the combination of radiotherapy and chemotherapy in localised lymphoid stages i and ii 94 patients undergoing laparotomy author s transl	Hodgkin's disease, the value of prognostic criteria and the combination of radiotherapy and chemotherapy in the localized lymphoid stages i and ii 94 patients undergoing laparotomy.
14	systolic strangulation of the anterior interventricular artery a rare cause of myocardial ischaemia author s transl	Systolic strangulation of the anterior interventricular artery, a rare cause of the apos; myocardial ischemia.
14	diagnosis and therapy of the so called malignant external otitis author s transl	Diagnosis and treatment of self-said translator malignant external otitis media.
14	crohn s disease indication for surgery author s transl	Crohn's disease indication for surgery was translated by the authors.
14	the prognosis in primary chronic glomerulonephritis in the adult 298 clinicopathological cases author s transl	The prognosis of primary chronic glomerulonephritis in the adult 298 translational clinical case histories.
14	osteosarcoma 1978 a turning point in prognosis through adjuvant chemotherapy following adequate surgery author s transl	Osteosarcoma 1978 a turning point in prognosis by adjuvant chemotherapy following adequate translation of the apos; author on surgery.
14	prognosis of the retinal detachment in children author s transl	The prognosis of the retinal detachment in translated children.
14	clinical signs and therapy of the abdominal aortic aneurysm author s transl	Clinical signs and therapy of the apos; author of the apos; aneurysm of the apos; translational abdominal aorta.
14	results of 289 cadaver kidney transplantations at the berlin friedrichshain centre author s transl	Results of 289 cadaver kidney transplants at the Friedrichshain Berlin Center.
14	resistance testing and chemotherapy results of bronchial tumours author s transl	Resistance testing and chemotherapy results of the bronchial tumours s transl.
14	retroperitoneal non chromaffin paraganglioma of the right kidney author s transl	Retroperitoneal non-chromaffin paraganglioma of the right kidney of the deceased.
14	angio immunoblastic lymphadenopathy author s transl	L' author of a study on lymphadenopathy angio@-@ immunoblastic translated into English.
14	mammary carcinoma author s transl	Translation of the breast carcinoma author.
14	principles of radical surgery of gastric carcinoma author s transl	Principles of radical surgery of apo; author of gastric carcinoma s translations.
14	tumor surgery principles of radical treatment author s transl	The principles of radical treatment tumour surgery translation authors s s s.
14	an attempt to predict the noise induced pts beginning a long time study author s transl	An attempt to predict the noise induced pts begin a long time author of l' study translations of l' author.
14	course and prognosis of patients with myocardial infarction during 7 years observations in a cardiological clinic with an intensive care unit author s transl	The author reports the history and prognosis of patients with myocardial infarction during 7 years of observation in a cardiology clinic with an intensive care unit.
14	congenital cyst of the common hepatic duct adenocarcinoma of the gall bladder and of the stomach author s transl	Congenital cyst of the apos; common adenocarcinoma of the hepatic canal of the gallbladder and translation of the apos; stomach article.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma in children improved prognosis through aggressive multiple drug combination and irradiation author s transl	Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in children improved prognosis through aggressive combination of multiple medications and translation of the apos; radiation.
14	a prospective study on course and prognostic criteria in preleukemia author s transl	A prospective study on course and prognostic criteria in preleukemia.
14	injuries of the pelvis author r transl	Translation of the wounds of the pelvis and pelvis.
14	breast cancer in the male author s transl	Breast cancer in the elderly; male author.
14	roentgen diagnosis of necrotizing enterocolitis in the newborn author s transl	Diagnosis of the rodent; necrotizing enterocolitis in the new-native translator.
14	radiotherapy of oral cancer late results author s transl	Late translation of oral cancer radiation results.
14	causes of death in road traffic injuries a comparison between 1970 and 1976 author s transl	The causes of death in road traffic injuries: a comparison between 1970 and 1976.
14	hypothermic circulatory arrest after total blood exchange in dogs author s transl	Hypothermic circulatory arrest after total blood exchange in the dogs.
14	on the rejection reaction against corneal grafts and first trails with tissue typed and hla adapted donor material author s transl	On the rejection reaction against corneal grafts and early tracing with typed and hla tissue adapted to donor material s translations of the author.
14	liposarcoma of the soft tissues of extremities a contribution to clinical diagnosis and treatment author s transl	Liposarcoma of soft tissues of the extremities a contribution to clinical diagnosis and treatment author s s translation.
14	experiences with temporary epiphyseal stapling by blount author s transl	Experiences; temporary stapling; epiphysis by blount translator.
14	carcinoma of the apocrine glands of the vulva with intraepidermal spreading under the picture of invasive paget s disease author s transl	Cancer of the apocrine glands of the vulva with intra-epidermal spread under the epidermis; image of the Paget's invasive disease transl.
14	results of surgical treatment of benign and malignant parotid tumors author s transl	Results of surgical treatment of benign and malignant parotid tumours.
14	radiotherapeutic aspects of testicular tumours results and problems author s transl	Radiation-related effects of testicular tumours: results and problems.
14	present views of limb replantation author s transl	Present the authors' views of limb replanting.
14	ten years analysis of cancer of the female breast author s transl	A 10-year analysis of breast cancer among women authors of translated texts.
14	mycosis fungoides the practionner confronted with the nosological diagnostic and prognostic problems of epidermotrophic lymphomas author s transl	Mycosis fungoides the practitioner faced with the nosological diagnostic and prognostic problems of epidermotrophic lymphoma s transl.
14	incidence natural history and complications of chronic arterial hypertension author s transl	Impact of diabetes; natural history and complications of diabetes; translative chronic hypertension.
14	schizophrenia in childhood author s transl	Translation of schizophrenia in children authors.
14	studies on the fibrinolytic system in ruptured intracranial aneurysm part 2 fibrinogen changes in acute stage of sah as a risk factor of the ischemic complications following vasospasm author s transl	Studies on the fibrinolytic system in ruptured epos; intracranial aneurysm, part 2, fibrinogenic changes in the acute phase of sah as a risk factor for post-translational ischemic complications; author of vasospasm.
14	problems of a stage based therapeutic approach to surgery in breast carcinoma author s transl	Dapos issues; therapeutic step-by-step approach to surgery in the author's breast carcinoma translated.
14	late results of tracheal resection author s transl	Late results of tracheal resection are translated.
14	clinical experience in the diagnosis and therapy of plasmacytoma author s transl	Clinical experience in the diagnosis and treatment of the plasmacytome.
14	chemotherapy of gastrointestinal cancer author s transl	Chemotherapy for cancer of the gastro-intestinal authors translated.
14	the value of scintigraphy and osteoscintimetry for the early detection of legg calv perthes disease author s transl	The value of scintigraphy and lapos; osteoscintimetry for the early detection of calves of leg perthes the translation of lapos; author of the disease.
14	calcifying and non calcifying chronic pancreatitis a statistical study author s transl	Calcification and non-calcification of chronic pancreatitis, author of a statistical study on pancreatitis.
14	prediction test of nomifensine prescription from symptomatic pre therapeutic status author s transl	Prediction test of nomifensin prescription from onset; pre-therapeutic author s translomatic symptomatic state.
14	cerebral hemodynamics in the vegetative state patients relationship between patterns of dysautoregulation and prognosis author s transl	Cerebral hemodynamics in the apos; vegetative state patients relationship between models of self-regulation and author prognosis translates.
14	oculomotor palsy caused by aneurysms at the internal carotid posterior communicating artery junction and its prognosis following intracranial surgery author s transl	Oculomotor paralysis caused by aneurysms at the posterior internal carotid junction of the connective artery and its prognosis following an intracranial surgery.
14	csf lactate and eeg changes in comatose patients with various medical conditions author s transl	Csf lactate and eeg changes in comatose patients with various medical conditions as translated by the authors.
14	epiphysiodesis in the treatment of discrepancies in length of the lower extremities author s transl	L' epiphysiodesis in the treatment of deviations of length of the lower extremities is translated by the authors.
14	diagnosis and differential diagnosis of acute hematogenous osteomyelitis in infants author s transl	Diagnosis and differential diagnosis of acute hematogenic osteomyelitis in infants.
14	muco epidermoid tumor of the bronchus in a 8 year old girl author s transl	Mucosal epidermoid tumour of the lung and lungs of an 8-year-old girl who is a translator.
14	cutaneous periarteritis nodosa critical study about 4 cases author s transl	Critical study of periarteritis nodosa cutaneous in about 4 cases.
14	new aspects in the treatment of elderly people with carcinoma of the urinary bladder author s transl	New aspects in the treatment of elderly people with apo; bladder carcinoma of the apo; urinary translator.
14	the acute calculus cholecystitis in the elderly patients prognosis and therapy author s transl	Acute calculus cholecystitis in the elderly patients of the United States.
14	parasternal lymphoscintigraphy in mastocarcinoma its diagnostic value and significance for prognosis author s transl	Parasitic lymphoscintigraphy of mastocarcinoma has diagnostic value and significance for translation of prognosis.
14	benign solitary enchondroma author s transl	L' author d' simple and solitary enchondroma s&apos.
14	the diagnosis of bleeding small bowel tumours author s transl	Hemorrhagic diagnosis of bowel tumors; small intestine.
14	radiotherapy of the medulloblastoma development of methods and results of the treatment of 30 patients from 1963 to 1976 author s transl	Radiotherapy of the development of the medulloblastoma of the methods and results of treatment of 30 patients from 1963 to 1976.
14	is drepanocitic trait asymptomatic author s transl	This is the translation of the characteristic drepanocitic asymptomatic of the author.
14	the indications for operative revascularization of acute and chronic renal artery embolism author s transl	Guidelines for Operation Revascularization of acute and chronic renal artery embolism.
14	surgery of the mitral valve author s transl	Translation surgery of the mitral valve.
14	reye s syndrome in adults author s transl	Reye syndrome in the apos; adult author.
15	epidemiologic studies of carcinoma of the kidney ii association of renal adenoma with smoking	Epidemiological studies of renal cell carcinoma (RCC) ii association between renal adenoma and smoking.
15	early childhood brain damage and neuroses in adults	Brain damage and early childhood neurosis in adults.
15	epidemiology and etiology of clefts	The epidemiology and etiology of the cracks.
15	facial features associated with predisposition to cleft lip	Facial features associated with predisposition to cleft lip.
15	skin cancer and immunosuppression	You know, skin cancer and immunosuppression.
15	case fatality of hyperplasia of the prostate in two teaching and three regional board hospitals	Lifecycle; hyperplasia of the prostate in two hospitals; teaching and three regional hospitals of councils; administration.
15	legal abortion a critical assessment of its risks	Legal abortion; abortion; critical assessment of risks; risk assessment, risk assessment; access; legal abortion; legal abortion; assessment; absence of abortion.
15	detection of individual susceptibility toward coronary disease	The detection of individual susceptibility to coronary heart disease.
15	prevention of myocardial infarction	Prevention of myocardial infarction; myocardial infarction.
15	factors of high fetal risk in a peripheral clinic	Factors of high fetal risk in a peripheral clinic.
15	extrathoracic bypass for stenosis of innominate artery	Extrathoracic bypass for stenosis of the innominated artery.
15	surgical treatment of chronic constrictive pericarditis using cardiopulmonary bypass	Surgical treatment of apo; chronic constrictive pericarditis by cardiopulmonary bypass.
15	bladder cancer smoking beverages and artificial sweeteners	Bladder cancer smoking drinks and artificial sweeteners.
15	sequential aspects of spontaneous abortion maternal age parity and pregnancy compensation artifact	Sequential aspects of pregnancy; spontaneous abortion Gender; maternal age and pregnancy compensation artifact.
15	occult breast carcinomas detected by xeroradiography clinical considerations	Unobserved breast carcinomas detected by xeroradiography, clinical considerations.
15	treatment of myeloma comparison of melphalan chlorambucil and azathioprine	Treatment of myeloma by comparison of melphalan chlorambucil and l' azathioprin.
15	sequential therapy compared with combination therapy in multiple myeloma	Sequential treatment compared to combination therapy in multiple myeloma.
15	a reassessment of the distribution of multiple sclerosis part one	Re-evaluation of the distribution of the early multiple sclerosis.
15	evaluation of oral pharyngeal laryngeal and esophageal cancer risk in reverse smokers of chuttas	Evaluation of oral pharyngeal laryngeal and esophageal cancer risk in reverse smokers of chuttas.
15	ethical issues in family planning for hospitalized psychiatric patients	Ethical issues related to family planning for hospitalized psychiatric patients.
15	emotional problems of residents in psychiatry	Acute emotional problems of psychiatric residents.
15	classification of suicidal behaviors i quantifying intent and medical lethality	Classification of suicidal behaviours quantification of intent and medical lethality.
15	controlling the abuse of illicit methadone in washington dc	Drug abuse control; illicit methadone abuse in Washington DC.
15	the awareness of risk and personal relevance in alcoholics	The awareness of risk and personal relevance in alcoholics.
15	risk of coronary surgery two hundred consecutive patients with no hospital deaths	The risk of coronary surgery 200 consecutive patients with no deaths in the hospital.
15	carotid endarterectomy complications and preoperative assessment of risk	Complications of carotid endarterectomy and preoperative assessment of risk.
15	a simple epidemiological model for evaluating the malaria inoculation rate and the risk of infection in infants	A simple epidemiological model to assess the rate of malaria and the risk of infection in infants.
15	clinician attitudes toward the suicide attempter	Apos clinicians' attitudes toward suicide attempters.
15	changes in creatine kinase and its isoenzymes in human fetal muscle during development	Changes in creatine kinase and its isoenzymes in human fetal muscle during development.
15	routine screening for venous thrombosis by ultrasound in the elderly	Routine screening for venous thrombosis by ultrasound in the elderly population.
15	depression followed by suicide a comparison of depressed suicides with living depressives	Depression followed by suicide, a comparison of depressive and living depressive suicides.
15	idiopathic facial paralysis pregnancy and the menstrual cycle	Idiopathic facial paralysis, pregnancy and menstrual cycle disorder.
15	aortocoronary bypass in the diabetic patient	Coronary artery bypass in the diabetic patient.
15	ball valve prostheses current appraisal of late results	Ball valve prostheses current evaluation of late results.
15	carcinoembryonic antigen in patients suffering from ulcerative proctocolitis	Embryonic-carcinogen antigen in ulcerative proctocolitis patients.
15	the detection of aberrant dna synthesis in a member of a high risk cancer family	Disease detection; aberrant DNA synthesis in a member of a high-risk family of cancer.
15	a comparative clinico genetic study of attack like schizophrenia with late and early manifestation with regard to age	A comparative clinical genetic study of attacks such as schizophrenia with late and early manifestations relative to age.
15	coronary artery anatomy before and after direct revascularization surgery clinical and cinearteriographic studies in 67 selected patients	Aposal anatomy; coronary artery before and after direct revascularization surgery Cinearteriographic and clinical studies in 67 selected patients.
15	pyridoxal phosphate and hypertensive disorders of pregnancy	Pyridoxal phosphate and hypertensive disorders of the pregnancy.
15	psychiatric resident suicide an analysis of five cases	Suicide d'apos; psychiatric resident, analysis of five cases.
15	a comparative study of predictive criteria in the predisposition of homicidal adolescents	A comparative study of predictive criteria for the predisposition of adolescents to suicide.
15	protease inhibitors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	The protease inhibitors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
15	parent child relationships and psychopathological disorder in the child	Parenting-child and psychopathological disorders in the child.
15	major factors in the development of diabetes mellitus in 10 000 men	Major factors in the development of diabetes mellitus in 10,000.
15	hereditary pancreatitis nonspecificity of aminoaciduria and diagnosis of occult disease	Inherited pancreatitis of apos; aminoaciduria and diagnosis of occult disease.
15	pre natal irradiation and childhood malignancy a review of british data from the oxford survey	L' prenatal irradiation and childhood malignancy, a review of British data from the oxford survey.
15	myocardial infarction in young men study of risk factors in nine countries	Myocardial infarction in young men: study of risk factors in nine countries.
15	determinants of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in patients with intermediate levels of alpha antitrypsin	Determinants of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in patients with intermediate levels of alpha-antitrypsin.
15	myocardial infarction in young women with special reference to oral contraceptive practice	Acute myocardial infarction in young women, particularly with respect to oral contraceptive use.
15	oral contraceptives and death from myocardial infarction	Oral contraceptives and death from myocardial infarction.
15	parenteral iron in treating surgical patients and the importance of routine evaluation of serum iron binding capacity report of three cases	Parenteral iron in the treatment of surgical patients and apo; importance of apo; regular assessment of serum iron binding capacity report three cases.
15	some risk factors of ischaemic heart disease in the prague male population	Some risk factors for ischemic heart disease in the male population prague.
15	hereditary progressive atrioventricular conduction defect	Atrio-ventricular progressive hereditary conduction defect.
15	infections in cancer patients on a protected environment prophylactic antibiotic program	Infections in cancer patients as part of a prophylactic antibiotic program in a protected environment.
15	epidemiology of severe mental retardation in children community studies	Infant epidemiology; severe mental retardation in children Community studies.
15	infants home environments a comparison of high risk families and families from the general population	Family environment of infants is a comparison between high-risk families and families in the general population.
15	identification of women at risk for unwanted pregnancy	Identification of women at risk of unwanted pregnancy.
15	radioactive contamination of the environment and the possible consequences	The radioactive contamination of the environment and the possible consequences.
15	the problems of abdominal operations in elderly patients	These are the problems of abdominal surgery in elderly patients.
15	continuing evaluation of coronary care	Ongoing evaluation of coronary care.
15	the incidence of otosclerosis in the general population	Incidence of otosclerosis in the general population.
15	coronary heart disease risk factors in school children the muscatine study	Coronary heart disease risk factors in school children. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/index_e.html.
15	the interrelationship of maternal smoking and increased perinatal mortality with other risk factors further analysis of the ontario perinatal mortality study 1960 1961	The relationship between maternal smoking and increased perinatal mortality and other risk factors has been the subject of further analysis in the framework of the 1960 study on perinatal mortality.
15	general anaesthesia during early pregnancy	General anaesthesia early in pregnancy.
15	problem of the evaluation of experimental research for clinical testing of new drugs in man	Problems; evaluation of experimental research for patients; clinical trials of new drugs in patients; men.
15	evaluation of side effects	Assessment of side effects.
15	children vulnerable to psychopathology the stony brook high risk project	Children vulnerable to psychopathology the high risk rocky creek project.
15	coronary artery disease in young women	Coronary artery disease in young women.
15	hazards of cardiac pacing	Risks of cardiac stimulation.
15	tympanoplasty on only hearing ears	Tympanoplasty on hearing ears only.
15	inheritance of idiopathic nephrotic syndrome	Heredity of idiopathic nephrotic syndrome.
15	prenatal diagnosis of a neural tube defect meckel syndrome	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects; neural tube defects.
15	reserpine and breast cancer in a retirement community	Reserpine and breast cancer in a retirement community.
15	editorial oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Editorial oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction.
15	recurrent ventricular fibrillation and modes of death in survivors of out of hospital ventricular fibrillation	Recurrent ventricular fibrillation and modes of death in survivors of stroke; ventricular fibrillation outside the apo; hospital.
15	near maximal ecg stress testing and coronary artery disease risk factor analysis in los angeles city fire fighters	Stress testing and risk factor analysis for coronary heart disease near its peak in Los Angeles City Firefighters.
15	radiation safety in flights of high altitude aircraft	Safety of radiation in flight from high altitude aircraft of high altitude aircraft.
15	drug and risk perception on ninth grade students sex differences and similarities	There are differences and similarities in the perception of drugs and risk among grade nine students.
15	coronary risk factors in 287 cases of myocardial infarct treated in a coronary unit	Coronary risk factors in 287 cases of myocardial infarction treated in a coronary unit.
15	cancer incidence in the mexican american	Cancer incidence in the United States.
15	prodromata of myocardial infarction and sudden death	Protromata of myocardial infarction and sudden death.
15	monitoring for serious arrhythmias and high risk of sudden death	Surveillance for severe arrhythmias and high risk of sudden death syndrome.
15	ventricular premature beats and mortality of men with coronary heart disease	Premature ventricular beats and mortality in men with coronary artery disease.
15	ventricular premature beats in a population sample frequency and associations with coronary risk characteristics	Frequency of premature ventricular beats in a population sample and associations with coronary risk characteristics.
15	coronary revascularization in patients surviving unexpected ventricular fibrillation	Coronary revascularization in patients surviving unexpected ventricular fibrillation.
15	medical information bureau	D&apos office; medical information.
15	the role of intraaortic balloon counterpulsation in patients undergoing cardiac operations	The role of intraaortic balloon counterpulsation in patients undergoing cardiac operation.
15	the assessment of maternal nutrition	An evaluation of maternal nutrition.
15	panel 2 phase ii investigations	Panel 2 Phase II investigations ii.
15	risk indicators in childhood malignancies	Risk indicators for malignancies in children.
15	an endocrine model for the diagnosis of intrauterine growth retardation as demonstrated by the determination of total estrogen and pregnandiol 24 hour urinary excretion in 222 at risk pregnancies	Endocrine model for the diagnosis of intra-@uterine growth retardation as demonstrated by the determination of apos; total 24-hour urinary excretion of estrogen and pregnandiol in 222 high-risk pregnancies.
15	validity of clinical examination and mammography as screening tests for breast cancer	Validity of the dose; clinical examination and mammography as tests for breast cancer.
15	risk factors and age	The risk factors and age.
15	physician suicide risk practical recognition and management	The risk of physician suicide is recognized and managed.
15	evaluating suicidal risk	Suicide risk assessment.
15	prediction of sudden death in patients discharged after acute myocardial infarction	The prediction of sudden death in patients released after acute myocardial infarction.
15	coronary risk factors in a community findings in tecumseh michigan	Coronary risk factors in a community findings in tecumseh michigan.
15	elevated serum levels of estrogen and prolactin in daughters of patients with breast cancer	High serum levels of estrogen and prolactin in daughters of patients with breast cancer.
15	the relative risk of spontaneous complete atrioventricular block in elderly patients with impaired intra ventricular conduction	The relative risk of spontaneous complete atrioventricular blockade in elderly patients with impaired ventricular conduction.
15	can the oxytocin challenge test serve as the primary method for managing high risk pregnancies	The oocytocin challenge test can be used-as the primary method for managing high-risk pregnancies?
15	cystourethrography procedures in children evaluation of benefits versus dose	Dose-versus-dose-benefit assessment of cystourethrography procedures in children.
15	genetic counseling in cases of chromosome insertions	Genetic counseling in cases of chromosomal insertions.
15	estimation of radiation dosage and transmutation effect of 14 c involved in measuring rate of albumin synthesis with 14 c carbonate	Estimation of radiation dose and dose; transmutation effect of 14 c involved in measuring rate of synthesis of l' carbonate albumin 14 c.
15	abdominal wound disruption	Disturbance of abdominal injuries.
15	critical appraisal of domiciliary obstetric and neonatal practice	Critical evaluation of obstetric and neonatal practice in the home.
15	valve replacement a perspective	Replacing d' a perspective valve.
15	neonatal risk following late gestational genital herpesvirus hominis infection	Neonatal risk following late gestational genital herpesvirus hominis infection.
15	the iowa 500 suicide in mania depression and schizophrenia	L' Iowa 500 suicide in manic depression and schizophrenia.
15	observations on the epidemiology of post partum mental illness	Comment on the epidemiology of mental illness post @-@partum.
15	cerebral infarctions study of their prevention	Brain infarctions study their prevention.
15	toxicological investigations with fluorescent whitening agents	Toxicological examinations with fluorescent bleaching agents.
15	prevention of thrombo embolic complications in urology using sub cutaneous calcium heparinate author s transl	The prevention of embolic thrombo complications in urology at birth; help with translation of apos; author of apos; calcium heparin under-skin.
15	a surrogate system for informed consent	A substitution system for informed consent.
15	the incidence of myocardial infarction in hospitalized patients and the risk factors of myocardial infarction	Incidence of myocardial infarction in hospitalized patients and risk factors for myocardial infarction.
15	empirical risk of oligophrenia in siblings of proband oligophrenics in populations with high levels of inbreeding	The empirical risk of oligophrenes in oligophrenic proband siblings in populations with high levels of inbreeding.
15	risk vulnerability and enrollment in a prepaid group practice	Risk vulnerability and enrollment in a collective pre-paid practice.
15	risk factors for coronary artery disease in children of affected families	The risk factors for coronary heart disease in children in affected families.
15	the uterine cervix from adolescence to the menopause	The cervix; uterus of the apos; adolescence to menopause.
15	prediction of suicide a replication study	Prediction of suicide, prediction of replication.
15	the occupation of fishing as a risk factor in cancer of the lip	L' occupation of fishing as a risk factor in cancer of the lip.
15	oral contraceptives as related to cancer and benign lesions of the breast	Oral contraceptives related to cancer and benign lesions of the breast.
15	primary risk factors in patients with myocardial infarction	Primary risk factors in patients with myocardial infarction.
15	diagnostic x rays in late pregnancy and in the neonate	Diagnosis X rays at the end of pregnancy and at the new-born.
15	hospital acquired infections i surveillance in a university hospital	Infections acquired in hospital; hospital surveillance in a teaching hospital.
15	psychosocial factors and the risk of myocardial infarctions in white women	The risk of myocardial infarction and the risk of myocardial infarction among white women.
15	previous fetal loss and risk of sudden infant death syndrome in subsequent offspring	Anterior fetal loss and risk of sudden infant death syndrome in subsequent offspring.
15	coffee drinking and death due to coronary heart disease	Drinking coffee and dying of apo; coronary heart disease.
15	serum lipoproteins and coronary heart disease in a population study of hawaii japanese men	Lipoprotein serum and coronary heart disease in a population study of hawaii japanese men.
15	association between maternal diabetes and the respiratory distress syndrome in the newborn	The association between maternal diabetes and the respiratory distress syndrome in the new-born.
15	oral contraceptives and reduced risk of benign breast diseases	Oral contraceptives and the reduction of benign breast disease.
15	liver cell adenomas associated with use of oral contraceptives	Hepatic cell adenomas associated with apos; use of oral contraceptives.
15	thrombosis with low estrogen oral contraceptives	Thrombosis with low-dose estrogen oral contraceptives.
15	a genetic study of bipolar affective disorder	Uh, a genetic study of bipolar affective disorder.
15	breast cancer detection today an opinion	Breast cancer detection today; there is an opinion.
15	length of interbirth intervals in female psychiatric patients and controls	Length of birth intervals in female psychiatric patients and controls.
15	association of exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma	Combinations of exogenous estrogen and endometrial cell carcinomas.
15	increased risk of endometrial carcinoma among users of conjugated estrogens	Increased risk of endometrial carcinoma in users of conjugated estrogen.
15	editorial cancer risk and estrogen use in the menopause	Editorial on cancer risk and risk; menopausal estrogen use.
15	editorial risks and benefits of estrogen use	Editorial risks and benefits of estrogen use.
15	nosocomial respiratory syncytial virus infections	Nosocomial respiratory syncytial virus infections.
15	serum lipids and uric acid relationship in ischemic thrombotic cerebrovascular disease	Serum lipids and uric acid relation in ischemic thrombotic cerebrovascular disease.
15	stoke in the young a four year study 1968 to 1972	"""Stoke in the Young"", a four-year study, 1968 @-@1972."
15	portosystemic shunting in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis a good risk disease	Portosystemic shunt in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis, a high-risk disease.
15	factors predictive of perioperative myocardial infarction during coronary operations	Predictive factors of perioperative myocardial infarction during coronary operations.
15	the cardiologist s responsibility for preventing coronary heart disease	The cardiologist is responsible for preventing coronary heart disease.
15	early risks of open heart surgery for mitral valve disease	Early risks of open heart surgery for mitral valve disease.
15	subacute sclerosing panencephalitis an epidemiologic study in israel	Subacute sclerosing Panencephalitis, epidemiologic study in the israel.
15	endometrial adenocarcinoma and the polycystic ovary syndrome	It's called endometrial adenocarcinoma and polycystic ovary syndrome.
15	antirabies treatment in man in relation to epidemiological conditions nordrhein westfalen 1972	Anti-rabies treatment in l'apos; man in relation to epidemiological conditions northrhein Westfalen 1972 northrhein.
15	implications of precancerous rectal biopsy in patients with inflammatory bowel disease	Effects of precancerous rectal biopsy in patients with inflammatory bowel disease.
15	patients at high risk for low birth weight delivery	High-risk patients are at risk for low birth weight deliveries.
15	aortocoronary artery bypass present indications and risk factors	Coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) is indicated and risk factors exist.
15	gastrointestinal complications after renal transplantation predictive factors and morbidity	Gastro complications-intestinal following renal transplantation predictive factors and morbidity.
15	cardiovascular risk factors and hearing loss a study of 1 000 fifty year old men	Cardiovascular risk factors and hearing loss a study of 1,000 50-year-old men.
15	risk factors in postoperative myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction post-operative: risk factors.
15	risk factors revisited	The risk factors were reviewed.
15	infection risk in meningococcal infection the effect of the duration and closeness of the contact in transmission of the meningococcus	Risk of diabetes; meningococcal infection Effect of contact duration and proximity on the transmission of meningococcal disease.
15	the activated plasma recalcification time a measurement encompassing the activated partial thromboplastin time and platelet function with improved detection of bleeders	The time of plasma recalcification activated, a measure encompassing activated partial thromboplastin time and platelet function, with better detection of hemorrhages.
15	lung cancer and air pollution in southcentral los angeles county	Lung cancer and air pollution in downtown Los Angeles County.
15	prevalence and incidence data in the assessment of the risk of coronary heart disease	Prevalence and prevalence data; incidence in assessment of risk of coronary heart disease.
15	cancer of the colon socioeconomic variables in a community	Cancer of socioeconomic variables of the colon in a community.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases i methodology and prevalence of disease	Epidemiological study of obstructive pulmonary diseases i methodology and prevalence of the disease.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases ii effects of in migration factors on the prevalence of obstructive lung diseases	Epidemiological study of obstructive pulmonary diseases ii effects of migration factors on the prevalence of obstructive pulmonary diseases.
15	the effect of menopause on serum cholesterol in american pima indian women	The effect of menopause on serum cholesterol in American pima Indian women.
15	tuberculin sensitivity in a high risk canine population	Tuberculin sensitivity in a high risk dog population.
15	fetal monitoring its effect on the perinatal mortality and cesarean section rates and its complications	Fetal monitoring of its effect on rates of perinatal and caesarian mortality and its complications.
15	gynaecologic surgery on elderly patients	Gynecological surgery on elderly patients.
15	the heritable hyperlipoproteinemias and atherosclerosis	Hereditary hyperlipoproteins and l' atherosclerosis.
15	heritable factors in the severity of affective illness	Hereditary factors in the severity of the affective illness.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california distribution of biochemical risk factors	Epidemiological studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and California, distribution of biochemical risk factors.
15	fetal risk in hyperextension of the fetal head in breech presentation	Fetal risk in children; hyperextension of the fetal head by the seat.
15	the effect of availability and utilization of prenatal care and hospital services on infant mortality rates summary of the findings of the louisiana infant mortality study part ii	The effect of availability and utilization of prenatal care and hospital services on infant mortality rates Summary of findings from the Louisiana Infant Mortality Study, part ii.
15	oral contraceptives and thromboembolism a reassessment	Both oral contraceptives and thromboembolism are subject to re-evaluation.
15	study of coronary risk factors related to physical activity in 15 171 men	Study of coronary risk factors for physical activity in 15,171 men.
15	what is barbiturate dependence and who is at risk	Qu&apos is-what barbiturates addiction and who is at risk?
15	primary angle closure glaucoma oculometry epidemiology and genetics in a high risk population	Primary angle closure glaucoma oculometry epidemiology and genetics in a high risk population.
15	familial risk and cancer control	Family risk and cancer control.
15	rubella vaccine in postpubertal women experience in western washington state	Rubella vaccine in women post-pubertaires in west of Washington State.
15	comparative results of total detections and detection in a group of patients with high risk for tuberculosis in an urban environment	Comparative results of total detections and detections in a group of patients at high risk of tuberculosis in urban settings.
15	psychiatry morphology and behaviour genetics author s transl	Psychiatric morphology and genetics of the author's behaviour.
15	multiple sequential skin cancers the risk of skin cancer in patients with previous skin cancer	Sequential multiple skin cancer, risk of skin cancer in patients with previous skin cancer.
15	estrogen use and stroke risk in postmenopausal women	Estrogen use and stroke risk in postmenopausal women.
15	changing risks in tuberculosis	Evolution of tuberculosis risk.
15	effect of a mass screening program on the risk of cervical cancer	The effect of a mass screening program on the risk of cervical cancer.
15	chemoprophylaxis in inactive tuberculosis long term evaluation of a canadian trial	Chemoprophylaxis in apos; long-term evaluation of apos; a Canadian inactive tuberculosis trial.
15	laparoscopy in the obese patient	Laparoscopy in the obese patient.
15	a simple assessment of the risk of low birth weight to select women for nutritional intervention	Simple assessment of the risk of pregnancy; low birth weight to select women for prenatal screening; subject matter; nutritional intervention.
15	polyps and diverticulosis of large bowel in autopsy population of akita prefecture compared with miyagi high risk for colorectal cancer in japan	Large intestine polyps and diverticulosis in the Japanese prefecture autopsy population; Akita compared to the high risk of miyagi colorectal cancer in Japan.
15	age at the time of the first birth a variable with simple double or triple significance in breast cancer studies	The age at first birth is a variable that has a simple double or triple significance in breast cancer studies.
15	what is early diagnosis doing	Qu' is-what early diagnosis does?
15	what should the physician ask	What' is-what should the physician ask?
15	malignant neoplasms in the families of patients with ataxia telangiectasia	Mild neoplasms in the families of patients with telangiectatic ataxia.
15	association between juvenile onset obesity and severe adult obesity in 73 532 women	Association between childhood obesity and severe adult obesity in 73,532 women.
15	nasopharyngeal cancer in bermuda	Nasinopharyngeal cancer in Bermudas.
15	the effect of different modes of artificial ventilation and of some prophylactic means on the incidence of postoperative deep vein thrombosis	The effect of different modes of artificial ventilation and certain prophylactic means on the joints; incidence of deep, venous thrombosis postoperative.
15	effects of medicare on hospital use a disease specific study	The effects of medicare on hospital outcomes are studied in the context of a disease-specific study.
15	anatomical site and size of 222 early asymptomatic oral squamous cell carcinomas a continuing prospective study of oral cancer ii	Anatomical site and size of 222 early asymptomatic squamous cell carcinomas; prospective ongoing study of oral cancer ii.
15	risk for breast cancer development determined by mammographic parenchymal pattern	Risk of breast cancer as determined by mammographic parenchyma profile.
15	ventricular arrhythmias during unstable angina pectoris	Acute ventricular arrhythmia during apos; unstable angina.
15	treadmill exercise testing of mass screening for coronary risk factors	Mass treadmill screening for coronary risk factors.
15	studies of tuberculosis in man in relation to infection in cattle	Tuberculosis studies in rabies; men in relation to infection in cattle.
15	the risk of tuberculous infection in sweden	Risk of infection; TB infection in sweden women.
15	tetralogy of fallot risk factors associated with complete repair	Fallot risk factors associated with complete repair are metrology.
15	lung cancer following exposure to chloromethyl methyl ether an epidemiological study	Lung cancer following exposure to chloromethyl methyl ether, an epidemiological study.
15	editorial considerations of risks versus benefits	Editorial considerations of risks versus benefits.
15	atherosclerosis of the internal mammary artery	Atherosclerosis of the internal breast artery.
15	influence of rejection on graft survival after renal transplantation	L' influence of rejection on graft survival after renal transplantation.
15	some possible childhood indicators of adult schizophrenia inferred from children of schizophrenics	Some possible childhood indicators of adult schizophrenia were inferred from children of schizophrenics.
15	use of creatine kinase for detecting severe x linked muscular dystrophy carriers	Use of creatine kinase for detection of apos carriers; severe x-related muscular dystrophy.
15	chronic pulmonary heart disease and its risk factors among a worker population in teheran	Chronic lung disease and its risk factors in a population of Tehran workers.
15	an unusual occurrence of multiple sclerosis in a small rural community	An unusual manifestation of multiple sclerosis in a small rural community.
15	comparison of rehospitalized and nonrehospitalized psychiatric patients on community adjustment self assessment guide	Comparison of rehospitalized and non-rehospitalized psychiatric patients according to D&apos guide; self-assessment; community adaptation.
15	surveillance and monitoring of cardiovascular disease assessment of trends	Cardiovascular disease surveillance and control Trend assessment.
15	clinical review of 106 consecutive carotid endarterectomies	A clinical review of 106 consecutive carotid endarterectomies.
15	recent trends in breast cancer incidence and mortality in relation to changes in possible risk factors	Recent trends in breast cancer incidence and mortality rates; changes in potential risk factors.
15	workshop on late effects of irradiation to the head and neck in infancy and childhood	Workshop on the late effects of the disease; radiation to the head and neck in infancy and childhood.
15	excess occurrence of cancer of the oral cavity lung and bladder following cancer of the cervix	Cancer of the oral cavity due to cancer of the oral cavity; cancer of the cervix; uterus.
15	principles of organization of an obstetrical unit from scratch	The principles are: organization of an obstetrics unit from scratch.
15	long term treatment with beta blockers after myocardial infarction	Long-term treatment with beta- @-@-blockers after myocardial infarction.
15	acoustic neuroma in von recklinghausen s disease	Acoustic neuroma in recklinghausen s disease.
15	the oxytocin challenge test	The oxytocin challenge test.
15	early proliferative changes in intestinal cells	Early proliferative changes in intestinal cells.
15	effects of physical training on mood	The effects of the effects of exercise; physical activity and elapse; training on elapse; training and elapse; physical activity on elapse; mood of elapse; mood of elapse; spirit and elapse; enter, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse, elapse.
15	comparative studies on dysplasia of esophageal epithelium in four prefectures of japan miyagi nara wakayama and aomori with reference to risk of carcinoma	Comparative studies of esophageal epithelium in four prefectures of Japan (miyagi nara wakayama and aomori) in relation to carcinoma risk.
15	dependence of immediate hypersensitivity on the month of birth	L' immediate hypersensitivity depends on the month of birth.
15	radiation hazards from 241am sources used in thyroid studies	Radiation risks from sources 241am used in thyroid studies.
15	evaluation of the hazard of surgical intervention at the height of gastroduodenal hemorrhage	Risk assessment; surgical intervention at the highest dose level; gastroduodenal hemorrhage.
15	oral contraceptive patient information a questionnaire study of attitudes knowledge and preferred information sources	Patient information on oral contraceptives, a questionnaire study of attitudes, knowledge and sources of information; preferred information.
15	a longitudinal psychophysiological study of three year old mauritian children preliminary report	A preliminary report was prepared on a longitudinal psychophysiological study of three-year-old Mauritian children.
15	results of epidemiologicalm mineralogical and cytotoxicological studies on the pathogenicity of coal mine custs	Results; epidemiological mineralogical and cytotoxicological studies on the pathogenicity of coal mine crusts.
15	cardiovascular risk and use of estrogens or estrogen progestagen combinations stanford three community study	Cardiovascular risk and use of estrogen or progestin combinations of estrogen and estrogen Stanford Community Study 3.
15	alcoholism hopelessness and suicidal behavior	Alcoholism, hopelessness and suicidal behavior.
15	a procedure for management of acquired tracheoesophageal fistula in ventilator patients	A procedure for the treatment of tracheal fistulas-esophageal acquired in ventilator patients.
15	etiology incidence and prognosis of renal failure following cardiac operations results of a prospective analysis of 500 consecutive patients	Acute etiologic effects and prognosis of stroke; renal failure following cardiac surgery; a prospective analysis of 500 consecutive patients.
15	preoperative or postoperative deep vein thrombosis	Preoperative or postoperative deep vein thrombosis.
15	hashimoto s thyroiditis and breast cancer	Hashimoto gets thyroiditis and breast cancer.
15	how general practitioners assess risks in using new drugs	How general practitioners assess risks associated with use of new drugs.
15	myocardial infarction in the familial forms of hypertriglyceridemia	Acute myocardial infarction in familial forms of hypertriglyceridemia.
15	violence television and the health of american youth	Violence on television and the health of young Americans.
15	multiple sclerosis and childhood infections	Uh, multiple sclerosis and childhood infections.
15	tricuspid atresia results of treatment in 160 children	Tricuspid atresia as a result of treatment in 160 children.
15	the yugoslavia cardiovascular disease study ii factors in the incidence of coronary heart disease	Lapses; Cardiovascular Disease Study in Yugoslavia ii factors in the incidence of coronary heart disease.
15	life events and subsequent illness	Life events and subsequent diseases.
15	mental retardation in a national population of young men in the netherlands ii prevalence of mild mental retardation	L' mental retardation in a national population of young men in the Netherlands; mild mental retardation.
15	vaccine associated poliomyelitis in the united states 1961 1972	Vaccination associated with poliomyelitis in the states.
15	physical therapy in rehabilitation after myocardial infarction author s transl	Physiotherapy in rehabilitation after myocardial infarction Translation of apo; author.
15	estrogens and endometrial cancer in a retirement community	Estrogen and endometrial cancer in a pensioner community.
15	oral prostaglandin e2 for labor induction in high risk pregnancy	The use of oral prostaglandin e2 for pregnancy; induction of labour during high-risk pregnancies.
15	an evaluation of the ifa gc procedure in a low risk population	Evaluation of the ifa gc procedure in a low risk population.
15	anesthetic practice and pregnancy controlled survey of male anaesthetists in the united kingdom	The practice of anaesthesia and pregnancy control investigates male anaesthetists in the united kingdom.
15	twins with academic learning problems antecedent characteristics	Twins with learning problems have a distinctive history.
15	the risk and accuracy of pancreatic biopsy	The risk and accuracy of pancreatic biopsy.
15	the increase in working years due to elimination of cancer as a cause of death	Increased number of years of work due to illness; elimination of cancer as a cause of death.
15	plasma prolactin and its relationship to risk factors in human breast cancer	Prolactin and its relationship to risk factors for human breast cancer.
15	the variation of recurrence risks with penetrance for isolated cases of autosomal dominant conditions	The variation of recurrence risks with penetrance in isolated cases of autosomal dominant conditions.
15	prolonged ultraviolet light induced erythema and the cutaneous carcinoma phenotype	Prolonged ultraviolet light induced erythema and the phenotype of skin carcinoma.
15	ototoxicity of tobramycin a clinical overview	Ototoxicity of tobramycin a clinical overview.
15	operative and nonoperative risks in the cardiac patient	Operating and non-operating risks in the cardiac patient.
15	does anaemia increase the risks to the fetus caused by smoking in pregnancy	L' anaemia increases-t-does it increase the risks to the fetus caused by smoking during pregnancy?
15	genital cytologic abnormalities in patients having therapeutic abortion	Genital cytological abnormalities in patients undergoing therapeutic abortions.
15	viral infections that affect the fetus	Viral infections that affect the fetus.
15	antiarrhythmic drugs for ischemic heart disease	Antiarrhythmic medications for ischemic heart disease.
15	evaluation of suicide risk in adolescents	Assessment of the risk of suicide in adolescents.
15	how is the acceptability of risks to the health of the workers to be determined	How to determine the acceptability of risks to the health of workers?
15	observation on the familial appearance of diseases associated with metabolic disorders of the mother	Comment on apo; familial onset of diseases associated with metabolic disorders of the mother.
15	incidence predisposing factors and outcome of pharyngocutaneous fistulas complicating head and neck cancer surgery	Predisposing factors; pharyngocutary fistular incidence and outcomes that complicate head and neck cancer surgery.
15	maternal anticonvulsants and perinatal risk	Maternal anticonvulsants and perinatal risk.
15	parental smoking its effects on fetus and child health	Parents' smoking affects the health of the fetus and children.
15	experience with surgical salvage in pulmonary tuberculosis application to general thoracic surgery	Experience in surgical recovery in the application of pulmonary tuberculosis to general thoracic surgery.
15	renal biopsy in pregnancy induced hypertension	Renal biopsy during pregnancy induced hypertension.
15	incidence of hyperuricemia and gout in coronary insufficiency from angina pectoris to myocardial infarct	Incidence of apos; hyperuricemia and gout in apos; coronary heart failure; angina at apos; myocardial infarction.
15	long term study of the risk factors in atherosclerosis	Long-term study of the risk factors for apos; atherosclerosis.
15	long term toxicity of antischistosomal drugs summary and perspectives	Synthesis and prospects for the long-term toxicity of anti-schistosomal drugs.
15	coronary heart disease and its risk factors in a group of 5 000 middle aged men in urban environment	Average age in urban areas: coronary heart disease and its risk factors in a group of 5,000 men.
15	temporal lobe surgery around the world results complications and mortality	Temporal lobe surgery around the world leads to complications and death.
15	suicide by persons with and without psychiatric contacts	Suicide by persons with and without psychiatric contact.
15	self destructive consequences of sex role socialization	Destructive-auto consequences of socialization of gender roles.
15	oestrogen profiles of parous and nulliparous women	Estrogenic profiles of parent and nulliparous women.
15	practical prenatal care i initial prenatal care	Practical prenatal care i prenatal first aid.
15	epidemiological research on cancer risk by aldol and aliphatic aldehydes	Epidemiological research on cancer risk associated with aldose and aliphatic aldehydes.
15	screening for risks of cardiovascular disease in children a preliminary report	Screening for cardiovascular disease in children: a preliminary report.
15	14 the patient classification for long term care developed by four research groups in the united states	The patient classification for long-term care developed by four research groups in the U.S. states.
15	evidence for hyperoestrogenaemia as a risk factor for myocardial infarction in men	Evidence of hyperestrogenemia as a risk factor for myocardial infarction in men.
15	the risk of pelvic inflammatory disease in women using intrauterine contraceptive devices as compared to non users	The risk of pelvic inflammatory disease in women using intra-uterine contraceptives compared to women who do not use these contraceptives.
15	injuries to research subjects a survey of investigators	Injuries to research subjects a survey of investigators.
15	predictors of epilepsy in children who have experienced febrile seizures	Predictors of epilepsy in children who have had febrile seizures.
15	self poisoning with follow up considerations	Auto-poisoning with considerations of follow-up.
15	hopelessness an indicator of suicidal risk	Desperation is an indicator of suicide.
15	risks of mortality of suicide attempters compared with psychiatric and general populations	Risks of mortality among suicide attempters compared to psychiatric and general populations.
15	suicide behavior community attitudes and beliefs	Suicidal behaviour Community attitudes and beliefs.
15	multivariate prediction of coronary heart disease during 8 5 year follow up in the western collaborative group study	Multi-variate prediction of coronary heart disease during 8-5 years of follow-up as part of the follow-up study in collaboration with a group of physicians.
15	a high risk pregnancy management protocol	A high-risk pregnancy management protocol.
15	a physiologic model of the dehydroepiandrosterone to estrogen conversion system in the fetoplacental unit ii preliminary clinical application the dehydroepiandrosterone loading test	Physiological model of the dehydroepiandrosterone to estrogen conversion system in the apos; foetoplacental unit ii Preliminary clinical application of the dehydroepiandrosterone load test.
15	circulation and anesthesia	Uh, circulation and anesthesia.
15	experience with sephadex gel filtration in assessing the risk of bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice	Experiment with sephadex gel filtration in vitro; risk assessment; bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice.
15	menopausal estrogens and breast cancer	Menopausal estrogens and breast cancer.
15	damage risk an evaluation of the effects of exposure to 85 versus 90 dba of noise	Risk of Damage An evaluation of the effects of exposure to 85 to 90 dBA of noise.
15	cancer in the offspring of fathers in hydrocarbon related occupations	Cervical cancer in the offspring of fathers working in hydrocarbon-related occupations.
15	risk factors for myocardial infarction in young women	Risk factors for myocardial infarction in young women.
15	familial colon cancer	Uh, familial colon cancer.
15	late effects of therapeutic irradiation on the skeleton and bone marrow	Late effects of the apo; therapeutic irradiation on the skeleton and bone marrow.
15	decreased risk of radiation associated second malignant neoplasms in actinomycin d treated patients	Reduced risk of radiation-associated secondary malignant neoplasms in patients treated with actinomycin d.
15	bacillus calmette gu rin vaccination and cancer prevention a critical review of the human experience	Bacillus calmates guin vaccination and cancer prevention a critical review of the human experience.
15	current epidemiological evidence for transmission of hodgkin s disease	Current epidemiological evidence for the transmission of Hodgkin's disease infection.
15	a pediatric screening examination for psychosocial problems	A pediatric screening examination for psychosocial problems.
15	oral contraceptive use in older women and fatal myocardial infarction	Use of oral contraceptives in elderly women and fatal myocardial infarction.
15	principles in selection of therapy	Guidelines for the selection and use of therapies.
15	risk estimates for chronic bronchitis in smokers a study of male female differences	Risk estimates for chronic bronchitis among smokers; study of differences between men and women.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects i problems and pitfalls analysis of 2495 cases using the alpha fetoprotein assay	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects and problems; trapping analysis of 2,495 cases at baseline; fetoprotein alpha test aid.
15	the addition of mammography to breast carcinoma screening in a general gynecology practice one year s experience	L' addition of mammography to breast cancer screening in a general gynaecological practice one year; experience.
15	the incidence of bacteremia in pediatric patients following tooth extraction	Labs; incidence of bacteremia in pediatric patients after tooth removal.
15	recurrence risks in children having one parent with a congenital heart disease	Recurrence risks in children whose parents have heart disease; a congenital heart condition.
15	polygenic inheritance of otosclerosis	The polygenic inheritance of the apos; otosclerosis.
15	genetic factors in breast cancer identification of a high risk group by means of dermatoglyphic investigation	Genetic factors in the identification of breast cancer; a high-risk group by means of a dermatoglyphic investigation.
15	the risk of heart disease in various psychiatric diseases	Risk of heart disease in various psychiatric illnesses.
15	smoking and other risk factors for coronary heart disease in british civil servants	Smoking and smoking are other risk factors for coronary heart disease in UK government.
15	population cancer screening	A population-based cancer screening survey.
15	hazards in the operative treatment of ductus botallo author s transl	Risks in the operative treatment of botallo de lidos; translative author.
15	risk factors associated with nasopharyngeal carcinoma	Risk factors associated with nasopharyngeal carcinoma.
15	the intrauterine device and deaths from spontaneous abortion	Intra<-> uterine device and deaths due to miscarriage.
15	cigarette smoking and atherosclerosis in autopsied men	Cigarette smoking and atherosclerosis in autopsied men.
15	chemical carcinogens in the human environment problems and quantitative aspects	The chemical carcinogens in the human environment and the quantitative aspects.
15	evaluation of environmental carcinogens for cancer in man	Evaluation of environmental carcinogens of cancer in humans.
15	some examples of dose response studies in chemical carcinogenesis	Some examples of dose studies-response on chemical carcinogenesis.
15	myocardial infarction in car assembly workers	Uh, myocardial infarction in car assemblers.
15	relationship of passive cigarette smoking to sudden infant death syndrome	The relationship between second-hand smoke and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) in Canada.
15	antenatal identification of women at high risk of spontaneous pre term birth	Prenatal identification of women at high risk of preterm, spontaneous birth.
15	the natural history of coronary artery stenosis a longitudinal angiographic assessment	The natural history of coronary artery stenosis is a longitudinal angiographic evaluation.
15	breast cancer screening benefit and risk for the first annual screening	The benefits and risks of breast screening for the first annual screening are outlined below.
15	who chooses prepaid medical care survey results from two marketings of three new prepayment plans	Who selects results; survey on paid medical care; advance from two marketing rounds of three new prepayment plans?
15	imminent shock a useful diagnosis in drug pathology	Imminent shock, a useful diagnosis in drug pathology.
15	the epidemiology of self reported drug misuse in the united kingdom	L' epidemiology of drug abuse; self-reported drug abuse in the UK.
15	splenectomy in childhood a review in england and wales 1960 4	Splenectomy in childhood in England and Wales, 1960 4.
15	cardiovascular birth defects and antenatal exposure to female sex hormones	Cardiovascular birth defects and prenatal exposure to female sex hormones.
15	alcoholism as blaming the alcoholic	The alcoholism as a means of condemning the alcoholic.
15	deep venous thrombosis of the legs after strokes part i incidence and predisposing factors	Severe vein thrombosis of the legs after stroke Part i incidence and predisposing factors.
15	coronary heart disease and risk factors in some special type collectivities	Myocardial infarction and risk factors in some special communities.
15	ischemic colitis incidence following abdominal aortic reconstruction a prospective study	A prospective study of the incidence of ischemic colitis following reconstruction of the abdominal aorta.
15	cardiac surgery in geriatric patients	This is cardiac surgery in geriatric patients.
15	central nervous system damage as a possible component of unexpected deaths in infancy	L' central nervous system damage could be an unintended cause of death in infants.
15	valve replacement by ball prosthesis study of risk factors	Replacement valves by balloon prosthesis study of risk factors.
15	nutrition and disease	They're nutrition and disease.
15	assessment of the findings of fibrogastroscopy with gastrobiopsy and determination of hexokinase activity in the serum and gastric juice of stomach ulcer patients	Evaluation of the results of the fibrogastroscopy with gastrobiopsy and determination of apos; activity of the apos; hexokinase in the serum and gastric juice of patients with apos; ulcer of apos; stomach.
15	clinical manifestations of polyposis and polyps of the large intestine and risk groups	Clinical manifestations of polyposis and polyps of the large intestine and at-risk groups.
15	tobacco and tobacco smoke	Uh, tobacco and tobacco smoke.
15	continuous vowel discrimination in normal and at risk infants	Continued vowel discrimination in normal and at-risk infants.
15	a multivariate study of the effects of high risk factors on performance on the brazelton neonatal assessment scale	A multivariate study of the effects of high risk factors on performance on the Brazelton neonatal scale.
15	high school football injuries prevention of injury to the central nervous system	Prevention of high school football injuries to the central nervous system.
15	shigellosis transmitted by nurses	Shigellosis, transmitted by nurses.
15	hodgkin s disease in siblings	Acute Hodgkin's disease in siblings.
15	an estimation of somatic hazards to the united states population from dental radiography	Dental X-ray estimation of somatic risks to the population of states-United.
15	problems in extrapolating toxicity data for laboratory animals to man	Problems; extrapolation of toxicity data for laboratory animals to human toxicity.
15	assessment of environmental carcinogen risks in terms of life shortening	Assessment of carcinogenic risks to the environment in terms of life shortening.
15	preliminary report of the lung cancer detection program in new york	Preliminary report from the lung cancer detection program in New York.
15	chronic myelogenous leukemia management of splenectomy in a high risk population	Chronic myelogenous leukemia management of splenectomy in a high-risk population.
15	buffering capacity of the smoke of different tobaccos in relation to lung cancer risks	Tobacco smoke buffering capacity of different tobacco products relative to lung cancer risks.
15	value of routine estimation of erythrocyte sedimentation rate in surgical patients	Routine estimate of erythrocyte sedimentation rate in surgical patients.
15	amputations for arteritis criteria of choice of the level of the amputation	Amputations for arteritis criteria for choosing the level of the apos; amputation of the apos; amputation.
15	the reproductive counseling process comments based on experience	The reproductive counseling process comments based on experience.
15	renal stones and coronary heart disease	Uh, renal anemia and coronary artery disease.
15	angiographic findings in asymptomatic aircrewmen with electrocardiographic abnormalities	Acute EKG abnormalities in asymptomatic members of aircrew.
15	a study of the relationship between goodwin s high risk score and fetal outcome	Study of the relationship between Goodwin's high-risk rating and fetal outcomes.
15	some social and medical correlates of pregnancy outcome	Some social and medical correlates of pregnancy outcome.
15	incest children at risk	The children at risk of incest.
15	complications of lymphangiography in patients of advanced age	Diagnosis of lymphangiography in the United States.
15	myelodysplasia the natural history of kyphosis and scoliosis a preliminary report	Myelodysplasia, l' the natural history of kyphosis and scoliosis a preliminary report.
15	stomach cancer in japan	Lapos cancer; stomach in Japan.
15	a general cardiovascular risk profile the framingham study	In the Framingham study, a general cardiovascular risk profile was established.
15	present status of coronary artery surgery	The current status of coronary surgery.
15	radiation cancer safety standards and current levels of exposure	Radiation-related cancer safety standards and current levels of radiation exposure.
15	epidemiological aspects in carcinogenic risk evaluation arising from pollution	Epidemiological aspects; carcinogenic risk assessment from pollution.
15	geographic patterns of lung cancer industrial correlations	Geographic patterns of lung cancer industrial correlations.
15	place and time aspects of the occurrence of down s syndrome	Issues related to the location and timing of the disease; occurrence of Down syndrome.
15	short pregnancy interval low birthweight and the sudden infant death syndrome	Pregnancy interval low birth weight and the sudden infant death syndrome.
15	assessment of intrauterine growth retardation by diagnostic ultrasound	Evaluation of intra-@uterine growth retardation by diagnostic ultrasound.
15	cryptorchidism hernia and cancer of the testis	Cryptorchidic Hernia and cancer of the testicles.
15	hyaline membrane disease in twins a 7 year review with a study on zygosity	A 7-year review with a study on the zygosity of the hyaline membrane in twins.
15	circulating maternal serum progesterone in high risk pregnancies	Circulating maternal serum progesterone in high-risk pregnancies.
15	gonadal radiation dose and its genetic significance in radioiodine therapy of hyperthyroidism	The dose of gonadal radiation and its genetic significance in hyperthyroidism.
15	carbohydrate homeostasis in chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis increased incidence of diabetes mellitus	Lupus; carbohydrate homeostasis in chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis increased; incidence of diabetes mellitus.
15	bcg vaccination and epidemiological situation a decision making approach to the use of bcg	FMD vaccination and the epidemiological situation is a decision-making approach to the use of FMD.
15	prophylactic central nervous system therapy in childhood acute lymphatic leukemia effect of poor risk patients on the results	The effect of acute lymphatic leukemia in children of low-risk patients on the outcomes of central nervous system prophylaxis.
15	familial polyposis	Uh, family polio.
15	colorectal polyps and carcinoma in southern iran	Carcinoma and colorectal polyps in southern Iran.
15	medical versus surgical treatment of unstable angina	Medical versus surgical treatment of apos; unstable angina.
15	effect of a high beef diet on the fecal bacterial flora of humans	Effect of a high beef diet on the faecal bacterial flora of humans.
15	fear appeals and attitude change effects of a threat s noxiousness probability of occurrence and the efficacy of coping responses	Effects of fear and change; attitude related to the probability of harm; a threat and vulnerability; effectiveness of measures; adaptation.
15	prevention of venous thromboembolism in surgical patients by low dose heparin prepared by the council on thrombosis of the american heart association	Prevention of venous thromboembolism in surgical patients by low dose heparin prepared by the Thrombosis of Apos Council; American Heart Association.
15	the course of pregnancy in patients with artificial heart valves	Progression of pregnancy in patients with artificial heart valves.
15	why do women liver longer than men	The why why why the liver of the woman, the liver of the goose; winter of the goose; gap between men, l' rear.
15	health patterns associated with type a behavior a managerial population	Health patterns associated with the typology of behaviour a population of managers.
15	sudden death	Uh, sudden death.
15	intestinal bypass operation as a treatment for obesity	An intestinal bypass graft (BBG) procedure to treat obesity.
15	changes in the benefit of immunization	Changes in the benefits of immunization.
15	comparative histologic study of adenomas of the large intestine in japan and england with special reference to malignant potential	Comparative histological study of adenomas of the large intestine in Japan and England with particular reference to malignant potential.
15	risk factors in juveniles indications of cardiovascular risk in higher grade school children of cologne	Risk Factors in the Youth Population Cardiovascular risk factors in children of l'apos; upper primary school receiving l'apos; cologne.
15	ototoxicity of amikacin	Apos; ototoxicity of amikacin.
15	recurrence risks for retinoblastoma a model for autosomal dominant disorders with complex inheritance	Retinoblastoma recurrence risks, a pattern of dominant autosomal disorders with complex inheritance.
15	screening high risk populations a challenge to primary medical care	Screening of high-risk populations is a primary medical care challenge.
15	demographic data and mental health planning	Demographic data and mental health planning.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects.
15	clinical decision analysis the hazard of using additional data	Clinical decision analysis the hazard of using additional data.
15	midtrimester amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis safety and accuracy	Mid-term amniocentesis for safety and accuracy of prenatal diagnosis.
15	detecting early colon cancer	Colon cancer early detection.
15	high risk factors for childhood asthma	High risk factors for childhood asthma.
15	some social and medical characteristics of army men with testicular cancer	Certain social and medical characteristics of members with testicular cancer.
15	the risk of meningitis among classroom contacts during an epidemic of meningococcal disease	The risk of meningitis among school contacts during an epidemic of meningococcal disease.
15	estimating the risks for offspring of first cousin matings an approach	Estimating the risks to offspring of first cousin mating is one approach.
15	amniocentesis for antenatal diagnosis review of problems and outcomes in a large series	Amniocentesis for apo; prenatal diagnostic examination of problems and results; extensive testing.
15	the individual at high risk for endometrial carcinoma	The person at high risk for endometrial cancer.
15	cancer risk in diethylstilbestrol exposed offspring	Cancer risk in offspring exposed to diethylstilbestrol.
15	rauwolfia derivatives and breast cancer	Rauwolfia derivatives and breast cancer.
15	methodological issues underlying multiple decrement life table analysis	Methodological issues-jacentes at l' multiple-decrement life table analysis.
15	subjective multivariable analysis bu computer for evaluation of coronary artery bypass	Multi-variable computer-based subjective analysis for apos; assessment of coronary artery derivation.
15	operative risk in patients with previous coronary artery bypass	Operating risk in patients previously undergoing coronary artery bypass graft.
15	various risk factors in the precipitaiton of complications caused by anesthetics and muscle relaxants	Various risk factors in the precipitate of complications caused by anesthetics and muscle relaxants.
15	high risk factors in anesthesiology and methods of detection	High risk factors in anesthesiology and methods of detection.
15	menopause and risk of cardiovascular disease the framingham study	Framingham study of menopause and risk of cardiovascular disease.
15	risk of congenital abnormality after inadvertent rubella vaccination of pregnant women	Risk of diabetes; birth defect after rubella vaccination of pregnant women.
15	hepatic angiosarcomas in dogs an excessive frequency as compared with man	Hepatic angiosarcomas in dogs at an excessive frequency compared to men.
15	fluoridated drinking water and the occurrence of cancer	You know, fluoridated drinking water and cancer cases.
15	mantel haenszel analysis of oxford data ii independent effects of fetal irradiation subfactors	Mantel haenszel analysis of oxford data ii independent effects of fetal irradiation under-factors.
15	gastric cancer in colombia i cancer risk and suspect environmental agents	Gastric cancer in Colombia i risks cancer and suspects environmental agents.
15	occupation and hodgkin s disease	Uh, occupation and Hodgkin's disease.
15	ocular alkali burns in a large urban area	Ocular burns; alkali in a large urban area.
15	the observation and analysis of cancer deaths among classified radiation workers	L' observation and monitoring; and analysis of cancer deaths among radiation-classified workers.
15	inidications for multivalve prostheses	Insertions for multivalve dentures.
15	substrate mobilization a new hypothesis for the aetiology of the idiopathic respiratory distress syndrome	This is a new hypothesis for the etiology of the idiopathic respiratory distress syndrome.
15	the macandrew alcoholism scale as a general measure of substance misuse	L'apos; scale d'apos; alcoholism of macanders as a general measure of substance abuse.
15	family history as a predictor of alcoholism in u s navy personnel	Family history as a predictor of alcohol dependence among U.S. Navy personnel.
15	recognition and operative management of patients with arteriosclerotic coronary artery aneurysms	Recognition and operative management of patients with apo; arteriosclerotic aneurysms of the coronary artery.
15	combined valvular and coronary artery surgery	Uh, valvular and coronary surgery combined.
15	comparison of patients with coronary artery or valve disease intraoperative differences in blood volume and observations of vasomotor response	A comparison of patients with intraoperative differences in blood volume and observations of vasomotor response to coronary artery or valvular disease.
15	myocardial infarction comparative study of principal risk factors in the two sexes	Myocardial infarction: comparative study of major risk factors in both sexes.
15	discussion of genetics and mental health	Discussion on genetics and mental health issues.
15	genetic counseling for congenital heart disease	Genetic counseling for congenital heart disease.
15	the coronary prone behavior pattern and the suppression of fatigue on a treadmill test	The pattern of coronary behaviour and the suppression of fatigue during a treadmill test.
15	maximum acid output and risk of peptic ulcer	Maximum dosage, acid and risk of gastroduodenal ulcer.
15	coronary risk factors and socioeconomic status the oslo study	Coronary risk factors and socioeconomic status of adults; Oslo study.
15	the swine influenza decision	The decision on the swine flu.
15	septicemia and meningitis in children splenectomized for hodgkin s disease	Septicaemia and meningitis in children splenectomized for Hodgkin's disease.
15	an assay for selecting high risk population for gastric cancer by studying environmental factors	Screening test of high risk population for cancer of the intestines; stomach by intestines; environmental factors study.
15	mass screening in the diagnosis of precancerous diseases of the stomach	Mass screening in the diagnosis of pre-cancerous disease of the stomach.
15	surgical versus medical treatment of coronary artery disease long term survival	Surgical or medical treatment of coronary artery disease, long-term survival.
15	medical fitness for sports with particular reference to cardiovascular conditions	Medical fitness for sports with a reference to cardiovascular conditions.
15	health risks of various sports	Health risks of various sports.
15	a study of occupational stressor and the incidence of disease risk	A study of workplace stress and the incidence of disease risk.
15	cancer mortality and saccharin consumption in diabetics	Cancer mortality and saccharin consumption in diabetics.
15	the risk of birth defects jacobs v theimer and parents right to know	The risk of birth defects Jacobs v Theimer and parents have the right to know.
15	the case for a more aggressive approach to staghorn stones	Arguments in favour of a more aggressive approach to cutting stone.
15	brief communication possible increased risk of lung cancer among beauticians	Brief communication possible increased risk of lung cancer among beauticians.
15	general practice observed child abuse and general practice	General practice observed child abuse and general practice.
15	child health clincs and inverse care laws evidence from longitudinal study of 1878 pre school children	"""Child Health Clincs and inverse care laws,"" in longitudinal study of 1878, Precolary Children, vol."
15	general criteria for assessing the evidence for carcinogenicity of chemical substances report of the subcommittee on environmental carcinogenesis national cancer advisory board	General criteria for assessment; assessment of evidence of carcinogenicity of chemicals Report of the National Advisory Council on Cancer.
15	carrier detection and genetic counselling in duchenne muscular dystrophy a follow up study	A follow @-> up study of duchenne muscular dystrophy.
15	primary hyperlipoproteinemia in childhood and adolescence identification and treatment of persons at risk for premature atherosclerosis	Primary hyperlipoproteinemia in childhood and adolescence Identification and treatment of individuals at risk of premature atherosclerosis.
15	carcinogenicity of fibrous glass pleural response in the rat in relation to fiber dimension	Carcinogenicity of the fibrous pleural response of glass in the rat in relation to fiber size.
15	assessment of drugs in schizophrenia diagnosis and patient selection	Drug evaluation in schizophrenia diagnosis and patient selection.
15	cancer of the uterine corpus after hormonal treatment for breast cancer	Cancer of the body of the uterus following treatment with a hormonal treatment for breast cancer.
15	estimation of risk as a function of risk factors ii application to the multivariate analysis of coronary heart disease in a middle aged male population author s transl	Risk assessment based on risk factors ii factors; application to patients; multivariate analysis of coronary heart disease in a male population; mean age.
15	chronic bronchitis and risk factors in employees of the sanitation d partment city of geneva	Acute bronchitis and risk factors among health workers in the city of Geneva.
15	abnormal polygraphic findings in near miss sudden infant death	Abnormal polygraph results in sudden infant death syndrome.
15	legal abortion mortality in the united states epidemiologic surveillance 1972 1974	Mortality due to legal abortion in the United States of America.
15	one view follow up mammogram efficacy in screening for breast cancer	One perspective is to monitor the effectiveness of mammography in screening for breast cancer.
15	normal children abnormal results	There are abnormal results in normal children.
15	a migrant study of adopted apache children	It's a migrant study of adopted Apache children.
15	impending child abuse psychosomatic symptoms in adults as a clue	Immediate childhood psychosomatic symptoms in adults are an indication.
15	minimizing the risk of amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis	Minimize the risk of amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis.
15	myocardial ischaemia risk factors and death from coronary heart disease	Risk factors for diabetes; myocardial ischemia and death from coronary artery disease.
15	toward preventing coronary death from ventricular fibrillation	Prevention of coronary death by ventricular fibrillation.
15	obesity in childhood a community study in newcastle upon tyne	Obesity in children: a community study in Newcastle on Tyne.
15	n methylnicotinamide excretion and affective disorders	N methylnicotinamide excretion and affective disorders.
15	the influence of childbirth on psychiatric morbidity	Influence of childbirth on psychiatric morbidity.
15	cerebral function and the eeg in psychiatric disorder a hypothesis	Brain function and l' butchering in psychiatric disorders a hypothesis.
15	results of a two year health education campaign on dietary behavior the stanford three community study	Results of a two-year public health education campaign on food-related eating habits; Stanford Three community study.
15	the discovery of drug induced illness	It's about the discovery of a disease caused by a drug.
15	relationship between the development of experimental leukemia and animals capacity for a humoral immune response	The relationship between the development of experimental leukemia and the animals' ability to produce a humoral immune response.
15	childhood antecedents of adult obesity do chubby infants become obese adults	The history of adult obesity during childhood causes chubby babies to become obese adults.
15	enrollment choice in a mutli hmo setting the roles of health risk financial vulnerability and access to care	Choices; enrollment in a mutli hmo defining the roles of financial vulnerability and access to care.
15	risk factors of sports injuries in winter	The risk factors for sports injuries in winter.
15	gonorrhoea in women and exposure to risk	Gonorrhea in women and HIV/AIDS; exposure to risk factors.
15	risk factors in pulmonary embolism	The risk factors for lung embolism.
15	design and methodology of the zagreb preliminary study response rates at the study stages	Design and methodology of the project; preliminary study of response rates; study.
15	hyperglycaemia a risk factor for hypertension	Hyperglycemia is a risk factor for hypertension.
15	the concept of risk in epidemiology point of view of a public health officer author s transl	The concept of risk in epidemiology from the point of view of an author, a public health officer translator from the author.
15	oestrogens and endometrial cancer a point of view	Oestrogen and cancer of the apos; endometrium d' a point of view.
15	malignant transformation and natural history of oral leukoplakia in 57 518 industrial workers of gujarat india	The malignant transformation and natural history of oral leukoplasty in 57,518 industrial workers in Gujarat india.
15	preventive cardiology what should the clinician be doing about it	Preventive Cardiology What should the clinician be doing about this?
15	relationship of wives preventive health orientation to their beliefs about heart disease in husbands	Preventive health orientation of wives and their beliefs about heart disease in husbands.
15	components of blood pressure and risk of atherothrombotic brain infarction the framingham study	Components of blood pressure and risk of atherothrombotic brain infarction; Framingham study.
15	investigation of some risk factors in tubercular infection in children	Study of selected risk factors for tuberculosis; infection in children.
15	reducing the risk of tuberculosis in children vaccinated with bcg	To reduce the risk of tuberculosis (TB) in children vaccinated with bcg vaccine.
15	neuropsychological deficit in polydrug users a preliminary report of the findings of the collaborative neuropsychological study of polydrug users	Neuropsychological deficits in poly-drug users A preliminary report of the results of the collaborative neuropsychological study of poly-drug users.
15	health related aspects of integrated pest management	The health aspects of integrated pest management (IPM) management.
15	defining the malignant potential of the giant pigmented nevus	Define the malignant potential of the giant pigmented naevus.
15	maternal serum unconjugated estriol and urine estriol concentrations in normal and high risk pregnancy	Unconjugated esterol in maternal serum and estriol levels; urine in normal or high-risk pregnancy.
15	the diagnosis and management of intrauterine growth retardation	The diagnosis and management of intra-uterine growth retardation.
15	palmar crease variants and their clinical significance a study of newborns at risk	Palmar ply variants and their clinical importance A study of new-babies at risk.
15	homograft and prosthetic aortic valve replacement a comparative study	A comparative study of homograft and aortic valve replacement by a prosthesis.
15	survey of amniocentesis for fetal sex determination in hemophilia carriers	Apos; immunoassay; amniocentesis for fetal sex determination in apo carriers; hemophilia.
15	the initial manifestations of acute myocardinal infarction	Early manifestations of acute myocardial infarction.
15	estrogens and atherosclerosis	Estrogen and atherosclerosis.
15	prevention of thromboembolic phenomena	The prevention of thromboembolic phenomena.
15	protective efficacy of vaccination in children in four episodes of natural varicella and zoster in the ward	The protective efficacy of immunization in children with four episodes of natural varicella and herpes zoster in the service.
15	the thromboembolic risk of the pill	The thromboembolic risk of the pill.
15	characteristic features of ischaemic strokes in young adults author s transl	Characteristics of ischemic strokes in young adults.
15	coronary risk factors and anginal pain patterns	Coronary risk factors and anginal pain patterns.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california incidence of myocardial infarction and death from coronary heart disease	Epidemiological studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and California, Japan and California; incidence of stroke; incidence of myocardial infarction and death from coronary artery disease.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california coronary heart disease risk factors in japan and hawaii	Epidemiological studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in Japanese men living in Hawaii and California, risk factors for coronary artery disease in Japan and Hawaii.
15	genetic counselling i definition and present status author s transl	Genetic counselling i definition and current status of translations.
15	reuse of disposable catheters and guide wires	Reuse of disposable catheters and guides.
15	assessing the intellectural consequences of early intervention with high risk infants	Assessment of cognitive consequences of early intervention with high risk infants.
15	abortion deaths associated with the use of prostaglandin f2alpha	Abortion-related deaths associated with the use of prostaglandin f2alpha.
15	identification of subjects at high coronary risk in the roman project of coronary heart disease prevention author s transl	Identification of subjects at high coronary risk as part of the Roman project for the prevention of coronary heart disease.
15	coccidioidomycosis and renal transplantation	It's called coccidioidomycosis and renal transplant.
15	evaluation and measurement some dilemmas for health education	Evaluation and measurement of certain health education dilemmas.
15	complications of cardiac surgery	The complications of cardiac surgery.
15	thromboembolism following total hip replacement arthroplasty the efficicy of dextran aspirin and dextran warfarin in prophylaxis	Thromboembolism following total hip replacement replacements; efficacy of apos; dextran aspirin and warfarin dextran for prophylaxis.
15	surgery and coronary heart disease	Surgery and coronary heart disease.
15	risk factors for developing asthma and allergic rhinitis a 7 year follow up study of college students	Risk factors for asthma and allergic rhinitis in follow-up study of apoes; 7 years duration with college students.
15	emotional history and pathogenesis of cancer	He's got emotional history and cancer pathogenesis.
15	radiations and public health author s transl	Authors' translation on radiation and public health issues.
15	a prospective study of cerebrovascular disease in japanese rural communities akabane and asahi part 1 evaluation of risk factors in the occurrence of cerebral hemorrhage and thrombosis	A prospective study of cerebrovascular disease in rural Japanese communities Akabane and Asahi part 1 assessment of risk factors in the apos; onset of apos; cerebral haemorrhage and thrombosis.
15	rational prescribing of drugs	Rational prescribing of medication.
15	surgery for gastric ulcer	Uh, gastric ulcer surgery.
15	significance of indices of potential epidemiologic valency of natural foci of tick borne encephalitis and methods of determining them	Importance of indices of potential epidemiologic valence of natural outbreaks of tick-borne encephalitis and methods to determine them.
15	cholecystostomy in the high risk patient with biliary tract disease	Choleystostomy in the high-risk patient with biliary tract disease.
15	parental transactional style deviance as a possible indicator of risk for schizophrenia	Parental transactional style deviance as a possible indicator of the risk of schizophrenia.
15	attempt at evaluation of the risk of mortality in utero	To evaluate the risk of mortality in utero.
15	risk and postoperative complications in abdominal surgery in elderly patients author s transl	Risk factors and postoperative complications of abdominal surgery in elderly patients.
15	selenium vitamin e and copper in multiple sclerosis	Selenium, vitamin e and copper in multiple sclerosis.
15	birthweights of male and female schizoprenics offspring	Birth weight of male and female schizoprenic offspring.
15	rheoencephalographic method of of analyzing several risk factors for cerebrovascular disease epidemiologic study	Re-encephalographic method; analysis of several risk factors for cerebrovascular disease; epidemiological study.
15	ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins a study on 205 male and female pairs with special reference to hereditary factors	"""Ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins"", a study of 205 male and female cervical cancer pairs, with emphasis on hereditary factors."
15	risk benefit analysis for industrial and social needs	Risk/benefit analysis for industrial and social needs.
15	risk factors and early diagnosis in pancreatic carcinoma	Risk factors and early diagnosis in pancreatic carcinoma.
15	brain infarction in young adults with particular reference to pathogenesis	Cerebral infarction in young adults especially with respect to pathogenesis.
15	a hypothesis the role of a high risk male in the etiology of cervical carcinoma a correlation of epidemiology and molecular biology	An hypothesis on the role of a high-risk man in the etiology of cervical carcinoma; a correlation of cervical cancer; epidemiology and molecular biology.
15	cigarette smoking use of oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Smoking use of oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction.
15	methodical study of multifactorial prevention of ischemic heart disease	Systematic study of multifactorial prevention of ischemic heart disease.
15	myocardial infarct in young persons	Myocardial infarction in young people.
15	relative risk factors in chronic open angle glaucoma an epidemiological study	The relative risk factors in chronic angle-angled glaucoma are an epidemiological study.
15	exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma case control and incidence study	Case study-controls and investigation; incidence of exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinomas.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 1 study of some socio economic and cultural factors	A study of selected socio-economic factors-economic and cultural factors on nutritionally at-risk children, part one.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 2 study of factors pertinent to the child siblings or mother	Follow-up study; nutritional risk child part 2 on factors relevant to the child; sibling child or the mother.
15	asymptomatic autoimmune thyroiditis and coronary heart disease cross sectional and prospective studies	Cross-sectional and prospective studies on asymptomatic auto thyroiditis and coronary artery disease.
15	fire on ice	Uh, fire on the ice.
15	tests of competency to consent to treatment	The tests of competence to consent to treatment.
15	disulfiram toxicity and carbon disulfide poisoning	Disulfiram toxicity and carbon disulfide poisoning.
15	adverse effects on offspring of maternal alcohol abuse during pregnancy	Adverse effects on progeny; maternal alcohol abuse during pregnancy.
15	estrogen and endometrial carcinoma an independent pathology review supporting original risk estimate	Cancer of the estrogen and the intestines; endometrium: independent pathological examination; initial risk assessment.
15	mortality among patients with ankylosing spondylitis not given x ray therapy	Mortality in patients with ankylosing spondylitis who have not been X-rayed.
15	sounding board the pill a perspective for assessing risks and benefits	Surveys the pill; a perspective for evaluating risks and benefits.
15	coffee alcohol and risk of coronary heart disease among japanese men living in hawaii	L' coffee alcohol and risk of coronary heart disease in Japanese men living in Hawaii.
15	policy responses to complex issues the case of black infant mortality	Policy responses to complex questions the case of black infant mortality.
15	what is meant by the at risk pregnancy	"What do you mean by the word ""at risk""?"
15	the doctor and the patient in early breast cancer diagnosis	The doctor and patient in early breast cancer diagnosis.
15	anorexia nervosa and gonadal dysgenesis further evidence of a relationship	Nervous anorexia and gonadal dysgenesis constitute further evidence of a relationship.
15	the psychological approach in cardiovascular epidemiology	Lapos; psychological approach to cardiovascular epidemiology.
15	myocardial function of the chronic hemodialysed patient evaluation by measurement of systolic time intervals	Myocardial function of the apos; evaluation of the chronic hemodialysis patient by measurement of systolic time intervals.
15	occupational differences in rates of lung cancer	Occupational differences in rates of lung cancer.
15	exotic diseases ounce of prevention or pound of cure	Exotic diseases ounce of prevention or pound of cure.
15	prophylaxis of myocardial infarction and follow up treatment author s transl	Prophylaxis of myocardial infarction and follow-up.
15	epidemiology of diabetes mellitus in riga	Epidemiology of diabetes mellitus in riga.
15	surgical management of unruptured asymptomatic aneurysms	The surgical management of unbroken asymptomatic aneurysms.
15	legionnaires disease description of an epidemic of pneumonia	It's a disease of the legionnaires Description; an epidemic of pneumonia.
15	family structure and the mental health of children concurrent and longitudinal community wide studies	Family structure and mental health of children Community scale simultaneous and longitudinal studies.
15	analysis of familial factors in bipolar affective illness	Analysis of family factors in bipolar affective disorder.
15	acute hyperkalemia risks in recipients of kidney graft cooled with collins solution	Risks of apo; acute hyperkalemia in apo recipients; cooled renal transplant with solution of collins.
15	the responsibility to report occupational health risks	The responsibility to report occupational health risks.
15	the occupational determinants of chronic disabling pulmonary disease in rubber workers	The occupational determinants of chronic disabling lung disease in rubber workers.
15	occurrence of childhood cancers among sibs and estimation of familial risks	Incidence of childhood cancer in siblings and adults; estimation of family risk.
15	study of prenatal des exposure and its consequences in rochester minnesota	Prenatal exposure to exposure and its consequences in Rochester, Minnesota.
15	preceding pregnancy loss as an index of risk of stillbirth or neonatal death in the present pregnancy	Previous pregnancy loss as an index of risk of stillbirth or neonatal death in the current pregnancy.
15	spontaneous premature birth in twin pregnancy	You know, spontaneous premature birth in twins.
15	identifying patients at risk for thromboembolism use of 125i labeled fibrinogen in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Identification of patients at risk for apo; thromboembolic embolism, taking 125i-labeled fibrinogen in patients with apo; acute myocardial infarction.
15	the estimation and interpretation of attributable risk in health research	Estimation and interpretation of attributable risk in health research.
15	exogenous estrogens and endometrial carcinoma review and comments for the clinician	Examination of exogenous estrogens and endometrial carcinoma and comments to the clinician.
15	risk of bladder tumors among benzidine workers and their serum properdin levels	The risk of bladder tumours in benzidine workers and their serum levels of propellin.
15	epidemiology of cancer of the testis in upstate new york	Epidemiology of cancer of the testicle in northern California, New York State.
15	characteristics in youth indicative of adult onset hodgkin s disease	Characteristics of youth indicating onset of Hodgkin's disease in adults.
15	lack of acknowledgment in the family rorschachs of families with a child at risk for schizophrenia	The lack of recognition in the family rorschachs of families with a child at risk of developing schizophrenia.
15	pao2 levels and retrolental fibroplasia a report of the cooperative study	Pao2 levels and retrolental fibroplasia a report of l' cooperative study.
15	chronic mastopathy and breast cancer a follow up study	Chronic mast disease and breast cancer follow-up study.
15	present status of thermography ultrasound and mammography in breast cancer detection	Current status of ultrasound and mammography in breast cancer detection.
15	do risk factor interventions prevent or reverse arteriosclerosis	Do risk factor interventions prevent-them or reverse-them l' arteriosclerosis?
15	clinical judgement is not sufficient for the management of conduction defects indications for diagnostic electrophysiologic studies	Clinical judgement is not sufficient for the management of abnormal conduction indicated in diagnostic electrophysiological studies.
15	is early revascularization following acute coronary occlusion a safe and effective surgical procedure	The early revascularization following acute coronary occlusion is a safe and effective surgical procedure.
15	the rebuck skin window as a guide in cancer chemotherapy	Rebuck the skin window as a guide in cancer chemotherapy.
15	heart disease indicators in patients with aortocoronary bypass operation	Cardiac disease indicators in patients undergoing bypass surgery.
15	epidemiological features of canine renal neoplasms	Epidemiological characteristics of canine renal neoplasms and renal neoplasms.
15	experience with fifty repeat procedures for myocardial revascularization	Experimentation with fifty replicate procedures for myocardial revascularization.
15	prescribing of tetracycline to children less than 8 years old a two year epidemiologic study among ambulatory tennessee medicaid recipients	Prescription of tetracycline to children under 8 years of age as part of a two-year epidemiological study in ambulatory patients of Tennessee Medicaid.
15	benign breast disease and oral contraceptive use	Benign breast disease and oral contraceptive use.
15	genetic damage from diagnostic radiation	Uh, genetic damage from diagnostic radiation.
15	association between oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction a review	The association between oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction was examined.
15	risk of developing breast cancer determined by mammography	The risk of developing breast cancer determined by mammography.
15	bacterial endocarditis in patients with pulmonary stenosis aortic stenosis or ventricular septal defect	Lapses; bacterial endocarditis in patients with defective pulmonary stenosis, aortic stenosis or ventricular septation.
15	the troms heart study high density lipoprotein and coronary heart disease a prospective case control study	The trombone heart study high density lipoprotein and coronary heart disease, prospective case study.
15	prenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies a review of 15 cases	Prenatal diagnosis of apo; 15 cases of hemoglobinopathy.
15	juvenile delinquency adult criminality and adult psychiatric treatment an epidemiological study	Juvenile delinquency Adult delinquency and adult psychiatric treatment: an epidemiological study.
15	familial cancer in the general population	Family cancer in the general population.
15	multiple primary cancers relative risk in new mexico s triethnic population	Relative risk of multiple primary cancers in triethnic population of New-Mexico.
15	multiple primary cancers at memorial hospital 1949 1962	Primary multiple cancers at baseline; Memorial Hospital, 1962.
15	role of heredity in multiple primary cancer	The role of the apos; heredity in multiple primary cancer.
15	breast cancer in families	You know, breast cancer in families.
15	second malignant tumors after cancer in childhood	Second malignant tumour after cancer in childhood.
15	multiple primary cancer risk after therapy for hodgkin s disease	Multiple primary cancer risk after treatment of Hodgkin's disease.
15	a death certificate analysis of nasal cancer among furniture workers in north carolina	An analysis of death certificates for nose cancer among furniture workers in North Carolina.
15	new concepts in prevention and treatment of sunburn	New concepts in prevention and treatment of sunburn.
15	new estimates of mortality associated with fertility control	New estimates of mortality associated with fertility control.
15	an audit of obstetric care in a university family medicine department and an obstetrics gynecology department	An audit of obstetrical care in a family medicine department and an obstetrics department.
15	on 23 cases of postinfartual interventricular septal rupture s	Out of 23 cases of interventricular septal rupture post-ventricular rupture, s.
15	importance of coronarographic evaluation in valvular diseases for correct surgical indication author s transl	Importance of ultrasound; coronary artery evaluation in valvular diseases for correct surgical indication.
15	a retrospective analysis of the systolic bp iop ratio in glaucoma screening	A retrospective analysis of the systolic bp iop ratio in glaucoma screening.
15	more evidence for the recessive inheritance of selective adult type lactose malabsorption	More dosage; indications of disease; recessive inheritance of selective adult-type lactose malabsorption.
15	effects of stimulus intensity and stimulus duration during acoustic priming on audiogenic seizures in c57bl 6j mice	Effects of stimulus duration and intensity during recovery; acoustic initiation on audiogenic seizures in c57bl 6j mice.
15	stroke incidence and risk factors	Stroke incidence and risk factors for stroke.
15	intensive plasmapheresis as a risk factor for arteriosclerotic cardiovascular disease	Intensive plasmapheresis as a risk factor for arteriosclerotic cardiovascular disease.
15	spinocerebellar ataxia and hla linkage risk prediction by hla typing	Spinal cord ataxia and hla binding risk prediction by hla typing.
15	mid trimester abortion by dilatation and evacuation a safe and practical alternative	Mid-term dilatation and evacuation abortion, a safe and practical alternative.
15	endotracheal intubation and its relationship to bacterial colonization and systemic infection of newborn infants	Endotracheal intubation and its relationship to bacterial colonization and l' systemic infection of newborn-infants.
15	gallbladder disease as a side effect of drugs influencing lipid metabolism experience in the coronary drug project	Gallbladder disease as a side effect of drugs affecting appetite; experience with lipid metabolism in the coronary drug project.
15	surgical indication author s transl	Apos translation; author of apos; surgical indication.
15	a new variety of hereditary sensory neuropathy	Uh, a new variety of hereditary sensory neuropathies.
15	results of long term use of a low dose estroprogestatif in diabetics and high risk women	The results of the long-term use of a low-dose estrogen plus progestin in diabetics and women at high risk.
15	schizophrenia genetic factors	Schizophrenia genetic factors genetic factors.
15	possibilities and limitations of air travel	The opportunities and limitations of opportunities and limitations of opportunities and limitations of opportunities; the use of airspace; the limitations of opportunities and limitations of airspace; the use of airspace; the use of airspace; the air travel, opportunities and limitations of airspace; the limitations of airspace; the use of airspace; the air travel space, opportunities and limitations of airspace; the analysis of opportunities and limitations of airspace; the analysis of opportunities and limitations of airspace; the information of the limitations of airspace; the limitations of airspace before and the limitations of airspace; and the prior and limitations of air travel.
15	congenital malformations in infants of diabetic mothers	Acute congenital malformations in infants of diabetic mothers.
15	estrogens and endometrial carcinoma	Estrogen and endometrial carcinoma.
15	gonorrhea screening program in a women s hospital outpatient department results and analysis of risk factors	Results of the gonorrhea screening program in an outpatient women's hospital and risk factor analysis.
15	epidemiologic treatment of syphilis	Epidemiological treatment of syphilis infection.
15	body height and body mass as determinants of basal blood pressure in children the bogalusa heart study	Body height and body mass as determinants of baseline blood pressure in children and youth; bogalusa heart study.
15	tests for homogeneity of effect in an epidemiologic investigation	Dapos tests; homogeneity of symptoms; effect in an epidemiological investigation.
15	prediction of treatment effectiveness in a drug free therapeutic community	Prediction of drugs; treatment effectiveness in a drug-free therapeutic community.
15	pathogenesis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease role of contraception and other risk factors	Pathogenesis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease role of contraception and other risk factors.
15	mortality experience in relation to a measured arsenic trioxide exposure	Experience in mortality related to a measured exposure to arsenic trioxide.
15	corneal transplantation reaction in avascular keratoconus patients due to hla associated immune aberration against infection a hypothesis	Corneal transplant reaction in avascular keratoconus patients due to apos; hla-associated immune aberration against apos; infection hypothesis.
15	lcoc regional sarcoid reaction sarcoidosis and malignant tumors	Sarcoid reaction to regional sarcoidosis and malignant tumours.
15	the association of hl a b8 and childhood celiac disease in an israeli population	The association of celiac b8 and childhood celiac disease in an israeli population.
15	prospective screening for deep vein thrombosis in high risk patients	Prospective tests for deep vein thrombosis in high risk patients.
15	does intensive prenatal care during childbirth lead to a greater risk of infection	Intensive prenatal care during childbirth increases the risk of developing a newborn's infection.
15	optimal function and health	Optimal health and functioning.
15	are we mobilizing early enough	We are mobilizing early enough to mobilize early enough.
15	the value of assessing intent in attempted suicide	The value of suicide attempt; assessment of intent.
15	platelet hyperaggregability in young patients with completed stroke	Platelet hyper-aggregation in young patients with complete stroke.
15	submaximal treadmill exercise testing of patients with coronary artery disease	Submaximal treadmill exercise testing of patients with coronary artery disease.
15	risks of mercury poisoning in the dental laboratory	Risks of mercury poisoning in the dental laboratory.
15	diffusible cholesterol as a risk factor in the biochemical stage of atherosclerosis	Diffusible cholesterol is a risk factor in the biochemical stage of cholesterol synthesis; atherosclerosis.
15	salivary gland neoplasms as a late consequence of head and neck irradiation	Salivary gland neoplasms as a late consequence of head and neck irradiation.
15	ectopic ossification after total hip arthroplasty predisposing factors frequency and effect on results	Ectopic ossification after total hip arthroplasty predisposing frequency and effect on results.
15	genetic studies in outpatients plasma cholesterol in family and twin studies	Outpatient genetic studies of plasma cholesterol in the family and twin studies.
15	national views australia	Australian national views.
15	perthes disease treated by prolonged recumbency and femoral head containment a long term appraisal	Perths treated prolonged elongation and femoral head containment a long-term assessment.
15	prediction of the reading and spelling performances of normal and retarded readers a four year follow up	Prediction of read and write performance; spelling of normal readers and delayed a follow-up of four years.
15	further investigation on the predictive value of human placental lactogen in high risk pregnancies	D' further research on the predictive value of human placental lactogen in high risk pregnancies.
15	oxytocinase and human placental lactogen for the prediction of intrauterine growth retardation	Ocytocinase and human placental lactogen for the prediction of intrauterine growth retardation.
15	perinatal addiction outcome and management	Outcomes and management of perinatal addiction.
15	use of the exercise test in the diagnosis of coronary disease	Use of the coronary artery disease test; exercise in the diagnosis of coronary artery disease.
15	screening for breast cancer	Screening for breast cancer.
15	the potential of organizations of fee for service physicians for achieving significant decreases in hospitalization	The potential of organizations of physicians remunerated at the time to achieve significant decreases in hospitalizations.
15	risk factors in mitral valve replacements	The risk factors for mitral valve replacements.
15	incidence and evaluation of the risk of coronary disease prospective study in paris	Prospective study of the incidence and risk of coronary heart disease in Paris.
15	informed consent some newer aspects and their relation to the specialty of radiology	Informed Consent Some newer aspects and their connection to the specialty of radiology.
15	techniques for assessing teratogenic effects epidemiology	Techniques for assessment; epidemiology of teratogenic effects.
15	behavioral testing as a method for assessing risk	Behavioural testing as a method of risk assessment.
15	childhood accidents three epidemiological studies on the etiology	Injuries in children Three epidemiological studies on the causes; etiology.
15	perinatal intracranial hemorrhage incidence and clinical features	Apos incidence; perinatal intracranial hemorrhage and clinical characteristics.
15	multistage scoring system for identifying infants at risk of unexpected death	A multi-step scoring system for identifying infants at risk of unplanned death.
15	evaluation and management of suicidal behavior	Assessment and management of suicidal behaviour.
15	the need demand problem in patients with oro mandibular functional disorders	Demand problem in patients with oro mandibular functional disorders.
15	tests of fibrin metabolism in recurrent venous thromboembolism	Tests for fibrin metabolism in recurrent venous thromboembolism.
15	acute myocardial infarction in newark n j a study of racial incidence	Acute myocardial infarction in Newark nd a study of racial incidence.
15	deep wound sepsis following total hip arthroplasty	Deep sepsis following total hip arthroplasty.
15	epidemiological study of youth suicide comparison between primary suicidals and repeaters	Epidemiological comparative study of youth suicide between primary and recidivists.
15	alcohol consumption among pregnant women and outcome of pregnancy author s transl	Alcohol consumption in pregnant women and women born of pregnancy.
15	disease physician patient contacts and work disability in a general practice	Contacts with physicians and the inability to work in a general practice office.
15	assessment of myocardial performance and optimal volume loading during elective abdominal aortic aneurysm resection	Evaluation of myocardial performance and optimal volume load during elective abdominal aortic aneurysm resection.
15	a planned approach to coexistent cerebrovascular disease in coronary artery bypass candidates	A planned approach to concomitant cerebrovascular disease in coronary artery bypass graft candidates.
15	mutagenicity testing and risk estimation with mammals	Mammalian mutagenicity testing and risk estimation.
15	carcinogenic mutagenic and teratogenic risks associated with vinyl chloride	Mutagenic and teratogenic risks associated with vinyl chloride.
15	practical evaluation of mutagenicity data in mammals for estimating human risk	Evaluation of mammalian mutagenicity data in a practical manner; estimation of risk to humans.
15	metabolic studies and the evaluation of genetic risk from the viewpoint of industrial toxicology	Metabolic studies and assessment of genetic risk from an industrial toxicological perspective.
15	parental focus of attention in a videotape feedback task as a function of hypothesized risk for offspring schizophrenia	Concentration of apo; parental attention in video-tape feedback task as a function of hypothetical risk of progeny schizophrenia.
15	physiologic reactions to social challenge in persons evidencing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Physiological responses to social challenge in people with a behavioural pattern predisposed to coronary heart disease.
15	influenza infections during pregnancy in the mouse	Influenza infections during pregnancy in the mouse.
15	extraocular muscle surgery in the presence of complete paralysis of the fifth sixth and seventh cranial nerves	Extraocular muscle surgery in the presence of apos; complete paralysis of the 5th and 7th cranial nerves.
15	the contribution of genetics to biological psychiatry	The contribution of genetics to biological psychiatry.
15	the natural course of coronary heart disease	L' natural evolution of coronary heart disease.
15	early onset of oral cancer among women who drink and smoke	L'apos; early onset of oral cancer among women who drink and smoke.
15	nocturnal asthma and sudden death	Uh, nocturnal asthma and sudden death.
15	the effect of high level sound exposure on the loudness difference limen	A high level of noise exposure on the difference in noise.
15	neurofibromatosis a neoplastic birth defect with two age peaks of severe problems	Neurofibromatosis, neoplastic malformation at birth, with two peaks of severe problems.
15	controlled trial of bicarbonate therapy in high risk premature newborn infants	Effect of bicarbonate on the treatment of early-born infants with high risk.
15	determination of the importance of environmental factors in human cancer the role of epidemiology	Determination of causes; importance of environmental factors in human cancer role of disease; epidemiology.
15	environmental health education a different orientation	Environmental education, environmental hygiene, and a different orientation.
15	alcohol and the fetus	It's called alcohol and the fetus.
15	treatment of borderline diabetes controlled trial using carbohydrate restriction and phenformin	Apos therapy; diabetes control limit trial using carbohydrate restriction and phenformin.
15	practical utilization of a hazard catalogue for the early detection of pre and dysmaturity	Practical use of a catalogue of hazards for early detection of pre- and dysmaturation.
15	risk factors for lung cancer in singapore chinese a population with high female incidence rates	The risk factors for lung cancer among Chinese people in Singapore, a population with high rates of lung cancer; incidence among women.
15	relationship between steroid excretion patterns and breast cancer incidence in israeli women of various origins	The relationship between steroid excretion and breast cancer incidence in israeli women of various origins.
15	non accidental childhood injury presenting at a hospital casualty department	Non-accidental child injuries presenting in the emergency department of a hospital.
15	the prevention of prematurity	This is the prevention of prematurity.
15	results in the management of pregnancies involving risk factors	Results of the management of pregnancies with risk factors.
15	lead absorption in a community of potters in barbados	L' lead absorption in a community of potters of barbados.
15	hyperdynamic beta adrenergic circulatory state a case report	Hydynamic adrenergic circulatory state beta-hyperdynamic adrenergic state.
15	primary immunisation and febrile convulsions in oxford 1972 5	Primary immunization and febrile convulsions in oxford 1972 5.
15	cancer in asbestos mining and other areas of quebec	Cancer in asbestos mines, asbestos mines, and other areas of Quebec.
15	material and thickness the important factors in the impact resistance of spectacle lenses	Material and thickness the important factors in the impact resistance of eyeglass lenses.
15	risks of discontinuing anticoagulant therapy in a selected group of patients with atherosclerotic heart disease a prospective study	Discontinuation of anticoagulant therapy in a selected group of patients with atherosclerotic heart disease in a prospective study.
15	pregnancy in renal transplant recipients report of two successful pregnancies in a patient with impaired renal function	Pregnancy in kidney transplant patients reports two successful pregnancies in a patient with impaired renal function.
15	liver toxicity after acetaminophen ingestion inadequacy of the dose estimate as an index of risk	Hepatic toxicity following ingestion of acetaminophen Insufficient liver function; dose estimate as an index of risk.
15	high school contact among persons with leukemia and lymphoma	High school contact among people with leukemia and lymphoma.
15	regular drug use and cancer	You know, regular drug use and cancer.
15	lung cancer risk among beauticians and other female workers brief communication	Risk of lung cancer in beauticians and other female workers A brief presentation is needed.
15	the identification of individuals at high risk for large bowel cancer an overview	The identification of individuals at high risk for large bowel cancer provides an overview of the situation.
15	early detection of colonic neoplasia in patients at high risk	Early detection of colonic neoplasia in patients at high risk.
15	ski injuries	He's got injuries from skiing.
15	cancer of the esophagus in southern iran	Cancer of the esophagus in southern Mexico; Iran.
15	phase ii study of oral methyl ccnu and prednisone in previously treated alkylating agent resistant multiple myeloma	Phase II study of oral methyl ccnu and prednisone in a previously treated alkylation-resistant multiple myeloma.
15	subcellular distribution a factor in risk evaluation of pentachlorophenol	Subcellular distribution a factor in pentachlorophenol risk assessment.
15	surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in the elderly clinical considerations on a group of patients undergoing major surgical destruction	Surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in the elderly, clinical considerations on a group of patients undergoing major surgical destruction.
15	precordial mapping in acute myocardial infarction	Pre-cordial mapping in acute myocardial infarction.
15	bowel transit time and stool weight in populations with different colon cancer risks	Bowel transit time and stool weight in populations at different colon cancer risks.
15	unilateral breast feeding and breast cancer	L' unilateral breastfeeding and breast cancer.
15	alcohol consumption cardiovascular risk factors and mortality in two chicago epidemiologic studies	Alcohol consumption, cardiovascular risk factors and mortality in two Chicago-based epidemiological studies.
15	cancer experience among coke by product workers	Cancer experience among coke production workers by product.
15	cancer mortality among rubber workers an epidemiologic study	Cancer mortality among rubber workers Epidemiological study.
15	case study 1 asbestos the tlv approach	Case study 1 asbestos and l' approach tlv.
15	respiratory disease mortality among uranium miners	Respiratory disease mortality among uranium mining workers.
15	immunotherapy of chronic myelocytic leukemia effects of different vaccination schedules	Immunotherapy for the effects of chronic myelocytic leukemia at different immunization schedules.
15	unstable angina comparison of medical and surgical management	Unstable comparison of angina and medical and surgical management.
15	a nurse rehabilitator s impact on patients with myocardial infarction	Impact of a rehabilitation nurse on patients with myocardial infarction.
15	clinically silent pericardial effusions in patients on long term hemodialysis pericardial effusions in hemodialysis	Clinically silent pericardial effusions in patients on long term hemodialysis pericardial effusions in hemodialysis.
15	artificial sweeteners and human bladder cancer	You know, artificial sweeteners and human bladder cancer.
15	correlation between leucocyte migration inhibition by breast cancer antigens mammographic findings and other breast cancer risk factors	The correlation between leukocyte migration inhibition by breast cancer antigens, mammography results and other breast cancer risk factors.
15	identification of sudden death risk factors in acute and chronic coronary artery disease	Identification of sudden death risk factors in acute and chronic coronary heart disease.
15	patients admitted to the coronary care unit for chest pain high risk subgroup for subsequent cardiovascular death	Patients admitted to the coronary care unit for chest pain under-high risk group for subsequent cardiovascular death.
15	noninvasive predictors of sudden cardiac death in men with coronary heart disease predictive value of maximal stress testing	A randomized trial of coronary heart disease (CHCD) in the United States.
15	biologic and psychosocial risk factors of sudden death from coronary disease in white women	Journal of the American Medical Association, 2nd ed., No. 2, p.
15	gastrointestinal hemorrhage in patients in a respiratory intensive care unit	Gastro haemorrhage-intestinal in respiratory intensive care unit patients.
15	ethical issues in investigation of screening strategies	The following are some of the issues: ethical issues; ethical issues in the context of waiting; research on waiting times; the impact of screening strategies on screening strategies; other end of the waiting list; the shadow of the waiting list; the other end of the waiting list; the opening of the waiting list; the opening of the waiting list; the other end of the waiting list; the end of the waiting list; the end of the waiting list; the other end of the waiting list; the other end of the waiting list; the other end of the waiting list.
15	estimation of risks due to environmental carcinogenesis	Risk assessment due to environmental carcinogenesis.
15	breast cancer and fertility trends in canada	Breast cancer and fertility trends in Canada.
15	the rising frequency of hysterectomy its effect on uterine cancer rates	Lupus; increased frequency of apostomy; hysterectomy has an effect on cancer rates in the uterus.
15	bias due to misclassification in the estimation of relative risk	Bias due to misclassification in the appendix; relative risk estimate.
15	high density lipoprotein as a protective factor against coronary heart disease the framingham study	High-density lipoproteins as a protective factor against coronary heart disease (CHD); Framingham study.
15	cellular immune responses in familial medullary thyroid carcinoma	Cell cell immune responses in familial medullary thyroid carcinoma.
15	decision analysis to evaluate lymphangiography in the management of patients with hodgkin s disease	A decision analysis to evaluate the use of lymphangiography in the management of patients with Hodgkin's disease.
15	low gynecologic an obstetric risk factor	Uh, low gynaecological rate, obstetric risk factor.
15	aphakic retinal detachment as a function of the technic and course of cataract extraction	Detached aphakic retina according to technique and course of the apos; extraction of cataract.
15	changes in menstrual cycle length and regularity after use of oral contraceptives	The use of oral contraceptives has been linked to changes in the duration and regularity of the menstrual cycle.
15	coffee and health	Oh, coffee and health.
15	social risk factors for rheumatoid arthritis epidemiologic social medical study	Social risk factors for rheumatoid arthritis Epidemiological social medical study Social medical study.
15	is epa s radium 226 drinking water standard justified	Epa s radium 226 drinking water standard is-justified?
15	hospitalization for laparoscopy the exception rather than the rule	The hospitalization for laparoscopy is the exception rather than the rule.
15	acute leukemia after alkylating agent therapy of ovarian cancer	Acute leukemia after alkylating agent therapy of ovarian cancer.
15	recommendations for a national policy on poliomyelitis vaccination	Recommendations for a national policy on immunization against poliomyelitis.
15	the relationship of childhood respiratory illness to adult obstructive airway disease	Ratio of childhood respiratory illness and obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) in adults.
15	use of the smooth teflon clip to prevent pulmonary embolism in the postoperative period	Use of the smooth teflon clip to prevent lung embolism during the postoperative period.
15	factors influencing contraceptive behavior of single college students	Factors influencing the contraceptive behaviour of single university students.
15	survival in traumatic transverse myelitis	Surviving a traumatic transverse myelitis.
15	multifactorial index of cardiac risk in noncardiac surgical procedures	A multifactorial index of cardiac risk in non-cardiac surgical procedures.
15	laboratory acquired rocky mountain spotted fever the hazard of aerosol transmission	The laboratory contracted purple fever from the rocky mountains, a risk of aerosol transmission.
15	genetics of juvenile diabetes mellitus a recessive gene closely linked to hla d and with 50 per cent penetrance	Juvenile diabetes mellitus genetics is a recessive gene closely linked to hla d and with a 50 percent penetrance.
15	evidence favoring the use of anticoagulants in the hospital phase of acute myocardial infarction	Evidence for the use of anticoagulants in the hospital phase of the disease; acute myocardial infarction.
15	amniotic fluid neutrophils prior to cesarean section and intrauterine infection	Amniotic fluid neutrophils prior to caesarean and l' intra-uterine infection.
15	a formula for selective lymphadenectomy its application to cancer of the vulva	Selective lymphadenectomy formulation applied to cancer of the vulva.
15	abnormal fetal growth patterns ultrasonic diagnosis and management	Abnormal ultrasonic diagnosis and management of fetal growth.
15	endometrial cancer after menopausal use of estrogens	Cervical cancer; endometrium; endometrium; use of estrogens in menopause.
15	atherosclerosis a major cause of peripheral vascular disease	Atherosclerosis is a major cause of peripheral vascular disease.
15	exacerbation of diabetic renal failure following intravenous pyelography	Lapos; exacerbation of apos; diabetic renal failure following intravenous pyelogram.
15	development of drug therapy for children	Development of drug therapy for children.
15	a practical classification of the risk factor in restorative surgery of the fallopian tube	A practical classification of the risk factor in the reconstructive surgery of the fallopian tubes.
15	long term safety and use effectiveness of intrauterine devices	Long-term safety and effectiveness of d' use of intra-uterine devices.
15	risk for short arm 10 trisomy a segregation analysis of eleven families with different translocations	Risk of short arm trisomy 10 A segregation analysis of eleven families with different translocations.
15	family planning and the primary care physician	Family planning and the physician of first resort.
15	the risk of advanced heart block in surgical patients with right bundle branch block and left axis deviation	Risk of advanced cardiac block in surgical patients with right bundle branch block and left axis deflection.
15	relationships among ventricular arrhythmias coronary artery disease and angiographic and electrocardiographic indicators of myocardial fibrosis	Relationships between ventricular arrhythmias, coronary arteries, and angiographic and electrocardiographic indicators of myocardial fibrosis.
15	effect of coronary bypass surgery on longevity in high and low risk patients report from the v a cooperative coronary surgery study	The effect of coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) on longevity in high-risk and low-risk patients has been reported in a collaborative coronary surgery study.
15	a fever index evaluation of chloramphenicol or clindamycin in patients with serious pelvic infections	An assessment of risk of chloramphenicol fever or clindamycin in patients with severe pelvic infections.
15	cesarean section and maternal mortality in rhode island incidence and risk factors 1965 1975	Caesarean section and maternal mortality in apo; island rhode incidence and risk factors 1965-1975.
15	sustained attention in children at risk for schizophrenia report on a continuous performance test	A report on ongoing performance testing indicates continued attention in children at risk of schizophrenia.
15	retinal detachment following congenital cataract surgery	Detachment of the retina following congenital cataract surgery.
15	lens implantation surgery in the second eye	Dapos surgery; lentil implantation in the second eye cavity.
15	results of primary and secondary implants using choyce mark viii lenses	Results of primary and secondary implants using Choyce brand lenses viii.
15	adenocarcinoma in regional enteritis of the small intestine	Adenocarcinoma in regional enteritis of the small intestine.
15	orbital expansion for anophthalmia and micro orbitism	Orbital expansion for anophthalmia and microorbiting.
15	patterns of breast parenchyma on mammography	Mammographic parenchyma key words.
15	prevention of heart disease in the asymptomatic post infarction patient	Prevention of heart disease in infarct asymptomatic patients.
15	caregiver child interactions and the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Interactions with the person who develops symptoms; child and type of behaviour predisposed to coronary heart disease.
15	coronary risk factors in flying personnel a progress report	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that coronary heart disease is a risk factor for coronary heart disease.
15	prevention of heart disease in the young coronary candidate	Prevention of heart disease in the young CHD candidate.
15	gonorrhea screening in family planning clinics when should it become selctive	At family planning clinics when screening for gonorrhoea should-become auto-administered?
15	cholesterol and dna content in arterial tissue in severe obesity their relation to some risk factors for ischaemic heart disease	Cholesterol and DNA levels in arterial tissue in severe obesity are linked to certain risk factors for coronary heart disease.
15	notes on experiments with drugs in psychiatry	Notes on the use of drugs in psychiatry and psychotherapy.
15	workload and risk of myocardial infarction a prospective psychosocial analysis	Workload and risk of myocardial infarction a prospective psychosocial analysis.
15	cardiovascular risk factors among japanese and american telephone executives	Cardiovascular risk factors among Japanese and U.S. telephone executives.
15	a competing risk model based on the life table procedure in epidemiological studies	A competing risk model based on the life table procedure in epidemiological studies.
15	the incidence and characteristics of acute myeloid leukaemia arising in hodgkin s disease	L' incidence and characteristics of acute myeloid leukemia from Hodgkin's disease.
15	importance of glycosuria in pregnant women as a risk factor in relation to diabetes mellitus	Los; importance of glycosuria in pregnant women as a risk factor for diabetes mellitus.
15	a new endoprosthesis for nonoperative intubation of the biliary tract in malignant obstructive jaundice	A new endoprosthesis for non-operative intubation of the biliary tract in malignant obstructive jaundice.
15	evaluation of a serologic test for gonorrhea in a low risk female population	Evaluation of a serologic test for gonorrhea in a low-risk female population.
15	hla islet cell antibodies and types of diabetes mellitus	Islet cell antibodies and types of diabetes mellitus.
15	side effects of antihemophilic concentrates	Side effects of antihemophilic concentrates.
15	postoperative wound infection rates	Dapos; postoperative wound infection.
15	risk factors of breast cancer in finland	The risk factors for breast cancer in Finns.
15	mortality risk associated with the use of oral contraceptives	Mortality risks associated with the use of oral contraceptives are high.
15	therapy for cholelithiasis	Therapy for cholelithiasis.
15	single dose intra incisional antibiotic prophylaxis of surgical wound sepsis a controlled trial of cephaloridine and ampicillin	Single-dose intra-@ incisional antibiotic prophylaxis of surgical sepsis, controlled test of cephaloridine and d' ampicillin.
15	donor pretreatment in cadaver renal transplantation	Donor pretreatment in the context of kidney transplantation in a cadaver.
15	effects of a health screening on mortality and causes of death in middle aged men a prospective study from 1970 to 1974 of mean in malm born 1914	Effects of screening on mortality and causes of death among Canadian men; average age, prospective study of the mean infant mortality in 1914 from 1970 to 1974.
15	measures for the prevention of incidents in ambulatory dental surgery	Measures to prevent ambulatory dental surgery incidents.
15	complete surgical correction of congenital cardiopathies in infants	Complete surgical correction of congenital heart disease in infants.
15	some issues in research on stressful life events	Some questions in research on stressful life events.
15	dentofacial orthopedics and morphopsychology	Dento orthopaedics-facial and morpho-psychology.
15	androgen and estrogen formation in women with ovarian hyperthecosis	Androgen and estrogen formation in women with ovarian hyperthesis.
15	amniotic fluid analysis its role in maternal neonatal infection	Analysis of amniotic fluid its role in maternal neonatal infection.
15	inidcations for prenatal diagnosis in relatives of patients with neural tube defects	Implications for prenatal diagnosis in parents of patients with neural tube defects.
15	induction of labor in the high risk pregnancy with pgf 2 alpha	Induction of work during high risk pregnancy with pgf 2 alpha.
15	on conservative estimates of radiation hazards	On conservative estimates of radiation hazards.
15	carcinogenic risk assessment	A carcinogenic risk assessment.
15	infection surveillance identifying the problems and the high risk patient	Surveillance for infection identifying problems and the high-risk patient.
15	principles and tasks of biochemical research at centers participating in the accomplishment of the national program for the control of cardiovascular diseases	The principles and tasks of biochemical research in centres participating in the national programme for the control of cardiovascular diseases.
15	exogenous hormones reproductive history and breast cancer	Exogenous hormones Reproductive history and breast cancer.
15	dentition diet tobacco and alcohol in the epidemiology of oral cancer	Dietary teething and alcohol in the mouth; epidemiology of oral cancer.
15	studies on herediatary spherocytosis in iceland	Studies on hereditary spherocytosis in Iceland.
15	preoperative bowel preparation in urologic surgery	Preoperative bowel preparation in urological surgery.
15	lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in amniotic fluid and its value for the prediction of neonatal respiratory distress syndrome in pregnant diabetic women	Lecithin ratio-sphingomyelin in the amniotic fluid and its value for the prediction of neonatal respiratory distress syndrome in pregnant diabetic women.
15	the incidence of macular pucker after retinal detachment surgery	L' incidence of macular pleats after retinal detachment surgery.
15	evaluation of the risk of postoperative pulmonary complications	Assessment of the risk of post-operative pulmonary complications.
15	coffee consumption and coronary heart disease in middle aged swedish men	Average age in Sweden: coffee consumption and coronary heart disease.
15	calculation of the size of the population group necessary for evaluation of the results of measures for the prevention of cardiovascular diseases on the example of the kaunas survey	Calculation of the size of the population group necessary for prevention of cardiovascular disease; evaluation of the results of measures to prevent cardiovascular diseases; example of l'apos; survey kaunas.
15	participation of the population in mass screening and the role of complete population surveillance for detection of the disease studied from the experience of the methodical measures for the prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas	Population participation in mass screening and the role of comprehensive population surveillance in detecting the disease studied from the perspective of the population; experience with methodological measures for the prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas.
15	organization of collecting and analysis of the data on nutrition in epidemiological study of cardiovascular diseases	Organization of collection and analysis of nutrition data in the epidemiological study of cardiovascular diseases.
15	population surveillance and its importance in the study of the effectiveness of primary and secondary prevention of ischemic heart disease among the population	Population surveillance and its importance in the study of the effectiveness of primary and secondary prevention of coronary heart disease in the population.
15	ergometry and the risk factors in ischemic heart disease	L' ischemic heart disease ergometry and risk factors.
15	asymptomatic coronary artery disease and coronary bypass surgery	Asymptomatic coronary artery disease and surgical coronary artery bypass.
15	dietary and serum lipids in the multifactorial etiology of atherosclerosis	The dietary and serum lipids in the apos; multifactorial etiology of apos; atherosclerosis.
15	testing the lipid hypothesis clinical trials	Lipos test; lipid hypothesis clinical trials.
15	angina pectoris and middle aged man	Angina pectoris and male dapos; mean age.
15	the tromso heart study risk factors for coronary heart disease related to the occurrence of myocardial infarction in first degree relatives	Trumpeter heart study risk factors for coronary heart disease related to the occurrence of myocardial infarction in first degree parents.
15	risk factors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease copd	Risk factors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease copd.
15	determination of significant relative risks and optimal sampling procedures in prospective and retrospective comparative studies of various sizes	Identification of significant relative risks and procedures; optimal sampling through prospective and retrospective comparative studies of various sizes.
15	prader willi syndrome variable severity and recurrence risk	Prader willi syndrome varies in severity and recurrence risk.
15	the identification of infants at risk of malnutrition in kingston jamaica	Identification of infants at risk of malnutrition in Kingston jamaica.
15	growth profile of preschool children from an urban low socio economic community in india	Growth profile of children; pre-school age; an urban community with low socio-economic status in India.
15	cholesterol in preteen children of parents with premature coronary disease	Cholesterol in preteen children of parents with premature coronary disease.
15	screening in family medicine the current situation	Screening in family medicine The current situation.
15	clinical application of high risk scoring on an obstetric service	L' clinical application of high risk scoring on a home care setting; obstetrics.
15	home observation for measurement of the environment a validation study of screening efficiency	Home observation for measurement of apos; environment a validation study of apos; filtration efficiency.
15	reproductive counseling in patients who have had a spontaneous abortion	Reproductive counselling in patients who have had a miscarriage.
15	the use of delayed primary wound closure in preventing wound infections	Use of delayed primary wound healing to prevent infection of wounds.
15	the effects of moderate alcohol consumption during pregnancy on fetal growth and morphogenesis	Effects of alcohol consumption during pregnancy on fetal growth and morphogenesis.
15	problems in follow up studies	Problems in follow-up studies Follow-up studies.
15	iron burden in sickle cell anemia	Iron levels in sickle cell anemia.
15	are breast patterns a risk index for breast cancer a reappraisal	Breast profiles are an index of risk for breast cancer a reassessment.
15	toxocara infection in animal hospital employees	Toxocara infection in animal hospital workers.
15	hydatid disease in new zealand an epidemiological study of transmission among maoris	Hydatid disease in new zealand an epidemiological study of transmission in Maori.
15	indications and guidelines for mammographic examinations	Indications and guidelines for mammographic examinations.
15	preoperative intra aortic balloon assist in high risk revascularization patients	The preoperative aortic intra-balloons help patients at high risk of revascularization.
15	lung cancer among black migrants interaction of host and occupational environment factors	Lung cancer in black migrants interaction of host and occupational environment.
15	prevention of complications of histamine liberation occurring after administration of anesthetic agents and adjuvants	Prevention of complications of histamine release; post-dose histamine release; administration of anesthetics and additives.
15	factors favoring anaphylactic reactions to general anesthetics	Factors promoting anaphylactic reactions to general anesthetic.
15	symposium on intensive care 2 infection control in the surgical intensive care unit	Intensive care symposium 2 infection control in the intensive surgical care unit.
15	detection and dispensary care of groups of persons at increased risk of bronchogenic cancer disease in czechoslovakia	Screening and care of groups of people at increased risk of bronchogenic cancer in Czechoslovakia.
15	assessment of the danger of bronchological studies under polyclinic conditions	Evaluation of the danger of bronchological studies under polyclinical conditions.
15	coronary risk factor reduction through biofeedback aided relaxation and meditation	Reducing coronary risk factor by biofeedback facilitated relaxation and meditation.
15	toward classifying psychoactive chemical use	With regard to the classification of chemical substances; use of psychoactive chemicals.
15	successful chemoprophylaxis for pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis	A successful chemoprophylaxis for pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
15	risk of coeliac disease in children of patients and effect of hla genotype	Celiac disease risk in children of patients and effect of the hla genotype.
15	antituberculous therapy in pregnancy risks to the fetus	There are risks to the fetus from TB treatment during pregnancy.
15	right coronary endarterectomy a procedure with increased risk of perioperative infarction	Lapses; right coronary endarterectomy is an increased risk of perioperative infarction.
15	breast neoplasms in women treated with x rays for acute postpartum mastitis	Breast neoplasms in women treated with X-ray for acute mastitis post @-@partum.
15	oral contraceptives and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Oral contraceptives and nonfatal myocardial infarction.
15	noncontraceptive estrogens and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Non-contraceptive estrogen and non-fatal myocardial infarction.
15	treatment of common dog bites infection risk factors	Treatment of common dog bites infection risk factors.
15	children at risk performance of three year olds and their mentally ill and well mothers on an interaction task	Children at risk performance of three-year-old children and their mentally ill and healthy mothers on an ongoing task; interaction.
15	significance of fatty tissue hypertrophy for the metabolic risk	L' importance of apos; metabolic risk of fat hypertrophy.
15	female adolescent drinking behavior potential hazards	Alcohol consumption among teenagers: potential risks.
15	the natural history of calcium urolithiasis	L' natural history of calcium urolithiasis.
15	estrogen treatment of postmenopausal women benefits and risks	There are benefits and risks associated with estrogen treatment for post-menopausal women.
15	hla and chronic active hepatitis	Hla and chronic active hepatitis.
15	influence of height weight and obesity on risk of breast cancer in an unselected swedish population	Lapos; influence of height, weight and weight; obesity on risk of breast cancer in an unselected Swedish population.
15	normal serum cholesterol but low h d l cholesterol concentration in young patients with ischaemic cerebrovascular disease	Cholesterol is a normal serum cholesterol but low cholesterol level h dl in young patients with cerebrovascular ischemic disease.
15	safety of cimetidine	Uh, cimetidine safety.
15	incidence of skin carcinoma after renal transplantation	Impact of apos; skin adenocarcinoma after renal transplantation.
15	sequential evaluation of the supine hypertension or roll over test in a high risk population	Sequential evaluation of supine hypertension and/or reverse somatostatus in a high risk population.
15	the early risk of re replacement of aortic valves	There is an early risk of replacement of aortic valves.
15	selective screening for cervical cancer experience of the finnish mass screening system	Screening for cervical cancer as part of the mass screening system for Finns.
15	the hazard of old lead mines in wales	Danger of old lead mines in Wales.
15	the harlem regional stroke program an overview	The Harlem regional stroke program provides an overview of the situation.
15	thyroid disease following irradiation for benign conditions	Acute thyroid disease due to apos; radiation under benign conditions.
15	translumbar aortography a study of its safety and usefulness	Translumbar aortography: a study of its safety and utility.
15	soft tissue fluid determination by dichromatic absorptiometry	Soft tissue fluid determination by dichromatic absorptiometry.
15	the extracapsular cataract extraction without phacoemulsification	L' extracapsular cataract extraction without phaco-emulsification.
15	photocoagulation treatment of proliferative diabetic retinopathy the second report of diabetic retinopathy study findings	The photocoagulation treatment of proliferative diabetic retinopathy is the second report on diabetic retinopathy.
15	epidemiology of hodgkin s disease in the young	The epidemiology of Hodgkin's disease in the young.
15	histocompatibility leukocyte antigen patterns in nasopharyngeal carcinoma cases from california	Histocompatibility leukocyte antigen patterns in nasopharyngeal carcinoma cases from California.
15	psychological factors in failure to wear the milwaukee brace for treatment of idiopathic scoliosis	Psychological factors no-wear milwaukee support for treatment of idiopathic scoliosis.
15	the intermediate coronary care unit a stage in continued coronary care	An intermediate coronary care unit is a step in the continuum of coronary care.
15	an assessment of community suicide risk	Assessing community suicide risk.
15	religiosity and self destructive crises in the institutionalized elderly	Crises of religiosity and despair; self-destruction among the elderly in institutions.
15	attempted suicides 35 years afterward	Attempted suicide 35 years later.
15	estimation of suicide risk by the use of clinical models	Evaluation of suicide risk was carried out through the use of clinical models and clinical models.
15	abo blood groups and chicken pox in an indian population	Chickenpox and abo blood type in an Indian population.
15	electrocardiographic response to intravenous urography prospective evaluation of 275 patients	Electrocardiographic response to intravenous urography prospective assessment of 275 patients.
15	further comments on novel schedule tlvs	D' further comments on tlvs new schedule.
15	symptomatic myocardial infarction without chest pain prevalence and clinical course	Symptomatic myocardial infarction without chest pain and clinical progression.
15	influence of etiology of atrial fibrillation on incidence of systemic embolism	Influence of apos; etiology of atrial fibrillation on apos; systemic embolism.
15	provocative testing for coronary arterial spasm rationale risk and clinical illustrations	Challenge tests for coronary spasma risk and clinical illustrations.
15	treatment of chronic stable angina a preliminary report of survival data of the randomized veterans administration cooperative study	Treatment of apo; chronic stable angina, preliminary report of survival data for apo; randomized co-operative study of apo; veteran administration.
15	abnormal regulation of ventilation in infants at risk for sudden infant death syndrome	An abnormal regulation of ventilation in infants at risk of sudden infant death syndrome.
15	smoking a risk factor for spontaneous abortion	Smoking is a risk factor for spontaneous abortion.
15	lassa fever response to an imported case	Lassa fever response to an imported case.
15	the aetiology of acute pulmonary embolism and the identification of high risk groups	Lapos; apo etiology; acute pulmonary embolism and apo; identification of high risk groups.
15	coronary risk factors in various occupational groups the oslo study	Coronary risk factors in various occupational groups in Oslo.
15	stress effects on affiliation preferences among subjects possessing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Stress effects on coronary preference; affiliation in subjects with a typical coronary predisposition pattern of behaviour.
15	lung cancer in coastal georgia a death certificate analysis of occupation brief communication	Lung cancer in the coastal zone georgia a death certificate analysis of the apo; brief occupation communication.
15	detection of presymptomatic carriers of huntington s chorea	Detection of presymptomatic carriers of Huntington's chorea.
15	febrile convulsions followed by nonfebrile convulsions a clinical electroencephalographic and follow up study	Febrile convulsions followed by non-febrile convulsions, clinical electroencephalographic and follow-up study.
15	gram negative endocarditis following cystoscopy	Gram-negative, endocarditis following a cystoscopy.
15	imported diseases an assessment of trends	Imported diseases an assessment of trends.
15	diet and cancer of endocrine target organs	Nutrition and cancer of endocrine target organs.
15	the high risk perinatal registry a systematic approach for reducing perinatal mortality	The high-risk perinatal registry is a systematic approach to reducing perinatal mortality rates.
15	emergency decision making a theoretical analysis of responses to disaster warnings	Emergency decision-making Theoretical analysis of responses to disaster warnings.
15	precursor lesions in familial melanoma a new genetic preneoplastic syndrome	The precursor lesions to familial melanoma are a new genetic pre-neoplastic syndrome.
15	pregnancy and delivery among immigrants	The pregnancy and birth; childbirth among immigrants.
15	changing patterns and mortality of acute myocardial infarction in a coronary care unit	Changing patterns and mortality of coronary artery disease; acute myocardial infarction in a coronary care unit.
15	autopsy study of unoperated abdominal aortic aneurysms the case for early resection	Dapos study; autopsy of unoperated abdominal aortic aneurysms justifying early resection.
15	incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass grafting	Incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft.
15	ischemic heart disease in a group of men 35 to 44 engaged in stressful mental work data from the 1st examination	Ischemic heart disease in a group of men 35 to 44 engaged in stressful mental work data from the first review.
15	selection of groups of the male population 40 to 49 with risk factors for conducting primary prophylaxis of ischemic heart disease	Selection of groups of men aged 40 to 49 with risk factors for completion of apo; primary prophylaxis of ischemic heart disease.
15	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland in norway serum calcitonin in 300 relatives of 43 patients	Medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland in norway serum calcitonin in 300 parents of 43 patients.
15	risk and complications in peritoneoscopy	Risk and complications in peritoneoscopy.
15	hla b27 in ankylosing spondylitis differences in frequency and relative risk in american blacks and caucasians	Hla b27 in ankylosing spondylitis differences in frequency and relative risk in American blacks and caucasians.
15	how can the largest possible number of people be reached by a prophylaxis program in a country with a scattered population	How can you-reach as many people as possible through a prophylaxis program in a country where the population is dispersed?
15	concomitants of atherosclerotic carotid artery stenosis	Apos sinus stenosis; atherosclerotic carotid artery concomitantly.
15	menstrual regulation the method and the issues competing risks of unnecessary procedures and complications	To regulate the method and the issues of competing risk factors; unnecessary procedures and complications.
15	a simplified antepartum high risk pregnancy scoring form statistical analysis of 5459 cases	A statistical analysis of 5,459 cases is a simplified method of scoring high-risk pregnancies prior to delivery.
15	adriamycin cardiomyopathy risk factors	Cardiomyopathy: risk factors for coronary heart disease.
15	forecasting the development of primary hepatocellular carcinoma by the use of risk factors studies in west africa	Anticipate onset of primary hepatocellular carcinoma; assistance; studies of risk factors in West Africa.
15	induction of labour	Induction de main-d&apos.
15	fatalities in 2 070 psychiatric outpatients	Mortalities in 2,070 outpatient psychiatric patients.
15	coronary artery surgery in south australia 1970 1976	Coronary artery surgery in the south of the country.
15	neoplasms of the large bowel following ureterosigmoidostomy	Acute neoplasms of the large intestine following uretersigmoidostomy.
15	evaluation of nephrotoxic and ototoxic effects of tobramycin in worldwide study	Evaluation of nephrotoxic and ototoxic effects of tobramycin in a worldwide study.
15	follow up of survivors of childhood cancer	We're tracking the survivors of childhood cancer.
15	epidemiology of vaginal adenosis and adenocarcinoma associated with exposure to stilbestrol in utero	Epidemiology of vaginal adenosis and adenocarcinoma associated with exposure to stilbestrol in utero.
15	oral contraceptives and breast neoplasia	You know, oral contraceptives and breast neoplasia.
15	dose response evaluation of adriamycin in human neoplasia	Dose assessment-response of adriamycin in human neoplasia.
15	assessment of behavioral risk for coronary disease by voice characteristics	Assessment of the behavioural risk of coronary heart disease by voice characteristics.
15	uterine cancer and estrogen therapy	Cervical cancer; uterus and estrogen therapy.
15	vascular complications of long term oestrogen therapy	The vascular complications of long-term estrogen therapy.
15	relative risks of saccharin and calorie ingestion	Relative risks of apos; saccharin and calorie intake.
15	preoperative oral antacid therapy for patients requiring emergency surgery	Pre-operative oral anti-acid therapy for patients requiring emergency surgery.
15	fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites of patients with ulcerative colitis a high risk group for development of colon cancer	The fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites of patients with ulcerative colitis are a high-risk group for developing colon cancer.
15	adjuvant chemotherapy and immunotherapy in high risk patients with melanoma	Adding chemotherapy and immunotherapy in high risk patients with melanoma apos.
15	mortality from pneumonia and risk conditions during influenza epidemics high influenza morbidity during nonepidemic years	Pneumonia mortality and risk conditions during influenza epidemics High mortality due to influenza; influenza during non-epidemic years.
15	the spectrum of vitamin k deficiency	This is the spectrum of vitamin K deficiency.
15	cooperative study of hospital frequency and character of transient ischemic attacks iii variations in treatment	Cooperative study of hospital frequency and nature of transient ischemic attacks iii treatment changes.
15	distribution of various coronary risk factors in an urban general practice	Distribution of various coronary risk factors in an urban general practice.
15	the clinical significance of the risk factor hyperlipoproteinemia study on 2700 patients	Labs; clinical importance of the apo; study of apo; risk factor hyperlipoproteinemia in 2,700 patients.
15	ischaemic heart disease in the elderly	Ischemic heart disease in the elderly.
15	spontaneous abortion and the use of sugar substitutes saccharin	Spontaneous abortion and the use of sugar substitutes replace the saccharin.
15	the pattern of food and mortality in belgium	The structure of food and mortality in belgium.
15	community education for cardiovascular health	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	port moresby infant feeding survey	Port moresby, infant feeding survey.
15	survey of serum lipid levels in icelandic men aged 34 61 years an epidemiological and statistical evaluation	Survey of serum lipid levels in Icelandic men aged 34 to 61, epidemiological and statistical evaluation.
15	possibilities of error in eeg in sleep and consciousness electroencephalographic observations in 153 children	Apos possibilities; error in sleep and consciousness electroencephalographic observations in 153 children.
15	home testing for recurrent bacteriuria using nitrite strips	Home testing for recurrent bacteriuria at baseline; nitrite band help.
15	massive colonic diverticular hemorrhage in a transplant patient	Massive colonic diverticular hemorrhage in a transplant recipient.
15	management of household contacts of leprosy patients	Management of household contacts of leprosy patients.
15	life threatening surgical infection its development and prediction	Life-threatening surgical infection, its development and prediction.
15	relation between the race and economic status of patients and who performs their surgery	Relationship between race and economic status of patients and who performs their surgery.
15	estrogen use and cancer of the uterine corpus in alberta	Use of estrogens, estrogens and cancer of the uterus in Alberta.
15	high risk breast tumor patients	Patients at high risk for breast cancer.
15	risk factors and angiographically determined coronary occlusion	Risk factors and risk factors; angiographically determined coronary occlusion.
15	fecal constituents of a high risk north american and a low risk finnish population for the development of large bowel cancer	The Fecal Components of Apos; a northern population-of high risk and of apo; a population of Finnish at low risk for development of apo; cancer of the large intestine.
15	neonatal resuscitation	Uh, neonatal resuscitation.
15	estimation of relative risk from matched pairs in epidemiologic research	Relative risk estimation of matched pairs in epidemiological research.
15	stress and workload in pilots	Stress and workload in drivers.
15	risk factors associated with post cesarean section febrile morbidity	Post-cesarean risk factors associated with febrile morbidity.
15	obstetrics in cuba 1974	Uh, obstetrics in Cuba, 1974.
15	how old people tolerate intracranial surgery for aneurysm	How the elderly tolerate intracranial surgery for aneurysm.
15	a case control study of regular aspirin use and coronary deaths	Case study-control of apos; regular use of aspirin and coronary death.
15	pre cancers and liability to other diseases	Pre-cancer and liability for d' other diseases.
15	an assessment of the possible association of isoniazid with human cancer deaths	Evaluation of the possible association between isoniazid and human cancer deaths.
15	sodium etidronate in the treatment of paget s disease of bone a study of long term results	Sodium etidronate in the treatment of paget bone disease A study of the long-term outcomes of the treatment.
15	detection of a new lipoprotein lp a its occurrence in atherosclerosis with or without hyperlipemia	Detection of apos; a new lipoprotein lp appears in apos; atherosclerosis with or without hyperlipemia.
15	a 4 year prospective study of the relationship of different habitual vocational physical activity to risk and incidence of ischemic heart disease in volunteer male federal employees	Four-year prospective study of the relationship between work-life conflict; usual occupational physical activity and risk and risk; incidence of ischemic heart disease in male volunteer federal employees.
15	organic impairment in polydrug users risk factors	Organic deterioration of risk factors of polydrug users.
15	ano rectal abnormalities and esophageal atresia familial and epidemiological studies	Family ano rectal abnormalities and esophageal atresia and epidemiological studies.
15	assessment of cardiac risk in surgical patients	Assessing cardiac risk in surgical patients.
15	the case against pot	The case against the herb.
15	risk factors in stroke in a mexican american population houston	Risk factors in stroke in a Mexican American population houston.
15	retrolental fibroplasia a new analysis of risk factors based on recent cases	Retinal fibroplasia is a new analysis of risk factors based on recent cases.
15	risk of neonatal streptococcus b infection	Risk of neonatal streptococcal infection; risk of neonatal strep infection.
15	follow up studies in patients with right bundle branch block and left anterior hemiblock significance of h v interval	Follow-up studies in patients with right bundle branch block and significant anterior left hemiblock of the apos; hv interval.
15	prophylactic antibiotics in neonates with umbilical artery catheter placement a prospective study of 137 patients	Prophylactic antibiotics in newborns; an apo catheter; an umbilical artery Placement d' a prospective study of 137 patients.
16	antihistaminic drugs in dermatology	You know, antihistamine drugs in dermatology.
16	studies on spreading factors i the importance of mechanical factors in hyaluronidase action in skin	Propagation factors studies; importance of mechanical factors in apo; action of apo; hyaluronidase on skin.
16	liquid nitrogen in the treatment of skin diseases	Liquid nitrogen in the treatment of skin diseases.
16	the role of non precipitating antibodies in the passive sensitization of human skin by rabbit anti ovalbumin	The role of non-precipitating antibodies in the passive sensitization of human skin by rabbit ovalbumin antibodies.
16	studies of hypersensitivity to low molecular weight substances ii reactions of some allergenic substituted dinitrobenzenes with cysteine or cystine of skin proteins	Studies of apo; hypersensitivity to low molecular weight substances ii reactions of some substituted allergenic dinitrobenzenes with cysteine or cystine skin proteins.
16	studies on the antibodies in rabbit antisera responsible for sensitization of human skin i the role of impurities in crystalline egg albumin in stimulating the production of skin sensitizing antibody	Antibody studies in rabbit antisera responsible for sensitization of human skin i the role of impurities in apos; albumin; crystalline egg in stimulating apos production; skin sensitizing antibodies.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin ix the distribution of non specific esterases	The histology and cytochemistry of human skin ix the distribution of nonspecific esterases.
16	an electron microscope study of the epidermis of mammalian skin in thin sections i dermo epidermal junction and basal cell layer	An electron microscopic study of the epidermis of mammalian skin in thin sections of the i dermo epidermal junction and the basal cell layer.
16	investigation of the structure of the cornified epithelium of the human skin	Examination of the structure of the human skin; corneal epithelium.
16	electrolyte distribution and active salt uptake in frog skin	Distribution of electrolytes and active salt uptake in frog skin.
16	olfactory perception in migrating salmon i l serine a salmon repellent in mammalian skin	An olfactory perception in migrating salmon and a salmon repellent in the mammalian skin.
16	change in enzyme activity and ribonucleic acid concentration within the epidermal cell of the rat during the growth stage of the hair cycle	Changes in cell size, enzyme activity, and concentration of ribonucleic acid in the epidermal cell of the rat during the growth stage of the hair cycle.
16	the basement lamelia of amphibian skin its reconstruction after wounding	The sub-laminar skin floor d' amphibian its reconstruction after injury.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin xi the distribution of beta glucuronidase	The cytochemistry and histology of human skin xi the distribution of beta glucuronidase.
16	the characterization and localization of frog skin cholinesterase	Characterization and localization of frog skin cholinesterase activity.
16	collagen formation by fibroblasts of the chick embryo dermis	Collagen formation by fibroblasts of the dermis of the chicken embryo.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Nervous pathways of skin pain.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Nervous pathways of skin pain.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the clear cell of masson dendritic cell or melanocyte	Electron microscopic study of the human epidermis of the clear cell of the dendritic cell of the massoon or melanocyte.
16	the fine structure of the adepidermal reticulum in the basal membrane of the skin of the newt triturus	The fine structure of the adepidermal reticulum in the basement membrane of the skin of triturus triturus.
16	electron microscope observations of the melanocyte of the human epidermis	Epidermal observations by electron microscopy of the melanocyte of the human epidermis.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the cell boundaries and topography of the stratum malpighii	Study by electron microscopy of the human epidermis, the cell boundaries and the topography of the stratum malpighii.
16	a study of the distribution of 2 4 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and extracellular medium in relation to induction of contact skin sensitivity	A study of the distribution of 24 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and extracellular medium in relation to contact etapos; induction of skin sensitivity.
16	fine structure of the larval anuran epidermis with special reference to the figures of eberth	The fine structure of the larval epidermis of the anurans refers particularly to the figures d'apos; Eberth.
16	the fine structure of the interrelationship of cells in the human epidermis	The fine structure of the cell interrelationship in the human epidermis.
16	permeability of frog skin to choline	Permeability of frog skin with choline.
16	the effect of aminomethylpteroylglutamic acid on the development of skin hypersensitivity and on antibody formation in guinea pigs	Effect of lacidosis; aminomethylpteroylglutamic acid on the development of lacidosis; skin hypersensitivity and antibody formation in guinea pigs.
16	efficiency tests on a series of common skin antiseptics under ward conditions	Efficacy on a series of common skin antiseptics under room conditions.
16	staphylococci in septic fingers	Staph in septic fingers.
16	staining of skin with dihydroxyacetone	Dyeing of skin with dihydroxyacetone.
16	influence of the physical state of endotoxic preparations on dermal toxicity	L' influence of apos; physical state of endotoxic preparations on dermal toxicity.
16	homologous disease in the adult rat a model for autoimmune disease i general features and cutaneous lesions	Disease homologous in adult rat a model auto disease-immune i general characteristics and skin lesions.
16	skin resistance levels and galvanic skin response unilateral differences	Skin resistance levels and galvanic skin response differ unilaterally.
16	properties of acatalasic cells growing in vitro	Properties of acatalase cells growing in vitro.
16	burns and other skin lesions microcirculatory responses in man during healing	Acute burns and other skin lesions, microcirculatory responses in the apos; man during recovery.
16	sex chromatin mass in living cultivated human cells	Sexual chromatin mass in live cultured human cells.
16	the effect of hydrocortisone on the response of fetal rat skin in culture to ultraviolet irradiation	Effects of apos; hydrocortisone on the response of fetal rat skin in culture to apos; ultraviolet irradiation.
16	action of antidiuretic hormone on the equivalent pore radius at both surfaces of the epithelium of the isolated toad skin	Action of the apos; antidiuretic hormone on the pore radius equivalent to the two surfaces of the apos; isolated toad skin epithelium.
16	cutaneous sensory end organs of some anthropoid apes	Cutaneous sensory organs of some anthropoid monkeys.
16	calciphylaxis passive transfer	It's called passive transfer calcalphylaxis.
16	radiation dose to the skin and to the gonads from diagnostic x ray procedures	Dose of radiation to the skin and to the gonads resulting from diagnostic x-ray procedures.
16	a study of the fine structure of the epidermis of rana pipiens	A study of the fine structure of the epidermis of rana pipiens pipiens.
16	assay of vitamins and amino acids with cultured tissue cells and antimetabolites	Test for vitamins and amino acids with cultured tissue cells and antimetabolites.
16	collagenolytic activity of intact and necrotic connective tissue	Intact and necrotic connective tissue collagenolytic activity.
16	resurfacing of the thumb following major skin loss	Re-shape of the thumb following a significant loss of skin.
16	chromosome studies of normal and psoriatic skin fibroblasts	Chromosome studies of normal and psoriatic skin fibroblasts.
16	ultraviolet induced acantholysis in pemphigus	L' ultraviolet induces apos; acantholysis in pemphigus.
16	dermojet histopathological artifacts	These are histopathological dermojet artifacts.
16	intermolecular cross linking of collagen and the identification of a new beta component	Collagen intermolecular linkage and identification of a new beta component.
16	complement as a mediator of inflammation enhancement of vascular permeability by purified human c 1 esterase	Complimentary as mediator of apo; inflammatory enhancement of vascular permeability by purified human esterase c 1.
16	hurler s syndrome demonstration of an inherited disorder of connective tissue in cell culture	It's called howler syndrome, which shows an inherited disorder of connective tissue in a cell culture.
16	the susceptibility of chick embryo skin organ cultures to influenza virus following excess vitamin a	Vulnerability of food crops; food organs; chicken embryos to influenza virus following illness; excess vitamin a.
16	effects of anti rheumatic compounds and pyridine derivatives on the cutaneous response to thurfyl nicotinate in the guinea pig	Effects of anti-@-@rheumatizers and pyridine derivatives on the skin response to thurfyl nicotinate in the guinea pig.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles i determinants of the chronic nodular lesion of connective tissue	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles i determinants of connective tissue chronic nodular injury.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles ii purification by density gradient column electrophoresis	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles ii purification by density gradient column electrophoresis.
16	effect of a new inhibitor of cholesterol biosynthesis ay 9944 on serum and tissue sterols in the rat	Effect of a novel inhibitor of cholesterol synthesis ay 9944 on serum and tissue sterols in the rat.
16	specific sites of fatty acid sterol synthesis in isolated skin components	Specific site of fatty acid sterol synthesis in isolated skin components.
16	fine structure of desmosomes hemidesmosomes and an adepidermal globular layer in developing newt epidermis	A fine d&apos structure; desmosome hemidesmosomes and an epidermal globular layer in newborn epidermis development.
16	a fine structural analysis of the epidermis of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	A fine structural analysis of the epidermis of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l.
16	mediators of inflammation in leukocyte lysosomes ii mechanism of action of lysosomal cationic protein upon vascular permeability in the rat	Inflammation in leukocyte lysosomes ii mechanism of inflammation; action of lysosomal cationic protein on vascular permeability in rat.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study in cell culture	Syndrome hurler s a genetic study in cell culture.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles 3 dermonecrotic reaction to cell wall mucopeptides	Biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles 3 dermonecrotic reaction to cell wall mucopeptides.
16	passage of lipid across vascular endothelium in newborn rats an electron microscopic study	The passage of lipids into the vascular endothelium of newborn rats (@-@) was studied by electron microscopy.
16	a special fibril of the dermis	It's a special fibril of the dermis.
16	effects of d2o and osmotic gradients on potential and resistance of the isolated frog skin	Effects of d2o and osmotic gradients on potential and resistance of isolated frog skin.
16	quantitative studies of the antagonism by nalorphine of some of the actions of morphine like analgesic drugs	Quantitative studies of l' antagonism by nalorphine of certain actions of morphine such as painkillers.
16	collagen defect induced by penicillamine	Collagen failure induced by penicillamine.
16	itch and vibration	Itching and vibrations.
16	cell junctions in amphibian skin	Cellular junctions in amphibian skin.
16	the intraepidermal innervation of the snout skin of the opossum a light and electron microscope study with observations on the nature of merkel s tastzellen	L' intra-epidermal innervation of the snout skin of l' opossum with observations on the nature of merkel s tastzellen was studied by light and electron microscopy.
16	soluble proteins of a melanoma and normal skin from the swordtail platyfish and their hybrids	Soluble proteins from melanoma and dapos; normal skin from the plant; platyfish espadon and their hybrids.
16	sweating direct influence of skin temperature	The sweating directly affects the temperature of the skin.
16	polysome morphology evidence for endocrine control during chick embryogenesis	Polysome morphology, endocrine control during chick embryogenesis and chick embryogenesis.
16	the dstribution of calcium 47 in the rat	Contribution of calcium 47 in the rat.
16	absence or singular specificity of carotenoids in some lower fishes	The absence or singular specificity of carotenoids in some lower fish.
16	transformation of mycelial and yeast forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis in cultures and in experimental inoculations	Transformation of mycelial and yeast forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis in experimental cultures and inoculations.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors toxicity studies on animals	Dermal temperature recording with apo; Phosphorus Toxicity Studies in Animals.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors a new technique	Skin temperature recording with phosphores, a new technique.
16	striae and their relation to topical steroid therapy	Tissue striations and their relation to topical steroid therapy.
16	effects of arterial hypoxia on the cutaneous circulation of the rabbit	Effects of apo; arterial hypoxia on the skin circulation of the rabbit.
16	presence and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in bovine skin	Presence and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in cattle skin.
16	thermal denaturation of soluble calf skin collagen	Thermal denaturation of soluble calf skin collagen.
16	preparation and properties of a cell free system from rat skin that catalyzes sterol biosynthesis	Preparation and properties of a cell-free system of rat skin that catalyzes sterol biosynthesis.
16	ultrastructural studies of human cutaneous nerve with special reference to lamellated cell inclusions and vacuole containing cells	Ultrastructural studies of human skin nerve, particularly lamellar cell inclusions and cells containing vacuoles.
16	lipogenesis from amino acids in perfused isolated dog skin	Lipogenesis from amino acids in perfused isolated dog skin.
16	hurler s syndrome effect of retinol vitamin a alcohol on cellular mucopolysaccharides in cultured human skin fibroblasts	Hurler s syndrome effect of retinol vitamin a alcohol on cell mucopolysaccharides in cultured human skin fibroblasts.
16	staphylococcus aureus on the hair	Staphylococcus aureus on the hair.
16	collagen structural studies based on the cleavage of methionyl bonds	Collagen structural studies based on cleavage of the methionyl bonds.
16	development of antigens in human cells infected with simian virus 40	Development of antigens in human cells infected with simian virus.
16	delayed dermal hypersensitivity in mice to spherule and mycelial extracts of coccidioides immitis	The mouse dermal hypersensitivity to spherule and mycelial extracts of coccidioides immitis was delayed.
16	enzymatic solubilization of insoluble proteins at neutral ph	Enzyme solubilization of insoluble proteins at neutral ph.
16	degradation of streptococcal cell wall antigens in vivo	Degradation of streptococcal cell wall antigens in vivo.
16	a comparison of the responses of frog skin receptors to mechanical and electrical stimulation	Comparison of the responses of frog skin receptors to mechanical and electrical stimulation.
16	a visco elastic theory of mechanoreceptor adaptation	A visco-elastic theory of mechanoreceptor adaptation.
16	mechanoreceptors in rabbit ear skin innervated by myelinated nerve fibres	In rabbit ears innervated by myelinated nerve fibers, mechanoreceptors are innervated by nerve fibers.
16	persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls related to chronic inflammation of rabbit dermal connective tissue	The persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls is related to chronic inflammation of rabbit dermal connective tissue.
16	cocoon surrounding desert dwelling frogs	Conjacent cocoon frogs living in the desert.
16	vitamin c induced increase of dermatan sulfate in cultured hurler s fibroblasts	Vitamin c induced an increase in dermatan sulfate in cultured hurler fibroblasts.
16	hypophyseal control of genetic expression during chick feather and skin differentiation	Pituitary control of apos; genetic expression during feather and skin differentiation of chicks.
16	langerhans cells uptake of tritiated thymidine	The langerhans cells collect tritiated thymidine.
16	chemical cue preferences of inexperienced snakes comparative aspects	Chemical preferences of inexperienced snake markers comparative aspects.
16	responses of human somatosensory cortex to stimuli below threshold for conscious sensation	Reactions of human somatosensory cortex to stimuli below the threshold of conscious sensation.
16	susceptibility of human diploid fibroblast strains to transformation by sv40 virus	Vulnerability of human diploid fibroblast strains to transformation by sv40 virus.
16	the serologic specificity of tropocollagen telopeptides	Serological specificity of telopeptides of tropocollagin.
16	the interrelation of thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflexes in the control of the blood vessels in the human forearm	Interrelation of thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflexes in the control of blood vessels in the apos; before-human arm.
16	leukotactic factor elaborated by mixtures of genetically dissimilar cells	Leukotactic factor developed by mixtures of genetically dissimilar cells.
16	skin sensory afterglows	The skin glows under the light effect.
16	centromere absence of dna replication during chromatid separation in human fibroblasts	DNA in centromeres during chromatid separation in human fibroblasts.
16	synthesis and turnover of collagen precursors in rabbit skin	Synthesis and renewal of collagen precursors in rabbit skin tissue.
16	the separation of the alpha chains of collagen by free flow electrophoresis	The separation of the alpha chains of collagen by free flow gel electrophoresis.
16	refsum s disease nature of the enzyme defect	Refsum disease of the liver; enzyme deficient.
16	myelinated afferent fibres innervating the primate skin and their response to noxious stimuli	Myelinated afferent fibers innervating primate skin and their response to noxious stimuli.
16	peripheral modification of sensory nerve responses after cross regeneration	Peripheral modification of sensory nerve responses after cross regeneration.
16	local and reflex factors affecting the distribution of the peripheral blood flow during arterial hypoxia in the rabbit	Local factors and reflexes affecting the distribution of peripheral blood flow during apo; arterial hypoxia in rabbits.
16	distribution of peripheral blood flow in primary tissue hypoxia induced by inhalation of carbon monoxide	Distribution of peripheral blood flow in primary tissue hypoxia induced by carbon monoxide inhalation.
16	effects of haemorrhage on the distribution of the peripheral blood flow in the rabbit	Effects of hemorrhage on the distribution of peripheral blood flow in the rabbit.
16	responses of skin blood vessels to bradykinin histamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Reactions of the blood vessels to bradykinin histamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine.
16	animal identification i liquid nitrogen branding of cattle	Animal identification i tagging; liquid nitrogen from cattle.
16	animal identification ii freeze branding of seals for laboratory identification	Identification of animals ii Cold tagging of seals for laboratory identification.
16	the topology of dermatomal projection in the medial lemniscal system	The topology of dermatomal projection in the median lemniscal system.
16	biological effects of leptospiral lipids	The biological effects of leptospiral lipids.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study of clones in cell culture with particular reference to the lyon hypothesis	Hurler syndrome is a genetic study of clones in cell culture with specific reference to the lyon hypothesis.
16	concanavalin a in vivo induction of hemorrhagic skin lesions arthus like reactions in mice	Concanavalin a in vivo induction of hemorrhagic arthrotic skin lesions such as reactions in mice.
16	copper relation to penicillamine induced defect in collagen	Ratio of copper to penicillamine Collagen deficiency induced by penicillamine.
16	the effect of gamma irradiation on soluble collagen	The effect of gamma irradiation on the collagen's soluble state.
16	the lipid substances and cytopathic effects in man of bcg strain copenhagen and attenuated vole bacillus strain prague	Lipid substances and cytopathic effects in copenhagen strain bcg and attenuated vole strain prague men.
16	effect of diethylstilbestrol on skin sterols of the male rat	Dietary effect of diethylstilbestrol on skin sterols of male rat.
16	multiple temperature sensitive spots innervated by single nerve fibers	Multiple heat-sensitive spots innervated by single nerve fibers.
16	neuronal specification of cutaneous nerves through connections with skin grafts in the frog	Neuronal specification of skin nerves through connections with skin grafts in frog.
16	sensitization of smooth muscle to plasma kinins effects of enzymes and peptides on various preparations	Sensitization of smooth muscle to plasma kinins effects of enzymes and peptides on various preparations.
16	the influence of the cellular infiltrate on the evolution and intensity of delayed hypersensitivity reactions	L' influence of the apos; cell infiltration on the apos; evolution and apos; intensity of reactions; delayed hypersensitivity.
16	collagen has a discrete family of reactive hydroxylysyl and lysyl side chain amino groups	Collagen has a discrete family of reactive hydroxylysyl and lysyl amino groups.
16	variations in purine metabolism of cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with gout	Purine metabolism of cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with gout.
16	size discrimination on the skin	Size discrimination on the skin.
16	herpesvirus type 2 association with carcinoma of the cervix	Association of Apos; herpesvirus type 2 cervical carcinoma; uterus.
16	l lactic acid a mosquito attractant isolated from humans	Lactic acid is a mosquito attractant isolated from humans.
16	gaucher s disease a genetic disease detected in skin fibroblast cultures	Detected genetic disease in skin fibroblast cultures.
16	the metabolism of n triphenylmethylmorpholine in the dog and rat	The metabolism of n triphenylmethylmorpholine in dogs and rats.
16	sources of gas gangrene in hospital	Sources of gaseous gangrene in hospital.
16	serial reconstruction of the characteristic granule of the langerhans cell	Serial reconstruction of the characteristic granule of the langerhans cell.
16	the effects of oral contraceptives on the endometrium	The effects of oral contraceptives on the endometrium.
16	the dermal chromatophore unit	L' dermal chromatophore unit.
16	the conversion of testosterone to 5 alpha androstan 17 beta ol 3 one dihydrotestosterone by skin slices of man	Conversion of testosterone to 5 alpha androstan 17 beta ol 3 1 dihydrotestosterone by slices of skin d'apos; man.
16	synthesis and degradation of collagen in the developing corium of the chick embryo	Synthesis and degradation of collagen in the developing corium of the chicken embryo.
16	a study of the mechanism of water transfer across frog skin by a comparison of the permeability of the skin to deuterated and tritiated water	A study of the mechanism of transfer of d' water through the frog skin by a comparison of the permeability of the skin to l' deuterated water and tritiated water.
16	rapid diagnosis of herpesvirus hominis infections in superficial lesions by immunofluorescent antibody technics	Rapid diagnosis of herpesvirus hominis infections by immunofluorescent antibody technics in surface lions.
16	vitamin a induced synthesis of alkaline phosphatase	Vitamin induced synthesis of alkaline phosphatase.
16	cystathionine synthase in tissue culture derived from human skin enzyme defect in homocystinuria	The cystathionine synthase in tissue culture is derived from apos; a defect in the human skin enzyme during apos; homocystinuria.
16	sexual behavior stimulation by painful electrical shock to skin in male rats	Stimulation of sexual behavior in male rats by painful electrical shock to the skin.
16	study of delayed hypersensitivity to myxoviruses induced by vaccines	Study of apo; delayed hypersensitivity to myxoviruses induced by vaccines.
16	elastofibroma dorsi	Uh, Elastofibroma dorsi.
16	embryonic morphogenesis role of fibrous lattice in the development of feathers and feather patterns	Embryonic morphogenetic role of the fibrous network in the development of feathers and feather patterns.
16	comparative antibacterial activity of hexachlorophane in different formulations used for skin disinfection	Comparative antibacterial activity of hexachlorophane in different formulations used for skin disinfection.
16	increased free cystine content of fibroblasts cultured from patients with cystinosis	Increase free cystine content of cultured fibroblasts from patients with cystinosis.
16	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas a study in cell culture	The cystic fibrosis of the pancreas is a study in cell culture.
16	hurler and hunter syndromes mutual correction of the defect in cultured fibroblasts	Hurler syndrome-hunter Mutual correction of the defect in cultured fibroblasts.
16	morphological and biochemical characterization of goldfish erythrophores and their pterinosomes	Morphological and biochemical characterization of goldfish erythrophores and their pterinosomes.
16	glycolipid and mucopolysaccharide abnormality in fibroblasts of fabry s disease	Glycolipid and mucopolysaccharide defects in fibroblasts of Fabry's disease.
16	human wound repair i epidermal regeneration	Repair of human wounds i epidermal regeneration.
16	human wound repair ii inflammatory cells epithelial mesenchymal interrelations and fibrogenesis	Repair of human wounds ii inflammatory mesenchymal cells epithelial and fibrogenesis.
16	cholesterol requirement of primary diploid human fibroblasts	Cholesterol requirements in primary diploid human fibroblasts.
16	partial hydroxylation of certain lysines in collagen	Partial hydroxylation of certain lysines in collagen.
16	keratohyalin extraction and in vitro aggregation	Keratohyaline extraction and in vitro aggregation.
16	skin replication procedure for the scanning electron microscope	Cutaneous replication procedure for the scanning electron microscope.
16	acth and decubitus ulceration an experimental study	This is an experimental study on acth and apos; ulceration of the decubitus.
16	myotonic muscular dystrophy abnormalities in fibroblast culture	Myotonic abnormalities in fibroblast culture of muscular dystrophy.
16	permeability increasing activity in hereditary angioneurotic edema plasma ii mechanism of formation and partial characterization	Increased permeability; activity in angio-eurotic hereditary plasma; edema ii mechanism of formation and partial characterization.
16	activation of hageman factor by collagen	Activation of lamb factor by collagen.
16	a symmetrical extracellular fibril	Uh, a symmetrical extracellular fibril.
16	carbenicillin resistance in pseudomonas aeruginosa from clinical material	Carbenicillin resistance in pseudomonas aeruginosa from clinical material.
16	role of candida albicans infection in napkin rashes	Role of lacidosis; candida albicans infection in towel rash.
16	new sialic acid containing sulfolipid ungulic acid	New sialic acid containing sulfolipid ungulic acid.
16	demonstration of a bactericidal substance against beta hemolytic streptococci in supernatant fluids of staphylococcal cultures	Evidence of a bactericidal substance against beta-hemolytic streptococci in supernatants of staphylococcal cultures.
16	melanoma and pigmentation of the leptomeninges in ugandan africans	Melanoma and pigmentation of the leptomeninges of ugandan africans.
16	white blood cell cultures in genetic studies on the human mucopolysaccharidoses	White blood cell cultures in genetic studies of the human mucopolysaccharide.
16	induction of melanin synthesis in albino mouse skin by dna from pigmented mice	Induction of melanin synthesis in albino mouse skin by DNA from pigmented mice.
16	the defect in hurler and hunter syndromes ii deficiency of specific factors involved in mucopolysaccharide degradation	Failure of howler and hunter syndromes ii Failure of specific factors involved in mucopolysaccharide degradation.
16	the classification of staphylococci from colonized ventriculo atrial shunts	The classification of staphylococci from ventricular atrial derivatives colonized by ventricle.
16	studies on the migratory behavior of melanocytes in guinea pig skin	Studies on the migratory behaviour of melanocytes in guinea pig skin.
16	polysaccharide in delayed hypersensitivity i pneumococcal polysaccharide as inducer and elicitor of delayed reactivity in guinea pigs	Polysaccharide in delayed hypersensitivity i pneumococcal polysaccharide as inducer and trigger of delayed reactivity in guinea pigs.
16	polydactyly and other minor stigmata associated with 46 xx 47 xx d mosaicism	Polydactylie and other minor stigmas associated with 46 x 47 x x x mosaic d.
16	beta glucuronidase activity in skin components of children with cystic fibrosis	Beta glucuronidase activity in skin components of children with cystic fibrosis.
16	comparison of the reflex reactivity of skin and muscle veins in the human forearm	Comparison of the reflex reactivity of skin and muscle veins of l' before-human arm.
16	chick cartilage collagen a new type of alpha 1 chain not present in bone or skin of the species	Chicken cartilage collagen is a new type of alpha 1 chain that is not present in bone or skin; species.
16	the role of skin and muscle resistance vessels in reflexes mediated by the baroreceptor system	The role of skin and muscle resistance vessels in reflexes mediated by the baroreceptor system.
16	increased vascular permeability produced by human platelet granule cationic extract	Increases in vascular permeability produced by human platelet granule cationic extract.
16	cuticular lipids of adults and puparia of the australian sheep blowfly lucilia cuprina wied	The cuticular lipids of adults and pupae of the Australian meat fly lucilia cuprina were examined.
16	ultraviolet light alteration of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid in vivo	Ultraviolet radiation alteration of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid in vivo.
16	evidence for intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two human diploid strains each carrying an x linked mutation	Evidence of intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two human diploid strains each carrying an x-linked mutation.
16	metachromatic leukodystrophy arylsulfatase a deficiency in skin fibroblast cultures	Leucodystrophy metachromatic arylsulfatase, a deficiency in skin fibroblast cultures.
16	reversible transformation of fibrous collagen to a soluble state in vivo	Reversible conversion of fibrous collagen to a soluble state in vivo.
16	parasexual cycle in cultivated human somatic cells	Parasexual cycle in human somatic cells cultured.
16	erythropoietic protoporphyria iv protection from sunlight	Erythropoietic proto-phyria iv protection from sunlight.
16	evidence that xeroderma pigmentosum cells do not perform the first step in the repair of ultraviolet damage to their dna	It appears that xeroderma pigmentosum n&apos cells do not perform the first step in repairing ultraviolet damage to their DNA.
16	chemical and electrical synaptic connexions between cutaneous mechanoreceptor neurones in the central nervous system of the leech	Chemical and electrical synaptic connections between cutaneous mechanoreceptor neurons in the central nervous system of the leech.
16	presence of caerulein in extracts of the skin of leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and of xenopus laevis	Evidence of caerulein in extracts of the skin of leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and xenopus laevis.
16	osmium zinc iodide reactive sites in the epidermal langerhans cell	Zinc iodide reactive sites in langerhans epidermal cell osmium.
16	severe local reaction following live measles virus in guinea pigs previously inoculated with killed virus	A severe local reaction following isolation; inoculation of live measles virus into guinea pigs previously inoculated with the killed virus.
16	acute effects of a monoamine oxidase inhibitor tranylcypromine on thermoregulation in the conscious rabbit	Acute effects of monoamine oxidase inhibitor tranylcypromine on the thermoregulation of conscious rabbits.
16	the action of glucosulphone n n di glucose sodium sulphonate of 4 4 diaminodiphenyl sulphone on pancreatic kallikrein	L' action of the glucose sodium sulfonate n-glucosulphone of 4 diaminodiphenyls sulphone on pancreatic kallikrein.
16	structure and pharmacological actions of phyllocaerulein a caerulein like nonapeptide its occurrence in extracts of the skin of phyllomedusa sauvagei and related phyllomedusa species	Structure and pharmacological actions of phyllocaerulein a caerulein as non-apeptide present in extracts of the skin of phyllomedusa sauvagei and related species of phyllomedusa.
16	wound healing and collagen formation vi the origin of the wound fibroblast studied in parabiosis	The wound healing and collagen formation process is the origin of the wound fibroblasts studied in parabiosis.
16	the metabolism of the insecticide carbaryl 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by fat body of the blowfly larva calliphora erythrocephala	Metabolism of l' insecticide carbaryl 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by the fat body of the larval fly calliphora erythrocephala.
16	which disposable chest electrode	What disposable chest electrode?
16	interferon induction increased through chemical modification of a synthetic polyribonucleotide	Interferon was increased by chemical modification of a synthetic polyribonucleotide.
16	the role of normal skin in the spread of streptococcal pyoderma	The role of normal skin in the spread of streptococcal pyoderma.
16	staphylococcal epidemiology in antarctica	Staphyloccal epidemiology in antarctica.
16	correlation of initial changes in the mouse epidermal cell population with two stage carcinogenesis a quantitative study	A quantitative study established the correlation between initial changes in the mouse epidermal cell population and two-stage carcinogenesis.
16	effect of pregnancy on sebum excretion	Effect of pregnancy on sebum excretion.
16	differentiating neoplasms of hair germ	Neoplasms differentiating the hair germ.
16	dimethylbenzanthracene tumorigenesis and aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in mouse skin inhibition by 7 8 benzoflavone	Dimethylbenzanthracene tumorigenesis and aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in skin inhibition by 7 benzoflavone.
16	genetic inactivation of the alpha galactosidase locus in carriers of fabry s disease	Genetic inactivation of the alpha galactosidase locus in carriers of Fabry s.
16	optimum skin blending method for quantifying poultry carcass bacteria	Optimal cutaneous blending method for quantifying poultry carcass bacteria.
16	lesch nyhan syndrome preventive control by prenatal diagnosis	Prevention of Lesch Nyhan syndrome by prenatal diagnosis.
16	defect in dna synthesis in skin of patients with xeroderma pigmentosum demonstrated in vivo	Failure of apo synthesis; DNA in skin of patients with pigment xeroderma demonstrated in vivo.
16	tissue distribution of progesterone 7 h3 in the female genital tract 8 hours after intravenous administration	Tissue distribution of progesterone 7 h3 in the apos; female genital apparatus 8 hours after intravenous administration.
16	bactericidal properties of tego 103 s and tego 103 g	The bactericidal properties of tego 103 s and tego 103 g.
16	scheie and hurler syndromes apparent identity of the biochemical defect	The identity of the biochemical defect appears to be the scheie and howler syndromes.
16	nitrogen requirements and uricolytic activity of cutaneous bacteria	The nitrogen requirements and uricolytic activity of skin bacteria.
16	collagen molecules distribution of alpha chains	Distribution of alpha chains by collagen molecules.
16	comparative enumeration of lipophilic and nonlipophilic cutaneous diphtheroids and cocci	Comparative counting of lipophilic and non-lipophilic cutaneous diphtheroids and cocci.
16	effects of systemic demethylchlortetracycline on human cutaneous microflora	The effects of systemic demethylchlortetracycline on human skin microflora.
16	mechanism of prophylaxis by silver compounds against infection of burns	Dapos-based prophylaxis mechanisms; money against infection from burns.
16	toxin from skin of frogs of the genus atelopus differentiation from dendrobatid toxins	The skin toxin of frogs of the genus atelopus differentiates from dendrobatid toxins.
16	studies in vivo on the biosynthesis of collagen and elastin in ascorbic acid deficient guinea pigs	In vivo studies on the biosynthesis of collagen and elastin in ascorbic acid deficient guinea pigs.
16	the relationship between reversibility of fibril formation and subunit composition of rat skin collagen	The relationship between reversibility of fibrillar formation and the composition of rat skin collagen sub-units.
16	cell free transmission and in vivo replication of marek s disease virus	Cell-free transmission and in vivo replication of mares disease virus.
16	synthesis of lipids from acetate by human preputial and abdominal skin in vitro	Synthesis of lipids from d' acetate by human preputial and abdominal skin in vitro.
16	evidence for the chylomicron origin of lipids accumulating in diabetic eruptive xanthomas a correlative lipid biochemical histochemical and electron microscopic study	Evidence of apo; chylomicron origin of lipid accumulated in xanthomasruptive diabetics, correlative histochemical and electron microscopic studies of lipids.
16	localization of antigenic determinants in the polypeptide chains of collagen	Localization of antigenic determinants in the polypeptide chains of collagen.
16	peritoneal infections in patients on long term peritoneal dialysis before and after human cadaveric renal transplantation	Peritoneal infections in patients on long-term peritoneal dialysis before and after human cadaveric renal transplantation.
16	the extraction of polymeric collagen from biopsies of human skin	L' extraction of polymeric collagen from human skin biopsies.
16	foot skin ischaemia in atherosclerotic peripheral vascular disease	Foot skin ischemia in atherosclerotic peripheral vascular diseases.
16	cellular and vascular components of the allograft reaction evidence from returned skin allografts	Cellular and vascular components of the allograft reaction; evidence of return of allograft allograft skin allograft.
16	the effects of histamine in malaria	The effects of histamine on malaria.
16	human skin collagenase the role of serum alpha globulins in the control of activity in vivo and in vitro	Human skin collagenase the role of serum alpha globulins in the control of in vivo and in vitro activity.
16	eggshell thinning in japanese quail fed mercuric chloride	The eggshell is s' thinning in Japanese quail fed mercuric chloride.
16	kinetics of acetylcholine synthesis and hydrolysis in myasthenia gravis	Kinetics of synthesis and synthesis; hydrolysis of acetylcholine in myasthenia gravis.
16	the glycosaminoglycans of neonatal rat skin	The glycosaminoglycans of neonatal rat skin.
16	skin collagen and thickness in women with hirsuties	Collagen and skin thickness in women with hirsuties.
16	the natural history of molluscum contagiosum in fijian children	L' natural history of molluscum contagiosum in children of Fijians.
16	the lymphatic status of hamster cheek pouch tissue in relation to its properties as a graft and as a graft site	L' lymphatic state of the hamster cheek tissue in relation to its properties as a graft and as a graft site.
16	determination of arterial blood flow by percutaneously introduced flow sensors in an external magnetic field i the method	Determination of arterial blood flow using percutaneous introduced flow sensors in an external magnetic field i the method.
16	localization of permeability barriers in the frog skin epithelium	Localization of the permeability barriers in the frog skin epithelium.
16	formation and origin of basal lamina and anchoring fibrils in adult human skin	Formation and origin of basal lamina and anchoring of fibrils in adult human skin.
16	skin collagen and thickness in simple obesity	Collagen and skin thickness in simple obesity.
16	skin capillary blood flow in scleroderma	Dermal capillary blood flow in scleroderma.
16	the influence of thyroactive substances on the induction of cervico vaginal tumours in intact and castrate rats	The influence of thyroactive substances on the induction of cervical vaginal tumours in intact and castrate rats.
16	fabry s disease antenatal detection	Prenatal detection of Fabry's disease.
16	cutaneous reactions to intradermal prostaglandins	Skin reactions to intradermal prostaglandins.
16	studies on the nature of sweat gland fatigue in the goat	Studies on the nature of sweat gland fatigue in the goat.
16	nuclear magnetic resonance of sodium 23 linoleate water basis for an alternative interpretation of sodium 23 spectra within cells	Nuclear magnetic resonance of sodium linoleate 23 based on d' water for an alternative interpretation of the spectra of sodium 23 at l' inner cells.
16	chloroquine concentrations in the skin of rabbits and man	Concentrations of chloroquine in the skin of rabbits and men.
16	inhibition of contact sensitivity in the mouse by topical application of corticosteroids	Inhibition of contact sensitivity in mice by epos; topical application of corticosteroids.
16	hyposensitization with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus antigen trial in asthma induced by house dust	Dapos test; potato hyposensitization; dermatophagoides pteronyssinus antigen in apos; asthma induced by household dust.
16	skin bacteria and skin disinfection reconsidered	The skin bacteria and skin disinfection have been reconsidered.
16	distinctive characteristics of nucleoli of two established cell lines	Distinct characteristics of the nucleoli of two established cell lines.
16	disinfection of the skin an assessment of some new preparations	Disinfection of the skin and evaluation of some new preparations.
16	inductive interactions between human dermis and chick chorionic epithelium	Inductive interactions between human dermis and chicken chorionic epithelium.
16	neurofibromatosis and leprosy	Uh, neurofibromatosis and leprosy.
16	studies on purified rheumatoid synovial collagenase in vitro and in vivo	Purified in vitro and in vivo rheumatoid synovial collagenase studies.
16	localized skin changes induced by depot injections of vitamin a in the rat	Localized skin changes induced by depot injections of vitamin a in the rat.
16	significance of cytoplasmic microtubules in lupus nephritis	L' importance of cytoplasmic microtubules in lupus nephritis.
16	human phosphoglycerate kinase and inactivation of the x chromosome	The human phosphoglycerate kinase and l' inactivation of the x chromosome.
16	osteoporosis skin collagen and androgen	Skin collagen and androgen for osteoporosis.
16	cutaneous changes associated with marek s disease of chickens	Skin changes associated with disease of chickens.
16	early and late incorporation of tritiated thymidine into skin cells and the presence of a long lived g 0 specific precursor pool	Early and late incorporation of tritiated thymidine into skin cells and the presence of a long-lasting pool of specific g0 precursors.
16	effect of estradiol 17 on collagen biosynthesis degradation and re utilization in vivo	Effect of apos; estradiol 17 on collagen biosynthesis degradation and in vivo reuse.
16	the distribution of cutaneous receptors in the rabbit s hind limb and differential electrical stimulation of their axons	The distribution of cutaneous receptors in the rabbit hindlimb and differential electrical stimulation of their axons.
16	diffusible factors from malignant cells which affect epidermal survival and differentiation	Dissolvable factors in malignant cells that affect epidermal survival and differentiation.
16	cytochalasin b effects on microfilaments and movement of melanin granules within melanocytes	Effects of cytochalasin b on microfilaments and movement of melanin granules within melanocytes.
16	water uptake by the crab eating frog rana cancrivora as affected by osmotic gradients and by neurohypophysial hormones	Absorption of water by crab feeding on rana cancrivora frogs is affected by osmotic gradients and by neurohypophysial hormones.
16	histrionicotoxins roentgen ray analysis of the novel allenic and acetylenie spiroalkaloids isolated from a colombian frog dendrobates histrionicus	Histrionicotoxin analysis of roentgen rays of new allenic and acetylenic spiroalkaloids isolated from a dendrobate histrionicus Columbian frog.
16	potentially infectious agents associated with shearling bedpads effect of laundering with detergent disinfectant combinations on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa	Potentially infectious agents associated with shear bed pads are known to have the effect of washing them with detergent disinfectant combinations on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa.
16	lactic acid utilization by the cutaneous micrococcaceae	Use of l' lactic acid by micrococcaceae.
16	rapid identification and typing of herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 by a direct immunofluorescence technique	Rapid identification and typing of apoviruses; herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 by direct immunofluorescence.
16	the distribution of antigenic determinants in rat skin collagen	The distribution of antigenic determinants in rat skin collagen.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity i a new look at the jones mote reaction general characteristics	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity i a new look at the general characteristics of Jones mote.
16	the use of an unnatural prostaglandin in the termination of pregnancy	It is important to note that the use of prostaglandin during pregnancy is not a natural part of pregnancy.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters i the epidermolytic syndrome description and studies on its procurement	An analysis of the Syrian hamster graft-host disease relationship was carried out as part of the epidermolytic syndrome description and acquisition studies.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters ii the epidermolytic syndrome studies on its pathogenesis	An analysis of graft versus needle disease in Syrian hamster ii studies of epidermolytic syndrome on its pathogenesis.
16	implantation transplantation and epithelial mesenchymal relationships in the rat uterus	Transplantation and epithelial mesenchymal relationships in the uterus of the rat.
16	further studies on metachromasia in cultured human fibroblasts staining of glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharides by alcian blue in salt solutions	Other studies on metachromasis in cultured human fibroblasts staining mucopolysaccharide glycosaminoglycans with d&apos blue; alcian in saline solutions.
16	melanin pigmentation an in vivo model for studies of melanosome kinetics within keratinocytes	Melanin pigmentation is an in vivo model for apos studies of melanosome kinetics in keratinocytes.
16	clinical evaluation of kethoxal against cutaneous herpes simplex	Clinical evaluation of kethoxal against skin apos; simplex herpes.
16	immunobiological activity of cell wall antigens of staphylococcus aureus	Immunobiological activity of cell wall antigens of staphylococcus aureus.
16	cellular reaction in the footpad and draining lymph nodes of mice induced by mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli	Cellular response in the pedal cushion and draining lymph nodes of mice induced by mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli.
16	united states standard diphtheria toxin for the schick text and the erythema potency assay for the schick text dose	States-U.S. standard diphtheria toxin for schick text and l&apos potency test; erythema for schick text schick text dose text.
16	cell mediated hypersensitivity in rabbits infected with trypanosoma brucei and trypanosoma rhodesiense	Cell-mediated hypersensitivity in rabbits infected with trypanosoma brucei and trypanosoma rhodesiense.
16	the preparation of an alkali soluble collagen from demineralized bone	Preparation of an alkali-soluble collagen from demineralized bone.
16	blood flow characteristics and tissue nutrition in apparently ischaemic feet	Blood flow characteristics and tissue nutrition in apparently ischemic feet.
16	immunological evidence for an inactive precursor of collagen proline hydroxylase in cultured fibroblasts	Immunological evidence of an inactive precursor of collagen proline hydroxylase in cultured fibroblasts.
16	prolonged survival of glutaraldehyde treated skin homografts	Prolonged survival of glutaraldehyde treated cutaneous homografts.
16	the melanocyte model colchicine like effects of other antimitotic agents	The melanocyte model colchicine as effects of other antimitotic agents.
16	polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis of corynebacterium diphtheriae a possible epidemiological aid	A possible epidemiological aid is polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis of corynebacterium diphtheriae.
16	the role of passenger leukocytes in the anomalous survival of neonatal skin grafts in mice	The role of passenger leukocytes in the abnormal survival of neonatal skin grafts in mice.
16	intracellular enzymes and protein synthesis in rabbit skin after thermal injury	The intracellular enzymes and protein synthesis in rabbit skin after thermal injury.
16	effects of ranatensin a polypeptide from frog skin on isolated smooth muscle	Effects of ranatensin a frog skin polypeptide on isolated smooth muscle.
16	serum stimulated release of cell contacts and the initiation of growth in contact inhibited chick fibroblasts	Serum stimulates release of cell contacts and l' initiation of growth at contact inhibits chick fibroblasts.
16	characterization of human platelet vascular permeability enhancing activity	Characterization of human platelet vascular permeability.
16	metabolism of testosterone 14 c by cultured human cells	The metabolism of testosterone 14 c by cultured human cells.
16	morphogenesis of rabbit fibroma virus correlation with pathogenesis of the skin lesion	Morphogenesis of rabbit fibroma virus correlation with skin lesion pathogenesis.
16	the effects of glycols on the renaturation of soluble collagen	The effects of glycols on the renaturation of soluble collagen.
16	transport and metabolism of sarcosine in hypersarcosinemic and normal phenotypes	Transport and metabolism of sarcosine in both hypersarcosinemic and normal phenotypes.
16	natural history of impetigo i site sequence of acquisition and familial patterns of spread of cutaneous streptococci	Natural history of infection; impetigo i site sequence; acquisition and familial patterns of spread of streptococci.
16	natural history of impetigo ii etiologic agents and bacterial interactions	Natural history of l' impetigo ii etiological agents and bacterial interactions.
16	hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia with multiple associated anomalies	Associated hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia with multiple abnormalities.
16	xeroderma pigmentosum and pigmented xerodermoid	Xeroderma pigmentosum and pigmented xerodermoid.
16	lipoid proteinosis	Uh, lipoid proteinosis.
16	pilosebaceous abnormalities in apert type acrocephalosyndactyly	"""Pilosebaceous abnormalities in apert acrocephalosyndactyly-type acrocephalosyndactyly""."
16	syndrome of unilateral ectromelia psoriasis and central nervous system anomalies	Unilateral ectromelic psoriasis and central nervous system abnormalities.
16	investigation of a case of oculocutaneous albinism	Investigation of a case of oculo albinism-skin.
16	the biology of keratinization	You know, the biology of keratinization.
16	possible genetic heterogeneity of x linked ichthyosis	Possible genetic heterogeneity of x-linked diabetes; ichthyosis.
16	familial focal facial dermal dysplasia	Family focal focal dermal dysplasia.
16	lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase deficiency in fibroblasts from siblings with hydroxylysine deficient collagen	Lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase deficiency in fibroblasts of siblings with a hydroxylysine-deficient collagen.
16	early reactions of the subcutaneous tissue to repeated injections of carcinogens in aqueous solutions	Early reactions of the tissue under-skin to repeated injections of carcinogens in aqueous solutions.
16	the induction of adenomata in mouse lung homografts by chemical carcinogens	Induction of apo; adenomas in mouse lung homografts by chemical carcinogens.
16	hydroxylysine in the n terminal regions of the 1 and 2 chains of various collagens	L' hydroxylysine in the n terminal regions of chains 1 and 2 of various collagens.
16	the effects of certain glycols substituted glycols and related organic solvents on the thermal stability of soluble collagen	The effects of certain glycol substituted glycols and related organic solvents on the thermal stability of soluble collagen.
16	changes in plasma volume and protein content during exposures of working men to various temperatures before and after acclimatization to heat separation of the roles of cutaneous and skeletal muscle circulation	Changes in plasma volume and protein content during pregnancy; exposure of workers to various temperatures before and after pregnancy; acclimation to thermal separation of the roles of skin and skeletal muscle circulation.
16	connective tissue synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in cell culture	Connective tissue synthesis by sclerodermal skin fibroblasts in cell culture.
16	aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase and polycyclic hydrocarbon tumorigenesis effect of the enzyme inhibitor 7 8 benzoflavone on tumorigenesis and macromolecule binding	Aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase and polycyclic hydrocarbon tumorigenesis effect of the enzyme inhibitor 7-8 benzoflavone on tumorigenesis and binding macromolecule.
16	fine structural observations relating to the production of color by the iridophores of a lizard anolis carolinensis	Fine structural observations concerning the production of colour by the iridophores d'apos; a lizard anolis carolinensis.
16	oyster ciliary inhibition by cystic fibrosis culture medium	Ciliary oyster inhibition by cystic fibrosis culture medium.
16	induction of benzo pyrene hydroxylase in human skin	The induction of benzo pyrene hydroxylase in human skin.
16	deficiency of alpha l fucosidase	Fucosidase alpha deficiency.
16	the survival of salmonellas on finger tips and transfer of the organisms to foods	Survival of Salmonella on finger tips and transfer of organisms into food.
16	excretion of sterols from the skin of normal and hypercholesterolemic humans implications for sterol balance studies	The excretion of sterols from the skin of normal and hypercholesterolemic humans has implications for l&apos studies; sterol balance.
16	the isolation and amino acid and carbohydrate composition of polymeric collagens prepared from various human tissues	The isolation and amino acid and carbohydrate composition of polymeric collagen prepared from various human tissues.
16	compartmentalization of spermine and spermidine in the herpes simplex virion	Comparison of spermine and spermidine in the herpes simplex virion virion.
16	cardiovascular reflex responses to cutaneous and visceral stimuli in spinal man	Cardiovascular responses to cutaneous and visceral stimuli in the spinal cord.
16	isolation and identification of pharmacologically active amino acids in skin and their structure activity relationship on the guinea pig ileum	Isolation and identification of pharmacologically active amino acids in skin and their relationship to d' structural activity on guinea pig ileum.
16	histological and ultrastructural findings in a case of the s zary syndrome	Histological and ultrastructural observations in a case of szary syndrome.
16	dna synthesis in mixed cultures of rat leukocytes and allogeneic dissociated skin cells	Synthesis of DNA in mixed cultures of dissociated rat leukocytes and allogeneic dissociated skin cells.
16	uridine diphosphate glucuronic acid production and utilization in various tissues actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycans	Production and use of glucuronic acid uridine diphosphate in various tissues actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycans.
16	prostaglandin biosynthesis by human skin and its inhibition by corticosteroids	Prostaglandin biosynthesis by human skin and its inhibition by corticosteroids.
16	permeability and enterotoxic factors of nonagglutinable vibrios vibrio alcaligenes and vibrio parahaemolyticus	Permeability and enterotoxic factors of nonagglutinable vibrios vibrions and vibrios parahaemolyticus.
16	infections in a hospital for patients with diseases of the skin	Infections in a hospital for patients with skin diseases.
16	critical role of the carbohydrate side chains of collagen in platelet aggregation	Critical role of the carbohydrate side chains of collagen in the platelet aggregation.
16	cuticle deposition in imaginal disks effects of juvenile hormone and fat body in vitro	Deposit of cuticles in imaginary disc effects of juvenile hormone and fat body in vitro.
16	pepsin treatment of avian skin collagen effects on solubility subunit composition and aggregation properties	Fine treatment of skin collagen effects d' bird on the composition of sub-solubility units and d&apos properties; aggregation.
16	serologically demonstrable alloantigens of mouse epidermal cells	HELANGENS of mouse epidermal cells that are serologically demonstrable.
16	further observations on the pathogenesis of acne	Other observations on the pathogenesis of acne.
16	the erythrasma microorganism in situ studies using the skin surface biopsy technique	In situ study of erythema micro-@organism at apos; skin surface biopsy technique helps.
16	inhibition of prostaglandin biosynthesis by corticosteroids	Inhibition of prostaglandin biosynthesis by corticosteroids.
16	simulation of genetic mucopolysaccharidoses in normal human fibroblasts by alteration of ph of the medium	Simulation of genetic mucopolysaccharidoses in normal human fibroblasts by alteration of ph of medium.
16	reducible crosslinks in hydroxylysine deficient collagens of a heritable disorder of connective tissue	"""Reductible crosslink in hydroxylysine deficiency collagens of a Heritable Disorder of Connective tissue tissues"", Journal of Medicine, Vol."
16	steam versus hot water scalding in reducing bacterial loads on the skin of commercially processed poultry	Steam versus hot water by reducing bacterial loads on the skin of the commercially processed poultry.
16	skin trauma in patients receiving systemic corticosteroid therapy	Acute skin trauma in patients receiving systemic corticosteroid therapy.
16	new in vitro test for ige mediated hypersensitivity in man	A new in vitro test for hypersensitivity; hypersensitivity in humans.
16	isolation of a mycoplasma from sarcoid tissue	Isolate a mycoplasma from sarcoid tissue.
16	coeliac disease vasculitis and cryoglobulinaemia	Celiac disease, vasculitis and cryoglobulinemia.
16	immunologic tolerance role of the regional lymph node	The role of the regional lymph node in immunological tolerance.
16	tests for antibody and cell mediated hypersensitivity to trypanosome antigens in rabbits infected with trypanosoma congolense	Antibody and antibody tests; cell-mediated hypersensitivity to trypanosome antigens in rabbits infected with trypanosome congolense.
16	an inherited defect affecting the tricarboxylic acid cycle in a patient with congenital lactic acidosis	A hereditary abnormality affecting the cycle of tricarboxylic acid in a patient with congenital lactic acidosis.
16	cholesterol distribution in the bulk tissues of man variation with age	Cholesterol distribution in the crude tissues of the intestines; men vary with age; men vary with age.
16	the viability of fetal skin of abortuses induced by saline or prostaglandin	The viability of fetal skin from abortions induced by saline or by prostaglandins.
16	the release of collagenase as an inactive proenzyme by bone explants in culture	The release of collagenase as an inactive proenzyme from the bone explants in culture.
16	uptake of 63 ni 2 from its complexes with proteins and other ligands by mouse dermal fibroblasts in vitro	L' absorption of 63 or 2 of its complexes with proteins and d' other ligands by mouse dermal fibroblasts in vitro.
16	social interaction and wounding in the genesis of spontaneous murine amyloidosis	Social interaction and injuries in the genesis of spontaneous murine amyloidosis.
16	adenovirus susceptibility to human interferon during one step replication	Adenovirus susceptibility to apo; human interferon during apo; one-step replication.
16	yeasts in a hospital for patients with skin diseases	The yeasts in a hospital for patients with skin diseases.
16	use of 4 per cent chlorhexidine detergent solution hibiscrub and other methods of skin disinfection	Use of condoms; a solution; hibiscrub containing 4% chlorhexidine detergent and d*apos; other methods of disinfecting the skin.
16	diphtheria infection in north west canada 1969 1970 and 1971	Diphtheria infection in northern-western Canada, 1969: 1970 and 1971.
16	simulated human skin scales	Simulated human skin scales.
16	patterns of reflex excitability change after widespread cutaneous stimulation in man	The patterns of reflex excitability change after extensive skin stimulation in men.
16	the effect of increasing the innervation field sizes of nerves on their reflex response time in salamanders	L' effect of apo; increase field size; innervation of nerves on their reflex response time in salamanders.
16	input from muscle and cutaneous nerves of the hand and forearm to neurones of the precentral gyrus of baboons and monkeys	Muscle and skin nerves of the hand and forearm to the neurons of the pre-central gyrus of baboons and monkeys.
16	delayed manifestation of ultraviolet reaction in the guinea pig caused by anti inflammatory drugs	The manifestation of ultraviolet reaction in the guinea pig was delayed by the anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
16	effect of alcohols and neutral salt on the thermal stability of soluble and precipitated acid soluble collagen	L' effect of alcohols and neutral salts on the thermal stability of soluble and soluble acidic collagen.
16	sanfilippo syndrome profound deficiency of alpha acetylglucosaminidase activity in organs and skin fibroblasts from type b patients	Sanfilippo syndrome: profound deficiency of l' alpha acetylglucosaminidase activity in organs and skin fibroblasts of type b patients.
16	the defect in the hunter syndrome deficiency of sulfoiduronate sulfatase	Dysfunction of the sulfoiduronate sulfatase due to the hunter's syndrome.
16	characterization of cystic fibrosis factor and its interaction with human immunoglobulin	Characterization of cystic fibrosis factor and its interaction with human immunoglobulin.
16	development of an equine herpesvirus in two cell culture systems light and electron microscopy	Development of an equine herpesvirus in two cell culture systems by light and electron microscopy.
16	occurrence of bombesin and alytesin in extracts of the skin of three european discoglossid frogs and pharmacological actions of bombesin on extravascular smooth muscle	Presence of bombesin and d'apos; allytesin in extracts of skin from three discoglossided European frogs and pharmacological action of bombesin on extravascular smooth muscle.
16	value of desiccated swabs for streptococcal epidemiology in the field	Value of dried swabs for apo; streptococcal epidemiology in the field.
16	characterization of staphylococcus aureus in a pediatric burn unit	Characterization of staphylococcus aureus in a pediatric burn unit.
16	somatotopic organization of vibrissal responses in the ventro basal complex of the rat thalamus	Somatotopic organization of vibrissal responses in the ventro complex-basal of rat thalamus.
16	perinatal coagulopathies complicating fetal blood sampling	Perinatal coagulopathies complicating fetal blood collection.
16	the isolation of glycoproteins from bovine achilles tendon and their interaction with collagen	L' isolation of glycoproteins from bovine tendon; bovine achenes and their interaction with collagen.
16	delayed hypersensitivity reactions provoked by ribosomes from acid fast bacilli i ribosomal isolation characterization delayed hypersensitivity and specificity	Delayed hypersensitivity reactions caused by ribosomes of fast acidic bacilli delayed characterization of the hypersensitivity and specificity.
16	a collagenase in extracts of the invertebrate bipalium kewense	Collagenase in extracts of the invertebrate bipalium kewense.
16	amyloidogenesis in healing wound electron microscopic studies of biopsied wounds in macular amyloidosis	Amyloidogenesis in wound electron microscopic studies of biopsied wounds in macular amyloidosis.
16	histochemical investigation of the activity of oxidoreductases in the skin lesions of lepromatous leprosy patients	Histochemical study of the apos; oxidoreductase activity in the skin lesions of lepers.
16	a test for the determination of competency in clearing bacilli in leprosy patients	A test for the ability to eliminate leprosy bacilli in lepers.
16	activation of the viral genome in simian virus 40 transformed nonpermissive cells by permissive cell extracts	L' activation of the viral genome of simian virus 40 transforms the cells not allowed by permissive cell extracts.
16	effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and medulla oblongata on thermoregulation in monkeys	The effects of heating and cooling of the spinal cord and spinal bulb on thermoregulation in monkeys.
16	antibody responses to group a streptococcal infections in the hamster	Antibody reactions to group a strep infection in the hamster.
16	differences in the urea extracted proteins of mouse epidermis and squamous cell carcinomata determined by fluorescence microscopy	Differences in proteins extracted from the urea of mouse epidermis and squamous cell carcinomas were determined by fluorescence microscopy.
16	fabry s disease differentiation between two forms of galactosidase by myoinositol	Fabry disease differentiation between two forms of galactosidase by myoinositol.
16	detection of inborn errors of metabolism galactosemia	Detection of inborn errors of galactosemia metabolism.
16	menkes kinky hair disease further definition of the defect in copper transport	Menkes perverse hair disease further definition of the anomaly in copper transport.
16	sanfilippo disease type b enzyme replacement and metabolic correction in cultured fibroblasts	Sanfilippo disease type b enzyme replacement and metabolism correction in culture fibroblasts.
16	the hurler syndrome a study of cultured lymphoid cell lines	The hurler syndrome, a study of cultured lymphoid cell lines.
16	effects of intrabrachial arterial infusion of pyruvate on forearm tissue metabolism interrelationships between pyruvate lactate and alanine	Effects of intrabranchal arterial infusion of pyruvate on apos tissue metabolism; before-interactions between pyruvate lactate and lanine.
16	spinal pathways projecting to the cerebral first somatosensory area in the monkey	Spinal pathways projecting to the first cerebral somatosensory zone in the monkey.
16	selective destruction of skin permeability activity in cholera toxin effect of acid on cholera enterotoxin	Selective destruction of apo; skin permeability activity in apo; effect of acid cholera toxin on apo; cholera enterotoxin.
16	effect of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on cell proliferation	Effect of adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate on cell proliferation.
16	subcutaneous bacteria in turkey carcasses	Bacteria in turkey carcasses under-skin.
16	the molecule microscope a new instrument for biological and biomedical research	The molecular microscope is a new instrument for biological and biomedical research.
16	two actions of cyclic amp on melanosome movement in frog skin dissection by cytochalasin b	Cyclic Amp on melanosome movement during dissection of frog skin by cytochalasin b.
16	familial hypercholesterolemia identification of a defect in the regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity associated with overproduction of cholesterol	Hypercholesterolemia, familial hypercholesterolemia, identification of apos; a defect in the regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity associated with overproduction of cholesterol.
16	experience with an image analyzing computer in virus plaque measurements	Experimentation with virus plaques; analysis of viruses; computer images to measure viral plaques.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity in contact sensitized guinea pigs i transfer with immune serum	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity to sensitized guinea pigs and transfer with immune serum.
16	interferon production by human cells in vitro	Production of apos; interferon by human cells in vitro.
16	stimulus response functions of rapidly adapting mechanoreceptors in human glabrous skin area	The response-stimulating functions of fast adaptation mechanoreceptors in the glabrous region of human skin.
16	production of high titered interferon in cultures of human diploid cells	Production of high-title interferon in cultures of human diploid cells.
16	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes i eosinophilia and immunologic responses to a schistosomal egg preparation	Mansoni schistosome infection in thymus-dependent lymphocyte-deprived mice, eosinophilia and immunological responses to a schistosomal egg preparation.
16	improved experimental model for measuring skin degerming activity on the human hand	Improved experimental design for measuring skin movement activity on the human hand.
16	reflex vascular responses to left ventricular outflow obstruction and activation of ventricular baroreceptors in dogs	Reflex vascular responses to apo; left ventricular outflow obstruction and apo; dog ventricular baroreceptor activation.
16	a guide to bullous lesions of the skin	This is a guide to bulbous skin lesions.
16	regulation of cholesterol metabolism in the dog ii effects of complete bile diversion and of cholesterol feeding on pool sizes of tissue cholesterol measured at autopsy	Regulation of cholesterol metabolism in dogs ii effects of a complete diversion of bile and fat; ingestion of cholesterol on the size of the pools of tissue cholesterol measured at autopsy.
16	effect of copper containing intrauterine contraceptive devices on human cells in culture	The effect of copper containing the intra-uterine contraceptives-on human cells in culture.
16	role of the clotting system in cell mediated hypersensitivity i fibrin deposition in delayed skin reactions in man	The role of the clotting system in apo; cell-mediated hypersensitivity, fibrin deposition, in delayed skin reactions in men.
16	indirect cutaneous immunofluorescence ii clinical significance	Indirect skin immunofluorescence ii Clinical importance ii.
16	transient increase in capillary permeability induced by clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin	A transient increase in capillary permeability induced by Clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin.
16	chromosome studies in induced abortions	L' chromosome studies in induced abortions.
16	biosynthesis of prostaglandin e 2 in human skin subcellular localization and inhibition by unsaturated fatty acids and anti inflammatory drugs	Prostaglandin 2 biosynthesis in human skin subcellular localization and its inhibition by unsaturated fatty acids and anti-@inflammatory drugs.
16	color changes unusual melanosomes and a new pigment from leaf frogs	Color changes unusual melanosomes and a new leaf frog pigment.
16	immunity to syphilis i passive transfer in rabbits with hyperimmune serum	Immunity to syphilis i passive transfer in rabbits with hyperimmune serum.
16	quantitative aspects of pinocytosis and the intracellular fate of n acetyl alpha d glucosaminidase in sanfilippo b fibroblasts	Quantitative aspects of pinocytosis and the intracellular fate of the acetyl alpha glucosaminidase in sanfilippo b fibroblasts.
16	cultured skin fibroblasts in storage disorders an analysis of ultrastructural features	Cutaneous fibroblasts grown in storage disorders an analysis of ultrastructural characteristics.
16	a sex linked defect in the cross linking of collagen and elastin associated with the mottled locus in mice	A sex-related defect in the cross binding of collagen and elos; elastin associated with the labelled locus in mice.
16	influence of medroxypregesteroneacetate on testosterone metabolism by cultured human fibroblasts a model for drug steroid interaction	Influence of medroxypregesteroneacetate on testosterone metabolism by human culture fibroblasts on a model for drug steroid interaction.
16	changes in the fungal autoflora of apollo astronauts	Changes in the apollo; fungal autoflora of apollo astronauts.
16	a specific collagenase from rabbit fibroblasts in monolayer culture	A specific collagenase from rabbit fibroblasts in monolayer culture.
16	attempt to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia by skin scarification with leukemic cell suspensions	Try to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia by skin scarification using leukemia cell suspensions.
16	infectious dna from herpes simplex virus infectivity of double stranded and single stranded molecules	Infectivity of apo; infectious DNA of apo virus; herpes simplex virus of double-stranded and single-stranded molecules.
16	the acquisition of specificity in cutaneous sensory neurons a reconsideration of the integumental specification hypothesis	L' acquisition of specificity in skin sensory neurons rethinks the integumentary specification hypothesis.
16	virulence of two mastitis strains of staphylococcus aureus in bovine skin enhancement by growth in high carbohydrate high salt medium or in raw milk	Virulence of two strains of mastitis staphylococcus aureus in rabbits; improvement of bovine skin by growth in a high-carbohydrate salt medium or in raw milk.
16	inhibition of cell growth in the g1 phase by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Inhibition of cell growth in the g1 phase by adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
16	lymph flow and lymph protein concentration in the skin and muscle of the rabbit hind limb	Lymphatic flow and lymph protein levels in rabbit hindlimb skin and muscles.
16	clonal selection attenuation and differentiation in an in vitro model of hyperplasia	Clonal selection attenuation and differentiation in an in vitro model; hyperplasia.
16	the role of cathepsin d in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis a histochemical study employing unlabeled antibodies and the peroxidase antiperoxidase complex	The role of cathepsin d in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis was investigated in a histochemical study using unlabeled antibodies and the peroxidase complex.
16	relationship of unkeratinized skin to bovine fetal mummification an hypothesis	The relationship between unkeratinized skin and bovine fetal mummification is hypothesized.
16	follicular contact dermatitis due to coloured permanent pressed sheets	Follicular contact dermatitis caused by permanent coloured and permanent pressed sheets.
16	antinociceptive action of bradykinin and related kinins of larger molecular weights by the intraventricular route	The antinociceptive action of bradykinin and related kinins of higher molecular weight by the intraventricular route.
16	the contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to adaptation and conduction block in sensory neurones of the leech	The contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to adaptation and conduction blockade in the sensory neurons of the leech.
16	relative rates of transcapillary movement of free thyroxine protein bound thyroxine thyroxine binding proteins and albumin	The relative rates of transcapillary movement of free thyroxine proteins bound thyroxine-binding proteins to thyroxine albumin.
16	assignment of three gene loci pgk hgprt g6pd to the long arm of the human x chromosome by somatic cell genetics	L' assignment of three gene loci pgk hgprt g6pd to the long arm of the human x chromosome by somatic cell genetics.
16	immunoglobulin in clinically uninvolved skin in systemic lupus erythematosus association with renal disease	Lupus erythematosus; immunoglobulin in the skin not clinically involved in the disease; association of systemic lupus erythematosus with renal disease.
16	the immunopathology of epidermolysis bullosa acquisita	Immunopathology of epidermolysis bullosa acquired.
16	recommended daily allowances for vitamin c	Recommended daily allowances for vitamin c.
16	deficient dna repair in human progeroid cells	It's called DNA repair in human progeroid cells.
16	a guide to the histological identification of fungi in tissues	A guide book for the histological identification of fungi in tissues.
16	vascular leakage through intraendothelial channels induced by cholera toxin in the skin of guinea pigs	Vascular leak in intraendothelial channels induced by cholera toxin in the skin of guinea pigs.
16	collagen biosynthesis in nonfibroblastic cell lines	Collagen biosynthesis in nonfibroblastic cell lines.
16	effectiveness of septisol antiseptic foam as a surgical scrub agent	Effectiveness of antiseptic septic foam as a surgical washing agent.
16	isolation and characterization of corynebacteria from burned children	The isolation and characterization of corynebacteria in burnt children.
16	evidence for fetal antigen in human sarcoma	Evidence of fetal antigen in human sarcoma.
16	collagen polymorphism characterization of molecules with the chain composition alpha 1 3 03 in human tissues	Characterization of collagen polymorphism of molecules with a chain composition of 1–0 alpha in human tissues.
16	bicycle injuries in children	The bicycle injuries in children.
16	evidence that axoplasmic transport of trophic factors is involved in the regulation of peripheral nerve fields in salamanders	Evidence suggests that axoplasmic transport of trophic factors is involved in the regulation of peripheral nerve fields in salamanders.
16	extracellular factor synthesized by bacillus cereus which evokes a dermal reaction in guinea pigs	An extracellular factor synthesized by the cereus bacillus that evokes a dermal reaction in guinea pigs.
16	the importance of the included serum proteins in the immune response in rabbits to a rat skin xenograft	The importance of serum proteins in the immune response of rabbits to a rat skin xenograft was emphasized.
16	neutralization studies with marek s disease virus and turkey herpesvirus	Neutralization studies with whiting virus and turkey herpesviruses.
16	evidence for complement activation via the alternate pathway in skin diseases i herpes gestationis systemic lupus erythematosus and bullous pemphigoid	Evidence of apo; alternative complement activation in herpes gestation i herpes systemic lupus erythematosus and pemphigoid bubble.
16	cartilage collagen a staggered substructure in reconstituted fibrils	Cartilaginous collagen is a sub-offset in reconstituted fibrils.
16	pain perception modification of threshold of intolerance and cortical potentials by cutaneous stimulation	Impairment of threshold pain perception; intolerance and cortical potentials by skin stimulation.
16	prostaglandin activity in human cutaneous inflammation detection by radioimmunoassay	Lapos; prostaglandin activity in human skin inflammation by radioimmunoassay.
16	microfilaments in epidermal cancer cells	Microfilaments in epidermal cancer cells.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus studies of the antibodies bound to skin	Studies of systemic lupus erythematosus of antibodies bound to the skin.
16	phage typing of coagulase negative staphylococci and micrococci	Lysotyping of staphylococci and micrococci with negative coagulase.
16	trophic skin ulceration of leprosy skin and serum zinc concentrations	Trojan skin ulceration of leprosy and serum zinc levels.
16	one death and a cluster of febrile complications related to saline abortions	One death and a cluster of febrile complications related to aborting saline.
16	daytime variation in the density of onchocerca volvulus microfilariae in human skin	Diurnal variation in the density of microfilariae in human skin; onchocerca volvulus.
16	skin tests with influenza virus	Skin tests with influenza virus.
16	dispersal and transfer of staphylococcus aureus in an isolation ward for burned patients	Dispersal and transfer of Staphylococcus aureus to an isolation ward for burn patients.
16	defect in conversion of procollagen to collagen in a form of ehlers danlos syndrome	Failure to convert procollagen to collagen in the form of ehlers danlos syndrome.
16	preoperative sterilization of the perineum a comparison of six antiseptics	Preoperative sterilization of the perineum by comparison of six antiseptics.
16	cutaneous and ocular reactions to practolol	Acute reactions to practolol in both skin and eyes.
16	cell mediated immunity in humans during viral infection i effect of rubella on dermal hypersensitivity phytohemagglutinin response and t lymphocyte numbers	Cell-mediated immunity in humans during infection; viral infection effect of rubella on the apos; phytohemagglutinin skin hypersensitivity response and number of lymphocyte t lymphocytes.
16	development of a purified cholera toxoid ii preparation of a stable antigenic toxoid by reaction of purified toxin with glutaraldehyde	Development of a purified cholera anatoxin ii preparation of apos; antigenic anatoxin stable by reaction of purified toxin with glutaraldehyde.
16	relationship of antimicrobial cellular immunity to delayed hypersensitivity in listeriosis	Relationship between drug; antimicrobial cellular immunity and immunos; delayed hypersensitivity in listeriosis.
16	skin testing of guinea pigs and footpad testing of mice with a new antigen for detecting delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans	Skin tests of guinea pigs and tests on mouse foot pads with a new antigen to detect delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans.
16	saphenous nerve injury caused by stripping of the long saphenous vein	Lesion of the saphenous nerve caused by stripping of the long saphenous vein.
16	instability of polymeric skin collagen in osteogenesis imperfecta	L' instability of polymeric skin collagen in osteogenesis.
16	chemical characterization of isolated epidermal desmosomes	A chemical characterization of isolated epidermal desmosomes.
16	uptake and release of bilirubin by skin	Absorption and release of bilirubin via skin.
16	role of sweat in accumulation of orally administered griseofulvin in skin	The role of sweat in the body; accumulation of orally administered grey-fulvin in the skin.
16	cutaneous reflexes in small muscles of the hand	Skin reflexes in small muscles of the hand.
16	onchocerciasis in canada	Onchocerciasis in Canada.
16	skin scales among airborne particles	Skin scales among airborne particles.
16	elimination of bacteria from dogs with antibiotics	The elimination of bacteria in dogs treated with antibiotics.
16	cytotoxic activity of mycobacterium ulcerans	Acute cytotoxic activity of mycobacterium ulcerans.
16	the behaviour of carcinoma of the large bowel in man following transplantation into immune deprived mice	The behaviour of the carcinoma of the large intestine in men following transplantation in immunosuppressed mice.
16	tetracycline and acne vulgaris a clinical and laboratory investigation	Tetracycline and acne vulgaris are both clinical and laboratory studies.
16	from phisohex to hibiscrub	From the phisohex to the hibiscrub.
16	sj gren larsson syndrome in two sibs with peripheral nerve involvement and bisalbuminaemia	Sj gren larsson syndrome in two siblings with peripheral nerve involvement and bisalbuminemia.
16	retention of 14c labeled tuberculin purified protein derivative in the skin of sensitized and nonsensitized animals	Retention of 14c-labelled tuberculin-purified protein derivative in the skin of sensitized and unsensitized animals.
16	effect of estrogen therapy on climacteric symptoms and tissue changes	Dosage effect; estrogen therapy on climacteric symptoms and tissue changes.
16	dna repair in potorous tridactylus	DNA repair in potent tridactylus.
16	distribution of serratia species in clinical specimens	Distribution of serratia species in clinical specimens.
16	regulation of blood flow in paget s disease of bone	The regulation of blood flow in paget bone-related diseases.
16	responses in human a and c fibres to repeated electrical intradermal stimulation	Reactions of human a and c fibers to repeated electrical intradermal stimulation.
16	naegleria another pathogenic ameba studies in germfree guinea pigs	Naegleria, another study on l'apos; ambea pathogen in guinea pigs without germs.
16	human mycobacterium ulcerans infections developing at sites of trauma to skin	Developing infections with human ulcer mycobacteria at sites of skin trauma.
16	hexachlorophene in mice effects after long term percutaneous applications	Dosage effects; hexachlorophene in mice after long-term percutaneous application.
16	the effect of travase on heat injured skin	L' effect of travase on heat injured skin.
16	the pathology of tangier disease a light and electron microscopic study	The pathology of pitch disease was studied by light and electron microscopy.
16	mucous metaplasia and gap junctions in the vitamin a acid treated skin tumor keratoacanthoma	Mucous metasplasia and gap junctions in vitamin a acid treated keratoacanthoma skin tumor.
16	dynamic telethermography in mammary carcinoma	Dynamic telethermography in mammary carcinoma.
16	afferent connections to the fast conduction pathway in the central nervous system of the leech hirudo medicinalis	Connects to the rapid conduction pathway in the central nervous system of the leech hirudo medicinalis.
16	testosterone 5alpha reductase in rat skin homogenates measurement in the skin at various anatomical sites in males and females	Testosterone 5alpha reductase in rat skin homogenates measures in the skin at various anatomical sites in males and females.
16	changes in the mitotic cycle induced by alpha solanine	Changes in the mitotic cycle induced by alpha solanine.
16	cutaneous everted nipple ureterostomy	Acute cutaneous urethostomy of the nipple with effilochage.
16	tyrosinases in rana pipiens purification and physical properties	Tyrosinases in rana pipiens purification and physical properties.
16	osmotic gradients across snail epidermis evidence for a water barrier	There are osmotic gradients across the epidermis of the snails indicating the existence of apoes; a barrier of apos; water.
16	evidence of cholecystokinin release by bombesin in the dog	Evidence of cholecystokinin release from bombesin in dogs.
16	arteriosclerotic changes within the diabetic oral vasculature	Arteriosclerotic changes in diabetic oral vascular system.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iii determination of the volumes of nuclei and cytoplasm of cells in murine epidermis	Ultrastructural studies of keratinized mouse epithelia iii determination of volumes of nuclei and cytoplasm of cells in murine epidermis.
16	epidermal chalone and cyclic amp an in vivo study	In vivo study of epidermal chalone and cyclic bulb.
16	the effect of vitamin a on growth and differentiation of human keratinocytes in vitro	The effect of vitamin a on growth and differentiation of human keratinocytes in vitro.
16	in vitro epidermal cell proliferation in rat skin plugs	In vitro epidermal cell proliferation in rat skin plugs.
16	glycocalyx of epidermal cells in vitro demonstration and enzymatic removal	Glycocalyx of epidermal cells in vitro and enzymatic removal.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iv quantitative studies of lysosomes	Ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iv quantitative studies of lysosomes.
16	persistent individual differences in the bacterial flora of the skin of the forehead numbers of propionibacteria	Persistent individual differences in the bacterial flora of the skin number of propionibacteria of the forehead.
16	ultrastructural localization of in vivo bound immunoglobulins in bullous pemphigoid a preliminary report	Ultrastructural localization of in vivo bound immunoglobulins in bulldozer pemphigoids has been tentatively reported.
16	congenital circumscribed hypomelanosis a characterization based on electron microscopic study of tuberous sclerosis nevus depigmentosus and piebaldism	Confined congenital hypermelanosis, a characterization based on apos; electron microscopic study of tuberous sclerosis nevus depigmentosus and piebaldism.
16	morphometric evaluation of sebaceous gland volume in intact castrated and testosterone treated rats	Morphometric evaluation of sebaceous gland volume in intact castrated and testosterone-treated rats.
16	treatment of variola major with cytosine arabinoside	Treatment of major smallpox with cytosine arabinoside.
16	normal and branched alkanes from cast skins of the grasshopper schistocerca vaga scudder	Normal and branched alkanes from cast skins of the grasshopper schistocerca vaga scudder.
16	xenoplastic combinations between chick chorionic epithelium and fetal monkey dermis	Xenoplastic combinations between chicken chorionic epithelium and fetal monkey dermis.
16	subepidermal deposition of immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f hybrid mice	Subepidermal deposition of immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f hybrid mice.
16	acute destruction of rat skin grafts by alloantisera	The acute destruction of rat skin grafts by alloantiers.
16	the transfer of tolerance to dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pigs by parabiosis	The transfer of tolerance to sensitivity on contact with dncb in guinea pigs by parabiosis.
16	esterification of low density lipoprotein cholesterol in human fibroblasts and its absence in homozygous familial hypercholesterolemia	Cholesterol Esterification of low density lipoproteins in human fibroblasts and cholesterol deprivation in homozygous family hypercholesterolemia.
16	antibody to myosin the specific visualization of myosin containing filaments in nonmuscle cells	Antibody to myosin the specific visualization of myosin containing filaments in nonmuscle cells.
16	plasma membrane components of skin fibroblasts from normal individuals and patients with cystic fibrosis	Components of the plasma membrane of cutaneous fibroblasts from normal subjects and patients with cystic fibrosis.
16	variation in the phenotypic expression of beta glucuronidase deficiency	Variation in apos; phenotypic expression of beta glucuronidase deficiency.
16	polyinosinic polycytidylic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in carcinogen treated epidermis and in carcinogen induced skin tumors in mice	Polyinosinic polycytidylic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in carcinogen treated epidermis and in carcinogen skin tumors in mice.
16	correlation between the carcinogenicities of nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive actions on sebaceous glands of mouse skin	Correlation between the carcinogenicity of nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive effect on sebaceous glands of mouse skin.
16	variation in response of channel catfish to henneguya sp infections protozoa myxosporidea	Variation in response of channel catfish to protozoan henneguya sp. myxosporidea infections.
16	human antigen and enzyme markers in man chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids evidence for synteny between the hl a pgm3 me1 and ipo b loci	Antigen and human enzyme markers in Chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids show synteny between the hl a pgm3 me1 and ipo b loci.
16	free and membrane bound ribosomes in normal and methylcholanthrene treated mouse epidermis	Free and membrane-bound ribosomes in the epidermis of normal and methylcholanthrene treated mice.
16	prostaglandins kinin and inflammation in the rat	Prostaglandins kinins and l' inflammation in the rat.
16	preoperative disinfection of surgeons hands use of alcoholic solutions and effects of gloves on skin flora	Pre-operative hand sanitization; use of alcoholic solutions and effects of gloves on skin flora.
16	disinfection of the skin with detergent preparations of irgasan dp 300 and other antiseptics	Dilution of the skin with detergent preparations of 300 dp irgasan and d' other antiseptic.
16	locked in syndrome report of seven cases	Uh, syndrome report locked on seven cases.
16	percutaneous aspiration biopsy of the pancreas under ultrasonic guidance	You know, percutaneous aspiration biopsy of the pancreas by ultrasound.
16	lobomycosis as a disease of the atlantic bottle nosed dolphin tursiops truncatus montagu 1821	Lobomycosis as a disease of the dolphin tursiops truncatus monttagu 1821.
16	onchocerciasis in guatemala iii daytime periodicity of microfilariae in skin	Onchocerciasis in Guatemala iii diurnal periodicity of microfilariae in skin.
16	onchocerciasis prevalence of microfilaruria and other manifestations in village of cameroon	Onchocerciasis, prevalence of microfilaruria and other manifestations in the cameroon village.
16	methods for evaluating topical antibacterial agents on human skin	Evaluation of topical antibacterial agents on human skin.
16	the effects of x irradiation on the mechanical properties of skin	The effects of irradiation on the mechanical properties of the skin.
16	oral contraceptives and porphyria cutanea tarda	Oral contraceptives and porphyria cutanea tardy.
16	skin graft survival on avascular defects	A skin graft on avascular defects.
16	ultrastructural studies of regenerating spines of the sea urchin strongylocentrotus purpuratus i cell types without spherules	Ultrastructural studies of regenerating spines of the urchin Strongylocentrotus purpuratus i without spherules.
16	lipoid proteinosis report of 2 cases with histology of the vocal folds	Two cases of lipoid proteinosis with histology of vocal folds were reported.
16	the anti map and anti group a carbohydrate antibodies response in streptococcal human infections	The anti- and anti-group card -- a carbohydrate antibody response in human streptococcal infections.
16	renal excretion of fluoride in renal failure and after renal transplantation	L' renal excretion of fluoride during kidney failure and after renal transplant.
16	expression in organ culture of agouti locus genes of the mouse	Expression in organ cultures of genes of the agouti locus of the mouse.
16	the development of the primitive epithelium and true tegument in the cercaria of schistosoma mansoni	The development of the primitive epithelium and true integument in the cercary of schistosoma mansoni.
16	the sebotrophic effect of pregnancy	L' the sebotrophic effect of pregnancy.
16	glycosidases in human skin fibroblast cultures alpha fucosidase alpha galactosidase alpha glucosidase beta mannosidase and n acetyl alpha glucosaminidase	Glycosidases in human skin fibroblast cultures alpha fucosidase alpha galactosidase alpha glucosidase beta mannosidase and nacetyl alpha glucosaminidase.
16	morphochemical analysis of mucosubstances in some epithelial tissues of the eel anguilla japonica	Morphochemical analysis of mucosubstances in some epithelial tissues of the eel eel eel eel japonica.
16	benzene hexachloride poisoning in cattle	Benzene hexachloride poisoning in livestock.
16	hypotrichosis in miniature poodle siblings	L' hypotrichosis in miniature poodles.
16	transformation of horse skin cells by type c sarcoma viruses	The transformation of horse skin cells by c-type sarcoma viruses.
16	new type of exfoliatin obtained from staphylococcal strains belonging to phage groups other than group ii isolated from patients with impetigo and ritter s disease	A novel type of exfoliatin from staphylococcal strains belonging to phage groups other than group ii has been isolated from patients with apo; impetigo and ritter s.
16	streptozotocin therapy in 22 cancer patients	Effect of streptozotocin therapy on the treatment of cancer patients with streptozotocin.
16	physiochemical and biological properties of the major basic protein from guinea pig eosinophil granules	Physiochemical and biological properties of the major basic protein of guinea pig eosinophils.
16	a selective stain for mast cells	It's a selective spot for mast cells.
16	effects of human chorionic gonadotropin preparations on complement in vitro	The effects of human chorionic gonadotropin preparations on complement in vitro.
16	stimulation of synthesis of free chondroitin sulfate chains by beta d xylosides in cultured cells	Stimulation of the synthesis of free chondroitin sulfate chains by beta d xylosides in cultured cells.
16	capillary density in developing and healing tuberculous lesions produced by bcg in rabbits a quantitative study	Hair density in the development and healing of tubercular lesions produced by bcg in rabbits, quantitative study.
16	phosphate compounds in bone scanning	The phosphate compounds in bone scintigraphy.
16	altered control of skin blood flow at high skin and core temperatures	Change in the control of cutaneous blood flow at high skin and heart temperatures.
16	effect of chronic hypercapnia on body temperature regulation	Apos effects; chronic hypercapnia on body temperature regulation.
16	animal experiments in radiotherapy iii large versus small animals	Experiences with radiation animals iii Large animals versus small animals.
16	dose fractionation schedules biologic aspects and applications to high let radiotherapy	Dose fractionation plans biological aspects and applications to high dose radiation.
16	clinical trials with new radiation modalities	Clinical trials with new radiation patterns.
16	intradermal catabolism of rabbit igg and its fragments	Intradermal catabolism of rabbit igg and its fragments.
16	increased collagen synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in vitro a possible defect in the regulation or activation of the scleroderma fibroblast	An increase in collagen synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in vitro may constitute a defect in the regulation or the activation of scleroderma fibroblast.
16	sanfilippo a syndrome sulfamidase deficiency in cultured skin fibroblasts and liver	Sanfilippo has sulfamidase deficiency in cultures of cutaneous fibroblasts and liver.
16	systemic nodular panniculitis with cardiac involvement	Panniculitis, a systemic nodular panniculitis with cardiac involvement.
16	a clinico radiological survey of deep venous thrombosis of the leg	A clinical radiological study of deep vein thrombosis of the leg.
16	operations for lymphoedema of the lower limbs a study of the results in 108 operations utilizing vascularized dermal flaps	Lymphoedema surgery of the lower limbs: study of the results of 108 procedures using a vascularized dermal flap.
16	skin changes secondary to hydroxyurea therapy	Follow-up skin changes to apo therapy; hydroxyurea.
16	livedo vasculitis the vasculitis of atrophie blanche immunohistopathologic study	Livingo vasculitis the vasculitis of l' study immunohistopathological white atrophy.
16	mummified cutaneous mixed tumor	Mummified mixed skin tumor.
16	intralesional triamcinolone therapy for pretibial myxedema	Intracalesional triamcinolone therapy for pretibial myxedema.
16	fixed long ultraviolet eruption	This is a long ultraviolet rash.
16	epidermolysis bullosa acquisita with electron microscopical studies	Epidermolysis bullosa acquired with electron microscopy studies.
16	acute eruptive darier disease keratosis follicularis	Acute flare-up disease of the follicular keratose stinger.
16	erythema gyratum repens with metastatic adenocarcinoma	Erythema gyratum repens with metastatic adenocarcinoma.
16	the skin in the winchester syndrome	Yeah, skin in the Winchester syndrome.
16	dermatomyositis in six patients without initial muscle involvement	Dermatomyosite in six patients without initial muscle involvement.
16	mast cells in the epidermis of piebaldism	Mastocytes in the epidermis of piebaldism.
16	the permeability barrier in mammalian epidermis	The permeability barrier in mammalian epidermis.
16	changes in distribution pattern of cytoplasmic filaments in human melanocytes during ultraviolet mediated melanin pigmentation the role of the 100 angstrom filaments in the elongation of melanocytic dendrites and in the movement and transfer of melanosomes	Changes in the distribution pattern of cytoplasmic filaments in human melanocytes during ultraviolet, the role of 100 d&apos filaments in melanin; angstrom in apos; elongation of melanocytic dendrites and movement and transfer of melanosomes.
16	the fine structure and cell kinetics of mouse epidermis after wounding	Fine structure and cell kinetics of mouse epidermis after injury.
16	distribution and metabolism of 2 4 5 2 5 pentachlorobiphenyl	Distribution and metabolism of pentachlorobiphenyl compound.
16	pneumatic orthosis pilot study	Pneumatic orthosis pilot study.
16	long term maintenance of psoriatic human skin on congenitally athymic nude mice	Long term maintenance of psoriatic human skin on congenitally athymic nude mice.
16	cutaneous effects of topical indomethacin an inhibitor of prostaglandin synthesis on uv damaged skin	Skin effects of indomethacin topical, an inhibitor of prostaglandin synthesis, on skin damaged by apos; uv.
16	epidermal synthesis of prostaglandins and their effect on levels of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate	Epidermal synthesis of prostaglandins and their effect on levels of apos; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
16	the effect of anthralin and its derivatives on epidermal cell kinetics	L' effect of anthraline and its derivatives on epidermal cell kinetics.
16	prostaglandin and dna synthesis in human skin possible relationship to ultraviolet light effects	Prostaglandin and DNA synthesis in human skin may be related to the effects of ultraviolet light.
16	cyclic 3 5 nucleotide phosphodiesterase in rat skin ii biochemical characterization	Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase 3-5 in rat skin ii biochemical characterization.
16	esterification of 4 14c cholesterol by cutaneous bacteria staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes and propionibacterium granulosum	Cholesterol Esterification 4c 14c by the cutaneous bacterium staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes and propionibacterium granulosum.
16	analysis of lipid composition of isolated human sebaceous gland homogenates after incubation with cutaneous bacteria thin layer chromatography	Analysis of lipid composition of isolated human sebaceous gland homogenates after incubation with skin-borne bacteria by thin-layer chromatography.
16	the effects of a nonsteroid antiandrogen flutamide on sebaceous gland activity	The effects of a nonsteroidal antiandrogen flutamide on sebaceous gland activity.
16	vasoconstrictor activities of some novel synthetic steroids in alcoholic solution	Some new synthetic steroids in alcoholic solution exhibit vasoconstrictive activity.
16	movement of beta irradiated epidermal basal cells to the spinous granular layers in the absence of cell division	Movement of beta-rayed epidermal basal epidermal cells to spiny granular layers in the absence of cell division.
16	human necrotizing vasculitis immunoglobulins and complement in vessel walls of cutaneous lesions and normal skin	Anti-human necrotizing vasculitis immunoglobulins and complement in vascular walls of skin lesions and normal skin.
16	in vivo studies of sterol and squalene secretion by human skin	In vivo studies of sterol and squalene secretion by human skin.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in skin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Dapos deposits; systemic lupus erythematosus immune globulin.
16	comparison of the cyanogen bromide peptides of insoluble guinea pig skin and scar collagen	Comparison of insoluble guinea pig skin and scar collagen peptides to cyanogen bromide.
16	structural studies of alpha melanocyte stimulating hormone and a novel beta melanocyte stimulating hormone from the neurointermediate lobe of the pituitary of the dogfish squalus acanthias	Structural studies of the melanocytic alpha hormone and dapos; a new melanocytic beta hormone of the neuro-lobe-intermediates of the apos; pituitary of the apos; aiguillate squalus acanthias.
16	studies on onchocerca cervicalis railliet and henry 1910 v the development of onchocerca cervicalis larvae in the vectors	Studies on apos; onchocerca cervicalis railliet and Henry 1910 v the development of apo larvae; onchocerca cervicalis in vectors.
16	a comparative study of horseradish peroxidase conjugates prepared with a one step and a two step method	A comparative study of horseradish peroxidase conjugates prepared by a one-step and a two-step method.
16	comparative ultrahistochemistry of the adepidermal granules of salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and hynobiuo tokyoensis enzyme digestive experiment for the epoxy embedded sections	L' comparative ultrahistochemistry of adepidermal granules of salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and l' hynobiuo tokyoensis was assayed by enzymatic digestion of epoxy-coated sections.
16	a comparison of hexachlorophene and lactacyd on growth of skin flora in healthy term newborn infants	A comparison of hexachlorophene and lactacyd on the growth of skin flora in healthy newborn infants.
16	pacemaker infections a 12 year review	Pacemaker infections after 12 years of study.
16	self inoculation with milk as a cause of recurrent cellulitis	L' auto-inoculation of milk as a cause of recurrent cellulitis.
16	correlation of human in vivo and in vitro cutaneous antimicrobial factors	Correlation of cutaneous antimicrobial factors in vivo and in vitro in humans.
16	transient bacteremia associated with percutaneous liver biopsy	Acute percutaneous liver biopsy associated with transient bacteremia.
16	control of sterol synthesis and of hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase in skin fibroblasts grown from patients with homozygous type ii hyperlipoproteinemia	The control of sterol and l&apos synthesis; hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase in skin fibroblasts obtained from patients with type II homozygous hyperlipoproteinemia.
16	pressure dependent factors in edema formation in canine forelimbs	Pressure-dependent factors in canine egg formation; edema in forelimbs.
16	an analysis of the specificity in pharmacological inhibition of the passive cutaneous anaphylaxis reaction in mice and rats	An analysis of the specificity of l'apos; pharmacological inhibition of the passive anaphylactic skin reaction in mice and rats.
16	the isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon binding proteins from mouse liver and skin cytosols	The isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon binding proteins in mouse liver and skin cytosols.
16	procollagen peptidase its mode of action on the native substrate	The procollagen peptidase acts on the native substrate.
16	growth in agarose of human cells infected with cytomegalovirus	Agarose growth of human cells infected with cytomegalovirus.
16	theoretical and experimental principles and clinical aplications of the antiandrognes author s transl	Theoretical and experimental principles and clinical aplications of the anti-androgens translator.
16	an unusual variant of klippel trenaunay weber syndrome	Unusual variant of klippel trenaunay weber syndrome.
16	capacities of humans and monkeys to discriminate vibratory stimuli of different frequency and amplitude a correlation between neural events and psychological measurements	The ability of humans and monkeys to distinguish vibratory stimuli of different frequencies and amplitudes, a correlation between neural events and psychological measurements.
16	effect of zinc deficiency and repletion on thymidine metabolism	The effect of zinc deficiency and deficiency on thymidine metabolism.
16	vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia a case report and family study	Vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia case report and family study.
16	afferent new fiber activity responding to temperature changes of scrotal skin of the rat	New afferent fibrous activity responds to changes in skin temperature in the rat scrotum.
16	cerebroside sulfatase activity in cultivated human skin fibroblasts and amniotic fluid cells	L' cerebroside sulfatase activity in cultured human skin fibroblasts and amniotic fluid cells.
16	the locus for human adenine phosphoribosyltransferase on chromosome no 16	The locus for l' human adenine phosphoribosyltransferase on chromosome #16.
16	a disease of freshwater fishes caused by tetrahymena corlissi thompson 1955 and a key for identification of holotrich ciliates of freshwater fishes	Disease of fishes; freshwater caused by tetrahymena corlissi thompson 1955 and key dapos; identification of holotrichous ciliates of fishes; freshwater.
16	studies on the immune status of patients with renal adenocarcinoma	Studies on immune status of patients with renal adenocarcinoma.
16	fatal pox infection in a rough legged hawk	A deadly smallpox infection in a rough-legged falcon.
16	the histopathology of fin rot disease in winter flounder from the new york bight	L' histopathology of fin rot in winter flounder from New York Bay.
16	stimulus response functions of slowly adapting mechanoreceptors in the human glabrous skin area	The mechanoreceptor response-stimulation functions of the slow adaptation in the human skin glabrous region.
16	ibuprofen or aspirin in rheumatoid arthritis therapy	Ibuprofen or aspirin in the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis.
16	properties of strains of escherichia coli isolated from a variety of sources	Properties of strains of Escherichia coli isolated from a variety of sources.
16	clinical implications of the presence of drug residues in food	Clinical consequences of the presence of drug residues in food.
16	persistent modification of synaptic interactions between sensory and motor nerve cells following discrete lesions in the central nervous system of the leech	Persistent modification of synaptic interactions between sensory and motor nerve cells following discrete lesions in the leech central nervous system.
16	mouse skin tumorigenesis and induction of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase by tobacco smoke fractions	Mouse skin tumorigenesis and induction of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase by tobacco smoke fractions.
16	characterization of spontaneous chemicak and viral transformants of a c3h 3t3 type mouse cell line by transplantation into young chick blastoderms	Characterization of spontaneous chemicak and viral transformants from a c3h 3t3 mouse cell line by transplantation into young chick blastoderms.
16	self mutilation in mice associated with otitis media	Auto-mutilation in mice associated with otitis media.
16	prolonged inhibition of mouse epidermal dna synthesis by dexamethasone	Prolonged inhibition of mouse epidermal DNA synthesis by dexamethasone.
16	role of human skin in the photodecomposition of bilirubin	The role of human skin in the photodecomposition of bilirubin.
16	half lives of two types of rat homocytotropic antibodies in circulation and in the skin	Half-life of two types of rat homocytotropic antibodies in circulation and in the skin.
16	subcellular fractions from dermis and epidermis in contact sensitization of guinea pigs to 1 chloro 2 4 dinitrobenzene	Subcellular dermal and epidermal features; epidermis in sensitization to contact of guinea pigs with 1 chloro 24 dinitrobenzene.
16	studies in immunodermatology vi if studies of autoantibodies to the stratum corneum and of in vivo fixed igg in stratum corneum of psoriatic lesions	Immunodermatology studies vi if studies of auto-antibodies to stratum corneum and in vivo fixed igg in stratum corneum of psoriatic lesions.
16	studies in immunodermatology vii four compartment system studies of igg in stratum corneum and of stratum corneum antigen in biopsies of psoriasis and control dermatoses	Immunodermatology studies vii four compartmental studies of apos; stratum corneum and apos; stratum corneum antigen in biopsies of psoriasis and control dermatoses.
16	influence of ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in healing wounds of scorbutic guinea pigs	"""Ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in healing injuries of guinea guinea pigs"", Arch."
16	gloved hand as applicator of antiseptic to operation sites	Gloated hand as applicator of antiseptic at the sites d' operation.
16	a newly reported toxic australian frog genus heleioporus	A new toxic genus of Australian frog Heleioporus.
16	involvement of the skin in late infantile and juvenile amaurotic idiocies neuronal ceroid lipofuscinoses	Implication of the skin in late amaurotic and juvenile idiocytic, lipofuscinoses ceronal neuronal lipofuscinosis.
16	an evaluation of skin snip techniques used in the quantitative assessment of microfilarial densities of onchocerca volvulus	Evaluation of skin-cutting techniques used in the apo; quantitative evaluation of microfilariae density; volvulus onchocerca.
16	a new look at osteogenesis imperfecta a clinical radiological and biochemical study of forty two patients	A new look at osteogenesis and osteogenesis imperfecta a clinical radiological and biochemical study of 42 patients.
16	relationship between lipids in plasma and skin secretions of neonatal calf with particular reference to linoleic acid	Relationship of lipids in plasma to dermal secretions of neonatal calf, particularly with respect to apos; linoleic acid.
16	saprophytic occurrence of trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum gypseum in the coats of healthy laboratory animals preliminary report	Saprophytic presence of trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum gypseum in the coats of d' healthy laboratory animals, preliminary report.
16	mycotic flora of the interdigital spaces of the human foot a preliminary investigation	Mycotic flora of the interdigital spaces of the human foot a preliminary study.
16	an on line system for measurement of opacity pulse propagation times in atraumatic screening of patients for occlusive vascular disease	An online system to measure pulse propagation times; opacity in atraumatic screening of patients for occlusive vascular disease.
16	nondestructive measurements of the properties of healing burn scars	Non-destructive measurements of the healing properties of burn scars.
16	werner s syndrome autopsy report of one case with a review of pathologic findings reported in the literature	Werner's Syndrome autopsy d&apos, one case, accompanied by a review of pathological findings reported in the literature.
16	letter side benefits of the pill	The benefits of the pill are near the letters.
16	reticulosarcoma like skin lesions in phenylketonuria author s transl	Reticulosarcoma like skin lesions in phenylketonuria s transl.
16	role of meningococcal endotoxin in meningococcal purpura	The role of meningococcal endotoxin in meningococcal purpura.
16	the role of the skin in active specific immunization against leukemia in guinea pigs	The role of skin in active specific immunization against leukemia in guinea pigs.
16	demonstration and assaying of igg antibodies in tissues and on cells by labeled staphylococcal protein a	Demonstration and quantitation of antibody igg in tissues and on cells at baseline; protein a labeled staphylococcal.
16	absolute concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol in the skin layers after local treatment in vivo investigations with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles	Absolute concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol in the skin layers after local in vivo treatment with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles.
16	effect of polysorbate 85 on human skin	The effect of polysorbate 85 on human skin.
16	the innervation of hyperplastic epidermis in the mouse a light microscopic study	L' innervation of the apos; hyperplastic epidermis in the mouse was studied by light microscopy.
16	the detection of carotenoid pigments in human skin	The detection of carotenoid pigments in human skin.
16	lattice and rodlet nuclear inclusions in merkel cells in rabbit epidermis	Network and rod nuclear inclusions in merkel cells of rabbit epidermis.
16	distribution of radioactivity in the organs of the rat and mouse after injection of l 3h prolyl l leucyl glycinamide	Distribution of radioactivity in the organs of the rat and mouse after injection of prolyl leucyl glycinamide 3h.
16	feeding of boophilus microplus larvae on a partially defined medium through thin slices of cattle skin	Feeding of boophilus microplus larvae on a medium partially defined by thin slices of bovine skin.
16	isotope kinetics of human skin cholesterol secretion	Isotope kinetics of human skin cholesterol secretion.
16	relief of pain by transcutaneous stimulation	Relief of pain by transcutaneous stimulation.
16	skin carcinogenesis cholesterol 5alpha 6alpha epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin irradiated with ultraviolet light	Skin cancer cholesterol 5alpha 6alpha activity of l' epoxide hydrates in mouse skin irradiated by ultraviolet light.
16	prevention of malignant change in mammalian cells during prolonged culture in vitro	Prevention of malignant changes in mammalian cells during prolonged culture in vitro.
16	topical treatment of dermatophytoses and candidoses	Topical treatment of dermatophytoses and candidiasis.
16	t rosettes in alcoholic cirrhosis of the liver	T rosettes in alcoholic cirrhosis of the liver.
16	patients with ehlers danlos syndrome type iv lack type iii collagen	"Patients with ""Type IV"" ehlers danlos syndrome do not have type iii collagen."
16	human epidermal growth factor isolation and chemical and biological properties	Human epidermal growth factor isolation and chemical and biological properties.
16	response of muscular and cutaneous vessels to physiologic stimulation of chemoreceptors 38505	Physiological stimulation of chemoreceptors 38505 by muscle and cutaneous vessels.
16	distribution and metabolism of 3h 2 5 2 5 tetrachlorobiphenyl in rats	Distribution and metabolism of the tetrachlorobiphenyl 3h 2h 5h 5h5 in rats.
16	kaposi s varicelliform eruption complicating local facial trauma case report	The Kaposi varicella rash complicates the report of local facial trauma cases.
16	panniculectomy specimens as a convenient and inexpensive of homograft skin	Panniculectomy specimens as a convenient and inexpensive homograft skin.
16	hazards from simian herpes viruses reactivation of skin lesions with virus shedding	Risks associated with apoviruses; simian herpes Reactivation of skin lesions by apo; viral shedding.
16	flow and composition of skin and muscle lymph of the hind limb of the rabbit after injury	Flux and composition of the skin and muscle lymph of the hind limb of the rabbit after injury.
16	a study of connective tissue macromolecules in skin of mice with goldthioglucose induced obesity	A study of connective tissue macromolecules in the skin of mice receiving orthoglucose induced obesity.
16	enhancement of interferon production in vitro a property of tilorone poly rl rc deae dextran	Increase in the production of tilorone; in vitro interferon, a property of tilorone poly rl rc deae dextran.
16	chromosomal instability in cell lines derived from patients with xeroderma pigmentosum	Chromosome instability in cell lines from patients with xeroderma pigmentosum.
16	dose time relationships for skin reactions and structural damage in rat feet exposed to 250 kvp x rays	Time-dose relationships for skin reactions and structural damage to the feet of rats exposed to 250 kvp X-rays.
16	relative doses to skin and superficial nodes from 10 mv photons as a function of field size and distance from shadow tray	Doses for skin and surface nodes from 10 mv photons as a function of field size and distance from the d&apos plateau; shade.
16	early and late radiation changes following a second course of irradiation	Early and late radiation changes following second irradiation.
16	the rate of mitotic division in regenerating epithelium in the dog	The rate of mitotic division in regenerating epithelium in dogs.
16	the effect of induced arterial hypertension upon regional blood flow in subcutaneous tissue in patients with arterial insufficiency of the legs	L' effect of apo; induced arterial hypertension on regional blood flow in tissue under <-> skin tissue in patients with leg arterial insufficiency.
16	histochemical study of erythema nodosum leprosum enl lesions	Histochemical study of lesions of l' erythema nodosum leprosum removed.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 1 storage of hyaluronic acid and its possible significance in the pathogenesis of leprosy	Acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 1 storage of l' hyaluronic acid and its possible importance in the pathogenesis of leprosy.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 2 subcellular localization of hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprous infiltrates suggestive of a host mycobacterium leprae metabolic relationship	Acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 2 subcellular localization of l' hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprosy infiltrates suggesting a host metabolic relationship-mycobacterium leprae.
16	the effects of light on the human body	The effects of light on the human body.
16	diagnosis of scabies	We've got a diagnosis of scabies.
16	liquid gel partition chromatography of vitamin a compounds formation of retinoic acid from retinyl acetate in vivo	Liquid-gel partition chromatography of vitamin a compounds forming apos; retinoic acid from apos; retinyl acetate in vivo.
16	the effect of suture materials on healing wounds of the bladder	L' effect of suture materials on wound healing of the bladder.
16	atypical fibroxanthoma of the skin	You know, atypical fibroxanthoma of the skin.
16	histochemical and electron microscopic studies of the human cutaneous lymphatic capillary	Histochemical and electron microscopic studies of human lymphatic skin capillaries.
16	the deltopectoral flap an anatomical and hemodynamic approach	L' anatomical and hemodynamic approach to deltopectoral lambe.
16	detection of small vessels for microsurgery by a doppler flowmeter	Detection of small vessels for microsurgery with a Doppler flowmeter.
16	absorption metabolism and excretion by goldfish of the anionic detergent sodium lauryl sulphate	D'apos metabolism; absorption and excretion by goldfish of the anionic detergent sodium lauryl sulfate.
16	residual radiation damage in mouse skin 5 to 8 months after irradiation	Residual radiation damage in mouse skin 5 to 8 months after exposure.
16	contamination of broiler chickens by salmonella during processing in a number of poultry processing plants author s transl	The contamination of broiler chickens by Salmonella during processing in a number of poultry processing establishments.
16	tegumentary glands of the supra anal pit of scutigerellidae symphala myriapoda	Integumentary glands of the supraanal pit of the symphala myriapoda scutigerellid.
16	osler weber rendu syndrome urologist s view	D&apos syndrome osler weber made urologist.
16	induction of neural differentiation in cultures of amphibian undetermined presumptive epidermis by cyclic amp derivatives	Induction of neural differentiation in cultures of apos; presumptive undetermined epidermis of apos; amphibian by apos derivatives; cyclic ampoules.
16	prurigo nodularis and uremia	Prurigo nodularis and uremia.
16	hard x ray therapy with special reference to postoperative irradiation of breast carcinoma	X-ray therapy with special reference to post-operative irradiation of breast carcinoma.
16	histological studies after experimental grid irradiation iv findings in the skin	Histological studies after experimental grid iv irradiation discovered in the skin.
16	a herpesvirus type agent associated with skin lesions of green sea turtles in aquaculture	Herpesvirus-like agent associated with skin lesions of green sea turtles in aquaculture.
16	pathogenic considerations in systemic lupus erythematosus d l e immunohistologic studies author s transl	Pathogenic considerations in lupus erythematosus disseminated from translated immunohistological studies.
16	burn sepsis and burn toxin	Burn the sepsis and burn toxin.
16	deposits of immunoglobulins and complement c3 in clinically normal skin of patients with lupus erythematosus	Deposition of immunoglobulins and c3 complement into clinically normal skin of patients with lupus erythematosus.
16	keratinosomes in psoriatic skin	It's called keratinosomes in psoriatic skin.
16	a case of halo nevus with effete melanocytes	Case of halo nevus with effete melanocytes.
16	testosterone 5alpha reduction in the skin of normal subjects and of patients with abnormal sex development	Testosterone 5alpha reduction in the skin of normal subjects and patients with abnormal sexual development.
16	the geographical distribution of onchocerca volvulus infection in liberia	The geographical distribution of the onchocercia volvulus infection in liberia.
16	avulsion injuries in patients receiving corticosteroids	Avulsion injuries in patients receiving corticosteroids.
16	ultrastructural studies in epidermolysis bullosa heriditaria i dominant dystrophic type of pasini	Ultrastructural studies of eidermal bullosa heriditaria i dominant dystrophic type of pasini.
16	mycosis fungoides with marked brain involvement a case report	Fungoid fungus with marked cerebral involvement a case report.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and neurodermatitis lichen simplex hypertrophicus	Epidermal Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and neurodermatitis lichen simplex hypertrophicus hypertrophicus.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis during treatment with dithranol	Epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis during treatment with dithranol.
16	protein requirements of men in a hot climate decreased urinary nitrogen losses concomitant with increased sweat nitrogen losses during exposure to high environmental temperature	The protein requirements of men in a hot climate decreased urinary nitrogen losses at the same time as the increased losses of nitrogen from sweat during the heat; exposure to high ambient temperatures.
16	giant melanosomes in moles and in normal human epidermis author s transl	Giant melanosomes in moles and epidermis normal human translative epidermis.
16	trophic phenomena in dermatology author s transl	Translation of trophic phenomena in dermatology by the authors.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus in a 1 year old child	Lupus erythematosus disseminated in 1 year old child.
16	viral infection and interferon in cell cultures aged in vitro	Viral infection and interferon in cell cultures aged in vitro.
16	a comparison of methods for collecting clean catch urine specimens in a clinic population of obstetric patients	Comparison of methods of collecting urine samples from a population of obstetric patients in a clinic.
16	trancutaneous determination of aortic blood flow velocities in man	Trancutaneous determination of aortic blood flow velocities in man.
16	hemodynimic effects of systemic and central administration of clonidine in the monkey	Hemodynimal effects of clonidine; systemic and central administration of clonidine in the monkey.
16	a case of hartmannellid amebic meningoencephalitis in zambia	A case of hartmannellid amebic meningoencephalitis in Zambia.
16	the survival and growth of microorganisms in mascara during use	The survival and growth of micro-@ organisms in the mascara during use.
16	epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin eidermis	Apos; epos activity; epoxy hydrase in apos; mouse skin eiderm.
16	the subcellular localization of labelled tyrosine in the vitelline cells of schistosoma mansoni	The subcellular localization of labelled tyrosine in the yolk cells of schistosoma mansoni.
16	the fine structure of the cysticercoid of hymenolepis diminuta iii the scolex	The fine structure of the cysticercoid of hymenolepis decreased iii of the scolex.
16	epidemiological study of an hand foot and mouth disease outbreak observed in rome in the fall of 1973	Epidemiological study of an outbreak of foot-and-mouth disease (FMD) in Rome in the fall of 1973.
16	the structure of the sternal bursa of turkeys	The structure of the sternal exchange of turkeys.
16	the peripheral perfusion pressure a new non invasive parameter for the circulatory monitoring of patients author s transl	Peripheral perfusion pressure is a new non-invasive parameter for the circulatory monitoring of patient translators.
16	dipetalonema streptocerca macfie and corson 1922 description of the adult female	Dipetalonema streptocerca macfie and corson 1922 Description of the adult female.
16	plantar epidermis of the guinea pig and characteristics of the stratum corneum	Plantar epidermis of the guinea pig and characteristics of the stratum corneum.
16	use of the pulse wave monitor as a measurement of diagnostic sympathetic block and of surgical sympathectomy	Use of the d*apos monitor; pulse waves as a diagnostic sympathetic block and surgical sympathectomy measure.
16	spatial distribution of mitosis in mouse epidermis	Spatial distribution of mitosis in mouse epidermis.
16	postinflammatory acquired atresia of the external auditory canal	Aresia of the external auditory canal acquired after implantation; inflammation.
16	tachyphylaxis to the action of topically applied corticosteroids	Tachyphylaxis to the skin; action of the corticosteroids applied locally.
16	basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinoma like changes overlying dermatofibromas	Basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinomas look like changes to dermatofibromas.
16	miconazole therapy for endemic fungal disease	Micronazole therapy for endemic fungal diseases.
16	erythema gyratum atrophicans transiens neonatale	Erythema gyratum atrophicans transiens neonatal.
16	psoriasis on tumor	Psoriasis on tumor!
16	the importance of being visually literate observations on the art and science of making a morphological diagnosis in dermatology	To have a good visual knowledge of the art and science of dentistry; to make a morphological diagnosis in dermatology.
16	the histoid variety of lepromatous leprosy	Uh, the histoid variety of leprosy.
16	nerves and nerve endings in pigmented nevi part i	Nervous and nerve endings in pigmented area nevi i.
16	separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblasts in primary skin culture	Separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblasts in primary skin culture.
16	the chemotactic effect of blister roof blister fluid and blister floor on polymorphonuclear leucocytes in dermatitis herpetiformis duhring author s transl	The chemotactic effect of blister blister fluid and blister floor on polymorphonuclear leukocytes in dermatitis herpetiformis duhring author s transl.
16	the effect of some solvents on the epidermis author s transl	The effects of certain solvents on the skin; epidermis; translates.
16	scabies histological study of inflammatory lesions	Scabies histological study of inflammatory lesions.
16	a new formula for depigmenting human skin	It's a new formula for depigmenting human skin.
16	precocious noduloulcerative cutaneous syphilis	Nodulo cutaneous syphilis-ulcerative early.
16	orally given indomethacin and blood flow response to uvl	Indomethacin and blood flow response to apos; uvl orally.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in lepromatous leprosy skin presence of deposits in apparently uninvolved skin and occurrence of serum antiepithelial antibodies	Deposits of apos; immunoglobulin in leprosy skin leprosy presence of deposits in apparently uninvolved skin and appearance of serum antiepithelial antibodies.
16	pruritic maculopapular skin lesions in sarcoidosis an unusual clinical presentation	Pruritic maculopapular skin lesions in sarcoidosis present an unusual clinical picture.
16	time of onset and regression of d penicillamine activity measured by rupture load of rat skin	Moment of onset and regression of os; penicillamine activity measured by rat skin rupture charge.
16	the effect of salicylic acid on epidermal cell proliferation kinetics in psoriasis autoradiographic in vitro investigations author s transl	The effect of salicylic acid on the epidermal cell proliferation kinetics in psoriasis autoradiographic investigations in vitro.
16	hydrotherapy in cauterization wounds a histologic study author s transl	L' hydrotherapy in cauterization hurts an author d' a histological study.
16	ultrastructural demonstration of cystine in guinea pig back stratum corneum	Ultrastructural evidence of cystine in the guinea pig back corneum stratum.
16	cutaneous hydroxystereoid dehydrogenases and rat hair cycle	Skin dehydrogenases and rat hair cycle.
16	repeated topical applications of 1 2 4 trichlorobenzene effects on rabbit ears	Repeated topical application of 14 trichlorobenzene effects on rabbit ears.
16	environmental health hazards from high powered infrared laser devices	Risks to the safety of the environment from high-powered infrared laser devices.
16	skin dose with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy a study using lithium borate thermoluminescent dosimeters	Cutaneous dose with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy a study using lithium thermoluminescent borate dosimeters.
16	molecular pathogenesis of systemic lupus erythematosus	Molecular pathogenesis of systemic lupus erythematosus.
16	congenital insensitivity to noxious stimuli	You know, congenital insensitivity to noxious stimuli.
16	leishmaniasis in brazil x some observations of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatid antigens of patients suffering from cutaneous and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis	Leishmaniasis in Brazil x some observations of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatic antigens in patients with cutaneous and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis.
16	5 methoxy n acetyltryptamine melatonin in enterochromaffin cells	Five methoxy n acetyltryptamine melatonin in enterochromaffin cells.
16	histidinemia classical and atypical form in siblings	Classic histidinemia and atypical form in siblings.
16	acute gastric disease after cutaneous thermal injury	Dermal thermal injury causes acute gastric illness.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in mucopolysaccharidoses studies performed before and after plasma infusion therapy	L' ultrastructure of the skin in studies of mucopolysaccharideosis performed before and after plasma perfusion therapy.
16	cutaneous reactions of alloxan diabetic rats to local thermal trauma	Skin reactions of alloxan-induced diabetic rats to local thermal injury.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in systemic scleroderma	L' ultrastructure of the skin in systemic scleroderma.
16	skin and homograft cartilage reconstruction	Reconstruction of skin and skin cartilage; homograft.
16	blood flow measurements in skin flaps	Measure blood flow in skin flaps.
16	pharmacology of d penicillamine	Pharmacology of penicillamine d.
16	structure of cultured fibroblasts from dermatosparaxic calves	Structure of cultured bovine fibroblasts from dermatosparaxic calves.
16	tissue specificity of the epidermal chalones	Specificity of the tissue of the epidermal chalones.
16	activity of alpha d mannosidase in human langerhans epidermal cells	L' activity of alpha mannosidase in human langerhans epidermal cells.
16	solar urticaria a case with possible increase of skin mast cells	Solar Urticaria case with a possible increase of mast cells skin.
16	the interaction of concanavalin a and the surface coat of stratified squamous epithelium	The interaction of concanavalin a and the surface layer of the epithelium.
16	the erythemal action spectrum and deoxyribonucleic acid repair synthesis in xeroderma pigmentosum	Apos spectrum; erythemal action and deoxyribonucleic acid repair synthesis in xeroderma pigmentosum.
16	the bacteriological ecosystem of the skin of children in an african tropical envirovment tanzania	L' bacteriological ecosystem of the skin of children in an envirovment tanzania African Tropical.
16	cell migration and dna synthesis in organ culture of human skin	Cellular migration and synthesis of DNA in cultures of human skin organs.
16	the areal extent of dermatophyte infection	L' extent of the apos; dermatophytic infection.
16	the length breadth ratio of skin flaps on the trunk two new long narrow flaps	The ratio length to width of skin flaps on the trunk two new long and narrow flaps.
16	the proliferative response to epidermis of hairless mice to full thickness wounds	Proliferative response to epidermis of hairless mice to thick wounds.
16	the skin of primates xlii the skin of the silvered sakiwinki pithecia monachus	The skin of primates xlii the skin of the silver pithecia monachus sakiwinki.
16	phylogenetic significance of the skin of new world monkeys order primates infraorder platyrrhini	The phylogenetic significance of the skin of new world monkeys ordains primates infra-order platyrrhini.
16	diagnosis of familial hypercholesterolemia by measurement of sterol synthesis in cultured skin fibroblasts	Diagnosis of familial hypercholesterolemia by measuring sterol synthesis in cultured skin fibroblasts.
16	loss of cholesterol from muscle and skin of monkeys treated with nicotinic acid	Loss of cholesterol in the muscles and skin of monkeys treated with nicotinic acid.
16	reflex vascular responses in kidney ileum and forelimb to carotid body stimulation	Reflex vascular reactions of renal ileum and forelimb to carotid body stimulation.
16	changes in vesical function produced by cutaneous stimulation in rats	Changes in bladder function induced by skin stimulation in rats.
16	gamma heavy chain disease rapid sustained response to cyclophosphamide and prednisone	Gamma heavy chain disease rapid response to cyclophosphamide and prednisone.
16	heat destruction of some bacterial strains attached to broiler skin	The heat destruction of certain bacterial strains attached to broiler skin.
16	feather pecking and cannibalism in a caged layer flock	Feather kissing and cannibalism in a caged flock.
16	the effectiveness of in plant chlorination in poultry processing	L' efficiency of chlorination in poultry processing plants.
16	clinical and physiological aspects of transcutaneous oxygen measurements in perinatal medicine author s transl	The clinical and physiological aspects of transcutaneous measurements of oxygen in perinatal medicine.
16	onchocerca cervicalis infection in horses from the western united states	Onchocerca cervicalis infection in horses in the states-United West.
16	elimination of sulfamethazine from edible tissues blood urine and feces of turkey poults	Elimination of sulfamethazine from edible tissues of blood and feces of turkeys.
16	the immunofluorescent band test in mixed connective tissue disease	Testing for immunofluorescent bands in mixed connective tissue diseases.
16	changes in cutaneous flora after wet occlusion	Changes in skin flora after wet occlusion.
16	isolation of dermatophytes candida species and systemic fungi from dermatologic specimens in montr al 1963 to 1973	Isolation of candida dermatophytes and systemic fungi from dermatological specimens in the mountains from 1963 to 1973.
16	dilantin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation with purpura fulminans a case report	Dilantine induced disseminated intravascular coagulation with purpura fulminans, a case report.
16	thymic origin of abnormal lymphoid cells in s zary syndrome	Thymic origin of abnormal lymphoid cells in the zary syndrome.
16	mosaic 14 trisomy in a female child with multiple abnormalities	Mosaic 14 trisomy in a girl with multiple abnormalities.
16	on the functions of the pore cells in the connective tissue of terrestrial pulmonate molluscs	On the function of the porous cells in the connective tissue of terrestrial, pulmonary molluscs.
16	induction of the polyamine biosynthetic enzymes in mouse epidermis by tumor promoting agents	Induction of polyamine biosynthetic enzymes in mouse epidermis by tumor promoters.
16	the fine structure of the epidermis of two species of salmonid fish the atlantic salmon salmo salar l and the brown trout salmo trutta l i general organization and filament containing cells	The fine structure of the epidermis of two species of salmonid fish, the Atlantic salmon salmo salar l and the brown trout salmo trutta l general organization and filament containing cells.
16	differential cytotoxic acitivity of anticollagen serum on rat osteoblasts and fibroblasts in tissue culture	Differential cytotoxic activity of anticollagen serum on rat osteoblasts and fibroblasts in tissue culture.
16	development of high intensity narrow band lamps and studies of the irradiation effect on human skin irradiation with high intensity lamps	The development of high-intensity narrow-band lamps and studies of their effects; radiation on them; irradiation of human skin with high-intensity lamps.
16	products of epidermal protein synthesis	Products of epidermal protein synthesis.
16	electron microscopic study of nevic corpuscle	An electron microscopic study of the corpuscle.
16	epidermal intercellular binding of concanavalin a and pemphigus antibody	Epidermal intercellular binding of concanavalin a and apos; antibody-pemphigus.
16	histochemical analysis of epidermal cells and mucous cells in the skin of torpedo ocellata rafinesque	Histochemical analysis of epidermal and mucous cells from the skin of the torpedo ocellata rafinesque.
16	human evoked responses to potentially noxious tactile stimulation i	Suspected human reactions to potentially harmful tactile stimulation i.
16	necrotizing vasculitis etiologic aspects of immunology and coagulopathy	Vascular necrosis Etiologic aspects of immunology and coagulopathy.
16	cutis laxa ultrastructural and biochemical studies	Ultrastructural and biochemical studies of cutis laxa.
16	treatment of psoriasis with 6 aminonicotinamide	Treatment of psoriasis with 6 aminonicotinamide drugs.
16	acne aestivalis	Acne aestivalis acne.
16	nodular subcutaneous fat necrosis a manifestation of silent pancreatitis	Fat necrosis under-nodular skin, manifestation of silent pancreatitis.
16	low dosage cytarabine therapy for herpes zoster with pneumonia	Low-dose cytarabine therapy for pneumonia-induced shingles.
16	mannosidosis deficiency of a specific alpha mannosidase component in cultured fibroblasts	Mannose deficiency of apos; a specific component of alpha mannosidase in cultured fibroblasts.
16	familial opsonization defect associated with fatal infantile dermatitis infections and histiocytosis	An abnormality of apos; familial opsonization associated with fatal childhood dermatitis and histiocytosis.
16	pathogenetic aspects of bromocarbamide intoxication	Pathogenic aspects of bromocarbamide poisoning.
16	thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase their ultrastructural localization in rat skin	Both thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase are localized in rat skin ultrastructure.
16	effect of high dosis of d penicillamine and paramethasone on mechanical properties of rat connective tissue author s transl	Apos; a high dose of d penicillamine and paramethasone on mechanical properties of rat connective tissue.
16	the management of traumatic tattoos	Tattoo management, traumatic tattoo management.
16	fabry s disease on the mechanism of the peripheral nerve involvement	Fabry's disease on the mechanism of the apos; peripheral nerve involvement.
16	bacterial flora in relation to cataract extraction i material methods and preoperative flora	Bacterial flora in relation to cataract extraction i material methods and the preoperative flora.
16	local tissue effects of surface applied ent drugs	Local tissue effects of applied surface drugs.
16	reticulosarcomatosis originating from skin a clinicopathological study	Reticulosarcomatosis from the skin a clinicopathological study.
16	exacerbation and reactivation of herpesvirus hominis infection in mice by cyclophosphamide	Herpesvirus hominis infection exacerbated and reactivated in mice by cyclophosphamide.
16	incontinentia pigmenti	Incontinence pork-lied.
16	cystic fibrosis heterozygote detection a study on a normal population	Apos detection; cystic fibrosis heterozygosity in a normal population study.
16	effect of spinal sympathetic blockade upon local regulation of blood flow in subcutaneous tissue	Effect of spinal cord sympathetic blockade on local regulation of blood flow in tissue at-skin.
16	studies on soft tissue reactions to implantation of glass ceramics author s transl	Studies on soft tissue responses to implantation of translucent glassware.
16	hairlessness in mus musculus a pathologic study	L' absence of hair in the musculus is a study of the disease.
16	perianal paget disease histochemical differentiation utilizing the borohydride koh pas reaction	Perianal paget disease histochemical differentiation using the borohydride koh non reaction.
16	topography and topology in functional recovery of regenreated sensory and motor systems	Topography and topology of the functional recovery of the sensory and motor systems regenerated.
16	feather pattern development	A feather pattern.
16	labelling of murine epidermal langerhans cells with h3 thymidine	Marking of mouse epidermal langerhans cells with thymidine h3.
16	clinical picture and pathomorphology of traumatic high pressure oil injections the so called grease gun injury	The clinical picture and pathomorphology of the traumatic injections of high-pressure oil are what we call the fat gun wound.
16	translation of mrna for 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase isolated from epidermis tissue of calliphora vicina r d in a heterologous system dependence of mrna concentration on the insect steroid hormone ecdysone	Translation of mrna for 3 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase isolated from the epidermal tissue of calliphora vicina r in a heterologous system dependent on mrna concentration on the apos; ecdysone, an insect steroid hormone.
16	collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin normal and hypertrophic scar and keloid	Collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin and hypertrophic and keloid scar tissue.
16	the palmo mental reflex an electrophysiological study	Palmo's mental reflex is an electrophysiological study of the brain.
16	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease peripheral nerve lesion author s transl	Leucodystrophy of the translational peripheral nerve lesion of krabbe globoid cells.
16	transcutaneous electrical stimulation in treatment of postoperative pain	Acute transcutaneous electrical stimulation in the treatment of post-operative pain.
16	glycogen in epidermal nerve terminals of lacerta sicula squamata reptilia	Glycogen in epidermal nerve terminals of lacerta sicula squamata reptilia reptilia.
16	appearance of sex hormone receptors in frog rana esculenta tadpole skin during metamorphosis	L' appearance of sex receptors in frog tadpoles; sexual hormones in frog tadpoles during metamorphosis.
16	langerhans cells in tissue cultures of guinea pig epidermal cells	Langerhans in tissue cultures of guinea pig epidermal cells.
16	immunoglobulins in the skin in dermatitis herpetiformis and their relevance in diagnosis	Immunoglobulins in the skin in dermatitis herpetiformis and their importance in diagnosis.
16	micro determination of cyclic amp levels in human epidermis dermis and haif follicles	Microscopic determination of cyclic blisters in the dermis; human epidermis and hair follicles.
16	further studies on adenyl cyclase in psoriasis	D' other apo studies; adenylate cyclase in psoriasis were also conducted.
16	dermal epidermal deposition of complement components and properdin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Skin epidermal deposition of complement and propidin components in the systemic lupus erythematosus.
16	tumour angiogenic factor associated with subcutaneous lymphoma	Tumor angiogenic factor associated with lymphoma under-cutaneous.
16	primary cell culture for biochemical studies of human keratinocytes a method for production of very large numbers of cells without the necessity of subculturing techniques	Primary cell culture for biochemical studies of human keratinocytes is a method for producing a very large number of cells without qu*apos; sub@-@ culture techniques are required.
16	the junctional zone beneath migrating epidermis	The junction zone, under @-@jacent to the epidermis migration, is the junction zone of the epidermis.
16	pretibial epidermolysis bullosa report of two families and review of the literature	Two families and a review of the literature are reported in L' pretibiale bullosa epidermal.
16	elimination of circulating antibodies attempts to eliminate antibodies circulating in rabbits using a fraction of normal human epidermis	The elimination of circulating antibodies attempts to remove antibodies circulating in rabbits using a fraction of the normal human epidermis.
16	study on the mode of action of dithranol increased lipid peroxidation and enzyme inhibition	L' study of the mode of action; action of dithranol increased lipid peroxidation and enzyme inhibition.
16	on the facial muscles in perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang author s transl	On the facial muscles in perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang s translator.
16	effect of dietary copper deficiency in the rat on fatty acid composition of adipose tissue and desaturase activity of liver microsomes	The effect of dietary copper deficiency in the rat on fatty acid composition of adipose tissue and the desaturase activity of liver microsomes.
16	tularaemia in the rat i the cellular basis on host resistance to infection	Tularemia in rat is the cellular basis on resistance of host to infection.
16	the amino acid sequence of chick skin collagen alpha1 cb7	This is the amino acid sequence of collagen alpha1 cb7 from chicken skin.
16	bullous dermatosis of hemodialysis	Bubble dermatosis of the apos; hemodialysis.
16	tropomyosin antibody the specific localization of tropomyosin in nonmuscle cells	Tropomyosin antibody the specific localization of tropomyosin in nonmuscle cells.
16	some laboratory studies on the accuracy of bite mark comparison	Some laboratory studies on the accuracy of bite mark comparison.
16	specificity of antigens in aqueous phenol extracts of skin examined by means of guinea pig and rabbit immune sera	The specificity of antigens in aqueous extracts of skin phenol has been examined using guinea pig and rabbit immune sera.
16	a comparative evaluation of bacteriologic and morphologic indices of mycobacterium leprae in skin lymph node bone marrow nerve and muscle	Comparative evaluation of bacteriological and morphological indices of leprae mycobacteria in skin lymph node bone marrow nerve and muscle.
16	a radioautographic study of collagen synthesis by earthworm epidermis	A radioautographic study of collagen synthesis by earthworm epidermis.
16	the fine structure of epidermal glands of regenerating and mature globiferous pedicellariae of a sea urchin lytechinus pictus	The fine structure of epidermal glands of regenerating and mature globose pedicellaris; a lytechinus pictus sea urchin.
16	diagnostic significance of the immunofluorescent pattern in dermatitis herpetiformis	L' diagnostic significance of immunofluorescence profile in herpetiform dermatitis.
16	s zary s syndrome case report	This is a case report on Zarys Syndrome.
16	experimental studies of the pathogenesis of infections due to pseudomonas aeruginosa description of a burned mouse model	Experimental studies of the pathogenesis of infections due to pseudomonas aeruginosa describe d' a model of burned mice.
16	isolates of california encephalitis la crosse virus from field collected eggs and larvae of aedes triseriatus identification of the overwintering site of california encephalitis	Isolates of the California encephalitis virus from fields collected eggs and larvae of d' aedes triseriatus and d' identification of the d&apos site; appos overwintering; California encephalitis.
16	efferent pathways of the coronary chemoreflex	The efferent pathways of the coronary chemoreflex.
16	some peculiarities of skin metabolism with vitamin a deficit	Certain peculiarities of skin metabolism with vitamin deficiency a.
16	microbial flora of nurses hands iii the relationship between staphylococcal skin populations and persistence of carriage	Microbial flora in nurses' hands iii the relationship between staphylococcal skin populations and persistence of carriage.
16	intracutaneous cornifying epithelioma keratoacanthoma in the dog a retrospective study of 25 cases	A retrospective study of 25 cases of kerato epithelium-intracutaneous acanthoma in the dog was performed.
16	the ultrastructure of adult brugia malayi brug 1927 nematoda filarioidea	L' ultrastructure of adult brugia malayi brug 1927 filarioide nematoda.
16	the collagen content of skin and gingival tissues in ascorbic acid deficient monkeys	The collagen content of skin and gingival tissue in monkeys deficient in ascorbic acid.
16	excoriation injuries of the penis and scrotum author s transl	Expiry injuries of the penis and scrotum author s transl.
16	chemexfoliation as an adjunct to facial rejuvenation	Chemexfoliation as a complement to facial rejuvenation.
16	a new mucolipidosis with psychomotor retardation corneal clouding and retinal degeneration	A new mucolipidosis with apos; a psychomotor corneal and dapos delay; retinal degeneration.
16	distribution and persistence of staphylococcus and micrococcus species and other aerobic bacteria on human skin	Distribution and persistence of staphylococci, micrococcus and other aerobic bacteria on human skin.
16	a mucocutaneous disease in the dog resembling pemphigus vulgaris in man	A mucocutaneous disease in the dog resembling Pemphigus vulgaris in humans.
16	a disease in dogs resembling human pemphigus vulgaris case reports	A disease in dogs resembling human pemphigus vulgaris has been reported.
16	an unusual epizootic of actinobacillosis in dairy heifers	An unusual epizootic of actinobacillosis in milk heifers.
16	the functional status and columnar organization of single cells responding to cutaneous stimulation in neonatal rat somatosensory cortex s1	L' functional state and apo; column organization of individual cells responding to cutaneous stimulation in the somatosensory cortex s1 of the new rat-ne.
16	treatment of corns by injectable silicone	The treatment of horns by silicone injection.
16	hairy cutaneous malformations of palms and soles a hereditary condition	Hairy skin defects of palms and handplant a hereditary condition.
16	immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin d in rabbit skin	The immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin d in rabbit skin.
16	pustular patch test reactions in atopic dermatitis	Pustular patch test reactions in atopic dermatitis.
16	embryology of the epidermis ultrastructural aspects iii maturation and primary appearance of dendritic cells in the mouse with mammalian comparisons	L' embryology of ultrastructural aspects of the epidermis; epidermis iii maturation and l' primary appearance of dendritic cells in mice with mammalian comparisons.
16	structure of the toad epidermis during the moulting cycle ii electron microscopic observations on bufo bufo l	Toad structure; toad epidermis during the moulting cycle; and ii Electron microscopy observations on bufo bufo l.
16	in vitro growth and maturation of epithelial cells from postembryonic skin	In vitro growth and maturation of epithelial cells in postembryonic skin.
16	metabolism of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in cultivated bovine arterial cells ii quantitative studies on the uptake of 35so4 labeled proteoglycans	Metabolism of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in cultured bovine arterial cells ii Quantitative studies on the uptake of 35so4-labelled proteoglycans.
16	ehlers danlos syndrome in two siblings with deficient lysyl hydroxylase activity in cultured skin fibroblasts but only mild hydroxylysine deficit in skin	Danlos syndrome in two siblings whose l' lysyl hydroxylase activity is deficient in cultured skin fibroblasts but only a mild hydroxylysine deficiency in the skin.
16	effects of uv radiation of different spectral composition on content of sterols in rat skin	The effects of ultraviolet radiation of different spectral compositions on the sterol content of rat skin.
16	evaluation of two kinds of smallpox vaccine cvi 78 and calf lymph vaccine i clinical and serologic response to primary vaccination	Evaluation of two types of smallpox vaccine cvi 78 and calf lymph vaccine i clinical and serologic response to primary immunization.
16	skin lesions of the legs and feet and skeletal lesions of the feet in familail amyloidosis with polyneuropathy	Skin lesions of the legs and feet and skeletal lesions of the feet in the family polyneuropathic amyloidosis.
16	comparative investigation on the influence of human and bovine collagen types i ii and iii on the aggregation of human platelets	Comparative study of the influence of human and bovine collagen types iii and iii on the apos; aggregation of human platelets.
16	state of certain indices of natural nonspecific immunity in workers engaged in the manufacture of neomycin and monomycin	Status of certain indications of non-specific natural immunity in workers involved in the manufacture of neomycin and monomycin products.
16	investigations on the mechanism of the activity of urea upon the epidermis author s transl	Research on the mechanism of the apos; activity of the apos; urea on the apos; epidermis; transl.
16	ultrastructural evidence for lack of tissue damage in a local immune complex reaction a study of a mild passive arthus reaction	Ultrastructural evidence of the apos; lack of tissue damage in a complex local immune response a d&apos study; a mild passive arthritic reaction.
16	the effect of the activity of psoriasis on the response to autologous ground skin extract	L' effect of apos; activity of psoriasis on the response to apos; autologous extract of crushed skin.
16	cell mediated immunity in chronic polymorphous light eruptions leukocyte migration inhibition assay with irradiated skin as antigen	Cell-mediated immunity in a d&apos assay; leukocyte migration inhibition by chronic polymorphic light rash with irradiated skin as antigen.
16	discoid lupus erythematosus as part of a larger disease spectrum correlation of clinical features with laboratory findings in lupus erythematosus	Lupus erythematosus discoid in the context of a broader correlation between clinical characteristics and laboratory results for the lupus erythematosus.
16	testosterone metabolism in the skin a review of its function in androgenetic alopecia acne vulgaris and idiopathic hirsutism including recent studies with antiandrogens	Metabolism of testosterone in the skin a review of its function in androgenetic andaposal alopecia; acne vulgaris and elapos; idiopathic hirsutism, including recent antiandrogen studies.
16	subcellular distribution of phosphatases proteinases and ribonucleases in normal human stratum corneum and psoriatic scales	Subcellular distribution of protein phosphatases and ribonucleases in normal human stratum corneum and psoriatic scales.
16	investigative studies of the dermatitis caused by the larva of the brown tail moth euproctis chrysorrhoea linn ii histopathology of skin lesions and scanning electron microscopy of their causative setae	Dapos studies; investigation of dermatitis caused by the larval moth euproctis chrysorrhoea linn ii histopathology of skin lesions and scanning electron microscopy of their causal setae.
16	concentrations of ampicillin in human urogenital tissue serum and urine after intake of pivampicillin	Dapos levels; ampicillin in serum and liver; urine of human urogenital tissue following swallowing pivampicillin.
16	lysosomal hydrolases of the epidermis 3 peptide hydrolases	Lysosomal hyrolases of the 3 peptide hydrolases of the epidermis epidermis.
16	comparison of the shock inducing effect of anti mouse anti thymocyte horse serum and normal horse serum i experiments with three week old mice	Comparison of results; effect; induction of shock of anti-viral serum-mouse horse thymocyte and normal horse serum i experiments with three-week-old mice.
16	soft tissue radiography in determining contact and near contact gunshot wounds	X-ray of soft tissue to determine gunshot wounds on and near contact.
16	in vitro uptake of calcium by dermis of patients with pseudoxanthoma elasticum	In vitro uptake of calcium by the dermis in patients with pseudoxanthoma elasticum.
16	cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of carcinogenic aromatic amides and polycyclic hydrocarbons and ultraviolet irradiation in normally repairing and repair deficient xeroderma pigmentosum diploid human skin fibroblasts	Cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of carcinogenic aromatic amides and polycyclic hydrocarbons and of lapos; ultraviolet irradiation in normal repair and repair of defective diploid human skin fibroblasts of xeroderma pigmentosum.
16	the regulatory role of steroid hormones on the pgf pge ratio in target tissues	The regulatory role of the steroid hormones on the pgf pge ratio in target tissues.
16	the differential effects of cyclophosphamide and 6 mercaptopurine on the renal disease and skin immunoglobulin deposits of the nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice	The differential effects of cyclophosphamide and mercaptopurine 6 on skin and renal immunoglobulin deposits of the nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice were studied.
16	aspects of teratology of vitamin a acid beta all trans retinoic acid	Aspects of teratology of vitamin a acid beta all l' retinoic acid trans all.
16	an unusual pattern of testosterone metabolism in tissue associated with a keratin filled cutaneous cyst	Unusual testosterone metabolism in tissues associated with a keratin-filled, dermal cyst.
16	ultrastructure of inborm errors of keratinization vii porokeratosis mibelli and disseminated superficial actinic porokeratosis	L' ultrastructure of inbormal errors of keratinization vii porokeratosis mibelli and disseminated superficial actinic porokeratosis.
16	effects of steriod hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro ii antagonism by androgens of cortisol induced inhibition	Effects of steroid hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro ii antagonism by androgens of andos; cortisol-induced inhibition.
16	the repair of impaired epidermal barrier function in rats by the cutaneous application of linoleic acid	Repair of the defective epidermal barrier function in rats by skin application of linoleic acid.
16	kinetics of in vitro bovine keratohyalin synthesis	Kinetics of in vitro bovine keratohyaline synthesis.
16	induced tolerance in cold urticaria caused by cold evoked histamine release	Induced intolerance in cold urticaria caused by cold-evoked release of apos; histamine.
16	ultrastructure of keloid an unusual incident involving lepromatous leprosy	L' ultrastructure of keloid is an unusual incident involving leprosy.
16	electron microscopy of ancient egyptian skin	Electron microscopy of ancient Egyptian skin.
16	the local antinociceptive and topical anti inflammatory effects of propyl gallate in rodents	The local antinociceptive and topical anti-inflammatory effects of propyl gallate in rodents.
16	chronic urticarial lesions and macroglobulinemia apropos of 5 cases	Chronic urticarial and macroglobulinemia lesion; origin of 5 cases.
16	effect of bases and accelerants on the anti inflammatory activity of topical corticosteroids	Effect of bases and accelerants on apos; anti-@-@ inflammatory activity of topical corticosteroids.
16	circulatory effects of isometric muscle contractions performed separately and in combination with dynamic exercise	The circulatory effects of isometric muscle contractions were performed separately and in combination with dynamic exercise.
16	synthesis and biological activity of camel and bovine beta melanotropins	Synthesis and biological activity of camel and bovine beta-melanotropins.
16	the skin of the palms and soles of the marmosets callithrix jacchus and callithrix penicillata	The skin of the palms and soles of the marmosets callithrix jacchus and callithrix penicillata.
16	nonimmune and immune surveillance i growth of tumors and normal fetal tissues grafted into newborn mice	Non-immune and immunological surveillance i growth of tumours and normal fetal tissue grafted into newborn mice.
16	the treatment of hypermelanosis with 4 isopropylcatechol	The treatment of hypermelanosis with 4 isopropyl-catechol.
16	histopathological spectrum of erythema multiforme	Histopathological spectrum of erythema multiforme.
16	abnormal chemotaxis in patients with cutaneous anergy	Dermal anergy; abnormal chemotaxis in patients with apos.
16	the effect of orthostasis on the i 131 clearance in the metatarsal and crural subcutis in patients with occlusive arterial diseases	Apostasis; effect of orthostasis on clearance i 131 in under-cooking of metatarsus and crural in patients with occlusive arterial disease.
16	transformation from lepromatous to borderline leprosy under clofazimine therapy	Limit leprosy to leprosy under clofazimine treatment.
16	inhibition of vaccinia virus replication in skin of tuberculin sensitized animals challenged with ppd	L' inhibition of vaccine virus replication in the skin of tuberculin-sensitized animals in the presence of ppd.
16	ultrastructure of the epidermal cells of the teleost pimelodus maculatus lac p de 1803 pisces	Ultrastructure of the epidermal cells of the teleostan pimelodus maculatus lac p of 1803 pisces.
16	biosynthesis of pyrrolidone carboxylic acid in hairless mouse epidermis	Biosynthesis of apos; carboxylic pyrrolidone acid in hairless mouse epidermis.
16	binding of dexamethasone by the subcellular fractions of mouse epidermis and dermis	Attachment of dexamethasone by the subcellular fractions of mouse epidermis and dermis.
16	scanning electron microscopic and x ray microanalysis study of the mineral deposits in pseudoxanthoma elasticum	Scanning electron microscopy and X-ray microanalysis of mineral deposits of the pseudoxanthoma elasticum.
16	myocardial infarction without pain a study of the sensory function of the upper limbs	Painless myocardial infarction: study of the sensory function of the upper limbs.
16	interaction between collagen type i and type iii in conditioning bundles organization	Interaction between collagen type I and collagen type iii in apos; organization of conditioning beams.
16	influence of mounting media on the fading of basic aniline dyes in epoxy embedded tissues	Effect of mounting media on the discoloration of l&apos base dyes; aniline in l&apos-coated tissues; epoxy.
16	the effect of anti eosinophil serum on skin histamine replenishment following passive cutaneous anaphylaxis in the guinea pig	L' effect of anti-eosinophil serum on apos turnover; cutaneous histamine after passive cutaneous anaphylaxis in the guinea pig.
16	hypothalamic hypothyroidism and xxy xy sex chromosome mosaicism report of a case	One case of hypothalamic hypothyroidism and xxy xy sex chromosome mosaic.
16	stewart treves syndrome the histopathological evolution of epithelial metastases	Stewart Treves Syndrome, the histopathological evolution of epithelial metastasis.
16	histopathological characteristics of the inguinal lymph nodes and skin in onchocerciasis	Histopathological characteristics of the inguinal lymph nodes and skin in onchocerciasis.
16	keratin filaments of cultured human epidermal cells formation of intermolecular disulfide bonds during terminal differentiation	Keratin filaments of cultured human epidermal cells forming intermolecular disulfide bonds during terminal differentiation.
16	transcutaneous monitoring of po2 in different skin areas in the neonate and in the scalp of the fetus during labor methodological and physiological observations	Monitoring of po2 transcutaneous in different areas of skin in the newborn-and in the scalp of the fetus during apo; methodological and physiological observations of the work.
16	role of sterol photoconversion products in the regulation of cholesterol biosynthesis in rat skin	The role of sterol photoconversion products in the regulation of cholesterol biosynthesis in rat skin.
16	mysterious form of referred sensation in man	A referenced mysterious form of sensation in the human.
16	cutaneous response to dinitrochlorobenzene in patients with genito urinary cancers	Dermal reaction to dinitrochlorobenzene in patients with urinary tract cancer.
16	antibodies to an antigen of human thymus epithelial tissue common to the epidermis of the skin in malignant myasthenia	Antibody to an antigen from human thymus epithelial tissue common to the epidermis of malignant myasthenia.
16	the effect of long term oral oestriol succinate therapy on the skin of castrated women	The effect of long oral estriol succinate therapy on the skin of castrated women.
16	studies on parafilaria bovicola tubangui 1934 2 chemotherapy and pathology	Studies on parafilaria bovicola tubangui 1934 2 chemotherapy and pathology.
16	sinus histiocytosis with massive lymphadenopathy rosai and dorfman and significant skin involvement	Sinus histiocytosis massive lymphadenopathy rosai and dorfman and significant involvement of the skin.
16	variability of fibroblast lysosomal acid hydrolases with reference to the detection of enzyme deficiencies	Variability of lysosomal acid hydrolase fibroblasts with respect to the detection of enzyme deficiencies.
16	histone phosphorylation and synthesis of dna and rna during phases of proliferation and differentiation induced in mouse epidermis by the tumor promoter 12 o tetradecanoyl phorbol 13 acetate	Histone phosphorylation and synthesis of DNA and apos; rRNA during the phases of proliferation and differentiation induced in the apos; mouse epidermis by tumor promoter 12 o tetradecanoyl phorbol 13 acetate.
16	low level dna exchanges in normal human and xeroderma pigmentosum cells after uv irradiation	Low level DNA exchange in normal human and xeroderma pigmentosum cells after apos irradiation; uv.
16	the importance of man mouse and rat skin surface lipid fractions on the in vitro penetration of schistosoma mansoni cercariae author s transl	L' importance of mouse and rat skin lipid fractions on the in vitro penetration of translating schistosoma mansoni cercariae.
16	skin tumor initiating activities of the twelve isomeric phenols of benzo a pyrene	Initiation of skin tumours of the twelve isomeric phenols of benzo a pyrene.
16	moulting and morphogenesis of sensilla in a prostigmate mite acari actinotrichida actinedida caeculidae i mechanoreceptive bristles	Flue and morphogenesis of sensilla in a prostigmate acari actinotrichida actinedida caeculidae i mechanoreceptives.
16	measurement of chloride in sweat by use of a selective electrode and strip chart recorder	Measurement of chloride in sweat at home; help from a selective and instant electrode; tape recorder.
16	plastic embedding of cutaneous specimens for light microscopy using araldite epoxy resin	Plastic nesting of cutaneous specimens for light microscopy with an aralite epoxy resin.
16	the permeability of epidermis lacking normal membrane coating granules an ultrastructural tracer study of kyrle flegel disease	The permeability of epidermis lacking normal membrane coating granules was investigated by ultrastructural ultrastructural study at apos; assistance from apos; a tracer of phlegel kyrle disease.
16	phage typing and biotyping of coagulase negative staphylococci	Lysotyping and biotyping of coagulase negative staphylococci.
16	x linked ocular albinism in blacks ocular albinism cum pigmento	X related eye albinism in black albinism cum pigmento eye.
16	effect of soap and detergents on the restitution of acidity and lipids of the skin surface	Effect of soap and detergents on soap recovery; acidity and lipids of the skin surface.
16	giant pigment granules in dermal melanocytes of rat scrotal skin	Giant pigment granules in dermal melanocytes of rat scrotal skin.
16	response of cattle to inoculation with atypical mycobacteria of bovine origin	Cattle response to inoculation with atypical mycobacteria of apo; bovine origin.
16	the direct demonstration of histamine release in allergic reactions in the skin using a skin chamber technique	Direct demonstration of histamine release in allergic reactions from the skin to the skin; a skin chamber technique.
16	multivesicular vacuolization in malignant histiocytoma of the skin author s transl	Multivesicular vacuolization in malignant histiocytoma of the skin author s transl.
16	effect of retinyl acetate on sulfated glycosaminoglycan biosynthesis in dermal and epidermal cells in vitro	Effects of retinyl acetate on the biosynthesis of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in dermal and epidermal cells in vitro.
16	regional variation in the deposition of subepidermal immunoglobulin in nzb w f1 mice association with epidermal dna synthesis	Regional variation in the deposition of subepidermal immunoglobulin in nzb w f1 mice associated with epidermal dna synthesis.
16	the influence of acids and bases on the development of morphological and biochemical wound reactions author s transl	L' influence of acids and bases on the development of morphological and biochemical responses to wounds is translated by the author.
16	mucinosis follicularis provoked by light exposure	Follicular mucinosis caused by exposure to light.
16	changes in structure of ventral epidermis of rana ridibunda during metamorphosis	Changes in structure of l' ventral epidermis of rana ridibunda during metamorphosis.
16	predictive evaluation in animals of the contact allergenic potential of medically important substances i comparison of different methods of inducing and measuring cutaneous sensitization	Predictive evaluation in animals of the allergenic contact potential of medically important substances i comparison of different methods of skin sensitization induction and measurement.
16	neural representation of cutaneous aftersensations by spinothalamic tract neurons	Neural representation of-skin sensations by spinothalamic tract neurons.
16	metabolism and formation of dna adducts of benzo a pyrene in human diploid fibroblasts	Metabolism and formation of apos; DNA adducts of benzo a pyrene in human diploid fibroblasts.
16	transcutaneous oxygen monitoring in aminophylline treated apneic infants	Transcutaneous oxygen monitoring in aminophylline treated apneic infants.
16	formation and removal of specific acetylaminofluorene dna adducts in mouse and human cells measured by radioimmunoassay	Apos formation and elimination; apos-specific adducts; acetylaminofluorene dna in mouse and human cells measured by radioimmunoassay.
17	on the existence of a gradient of sensitivity to the lack of sodium in the spinal roots of the bullfrog	On the other hand, a gradient of sensitivity to the lack of sodium in the spinal roots of bullfrogs.
17	the effects of administration of sodium iodate to man and animals	Effects of sodium iodate on humans and animals.
17	the transport of sodium into human erythrocytes in vivo	The transport of sodium in human erythrocytes in vivo.
17	active sodium transport by the isolated toad bladder	Active transport of sodium by the isolated toad bladder.
17	an enzymatic ion exchange model for active sodium transport	Abstract model; enzyme ion exchange for active sodium transport.
17	action of external divalent ion reduction on sodium movement in the squid giant axon	Action of external apo reduction; divalent ion on sodium motion in the giant squid axon.
17	studies on the carrier function of phosphatidic acid in sodium transport i the turnover of phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in the avian salt gland on stimulation of secretion	Studies on the transporter function of phosphatidic acid in sodium transport and the renewal of phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in the avian saline gland on the stimulation of secretion.
17	ion transport in nitellopsis obtusa	The ion transport in nitellopsis obtusa.
17	na cl and water transport by rat colon	Na cl and water transport by rat colon.
17	the effect of calcium on sodium transport by frog skin	L' effect of calcium on sodium transport by frog skin.
17	movement of sodium across the mucosal surface of the isolated toad bladder and its modification by vasopressin	Sodium movement across the mucous surface of the isolated toad bladder and its modification by vasopressin.
17	electronic measurement of the intracellular concentration and net flux of sodium in the squid axon	Electronic measurement of the intracellular concentration and net flux of sodium in the squid axon.
17	active ion transport across canine blood vessel walls	Transport of active ions through canine blood vessel walls.
17	the effects of mechanical stimulation on some electrical properties of axons	The effects of mechanical stimulation on certain electrical properties of axons.
17	hypernatremia its significance in pediatric practice	Lapos; hypernatremia, its significance in pediatric practice.
17	hypernatraemia in cerebral disorders	L' hypernatraemia in cerebral disorders.
17	the concentration dependence of sodium efflux from muscle	Concentration-dependent sodium efflux from the muscle.
17	thermal inactivation of poliovirus under anaerobic conditions	Thermal inactivation of poliovirus under anaerobic conditions.
17	an analysis of the striated muscle fiber action current	Dapos current analysis; action of the striated muscle fibers.
17	effect of sodium alginate on staphylococcus aureus during mild heating and freezing	The effect of sodium alginate on staphylococcus aureus during mild heating and freezing.
17	the electrical characteristics of active sodium transport in the toad bladder	The electrical characteristics of active sodium transport in the toad bladder.
17	nonbiological conversion of cephalosporin c to a new antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate	Unbiological conversion of cephalosporin c to a new antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate.
17	heart action potential dependence on external calcium and sodium ions	Potential dependence of glucose levels; cardiac action on external calcium and sodium ions.
17	short term n2 15 incorporation by azobacter	Short-term n2/15 incorporation by l' azobacteria.
17	treatment of hypertension the special place of alpha methyldopa a short term study	It's the special place of l' it's the special place of l' alpha methyldopa a short term study.
17	ionic conductance changes in lobster axon membrane when lanthanum is substituted for calcium	Ion conductance changes in the lobster axonal membrane when lanthanum is substituted for calcium.
17	electron microscopy sodium localization in normal and ouabain treated transporting cells	Electron microscopic sodium localization in normal and ouabain-treated transport cells.
17	salt transport organelle in artemia salenis brine shrimp	Salt transport organelle in marine shrimp artemia salenis.
17	villous adenoma of the rectum with electrolyte depletion diabetes and hypogonadism	Adenoma of the rectum with electrolyte depletion, diabetes and hypogonadism.
17	after potentials and large depolarizations of single nodes of ranvier treated with veratridine	After potentials and large depolarizations of simple nodes of ranvier treated with veratridine.
17	phenacetin nephropathy	Uh, phenacetin nephropathy.
17	significance of soil salinity on the ecology of coccidioides immitis	L' importance of soil salinity on the soil surface; coccidioides immitis ecology.
17	transepidermal potential difference development in anuran larvae	Differential transepidermal potential develops in anuran larvae.
17	studies on the inhibition of intestinal absorption of radioactive strontium 3 the effect of administration of sodium alginate in food and in drinking water	Dosage studies; inhibition of apo; intestinal absorption of radioactive strontium 3; effect of apo; administration of sodium alginate in food and drinking water.
17	the effect of adaptation of the taste threshold observed with a semiautomatic gustometer	L' effect of l' adaptation of the taste threshold observed with a semi-automatic gustometer.
17	sodium movement across single perfused proximal tubules of rat kidneys	Sodium movement in perfused proximal tubules of rat kidneys.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus i evidence for an independent uptake of sodium and chloride ions	The mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a freshwater fish, carassius auratus, indicates that there is independent absorption of sodium and chloride ions.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus ii evidence for nh4 ion na ion and hco3 ion c1 ion exchanges	The mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a freshwater fish, carassius auratus ii., indicates the presence of sodium and chloride exchange, ionic ions, and n- and ionic ions.
17	ion transport in isolated rabbit ileum 3 chloride fluxes	Ion transport in isolated rabbit ileum 3 occurs as chloride fluxes.
17	the ac impedance of frog skin and its relation to active transport	L' ac impedance of frog skin and its relation to active transport.
17	the sedimentation behaviour of ribonuclease active and inactive ribosomes from bacteria	The sedimentation behaviour of both active and inactive ribosomes of bacterial ribonuclease.
17	maximum rate of depolarization of single muscle fiber in normal and low sodium solutions	The maximum rate of depolarization of a single muscle fiber in normal, low-sodium solutions.
17	the effect of calcium withdrawal on the structure and function of the toad bladder	Effect of calcium removal on the structure and function of the toad bladder.
17	the dual effect of calcium on the action potential of the frog s heart	The double effect of calcium on the action of the frog heart.
17	cytological alterations related to stimulation of the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal gland	Cytological alterations related to stimulation of the glomerular zone of the adrenal gland.
17	energetics of anaerobic sodium transport by the fresh water turtle bladder	Anerobic sodium transport by the fresh water turtle vesadder, J. Toxicol.
17	differences in na and ca spikes as examined by application of tetrodotoxin procaine and manganese ions	Peak differences between na and ca were examined by application of procaine and manganese tetrodotoxin ions.
17	the adenosine diphosphate adenosine triposphate excange reaction of cerebral microsomes and its relation to he sodium ion stimulatd adenosine triphosphatase reaction	Triposphate d' adenosine diphosphate d' adenosine excites the reaction of cerebral microsomes and its relationship to l' adenosine triphosphatase stimulated by sodium ion.
17	movements of radioactive sodium in cerebral cortex slices in response to electrical stimulation	Movements of radioactive sodium in the cerebral cortical slices in response to electrical stimulation.
17	uptake and loss of na rb and cs in relation to an active mechanism for extrusion of na in scenedesmus	Absorption and loss of na rb and cs in relation to an active mechanism d'apos; extrusion of na in scenedesmus.
17	purified staphylococcal alpha toxin effect on epithelial ion transport	Effect of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on epithelial ion transport.
17	crayfish muscle permeability to sodium induced by calcium depletion	Muscle permeability; sodium crayfish induced by calcium depletion.
17	effects of sodium azide on sodium fluxes in frog striated muscle	The effects of sodium azide on sodium fluxes in frog striated muscle.
17	fluid transport in the rabbit gallbladder a combined physiological and electron microscopic study	An electron microscopic study of fluid transport in the rabbit gallbladder was carried out.
17	sodium transport inhibitory factor in sweat of patients with cystic fibrosis	Sodium transport inhibitory factor in sweat in cystic fibrosis patients.
17	electron spin resosnance of gamma irradiated oriented dna prepared by wet spinning	Apos electron spin resistance; gamma irradiated oriented DNA prepared by wet spinning.
17	nature of the renal concentrating defect in sickle cell disease	Nature of the apos; renal abnormality in sickle cell disease.
17	discrimination of single transport systems the na plus sensitive transport of neutral amino acids in the ehrlich cell	The discrimination of single transport systems the transport of neutral amino acids in the d' ehrlich.
17	strophanthidin sensitive transport of cesium and sodium in muscle cells	The transport of cesium and sodium in muscle cells is sensitive to strophanthidin.
17	regulation of intracellular sodium concentrations in rat diaphragm muscle	Control of intracellular sodium concentrations in rat diaphragm.
17	giant axon of myxicola some membrane properties as observed under voltage clamp	L' giant axon of myxicola has certain membrane properties observed under voltage clamp.
17	control of aldosterone secretion by the pituitary gland	Control of aldosterone secretion by the pituitary.
17	effects of dinitrophenol and oligomycin on the coupling between anaerobic metabolism and anaerobic sodium transport by the isolated turtle bladder	Effects of dinitrophenol and l' oligomycin on the coupling between anaerobic metabolism and anaerobic sodium transport by the isolated turtle bladder.
17	relation between sodium concentration electrical potential and transfer capacity of rat small intestine	Relationship between sodium concentration of electrical potential and transfer capacity of rat small intestine.
17	effects of hypotonic saline loading in hydrated dog evidence for a saline induced limit on distal tubular sodium transport	The effects of hypotonic saline loading in the hydrated dog indicate the existence of a saline-induced limit on distal tubular sodium transport.
17	changes in proximal and distal tubular reabsorption produced by rapid expansion of extracellular fluid	Changes in proximal and distal tubular reabsorption caused by rapid expansion of extracellular fluid.
17	blockage of sodium conductance increase in lobster giant axon by tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin	Sodium conductance blockade was increased in the lobster giant axon by tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin.
17	simple photoreceptors in limulus polyphemus	Simple photoreceptors in limulus polyphemus.
17	some factors influencing sodium extrusion by internally dialyzed squid axons	Some factors influence sodium extrusion by internally dialyzed squid axons.
17	effect of inhibitors on alanine transport in isolated rabbit ileum	The effect of inhibitors on alanine transport in isolated rabbit ileum.
17	aldosterone hypersecretion in non salt losing congenital adrenal hyperplasia	Hypersecretion of apos; aldosterone in nonsaline medium; congenital adrenal hyperplasia.
17	an analysis of the surface fixed charge theory of the squid giant axon membrane	An analysis of the surface fixed charge theory of the giant axonal membrane of squid.
17	studies on the characteristics of the control system governing sodium excretion in uremic man	Studies of the characteristics of the control system governing sodium excretion in uremic men.
17	effect of bile infusion on the dog kidney	Effect of the biliary infusion on the dog kidney.
17	an upper limit to the number of sodium channels in nerve membrane	Upper limit of the number of sodium channels in the nerve membrane.
17	facilitation of heart muscle contraction and its dependence on external calcium and sodium	Facilitation of cardiac muscle contraction and its dependence on external calcium and sodium @-@.
17	transport of monosaccharides in kidney cortex cells	Transport of monosaccharides in renal cortical cells.
17	the dependence of slow inward current in purkinje fibres on the extracellular calcium concentration	The dependence of slow inward current in purkinje fibres on extracellular calcium concentration.
17	the relationship between glomerular filtration rate and sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the rat nephron	The relationship between glomerular filtration rate and sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of rat nephron.
17	sites of action of sodium depletion on aldosterone biosynthesis in the dog	Dapos sites; action of sodium depletion on aldosterone biosynthesis in dogs.
17	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xvi formation of protoplasts spheroplasts and related forms from a gram negative marine bacterium	Nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xvi formation of protoplasts spheroplasts and related forms from d' a marine Gram-negative bacterium.
17	effect of diluents on blood clot lysis	The effect of diluents on blood clot lysis.
17	alanine and sodium fluxes across mucosal border of rabbit ileum	Dapos, alanine and sodium flow through the mucosal border of the rabbit ileum.
17	sodium flux and electrical activity of arterial smooth muscle	Sodium flow and electrical activity of arterial smooth muscle.
17	water and sodium absorption in the human intestine	Absorption of water and sodium in the human intestine.
17	the site of the stimulatory action of vasopressin on sodium transport in toad bladder	Site of the apos; stimulatory action of vasopressin on sodium transport in toad bladder.
17	effects of lithium on different membrane components of crayfish stretch receptor neurons	Effects of lithium on different membrane components of d*apos receptor neurons; crayfish stretching.
17	the effect of cations on the electrical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig vas deferens	L' effect of cations on the electrical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig vas deferens.
17	active transport of ions by the gastric mucosa of the rabbit foetus	An active transport of ions through the gastric mucosa of the rabbit fetus.
17	a role for the sodium pump in photoreception in limulus	The sodium pump plays a role in photoreception in limulus.
17	effects of cardiac glycosides on electrical activity in the isolated retina of the frog	Effects of cardiac glycosides on electrical activity in the isolated frog retina.
17	structural requirements for active intestinal sugar transport the involvement of hydrogen bonds at c 1 and c 6 of the sugar	Structural requirements for active intestinal transport of l&apos sugars, involvement of hydrogen bonds at levels c 1 and c 6 of sugar.
17	demonstration of a hormonal inhibitor of proximal tubular reabsorption during expansion of extracellular volume with isotonic saline	Demonstration of a hormonal inhibitor of proximal tubular reabsorption during apos; expansion of extracellular volume with isotonic saline solution.
17	functional correlates of compensatory renal hypertrophy	Functional correlates of compensatory renal hypertrophy.
17	further observations on asymmetrical solute movement across membranes	D' further observations on asymmetric solute motion across membranes were made.
17	sodium fluxes in internally dialyzed squid axons	Sodium flow in internally dialyzed squid axons.
17	sodium movements in perfused squid giant axons passive fluxes	Sodium movements in perfused giant squid axons.
17	hellebrigenin 3 haloacetates potent site directed alkylators of transport adenosinetriphosphatase	L' helebenin 3 haloacetates is a potent site directed towards the alkylators of l' transport adenosineriphosphatase.
17	acetazolamide and sodium bicarbonate in treatment of salicylate poisoning in adults	Acetazolamide and sodium bicarbonate in apo treatment; salicylate poisoning in adults.
17	the accumulation of guanethidine by human blood platelets	L' accumulation of guanethidine by human blood platelets.
17	studies on streaming i inhibition of protoplasmic streaming and cytokinesis of chaos chaos by adenosine triphosphate and reversal by magnesium and calcium ions	Studies on apos; inhibition of the formation of i protoplasmic fluxes and cytokinesis of chaos by apos; adenosine triphosphate and apos; reversal by magnesium and calcium ions.
17	use of potassium pyroantimonate in the localization of sodium ions in rat kidney tissue	Use of potassium pyroantimonate for localization of sodium ions in rat kidney tissue.
17	a down then up staircase in frog ventricle due to altered excitation contraction coupling	Down stairs then up into frog ventricle due to a change in excitation-contraction coupling.
17	diffusional resistance of the innermost layer of the placental barrier of the rabbit	Resistance to diffusion of the innermost layer of the placental barrier of the rabbit.
17	depression of fractional sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the dog without sodium diuresis	Depressed fractional sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the dog without sodium diuresis.
17	effect of acute hypertension on sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule	Effect of apos; acute hypertension on sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule.
17	an evaluation of perfusion techniques in the study of water and electrolyte absorption in man the problem of endogenous secretions	Evaluation of infusion techniques in the study of apo, absorption of water and apo, electrolytes in the apo; man the problem of endogenous secretions.
17	sodium content of community water supplies in california	Sodium in water supplies in the California community.
17	condylactis toxin interaction with nerve membrane ionic conductances	Interaction of condylactis toxin with nerve membrane ion conductances.
17	the phosphaturic effect of sodium bicarbonate and acetazolamide in dogs	L' the phosphaturic effect of sodium bicarbonate and sodium l' acetazolamide in dogs.
17	natriferic and hydrosmotic effects of neurohypophysial peptides and their analogues in augmenting fluid uptake by bufo melanostictus	Natriferic and hydrosmotic effects of neurohypophysial peptides and their analogues in apos; increase in apos; fluid absorption by bufo melanostictus.
17	slow inactivation of currents in cardiac purkinje fibres	Slow inactivation of currents in cardiac purkinje fibers.
17	control of the orientation of cilia by adenosinetriphosphate calcium and zinc in glycerol extracted paramecium caudatum	Control of the apos; orientation of cilia by calcium and zinc adenosine triphosphate in glycerol extracted paramecium caudatum.
17	synaptic activation of an electrogenic sodium pump	Synaptic activation of an electrogenic sodium pump.
17	regional distribution of acid mucopolysaccharides in the kidney	Regional distribution of acid mucopolysaccharides in the kidney.
17	the effect of salicylates on the hemostatic properties of platelets in man	L' effect of salicylates on the hemostatic properties of platelets in men.
17	amiloride a potent inhibitor of sodium transport across the toad bladder	L' amiloride is a potent inhibitor of sodium transport across the toad bladder.
17	direct measurement of acetylesterase in living protist cells	Direct measurement of acetylesterase in living protist cells.
17	the effect of cyanide on the efflux of calcium from squid axons	L' effect of cyanide on appetite; efflux of calcium from squid axons.
17	monosodium l glutamate its pharmacology and role in the chinese restaurant syndrome	Monosodium glutamate l, its pharmacology and role in the Chinese restaurant syndrome.
17	lysine transport across isolated rabbit ileum	Lysine transport across the apos; isolated rabbit ileum.
17	mechanism of change in the excretion of sodium per nephron when renal mass is reduced	Mechanisms of change in the apo; sodium excretion by nephron when renal mass is reduced.
17	mechanism of exaggerated natriuresis in hypertensive man impaired sodium transport in the loop of henle	The mechanism of exaggerated natriuresis in the hypertensive man has altered sodium transport in the hen anse.
17	failure to demonstrate a hormonal inhibitor of proximal sodium reabsorption	Failure to demonstrate the existence of a hormonal inhibitor of proximal sodium reabsorption.
17	effective plasma volume in cirrhosis with ascites evidence that a decreased value does not account for renal sodium retention a sponteneous reduction in glomerular filtration rate gfr and a fall in gfr during drug induced diuresis	The effective plasma volume in cirrhosis with ascites showed that a decreased value did not explain renal sodium retention, a spontaneous reduction in glomerular filtration rate, and a drop in gfr during drug-induced diuresis.
17	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas diagnosis by sodium electrode sweat tests	Kystic fibrosis of the pancreas diagnosis by sodium electrode sweats.
17	the binding of sodium dodecyl sulphate to various proteins	The binding of sodium dodecyl sulfate to various proteins.
17	nitrification importance to nutrient losses from a cutover forested ecosystem	The importance of nitrification for nutrient losses from a clear-cut forest ecosystem.
17	human immunity to the meningococcus 3 preparation and immunochemical properties of the group a group b and group c meningococcal polysaccharides	Human immunity to the meningococcal 3 preparation and immunochemical properties of the polysaccharides of group a b and group c of meningococci.
17	effect of changes in renal perfusion pressure on the suppression of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption due to saline loading	Effect of changes in renal perfusion pressure on the suppression of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption due to saline loading.
17	the effect of sodium and calcium on the action potential of the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli	The effect of sodium and calcium on the potential of os; action of the smooth muscle of the guinea pig, taenia coli.
17	effect of a saline environment on sodium transport by the toad colon	Effects of salt environment on sodium transport by the toad colon.
17	factors affecting mucosal water and sodium transfer in everted sacs of rat jejunum	Factors affecting mucous water and sodium transfer in rat jejunum return bags.
17	metabolic studies aldosterone secretion rate and plasma renin after carbenoxolone sodium	Metabolic study of the rate of secretion of aldosterone and plasma renin after carbenoxolone sodium.
17	a study of the end plate potential in sodium deficient solution	A study of the terminal plate potential in a sodium-deficient solution.
17	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics ii sodium flux transients in the toad urinary bladder in response to short circuit	Non-stationary three-compartment tracers kinetics ii transient sodium flux in the toad bladder in response to the short-circuit.
17	effects of sodium concentration and osmolality on water and electrolyte absorption form the intact human colon	The effects of sodium concentration and osmolality on osteos, water and glucose, and electrolyte absorption form the intact human colon.
17	current voltage relations during illumination photoreceptor membrane of a barnacle	Current voltage relationships during the illumination of the photoreceptive membrane of a barnacle.
17	sodium inactivation in nerve fibers	Sodium inactivation in nerve fibres.
17	intra hepatic vascular response to sodium nitrite	Intrapatic vascular response to sodium nitrite.
17	sodium and calcium components of action potentials in the aplysia giant neurone	The sodium and calcium components of the apos potentials; action in the giant neuron of the apos; aplysia.
17	the action of ethacrynic acid on sodium efflux from single toad oocytes	L' the action of apos; ethacrynic acid on apos; sodium efflux from isolated toad oocytes.
17	action of amphotericin b on the toad bladder evidence for sodium transport along two pathways	The action of amphotericin b on the bladder of the toad indicates the existence of apos; sodium transport along two pathways.
17	renin aldosterone system in parkinson s disease	Systeme rénine-aldosterone in Parkinson's Disease.
17	antagonistic effect of monovalent cations in maintenance of cellular integrity of a marine bacterium	Antagonistic effect of monovalent cations in maintenance of cellular integrity of apos; a marine bacterium.
17	cation interactions and biochemical composition of the cell envelope of a marine bacterium	Cationic interactions and biochemical composition of the cell envelope of a marine bacterium.
17	ionic interactions in acetylcholine contraction of the denervated rat diaphragm	Ion interactions in acetylcholine contraction of the denervated rat diaphragm.
17	micropuncture studies of the sweat formation in cystic fibrosis patients	Micropuncture studies of the formation of sweat in cystic fibrosis patients.
17	the relationship between peritubular capillary protein concentration and fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	The relationship between peritubular capillary protein concentration and fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule.
17	metabolism and rate of secretion of aldosterone in the bullfrog	Metabolism and rate of secretion of aldosterone in bullfrogs.
17	comparison of the effects of water deprivation and sodium chloride imbibition on the hormone content of the neurohypophysis of the rat	Comparison of the effects of water deprivation and sodium chloride imbibition on the hormone content of the rat neurohypophysis.
17	tetrodotoxin resistant electric activity in presynaptic terminals	L' tetrodotoxin-resistant electrical activity in presynaptic terminals.
17	brain lesions in an infant rhesus monkey treated with monsodium glutamate	Cerebral lesions in a baby rhesus monkey treated with glutamate moussodium.
17	diarrhoea associated with medullary carcinoma of the thyroid	Diarrhea associated with medullary carcinoma of the thyroid.
17	circulatory changes and renin secretion in sheep in response to feeding	Kidney circulatory changes and renin secretion in sheep in response to feeding.
17	role of acetate in the reduction of plasma free fatty acids produced by ethanol in man	Role of acetate in the reduction of plasma free fatty acids produced by apos; ethanol in apos; man.
17	phage typing scheme for salmonella braenderup	A phage typing scheme for salmonella braenderup.
17	on the mechanism of action of aldosterone	On the mechanism of action of apos; aldosterone.
17	synaptic current at the squid giant synapse	The synaptic current at the giant synapse of the squid.
17	membrane potential as the sum of ionic and metabolic components	Membrane potential is the sum of ionic and metabolic components.
17	renal excretion of calcium and sodium in acute nephritis	L' renal excretion of calcium and sodium in acute nephritis.
17	production of mouse urinary bladder carcinomas by sodium cyclamate	The production of mouse bladder carcinomas by sodium cyclamate.
17	comparison of methods for tuberculosis bacteriology	Comparison of methods of tuberculosis bacteriology.
17	23na nuclear magnetic resonance relaxation studies of sodium ion interaction with soluble rna	Apos 23na nuclear magnetic resonance relaxation studies; sodium ion interaction with soluble rna.
17	spontaneous and evoked activity of motor nerve endings in calcium ringer	Spontaneous, evoked activity of motor nerve endings in the calcium ringing system.
17	the action potential in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli and ureter studied by the double sucrose gap method	The action of taenia coli and guinea-pig ureter in smooth muscle was studied by the double sucrose gap method.
17	effect of sodium ions on calcium movements in isolated synaptic terminals	Effect of sodium ions on calcium movements in isolated synaptic terminals.
17	determination of iodine concentration and distribution in rat thyroid follicles by electron probe microanalysis	Determination of apo concentration and distribution in rat thyroid follicles by apo microanalysis; use of electron probes.
17	change of tubular reabsorption of sodium and water after renal denervation in the dog	Changes in tubular reabsorption of sodium and d' water after renal denervation in the dog.
17	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of sodium ions in isolated frog muscle and liver	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies of sodium ions in isolated frog muscle and liver.
17	the relation of membrane changes ot contraction in twitch muscle fibres	The relationship between membrane and contraction in twitch muscle fibers changes.
17	contractile repriming in snake twitch muscle fibres	Repairing contractions in the snakeskin twitch muscle fibers.
17	production of an artifact during methanolysis of lipids by boron trifluoride methanol	The production of an artifact during the methanolysis of lipids by boron methanol trifluoride.
17	sodium influxes in internally perfused squid giant axon during voltage clamp	Sodium influx into the squid giant axon perfused internally during voltage clamp.
17	potential differences between mother and foetus at different gestational ages in the rat rabbit and guinea pig	Potential differences between mother and fetus at different gestational ages in the rabbit and guinea pig.
17	mechanisms regulating the renal excretion of sodium during pregnancy	Mechanisms controlling vomiting; renal excretion of sodium during pregnancy.
17	current separations in myxicola giant axons	Current separations in myxicola giant axons.
17	the effect of acute changes in haematocrit in the anaesthetized dog on the volume and character of the urine	The effect of acute changes in the blood; hematocrit in anesthetized dogs on the volume and character of the urine.
17	the effect of urea loading on volume and concentration of urine in rabbits	Effect of urea loading on volume and concentration of urine in rabbits.
17	mechanism of bicarbonate absorption and its relationship to sodium transport in the human jejunum	Mechanisms; bicarbonate absorption and its relation to sodium transport in the human jejunum.
17	interrelationships of chloride bicarbonate sodium and hydrogen transport in the human ileum	Interrelations between the transport of sodium bicarbonate chloride and hydrogen in the human ileum.
17	defect in urinary acidification induced in vitro by amphotericin b	Dysfunction; urinary acidification induced in vitro by apos; amphotericin b.
17	isolation and partial characterization of an immunogenic moiety obtained from salmonella typhimurium	Isolation and partial characterization of apos; immunogenic fraction obtained from Salmonella typhimurium.
17	resistance of pseudomonas to quaternary ammonium compounds i growth in benzalkonium chloride solution	Pseudomonas resistance to quaternary ammonium compounds grown in benzalkonium chloride solution.
17	microbiological study of water softener resins	Microbiological study of water softener resins.
17	the effect of electrical stimulation and ouabain on the uptake and efflux of l u 14c valine in chopped tissue from guinea pig cerebral cortex	Effects of electrical stimulation and apo; ouabain on apo; absorption and apo; efflux of u 14c valine into chopped tissue from guinea pig cerebral cortex.
17	method for quantitating formaldehyde gas in air	Quantification method for formaldehyde gas in air.
17	diuretics in cardiac edema 1969	Diuretics in the bloodstream; cardiac edema.
17	the interaction of monosodium urate with connective tissue components	L' the interaction of monosodium urate with connective tissue components.
17	direct evidence from nuclear magnetic resonance studies for bound sodium in forg skeletal muscle	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies revealed the presence of bound sodium in intact skeletal muscle.
17	evidence for a single stranded adenovirus associated virus genome isolation and separation of complementary single strands	Evidence of infection; existence of single strands; adenovirus associated with disease; isolation of virus genome and separation of complementary single strands.
17	ionic channels and nerve membrane lipids cholesterol tetrodotoxin interaction	Ion channels and nerve membrane lipids, cholesterol tetrodotoxin interaction.
17	growth from spores of clostridium perfringens in the presence of sodium nitrite	Growth from spores of clostridium perfringens in the presence of sodium nitrite.
17	inhibition of the effects of angiotensin ii on adrenal steroid production by dietary sodium	L' inhibition of effects of angiotensin ii on adrenal steroid production by dietary sodium.
17	na plus facilitated reactions of neutral amino acids with a cationic amino acid transport system	The reaction of neutral amino acids with a cationic amino acid transport system was also facilitated.
17	hypernatraemia special problems with angiocardiography in total anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Hypernatraemia-specific problems with angiocardiography in total anomalous pulmonary venous drainage.
17	assessment of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption during water diuresis in patients with heart disease	Evaluation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption during water diuresis in patients with cardiac disease.
17	spectrophotometric methods for monitoring the microbial transformation of steroids i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broths	Spectrophotometric methods for monitoring the microbial transformation of steroids i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broths.
17	enzymatic analysis of the requirement for sodium in aerobic growth of salmonella typhimurium on citrate	Enzymatic analysis of the sodium requirement in aerobic growth of Salmonella typhimurium on citrate.
17	enlargement of taurocholate micelles by added cholesterol and monoolein self diffusion measurements	Enhancement of taurocholate micelles by the addition of cholesterol and cholesterol measurements; auto-monolein release.
17	effects of increased sodium delivery on distal tubular sodium reabsorption with and without volume expansion in man	Effects of increased sodium intake on distal tubular sodium reabsorption, with and without volume expansion in men.
17	acetate and bicarbonate in the correction of uraemic acidosis	Acetate and bicarbonate in the correction of uremic acidosis.
17	neutron activation analysis of manganese and sodium in bacterial cells	Neutron activation analysis of manganese and sodium in bacterial cells.
17	an accuate method for measurement of aldosterone production	An accuate method to measure the production of apos; aldosterone.
17	synaptic potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method from the rabbit superior cervical ganglion	Synaptic potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method of rabbit superior cervical ganglion.
17	effects of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate on renal function in the rabbit	Effects of l' adenosine 3-5 monophosphate on renal function in the rabbit.
17	endocrine and metabolic disordes in bronchial carcinoma	Disordered endocrine and metabolic pathways in bronchial carcinoma.
17	proteins of avian tumor viruses with different coat antigens	Proteins of avian tumour viruses with different antigens of peel.
17	lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkey kidney cells in defined medium	The lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkey kidney cells in a defined medium.
17	time course of the sodium influx in squid giant axon during a single voltage clamp pulse	Lapos; sodium influx into the apos; squid giant axon during a single voltage imposed pulse.
17	sodium dependency of l alanine absorption in canine thiry vella loops	Sodium dependence of canines; absorption of alanine; alanine in canine loops.
17	the role of sodium current in the radial spread of contraction in frog muscle fibers	The role of sodium current in radial diffusion of contraction in frog muscle fibers.
17	effect of intraluminal ph on the absorption of pteroylmonoglutamic acid	Effect of intraluminal ph on apos; absorption of pteroylmonoglutamic acid.
17	growth of pseudomonas fluorescens with sodium maleate as a carbon source	Growth of pseudomonas fluorescens with sodium maleate as carbon source.
17	growth responses of escherichia coli to the surfactant dodecyl benzene sulfonate	The growth reactions of Escherichia coli with the surfactant dodecyl benzene sulfonate.
17	effect of sodium fluorescein and plating medium on recovery of irradiated escherichia coli and serratia marcescens from aerosols	Effect of sodium fluorescein and culture media on recovery of irradiated escherichia coli and serratia marcescens from aerosols.
17	the effect of altered sodium concentration in the distal nephron segments on renin release	An alteration in the sodium concentration in the distal nephron segments on renin release.
17	on the role of antidiuretic hormone in the inhibition of acute water diuresis in adrenal insufficiency and the effects of gluco and mineralocorticoids in reversing the inhibition	On the role of antidiuretic hormone in apo; inhibition of acute aqueous diuresis in apo; adrenal insufficiency and the effects of gluco and mineralocorticoids in reversal of apo; inhibition.
17	changes in bone sodium and carbonate in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis in the dog	Changes in sodium and bone carbonate in metabolic acidosis and liver; alkalosis in dogs.
17	postglomerular vascular protein concentration evidence for a causal role in governing fluid reabsorption and glomerulotublar balance by the renal proximal tubule	Postal-glomerular vascular protein concentration indicates a causal role in the regulation of fluid and l&apos reabsorption; glomerulotublar balance by the renal proximal tubule.
17	disproportionate inhibition of sodium reabsorption in the unilaterally diseased kidney of dog and man after an acute saline load	Disproportionate inhibition of sodium reabsorption in the unilaterally diseased kidney of dogs and dogs; man after an acute saline load.
17	nitrification of aspartate by aspergillus flavus	Nitrification of aspartate by aspergillus flavus.
17	sodium inactivation experimental test of two models	Experimental sodium inactivation test of two models.
17	an investigation of alpha methyl amino acids and their derivatives on isolated tissue preparations	A study of methyl alpha amino acids and their derivatives on isolated tissue preparations.
17	vaccinia virus structural polypeptide derived from a high molecular weight precursor formation and integration into virus particles	Vaccine virus structural polypeptide derived from the formation of d&apos, a high molecular weight precursor and its integration into virus particles.
17	lpp 1 infection of the blue green alga plectonema boryanum 3 protein synthesis	Infection 1 of the protein synthesis of the blue-green alga plectonema boryanum 3.
17	factors affecting the secretion of staphylococcal enterotoxin a	Factors affecting the secretion of staphylococcal enterotoxin a.
17	electrical potentials of the sigmoid colon and rectum in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis	Electrical potentials of the sigmoid colon and rectum in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis.
17	theoretical and experimental basis for a specific countertransport system in membranes	Theoretical and experimental basis for a specific system against-transport in membranes.
17	renin secretion an anatomical basis for tubular control	Renin secretion is an anatomical basis for tubular control.
17	reversible osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Reversible osmotic opening of the blood barrier.
17	partial purification and properties of a highly specific trehalose phosphate phosphatase from mycobacterium smegmatis	Partial purification and properties of a highly specific trehalose phosphate phosphatase of mycobacterium smegmatis.
17	paracrystalline sheets reaggregated from solubilized exosporium of bacillus cereus	Paracrystalline leaves reaggregated from solubilized exosporium of the bacillus cereus.
17	linear single stranded deoxyribonucleic acid isolated from kilham rat virus	Linear single-strand deoxyribonucleic acid isolated from kilham rat virus.
17	ultracentrifugal analysis of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Ultracentrifugal analysis of staphylococcal alpha toxin.
17	genetic heterogeneity in streptococcus mutans	Genetic heterogeneity in streptococcus mutans.
17	the distribution of inorganic cations in mouse testis electron microscope and microprobe analysis	The distribution of inorganic cations in mouse testis electron microscope and microprobe analysis.
17	effects of batrachotoxin on membrane potential and conductance of squid giant axons	Effects of batrachotoxin on membrane potential and conductance of giant squid axons.
17	angiotensin forming enzyme in brain tissue	L' enzyme forming angiotensin in brain tissue.
17	structural proteins of simian virus 40	Structural proteins of simian virus 40.
17	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of rous sarcoma virus kinetics of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and specificity of the products	Acid deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of virus rous of the sarcoma kinetics of the synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid and product specificity.
17	structural proteins of rabies virus	Structural proteins of rabies virus.
17	number and molecular weights of foot and mouth disease virus capsid proteins and the effects of maleylation	Number and molecular weight of FMD viral capsid proteins and the effects of maleylation.
17	separation and structure of components of nuclear polyhedrosis virus of the silkworm	Separation and structure of components of the nuclear polyhedrosis virus of the silkworm.
17	infectivity and sedimentation of rhinovirus ribonucleic acid	Infectivity and sedimentation of rhinovirus ribonucleic acid.
17	early intracellular events in the replication of t4 bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acid vii 32p suicide stabilization	The first intracellular events in the replication of the deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) t4 bacteriophage.
17	determination of hydrogen sulfide in fermentation broths containing so 2	Determination of sulfide in fermentation broths containing hydrogen.
17	nonelectrolyte permeability sodium influx electrical potentials and axolemma ultrastructure in squid axons of various diameters	Nonlectrolyte permeability sodium influx electrical potentials and axolemma ultrastructure in squid axons of various diameters.
17	purification and properties of colicin k	The purification and properties of colicin k.
17	effect of simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein on the recovery of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus from aerosols	The effect of simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein on the recovery of Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus from aerosols.
17	new quantitative qualitative and confirmatory media for rapid analysis of food for clostridium perfringens	New quantitative, qualitative and confirmatory media for apos; rapid food analysis for Clostridium perfringens.
17	removal of nonidet p40 absorbance for optical density monitoring of cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid	Absorption; nonidet p40 absorbance for optical density monitoring of the apos; cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid.
17	absorption of sodium and water by human rectum measured by a dialysis method	L' absorption of sodium and d' water by the human rectum is measured by a dialysis method.
17	inactivation of t antigen forming capacites of simian virus 40 and adenovirus 12 by ultraviolet irradiation	Inactivation of apos; t antigen forming abilities of simian virus 40 and apos; adenovirus 12 by ultraviolet irradiation.
17	characterization of the genome of cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus	Characterization of the genome of cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus.
17	electron microscope study of ribonucleic acid of myxoviruses	Electron microscopic study of ribonucleic acid of myxoviruses.
17	renal effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate evidence for a role for adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption	The renal effects of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate suggest a role for l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption.
17	ostnatal development of renal function micropuncture and clearance studies in the dog	Ostnatal development of micropuncture renal function and clearance studies in the dog.
17	intracortical distribution of number and volume of glomeruli during postnatal maturation in the dog	Intracortical distribution of number and volume of glomeruli during postnatal maturation in dogs.
17	a stored charge model for the sodium channel	This is a stored charge model for the sodium channel.
17	accelerated reabsorption in the proximal tubule produced by volume depletion	Accelerated reabsorption in the proximal tubule by volume depletion.
17	dicarboxylic amino acid influx across brush border of rabbit ileum effects of amino acid charge on the sodium amino acid interaction	Dapos influx; dicarboxylic amino acids across brush border of the apos; rabbit ileum effects of charge dapos; amino acids on the apos; interaction of sodium amino acids.
17	composition of the sulfur particle of chromatium vinosum strain d	Composition of the sulfur particle of the strain chromatium vinosum d.
17	studies on escherichia coli sex factors evidence that covalent circles exist within cells and the general problem of isolation of covalent circles	Studies of the sexual factors of Escherichia coli show that there are covalent circles within the cells and the general problem of isolation of covalent circles.
17	nitrogenase activity in cell free extracts of the blue green alga anabaena cylindrica	L' nitrogenase activity in cell-free extracts of the blue-green algae anabaena cylindrica.
17	cell wall and peptidoglycan from lactobacillus fermenti	The cell wall and lactobacillus fermenti peptidoglycan.
17	analysis of sodium transport in the amphibian oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Analysis of sodium transport in the oocyte; amphibian by extractive and radioautographic techniques.
17	optical studies on the kinetics of the sodium pump in mammalian non myelinated nerve fibres	Optical studies on the kinetics of the sodium pump in nonmyelinated mammalian nerve fibres.
17	on the control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nervous tissue by calcium	Control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nervous tissue by calcium.
17	on the mechanisms of sodium ion transport by the irrigated gills of rainbow trout salmo gairdneri	On the mechanisms of sodium ion transport by the irrigated gills of rainbow trout-in-salmo gairdneri sky.
17	formation of protoplasts from resting spores	Formation of protoplasts from resting spores.
17	experimental alteration of coupling resistance at an electrotonic synapse	Experimental modification of coupling resistance to an electrotonic synapse.
17	mechanism of compensatory renal hypertrophy	Mechanisms of compensatory renal hypertrophy.
17	angiotensin ii vascular receptors their avidity in relationship to sodium balance the autonomic nervous system and hypertension	Angiotensin receives vascular receptors whose avidity is linked to apos; sodium balance of the autonomic nervous system and to apos; high blood pressure.
17	energetics of sodium transport in frog skin ii the effects of electrical potential on oxygen consumption	Energy of sodium transport in frog skin ii the effects of electrical potential on oxygen consumption.
17	changes in total body calcium and sodium in osteomalacia	Changes in total calcium and sodium in the body; osteomalacia.
17	na and ca components of action potential in amphioxus muscle cells	Na and ca components of the action potential in the muscle cells of the cell; amphioxus.
17	the effect of metal ions and antidiuretic hormone on oxygen consumption in toad bladder	L' effect of metal ions and l' antidiuretic hormone on toad consumption; oxygen in the bladder.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of sodium on alanine fluxes	Lapos; sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect on sodium fluxes; alanine fluxes.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of alanine on sodium fluxes	Apos; sodium alanine interaction in apos; rabbit ileum effect of apos; alanine on sodium fluxes.
17	proximal tubular function in dogs with thoracic caval constriction	Proximal tubular functions in dogs with thoracic cavity constriction.
17	slow sodium an oral slowly released sodium chloride preparation	Slow oral sodium chloride slowly released orally.
17	the influence of the carbonic anhydrase inhibitor benzolamide cl 11 366 on the reabsorption of chloride sodium and bicarbonate in the proximal tubule of the rat	The influence of apos; benzolamide carbonic anhydrase cl 11366 on the reabsorption of sodium chloride and bicarbonate in the proximal tubule of the rat.
17	effect of peritubular protein concentration on reabsorption of sodium and water in isolated perfused proxmal tubules	Effect of peritubular protein concentration on reabsorption of sodium and d' water in isolated perfused proxmal tubules.
17	evidence for a direct action of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on the renal transport of phosphate sodium and calcium	Evidence of a direct action of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on the renal transport of sodium phosphate and calcium.
17	plasma aldosterone concentration at delivery and during the newborn period	Dapos concentration; plasma aldosterone at birth and during the neonatal period.
17	effect of chronic bile duct obstruction on renal handling of salt and water	Effect of apo; chronic bile duct obstruction on renal handling of salt and lapos; water.
17	the influence of angiotensin infusion on the urine composition in individual kidney function tests	Lapos; influence of apos infusion; angiotensin on apos composition; urine in individual kidney function tests.
17	the recovery of resting potential and input resistance in sheep heart injured by knife or laser	Re-establishment of resting potential and resistance to entry into the heart of stabbed or laser-wounded sheep.
17	studies on the porphobilinogen deaminase uroporphyrinogen cosynthetase system of cultured soya bean cells	Studies of the porphobilinogen deaminase uroporphyrinogen cosynthetase system of soybean cultured cells.
17	intrarenal distribution of blood flow and cortico medullary sodium gradient after unilateral splanchnicotomy in the dog	Intrarenal distribution of blood flow and cortico sodium gradient after unilateral splanchnicotomy in dogs.
17	membrane calcium current in ventricular myocardial fibres	Membrane calcium current in ventricular myocardial fibers.
17	the relation between membrane potential membrane currents and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibres	The relationship between potential membrane currents and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibers.
17	the binding of tetrodotoxin to nerve membranes	The binding of tetrodotoxin to nerve membranes.
17	the frequency dependent character of the membrane capacity in cardiac purkyn fibres	The frequency-dependent character of the membrane capacity in cardiac purkyn fibers.
17	loss of the penicillinase plasmid after treatment of staphylococcus aureus with sodium dodecyl sulfate	Loss of penicillinase plasmid after treatment of staphylococcus aureus with sodium dodecyl sulfate.
17	effect of membrane lipid composition on the allosteric inhibition by sodium of the ca 2 adenosine triphosphatase from escherichia coli	Effect of membrane lipid composition on apos; allosteric inhibition by sodium of apos; adenosine triphosphatase; escherichia coli.
17	antimicrobial activity of sodium n alkylsalicylates	Antimicrobial activity of sodium alkylsalicylates.
17	the relationship of amniotic fluid sodium to the latent period of saline abortion	The relationship between amniotic fluid sodium and the latent period of salt abortion.
17	renal handling of sodium and water in the hypothyroid rat clearance and micropuncture studies	Renal manipulation of sodium and sodium; water in the hypothyroid rat clearance and micropuncture studies.
17	effects of sodium warfarin on capillary ultrastructure	Effects of sodium warfarin on capillary ultrastructure.
17	thermoregulation around a new set point established in the monkey by altering the ratio of sodium to calcium ions within the hypothalamus	The temperature regulation around the apos; a new threshold established in the monkey by modifying the ratio of sodium to calcium ions in the apos; hypothalamus.
17	irreversibility of methylandrostenediol induced hypertension in the rat after suspension of the androgen treatment	The irreversibility of methylandrostenediol induced apos; hypertension in the rat after suspension of androgen treatment.
17	effects of sodium intake on inherited hypertension in the rat	Effects of apo; sodium absorption on apo; hereditary hypertension in the rat.
17	radioautographic localization of sodium pump sites in rabbit intestine	Radioautographic localization of sodium pump sites in rabbit intestine.
17	recurrent hyperkalaemia due to selective aldosterone deficiency correction by angiotensin infusion	Recurrent hyperkalemia due to selective correction of aldosterone deficiency by infusion of apos; angiotensin.
17	angiotensin sodium interaction in blood pressure maintenance of renal hypertensive and normotensive rats	L' sodium angiotensin interaction in blood pressure maintenance in renal normotensive and hypertensive rats.
17	photodynamic alteration of sodium currents in lobster axons	Photodynamic alteration of sodium currents in lobster axons.
17	the renal functional defect of postobstructive nephyropathy the effects of bilateral ureteral obstruction in the rat	L' renal functional abnormality of post-<-> obstruction neophysium, effects of bilateral ureteral obstruction in rat.
17	plasma renin levels and vascular complications in hypertension	Plasma renin levels and vascular complications in hypertension.
17	micropuncture studies of phosphate transport in the proximal tubule of the dog the relationship to sodium reabsorption	Micropuncture studies of phosphate transport in the proximal tubule of the dog in relation to sodium reabsorption.
17	interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in determining blood pressure in patients treated by maintenance dialysis	Interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in determining blood pressure in patients treated with d&apos dialysis; maintenance.
17	beta blockers and plasma renin activity in hypertension	Beta-blockers and plasma renin activity in hypertension.
17	indentification of an intestinal sodium and calcium dependent phosphatase stimulated by parathyroid hormone	Identification of a sodium- and calcium-dependent intestinal phosphatase stimulated by parathyroid hormone.
17	effect of acute and chronic calcium administration on plasma renin	Acute and chronic administration of calcium to the plasma renin.
17	intrapartum hypertension and intravenous saline	It's called intrapartum hypertension and intravenous saline.
17	hemodynamic and humoral characteristics of hypertension induced by prolonged stellate ganglion stimulation in conscious dogs	Hemodynamic and humoral characteristics of apos; hypertension induced by prolonged stellate ganglion stimulation in conscious dogs.
17	control plasma renin activity and changes in sympathetic tone as determinants of minoxidil induced increase in plasma renin activity	L' plasma renin activity and changes in sympathetic tone as determinants of minoxidil induced an increase in plasma renin activity.
17	the effect of sodium salicylate on bile secretion in the dog	L' effect of sodium salicylate on bile secretion in the dog.
17	detection of low renin hypertension evaluation of out patient renin stimulating methods	Determination of low-level renin hypertension evaluation of outpatient renin stimulation methods.
17	relationships of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium balance to blood pressure regulation in chronic renal failure of polycystic kidney disease	Relationship between the renin system @-@angiotensin-aldosterone and lapos; sodium balance, d' and blood pressure regulation, d' chronic renal failure of polycystic kidney disease.
17	normal plasma renin activity in low renin hypertension	L' plasma renin activity in low renin hypertension is normal.
17	effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics i direct stimulation and carotid occlusion	Effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics i direct stimulation and carotid occlusion.
17	regulation of protein phosphorylation and sodium transport in toad bladder	Regulation of protein phosphorylation and sodium transport in toad bladder tissue.
17	sodium stimulus for puddling behavior by tiger swallowtail butterflies papilio glaucus	Sodic flake stimulation; water in tailing papilio glaucus moths; tiger swallow.
17	reciprocation of renin dependency with sodium volume dependency in renal hypertension	J' studied the relationship between renin response and sodium volume dependence in renal hypertension.
17	clinical determinants of survival from postoperative renal failure	The clinical determinants of survival; postoperative renal failure.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and an angiotensin ii inhibitor on renin secretion in the dog	Effect of apos; angiotensin ii and dos; an angiotensin ii inhibitor on renin secretion in dogs.
17	hypertension due to renal artery stenosis in transplanted kidneys	Hypertension due to renal artery in transplanted kidneys.
17	role of angiotensin ii in experimental renal hypertension in the rabbit	The role of angiotensin ii in experimental renal hypertension in rabbits.
17	prorenin in human plasma	Prolinein in human plasma.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats	L' urinary kallikrein excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	effect of varying perfusion pressures on the output of sodium and renin and the vascular resistance in kidneys of rats with post salt hypertension and kyoto spontaneous hypertension	Effect of changes in perfusion pressures on the release of sodium and renin and vascular resistance in the kidneys of rats with d'apos; hypertension post-salt and d' spontaneous hypertension kyoto.
17	a circulating renin activator in essential hypertension	A circulating renin activator in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	renal prostaglandin synthesis in the goldblatt hypertensive rat	Renal prostaglandin synthesis in the hypertensive goldblatt rat.
17	renal control of sodium and fluid balance in newborn infants during intravenous maintenance therapy	Renal control of l'apos; sodium and fluid balance in newborns born during intravenous maintenance.
17	an essential ionized acid group in sodium channels	An essential ionized acid group in sodium channels.
17	effects of an acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase inhibitor and a sodium sparing diuretic on aldosterone stimulated sodium transport lipid synthesis and phospholipid fatty acid composition in the toad urinary bladder	The effects of acetyl coenzyme, a carboxylase inhibitor, and d' sodium-sodium-sodium-saving diuretic; aldosterone stimulate lipid synthesis and phospholipid fatty acid composition of sodium transport in the bladder of toads.
17	studies of renin and aldosterone in cirrhotic patients with ascites	Studies of renin and apos; aldosterone in cirrhotic patients with apo; ascites.
17	effects of sodium depletion on plasma renin activity and on the urinary excretion of cyclic amp and aldosterone in hypoparathyroid patients	Effect of sodium depletion on appetite; plasma renin activity and on appetite; urinary excretion of the apos; cyclic ampulla and the apos; aldosterone in hypoparathyroid patients.
17	the relationship between kallikrein and water excretion and the conditional relationship between kallikrein and sodium excretion	The relationship between kallikrein and sodium excretion; water excretion and the conditional relationship between kallikrein and sodium excretion.
17	control of plasma renin activity in chronic stable renal disease	Apos control; plasma renin activity in apos; stable chronic renal failure.
17	vascular angiotensin ii receptors and sodium balance in rats role of kidneys and vascular renin activity	Vascular angiotensin ii, receptors and sodium balance in rats, role of kidneys and vascular renin activity.
17	role of acth in regulation of aldosterone secretion	Role of apos; acth in regulation of apos secretion; aldosterone.
17	effect of progesterone on renal sodium handling in man relation to aldosterone excretion and plasma renin activity	Effect of progesterone on renal sodium handling in apos; men in relation to apos; d*apos excretion; aldosterone and apos; plasma renin activity.
17	diuretics urate excretion and sodium reabsorption effect of acetazolamide and urinary alkalinization	Dosage; acetazolamide; urinary excretion and sodium reabsorption of diuretics and sedatives; urinary alkalinization.
17	marked elevation of plasma renin activity during post diuretic sodium conservation in furosemide stimulated subjects	A marked elevation of plasma renin activity during post-average-sodium diuretic storage in furosemide-stimulated subjects was observed.
17	hemodynamics compartments and the renin aldosterone system in chronic heart failure	Hemodynamic compartments and the renin system-aldosterone in the apos; chronic heart failure.
17	renal blood flow and its response to angiotensin ii an interaction between oral contraceptive agents sodium intake and the renin angiotensin system in healthy young women	Renal blood flow and its response to angiotensin II, an interaction between oral sodium intake and the renal system in healthy young women.
17	effect of carbohydrate intake on the urinary excretion of magnesium calcium and sodium in fasting obese patients	Effect of carbohydrate on appetite; urinary excretion of magnesium, calcium and sodium in fasting obese patients.
17	role of aldosterone in the initial stage of 2 forms of experimental vasorenal hypertension	Apos role; aldosterone in the initial phase of 2 forms of experimental vasorenal hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system in rats with hereditary hydronephrosis	The renin system-angiotensin in rats with hereditary hydronephrosis.
17	changes of sodium appetite during the estrous cycle of sheep	Changes in appetite; sodic appetite during the estrous cycle of the sheep.
17	production of aldosterone by the regenerated adrenal gland after neonatal autograft in the normal and the sodium deprived rat	The production of aldosterone by the regenerated adrenal gland following neonatal autografting in normal and in the sodium-deprived rat.
17	sodium kinetics in aorta of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Sodium kinetics in the aorta of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	an inhibitor of sodium transport in the urine of dogs with normal renal function	An inhibitor of sodium transport in the urine of dogs with normal renal function.
17	control of plasma aldosterone in infancy and childhood a study of plasma renin activity plasma cortisol and plasma aldosterone	Apos control; plasma aldosterone in infancy and early childhood; childhood; apo study; plasma renin activity; plasma cortisol and plasma aldosterone.
17	circadian rhythm of plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone in normal man and in renal allograft recipients	Circadian rhythm of apo; plasma renin activity and apos; plasma aldosterone in normal male and renal allograft recipients.
17	spontaneous changes in weight leg volume renin aldosterone and sex hormones in patients with cyclical oedema	Spontaneous changes in leg volume, renin aldosterone and sex hormones in patients with cyclic edema.
17	antagonism of the effects of furosemide by indomethacin in normal and hypertensive man	Inhibition of the effects of furosemide by indomethacin in the normal and hypertensive man.
17	renal blockade to angiotensin ii in acute and chronic sodium retaining states	Apos kidney blockage; angiotensin ii in acute and chronic sodium retention states.
17	sodium flux through the sodium channels of axon membrane fragments isolated from lobster nerves	Sodium flow in the sodium channels of axonal membrane fragments isolated from lobster nerves.
17	the influence of ouabain on in vitro renin secretion and intracellular sodium	L' influence of ouabain on in vitro renin secretion and intracellular sodium.
17	effects of sodium and magnesium cations on the dark and light induced chlorophyll a fluorescence yields in sucrose washed spinach chloroplasts	The effects of sodium and magnesium cations on the dark and light induce chlorophyll a fluorescence in sucrose-washed spinach chloroplasts.
17	high output heart failure in the dog systemic and intrarenal role of angiotensin ii	High-flow heart failure in the systemic and intrarenal role of angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	hypertension as a disease of modern society	Hypertension is a disease of modern society.
17	rapid infusion of sodium bicarbonate and albumin into high risk premature infants soon after birth a controlled prospective trial	Rapid infusion of sodium bicarbonate and d' albumin to high-risk prematurity infants soon after birth as part of a prospective controlled trial.
17	the importance of sodium balance on the effect of angiotensin ii on aldosterone production	L' importance of apos; sodium balance on apos; effect of apos; angiotensin ii on aldosterone production.
17	diurnal variations of plasma aldosterone in supine man relationship to plasma renin activity and plasma cortisol	Diurnal changes in apo; plasma aldosterone in relationship between elongated man and elongated liver; plasma renin activity and plasma cortisol.
17	duration of central action of angiotensin ii estimated by its interaction with csf na	Duration of the central action of angiotensin II was estimated by its interaction with csf Na.
17	the distribution of sodium in aortic walls from spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats	The distribution of sodium in the aortic walls of spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats.
17	renin secretion from rat renal cortical cell suspensions	Renin secretion by rat renal cortical cell suspensions.
17	reversal of chronic renal hypertension role of salt and water excretion	Inversion of apo role; salt and water excretion in apo; chronic renal hypertension.
17	nmr in cancer vii sodium 23 magnetic resonance of normal and cancerous tissues	Rmn in cancer vii sodium 23 Magnetic resonance of normal and cancerous tissue.
17	aldactazide induced consummatory and operant responding to sodium by rats	L' aldactazide induced both a consuming and an operative response to sodium in rats.
17	acute effect of nephrotoxic serum on renal sodium transport in the dog	The acute effect of nephrotoxic serum on renal sodium transport in dogs.
17	hypertension in terminal renal failure	Hypertension in the apos; terminal renal failure.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal human subjects	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the apos; cardiovascular homeostasis in normal human subjects.
17	exaggerated phosphaturic response to volume expansion in patients with essential hypertension	Phosphaturic response exaggerated; volume expansion in patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	renal effects of prostaglandin e1 in hypertensive patients	The renal effects of prostaglandin e1 in hypertensive patients.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion and sodium metabolism in hypertensive patients	Urinary kallikrein and sodium metabolism in hypertensive patients.
17	increased intestinal absorption in the rat caused by sodium lauryl sulphate and its possible relation to the camp system	Increased intestinal absorption in the rat caused by sodium lauryl sulfate and its possible relationship to the encampment system.
17	actions of aldosterone on rrna and na transport in the toad bladder	Action of l' aldosterone on rrna and na transport in toad bladder.
17	the influence of sodium intake on the pressor response to angiotensin ii in the unanaesthetized rat	L' influence of apos; sodium absorption on the pressor response to apos; angiotensin ii in unanesthetized rat.
17	urinary kallikrein in hypertensive animal models	Urinary kallikrein in hypertensive animal models.
17	relationships among urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids and human hypertensive disease	Relationship between urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids and human hypertensive diseases.
17	plasma renin activity and renal sodium and water excretion following infusion of arachidonic acid in rats	Lapos; plasma renin activity and apo; renal sodium and water excretion following infusion of apo; arachidonic acid in rat.
17	beta adrenergic blockade in essential hypertension reduced renin release despite renal vasoconstriction	Beta-adrenergic blockade of essential hypertension reduced renin release despite renal vasoconstriction.
17	intrapatient comparison of treatment with chlorthalidone spironolactone and propranolol in normoreninemic essential hypertension	Intrapatient comparison of treatment with chlorthalidone spironolactone and propranolol in normoreninemic essential hypertension.
17	pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of alprenolol in the treatment of hypertension ii relationship to its effect on blood pressure and plasma renin activity	Pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of apos; alprenolol in the treatment of apos; hypertension ii related to its effect on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity.
17	separate roles of sodium ion concentration and fluid volumes in salt loading hypertension in sheep	Distinct roles of sodium ion concentration and fluid volumes in liver; saline-load hypertension in sheep.
17	cellular basis for reversal of hyperkalemic electrocardiographic changes by sodium	Cellular basis for l' reversal of hyperkaliemic electrocardiographic changes by sodium.
17	the effect of different preparations of human growth hormone on plasma renin activity in normal males	Effect of various preparations of human growth hormone on the immune system; plasma renin activity in normal males.
17	correlation between juxtaglomerular index kidney renin content and plasma renin concentration in the rat	Correlation between the renal renin content of the juxtaglomerular index and plasma renin concentration in the rat.
17	renal prostaglandins in relation to sodium regulation and hypertension	Renal prostaglandins in relation to sodium regulation and hypertension.
17	effect of drugs affecting sodium permeability on the muscle spindle of frogs	The effect of drugs affecting sodium permeability on the muscle spindle of frogs.
17	the effect of active immunization against aldosterone on the colonic potential response and sodium excretion in rabbits	L' effect of apos; active immunization against apos; aldosterone on colonic potential response and apos; sodium excretion in rabbits.
17	calcium and sodium ions as charge carriers in the action potential of an identified snail neurone	Calcium and sodium ions as charge carriers in the potential d&apos action; an identified snail neuron.
17	stimulation by aldosterone of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres effects of rna inhibitors and spironolactone	Apos stimulation; apos aldosterone; goose muscle fibre sodium efflux; effects of rna inhibitors and spironolactone.
17	influence of sodium intake on vascular and adrenal angiotensin ii receptors	Sodium absorption on vascular and adrenal receptors; angiotensin ii.
17	renin angiotensin system in hypertension after traumatic renal artery thrombosis	Renin angiotensin system in apos; hypertension after thrombosis of the apos; traumatic renal artery.
17	renin dependency of blood pressure analysis by angiotensin ii antagonist p113 in hypertensive patients treated with salt depletion and propranolol	Lapos; blood pressure analysis by apos; antagonist; angiotensin ii, p113 is dependent on renin in hypertensive patients treated with saline depletion and propranolol.
17	plasma renin activity angiotensin ii and aldosterone during intense heat stress	L' plasma renin activity angiotensin ii and aldosterone during intense heat stress.
17	influence of ethacrynic acid on intrarenal renin release mechanisms	L&apos influence; ethacrynic acid on intrarenal renin release mechanisms.
17	comparative evaluation of fractional excretion of sodium following saline infusion in transplanted kidneys and in isolated perfused kidneys in conditions of previous high or low dietary sodium intake	Comparative evaluation of apo; fractional excretion of sodium following saline infusion in transplanted kidneys and in perfused kidneys isolated under conditions of high or low dietary sodium intake.
17	renin profiling in hypertension and its use in treatment with propranolol and chlorthalidone	Renin profililing in hypertension and its use in treatment with propranolol and chlorthalidone.
17	the effect of plasma calcium on plasma adh levels in anephric patients	L' effect of plasma calcium on plasma adhesion levels in patients with dementia.
17	renal tubular sodium reabsorption during the recovery from the oliguric phase of acute nephritis	Renal tubular sodium reabsorption during recovery from the oliguric phase of acute nephritis.
17	phosphate transport by isolated renal brush border vesicles	Phosphate transport by isolated renal brush border vesicles.
17	plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration in children	Lapses; plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration in children.
17	the objective and timing of drug disposition studies appendix ii plasma concentrations of oxyphenbutazone in dogs given oxyphenbutazone or the calcium or sodium salts of its phosphate ester	Purpose and Schedule of Drug Elimination Studies Schedule ii Plasma concentrations d' oxyphenbutazone in dogs administered l' oxyphenbutazone or the calcium or sodium salts of its phosphate ester.
17	abnormal sodium transport in leucocytes from patients with essential hypertension and the effect of treatment	Treatment effect of abnormal sodium transport in leukocytes of patients with essential hypertension and luteum.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in congestive failure in conscious dogs	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the apos; congestive failure in conscious dogs.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal man	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal man.
17	treatment of patients with severe hypertension by inhibition of angiotensin converting enzyme	Treatment of patients with apo; severe hypertension by inhibition of apo; conversion enzyme; angiotensin.
17	effect of sodium intake on gentamicin nephrotoxicity in the rat	Impact of apo; sodium intake on gentamicin nephrotoxicity in rat.
17	renal function in normo and hypertensive 50 year old males	Renal functions in normo and hypertensive 50-year-old men.
17	active and passive immunization against angiotensin ii in the rat and rabbit evidence for a normal regulation of the renin angiotensin system	L' active and passive immunization against l' angiotensin ii in the rat and rabbit indicates normal regulation of the renin system-angiotensin.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii blocker 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on renal artery clip hypertension in the rat	Effect of l*apos blocker; angiotensin ii 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on apos; renal clip hypertension in rat.
17	effect of sodium intake on aldosterone and corticosterone production the serum sodium concentration and body weight in infant rats during weaning period	Effects of sodium intake on production of aldosterone and corticosterone, serum sodium concentration and body weight in newborn-rats born during the weaning period.
17	sodium transport by the colon of bufo marinus na uptake across the mucosal border	Sodium transport by the colon of bufo marinus n across the mucosal border.
17	effect of intravenous frusemide on plasma renin concentration suppression of response in hypertension	Effect of intravenous frusemide on suppression of response to plasma renin concentration in hypertension.
17	evidence for a humoral factor in unilaterally nephrectomized dogs stimulating renal growth in isolated canine kidneys	Evidence of apo; humoral factor in unilaterally nephrectomized dogs, stimulating renal growth in isolated dog kidneys.
17	content of total metabolic sodium in arterial hypertension of varying origin	Level of total metabolic sodium in adults; high blood pressure; varied origin.
17	low renin hypertension a distinct entity	L' low renin hypertension is distinct.
17	plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone pa in patients with chronic glomerulonephritis gn and hypertension	L' plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone pa in patients with chronic glomerulonephritis gn and d' hypertension.
17	reciprocal relation between renin dependency and sodium dependency in essential hypertension	Reciprocal relationship between renin dependence and sodium dependence in essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity pra and plasma aldosterone pa in hypertensive kidney allograft recipients	L' plasma renin activity pra and plasma aldosterone pa in patients with hypertensive renal allografts.
17	inhibition of the sodium inactivation of the nodal membrane by anemonia sulcata toxin ii	Inactivation of the nodal membrane by the toxin sulcata de l'apos; anemony ii.
17	a method for measurement of angiotensin ii in tissues and its application to rat kidney	Procedure for measuring angiotensin ii in tissues and its application to rat kidney.
17	the renin aldosterone system and renal hemodynamics in patients with posttransplant hypertension	The renin system-aldosterone and l' renal hemodynamics in patients with apo; post-hypertension-transplantation.
17	an assessment of the optimal range of dietary sodium for inducing a pause in laying	Assessment of the optimal range of dietary sodium for a break in laying.
17	circadian rhythms of serum renin activity and serum corticosterone prolactin and aldosterone concentrations in the male rat on normal and low sodium diets	Circadial liver rhythms; serum renin activity and serum prolactin and d&apos levels; corticosterone aldosterone in male rats on normal and low sodium diets.
17	effect of indomethacin on cholera induced fluid movement unidirectional sodium fluxes and intestinal camp	The effect of indomethacin on cholera induced a one-way fluid movement of sodium and intestinal camp.
17	intrarenal site of action of calcium on renin secretion in dogs	Site d' intrarenal action of calcium on renin secretion in dogs.
17	a morphometric study on the pars intermedia of the hypophysis during impairment of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in sodium depleted mice	A morphometric study of the intermedia pars of the pituitary gland during apos; alteration of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in mice depleted of sodium.
17	effect of calcium gluconate infusion on renin in the dog	Effect of calcium gluconate infusion on dog renin.
17	arterial and venous angiotensin ii in normal subjects relation to plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration and response to posture and volume changes	Arterial and venous angiotensin ii in normal subjects in relation to apos; plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration, as well as with response to posture and volume changes.
17	the effects of altered sodium balance and adrenergic blockade on renin release induced in rats by angiotensin antagonism	Epos; an alteration of apos; sodium and apos balance; an adrenergic blockade on renin release induced by apos; antagonism of apos; angiotensin in rats.
17	the effects of des asp1 angiotensin ii on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration and plasma renin activity in the rabbit	The effects of asp1 angiotensin ii on blood pressure, plasma aldosterone concentration, and plasma renin activity in rabbits.
17	aldosterone and sodium homeostasis in preterm infants	L' aldosterone and l' and, sodium homeostasis in preterm infants.
17	effect of renin angiotensin system on sodium intake	Effect of renin system-angiotensin on sodium absorption.
17	intrarenal renin angiotensin sodium interdependent mechanism controlling postclamp renal artery pressure and renin release in the conscious dog with chronic one kidney goldblatt hypertension	Interdependent mechanisms of apos; intrarenal renal sodium angiotensin controlling renal arterial pressure post-clamp and renin release in the conscious dog with chronic hypertension of a Goldblatt kidney.
17	pressor response to 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects	The pressor response to 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects.
17	renal renin output during continuous intracarotid infusions of iso and hypertonic sodium chloride solutions in the rat	Renal renin output during continuous intracarotid infusions of iso and hypertonic sodium chloride in rat.
17	cardiovascular complications in matched pairs of low and normal renin hypertensive patients	Cardiovascular complications in matched pairs of normal hypertensive patients and weak renin hypertensive patients.
17	sensitivity of renin secretion to volume depletion in the anaesthetized dog comparison between urinary drainage and slow haemorrhage	The sensitivity of renin secretion to volume depletion in the anesthetized dog's comparison between urine drainage and slow hemorrhage.
17	stretch receptor model for renin release with evidence from perfused rat kidney	Stretch for renin release with evidence of perfused rat kidney.
17	incidence and pathophysiological changes in chronic two kidney hypertension in the dog	Incidence and pathophysiological changes in chronic kidney hypertension in dogs.
17	plasma renin activity following central infusion of angiotensin ii and altered csf sodium concentration in the conscious goat	L' plasma renin activity following central infusion of d' angiotensin ii and l' alteration of csf sodium concentration in conscious goats.
17	hypertension in end stage renal disease the relationship between blood pressure plasma renin plasma renin substrate and exchangeable sodium in chronic hemodialysis patients	Lapses; end-stage hypertension; renal failure the relationship between plasma renin plasma blood pressure and renal renin substrate and exchangeable sodium in patients with apo; chronic hemodialysis.
17	experimental studies of effects of acute renal venous congestion on renal function with particular reference to renal arterio venous plasma sodium difference	Experimental studies of effects of acute renal venous congestion on renal function, particularly plasma arterial sodium difference in the renal venous vein.
17	hypertension associated with early stage kidney disease complementary roles of circulating renin the body sodium volume state and duration of hypertension	Hypertension associated with early stage of apo; renal insufficiency as a complement to circulating renin; condition of body sodium volume and duration of apo; hypertension.
17	estimating renin participation in hypertension superiority of converting enzyme inhibitor over saralasin	Estimation of renin participation in apos superiority; saralasin-converting enzyme inhibitor in apos; hypertension.
17	distribution of mineralocorticoid receptors in the kidney cells of rats with different levels of aldosterone in their bodies	Distribution of mineralocorticoid receptors in the kidney cells of rats with different levels of aldosterone in their bodies.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man and patients with essential hypertension blood pressure effects depending on renin and sodium balance	Apos; angiotensin ii blocks the effects of apos; essential hypertension in normal man and patients, according to the apos; renin balance-sodum.
17	the role of renin in the control of blood pressure in normotensive man	The role of renin in the control of blood pressure in normotensive men.
17	changes of blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration following the infusion of sar1 ile8 angiotensin ii in hypertensive fluid and electrolyte disorders	Changes in plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration following infusion of sar1 ile8 angiotensin ii in hypertensive disorders of the fluid and electrolytes.
17	the use of saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	The use of saralasin in the recognition of the apos; angiotensinogenic hypertension.
17	the effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on blood pressure and plasma aldosterone in man in relation to the prevailing plasma angiotensin ii concentration	The effects of angiotensin ii, saralasin, on blood pressure and lipos; aldosterone in the apos; man, in relation to the dominant plasma concentration of apos; angiotensin ii.
17	haemodynamic effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in patients with renovascular hypertension	Hemodynamic effects of apos; sar1ala8 angiotensin ii in patients with apos; renal hypertension-vascular.
17	comparative studies of the humoral and arterial pressure responses to sar1 ala8 sar1 ile8 and sar1 thr8 angiotensin ii in the trained unanaesthetized dog	Comparative studies of humoral and arterial blood pressure responses to apos; angiotensin sar1 ala8 sar1 sar1 ile8 and sar1 thr8 ii in trained and unanaesthetized dogs.
17	agonist and antagonist effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in salt loaded and salt depleted normal man	Agonist and antagonistic effects of l' angiotensin sar1 ala8 ii in normal man's charged and depleted salt.
17	decrease in the maximum sodium permeability and slow sodium inactivation in ranvier s nodes treated with trimecaine	Decreased maximum sodium permeability and slow inactivation of sodium in the ransom nodes treated with trimecaine.
17	bidirectional sodium ion movements via the paracellular and transcellular routes across short circuited rabbit ileum	Bio-directional movements of the apos; sodium ion via the paracellular and transcellular channels through the apos; ileum of rabbit short-circulation.
17	angiotensin blockade its clinical significance	L'apos; angiotensin blocks its clinical significance.
17	usefulness and limitations of saralasin a partial competitive agonist of angioten ii for evaluating the renin and sodium factors in hypertensive patients	Use and limitations of saralasin, a partial competitive agonist of l' angioten ii, for l' evaluation of the renin and sodium factors in hypertensive patients.
17	distal tubule na and juxtaglomerular apparatus renin activity in uranyl nitrate induced acute renal failure in the rat an evaluation of the role of tubuloglomerular feedback	L' renin activity of the distal tubule na and l' juxtaglomerular apparatus in d&apos nitrate; uranyl induced acute renal failure in the rat, an evaluation of the role of tubuloglomerular feedback.
17	studies of the renin angiotension aldosterone system cortisol doc and adh in normal and hypertensive pregnancy	Studies of the lupus system; renin angiotension aldosterone cortisol doc and lupus; adhesion during normal and hypertensive pregnancy.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium excretion during gestation	The renin system-angiotensin and sodium excretion during pregnancy.
17	the effects of saralasin an angiotensin ii antagonist on blood pressure and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in normal and hypertensive subjects	The effects of saralasin, an angiotensin ii antagonist, on blood pressure and the renin system in normal and hypertensive subjects.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in patients with essential hypertension	Lapses; angiotensin ii blocks in patients with essential hypertension.
17	effects of aldosterone on na transport in the toad bladder ii the anaerobic response	Effects of apos; aldosterone on transport n in the toad bladder ii the anaerobic response.
17	dissociated effect of sodium intake on glomerular and pressor responses to angiotensin	Dissociated effect of apos; sodium absorption on glomerular and pressor responses to apos; angiotensin.
17	renin release by rat kidney slices incubated in vitro role of sodium and of alpha and beta adrenergic receptors and effect of vincristine	Renin release from slices of rat kidney incubated in vitro the role of sodium and alpha and beta adrenergic receptors and l' effect of vincristine.
17	evidence that prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors increase the concentration of sodium and chloride in rat renal medulla	It appears that inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis increase the concentration of sodium and chloride in rat renal medulla.
17	mechanisms of hypertension during the acute and intermediate phases of the one clip two kidney model in the dog	Mechanisms of the apo; hypertension during the acute and intermediate phases of the one-clip-two kidney model in dogs.
17	plasma prorenin in normal hypertensive and anephric subjects and its effect on renin measurements	Plasma prorenin in normal hypertensive and effervescent subjects and its effect on renin measurements.
17	an inactive renin in human plasma	It's like an inactive renin in human plasma.
17	dose dependent stimulation and inhibition of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in the rat kidney	Dose-dependent-stimulation and inhibition of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption by l' angiotensin ii in the rat kidney.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by angiotensin ii in the main duct of the rabbit mandibular gland isolated and perfused in vitro	Inhibition of sodium transport by angiotensin ii in the main channel of the isolated and perfused rabbit mandibular gland.
17	possible role of renin in hypertension as suggested by renin sodium profiling and inhibition of converting enzyme	The possible role of renin in hypertension is suggested by sodium renin and l' conversion enzyme.
17	unusual low plasma renin hypertension in a child	Usually, plasma renin hypertension is low in a child.
17	dissociation of renin and aldosterone during dehydration studies in a case of diabetes insipidus and adipsia	Dissociation of renin and aldosterone during dehydration studies in a case of diabetes insipidus and adipsia.
17	effect of catecholamines on sodium resorption and oxygen tension in rat kidneys	Catecholamine effects on sodium resorption and oxygen tension in rat kidneys.
17	effect of renal sympathetic nerve stimulation on proximal water and sodium reabsorption	Effect of renal sympathetic nerve stimulation on proximal water reabsorption of sodium and dapos.
17	kinetics of active sodium transport in rat proximal tubules and its variation by cardiac glycosides at zero net volume and ion fluxes evidence for a multisite sodium transport system	The kinetics of active sodium transport in rat proximal tubules and its variation by net zero volume cardiac glycosides and ionic fluxes indicate the existence of a multisite sodium transport system.
17	maternal and fetal effects of lumbar epidural analgesia for labor and delivery in patients with gestational hypertension	Maternal and fetal effects of apo; lumbar epidural analgesia for work and leisure; delivery in patients with apo; gestational hypertension.
17	salt frusemide and renin in severe experimental renal hypertension	Frusemide salts and renin in severe experimental renal hypertension.
17	anti hypertensive action of dl alpha tocopharyl esters in rats	The hypertensive action of dl alpha tocopharyl esters in rats.
17	reduced plasma renin activity in essential hypertension effects of blood pressure age and sodium	Reduction of apo; plasma renin activity in the effects of apo; essential hypertension; blood pressure and sodium age.
17	determination of renin dependency and sodium dependency in the three renin sub groups of essential hypertension	Determination of renin and sodium dependence in the three renin groups of essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity plasma angiotensin ii and extracellular fluid volume in patients after renal transplantation	L' plasma renin activity L' plasma angiotensin ii and extracellular fluid volume in patients following a renal transplant.
17	renin angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems in sodium homeostasis and hypertension in rats	Renin, apo, angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems in rats; sodium homeostasis and apo; hypertension.
17	further unravelling of the causes of acth induced hypertension in the sheep	A more detailed investigation of the causes of hypertension in sheep was carried out.
17	does the renin angiotensin system contribute to the vascular lesions in renal hypertensive rats	The renin system-angiotensin contributes-t-it to the vascular lesions in renal hypertensive rats?
17	renin release from isolated rat glomeruli	Renin release from isolated rat glomeruli.
17	effects of anoxia and metabolic inhibitors on reaction of the fast sodium system	Effects of anoxia and metabolic inhibitors on the reaction of the fast sodium system.
17	angiotensin ii antagonists in dehydrated rabbits without baroreceptor reflexes	Angiotensin ii antagonists in dehydrated rabbits without baroreceptor reflexes.
17	hyperprolactinaemia and antihypertensive effect of bromocriptine in essential hypertension identification of abnormal central dopamine control	Apos; hyperprolactinemia and apos; antihypertensive effect of bromocriptine in apos; identification of apos; essential central abnormal dopamine control hypertension.
17	effect of sodium bicarbonate on canine left ventricular function	The effect of sodium bicarbonate on canine left ventricular function.
17	oral contraceptive induced hypertension after adrenalectomy and hypophysectomy	Oral contraception induced hypertension after adrenalectomy and hypophysectomy.
17	detection of renovascular hypertension with angiotensin ii blockade	Detection of apo; renal hypertension-vascular with angiotensin ii block.
17	renin reactivity as a determinant of responsiveness to antihypertensive treatment	Renin reactivity is a determinant of responsiveness to antihypertensive therapy.
17	placental transport of sodium in the guinea pig	Acute toxicity of sodium in rats, J. Toxicol.
17	spironolactone antagonism of aldosterone action on na transport and rna metabolism in toad bladder epithelium	L' spironolactone antagonism of toads; action of aldosterone on nal transport and metabolism; toad bladder epithelium.
17	effects of sodium bicarbonate administration during cardiopulmonary resuscitation	The effects of apo; administration of sodium bicarbonate during cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
17	effects of propranolol on development and maintanance of severe renal hypertension in rats	Effects of propranolol on development and maintenance of severe renal hypertension in rats.
17	effect of intrarenal angiotensin ii blockade on renal function in conscious dogs	Effect of apos; intrarenal angiotensin ii on renal function in conscious dogs.
17	natriuretic response to saline infusion in normotensive and hypertensive man the role of renin suppression in exaggerated natriuresis	Natriuretic response to saline infusion in normotensive and hypertensive man the role of renin suppression in exaggerated natriurese.
17	the rational use of diuretics in the treatment of arterial hypertension	L'apos; the rational use of diuretics in the treatment of high blood pressure.
17	stabilized venous distensibility of normotensive and hypertensive humans on high and low sodium intake	Stabilized venous Distensitivity of normotensive and hypertensive humans with high and low sodium intake.
17	renin release and pressor response to renal arterial hypotension effect of dietary sodium	Renin release and pressor response to apos; the renal arterial hypotension effect of dietary sodium.
17	hypotensive effects of sodium volume depletion and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in relation to plasma renin in hypertensive patients	Hypotensive effects of sodium volume depletion and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii relative to plasma renin in hypertensive patients.
17	renin sodium and vasodepressor response to saralasin in renovascular and essential hypertension	Renin sodium and vasodepressor response to saralasin in the apos; essential and renascular hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity in pregnant women with oedema treated with hydrochlorothiazide	L' plasma renin activity in pregnant women with edema and HIV; hydrochlorothiazide.
17	blood pressure and renin activity in essential hypertension under pindolol	High blood pressure and renin activity in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	the effect of conjugated estrogens on the renin angiotensin system	Los; effect of conjugated estrogens on the apos system; renin angiotensin.
17	the renin aldosterone system in exaggerated natriuresis of essential hypertension	The renin system-aldosterone in the exaggerated natriuresis of essential hypertension.
17	age and the renin aldosterone system	L' age and the renin system-aldosterone.
17	alteration of the electrophysiologic characteristics of the neurons of the great pseudo equine leech after increasing the intracellular concentration of sodium ions	Modification of the electrophysiological characteristics of the neurons of the big leech pseudo-equine after increasing the intracellular concentration of d' sodium ions.
17	on the question of body fluid volume or sodium status influencing renin release	On the issue of body fluid volume or sodium status influencing renin release.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man interaction of renin and sodium in maintaining blood pressure	Apos; angiotensin ii blocks apos; renin interaction-sodium in apos; normal man in maintaining blood pressure.
17	age related changes in na excretion in saline loaded spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of Na excretion on the reneflags of non-@-@ hypertensive influx rats.
17	correlations between blood pressure blood volume plasma renin and urinary catecholamines in normal subjects and in patients with benign essential hypertension	Correlations between blood pressure, plasma renin and urinary catecholamines in normal subjects and in patients with apo; benign essential hypertension.
17	effect of norethisterone acetate on salt excretion and of the renin aldosterone system in man	The effects of norethisterone acetate (Norethisterone acetate); excretion of saline and of the renin system-aldosterone in men.
17	urinary kallikrein in rats bred for susceptibility and resistance to the hypertensive effect of salt and in new zealand genetically hypertensive rats	Urinary Kallikrein in rats reared for susceptibility and resistance to the hypertensive effect of salt and in new genetically hypertensive zeland rats.
17	sodium intake and furosemide administration in hypertensive patients with renal insufficiency	Lapses; sodium absorption and apo; furosemide administration in hypertensive patients with apo; renal failure.
17	role of sodium and water in hypertensive patients on maintenance hemodialysis	The role of sodium and sodium; water in apo; hemodialysis; maintenance of patients with hypertension.
17	on the inappropriate in hypertension research	On the left; inappropriate in hypertension research.
17	the effect of beta adrenergic blockade on patterns of urinary sodium excretion blood pressure and plasma renin activity in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Effect of beta adrenergic block on urinary sodium excretion blood pressure and renal plasma activity in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension.
17	plasma renin and prorenin in essential hypertension during sodium depletion beta blockade and reduced arterial pressure	Plasma renin and prorenin in apos; essential hypertension during beta-sodium depletion blockade and reduction of blood pressure.
17	search for a natriuretic mechanism sensitive to sodium in the brain of the monkey	Look for a natriuretic mechanism that is sensitive to sodium in the monkey brain.
17	studies on sodium ion retention and antidiuretic effects after administration of l tryptophan to rats	Studies of sodium ion retention and antidiuretic effects after dosage; tryptophan l administration to rats.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the newborn lamb response to furosemide	Renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in response to furosemide new-lamb.
17	renal arterial stenosis and circadian water and sodium excretion in subjects with a reduced fluid intake	Renal arterial stenosis and circadian d' water and sodium excretion in subjects with reduced water intake.
17	effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in hypertension in man	Epos; antagonist; angiotensin ii 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on the apos; hypertension in the apos; man.
17	plasma vasopressin concentrations and effects of vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure in rats with malignant two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Effect of vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure and plasma vasopressin levels in rats with apos; malignant hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	sodium renin aldosterone catecholamines and blood pressure in diabetes mellitus	Sodium renin, aldosterone, catecholamines and blood pressure in diabetes mellitus.
17	effect of furosemide on urinary excretion of prostaglandin e in normal volunteers and patients with essential hypertension	Effect of furosemide on appetite; urinary excretion of prostaglandin e in normal volunteers and patients with furosemide; essential hypertension.
17	synergistic effects of hydralazine and alpha or beta adrenergic blockers the role of plasma renin activity	Synergistic effects of apos; hydralazine and alpha or beta-adrenergic blockers on the role of plasma renin activity.
17	measurement of plasma renin activity blood volume and exchangeable sodium an aid in the orientation of treatment of essential arterial hypertension	Measurement of blood volume of apos; plasma renin activity and exchangeable sodium provides guidance for the treatment of essential hypertension.
17	effect of sodium loading and exercise on renal haemodynamics and urinary sodium excretion in young patients with essential hypertension before and during propranolol treatment	Effect of sodium loading and exercise on renal hemodynamics and urinary sodium excretion in young patients with essential hypertension before and during propranolol therapy.
17	effects of ethanol on sodium 3 o methyl glucose and l alanine transport in the jejunum	Apos effects; ethanol on sodium 3 o methyl glucose and apos transport; alanine in the jejunum.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium in normal pregnancy a longitudinal study	In addition, a longitudinal study was conducted using the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone and sodium during normal pregnancy.
17	sodium restriction and inhibition of the renin angiotensin system in renovascular hypertension in the rat	"""Renin angiotensin system in renovascular hypertension in the rat"", J. Am. et al."
17	intrarenal distribution of plasma flow in cirrhosis as measured by transit renography relationship with plasma renin activity and sodium and water excretion	Intrarenal distribution of plasma flow in cirrhosis as measured by the transit renography relationship with l' plasma renin activity and l' sodium and d&apos excretion; water.
17	intrarenal role of angiotensin ii in controlling sodium excretion during dehydration in dogs	Intrarenal role of angiotensin ii in the control of apos; sodium excretion during dehydration in dogs.
17	the treatment of dysmenorrhea with naproxen sodium a report on two independent double blind trials	The treatment of dysmenorrhea with naproxen sodium, report on two independent double-blind trials.
17	plasma renin plasma aldosterone and exchangeable sodium in normotensive and hypertensive kidney transplant recipients with and without transplant renal artery stenosis	Renin plasma Aldosterone and exchangeable sodium in normotensive and hypertensive renal transplant patients with or without l&apos stenosis; transplanted renal artery.
17	effect of immersion on the urinary excretion of aldosterone in trained and untrained male subjects author s transl	Effects of apo; immersion in apo; urinary excretion of aldosterone in trained and untrained male subjects.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system of the normothermic marmot	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone of the normothermal groundhog.
17	sodium exchange between two sites the binding of sodium to halotolerant bacteria	L' exchange of sodium between two sites allows the binding of sodium to halotolerant bacteria.
17	concurrent estimation of total body and exchangeable body sodium in hypertension	Simultaneous estimation of total body sodium and exchangeable body sodium in hypertension.
17	renal hypotension in sodium and fluid deprivation experimental findings in renin depleted rats	L' renal hypotension in sodium and fluid deprivation was observed in renin-depleted rats.
17	renal vein renin activity a prospective study of sampling techniques and methods of interpretation	Renal renal vein renin activity a prospective study of sampling techniques and methods; interpretation.
17	kinetics of bidirectional active sodium fluxes in the toad bladder	Kinetics of active two-way sodium fluxes in the toad bladder.
17	extraction and radioimmunoassay of urinary aldosterone in the rat	Urinary extract and radioimmunoassay of urinary aldosterone in the rat.
17	control of aldosterone secretion during sodium restriction adrenal receptor regulation and increased adrenal sensitivity to angiotensin ii	Control of apos secretion; aldosterone during sodium restriction adrenal receptor regulation and increased adrenal sensitivity to apos; angiotensin ii.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by prostaglandin e2 across the isolated perfused rabbit collecting tubule	Inhibition of sodium transport by prostaglandin e2 across the isolated perfused rabbit collecting tube.
17	kinetic analysis of sodium and chloride influxes across the gills of the trout in fresh water	Kinetic analysis of sodium and chloride inputs through the gills of the freshwater trout.
17	hypertension treated by salt restriction	Acute hypertension treated by saline restriction.
17	2 models of indomethacin induced arterial hypertension in rats in chronic experiments	Two models of apo-induced hypertension and indomethacin were used in rats in chronic experiments.
17	role of the natriuretic factor in the phenomenon of exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension	The role of the natriuretic factor in the phenomenon of exaggerated natriuresis in the apos; experimental hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin and sodium metabolism in patients with essential hypertension	Urinary prostaglandin and sodium metabolism in patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	mechanism of the prophylactic effect of adaptation to altitude hypoxia on the development of hypertension	Mechanisms of apo; prophylactic effect of apo; adaptation to apo; hypoxia; altitude on development of apo; hypertension.
17	renal vascular response to interruption of the renin angiotensin system in normal man	Renal vascular response to interruption of the angiotensin renin system in normal man.
17	the effect of dietary sodium intake on the blood pressure and cardiac output responses to angiotensin ii in unanaesthetized rats	Effects of apo; dietary sodium intake on blood pressure and cardiac output responses to apo; angiotensin ii in unanesthetized rats.
17	plasma renin levels and systemic haemodynamics in essential hypertension	Plasma renin levels and systemic hemodynamics in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	role of sodium intake in the antihypertensive effect of propranolol	The role of sodium intake in the antihypertensive effect of propranolol.
17	kidney transplant artery stenosis interrelationship between blood pressure kidney function renin aldosterone system and body sodium content	Arterial stenosis related to renal transplantation interrelationship between blood pressure renal function, the renin system-aldosterone and the body's sodium content.
17	effect of prostaglandin a1 infusion in hypertensive patients with renal artery stenosis	Effect of prostaglandin infusion on hypertensive patients with renal artery stenosis.
17	the significance of body sodium content in hypertension following renal transplantation exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration before and after renal transplantation	The importance of the sodium content of the apo; organism in kidney; hypertension following renal transplantation; exchangeable sodium concentration and plasma renin concentration before and after renal transplantation.
17	urinary kallikrein in normal renin essential hypertension	Urinary kallikrein in normal renin essential hypertension.
17	sodium intake following destruction of the anterior hypothalamus in the rat	Sodium intake after destruction of the anterior hypothalamus in the rat.
17	effect of acth on plasma renin activity aldosterone level and deoxycorticosterone level in humans author s transl	Effect of Apos; acth on levels of aldosterone and deoxycorticosterone in apos; plasma renin activity in humans.
17	pressor response to saralasin 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii bolus injection in hypertensive patients	Pressor response to saralasin 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii bolus injection in hypertensive patients.
17	basolateral plasma membrane localiztion of ouabain sensitive sodium transport sites in the secretory epithelium of the avian salt gland	The basolateral plasma membrane localizes ouabain-sensitive sodium transport sites in the secretory epithelium of the avian saline gland.
17	renin reactivity renin activity and renin concentration in patients with normal and low renin essential hypertension	L' renin reactivity renin activity and renin concentration in patients with normal and low renin essential hypertension.
17	inactivation of sodium channels second order kinetics in myelinated nerve	Inactivation of second-order kinetic sodium channels in myelinated nerve.
17	sodium balance in very low birth weight infants	Sodium balance in very low birth weight infants.
17	activity of lysosomal beta glucuronidase in leukocytes of rats exposed to benzene and sodium selenate	The activity of lysosomal beta glucuronidase in leukocytes from rats exposed to benzene and sodium selenate.
17	stimulus secretion coupling in pancreatic acinar cells influences of external sodium and calcium on responses to cholecystokinin pancreozymin and ionophore a23187	Stimulus secretion coupling in pancreatic acinar cells influences external sodium and calcium on responses to pancreozymin cholecystokinin and l' ionophore a23187.
17	renin secretion as a function of renal renin content in dogs	The renin secretion as a function of renal renin content in dogs.
17	renal sodium retention and ascites formation in dogs with experimental cirrhosis but without portal hypertension or increased splanchnic vascular capacity	Renal sodium retention and ascites formation in dogs with experimental cirrhosis, but without portal hypertension or increased splanchnic vascular capacity.
17	renal micropuncture study of normotensive and milan hypertensive rats before and after development of hypertension	Study of the renal micropuncture of normotensive and milan hypertensive rats before and after development of hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium appetite	It's called the renin system-angiotensin and l&apos.
17	plasma prolactin in essential and renovascular hypertension	Plasma protein in essential hypertension and renascular.
17	sodium and renin in the hypertension of early renal disease	Sodium and reindeer in the hypertension of early renal disease.
17	relationship of basal plasma noradrenaline to blood pressure age sex plasma renin activity and plasma volume in essential hypertension	Ratio of basal plasma noradrenaline to apo; age at blood pressure Sexual Plasma renin activity and plasma volume in essential hypertension.
17	role of the renin angiotensin system in post transplantation hypertension in patients with multiple kidneys	Role of the Dapos System; renin angiotensin in apos; post-transplant hypertension in patients with multiple kidneys.
17	the cycling of calcium sodium and protons across the inner membrane of cardiac mitochondria	Cycling of sodium calcium and protons across the inner membrane of cardiac mitochondria.
17	reproducibility of plasma renin activity pra profile in essential hypertension patients	Reproducibility of plasma renin activity pra profile in essential hypertension patients.
17	renin subgroups in essential hypertension an analysis and critique	Under-renin groups in the apos; essential hypertension an analysis and a criticism.
17	partial characterization of aortic renin in the spontaneously hypertensive rat and its interrelationship with plasma renin blood pressure and sodium balance	Partial characterization of aortic renin in the spontaneously hypertensive rat and its relationship to blood pressure and l' plasma renin sodium balance.
17	effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on arterial pressure renin and aldosterone in hypertension	Effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on renin and apos, and aldosterone in blood pressure; hypertension.
17	what makes the renin angiotensin system a pathogenic factor	This makes the renin system-angiotensin a pathogenic factor.
17	the immediate pressor response to saralasin in man a test of angiotensin ii receptor vacancy	The immediate pressor response to saralasin in humans was tested on apos; angiotensin ii, a receptor defect.
17	sodium intake and the effects of isoproterenol and exercise on plasma renin in man	Sodium absorption and the effects of isoproterenol and lapos; exercise on plasma renin in men.
17	the influence of different sodium loads on renin release in hypertensive and normotensive states of chronic renal failure	L' influence of different sodium loads on renin release in hypertensive and normotensive states of l' chronic renal failure.
17	health effects of long term exposure to sodium sulfate dust	Health effects of exposure; long-term exposure to sodium sulphate dust.
17	the effect of increasing the plasma magnesium concentration on renin release from the dog s kidney interactions with calcium and sodium	Effect of increased plasma magnesium concentration on renin release by dog kidney interactions with calcium and sodium.
17	effect of magnesium on sodium transport in toad urinary bladder	Effect of magnesium on sodium transport in toad bladder.
17	reversal of renal hypertension effects on renin salt and water balance	Renal hypertension on the saline and water balance of renin.
17	the renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and under the effects of inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis in rats	The renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and under the effects of inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis in rats.
17	sodium uptake across the apical border of the isolated turtle colon confirmation of the two barrier model	Sodium uptake across the apical border of the isolated turtle colon supports the two-barrier model.
17	weak a c magnetic field effects changes in cell sodium pump activity following whole animal exposure	A weak magnetic field alters the cellular sodium pump activity following exposure to whole animals.
17	17 alpha hydroxylase deficiency a combination of hydroxylation defect and reversible blockade in aldosterone biosynthesis	Alpha hydroxylase deficiency, a combination of dapos, hydroxylation and dapos; reversible blockade of apos biosynthesis; aldosterone.
17	prolonged infusions of ile5 angiotensin ii in sodium replete and deplete man effects on aldosterone acth cortisol blood pressure and electrolyte balance	Prolonged infusions of apos; angiotensin ii in sodium depleted rich man effects on blood pressure of apos; aldosterone acth cortisol and apos; electrolyte balance.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in hypertensive children with coarctation of the aorta	The role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in hypertensive children with coarctation of the aorta.
17	desoxycorticosterone in normal pregnancy ii cortisol dependent fluctuations in free plasma desoxycorticosterone	Deoxycorticosterone in a normal pregnancy ii Cortisol-dependent fluctuations in free plasma deoxycorticosterone.
17	thyroid hormone aldosterone interaction on na transport in toad bladder	Interaction of l' thyroid hormone aldosterone on transport n in toad bladder.
17	effect of parathyroid hormone on plasma renin activity and sodium excretion	Effect of parathyroid hormone on apos; plasma renin activity and apos; sodium excretion.
17	interrelations between plasma renin activity aldosterone and sympathetic nervous system activity in essential hypertension	Interrelationships between apos; plasma renin activity aldosterone and apos; sympathetic nervous system activity in apos; essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity following renal transplantation	L' plasma renin activity following renal transplantation.
17	calibration and evaluation of a system of total body in vivo activation analysis using 14 mev neutrons	Calibration and evaluation of total body in vivo activation analysis using 14 mev neutrons.
17	correlation of structural and ultrastructural modifications of the renal cortex with water sodium and protein excretion in rats rendered hypertensive by perinephritic constriction by collodion	Correlation between structural and ultrastructural changes of the renal cortex and apos; sodium and protein excretion in apos; water in collodion-induced perinephritic constriction hypertensive rats.
17	sodium losing renal disease two cases and a review of the literature	Two cases of sodium loss nephropathy and a review of the literature.
17	a composite analysis of renin classification methods	A composite analysis of renin classification methods.
17	renal hemodynamics and the renin angiotensin system in cirrhosis relationship to sodium retention	Lapses; renal hemodynamics and the kidney angiotensin system in relation to cirrhosis and sodium retention.
17	effect of papaverine on renin release in dogs in vivo and in vitro	The effect of papaverine on renin release in dogs in vivo and in vitro.
17	calcium and sodium excretion in rats in response to prolonged treatment with polythiazide	L' calcium and sodium excretion in rats in response to prolonged treatment with polythiazide.
17	polkissen cells and their possible role in renin secretion	The polkissen cells and their possible role in renin secretion.
17	renin secretion during dynamic changes in renal perfusion pressure	Renin secretion during dynamic changes in renal perfusion pressure.
17	intrarenal renin and autoregulation of renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate	Intrarenal renin and autoregulation of renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate.
17	effect of hematocrit variation on the urinary sodium excretion in normal and uremic dogs author s transl	Effect of changes in hematocrit on appetite; urinary sodium excretion in normal and uremic dogs.
17	renal kallikrein variations in relation to sodium intake and experimental renovascular hypertension author s transl	Variations in renal kallikrein with respect to sodium intake and apo; experimental vascular hypertension, translated by the authors.
17	plasma mineralocorticoids plasma renin and urinary kallikrein in salt sensitive and salt resistant rats	Plasma mineralocorticoids plasma renin and urinary kallikrein in salt-resistant and salt-sensitive rats.
17	continuous determination of various enzymes and sodium concentration in urine a usable method for diagnosis of kidney graft rejection	Ongoing determination of various enzymes and sodium concentration in urine is a useful method for diagnosing rejection of kidney transplant.
17	angiotensin thirst and sodium appetite retrospect and prospect	Angiotensin and sodium appetite retrospectively and prospectively.
17	the renin angiotensin system and thirst some unanswered questions	The renin angiotensin system and thirst some unanswered questions.
17	lymphatic network of kidney ii effect of diuretics on intrarenal renin release	Kidney lymphatic network ii effect of diuretics on intrarenal renin release.
17	collecting duct sodium reabsorption in deoxycorticosterone treated rats	Collector duct sodium reabsorption in deoxycorticosterone-treated rats.
17	kinetics of sodium in rabbit arterial wall inability of aldosterone to alter extra to intracellular distribution	Sodium kinetics in rabbit arterial wall failed to alter the extracellular distribution of l' aldosterone.
17	the effect of extremely high sodium intake on plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone concentration and urinary excretion of aldosterone metabolites	Effect of extremely high sodium intake on apos concentration; plasma aldosterone; renin activity and apos; urinary excretion of dapos metabolites; and plasma aldosterone.
17	sodium retention and hypertension with short dialysis	Acute sodium retention and hypertension with short dialysis.
17	innappropriate renin secretion unmasked by captopril sq 14 225 in hypertension of chronic renal failure	Inappropriate unmasked renin secretion by captopril sq 14,225 in the apos; hypertension of the apos; chronic renal failure.
17	comparison of two angiotensin ii analogues in normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Comparison of two apos; angiotensin ii analogues in normal subjects and hypertensive patients.
17	renin aldosterone and renal haemodynamics in cirrhosis with ascites	Renin aldosterone and renal hemodynamics in cirrhosis with ascites.
17	renal responses to angiotensin ii and 1 sar 8 ala aii in sodium replete and deplete dogs	Renal responses to angiotensin ii and 1 sar 8 alaii in sodium-filled and impoverished dogs.
17	effects of chronic lithium administration on concanavalin a binding to plasma membranes from the corpus striatum of rat brain	Effects of apos; chronic lithium administration on concanavalin, a binding to plasma membranes of the striated corpus of rat brain.
17	orthostatic hypotension in complicated diabetes mellitus study of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system author s transl	Orthostatic hypotension in complicated diabetes mellitus study of reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system s transl.
17	renin sodium profile and its therapeutical implications in arterial hypertension	Sodium renin profile and its therapeutic implications in high blood pressure.
17	elevated plasma renin activity in patients with acute pyelonephritis	High plasma renin activity in patients with acute pyelonephritis.
17	coupled sodium chloride influx across brush border of flounder intestine	Coupled sodium chloride influx through the brush border of the apos; flounder intestine.
17	plasma volumes and hematocrits in rats with chronic sinoaortic denervation hypertension	Plasma volumes and hematocrit in rats with chronic aortic hypertension due to sino denervation-aortic.
17	essential role of mean circulatory filling pressure in salt induced hypertension	Essential role of mean circulatory filling pressure in glucose; salt hypertension.
17	salt intake and diuretic treatment of hypertension	Salt absorption and diuretic treatment of high blood pressure.
17	increased glomerular filtration rate after converting enzyme inhibition in essential hypertension	Increased glomerular filtration rate after apo conversion; enzyme inhibition in apo; essential hypertension.
17	plasma active and inactive renin in the rabbit effect of dietary sodium depletion and repletion	Plasma renin is active and inactive in the apos; the rabbit effect of dietary sodium depletion and refluxing.
17	studies on the inhibitory effect of indomethacin and meclofenamate on the adrenalectomy induced increase in plasma renin concentration	The study of the inhibitory effect of indomethacin and meclofenamate on adrenalectomy induced an increase in plasma renin concentration.
17	angiotensin ii blockade during combined thiazide beta adrenoreceptor blocker treatment	L' angiotensin ii blocks during combined beta treatment with a-thiazide-adrenoceptor blocker.
17	effects of high salt intake and meclofenamate on arterial pressure and renal function in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effects of high dose of salt and meclofenamate on arterial pressure and renal function in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	urinary prostaglandins and kallikrein in essential hypertension	Urinary protaglandins and kallikrein in essential hypertension.
17	sodium balance urinary prostaglandin e2 and renin in normal man	Sodium balance urinary prostaglandin e2 and normal man reindeer.
17	effect of chronic treatment with desoxycorticosterone on the dipsogenic response of rats to isoproterenol and angiotensin	Effect of chronic treatment with deoxycorticosterone on the dipsogenic response of rats to isoproterenol and angiotensin.
17	angiotensin and sodium balance their role in chronic two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Angiotensin and sodium balance their role in the chronic two-kidney Goldblatt hypertension.
17	the role of angiotensin in the control of blood pressure during sodium depletion	The role of angiotensin in the control of blood pressure during sodium depletion.
17	factors controlling plasma renin and aldosterone during pregnancy	The factors controlling plasma renin and aldosterone during pregnancy.
17	exchangeable sodium in angiotensinogenic and nonangiotensinogenic renovascular hypertension	Exchangeable sodium in angiotensinogenic and nonangiotensinogenic renovascular hypertension.
17	effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance on the renin angiotensin system in renovascular and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance on the renin system-angiotensin in vascular and spontaneously hypertensive kidney rats.
17	inhibition by angiotensin ii of some vasopressin effects on renal function in sheep	L' angiotensin ii inhibits some effects of vasopressin on renal function in sheep.
17	divergent blood pressure responses during short term sodium restriction in hypertension	"""Effect of sodium on high blood pressure and hypertension,"" Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol."
17	application of equivalent electrical circuit models to study of sodium transport across epithelial tissues	Application of equivalent electrical circuit models to the study of sodium transport in epithelial tissue.
17	change in the selectivity of the sodium channels of a nerve fiber membrane under the action of veratrine	Alteration of the selectivity of the sodium channels; a nerve fiber membrane under the sodium channel; action of veratrin.
17	sodium intake and plasma angiotensin level as modulators of adrenal and uterine angiotensin ii receptors in the rat	Sodium intake and serum angiotensin as modulators of lacid receptors; adrenal angiotensin ii and uterine in the rat.
17	factors influencing the release of renin in patients under chronic dialysis treatment	The factors that influence the release of renin in patients on chronic dialysis.
17	idiopathic sustained inappropriate secretion of adh with associated hypertension and thirst	An idiopathic adhesive maintained an inappropriate secretion of adhesion associated with vomiting, hypertension and thirst.
17	renal tubular reabsorption in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Acute renal tubular reabsorption in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	hemodynamics of central infusion of angiotensin ii in normal and sodium depleted dogs	Hemodynamics of central infusion of apos; angiotensin ii in normal and sodium-free dogs.
17	reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or converting enzyme inhibitor	Reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or converting enzyme inhibitor.
17	changes of plasma renin and renal renin concentration in hgcl2 induced acute renal failure in rats	Changes in plasma renin and renal renin concentration in hemapos; hgcl2 induced acute renal failure in rats.
17	diuretics role of sodium balance	Diuretic role of sodium balance.
17	prostaglandin e2 induced hypertension in conscious dogs	Prostaglandin e2 induced hypertension in conscious dogs.
17	neonatal changes in the plasma levels of cortisol cortisone and aldosterone in the calf	Natal changes in plasma concentrations of cortisone and d' aldosterone of cortisol in calves.
17	nephrotic syndrome vasoconstriction and hypervolemic types indicated by renin sodium profiling	Nephrotic vasoconstriction syndrome and hypervolemic types indicated by renin sodium profiling.
17	effects of the oral converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14225 in a model of low cardiac output in dogs	Effects of apo inhibitors; oral conversion enzyme sq 14225 in a model of low cardiac output in dogs.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on plasma aldosterone concentration and on blood pressure before and during sodium depletion in normal subjects	Effect of apos; angiotensin antagonist; saralasin ii on plasma aldosterone concentration and blood pressure before and during sodium depletion in normal subjects.
17	plasma and urine dopamine in man given sodium chloride in the diet	Plasma and urinary dopamine in men who received sodium chloride in the diet.
17	the blocking effect of magnesium on the secretion of adrenal catecholamines induced by the omission of sodium from the extracellular medium	L' inhibitory effect of magnesium on the secretion of adrenal catecholamines induced by the apos; omission of sodium from the extracellular medium.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and sodium depletion on angiotensinogen production	Effect of apos; angiotensin ii and sodium depletion on angiotensinogen production.
17	effects of metoprolol on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in thiazide resistant hypertensive patients	Effect of metoprolol on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in thiazide-resistant hypertensive patients.
17	stability of carmustine in the presence of sodium bicarbonate	Stability of carmustine in the presence of sodium bicarbonate.
17	somatostatin stimulates sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit ileum	Somatostatin stimulates sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit ileum.
17	intrarenal prostaglandins effect of sodium and indomethacin on pge2 and pgf2 alpha in rabbits	Effect of intra-renal prostaglandins of sodium and indomethacin on pge2 and pgf2 alpha in rabbits.
17	reversible colchicine induced disruption of amygdaloid function in sodium appetite	Reversible colchicine induced disruption of amygdaloid function in the sodium appetite.
17	alterations in the responses of the sympathetic nervous system and renin in borderline hypertension	Changes in the responses of the sympathetic nervous system and renin in apos; limiting hypertension.
17	circadian changes in plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in two kidney hypertension rats	Circadian changes in plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in two renal hypertensive rats.
17	primacy of the renin angiotensin system in mediating the aldosterone response to sodium restriction	The primacy of the renin angiotensin system in the mediation of the aldosterone response to sodium restriction.
17	angiotensin ii plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of blood pressure response to saralasin in essential hypertension	Angiotensin ii, plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of blood pressure response to saralasin in apos; essential hypertension.
17	responses of the renin angiotensin system and kallikrein kinin system to sodium and converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14 225	Reactions of the liver system; renin angiotensin and kallikrein kinin system to sodium and sodium; conversion enzyme inhibitor sq.
17	captopril and salt subtraction to treat uncontrollable hypertension in haemodialysis patients	Captopril and salt subtraction to treat uncontrollable hypertension in patients with hemodialysis.
17	effects of chronic alpha and beta adrenoceptor blockade with labetalol on plasma catecholamines and renal function in hypertension	Acute effects of chronic alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor blockade with labetalol on plasma catecholamines and renal function in hypertension.
17	decreased urinary kallikrein activity and elevated blood pressure normalized by orally applied kallikrein in essential hypertension	Decreased urinary kallikrein and elevated blood pressure normalized by apos; oral application of kallikrein in apos; essential hypertension.
17	chronic blockade of angiotensin ii formation during sodium deprivation	Chronic blockade of angiotensin II formation during sodium deprivation.
17	importance of the radioimmune method of determining renin activity in the blood plasma for the differential therapy of hypertension	The importance of the radio method-immune for determination of apos; renin activity in the blood plasma for the differential treatment of apos; hypertension.
17	extracellular ph selectively modulates recovery from sodium inactivation in frog myelinated nerve	The extracellular ph selectively modulates recovery of sodium inactivation in frog myelinated nerve.
17	renal handling of water and sodium in children with proximal and distal renal tabular acidosis	Renal handling of water and sodium in children with proximal and distal renal tubular acidosis.
17	chronic effects of lead on renin and renal sodium excretion	Chronic effects of lead on renin and renal sodium excretion.
17	the relationship of urinary prostaglandins and plasma renin to sodium balance and diuresis in normal man	The relationship of urinary prostaglandins and plasma reindeer to sodium balance and diuresis in normal man.
17	the renin angiotensin system in newborn dogs developmental patterns and response to acute saline loading	The d' renin angiotensin system in newborn dogs-and response to acute saline loading.
17	evidence for na retaining humoral agents and vasoconstrictor humoral agents in hypertension prone dahl s rats prevention of nacl induced hypertension in dahl s rats with thiazide	Evidence of retention of humoral and cellular agents; vasoconstrictor humoral agents in apo-prone dahl rats; hypertension, prevention of apos; and nacl-induced hypertension in dahl rats with thiazide.
17	the effect of sodium pentobarbital on the preservation of fertilizing capacity of turkey spermatozoa	L' effect of sodium pentobarbital on the conservation of the fertilization capacity of turkey sperm.
17	reversal of two kidney one clip renovascular hypertension in the rat	L&apos reversal; renal hypertension-vascular of two kidneys a clip in the rat.
17	sequential method for combined screening antihypertensive and diuretic agents in the same spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	Sequential method for combined screening for antihypertensive and diuretic agents in the same narrowed spontaneously hypertensive rat.
17	is low urinary prostaglandin concentration a stage in the development of essential hypertension	Low urinary prostaglandin levels are a stage in the development of essential high blood pressure.
17	sodium induced elevation of blood pressure in the anephric state	Sodium induced an elevation of blood pressure at the extinction state.
17	in vitro neutralizing capacity of commercially available antacid mixtures and their role in the treatment of peptic ulcer	In vitro neutralization capacity of commercially available antacid mixtures and their role in the treatment of gastroduodenal ulcers.
17	renal interstitial pressure and sodium excretion during renal vein constriction	Renal interstitial pressure and sodium excretion during renal venous constriction.
17	effect on renal sodium and water excretion of the inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis in extracellular volume expansion	Effect on apos; excretion of apos; renal sodium and water from apos; inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis in apos; expansion of extracellular volume.
17	the present status of the autoregulation theory of the pathogenesis of hypertension	Current status of the theory of apos; self-regulation of the pathogenesis of apos; hypertension.
17	intrarenal conversion of prostaglandin f2 alpha into prostaglandin e2 and renin release in the isolated perfused rat kidney	Intrarenal conversion of prostaglandin f2 alpha to prostaglandin e2 and renin release in isolated perfused rat kidney.
17	diminished urinary prostacyclin metabolite in essential hypertension	Decreased urinary prostacyclin metabolite in essential hypertension.
17	role of prostaglandin in the antihypertensive mechanism of captopril in low renin hypertension	The role of prostaglandin in the antihypertensive mechanism of captopril in low renin hypertension.
17	influence of sodium on experimental renovascular hypertension in rats	The influence of sodium on glucose; experimental renal hypertension in rats.
17	active and inactive renin in individual juxtaglomerular apparatuses	Both active and inactive renin in individual juxtaglomerular devices.
17	angiotensin ii and not sodium status is the major determinant of the agonistic antagonistic balance of saralasin s actions	L' angiotensin ii, not l' sodium state, is the major determinant of l' agonistic antagonistic balance of saralasin actions.
17	long term regulation of arterial pressure glomerular filtration and renal sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in dogs	Long-term regulation of blood pressure glomerular filtration and renal sodium reabsorption by etapos; angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the maintenance of blood pressure aldosterone secretion and sodium balance in normotensive subjects	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in the maintenance of d' aldosterone and l&apos secretion; and sodium balance of blood pressure in normotensive subjects.
17	acceleration of hypotension and development of stroke in the spontaneously hypertensive rat by unilateral ureteral obstruction	Cardiovascular disease; hypotension and development of the brain; stroke in the spontaneously hypertensive rat by unilateral obstruction of the urethra.
17	use of first dose response or plasma renin activity to predict the long term effect of captopril identification of triphasic pattern of blood pressure response	Use of first dose response or apo; plasma renin activity to predict apos; long-term effect of apos; identification of captopril on triphasic pattern of blood pressure response.
17	regulation of receptor binding interactions of 125i angiotensin ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii an angiotensin antagonist by sodium ion	Regulation of receptor binding interactions of 125i angiotensin ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii, an antagonist of l' angiotensin, by sodium ion.
17	specific inhibition of renin by an angiotensinogen analog studies in sodium depletion and renin dependent hypertension	Specific inhibition of renin by an angiotensinogen analog in sodium depletion and renin-dependent hypertension.
17	angiotensin and other peptides in the control of water and sodium intake	Lapses; angiotensin and dapos; other peptides in the control of apos; sodium and water absorption.
17	interaction of catecholamines and the renin angiotensin system in regulating sodium reabsorption in the rat kidney	Interaction of catecholamines and the @-@angiotensin renin system in regulating sodium reabsorption in rat kidney.
17	a comparison of sodium chloride thiocyanate and sucrose spaces as estimates of extracellular fluid volume	Comparison of sodium chloride thiocyanate and sucrose spaces to estimate volume of extracellular fluid.
17	clinical and biochemical effects of spironolactone administered once daily in primary hypertension multicenter sweden study	Clinical and biochemical effects of spironolactone administered once daily as part of a sweden primary hypertension multi-centre study.
17	na and ca2 ingestion plasma volume electrolyte distribution at rest and exercise	Lapos distribution; plasma volume electrolyte; nausea and ca2 ingestion during rest and exercise.
17	heterogeneous distribution of the sodium dependent alanine transport activity in the rat hepatocyte plasma membrane	Heterogeneous distribution of l' sodium-dependent alanine transport activity in the plasma membrane of rat hepatocytes.
17	a dose response comparison of the actions of angiotensin ii and angiotensin iii in sheep	Dose comparison-response of the actions of angiotensin ii and angiotensin iii in sheep.
17	regulation of serum progesterone in patients with essential hypertension	The regulation of serum progesterone in patients with essential hypertension.
17	obesity and essential hypertension hemodynamics intravascular volume sodium excretion and plasma renin activity	Obesity and obesity; essential hemodynamic hypertension intravascular volume sodium excretion and plasma renin activity.
17	effects of indomethacin and meclofenamate on renin release and renal hemodynamic function during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs	Effects of indomethacin and meclofenamate on renin release and renal hemodynamic function during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs.
17	angiotensin inhibitors for hypertension	Apos inhibitors; angiotensin inhibitors for high blood pressure.
17	effects of acute haemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance upon experimentally hypertensive rats	The effects of acute haemodialysis induced changes in serum sodium balance in experimental hypertensive rats.
17	efficacy of captopril in experimental low renin hypertension	Efficacy of captopril in apos; experimental low renin hypertension.
17	testosterone a specific competitive antagonist of aldosterone in the toad bladder	Testosterone is a specific competitive antagonist of aldosterone in the toad bladder.
17	sodium and water content and the central hemodynamic indices in hypertension	Sodium and water content and central hemodynamic indices of hypertension.
17	transport of glycyl l proline into intestinal and renal brush border vesicles from rabbit	Transport of glycyl proline in intestinal and renal brush border vesicles of rabbit.
17	vascular renin in hypertension	Acute vascular renin in patients with high blood pressure.
17	hypertension produced by sodium depletion and unilateral nephrectomy a new experimental model	Hypertension caused by sodium depletion and unilateral nephrectomy is a new experimental model.
17	enhanced parathyroid function in essential hypertension a homeostatic response to a urinary calcium leak	Increase parathyroid function in the apos; essential hypertension a homeostatic response to a urinary calcium leak.
17	disturbance of kidney aldosterone sensitivity and the mechanism of its development during neurodystrophy	Disturbance of sensitivity to renal aldosterone and its development during neurodystrophy.
17	aldosterone receptor measurements during changes in dietary sodium	Measurement of apos; aldosterone receptors during changes in the dietary sodium.
17	renin angiotensin system in acute hepatitis author s transl	Renin angiotensin system in acute hepatitis author s transl.
17	quantitative x ray microanalysis of frozen hydrated bulk biological specimens	Freezing and hydrated bulk biological specimens are analysed quantitatively by X-ray.
17	evidence that the acute hypotensive effect of captopril in dogs is not wholly explained by a reduction of plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect	L' acute hypotensive effect of captopril in the dog n' is not fully explained by a reduction of plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect.
17	urinary tetrahydroaldosterone and aldosterone 18 glucuronide excretion in white and black normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Urinary tetrahydroaldosterone and aldosterone 18 Glucuronide excretion in normal white and black subjects and hypertensive patients.
17	renal management of sodium under indomethacin and aldosterone in the elderly	The renal management of sodium under indomethacin and aldosterone in the elderly.
17	kinetic disposition and diuretic effect of frusemide in acute pulmonary oedema	Kinetic disposition and diuretic effect of frusemide in acute pulmonary edema.
17	overview of the role of angiotensin inhibitors in delineating the function of the renin angiotensin system	An overview of the role of angiotensin inhibitors in delineating the function of the apos system; angiotensin renin.
17	studies of the functional role of the intrarenal renin angiotensin system	Studies of the functional role of the intra-renal angiotensin system.
17	effects of two angiotensin ii analogues on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects on different sodium intakes	Effect of two analogs of angiotensin ii on plasma aldosterone concentration of arterial pressure, plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects on different sodium intakes.
17	the effect of sodium on aldosterone metabolic clearance	The effect of sodium on the metabolic clearance of aldosterone.
17	increased sodium appetite in the rat induced by intracranial administration of components of the renin angiotensin system	Increased appetite for sodium in rats; intracranial administration of components of the apos system; renin angiotensin increased the appetite; rat sodium appetite.
17	changes of urinary kallikrein and kinin excretions induced by adrenalin infusion in conscious dogs	Changes in urinary kallikrein and kinin excretion induced by d' adrenaline infusion in conscious dogs.
17	inborn error in the terminal step of aldosterone biosynthesis corticosterone methyl oxidase tpe ii deficiency in a north american pedigree	Inborn error in the terminal stage of biosynthesis of l' aldosterone corticosterone methyl oxidase tpe ii in a northern pedigree-U.S.
17	differential renal effects of cyclooxygenase inhibition in sodium replete and sodium deprived dog	Differential renal effects of cyclooxygenase inhibition in sodium-deprived and sodium-filled dogs.
17	sodium balance and plasma renin activity during the development of two kidney goldblatt hypertension in rats	L' sodium balance and l' renin activity during the development of l' two-kidney Goldblatt hypertension in rats.
17	the role of the renal effects of angiotensin ii in hypertension	The role of the renal effects of angiotensin ii in high blood pressure.
17	exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension and the role of the natriuretic factor	Excessive natriuresis in experimental hypertension and the role of the natriuretic factor.
17	the effects of hemorrhage and sodium depletion on plasma concentrations of angiotensin ii and des asp1 angiotensin ii in the rat	Effects of apos; hemorrhage and sodium depletion on plasma concentrations of angiotensin ii and dos; asp1 angiotensin ii in rats.
17	influence of sodium intake on catecholamine release by angiotensin and renal nerve stimulation in dogs	L' influence of sodium intake on catecholamine release by apos; angiotensin and renal nerve stimulation in dogs.
17	hypertension following renal transplantation the role of the host s kidney	L'apos; hypertension that follows renal transplantation, the role of the host kidney.
17	effects of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in essential hypertension	Apos effects; apos inhibition; conversion enzyme; angiotensin on blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in apos; essential hypertension.
17	neuroeffector function of isolated portal vein from spontaneously hypertensive and wistar kyoto rats dependence on external calcium concentration	The neuroeffector function of the isolated portal vein from spontaneously hypertensive and wistar kyoto rats depends on the external calcium concentration.
17	leucocyte cation transport in essential hypertension its relation to the renin angiotensin system	Leukocyte cation transport in essential hypertension is related to the apos system; renin angiotensin.
17	studies on the mechanism of renin release from rat kidney slices calcium sodium and metabolic inhibition	Studies on the mechanism of renin release from slices of rat kidney calcium sodium and metabolic inhibition.
17	functional renal involvement in normotensive patients with progressive systemic sclerosis impaired sodium excretion during isotonic saline infusion	L*apos; functional renal involvement in normotensive patients with progressive systemic sclerosis impaired apos; sodium excretion during isotonic saline infusion.
17	angiotensin in the control of water and sodium intake	Lapses; angiotensin in the control of lupus; absorption of water and sodium.
17	comparison of oral diazoxide and minoxidil in refractory hypertension	Comparison of oral diazoxide and minoxidil in refractory hypertension.
17	abnormal urinary kallikrein in hypertension is not related to aldosterone or plasma renin activity	The abnormal urinary kallikrein in apos; hypertension is not related to apos; aldosterone or apos; plasma renin activity.
17	effect of dietary salt on hemodynamics of established renal hypertension in the rabbit implications for the autoregulation theory of hypertension	Effect of dietary salt on hemodynamics of renal hypertension in the rabbit implications for the selforegulation theory of hypertension.
17	body weight reduction necessary to attain normotension in the overweight hypertensive patient	Reduction in body weight necessary to reach normotension in the hypertensive and obese patient.
17	in vivo modification of angiotensin ii pressor responsiveness in sheep by indomethacin	In vivo modification of pressor responsiveness to apos; angiotensin ii in sheep by apos; indomethacin.
17	effect of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition with sq 14 225 on blood pressure in sheep	Effect of apos; inhibition of apos; conversion enzyme; angiotensin with sq 14,225 on blood pressure in sheep.
17	renal prostaglandins renin release and renal hemodynamic function in high renin states	Renal renin release and renal hemodynamic function in renal prostaglandins in elevated renal states.
17	relationships between sodium clearance plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone renal hemodynamics and blood pressure in essential hypertension	Relationship between apos; renal hemodynamics of apos; plasma aldosterone and blood pressure in apos; essential hypertension.
17	enhancement by diuretics of the antihypertensive action of long term angiotensin converting enzyme blockade	Increased by diuretics of the apos; antihypertensive action of the apos; conversion enzyme of the apos; angiotensin blocking long term.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cirrhosis	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in cirrhosis.
17	prostaglandins role in renin regulation and mediation of antihypertensive drug effects	Role prostaglandins play in renin regulation and mediation of antihypertensive drug effects.
17	dynamic responses of active and inactive renin in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Dynamic reactions of active and inactive renin in patients with essential hypertension and renal-vascular.
17	low plasma renin activity in normotensive patients with diabetes mellitus relationship to neuropathy	Low plasma renin activity in normotensive patients with diabetes mellitus related to neuropathy.
17	plasma volume osmolality vasopressin and renin activity during graded exercise in man	Plasma volume osmolality vasopressin and renin activity during graded exercise in men.
17	hydrostatic ultrafiltration during hemodialysis using decreasing sodium dialysate	Hydrostatic ultrafiltration during apo; hemodialysis using decreasing sodium dialysate.
17	blood pressure and sodium balance in hypertensive patients in hospital	Blood pressure and sodium balance in hospitalized hypertensive patients.
17	interactions between angiotensin peptides and the sympathetic nervous system mediating intestinal sodium and water absorption in the rat	Apos peptide interactions; angiotensin and the sympathetic nervous system mediating apos; intestinal absorption of sodium and d' rat water.
17	synaptic transmission and intracellular sodium ionophore induced sodium loading of nerve terminals	Synaptic transmission and intracellular sodium ionophore induced sodium loading of nerve terminals.
17	continuous positive airway pressure impairs renal function in newborn goats	Continued positive respiratory pressure impairs renal function in newly born-goats.
17	the renin kallikrein prostaglandin system plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein during prostacyclin infusion in man	The active and inactive plasma renin kallikrein system prostaglandin, renin and urinary kallikrein during prostacyclin infusion in men.
17	stimulatory action of angiotensin ii on water and electrolyte transport by the proximal colon of the rat	Stimulatory action of angiotensin ii on the transport of water and electrolytes by the proximal colon of the rat.
17	increased sodium appetite in adrenalectomized or hypophysectomized rats after intracranial injections of renin or angiotensin ii	Sodium appetite increased in adrenalectomized or hypophysectomized rats following intracranial injections of renin or d*apos; angiotensin ii.
17	essential hypertension and diabetes	He's got essential hypertension and diabetes.
17	inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in coarctation of the aorta	Inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in coarctation of the aorta.
17	the relationship between sodium pump activity and twitch tension in cardiac purkinje fibres	The relationship between sodium pump activity and twitch tension in cardiac purkinje fibers.
17	effect of oral sucrose on blood pressure in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of oral sucrose on blood pressure in spontaneously hypertensive rat.
17	the effect of weight reduction on blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone levels in obese patients	Effect of weight reduction on weight; plasma renin activity of arterial pressure and plasma aldosterone levels in obese patients.
17	sodium dependent inhibition of amino acid and dipeptide transport by harmaline in monkey small intestine	Sodium-dependent inhibition of amino acid and dipeptide transport by harmaline in monkeys; small intestine.
17	influence of unilateral adrenalectomy on renin angiotensin aldosterone system in primary aldosteronism	L' influence of unilateral adrenalectomy on renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in apos; primary aldosterone.
17	the sodium effect of bacillus subtilis growth on aspartate	Sodium effect of bacillus subtilis on the bones; aspartate.
17	factors relating to aldosterone secretion rate the excretions of aldosterone 18 glucuronide and the plasma aldosterone concentration in cirrhosis	Factors related to the secretion of apos; aldosterone are the levels of apos; apos glucuronide excretion; aldosterone 18; and aldosterone concentration in cirrhosis.
17	uncontrollable hypertension in patients on hemodialysis long term treatment with captopril and salt subtraction	Uncontrollable hypertension in patients on long-term hemodialysis with captopril and subtraction saline.
17	aldosterone response to sodium deprivation and angiotensin ii in patients with hypopituitarism	Apos; aldosterone response to sodium deprivation and angiotensin ii in patients with apos; hypopituitarism.
17	effect of hypertonic and hypotonic infusions on aldosterone in conscious sodium depleted dogs	Effect of hypertonic and hypotonic infusions on aldosterone in conscious sodium depleted dogs.
17	the effect on salt appetite and the renin aldosterone system on replacing the depleted ions to sodium deficient cattle	L' effect on salt appetite and the renin system-aldosterone on the replacement of depleted ions by sodium deficient cattle.
17	stimulation by injected guanosine triphosphate of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres pre exposed to aldosterone	Stimulation by sucrose; guanosine triphosphate injection of sucrose; sodium efflux into barnacle muscle fibers, previously exposed to aldosterone.
17	gated sodium 23 nuclear magnetic resonance images of an isolated perfused working rat heart	Gated sodium 23 nuclear magnetic resonance images d' an isolated perfused rat heart.
17	application of in vivo activation analysis to the compartmental study of sodium in the hand	Application of apo; apo analysis; in vivo activation at apo; compartmentalized study of sodium in the hand.
17	vasopressin fluid and electrolyte response to chronic angiotensin ii infusion	Vasopressin fluid and electrolyte response to chronic d*apos; angiotensin II.
17	role of aldosterone in sodium retention of pregnancy in the rat	Role of aldosterone in sodium retention in pregnancy in rats.
17	reduced urine kallikrein excretion and antikaliuresis by chlorazanil in rats	Chlorazanil reduced urinary kallikrein excretion and chlorazanil antikaliuresis in rats.
17	hypertension treated by sodium restriction	Acute hypertension treated by sodium restriction.
17	chronic treatment with the new potent vasodilator ro 12 4713 in moderate to severe hypertension effects on blood pressure endocrine function sodium and plasma volume	Chronic treatment with the new potent vasodilator ro 12 4713 in effects of moderate to severe hypertension on endocrine function of blood pressure, sodium and plasma volume.
17	effects of sodium intake and goldblatt hypertension on renin release in rat kidney slices	Effects of sodium absorption and apo; goldblatt-like hypertension on renin release in rat kidney slices.
17	subcellular localization of aldosterone induced proteins in toad urinary bladders	The subcellular localization of aldosterone induces proteins in the bladder of toads.
17	na ca exchange in rat myometrium membrane vesicles highly enriched in plasma membranes	L' na ca exchange in rat myometrium membrane vesicles is rich in plasma membranes.
17	sodium and angiotensin in the pathogenesis of experimental renovascular hypertension	Sodium and angiotensin in the pathogenesis of experimental renovascular hypertension.
17	plasma vasopressin levels and urinary sodium excretion during cardiopulmonary bypass with and without pulsatile flow	Plasma vasopressin levels and urinary sodium excretion during cardiopulmonary bypass with and without pulsatile flow.
17	connection between the changes in tubular reabsorption and in glomerular filtration rate induced by replacement of plasma sodium and chloride by isotonic mannitol	Relationship between changes in tubular reabsorption and glomerular filtration rate induced by replacement of plasma sodium and chloride with isotonic mannitol.
17	sodium free water clearance in hemodialysis	Sodium-free water clearance in apo; hemodialysis.
17	sodium and calcium action potentials in cells derived from a rat medullary thyroid carcinoma	Potential for sodium and calcium action in cells derived from rat-derived spinal cord thyroid carcinoma.
17	regulation of aldosterone biosynthesis during sodium deficiency evidence for an essential role of the pituitary gland	The regulation of aldosterone biosynthesis during sodium deficiency indicates that the pituitary is essential.
17	vasopressin elevation in essential hypertension and increased responsiveness to sodium intake	Elevation of vasopressin in essential hypertension and increased responsiveness to sodium absorption were observed.
17	role of the renal nerves in the pathogenesis of one kidney renal hypertension in the rat	The role of the renal nerves in the pathogenesis of the kidney; a renal hypertension in the rat.
17	renal function aldosterone and vasopressin excretion following repeated long distance running	L' aldosterone and l' and vasopressin excretion from renal function were excreted following long-distance, repeated runs.
17	sodium proton exchange in mouse neuroblastoma cells	Sodium proton exchange in mouse neuroblastoma cells.
17	investigation of the mechanism of action of prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors on renin and aldosterone secretion and sodium excretion	Examination of the mechanism of d' action of prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors on renin and d&apos secretion; aldosterone and sodium excretion.
17	plasma substance p levels in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	Plasma-p-substance levels in normotensive and hypertensive subjects.
17	effects of chronic prazosin treatment on the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in man	Effects of apos; chronic prazosin treatment on the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in men.
17	the effect of prostaglandin inhibition on renin release a comparison of furosemide and low sodium stimulation tests	The apo effect of prostaglandin inhibition on renin liberates a comparison of furosemide and low sodium stimulation tests.
17	sodium appetite in sheep induced by cerebral ventricular infusion of angiotensin comparison with sodium deficiency	Sodium appetite in sheep induced by cerebral ventricular infusion of angiotensin compared to sodium deficiency.
17	effects of salt and water depletion on the early phase of hypertension in goldblatt two kidney hypertensive dogs	Effect of salt and water depletion on the early phase of hypertension in goldblatt rats.
17	asp1 val5 angiotensin 1 8 octapeptide does not stimulate aldosterone secretion in sodium depleted sheep	L' octapeptide asp1 val5 angiotensin 18 does not stimulate aldosterone secretion in sodium-deprived sheep.
17	aldosterone stimulates na transport without affecting citrate synthase activity in cultured cells	L' aldosterone stimulates transport without affecting the citrate synthase activity in cultured cells.
17	sodium dependent and calcium dependent calcium transport by rat brain microsomes	Sodium- and calcium-dependent calcium transport by rat brain microsomes.
17	thermoregulation in spontaneously hypertensive rats effects of antihypertensive treatments	The effects of antihypertensive treatments on thermoregulation in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	influence of sodium homeostasis on dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone renin and prolactin secretion in man	L' sodium homeostasis influences dopaminergic modulation of prolactin and renin d' aldosterone secretion in men.
17	analysis of steroids in urine for differentiation of pseudohypoaldosteronism and aldosterone biosynthetic defect	Analysis of steroids in urine for differentiation of pseudohypoaldosterone and biosynthetic defects of aldosterone.
17	renin release after furosemide and ethacrynic acid in man evidence for neural reflex control mechanisms	The release of renin after the administration of furosemide and ethacrynic acid to men indicates the presence of neural-reflex control mechanisms.
17	renal hemodynamics and sodium excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal hemodynamics and sodium excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats subject to stroke.
17	the effect of antihypertensive therapy on abnormal leucocyte sodium transport in essential hypertension	The effect of antihypertensive therapy on abnormal sodium leukocyte transport in essential hypertension.
17	genetic markers in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Genetic markers in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	sodium status and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in compensated liver disease	Sodium status and the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in compensated liver disease.
17	changing sodium intake in children the minneapolis children s blood pressure study	Change in sodium intake in children in Moose; Minneapolis children's blood pressure study.
17	severe hypertension hyperkalemia and renal tubular acidosis responding to dietary sodium restriction	Severe hypertension hyperkalemia and renal tubular acidosis responding to dietary sodium restriction.
17	angiotensin i ii and iii in sheep a model of angiotensin production and metabolism	In sheep, angiotensin iii and iii is a model of angiotensin production and metabolism.
17	a comparison of the effects of prostaglandins e2 and i2 on renal function and renin release in salt loaded and salt depleted anaesthetized dogs	A comparison of the effects of prostaglandins e2 and i2 on renal function and renin release in anesthetized dogs with and without salt.
17	the renin aldosterone profile in hypertension	The reindeer aldosterone profile in hypertension.
17	angiotensin induced sodium excretion patterns in cirrhosis role of renal prostaglandins	Angiotensin induced sodium excretion patterns in the role of renal prostaglandins in cirrhosis.
17	light dependent delta ph and membrane potential changes in halobacterial vesicles coupled to sodium transport	Light-dependent delta ph and membrane potential changes in halobacterial sodium transport-coupled vesicles.
17	pediatric aspects of essential hypertension	Pediatric aspects of essential hypertension.
17	cardiovascular effects of chronic intraventricular administration of angiotensin ii in dogs	Cardiovascular effects of apos; chronic intraventricular administration of angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	dexamethasone hypertension in rats	Acute dexamethasone hypertension in rats.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone secretion	Dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone release.
17	urinary excretion of calcium following an oral calcium loading test in healthy children	Urinary calcium excretion following calcium poisoning; oral calcium loading test in healthy children.
17	transfer of urea sodium and chloride across the perfused human placenta	D'apos; urea sodium and chloride through the human perfused placenta.
17	amino acid dependent sodium transport in plasma membrane vesicles from rat liver	Amino acid dependent sodium transport in plasma membrane vesicles from rat liver.
17	effects of acth on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded timolol maleate treated rats stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	Effects of apo; acth on the glomerular area of rats treated with stereologous sodium-loaded timolol maleate and plasma hormones.
17	plasma cryoactivated renin and active renin in diabetes mellitus	Plasma cryoactivation of renin and renin in diabetes mellitus.
17	reversible acute renal failure from combined triamterene and indomethacin a study in healthy subjects	Reversible acute renal failure due to combination of triamterene and indomethacin in healthy subjects.
17	urine dopamine in normal and hypertensive pregnancies	Urinary dopamine in normal and hypertensive pregnancies.
17	hormonal contraception and hypertension	Hormonal contraception and hypertension.
17	evidence for a raised concentration of a circulating sodium transport inhibitor in essential hypertension	Evidence of increased concentration of sodium transport inhibitor in essential hypertension.
17	long term effects of captopril on cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of aortic smooth muscle from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Long-term effects of captopril on cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of aortic smooth muscle in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	synthesis and migration of proteins and glycoproteins in juxtaglomerular cells of sodium deficient rats an ultrastructural radioautographic study	The synthesis and migration of proteins and glycoproteins in juxtaglomerular cells from sodium-deficient rats were studied by ultrastructural radioautography.
17	an increase in a circulating inhibitor of na k dependent atpase a possible link between salt intake and the development of essential hypertension	An increase in a circulating inhibitor, a drug-dependent apase, a possible link between salt absorption and the development of cholesterol; essential hypertension.
17	exaggerated fractional sodium excretion in hypertension with advanced renal disease the role of renal prostaglandin and kallikrein	Excessive fractional sodium excretion in apo; hypertension with renal disease advances the role of renal and kallikrein prostaglandins.
17	effect of sodium intake on brain angiotensin converting enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of sodium intake on brain angiotensin converting enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 stimulate sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit intestine	Both clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 stimulate sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit intestine.
17	acute hypertension in a nonhuman primate humoral and hemodynamic mechanisms	Acute hypertension in humoral and hemodynamic mechanisms of nonhuman primates.
17	physiological and pharmacological dialysate sodium concentrations	Sodium in physiological and pharmacological dialysates.
17	effect of av3v lesions on development of doca salt hypertension and vascular na pump activity	Effect of av3v lesions on development of vascular pumps; hypertension by doca salt and lapos.
17	effects of chronic sodium depletion on canine brain renin and cathepsin d activities	Effects of chronic sodium depletion on canine cerebral renin and cathepsin d activities.
17	the role of calcium in the control of renin release	The role of calcium in the control of renin release.
17	abnormalities of sodium and h2o handling in chronic obstructive lung disease	Defects in sodium and h2o handling in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
17	responses of active and inactive plasma renin and changes in urinary kallikrein and plasma prekallikrein to various conditions in normal subjects	Reactions of active and inactive plasma renin and changes in urinary kallikrein and plasma prkallikrein under various conditions in normal subjects.
17	determination of the equilibrium dissociation constants and number of glycine binding sites in several areas of the rat central nervous system using a sodium independent system	Determination of apo dissociation constants; equilibrium and number of glycine binding sites in several regions of the rat central nervous system using a sodium independent system.
17	influence of the renin angiotensin system in the renal haemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation in the rat	L' influence of the renin vascular system; renin angiotensin in renal hemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation in the rat.
17	sodium efflux in rabbit myocardium relationship to sodium calcium exchange	Sodium efflux in rabbit myocardial relationship to sodium salt exchange.
17	inter relationship of sympathetic nervous system and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in three renin subgroups of borderline and persistent essential hypertension	Relationship of sympathetic nervous system to aldosterone system in apos; angiotensin renin in three under-kidney groups in apos; limiting and persistent essential hypertension.
17	a case of normoreninemic normotensive primary aldosteronism associated with essential hypertension and nephrocalcinosis	Cases of normosenemal primary aldosteronism associated with essential hypertension and nephrocalcinosis.
17	sodium channel sodium pump and sodium calcium exchange activities in synaptosomal plasma membrane vesicles	Sodium channel pump and sodium calcium exchange in synaptosomal plasma membrane vesicles.
17	characteristics of calcium and sodium transport in the synaptosomes and subsynaptosomal structures of the brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Characteristics of calcium and sodium transport in the synaptosomes and structures under-ynaptosomal of the brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the effect of dietary sodium on the blood pressure response to dopamine infusion in the conscious rat	L' effect of dietary sodium on the blood pressure response to dopamine infusion in conscious rat.
17	attenuated pressure natriuresis in hypertensive rats	Lighter pressure natriuresis in hypertensive rats.
17	volume and vasoconstriction in experimental renovascular hypertension	Effect of renascular hypertension on vasoconstriction and volume.
17	the role of urinary pge2 and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the pathogenesis of essential hypertension	The role of urinary pge2 and reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system in the pathogenesis of essential hypertension.
17	effects of a nonpressor analogue of vasopressin on plasma renin activity and salt and water excretion in water loaded anesthetized dogs	The effects of the non-pressive analog of vasopressin on apos; plasma renin activity and apos; ejaculation of apos; water in apos; water loaded anesthetized dogs.
17	exchangeable sodium in rats with goldblatt two kidney one clip hypertension	Sodium ion exchangeable in rats with goldblatt two kidney one clip hypertension.
17	renal function and sympathetic activity during mental stress in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal function and sympathetic activity during mental stress in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	whole body measurements of sodium turnover in offspring of patients with sustained essential hypertension	Sodium turnover in apo; whole organism in progeny of patients with sustained essential hypertension.
17	formation and activation of renin in vivo	Formation and activation of renin in vivo.
17	plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein in normal subjects in response to hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or aldosterone administration	Plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein in normal subjects in response to d' hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or d' aldosterone.
17	gastric potential difference a reliable index of mucosal integrity	The gastric potential difference a reliable index of mucosal integrity.
17	changes in the rate of dopamine synthesis in the posterior pituitary during dehydration and rehydration relationship to plasma sodium concentrations	Changes in the rate of dopamine synthesis in the posterior pituitary during the relationship between dehydration and rehydration and plasma sodium concentrations.
17	use of captopril to estimate renin angiotensin aldosterone activity in the pathophysiology of chronic heart failure	L' use of captopril to estimate apos; aldosterone activity of the apos; angiotensin renin in the pathophysiology of the apos; chronic heart failure.
17	calcium and renin release inhibition of low sodium induced renin secretion by high calcium concentration in rat kidney perfusion	Low renin secretion was induced by calcium and renin inhibition of renin secretion induced by high calcium concentration in rat renal perfusion.
17	hydroosmotic response of collecting tubules to adh or camp at reduced peritubular sodium	Hydroosmotic response of collecting tubules to adhesion or encampment at reduced peritubular sodium concentration.
17	evidence for coupled sodium hydrogen exchange in the rat superficial proximal convoluted tubule	Evidence of a coupled sodium hydrogen exchange in the rat superficial proximal convoluted tubule.
17	study of sodium bromide in human volunteers with special emphasis on the endocrine system	Study of sodium bromide in human volunteers with emphasis on the endocrine system.
17	the problem of sodium metabolism in chronic kidney failure	The problem of sodium metabolism in chronic renal failure.
17	sodium and chloride transport in the isolated intestine of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	Transport of sodium and chloride in the isolated intestine of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l.
17	sodium retention in rats with cadmium induced hypertension	Sodium retention in rats treated with cadmium induced high blood pressure.
17	renal response to angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition	Renal response to apo; apo-inhibition; apo-converting enzyme; angiotensin.
17	catecholamines sodium and renin in unilateral renal hypertension in man	Sodium and renin catecholamines in unilateral renal hypertension in men.
17	trimethaphan induced hypotension effect on renal function	Trimethaphane induced a hypotension effect on renal function.
17	transport of beta hydroxy beta methyl glutarate and beta hydroxbutyrate by renal brushborder membrane vesicles	The transport of beta @-@hydroxy beta-methyl glutarate and beta-hydroxbutyrate through the membrane vesicles of the brush border membrane.
17	actions of angiotensin ii on the isolated spontaneously hypertensive rat kidney	L' action of apos; angiotensin ii on the isolated spontaneously hypertensive rat kidney was demonstrated.
17	role of prostaglandins in the aldosterone response to acth in sodium depleted human subjects	The role of prostaglandins in the aldosterone response to apos; acth in human subjects has been diminished.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone and kallikrein kinin systems in the control of fluid and electrolyte metabolism renal function and arterial blood pressure	Role of the renin systems-angiotensin-aldosterone and kallikrein-kinin in the control of the renal function and arterial blood pressure.
17	angiotensin production and metabolism in sheep	Production and metabolism of sheep angiotensin.
17	the renin angiotensin system and hypertension	The renin angiotensin system and high blood pressure.
17	modification of nerve membrane sodium channels by the insecticide pyrethroids	Modification of nerve membrane sodium channels by pyrethroid insecticide.
17	a method for determination of human urinary inactive kallikrein prekallikrein	Determination method for the determination of human kallikrein inactive in urine.
17	hormones salt hypertension and the interstitium is the interstitium the missing link	Hormones salt the hypertension and the interstium is the apos; interstium the missing link.
17	45ca fluxes in isolated toad bladder epithelial cells effects of agents which alter water or sodium transport	The 45ca fluxes in isolated toad bladder epithelial cells affect the effects of agents that modify l' water or sodium transport.
17	effect of chronic and acute changes in sodium balance on the urinary excretion of prostaglandins e2 and f2 alpha in patients with essential hypertension	Effect of chronic and acute changes in apo; sodium balance on apo; urinary excretion of prostaglandins e2 and f2 alpha in patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	is the renin angiotensin aldosterone system involved in the sodium retention in the nephrotic syndrome	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone is involved in the sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome.
17	effect of sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration on hexose absorption by the rat jejunum in vivo further evidence of two transport mechanisms	The effect of sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration on the apos; absorption of apos; hexose by the rat jejunum in vivo confirms the apos; existence of two transport mechanisms.
17	blood pressure plasma osmolarity and oedema in pregnancy	Oedema and plasma osmolarity of blood pressure during pregnancy.
17	water and sodium excretion in unilaterally denervated normal and sodium depleted anesthetized rats before and after plasma volume repletion	Sodium and water excretion in unilaterally denervated normal and sodium-depleted anesthetized rats before and after plasma volume replication.
17	effect of forebrain lesions on response to chronic intraventricular angiotensin ii	Effect of forebrain lesions on response to chronic intraventricular angiotensin ii.
17	sodium retention and salt appetite following deoxycorticosterone in hamsters	Sodial retention and salt appetite after deoxycorticosterone in hamsters.
17	estimating dietary sodium intake in individuals receiving a randomly fluctuating intake	Estimation of dietary sodium intake in individuals receiving a variable randomized intake.
17	dietary sodium restriction for mild hypertension in general practice	Sodic restriction for mild hypertension in general practice.
17	ultrastructure of the perfused rat epididymis effect of luminal sodium ion concentration	Ultrastructure of the perfused rat epididymis effect of luminal sodium ion concentration.
17	two techniques to improve adherence to dietary sodium restriction in the treatment of hypertension	Two techniques to improve appetite; adherence to dietary sodium restriction in the treatment of apo; hypertension.
17	transmembrane na and ca2 electrochemical gradients in cardiac muscle and their relationship to force development	Transmembrane na and ca2 electrochemical gradients in cardiac muscle and their relationship to force development.
17	enhancement of calcium current during digitalis inotropy in mammalian heart positive feed back regulation by intracellular calcium	Increased calcium current during inotropy of digitalin in the positive mammalian heart versus regulation by intracellular calcium.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone responsiveness to angiotensin ii with changes in sodium intake	Dopaminergic modification of apos reactivity; aposaldosterone; angiotensin ii with changes in apos; sodium absorption.
17	renal function in cystic fibrosis with special reference to the renal sodium handling	The renal function in cystic fibrosis, especially with respect to the handling of renal sodium.
17	sodium balance during development of hypertension in the spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	L' sodium balance during development of the apos; hypertension in the spontaneously hypertensive rat narrows.
17	effects of dietary sodium on brain angiotensin ii receptors in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effects of dietary sodium on cerebral angiotensin ii receptors in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	renal structural and functional changes and sodium balance in hypothyroid rats	Renal structural and functional changes and sodium balance in hypothyroid rats.
17	respiration and sodium transport in rabbit urinary bladder	Respiration and sodium transport in rabbit bladder.
17	molecular action of aldosterone	The molecular action of l' aldosterone.
17	the effect of dialysate sodium concentration on body fluid compartment volume plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in chronic hemodialysis patients	The effect of dialysate sodium concentration on plasma fluid volume renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in chronic hemodialysis patients.
17	effect of sodium gradient on calcium uptake by plasma membranes of the myometrium	Effect of sodium gradient on calcium uptake by plasma membranes of myometrium.
17	role of renin angiotensin system in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	The role of the angiotensin renin system in apos; glucocorticoid hypertension in rats.
17	evidence that some mechanism other than the renin system causes sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome	Evidence that a mechanism other than the renin system causes sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome.
17	remodeling of the rat aortic endothelial layer during experimental hypertension changes in replication rate cell density and surface morphology	Endothelial layer remodeling of the rat aorta during apo changes; experimental hypertension in replication rate cell density and surface morphology.
17	influence of sodium on the alpha 2 adrenergic receptor system of human platelets role for intraplatelet sodium in receptor binding	L' influence of sodium on the alpha 2 adrenergic receptor system of human platelets is involved in intraplatelet sodium binding to receptors.
17	prevention of malignant hypertension in salt loaded s dahl rats with the calcium antagonist nifedipine	Prevention of lacidosis; malignant hypertension in sahl rats with lacidosis; calcium antagonist nifedipine.
17	exchangeable sodium plasma renin activity and blood pressure changes during the development of 2 kidney 1 clip hypertension and after subsequent contralateral nephrectomy	L' exchangeable sodium plasma renin activity and blood pressure changes during stroke development; hypertension by 2 renal clips 1 and after subsequent contralateral nephrectomy.
17	intracellular na and ca2 activities in aortic smooth muscle cells from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Intracellular Na- and Ca2-activities in aortic smooth muscle cells from spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	effects of angiotensin ii on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded dexamethasone treated rats administered or not with maintenance doses of acth stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	In rats treated with dexamethasone, the effects of angiotensin ii on the glomerular area of rats treated with dexamethasone and receiving or not receiving maintenance doses of the stereology of the apos; aceth and plasma concentrations of the hormones.
17	rate of action of anemonia sulcata toxin ii on sodium channels in myelinated nerve fibres	Dapos; action of Dapos toxin; anemonia sulcata ii on sodium channels in myelinated nerve fibers.
17	effect of sodium intake on biosynthesis of renin	The effect of sodium on the biosynthesis of renin.
17	the role of the cellular sodium pump in human granulopoiesis in vitro	The role of the cellular sodium pump in human granulopoiesis in vitro.
17	chronology of the sodium hypothesis and hypertension	Chronology of apos; sodium hypothesis and apos; hypertension.
17	dietary sodium and essential hypertension some myths hopes and truths	Dietary sodium and lapos; essential hypertension some hopes and truths myths.
17	the sodium currents of nerve under voltage clamp as heterogeneous kinetics a model that is consistent with possible kinetic behavior	Sodium currents of the nerve under tension clamp as heterogeneous kinetics a model that is consistent with possible kinetic behavior.
17	sodium and chloride transport across the isolated rabbit ciliary body	Transport of sodium and chloride through isolated rabbit ciliary body.
17	active and inactive renin release from rabbit kidney cortex slices effect of sodium concentration and of furosemide	Activated and inactive renin release by rabbit renal cortex, effect of sodium concentration and furosemide on renal cortical slices.
17	sodium needs of infants and children with ileostomy	The sodium requirements of infants and ileostomized children.
17	the feedback regulation of angiotensinogen production by components of the renin angiotensin system	Feedback on the regulation of angiotensinogen production by components of the apos system; renin angiotensin.
17	effects of renal sympathectomy on sodium and water excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effects of renal sympathectomy on apos; sodium and water excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats subject to stroke.
17	contrasting renal effects of different antihypertensive agents in hypertensive rats with bilaterally constricted renal arteries	Comparison of the renal effects of different antihypertensive drugs in hypertensive rats with bilateral renal arterial constriction.
17	interactions of cocaine and cocaine congeners with sodium channels	Interactions of cocaine and cocaine congeners with sodium channels.
17	olfactory contributions to dehydration induced anorexia in weanling rats	Olfactory contribution to dehydration induced anorexia in weaned rats.
17	sodium neural interactions in the development of spontaneous hypertension	Neural interactions in the development of hypertension.
17	plasma catecholamines and cardiovascular responses during converting enzyme inhibition in normotensive and hypertensive man	Plasma catecholamines and cardiovascular responses during apo; inhibition of conversion enzymes in normotensive and hypertensive men.
17	dietary sodium and renal alpha 2 adrenergic receptors in dahl hypertensive rats	Dietary sodium and renal alpha 2 receptors in dahl hypertensive rats.
17	natriuresis and renal na k atpase activity in kidneys of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal natriuresis and na k atpase activity in kidneys of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the relation of genetics to essential hypertension a review	The relationship between genetics and blood pressure; essential hypertension.
17	estrogens and hypertension	Estrogen and hypertension!
17	effect of anteroventral third ventricle lesions on vascular sodium pump activity in two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Effect of preventral third ventricular lesions on apos; vascular sodium pump activity in apos; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by sodium sequestration role of angiotensin ii	Stimulation of apos biosynthesis; aldosterone by sodium sequestration of apos; angiotensin ii.
17	reduced ratio of active to total urinary kallikrein in essential hypertension	Reduction of active to total urinary kallikrein ratio in essential hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin e2 and kallikrein excretion in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	L' prostaglandin e2 and kallikrein urinary excretion in apo; glucocorticoid hypertension in rats.
17	renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast medium the role of sodium balance and the renin angiotensin system	Renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast medium, role of the apos; sodium balance and the apos system; angiotensin renin.
17	relations between the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and urinary elimination of sodium study of healthy subjects in clinostatism and on a sodium free diet	Relations between the reindeer angiotensin aldosterone system and urinary elimination of sodium study of healthy subjects in clinostatism and on a sodium free diet.
17	changes in plasma sodium concentration in women at the menopause	Changes in plasma sodium concentration in postmenopausal women.
17	pathologic effects in rodents exposed to sodium combustion products	Pathological effects in rodents exposed to sodium combustion products.
17	effect of sodium deficiency on beta melanocyte stimulating hormone stimulation of aldosterone in isolated rat adrenal cells	Effect of sodium deficiency on stimulation of apos; aldosterone by apos; beta-enhancing hormone-melanocytes in isolated rat adrenal cells.
17	modulated anticonvulsant block of sodium channels in nerve and muscle	Anti-vulsing modulable block of sodium channels in nerves and muscles.
17	changes of alanine sodium co transport during maturation of xenopus laevis oocytes	Changes in sodium alanine transport during maturation of xenopus laevis oocytes.
17	dopaminergic blockade of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system effect of high and low sodium intakes	L&apos dopaminergic blockade; effect of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone from high and low sodium intakes on the renin system-aldosterone.
17	reversal of renovascular hypertension	Inversion of l' hypertension reno-vascular.
17	inhibition of guinea pig renal na k atpase by normotensive human plasma effects of a high sodium diet	Lapos; inhibition of guinea pig renal na katpase by normotensive plasma effects of apos; a high sodium diet in humans.
17	responses to furosemide in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	Effect of furosemide on human immunodeficiency virus infection.
17	decrease of angiotensin sensitivity after bed rest and strongly sodium restricted diet in pregnancy	Reduced angiotensin sensitivity after bed rest and a sharply reduced sodium diet during pregnancy.
17	interaction of renal beta 1 adrenoceptors and prostaglandins in reflex renin release	Interaction of renal beta 1 adrenoceptors and prostaglandins in reflex renin release.
17	further observations of aldosterone response in barnacle muscle fibers	D' further observations of response to aldosterone in barnacle muscle fibers have been made.
17	the renin angiotensin system and drinking in the euryhaline flounder platichthys flesus	The renin angiotensin system and drink in the plea euryhaline platichthys flesus platichthys platichthys flesus.
17	structural and functional studies of the adrenal zona glomerulosa in sodium depleted and sodium loaded sheep	Structural and functional studies of the adrenal glomerular zone in sodium-depleted sheep and sodium-loaded sheep.
17	metabolic regulation of apical sodium permeability in toad urinary bladder in the presence and absence of aldosterone	Metabolic regulation of apical sodium permeability in the toad bladder in the presence and absence of aldosterone.
17	effects of tibalosine a new alpha adrenoceptor antagonist in essential hypertension	The effects of tibalosin, a new antagonist of alpha-adrenoceptors, on the apos; essential hypertension.
17	precursors of hypertension a review	Early signs of hypertension were examined.
17	renal function in pregnant rats with two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Acute renal function in pregnant rats with apo; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	chemical renal medullectomy and experimental hypertension	You know, chemical renal medullectomy and experimental hypertension.
17	aldosterone response to renin angiotensin acth hemorrhage and sodium depletion in a freshwater teleost catostomus macrocheilus	Aldosterone response to reindeer angiotensin acth hemorrhage and sodium depletion in a freshwater teleostomus catostomus macrocheilus.
17	defect in the sodium modulated tissue responsiveness to angiotensin ii in essential hypertension	Sodium-modulated tissue responsiveness to angiotensin ii in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	comparison of sodium and urea as indicators of pulmonary vascular permeability	Comparison of sodium and urea as indicators of pulmonary vascular permeability.
17	intracellular na and ca2 in aortic smooth muscle cells after enzymatic isolation in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Intracellular Ca2 and Na in aortic smooth muscle cells after enzymatic isolation in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the influence of cytoplasmic sodium concentration on the stoichiometry of the sodium pump	The influence of cytoplasmic sodium concentration on the stoichiometry of the sodium pump.
17	canine neonatally induced coarctation hypertension in the second year variably hyperresponsive plasma renin activity	Canine neonatal induced coarctation hypertension in the second year of birth; plasma renin activity variably hyperactive.
17	sodium chloride transport in the medullary thick ascending limb of henle s loop evidence for a sodium chloride cotransport system in plasma membrane vesicles	Sodium chloride transport in the medullary thick ascending limb of the hen loop indicates the existence of a sodium chloride cotransport system in the plasma membrane vesicles.
17	dogs with experimental cirrhosis of the liver but without intrahepatic hypertension do not retain sodium or form ascites	Dogs with experimental cirrhosis of the liver, but without intrahepatic hypertension, do not retain sodium and ascites.
17	the effect of sodium intake on the blood pressure related to age and sex	The effect of sodium intake on blood pressure as a function of age and sex.
18	biometric study of spleen and liver weights in africans and europeans with special reference to endemic malaria	Biometric study of spleen and liver weights in Africans and Europeans, particularly with respect to endemic malaria.
18	spleens and holoendemic malaria in west new guinea	Spleen and holoendemic malaria in West-New Guinea.
18	a study of the structure of splenic sinuses in man and in the albino rat with the light microscope and the electron microscope	Study of the structure of splenic sinuses in humans and in albino rats by light and electron microscopy.
18	splenectomy in blood dyscrasia	Splenectomy in blood dyscrash.
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced diphosphopyridine nucleotide cytochrome c reductase cytochrome c oxidase and succinic dehydrogenase in the rat and guinea pig	Intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced diphosphopyridine nucleotide cytochrome c reductase cytochrome c oxidase and succinic dehydrogenase in rats and guinea pigs.
18	method for the study of antigenicity of homologous whole spleen cells in mice	Dapos method; mouse study of antigenicity of whole homologous spleen cells.
18	studies on the adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on antibody formation iii histologic response of the rabbit spleen to a single injection of a purified protein antigen	Immunosorbent studies; adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on antibody formation; histological response of rabbit spleen to a single injection of a purified protein antigen.
18	studies on the runting syndrome in newborn mice	Studies on the running syndrome in mice new-nées.
18	the cardio active principle in spleen	The cardio principle is active in the spleen.
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen ii some properties and the distribution of ribonuclease in rat spleen	Intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen ii certain properties and distribution of ribonuclease in rat spleen.
18	the site of synthesis of the 19s gamma globulins in dysgammaglobulinemia	The site of synthesis of the gamma globulins of the 19th century in dysgammaglobulinemia.
18	an action of 5 hydroxytryptamine on adrenaline receptors	An action of 5 hydroxytryptamine on d&apos adrenaline receptors.
18	humoral aspects of the immune response to homografts ii relationship between the hemagglutinating and cytotoxic activities of certain isoimmune sera	Humoral aspects of the immune response to homografts ii relationship between hemagglutinating and cytotoxic activities of certain isoimmune sera.
18	role of the thymus in immune ractions in rats i the immunologic response to bovine serum albumin antibody formation arthus reactivity and delayed hypersensitivity in rats thymectomized or splenectomized at various times after birth	The role of the thymus in the immune responses in rats he immunological response to antibody formation; bovine serum albumin; reactivity to l' arthus and l' delayed hypersensitivity in thymectomized or splenectomized rats at various times after birth.
18	gamma globulin and antibody formation in vitro iii induction of secondary response at different intervals after the primary the role of secondary nodules in the preparation for the secondary response	The formation of gamma globulin and antibody in vitro iii induction of the secondary response at different intervals after primary the role of secondary nodules in the preparation of the secondary response.
18	the role of liver and spleen in the metabolism of intravenously injected fat in rabbits	The role of the liver and spleen in the metabolism of intravenously injected fat in rabbits.
18	actions of bretylium and guanethidine on the uptake and release of 3h noradrenaline	Effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the apos; absorption and release of 3 h of noradrenaline.
18	plasma protein formation in vitro by tissues from mice infected with staphylococci	Plasma protein formation in vitro by tissues of mice infected with staphylococci.
18	passive transfer of transplantation immunity i tritiated lymphoid cells ii lymphoid cells in millipore chambers	Passive transfer of apo; transplant immunity i tritiated lymphoid cells ii lymphoid cells in millipore chambers.
18	homograft tolerance in mice use of urethan and sublethal irradiation	Mouse homograft tolerance to urethane and apo; sublethal irradiation.
18	immunological unresponsiveness to sensitization with simple chemical compounds a search for antibody absorbing depots of allergen	Immunologic inability to respond to sensitization with simple chemical compounds a search for antibody absorbing deposits of allergens.
18	the lymphod tissues and immune responses of neonatally thymectomized mice bearing thymus tissue in millipore diffusion chambers	The lymphoid tissues and immune responses of novel-nées thymectomized mice carrying thymus in millipore diffusion chambers.
18	antibody plaque formation by normal mouse spleen cell cultures exposed in vitro to rna from immune mice	Plate formation; antibody by normal mouse spleen cell cultures exposed in vitro to immune mouse rna.
18	immunity and susceptibility toward cheek pouch transplants of a mouse leukemia	Immunity and susceptibility to transplantation of the cheek; leukemia in mice.
18	pigment deposition in viscera associated with prolonged chlorpromazine therapy	Pigment deposition in viscera associated with prolonged chlorpromazine therapy.
18	spleen colony formation in anemic mice of genotype ww	Spleen colony formation in anemic mice genotype ww.
18	culture of the cytopathic area surrounding virulent cells of bacillus anthracis in mouse spleen	Culture of the cytopathic region surrounding virulent cells of anthracis bacillus in mouse spleen.
18	immune mechanisms in parabiosis intoxication	Immune mechanisms of parabiosis intoxication.
18	the regeneration of f1 host cell spleen and thymus at ectopic sites in f1 animals induced by implantation of parental spleen and thymus	Spleen and thymus regeneration of f1 cell; host at ectopic sites in f1 animals induced by parental spleen and thymus implantation.
18	production of immunological tolerance in mice after repeated injections of disrupted spleen cells	The development of immunological tolerance in mice after repeated injections of disrupted spleen cells.
18	major urinary protein complex of normal mice origin	Major urinary protein complex of normal mouse origin.
18	long term isolation stress in rats	D&apos stress disorder; long-term isolation in rats.
18	malignant lymphomas following allogenic disease transition from an immunological to a neoplastic disorder	Malignant lymphomas as a result of the transition from an allogeneic disease to an immunologic to a neoplastic disorder.
18	experimental runt disease in mice caused by salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen	Experimental salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen disease; avorton in mice.
18	transplantation tolerance induced in adult mice by protein overloading of donors	Transplant tolerance induced in adult mice by protein overload in the donor.
18	passive transfer of adjuvant arthritis by lymph node or spleen cells	Passive transmission of epos; adjuvant arthritis by lymph nodes or spleen cells.
18	congenital anomalies induced in hamster embryos with h 1 virus	Birth defects induced in hamster embryos carrying h1 virus.
18	further studies of the stimulation of dna synthesis in cultures of spleen cell suspensions by homologous cells in inbred strains of mice and rats	D' other studies on the stimulation of synthesis of l' DNA in cultures of splenic cell suspensions by homologous cells in inbred strains of mice and rats.
18	immunologic incompetence of immunologically runted animals	Immunological incompetence of animals on a diet; immunology.
18	the differing survival of normal and sensitized spleen cells transferred to allogeneic hosts	Differential survival of normal and sensitized spleen cells was transferred to allogeneic hosts.
18	studies on antigenicity the relationship between in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of hapten polylysine conjugates and their antigenicities in guinea pigs	Apos; antigenicity studies, the relationship between in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of d' haptene polylysine conjugates and their antigenicity in guinea pigs.
18	studies on the mechanism of action of riley virus 3 replication of riley s plasma enzyme elevating virus in vitro	Studies on the mechanism of action of riley virus 3 replication by riley plasma enzyme increase virus in vitro.
18	production of runt disease in tolerant mice by the injection of syngeneic lymphoid cells	The production of the disease of lupus; aborton in mice tolerant of lupus; injection of syngenic lymphoid cells.
18	cellular localization of immunoglobulins with different allotypic specificities in rabbit lymphoid tissues	Dapos cell localization; immunoglobulins with different allotypic specificities in rabbit lymphoid tissue.
18	the interaction of donor and host lymphoid cells in the pathogenesis of renal cortical destruction induced by a local graft versus host reaction	L' interaction of donor and donor lymphoid cells; host in the pathogenesis of renal cortical destruction induced by a local graft versus host reaction.
18	in vitro studies on radiation lymphoid recovery of mouse spleen	Lymphoid recovery in vitro studies using mouse spleen irradiation.
18	antibody formation in vitro by separated spleen cells inhibition by actinomycin or chloramphenicol	Antibody formation in vitro by the inhibition of splenic cells separated by either actinomycin or chloramphenicol.
18	delta aminolevulinate dehydratase activity in mice with hereditary anemia	Delta aminolevulinate dehydratase activity in mice with hereditary anemia.
18	the intracellular localization of pituitary thyrotropic hormone	Intracellular localization of pituitary thyrotropic hormone.
18	the mechanism of the pressor responses to physostigmine in the rat and their modification by mebutamate and amylobarbitone	The mechanism of pressor responses to physostigmine in the rat and their modification by mebutamate and l' amylobarbitone.
18	spleen as a production site for erythropoietin	The spleen as a production site of epos; erythropoietin.
18	antibody synthesizing cells appearance after secondary antigenic stimulation in vitro	Antibody synthesizing apos; cell appearance after secondary antigenic stimulation in vitro.
18	template activity of rna from antibody producing tissues	Dapos model; antibody producing tissue rna activity.
18	the release of specific bactericidal antibodies by endotoxin	Release of specific bactericidal antibodies by endotoxin.
18	correlation of succinate metabolism and virulence in salmonella typhimurium	Correlation of succinate metabolism and virulence in Salmonella typhimurium.
18	primary macroglobulinemia death due to mesenteric vascular occlusion with gas in the portal venous system	Death of primary macroglobulinemia due to mesenteric vascular occlusion with gas in the portal venous system.
18	humoral and cellular aspects of the immune response to the somatic antigen of salmonella enteritidis	Humoral and cellular aspects of the immune response to the somatic antigen of salmonella enteritidis.
18	homograft immunity in pregnancy the placental transfer of cytotoxic antibody in rabbits	Placentental transfer of cytotoxic antibody in rabbits is homograft immunity during pregnancy.
18	the survival of pasteurella pestis in materials preserved by solid carbon dioxide dry ice	The survival of pasteurella pestis in materials preserved by solid carbon dioxide dry ice.
18	an electron microscope study of lymphatic tissue in runt disease	An electron microscope study of lymphatic tissue in avorton.
18	hog cholera 3 investigation of the complement fixation test for the detection of the virus in swine tissue	Swine cholera research 3 on the complement fixation test for detection of the virus in swine tissue.
18	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 19s and 7s antibody response	Antibody synthesis at the cellular level induced suppression of the 19s and 7s antibody response.
18	stimulation of nonspecific resistance to infection by a crude cell wall preparation from mycobacterium phlei	Stimulation of nonspecific resistance to apos; infection by rudimentary cell wall preparation of mycobacterium phlei.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice 3 induction of membranous glomerulonephritis in young mice by the transplantation of spleen cells from old mice	Auto disease-immune in nzbbl3 mice; membrane-bound glomerulonephritis in young mice by the transplantation of old mouse spleen cells.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture i morphological evolution of lymph node and spleen cells in culture	Production of antibody by cells in culture and morphological evolution of lymph nodes and spleen cells in culture.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of antibody production local hemolysis in gum by cells obtained from long term culture	Antibody production by tissue cultured cells ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of production of apo; local hemolysis antibody in gum by cells obtained from apo; long-term culture.
18	the effects of antigens and of phytohemagglutinin on rabbit spleen cell suspensions	The effects of antigens and phytohemagglutinin on rabbit spleen cell suspensions.
18	chronic infection of rodents by machupo virus	Chronic infection of rodents by the machupo virus.
18	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis ii mouse protection studies	Heat-labile antigen of Salmonella enteritidis ii mouse protection studies.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella v relationship of strain oxidation rate of i erythritol to strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of the relationship between the genus brucella v and the rate of apos; leaf oxidation; erythritol and strain virulence in guinea pigs.
18	homograft target cells contact destruction in vitro by immune macrophages	Homograft target cells are destroyed by in vitro contact with immune macrophages.
18	granulocytosis promoting extract of mouse tumor tissue partial purification	Apos-promoting granulocytosis; partial purification of mouse tumor tissue extract.
18	lymphoma growth in vivo electronic discrimination between tumor and stroma cells	Lymphoma growth in vivo electron discrimination between tumor cells and stromal cells.
18	antibody synthesis initiated in vitro by paired explants of spleen and thymus	Antibody synthesis is initiated in vitro by paired explants of spleen and thymus.
18	immunological competence alteration by whole body x irradiation and shielding of selected lymphoid tissues	Alteration of immunological competence by whole body irradiation and shielding of certain lymphoid tissues.
18	increased incidence of lymphoma after injections of mice with cells differing at weak histocompatibility loci	Increased incidence of lymphoma after apo; injection of different cells into mice at apo loci; low histocompatibility.
18	immunization against rauscher mouse leukemia with tissue culture material	Mice leukemia immunization to help with tissue culture materials.
18	antagonistic effects of humoral isoantibodies on the in vitro cytotoxicity of immune lymphoid cells	The antagonistic effects of humoral isoantibodies on the in vitro cytotoxicity of immune lymphoid cells.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice i pathology and pathogenesis of a model system of spontaneous glomerulonephritis	Auto-immune disease in nzb nzb mice apos pathology and pathogenesis; a model system of spontaneous glomerulonephritis.
18	electron microscopy of listeria monocytogenes infected mouse spleen	Electron microscopy of Listeria monocytogenes infected mouse spleen.
18	quantitative studies of the adoptive immunological memory in mice i an age dependent barrier to syngeneic transplantation	Quantitative studies of the adoptive immune memory in mice i a disease-dependent barrier; age at syngene transplantation.
18	ontogeny of the immune response i the development of the follicular antigen trapping mechanism	The ontogeny of the immune response i the development of the follicle antigen trapping mechanism.
18	effect of pyridoxine deficiency on nucleic acid metabolism in the rat	Effect of pyridoxine deficiency on nucleic acid metabolism in the rat.
18	two cases of clostridial hepatitis	Two cases of clostridial hepatitis.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i the measurement of hydrolytic activities in whole homogenates	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i the measurement of hydrolytic activities in whole homogenates.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue ii intracellular distribution of acid hydrolases	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue ii The intracellular distribution of acid hydrolases.
18	differentiation and functional expression of potential antibody producing cells in the presence of chloramphenicol	Differentiation and functional expression of potential antibiotic-producing cells in the presence of chloramphenicol.
18	quantitation of transplantation immunity i method	Quantification of infection; transplantation immunity i.
18	cellular sites of synthesis of rabbit immunoglobulins during primary response to diptheria toxoid freund s adjuvant	Cellular sites of synthesis of rabbit immunoglobulins during primary response to l' adjuvant diphtheria anatoxin freund adjuvant.
18	studies on immunologic reconstitution of thymectomized mice	Studies on the immunological reconstitution of thymectomized mice and mice.
18	virus induced murine leukemia its inhibition and suppression by serum containing erythropoietin	The virus induced murine leukemia inhibition and suppression by serum containing lapos; erythropoietin.
18	high concentration of injected titanium dioxide in abdominal lymph nodes	High concentration of titanium dioxide injected into abdominal lymph nodes.
18	puromycin induced necrosis of crypt cells of the small intestine of mouse	Pubromycin caused necrosis of the cryptic cells of the small intestine of mice.
18	spleen cell proliferation in response to homologous antigens studied in congenic resistant strains of mice	Spleen cell proliferation in response to homologous antigens studied in strains of congener-resistant mice.
18	primary antibody response in organ cultures	Primary immune response in organ cultures.
18	immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed antibody plaque formation to shigella antigen by spleen cells from tolerant mice	Immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed plaque formation of anti-cellular antibody; shigella antigen by tolerant mouse spleen cells.
18	immunofluorescent antibody studies of a murine leukemia virus	Immunofluorescent antibody studies of mouse leukemia virus.
18	the incidence of palpable liver and spleen in the postpartum period	L' incidence of palpable liver and spleen in the postnatal period.
18	loss of thymus distinctive serological characteristics in mice under certain conditions	Loss of distinctive thymus serological characteristics in mice under certain conditions.
18	scanning with macroaggregates of radioiodinated human serum albumin as an adjunct to celiac arteriography a preliminary communication	Scanning with apo macroaggregates; radioiodinated human serum albumin as a complement to apo; celiac arteriography a preliminary communication.
18	virus induced erythropoiesis in hypertransfused polycythemic mice	The virus induced erythropoiesis in hypertransfused polycythemic mice.
18	heavy chain subclasses of human gamma g globulin serum distribution and cellular localization	Under-heavy-chain classes of human gamma-globulin distribution and cellular localization.
18	serum alpha globulin fraction survival and recovery effect in irradiated mice	Alpha globulin serum fraction survival and recovery effect in irradiated mice.
18	hemopoietic spleen colony studies ii erythropoiesis	Hematopoietic spleen colony studies ii erythropoiesis.
18	histocompatibility antigen transfer in utero tolerance in progeny and sensitization in mother	Histocompatibility in utero transfers tolerance in progeny and sensitizes the mother.
18	immunization with skin isografts taken from tolerant mice	Immunization with skin isografts from tolerant mice.
18	phosphoribosylamidotransferase regulation of activity in virus induced murine leukemia by purine nucleotides	The regulation of l' phosphoribosylamidotransferase activity in virus-induced murine leukemia by purine nucleotides.
18	drug induced tolerance for skin allografts across the h 2 barrier in adult mice	The drug induced tolerance to cutaneous allografts across the h2 barrier in adult mice.
18	tissue specificity of histone phosphorylation	The tissue specificity of histone phosphorylation.
18	primary antibody response in vitro in peritoneal cells	Primary immune response in vitro in peritoneal cells.
18	rabbit lymphoid cells differentiated with respect to alpha gamma and mu heavy polypeptide chains and to allotypic markers aa1 and aa2	The rabbit lymphoid cells differentiate with heavy alpha gamma and mu polypeptide chains and allotypic markers aa1 and aa2.
18	studies on viral plasmacytosis aleutian disease of mink vii infection of mink with dna extracted from diseased spleens	Viral plasmacytosis studies Aleutian disease; mink mink vii infection with mink; DNA extracted from diseased spleen.
18	primary immune response in grafted cells dissociation between the proliferation of activity and the proliferation of cells	The primary immune response in transplanted cells that disassociates from the proliferation of l' cell activity and proliferation.
18	on the nature of transplantation immunity in the adenovirus tumor system	About the nature of apo; transplant immunity in the adenovirus tumour system.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella vi growth stimulation by i erythritol compared with strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of brucella vi growth stimulation by erythritol compared with the virulence of the strain in guinea pigs.
18	chromosome abnormality in rat leukemia induced by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene	Chromosomal abnormality in rat leukemia induced by 712 dimethylbenz a anthracene.
18	murine lymphoma augmented growth in mice with pertussis vaccine induced lymphocytosis	Murine lymphoma increased growth in mice with apos; pertussis vaccine-induced lymphocytosis.
18	lipids of the living coelacanth latimeria chalumnae	The lipids of the living coelacantha latimeria chalumnae.
18	biosynthesis of gamma globulin studies in a cell free system	Cell-free gamma globulin studies in a cell-free system.
18	the influence of cortisone on experimental viral infection 8 suppression by cortisone of interferon formation in mice injected with newcastle disease virus	L' influence of cortisone on experimental suppression of apos; viral infection 8 with cortisone from d&apos formation; interferon in mice injected with Newcastle disease virus.
18	effect of splenectomy on the susceptibility of mice inoculated with diplococcus pneumoniae	The effect of splenectomy on the susceptibility of mice inoculated with diplococcus pneumoniae.
18	the mechanism of action of splenic irradiation in chronic myelogenous leukemia	The mechanism of action of splenic irradiation in chronic myelogenous leukemia.
18	hemopoietic colony forming units in regenerating mouse liver suppression by anticoagulants	Hematopoietic colony-forming units in regenerating mouse liver suppression by anticoagulants.
18	effect of neutral alpha and omega amino acids and basic alpha amino acids on uptake of l histidine by intestinal mucosa testis spleen and kidney in vitro a comparison with effect in brain	Effect of neutral alpha and omega acids and basic alpha amino acids on uptake of l' histidine by the intestinal mucous testis of the spleen and kidney in vitro; comparative effect in brain.
18	improved in vitro survival of normal functional spleen cells	Improved in vitro survival of normal functional spleen cells.
18	role of the thymus in tolerance 3 tolerance to bovine gamma globulin after direct injection of antigen into the shielded thymus of irradiated rats	The role of thymus in tolerance 3 to bovine gamma globulin after direct injection of antigen into the thymus of irradiated rats.
18	the incorporation of tritium from thymidine into proteins of the mouse	L' incorporation of the tritium of thymidine into the protein of the mouse.
18	factors influencing hematopoietic spleen colony formation in irradiated mice i the normal pattern of endogenous colony formation	Factors influencing hematopoietic spleen colony formation in irradiated mice i the normal pattern of endogenous colony formation.
18	ultrastructural localization of antibody in differentiating plasma cells	Ultrastructural localization of antibody in differentiating plasma cells.
18	hemopoietic colony studies v effect of hemopoietic organ stroma on differentiation of pluripotent stem cells	The effect of the stroma of hematopoietic organs on the differentiation of pluripotent stem cells is studied by hematopoietic colonies.
18	similarities between the biochemical actions of cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine	Similarities between the biochemical actions of cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine.
18	antigen binding to cells determination by enzymic fluorogenic group hydrolysis	Antigen binding to cell determination by enzymic hydrolysis of the fluorogenic group.
18	cytological evidence for a relationship between normal hemotopoietic colony forming cells and cells of the lymphoid system	In addition, there is evidence of a relationship between normal hemotopoietic colonies forming cells and cells of the lymphoid system.
18	enhanced erythropoiesis with concomitant diminished granulopoiesis in preirradiated recipient mice evidence for a common stem cell	Increased erythropoiesis and the concomitant decrease in granulopoiesis in preirradiated recipient mice are evidence of apos; the existence of a common stem cell.
18	the use of a non ionic detergent triton wr 1339 to determine rates of triglyceride entry into the circulation of the rat under different physiological conditions	The use of a non-ionic detergent in 1339 to determine the rates of onset; entry of triglycerides into the rat circulation under different physiological conditions.
18	in vitro synthesis of immunoglobulin by rheumatoid synovial membrane	In vitro synthesis of immunoglobulin by the rheumatoid synovial membrane.
18	uptake distribution and binding of beryllium to organelles of the rat liver cell	Distribution of apos; absorption and binding of beryllium to organelles of rat liver cells.
18	the origin and kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	L' origin and kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes.
18	the primary immune response in mice i the enhancement and suppression of hemolysin production by a bacterial endotoxin	The primary immune response in mice; enhancement and suppression of apos production; hemolysin by a bacterial endotoxin.
18	serological analysis of thymus and spleen grafts	Serological analysis of thymus and spleen transplant sites.
18	high dose delay of the immune response effect of actinomycin d on continuation of the immune response in vitro	Delayed high dose of antibody; effect of the immune response of antibody; actinomycin d on the continuation of the immune response in vitro.
18	rejection of renal allografts specific immunologic suppression	Rejection of renal allografts specific immunological suppression.
18	immunosuppression with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Immunosuppression with etapos; acetate of medroxyprogesterone.
18	influence of cellular factors on immune unresponsiveness induced by klebsiella pneumoniae capsular antigen	Influence of cellular factors on the non-immune response induced by klebsiella pneumoniae capsular antigen.
18	the effect of molybdenum on ascorbic acid metabolism in rats	The effect of molybdenum on the metabolism of ascorbic acid in rats.
18	induced sensitization of normal laboratory animals to brucella abortus endotoxin	Induced sensitization of normal laboratory animals to brucella abortus endotoxin.
18	transplantation of marrow to extramedullary sites	Transplantation of marrow to extra-medullary sites.
18	use of 125 i and 51 cr labeled albumin for the measurement of gastrointestinal and total albumin catabolism	Use of 125 i and 51 c labelled albumin for the measurement of gastro-intestinal catabolism and total albumin.
18	recall of immunity in mice vaccinated with salmonella enteritidis or salmonella typhimurium	Reminder of immunity in mice vaccinated with Salmonella enteritidis or typhimurium.
18	purification of the moloney and rauscher murine leukemia viruses by use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems	Purification of moloney and rauscher murine leukemia viruses by zonal ultracentrifuge.
18	in vivo growth and distribution of anthrax bacilli in resistant susceptible and immunized hosts	In vivo growth and distribution of anthrax bacilli in resistant, susceptible and immunized hosts.
18	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid from mammalian tissues	Isolate deoxyribonucleic acid from mammalian tissues.
18	studies on blood capillaries ii transport of ferritin molecules across the wall of muscle capillaries	Studies of blood capillaries ii transport of ferritin molecules through the wall of muscle capillaries.
18	high resolution electron microscopic analysis of the amyloid fibril	High-resolution electron microscopic analysis of the amyloid fibril.
18	depressed cellular formation of antibody to shigella antigens in vitro by spleen cell cultures from unresponsive mice	Rat cell cultures from insensitive mice decreased cell formation of antibody to shigella antigens in vitro.
18	immunologic defenses against metastases impairment by excision of an allotransplanted lymphoma	Immunological defense against apo; metastatic alteration by apo; excision of apo; all-planted lymphoma.
18	asparagine synthetase activity of mouse leukemias	Asparagine synthetase activity in mouse leukemias.
18	a new method for the enumeration of antigen reactive cells responsive to a purified protein antigen	A new method for counting reactive cells with antigen reacting to a purified protein antigen.
18	hemophilia role of organ homografts	The role of the immune system in the development of the immune system.
18	the induction of graft versus host disease in mice treated with cyclophosphamide	Lapos; induction of apos; anti-apos disease graft; host in mice treated with cyclophosphamide.
18	amyloidosis induced in mice by escherichia coli endotoxin	Amyloidosis induced in mice by apos; endotoxin; escherichia coli.
18	the primary immune response in mice ii cellular responses of lymphoid tissue accompanying the enhancement or complete suppression of antibody formation by a bacterial endotoxin	The primary immune response in mice ii cellular responses of lymphoid tissue accompanying the apos; augmentation or complete suppression of antibody formation by bacterial endotoxin.
18	cross protection against salmonella enteritidis infection in mice	Cross-protection against apo; Salmonella enteritidis infection in mice.
18	bone marrow as a source of cells in reactions of cellular hypersensitivity i passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity in syngeneic systems	Bone marrow as a source of cells in cell reactions; cell hypersensitivity i passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity in syngene systems.
18	chronic allogeneic disease i development of glomerulonephritis	Allogenic chronic disease i development of glomerulonephritis.
18	distribution of antibody forming cells of different specificities in the lymph nodes and spleens of guinea pigs	Distribution of antibodies of different specificities in the lymph nodes and spleen of guinea pigs.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response 3 chromosomal marker analysis of single antibody forming cells in reconstituted irradiated or thymectomized mice	Cell interaction-cell in immune response 3 Chromosomal markers analysis of single antibody cells formed in reconstituted irradiated or thymectomized mice.
18	specificity of the anamnestic response produced by listeria monocytogenes or mycobacterium tuberculosis to challenge with listeria monocytogenes	Specificity of the anamnestic response induced by listeria monocytogenes or tubercular mycobacteria for listeria monocytogenes challenge.
18	respiration enhancing effect of tuberculin on splenic cells of hypersensitive guinea pigs	Stimulant effect of tuberculin on respiration of splenic cells of hypersensitive guinea pigs.
18	distribution of chromate labeled brucella abortus endoxin in tolerant mice	Distribution of chromate-labeled brucella abortus endoxin in the tolerant mice.
18	properties of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus grown in vivo	Properties of Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus grown in vivo.
18	generalized gangliosidosis beta galactosidase deficiency	Generalized Ganglioside – Beta galactosidase deficiency.
18	lipid metabolism in human platelets i evidence for a complete fatty acid synthesizing system	Lipid metabolism in human platelets demonstrates the existence of a complete fatty acid synthesis system.
18	the binding of o aminoazotoluene to deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and protein in the c57 mouse	The aminoazotoluene or deoxyribonucleic acid binding to l' ribonucleic acid and protein in the c57 mouse.
18	neutron activation analysis ofr copper in biological material applied to wilson s disease	Neutron activation analysis of r copper in biological material applied to Wilson's disease.
18	histochemical investigation of acid mucosubstances in secondary amyloidosis	L' histochemical examination of acid mucosubstances in secondary amyloidosis.
18	spontaneous rupture of splenic artery aneurysm in pregnancy report of first known antepartum rupture with maternal and fetal survival	Spontaneous Rupture of Lapos; aneurysm of lapos; splenic artery during pregnancy: first known prenatal rupture with maternal and fetal survival.
18	cells involved in the immune response vii the demonstration using allotypic markers of antibody formation by irradiation resistant cells of irradiated rabbits injected with normal allogeneic bone marrow cells and sheep erythrocytes	Cells involved in the immune response vii the demonstration at apos; aid of allotypic markers of apos formation; antibodies by apos-resistant cells; irradiation of irradiated rabbits injected with normal allogeneic bone marrow cells and sheep erythrocytes.
18	nonspecific staining its control in immunofluorescence examination of soil	Non--specific staining of its control during the immunofluorescence examination of the soil.
18	the immediate haematological response in the rat to experimental exposures of carbon monoxide	The immediate hematological response in the rat to experimental exposure to carbon monoxide.
18	lipid abnormalities in foam cell reticulosis of mice an analogue of human sphingomyelin lipidosis	Lipid abnormalities in mouse foam cell reticulosis, an analogue of human sphingomyelin liposis.
18	infection of an established mouse cell line with cell free rauscher leukemia virus i cytological study with the electron microscope	Apos infection; a mouse cell line established by an electron microscopic cytological study of leukemia virus free of cells i.
18	genetic control of the antibody response in inbred mice transfer of response by spleen cells and linkage to the major histocompatibility h 2 locus	Genetic control of the immune response in inbred mice transfer of response by spleen cells and binding to major locus d' h 2 histocompatibility.
18	studies on the induction of tolerance of the h y antigen in mice with neonatal skin grafts	Studies on the induction of tolerance to antigen h y in neonatal transplant mice.
18	n acetyl beta glucosaminidases in human spleen	N acetyl beta glucosaminidases in human spleen.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in nonvaccinated mice challenged by various routes	Effect of specific mouse immune serum on the growth of Salmonella enteritidis in unvaccinated mice through various routes of administration.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice preimmunized with living or ethyl alcohol killed vaccines	The effects of a specific mouse immune serum on the growth of Salmonella enteritidis in mice pre-immunized with apo; live or ethyl alcohol killed vaccines.
18	dynamics in development of experimental streptococcal immunity in mice	Lapos development dynamics; experimental streptococcal immunity in mice.
18	high resolution autoradiography of intracellular plutonium	High resolution autoradiography of intracellular plutonium.
18	cerebral gm1 gangliosidosis chemical pathology of visceral organs	Gm1 cerebral ganglioside chemical pathology of visceral organs.
18	immunological properties of friend virus from mouse spleen obtained by gel filtration	The immunological properties of the mouse spleen-friendly virus obtained by gel filtration.
18	local immune response in experimental pyelonephritis	The local immune response in experimental pyelonephritis.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the passive transfer of cell mediated immunity	L' effect of cytotoxic agents on the passive transfer of cell-mediated immunity.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the primary immune response to listeria monocytogenes	L' effect of cytotoxic agents on the primary immune response to listeria monocytogenes.
18	pathogenesis of a local graft versus host reaction immunogenicity of circulating host leukocytes	Pathogenesis of apos; a local graft versus cell wall reaction; immunogenic host of leukocytes; circulating host.
18	physical separation of hemopoietic stem cells differing in their capacity for self renewal	Physical separation of haematopoietic stem cells differing in ability; auto-renewal.
18	salmonella abony salmonella typhimurium recombinant nonvirulent for the mouse	Salmonella abony salmonella typhimurium recombinant non-mouse virulent.
18	the role of individual spleen cells in the interferon response of the intact mouse	The role of spleen cells in the intact mouse interferon response.
18	sustained effects of brief daily stress fighting upon brain and adrenal catecholamines and adrenal spleen and heart weights of mice	Sustained effects of short daily stress relief on cerebral and adrenal catecholamines and adrenal spleen and heart weights in mice.
18	further implication of murine leukemia like virs in the disorders of nzb mice	An additional involvement of murine leukemia as a virus in the disorders of the nzb mice.
18	the host response to calmette gu rin bacillus infection in mice	The host response to guinea-pig infection in mice.
18	the influence of immunologically committed lymphoid cells on macrophage activity in vivo	L' influence of immunologically active lymphoid cells on macrophage activity in vivo.
18	pathogenesis of chronic disease associated with persistent lymphocytic choriomeningitis viral infection ii relationship of the anti lymphocytic choriomeningitis immune response to tissue injury in chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis disease	Pathogenesis of apo; chronic disease associated with persistent lymphocytic choriomeningitis viral infection ii relationship between immune response to lymphocytic choriomeningitis and tissue injury associated with chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis.
18	in vitro induction of a primary response to the dinitrophenyl determinant	In vitro, induction of a primary response to the dinitrophenyl determinant.
18	liver in felty s syndrome	Felty's syndrome is present in the liver.
18	comparison of soluble human and mouse transplantation antigens	Comparison of soluble human and mouse transplants.
18	significance of increased splenic uptake on liver scintiscanning	L' increased liver function; splenic absorption on liver scintigraphy is significant.
18	platelet life span and sites of platelet sequestration in onyalai	Lifespan of platelets and sites of platelet sequestration in the onyalai.
18	cell sorting automated separation of mammalian cells as a function of intracellular fluorescence	Cell sorting allows automatic separation of mammalian cells as a function of intracellular fluorescence.
18	pulmonary hypertension due to micro thromboembolism from splenic and portal veins after portacaval anastomosis	Lung hypertension due to splenic and portal vein microthromboembolism after porto anastomosis-cave.
18	a protein inhibitor of acid deoxyribonucleases	A protein inhibitor for acid deoxyribonucleases.
18	lymphomas in mice failure of induction after a graft versus host reaction	Lapos; induction of lymphomas in neonatal mice; was not successful after a host transplant.
18	studies on tuberculin fever iv the passive transfer of reactivity with various tissues of sensitized donor rabbits	Tuberculin Fever Studies iv the passive transfer of reactivity with various tissues from sensitized donor rabbits.
18	synthesis assembly and secretion of gamma globulin by mouse myeloma cells i adaptation of the merwin plasma cell tumor 11 to culture cloning and characterization of gamma globulin subunits	Synthesis assembly and secretion of gamma globulin by mouse myeloma cells i adaptation of merwin tumor 11 plasma cell 11 to culture cloning and characterization of gamma globulin sub-units.
18	synthesis and metabolism of glycerol 3h triether a nonabsorbable oil phase marker for lipid absorption studies	Synthesis and metabolism of glycerol 3h triether, a nonabsorbable oil phase marker for d&apos studies; lipid absorption.
18	cells involved in cell mediated and transplantation immunity in the rabbit i the noninvolvement of the bone marrow antigen reactive cell in the transplant rejection reaction	The cells involved in cell mediation and l' immunity to transplantation in rabbit i la non-involvement of reactive cell to l' bone marrow antigen in the transplant rejection response.
18	experimental bluetongue disease in white tailed deer	Experimental blue tongue disease in white-tailed deer.
18	effects of estradiol upon the thymus and lymphoid organs of immature female rats	Effects of estradiol on the thymus and lymphoid organs of immature female rats.
18	antibodies of the iga type in intestinal plasma cells of germfree mice after oral or parenteral immunization with ferritin	Antibody of the iga type in intestinal plasma cells of germless mice following oral or parenteral ferritin immunization.
18	carcinogen induced tumors of the thymus iv humoral influences of normal thymus and functional thymomas and influence of posthymectomy period on restoration	Cancer induces tumors of thymus IV humoral influences of normal thymus and functional thymomas and influences the postthymectomy period on restoration.
18	bone marrow and spleen dissociation of immunologic properties by cortisone	Dissociation of bone marrow and spleen immunological properties by cortisone.
18	influence of carotid baroreceptors on different components of the vascular system	L' influence of carotid baroreceptors on different components of the vascular system.
18	repression of colony formation reversed by antiserum to mouse thymocytes	The repression of colony formation was reversed by an antiserum against mouse thymocytes.
18	teratogenicity of vitamin b6 deficiency omphalocele skeletal and neural defects and splenic hypoplasia	Theratogenicity of vitamin b6 deficiency omphalocele skeletal and neural abnormalities and splenic hypoplasia.
18	complement fixing antigen from bhk 21 cell cultures infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	A binding compound; an antigen from bhk 21 cell cultures infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus.
18	pseudourea 2 2 9 10 anthrylenedimethylene bis 2 thio dihydrochloride dihydrate microbiological assay and tissue distribution studies in mice	Pseudourea 2-910 anthrylenedimethylene bis 2 thio dihydrochloride microbiological assay and tissue distribution studies in the mouse.
18	isolation of mycobacterium xenopei from water taps	To isolate the mycobacterium xenopei from the faucets.
18	vibriolytic antibody forming cells a new application of the pfeiffer phenomenon	L' vibriolytic antibody forming cells is a new application of the pfeiffer phenomenon.
18	a kinetic study on murine myeloid leukaemia	This is a kinetic study of murine myeloid leukemia.
18	red cell survival in biliary cirrhosis	Red cell survival in biliary cirrhosis.
18	antitumor activity in mice of tentacles of 2 tropical sea annelids	L' antitumor activity in mice of the tentacles of two tropical annelids of the sea.
18	hepatic influence on splenic synthesis and release of coagulation activities	Hepatic influence on splenic synthesis and release of clotting activities.
18	recovery of rauscher leukemia virus from large volumes of seeded cow s milk and from infected murine spleens	Recovery of leukemia virus from large volumes of stocked cow's milk and from infected mouse spleens.
18	suppression of established friend virus leukemia by statolon i demonstration of a latent infection in clinically normal mice	The suppression of leukemia caused by the statolon's established friend l'apos i virus demonstrates a latent infection in clinically normal mice.
18	mediation of immunity to tumor isografts in mice by heterologous ribonucleic acid	Intervention of apos; heterologous ribonucleic acid in apos; immunity to tumor isografts in mouse.
18	evidence for transformation of spleen cells one day after infection of mice with friend leukemia virus	Transformation of the spleen cells one day after infection; infection of mice with amic leukemia virus.
18	experimental encephalitis following peripheral inoculation of west nile virus in mice of different ages	Experimental encephalitis following peripheral inoculation of West Nile virus in mice of different ages.
18	mycotoxicity of aspergillus ochraceus to chicks	Mycotoxicity of aspergillus ochraceus to chicks.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response i synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by cells from nzb bl mice	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating the graft – host response i synergy in graft – host reactions produced by nzb bl mouse cells.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response ii synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by balb c lymphoid cells of differing anatomic origin	Synergy among lymphoid cells involved in graft-versus-host response ii Synergy in graft-versus-host reactions produced by balb c d&apos lymphoid cells; different anatomical origins.
18	release of vasoactive amines from rabbit platelets induced by sensitized mononuclear leukocytes and antigen	Acute release of vasoactive amines from rabbit platelets induced by sensitized mononuclear leukocytes and antigen.
18	the pathogenesis of aleutian disease of mink i in vivo viral replication and the host antibody response to viral antigen	The pathogenesis of in vivo viral replication in mink and the antibody response of the host to the viral antigen.
18	lactoferrin an iron binding protein in neutrophilic leukocytes	Lactoferrin is an iron binding protein in leukocytes.
18	histopathological findings in the combined immunity deficiency syndrome	Histopathological findings in the combined d&apos syndrome; immunodeficiency.
18	metabolism of arterial plasma estrogens by the splanchnic organs of the dog in vivo	The metabolism of arterial plasma estrogens by the splanchnic organs of the dog in vivo.
18	inhibition of nucleic acid and protein synthesis mouse spleen cells in vitro by azathioprine	In vitro, l' azathioprine inhibits nucleic acid and protein synthesis in mouse spleen cells.
18	antibody to nuclear material eluted from isolated spleen vessels in systemic lupus erythematosus	Antibodies to nuclear material were eluted from isolated spleen vessels in disseminated lupus erythematosus.
18	non enzymic nature of the pyridine haemochrome cleaving activity of mammalian tissue extracts haem alpha methenyl oxygenase	The non-enzymatic nature of the apos; cell cleavage activity; pyridine d&apos hemochrome; mammalian tissue extracts alpha methenyloxygenase.
18	free and membrane bound polyribosomes in normal and rauscher virus infected mouse spleen cells	Free and membrane-bound polyribosomes in normal and rauscher virus infected mouse spleen cells.
18	eression of allelic immunoglobulin in homozygous rabbits injected with rna extract	Lapus erection; allelic immunoglobulin in homozygous rabbits injected with lapos; rna extract.
18	selective simulation of allelic expression effectf antibodies to allotypic markers on lymphoid cells	Selective simulation of antibody; allelic expression to allotypic markers on lymphoid cells.
18	acylation of lysolecithin in the intestinal mucosa of rats	Acylation of lysolecithin in the intestinal mucosa of rats.
18	in vitro initiated secondary anti hapten response ii increasing cell avidity for antigen	In vitro initiated secondary haptene anti response ii increasing liver enzymes; cell avidity for apos; antigen.
18	maternal fetal interaction and immunological memory	I'm talking about maternal fetal interaction and immunological memory.
18	survival of listeria monocytogenes in experimentally infected mice	Survival of Listeria monocytogenes in experimentally infected mice.
18	rapid method for the isolation of listeria monocytogenes from experimentally infected mice	Rapid method for isolation of listeria monocytogenes from experimentally infected mice.
18	bone marrow histogenesis a comparison of fatty and red marrow	L' bone marrow histogenesis is a comparison of fat and red marrow.
18	a radiochemical assay for glutamine synthetase and activity of the enzyme in rat tissues	Radiochemical test for glutamine synthetase and apos; apo activity; enzyme in rat tissue.
18	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease deficiency of galactocerebroside beta galactosidase	Leucodystrophy of globoid cells, krabbe disease, deficiency of galactocerebroside beta galactosidase.
18	cellular aspects of the inverse relationship between the net charge of immunogens of antibodies elicited	Cellular aspects of the inverse relationship between the net charge of the antibody immunogens elicited responses.
18	altered nucleic acids of antibody forming tissues	Altered nucleic acids of antibody-forming tissue.
18	selection of a single antibody forming cell clone and its propagation in syngeneic mice	Selection of apos; a single antibody cell clone and its propagation in syngenic mice.
18	in vitro induction of granulocyte differentiation in hematopoietic cells from leukemic and non leukemic patients	In vitro l' induction of granulocyte differentiation in hematopoietic cells from leukemic and nonleukemic patients.
18	observations on the increasing malignancy of tumours on prolonged growth the influence of immunological changes in the host	Observations on the increasing malignancy of tumours on prolonged growth influence the immunological changes in the host.
18	enzyme and isoenzyme alterations in friend disease	Enzyme and isoenzyme changes in lacidosis; friend.
18	studies on mammalian glucoamylases with special reference to monkey intestinal glucoamylase	Studies on mammalian glucoamylases, in particular the intestinal glucoamylase of monkeys.
18	an experimental system for the simultaneous estimation of mitostatic and lymphotoxic effects of immunosuppressants and cytostatics	Experimental system for l' simultaneous estimation of mitostatic and lymphotoxic effects of immunosuppressants and cytostatics.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides ii action on peritoneal exudate cells	The regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides ii action on peritoneal exudate cells.
18	multiplication of pasteurella multocida in the spleen liver and blood of turkeys inoculated intravenously	Multiplication of pasteurella multocida in the liver and blood of turkeys inoculated intravenously.
18	leukemia virus activation in chronic allogeneic disease	Leukemia virus activation in chronic allogeneic diseases.
18	leukemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat i changes in spleen and thymus	Leukemia evoked changes in spleen and thymus with 7812 trimethylbenz a anthracene in the rat.
18	further studies of antigenic competition 3 a model to account for the phenomenon based on a deficiency of cell to cell interaction in immune lymphoid cell populations	D' other studies of antigenic competition 3 a model to account for the phenomenon based on a deficiency of l' cell-to-cell interaction in immune lymphoid cell populations.
18	the secondary immune response to a hapten in vitro antigen concentration and the carrier effect	The secondary immune response to a concentration of antigen; in vitro haptene and antibody; carrier effect.
18	quantitative isolation of total glycosphingolipids from animal cells	Quantitative isolation of total glycosphingolipids from animal cells.
18	acceleration by thymosin of the development of resistance to murine sarcoma virus induced tumor in mice	Acceleration by thymosin of the development of resistance to the mouse tumour-inducing murine sarcoma virus.
18	necessity of the spleen for balanced secondary sex ratios following maternal immunization with male antigen	Required spleen to balance sex ratios: secondary females after birth; maternal immunization with apo; male antigen.
18	differential response of ribonucleic acid polymerase in preneoplastic and neoplastic ovaries of mice following oestradiol treatment	Differential reaction of lacid; ribonucleic acid polymerase in preneoplastic and neoplastic ovaries of mice following estradiol; estradiol.
18	red cell aging in vivo	This is red cell aging in vivo.
18	the acid soluble disulphide and mixed disulphide levels of some normal tissues and transplanted tumours	The levels of acid-soluble disulfide and mixed disulfide in some normal tissues and in transplanted tumours.
18	isotopic studies of the conversion of oxophlorins and their ferrihaems into bile pigments in the rat	Isotopic studies of the conversion of oxophlorines and their ferrihemes to bile pigments in the rat.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts ii rejection of parental grafts by resistant f 1 hybrid mice	Specific immunobiology of bone marrow allografts ii rejection of parental grafts by resistant f1 hybrid mice.
18	cell mediated tumor allograft immunity in vitro transfer with rna	Cellular allograft with cell-mediated immunity in vitro transfer with rna.
18	breast involvement in wegener s granulomatosis	Breast involvement in the granulomatosis of Wegener s.
18	inducible heme oxygenase in the kidney a model for the homeostatic control of hemoglobin catabolism	L' inducible heme oxygenase in the kidney is a model for the homeostatic control of the catabolism of l' hemoglobin.
18	the spleen in type i hyperlipoproteinemia histochemical biochemical microfluorometric and electron microscopic observations	The spleen in the rat; histochemical histochemical type I hyperlipoproteinemia microfluorometric and microscopic electron microscopic observations.
18	the influence of thymic and bursal lymphoid systems in avian tuberculosis	The influence of thymic and bursal lymphoid systems on avian tuberculosis.
18	some structural and antigenic properties of intracisternal a particles occurring in mouse tumors complement fixation immunodiffusion neuroblastoma plasma cell tumor	Certain structural and antigenic properties of intracisternal a particles present in mouse tumours complete immunological binding of the neuroblastoma plasma tumor.
18	myeloperoxidase and crystalline bodies in the granules of dmba induced rat chloroma cells	Rat chloroma cells were induced by myeloperoxidase and crystalline bodies in dmba granules.
18	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of 5 diazouracil in mice	Dose and tissue distribution of 5 diazouracil in the mouse.
18	peritoneoscopic features of intraabdominal vessels in cirrhosis of the liver	Peritoneoscopic characteristics of intraabdominal vessels in cirrhosis of the liver.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides v effect on cell associated immunoglobulin receptors and immunological memory	Regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides will affect cell-associated immunoglobulin receptors and immune memory.
18	the binding of radioactive label from labelled phenacetin and related compounds to rat tissues in vivo and to nucleic acids and bovine plasma albumin in vitro	Binding of radioactive label of labelled phenacetin and compounds related to rat tissue in vivo and to nucleic acids and bovine plasma albumin in vitro.
18	suppressive effect of immunization with mouse fetal antigens on growth of cells infected with rauscher leukemia virus and plasma cell tumors	Suppressive effect of immunization with fetal mouse antigens on the growth of cells infected with leukemia rauscher virus and plasma cell tumours.
18	a survey of the interaction of calcium ions with mitochondria from different tissues and species	A study of the interaction of calcium ions with mitochondria of different tissues and species.
18	idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura with normal platelet survival time	Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura with normal platelet survival time.
18	immunocompetent cells among mouse thymocytes a minor population	The immunocompetent cells among mouse thymocytes, a minor population.
18	serological and immunogenic activity of soluble mouse transplantation antigens controlled by the h 2 locus	Serological and immunogenic activity of soluble mouse transplant antigens controlled by the h2 locus.
18	in vitro inhibition of leucocyte migration in crohn s disease by a sarcoid spleen suspension	In vitro, a sarcoid sarcoid spleen suspension inhibits leukocyte migration in Crohn's disease.
18	control of contamination in psittacosis specimens by antibiotics	Control of contamination of psittacosis specimens by antibiotics.
18	peyer s patches an enriched source of precursors for iga producing immunocytes in the rabbit	Peyer develops an enriched source of precursors for the production of immunocytes in rabbits.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts i graft rejection by irradiated responder mice	Specific immunobiology of bone marrow allografts graft rejection by responding irradiated mice.
18	unusual particles in splenic disorders	Uh, unusual particles in splenic disorders.
18	suppression of cell mediated immunity to infection by an antimitotic drug further evidence that migrant macrophages express immunity	Removal of cell-mediated immunity to anti-apos; infection with an anti-mitotic drug is further evidence that migrating macrophages express immunity.
18	viral and cellular surface antigens of murine leukemias and myelomas serological analysis by immunoelectron microscopy	Viral and cellular surface antigens of murine leukemias and myeloma, serological analysis by immunoelectron microscopy.
18	chronic allogeneic disease 3 genetic requirements for the induction of glomerulonephritis	Allogenic chronic disease 3 genetic requirements for l' induction of glomerulonephritis.
18	immune responses in vitro iv suppression of primary m g and a plaque forming cell responses in mouse spleen cell cultures by class specific antibody to mouse immunoglobulins	In vitro immune reactions iv suppression of primary g and d' a plaque forming cell responses in mouse spleen cell cultures by a class specific antibody to mouse immunoglobulins.
18	electrophoretically homogeneous antibody synthesized by spleen foci of irradiated repopulated mice	An electrophoretically homogeneous antibody synthesized by splenic foci of repopulated irradiated mice.
18	cellular differentiation of the immune system of mice vi strain differences in class differentiation and other properties of marrow cells	Cellular differentiation of the immune system of mice differences in class differentiation and d' other properties of bone marrow cells.
18	hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in mice infected with ectromelia virus	Hematopoietic colony forming cell responses in mice infected with ectromelia virus.
18	role of hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in the pathogenesis of ectromelia	Role of hematopoietic colonies forming cellular responses in the pathogenesis of ectomyelitis.
18	chronic proliferative arthritis of mice induced by mycoplasma arthritidis i induction of disease and histopathological characteristics	A chronic proliferative arthritis of mice induced by the mycoplasma arthritidis i induction of disease and histopathological characteristics.
18	eperythrozoon coccoides i effect on the interferon response in mice	Eperythrozoon coccoides i has an effect on the response to interferon in mice.
18	characterization of an equine infectious anemia antigen extracted from infected horse spleen tissue	Characterization of an equine infectious anemia antigen extracted from infected spleen tissue of horses.
18	in vitro attachment of radioactive endotoxins to lysosomes	In vitro attachment of radioactive endotoxins to lysosomes.
18	portal venous injection in the rat	portal venous injection in the rat.
18	defects in hematopoietic differentiation in nzb and nzc mice	Defects in hematopoietic differentiation in nzb and nzc mice.
18	generalized accumulation of neutral glycosphingolipids with g m2 ganglioside accumulation in the brain	Generalized accumulation of neutral glycosphingolipids with g m2 accumulation of gangliosides in the brain.
18	ceramide like synthetic amides that inhibit cerebroside galactosidase	Ceramide resembles synthetic amides that inhibit cerebroside galactosidase.
18	cytological identification of the chromosome carrying the ixth linkage group including h 2 in the house mouse	The cytological identification of the chromosome carrying the ixth linkage group, including h2 in the mouse.
18	on the 1 9 volt alternating current polarographic signal of tissues	On the 19-volt alternating current polarographic signal of tissue.
18	immunologic enhancement of allogeneic tumor growth with soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens	Immunological enhancement of allogeneic tumor growth with soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens.
18	host gene control of c type rna tumor virus inheritance of the group specific antigen of murine leukemia virus	Genetic control of apo; host of apo; inheritance of apo-like tumour virus; group-specific antigen of murine leukemia virus.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response iv synergy in the gvh reaction quantitated by a mortality assay in sublethally irradiated recipients	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating graft versus host response iv synergy in gvh response quantified by a mortality test in recipients under @-@lethally irradiated.
18	development of chicken lymphoid system i synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulins by chicken lymphoid cells	Development of the chicken lymphoid system i synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulins by the chicken lymphoid cells.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis i chronic suppression after perinatal exposure to maternal antibody to paternal allotype in sjl x balb c f 1 mice	Active suppression of apos synthesis; apos allotype; chronic immune globulin suppression after perinatal exposure to apos; maternal antiapos antibody; paternal allotype in sjl x bsp c f 1 mice.
18	immune status of mice tolerant of living cells ii continuous presence and nature of facilitation enhancing antibodies in tolerant animals	Immune status of mice tolerant of living cells ii Continuous presence and nature of antibodies stimulating facilitation in tolerant animals.
18	suppression of immunoglobulin class synthesis in mice i effects of treatment with antibody to chain	The suppression of immunoglobulin class synthesis in mice i effects of antibody chain treatment.
18	studies on thymus function 3 duration of thymic function	Studies on thymus function 3, duration of thymus function 3.
18	metabolism of the schistosomicidal agent hycanthone by rats and rhesus monkeys	Apos metabolism; schistosomicidal agent hycanthone by rats and rhesus monkeys.
18	restoration of antibody forming capacity in cultures of nonadherent spleen cells by mercaptoethanol	Re-establishing the ability to form antibody in cultures of splenic cells not adherent to mercaptoethanol.
18	unimpeded growth of tumour in hosts pre immunized with tyrosyl or dinitrophenyl coated tumour cells	Unimpeded tumor growth in pre-hosts immunized with tyrosyl or dinitrophenyl-coated tumor cells.
18	immune complexes and visceral deposits of measles antigens in subacute sclerosing panencephalitis	Immune complexes and visceral deposits of measles antigens in subacute sclerosing panencephalitis.
18	chemical classes of amyloid substance	These are chemical classes of amyloid substances.
18	ascorbic acid a culture requirement for colony formation by mouse plasmacytoma cells	An ascorbic acid culture necessary for colony formation by mouse plasmacytoma cells.
18	cellular basis of the genetic control of immune responses to synthetic polypeptides ii frequency of immunocompetent precursors specific for two distinct regions within phe g pro l a synthetic polypeptide derived from multichain polyproline in inbred mouse strains	The cellular basis of the genetic control of immune responses to synthetic polypeptides ii frequency of specific immunocompetent precursors for two distinct regions in the polyproline-derived synthetic phe a polypeptide in inbred strains of mice.
18	the pathological findings following laparotomy in hodgkin s disease	The pathological results of laparotomy in the Hodgkinian disease.
18	studies of mice with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes derived from f 1 hybrids of t1wh and t1ald translocation homozygotes	Study of mice with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes from f1 d&apos hybrids; t1wh and t1ald translocation homozygotes.
18	further observations on whether host immunodepression is associated with tumour growth in mice	Other observations are to determine if host immunosuppression is associated with tumour growth in mice.
18	spleen weight in rats during tumour growth and in homograft rejection	Rat spleen weight during tumour growth and homograft rejection.
18	nucleotide sequence at the binding site for coat protein on rna of bacteriophage r17	Nucleotide sequence at the binding site of the coat protein on rna of bacteriophage r17.
18	tissue localization of australia antigen immune complexes in acute and chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Tissue localization of antigenic immune complexes in acute and chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis.
18	genetic control of thymus derived cell function i in vitro dna synthetic response of normal mouse spleen cells stimulated by the mitogens concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin	Genetic control of cell function derived from thymus i in vitro synthesis response of l' DNA from normal mouse spleen cells stimulated by the mitogens concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin a and phytohemagglutinin.
18	rejection of ascites tumor allografts i isolation characterization and in vitro reactivity of peritoneal lymphoid effector cells from balb c mice immune to el4 leukosis	Rejection of tumour allografts; ascites characterization; isolation and in vitro reactivity of peritoneal lymphoid effector cells from gerber mice immunized against leukosis.
18	variation in accessible cell surface immunoglobulin among antibody firming cells	Accessible cell surface immunoglobulin among antibody firming cell cells.
18	detection of dna synthesis in intact organisms with positron emitting methyl 11 c thymidine	Detection of DNA synthesis in intact organisms with positrons emitting methylthymidine 11 c.
18	transfer amyloidosis i studies on the transfer of various lymphoid cells from amyloidotic mice to syngeneic nonamyloidotic recipients ii induction of amyloidosis in mice with spleen thymus and lymph node tissue from casein sensitized syngeneic donors	Transfer the apo; amyloidosis studies on the transfer of various lymphoid cells from amylotic mice to non-amylotic recipients of syngenic recipients ii induction of apo; amyloidosis in mice with thymus of the spleen and lymph node tissue from sensitized syngen donors.
18	thymus derived lymphocytes produce an immunologically specific macrophage arming factor	Thymus-derived lymphocytes produce an immunologically specific macrophage arming factor.
18	thymus derived t cell immunoglobulins presence of a receptor site for igg and absence of large amounts of buried ig determinants on t cells	Thymus-derived t-cell immunoglobulins; a receptor site for thymus-derived t-cell immunoglobulins; igg and absence of large amounts of buried determinants of ig on t-cell.
18	the immune reaction as a stimulator of tumor growth	The immune response as a stimulator of tumor growth.
18	enhancement of the post occlusive oscillation in the splenic circulation by adenosine	Increase in apos; post-occlusive oscillation in the splenic circulation by adenosine.
18	gaucher s disease deficiency of acid glucosidase and reconstitution of enzyme activity in vitro	Deficiency of acid glucosidase and reconstitution of apos; enzyme activity in vitro.
18	specific heterologous enhancement of immune responses iv specific generation of a thymus derived enhancing factor	Specific heterologous augmentation of immune responses iv specific generation of a factor of onset; increase derived from thymus.
18	rapid viral induction of murine lymphomas in the graft versus host reaction	Rapid viral induction of murine lymphoma in the graft response-host.
18	distribution of labeled lymph node cells in mice during the lymphocytosis induced by bordetella pertussis	Distribution of labeled lymph node cells in mice during lymphocytosis induced by Bordetella pertussis disease.
18	cellular events during the induction of experimental thyroiditis in the rabbit	Cellular effects during apo; induction of experimental thyroiditis in the rabbit.
18	the release of prostaglandins and rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs from rabbit spleen and its antagonism by anti inflammatory drugs	Release of prostaglandins and rabbit aorta from rabbit spleen and its antagonism by rabbit spleen anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
18	inhibition of chemical carcinogenesis by viral vaccines	The inhibition of chemical carcinogenesis by viral vaccines.
18	prenatal and postnatal changes in the content and species of ferritin in rat liver	Prenatal and postnatal changes in the content and species of ferritin in rat liver.
18	the diagnosis of hodgkin s disease in surgically excised spleens	The diagnosis of Hodgkin's disease in surgically excised rats.
18	helper activity of human leukemic tissue extracts for leukemia virus expression in mice	Auxiliary activity for apo; human leukemic tissue extracts for apo; leukemia virus expression in mice.
18	the generation from arachidonic acid of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs by a microsomal enzyme preparation which also generates prostaglandins	The production from arachidonic acid of rabbit aorta by a microsomal enzyme preparation that also generates prostaglandins.
18	glycosphingolipid levels in an unusual neurovisceral storage disease characterized by lactosylceramide galactosyl hydrolase deficiency lactosylceramidosis	Glycosphingolipid levels in an unusual neuroventricular disease characterized by a lactosylceramidose-lactosylceramidose-deficient lactosylceramidase galactosyl hydrolase.
18	a classification of the murine leukemia viruses neutralization of pseudotypes of friend spleen focus forming virus by type specific murine antisera	Classification of neutralization by murine leukemia viruses of pseudotypes of viruses forming the focus of the friendly spleen by specific murine antisera.
18	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro i regulatory effect of macrophages and thymus dependent t cells on the response of thymus independent b lymphocytes to endotoxin	Regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro The regulatory effect of macrophages and thymus-dependent t cells on the response of thymus-independent b lymphocytes to endotoxin.
18	thymus independent b cell proliferation in spleen cell cultures of mouse radiation chimeras stimulated by phytohemagglutinin or allogeneic cells	Thymus-independent b cell proliferation in spleen cell cultures of phytohemagglutinin-stimulated and allogeneic mouse radiation chimeras.
18	the mechanism of antigenic stimulation of primary and secondary clonal precursor cells	The mechanism of antigenic stimulation of primary and secondary clonal precursor cells.
18	deletion of hapten binding cells by a highly radioactive 125 i conjugate	Suppression of binding cells by a highly radioactive 125 i conjugate.
18	brain associated stem cell antigen an antigen shared by brain and hemopoietic stem cells	L' stem cell antigen associated with the brain is an antigen shared by the brain and hematopoietic stem cells.
18	influence of lynestrenol on the rat s ovary implanted into the spleen	L' influence of lynestrenol on the rat ovary implanted in the spleen.
18	leukaemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat 3 changes in lymphoid tissues	Leukemia produced changes in lymphoid tissues with 7812 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat 3.
18	co infection of mouse spleen cells with murine sarcoma virus and guaroa virus	Co-infection of mouse spleen cells with murine sarcoma virus and guaroa virus.
18	the persistence of hemopoietic stem cells in vitro	The persistence of hematopoietic stem cells in vitro.
18	bone marrow derived lymphoid cells b cells functional depletion with cobra factor and fresh serum	Bone marrow derived lymphoid cells – b cell functional depletion with cobra factor and fresh serum.
18	storage of chlorinated pesticides in human organs and tissues in ferrara province italy	Storage of chlorinated pesticides in human organs and tissues in Italy's Ferrara province.
18	rapid breaking of tolerance against escherichia coli lipopolysaccharide in vivo and in vitro	Rapid interruption of lipopolysaccharide tolerance of Escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro.
18	immunopathogenesis of acute central nervous system disease produced by lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus ii adoptive immunization of virus carriers	Immunopathogenesis d' acute central nervous system disease caused by lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus ii adoption immunization of viral carriers.
18	equine infectious anemia activity of liquid antigen extracts in the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	Equine infectious anemia activity of liquid antigen extracts in the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests.
18	observations on abnormal cells in the peripheral blood and spleen in hodgkin s disease	Observations on abnormal cells in the peripheral blood and on the spleen in Hodgkin's disease.
18	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia with erythroblastic multinuclearity	Congenital dyserythropoietic anemia with erythroblastic multinuclearity.
18	portal hypertension in kala azar	Portal hypertension in kala azar.
18	the effects of stimulation of the left atrial receptors on sympathetic efferent nerve activity	Effects of stimulation of left atrial receptors on sympathetic efferent nerve activity.
18	lysosomal localization of fructofuranosidase containing liposomes injected into rats	Lysosomal localization of fructofuranosidase containing liposomes injected into rats.
18	radioresistance of carrier specific helper thymus derived lymphocytes in mice	Resistance in lymphocytes derived from the specific thymus of the mouse.
18	enzyme deficiency in cholesteryl ester storage idisease	Enzymatic deficiency in cholesteryl ester storage idisease.
18	immunity of epstein barr virus in hodgkin s disease preceded by infectious mononucleosis	Immunity of the epstein virus barr in Hodgkin's disease preceded by infectious mononucleosis.
18	role of the macrophage in natural resistance to salmonellosis in mice	The role of macrophage in natural resistance to salmonellosis in mice.
18	comparative immunogenicity of heat killed and living oral salmonella vaccines	Comparative immunogenicity of heat killed and living oral salmonella vaccine.
18	model approach to immunological rejuvenation of the aged	Model approach for the immunological rejuvenation of the elderly.
18	post mortem findings in ugandans with hodgkin s disease	Postmortem discovery in ugandans with Hodgkin's disease.
18	cholesterol vitamin c controls its transformation to bile acids	Cholesterol's vitamin c controls its transformation into bile acids.
18	inhibition of macrophage response to brain injury a new effect of pertussis vaccine possibly related to histamine sensitizing factor	The inhibition of macrophage response to brain damage is a novel effect of pertussis vaccine that may be related to histamine sensitivity.
18	ultrastructural characteristics of the hairy cells of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis	Ultrastructural characteristics of the hairy cells of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis.
18	interferon inducing polycarboxylates mechanism of protection against vaccinia virus infection in mice	Interferon inducing polycarboxylates mechanism of protection against potato; vaccinia virus infection in mice.
18	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice i increased virulence of mycoplasma pulmonis	Respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide-treated mice increased virulence of mycoplasma pulmonis.
18	maturation of the human complement system i onset time and sites of fetal c1q c4 c3 and c5 synthesis	Maturation of the human complement system; fetal appearance and synthesis sites. c4 c3 and c5 fetus.
18	sites of formation of the serum proteins transferrin and hemopexin	Sites of formation of serum transferrin and hemopexin proteins.
18	the response of t cells to histocompatibility 2 antigens dose response kinetics	The response of t lymphocytes to apos; histocompatibility 2 antigens dose-kinetic response.
18	cytotoxicity in graft versus host reaction i role of donor and host spleen cells	Cytotoxicity in graft-versus-host response i role of donor and host spleen cells.
18	immune and natural antibodies to syngeneic murine plasma cell tumors	Antifungal and natural antibodies against mouse syngenetic plasma cell tumours.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract of mice during systemic antibiotic treatment	Resistance to colonization of the gastrointestinal tract of mice during systemic antibiotic treatment.
18	equine infectious anemia preparation of a liquid antigen extract for the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	Preparation of equine infectious anemia; a liquid antigen extract for apo assays; gel-gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation.
18	detection of african horsesickness viral antigens in tissues by immunofluorescence	Detection of African horse disease viral antigens in tissues by immunofluorescence.
18	anthrax infection in bone meal from various countries of origin	Infection at the beginning; anthrax in the flour d'apos; bones of various countries of origin.
18	deficit of specific thymus dependent lymphocytes in transplantation tolerance in the rat	Thymus-dependent specific lymphocyte deficiency in transplant tolerance in the rat.
18	critical role of determinant presentation in the induction of specific responses in immunocompetent lymphocytes	Critical role of determinant presentation in apo; induction of specific responses in immunocompetent lymphocytes.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response v derivation by migration in lethally irradiated recipients of two interacting subpopulations of thymus derived cells from normal spleen	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating the response of the graft to the migration-derived host v in irradiated recipients of two sub-@ interactive populations of cells derived from normal spleen thymus.
18	active suppression as a possible mechanism of tolerance in tetraparental mice	Active suppression as a possible mechanism of tolerance in tetraparental mice.
18	heterogeneity of the effector cells in the cytotoxic reaction against allogeneic lymphoma cells	Heterogeneity of effector cells in the cytotoxic response to the allogeneic lymphoma cells.
18	2 4 dinitrophenyl receptors on mouse thymus and spleen cells	Twenty-four dinitrophenyl receptors on the thymus and mouse spleen cells.
18	production of tl antibody by mice immunized with tl cell populations a possible assay for thymic hormone	Production of tl antibodies by mice immunized with tl cell populations, a possible assay for thymic hormone.
18	proliferation of donor marrow and thymus cells in the myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngeneic host mice	Proliferation of donor bone marrow and thymus cells in the myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngenic host mice.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution of activity from macromolecular components	The reconstitution of l' glucocerebrosidase activity from macromolecular components.
18	the organ specificity of ferritin in human and horse liver and spleen	The specificity of ferritin for human and horse liver and spleen organs.
18	thrombocytopenic purpura as the sole manifestation of a recurrence of hodgkin s disease	Thrombocytopenic purpura is the only manifestation of a recurrence of Hodgkin's disease.
18	immunological control of polyoma virus oncogenesis in mice	The immunological control of polyoma virus oncogenesis in mice.
18	cathepsin a in human brain and spleen	Cathepsin's in the human brain and spleen.
18	the subunit structure of horse spleen apoferritin the molecular weight of the oligomer and its stability to dissociation by dilution	The structure of the-units of l' horse spleen apoferritin the molecular weight of the oligomer and its stability to dilution dissociation.
18	carrier rate of salmonellas in sheep and goats and its public health significance	Rate of salmonella in sheep and goats and public health importance.
18	alkaline and acid phosphatase in murine leukemia	The alkaline and acid phosphatase in murine leukemia.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens of mice	Induction of immunological tolerance to soluble histocompatibility 2 mouse antigens.
18	demonstration that antigen binding cells are precursors of antibody producing cells after purification with a fluorescence activated cell sorter	Demonstrate that antigen-binding cells are precursors of antibody-producing cells after purification with a fluorescent-activated antigen-binding cell sorter.
18	extraction of equine infectious anemia immunodiffusion antigen with the aid of the chaotropic agent thiocyanate	Apos extraction; antigen; immunodiffusion of apos; equine infectious anemia; aid of apos; chaotropic agent thiocyanate.
18	effect of stimulation of the host defense system by coenzyme q 10 on dibenzpyrene induced tumors and infection with friend leukemia virus in mice	L' effect of stimulation of the host defense system by coenzyme q 10 on dibenzpyrene induces tumours and amic leukemia virus infection in mice.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis 3 identification of t cells as responsible for suppression by cells from spleen thymus lymph node and bone marrow	The active suppression of the synthesis of l' allotype of l' immunoglobulin 3 allowed us to identify the t cells responsible for suppression by cells of the lymph node of the thymus of the spleen and the bone marrow.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes i allogeneic effect by irradiated host t cells on adoptively transferred histoincompatible b lymphocytes	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t lymphocytes and b lymphocytes Allogenic effect of irradiated apo t lymphocytes; host on histoincompatible adopted b lymphocytes.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes ii failure of physiologic cooperative interactions between t and b lymphocytes from allogeneic donor strains in humoral response to hapten protein conjugates	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t lymphocytes and b lymphocytes ii failure of co-operative physiological interactions between t lymphocytes and b lymphocytes from allogeneic donor strains in humoral response to d&apos protein conjugates; hapten.
18	relative distribution of arylsulphatases a and b in rat liver parenchymal and other cells	Relative distribution of arylsulfatases a and b in rat liver parenchymal and other cells.
18	a genetic locus for inducibility of c type in balb c cells the effect of a nonlinked regulatory gene on detection of virus after chemical activation	A genetic locus for apo; c-type inducibility in cell walls; dapo effect; unlinked regulatory gene on detection of virus after chemical activation.
18	chromatographic evidence for the existence of multiple forms of cathepsin b1	Chromatographic evidence of cathepsin; the existence of multiple forms of cathepsin b1.
18	ribonucleic acid protein fractions of virulent salmonella typhimurium as protective immunogens	Protein ends of l' ribonucleic acid of virulent Salmonella typhimurium as protective immunogens.
18	detection of delayed hypersensitivity in mice injected with ribonucleic acid protein fractions of salmonella typhimurium	Detection of delayed hypersensitivity in mice injected with Salmonella typhimurium ribonucleic acid protein fractions.
18	demonstration of antigenic identity between purified equine infectious anemia virus and an antigen extracted from infected horse spleen	Proof of apos; antigenic identity between the purified equine infectious anemia virus and an antigen extracted from the infected horse spleen.
18	subunit interactions in horse spleen apoferritin dissociation by extremes of ph	Unitary interactions in the dissociation of the apoferritin from the horse spleen by extremes of ph.
18	the catalytic activity of horse spleen apoferritin preliminary kinetic studies and the effect of chemical modification	L' catalytic activity of preliminary kinetic studies on horse spleen apoferritin and l' effect of chemical modification.
18	the molecular basis of codominant expression of the histocompatibility 2 genetic region	The molecular basis of apos; codominant expression of the histocompatibility gene region.
18	the nature of the collagenolytic cathepsin of rat liver and its distribution in other rat tissues	The nature of the collagenolytic cathepsin of rat liver and its distribution in other rat tissues.
18	murine c type rna virus from spontaneous neoplasms in vitro host range and oncogenic potential	Murine virus type c from spontaneous neoplasms, in vitro host range and oncogenic potential.
18	adjuvant activity of mycobacterium leprae	Adjuvant activity of leprae mycobacteria.
18	role of mitochondria in the production of rna containing tumor viruses	The role of mitochondria in the production of rna containing tumor viruses.
18	concentrations of asparagine in tissues of prepubertal rats after enzymic or dietary depletion of asparagine	Concentrations of asparagine in tissues of prepubertal rats following enzymatic or dietary depletion of asparagine.
18	a new model for inducing malignant ovarian tumours in rats	A new model for inducing malignant ovarian tumours in the rat.
18	rapid immunological induction of murine lymphomas evidence for a viral etiology	Rapid immunological induction of murine lymphoma testifies to a viral etiology.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice i experimental conditions for the enhancement of hapten specific secondary antibody responses by the graft versus host reaction	L' allogenic effect on inbred mice i experimental conditions for apos; increase of specific secondary antibody responses to apos; hapten by graft versus host reaction.
18	immunity tolerance to a hapten nip coupled to an isologous carrier mouse gamma globulin	Immune tolerance to a spike d' haptene coupled to an isologous gamma globulin mouse transporter.
18	decreased percentage of polymorphonuclear neutrophils in mouse peripheral blood after inoculation with material from multiple sclerosis patients	Reduction in percentage of polymorphonuclear neutrophils in mouse peripheral blood after inoculation of material from MS patients.
18	idiotype expression and the inheritance of mouse antibody clones	L' idiotype expression and l' inheritance of mouse clones.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation ii generation of a population of thymus derived suppressor lymphocytes	Biological expression of apo; lymphocyte activation ii generation of a thymus-derived suppressive lymphocyte population.
18	termination of tolerance to human gamma globulin in mice by antigen and bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin	End of tolerance to gamma-human globulin in mice by antigen and l' bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin.
18	differentiation of thymus derived cells from precursors in mouse bone marrow	The differentiation of thymus-derived cells from precursors in mouse bone marrow.
18	a major genetic locus affecting resistance to infection with murine leukemia viruses 3 assignment of the fv 1 locus to linkage group 8 of the mouse	A major genetic locus affecting resistance to murine leukemia virus infection 3 assigns locus fv 1 to linkage group 8 of the mouse.
18	stimulation of anti brucella vaccination in mice by tetramisole a phenyl imidothiazole salt	Stimulation of brucella vaccination in mice by phenyl imidothiazole salt tetramisole.
18	resistance to mycoplasma synoviae is bursal dependent	Resistance to mycoplasma synoviae depends on the bursa.
18	immunity to vibrio cholerae in the mouse ii effect of a cell adherent immune factor	Immunity against vibrio cholerae in the mouse ii effect of d' an immune factor adhering to the cell.
18	host gene control of type c rna tumor virus expression and tumorigenesis in inbred mice	Apos gene control; apos host; cna-type tumor virus expression and tumorigenesis in inbred mice.
18	a tumor antigen in tissue cultures derived from patients with hodgkin s disease	A tumour antigen in tissue cultures from patients with Hodgkin's disease.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract and the spread of bacteria to the lymphatic organs in mice	Resistance to colonization of the digestive tract and spread of bacteria to the lymphatic organs in mice.
18	induction of type c viruses in cultured guinea pig cells	Induction of c-type viruses in cultured guinea pig cells.
18	serological identification of an ir region product	Serological identification of an ir region product.
18	immunodepression by rowson parr virus in mice i growth curves of rowson parr virus and immunological relationships with friend virus	Immunosuppression by Rowson's parr virus in mice i growth curves of Rowson's parr virus and immunological relationships with the virus.
18	some aspects of the pathogenesis and pathomorphology of leprosy	Some aspects of the pathogenesis and pathomorphology of leprosy.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of graft vs host reactions on host t lymphocyte functions	L' allogenic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of graft vs. host responses on host t-cell lymphocyte function.
18	synthesis intracellular distribution and secretion of immunoglobulin and h 2 antigen in muring splenocytes	Synthesis of the intracellular distribution and secretion of apo; immunoglobulin and apo; h 2 antigen in developing splenocytes.
18	serum mediated leukemia cell destruction in akr mice	Serum-mediated leukemia cell destruction in akr mice.
18	oligomeric iga the major component of the in vitro primary response of mouse spleen fragments	L' iga-ligomer is the major component of the in vitro primary response of mouse spleen fragments.
18	immunogenicity and immunosensitivity of urethane induced murine lung adenomata in relation to the immunological impairment of the primary tumour host	Immunogenicity and immunogenicity; immunosensitivity of murine pulmonary adenomas induced by apos; urethane in relation to apos; immunological alteration of the primary host tumour.
18	the time course of cardiovascular changes in lactation in the rat	L' time course of cardiovascular changes in lactation in the rat.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro i development of primary and secondary plaque forming cell responses to the random terpolymer 1 glutamic acid 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 gat by mouse spleen cells in vitro	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro development of plaque-forming primary and secondary cellular responses to serotonin; random, terpolymer 1 glutamic acid 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 gat by mouse spleen cells in vitro.
18	overlap stimulation of primary and secondary b cells by cross reacting determinants	Overlap stimulation of primary and secondary b cells by cross-reactive determinants.
18	an electrophoretic difference between surface and secreted igm of murine splenocytes	An electrophoretic difference between surface and tissue secreted from the mouse splenocytes.
18	effects of passive antibody on early pathogenesis of marek s disease	Effects of passive antibodies on early pathogenesis of Marek s.
18	tumor induction by cryptococcus neoformans	Tumor induction by cryptococcus neoformans.
18	influence of gonadal factors on skin test reactivity of cfw mice to candida albicans	Influence of gonadal factors on skin reactivity testing of cfw mice to candida albicans.
18	influence of hormones and chemical carcinogen on murine leukaemia	Effect of hormones and chemical carcinogens on murine leukemia.
18	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes ii pathology and altered pathogenesis	Schistosome mansoni infection in thymus-deprived mice ii pathology and altered pathogenesis.
18	leukemia virus activation during homograft rejection	Lapses; leukemia virus activation during repudiation; homograft.
18	mechanisms of thrombocytopenia in malignant tertian malaria	Mechanisms of thrombocytopenia in tertian malaria.
18	rabbit blood lymphocytes may be t cells with surface immunoglobulins	The rabbit blood lymphocytes may be T-cells with surface immune globulins.
18	unique nuclear dna sequences in the involved tissues of hodgkin s and burkitt s lymphomas	Unique DNA sequences in the tissues involved in Hodgkin lymphoma and burkitt s.
18	graft versus host reactions in mice iv thymus cell suppression of antibody formation	Transplant versus host reactions in mice iv thymus cell suppression of antibody formation.
18	n2 guanine specific transfer rna methyltransferase i from rat liver and leukemic rat spleen	N2 guanine specific transfer rna methyltransferase i from rat liver and leukemic rat spleen.
18	the role of the gut flora in the metabolism of cyclamate	The role of the intestinal flora in the metabolism of cyclamate.
18	hapten specific ige antibody responses in mice ii cooperative interactions between adoptively transferred t and b lymphocytes in the development of ige response	Reactions of serum antibodies specific to apos; hapten in mice ii Co-operative interactions between the adopted t- and b-lymphocytes in the development of the response.
18	transformation of histocompatibility immunogen into a tolerogen	Transformation of apos; immunogenicity; histocompatibility into tolerant immunogen.
18	mouse splenic peroxidase and its role in bactericidal activity	Splenic mouse peroxidase and its role in bactericidal activity.
18	recall of acquired cellular resistance in mice by antigens from killed brucella	Cellular resistance acquired in mice by antigens from killed brucella is recalled.
18	degree of immunity induced by killed vaccines to experimental salmonellosis in mice	Level of immunity to experimental salmonellosis in mice induced by killed vaccines.
18	helper dependent properties of friend spleen focus forming virus effect of the fv 1 gene on the late stages in virus synthesis	Help the concentration-dependent properties of the peptide; friend forming the peptide; viral effect of the fv 1 gene on the final stages of viral synthesis.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice i morphology quantitation tissue distribution	Identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice i morphology quantification of tissue distribution.
18	tumor induction by immunologically activated murine leukemia virus	Tumour induction by immunologically activated murine leukemia virus.
18	genetic control of the immune response frequency and characteristics of antigen binding cells in high and low responder mice	Genetic control of immune response frequency and characteristics of antigen-binding cells in both high- and low-responsive mice.
18	graft versus host reactions across different regions of the h 2 complex of the mouse	Reactions of graft versus host in different regions of the h2 complex of the mouse.
18	biological characteristics of t and b memory lymphocytes in the rat	Biological characteristics of memory lymphocytes t and b in the rat.
18	pancreatic involvement by venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in the hamster	Pancreatic involvement of the Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in the hamster.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from murine spleen cells increased amounts of the nucleolar species in leukaemic tissue	Apos polymerases; apos-dependent ribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid from murine spleen cells increased apos; nucleolar species in leukemic tissues.
18	immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion by cells in the mouse thymus that do not bear theta antigen	Synthesis and secretion of apos; immunoglobulins by thymus cells from mice that do not carry apos; antigen theta.
18	infection at the subcellular level ii distribution and fate of intravenously injected brucellae within phagocytic cells of guinea pigs	Subcellular infection ii distribution and become intravenously injected brucella in the phagocytic cells of guinea pigs.
18	virulence of six strains of mycobacterium bovis bcg in mice	Virulence of six strains of mycobacterium bovis bcg in mice.
18	polyarthritis associated with salmonella infection in rats	Polyarthritis associated with apos; Salmonella infection in rats.
18	an analysis of the close relationship of lysosomes to early deposits of amyloid ultrastructural evidence in experimental mouse amyloidosis	An analysis of the close relationship between lysosomes and early deposits of amyloid ultrastructural elements in mouse amyloidosis.
18	a bacteriological study of endemic tuberculosis in birds	A bacteriological study of endemic tuberculosis in birds.
18	mannosidosis in angus cattle the enzymic defect	Mannosidose in angus cattle the defect enzyme.
18	a mouse b cell alloantigen determined by gene s linked to the major histocompatibility complex	The mouse b cell alloantigen is determined by genes linked to the major d&apos complex; histocompatibility.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat i migration pattern tissue distribution and turnover rate of unprimed and primed b lymphocytes involved in the adoptive antidinitrophenyl response	The maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat migration pattern i, tissue distribution, and turnover rate of unbooted and primed b lymphocytes involved in the anti-initrophenyl adoptive response.
18	a cyclical appearance of antibody producing cells after a single injection of serum protein antigen	L' cyclic appearance of protein-producing cells; antibodies after a single injection of serum protein.
18	anatomical distribution of t and b lymphocytes in the rat development of lymphocyte specific antisera	Anatomical distribution of t and b lymphocytes in rat development; lymphocyte-specific antisera.
18	the ability of bacterial lipopolysaccharide to modulate the induction of unresponsiveness to a state of immunity cellular parameters	The ability of bacterial lipopolysaccharide to modulate the induction of non--response to a state of cellular parameters of l' immunity.
18	increased reactivity of mouse spleen cells sensitized in vitro against syngeneic tumor cells in the presence of a thymic humoral factor	The increased reactivity of the mouse spleen cells sensitized the syngenic tumor cells in vitro in the presence of a thymic humoral factor called apos.
18	specific murine b cell activation by synthetic single and double stranded polynucleotides	Specific murine b cell activation by single- and double-stranded synthetic polynucleotides.
18	regulatory properties of adenosine triphosphate l methionine s adenosyltransferase of rat liver	The regulatory properties of adenosine triphosphate methionine s adenosyltransferase from rat liver.
18	enhancement of resistance to infectious diseases by oral administration of brewer s yeast	Increase resistance to infectious diseases by oral administration of brewing yeast.
18	delayed type hypersensitivity and immunity against aerogenic tuberculosis in guinea pigs	Delayed hypersensitivity and immunity against aerogenic tuberculosis in guinea pigs.
18	effect of corynebacterium parvum treatment on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice	Effect of corynebacterium parvum treatment on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice.
18	correlates to increased lethality of attenuated venezuelan encephalitis virus vaccine for immunosuppressed hamsters	There is a correlation between the increased lethality of attenuated Venezuelan lidos; encephalitis vaccine in immunosuppressed hamsters.
18	leucocyte migration studies with spleen preparations in crohn s disease	Leukocyte migration studies with spleen preparations in Crohn's disease.
18	ribonucleic acid components of murine sarcoma and leukemia viruses	Ribonucleic acid components of murine sarcoma and leukemia virus.
18	preparation and biological properties of water soluble adjuvant fractions from delipidated cells of mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca	Preparation and biological properties of adducing water-soluble fractions of unbound cells of mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca.
18	multiplicity of scrapie virus in infected mouse spleen cells in vivo	The multiplicity of scrapie virus in infected mouse spleen cells in vivo.
18	in vitro transformation of mouse bone marrow derived b lymphocytes induced by the lipid component of endotoxin	In vitro transformation of mouse bone marrow derived b lymphocytes induced by the lipid component of l' endotoxin.
18	granulocyte macrophage precursor cell and colony stimulating factor responses of mice infected with salmonella typhimurium	Granulocyte macrophage precursor cell and colony stimulation factor responses of mice infected with salmonella typhimurium.
18	mechanisms regulating the cardiac output response to cyanide infusion a model of hypoxia	Mechanisms regulating the cardiac output response to cyanide infusion, a model of apo; hypoxia.
18	effects of splenectomy and beta adrenoceptor blockade on cardiac output response to acute hypoxemia	Effects of apo; splenectomy and dapos; β-receptor blockade on cardiac output response to acute hypoxemia.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response i differential suppressive effect of carrier primed t cells on hapten specific igm and igg antibody responses	Selective Roles of Thymus-derived Lymphocytes in the Immune Response i differential suppressive effect of carrier t cells on specific igm and igg antibody responses to apos; hapten.
18	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the horse	It's called acute systemic anaphylaxis in the horse.
18	comparison of the capillary tube and explant methods for the in vitro assay of tuberculin	Comparison of capillary tube and explant methods for tuberculin skin; in vitro test.
18	immunogenicity of living and heat killed salmonella pullorum vaccines	Immunogenicity of living and heat killed salmonella pullorum vaccines.
18	isolation of a neurotropic type c virus	Isolation of apos; a type c neurotropic virus.
18	studies of escherichia coli infection in chickens	Apos studies; Escherichia coli infection in chickens.
18	in vitro studies on strain dependent production of thymus specific autoantibodies	In vitro studies on the production of auto-thymus-specific antibodies, strain-dependent.
18	monoclonal production of both igm and igg1 antihapten antibody	Monoclonal production of apoes; anti-gym and igg1 antihaptene antibodies.
18	induction of b cell tolerance in vitro to 2 4 dinitrophenyl coupled to a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine dnp d gl	Induction of b cell tolerance in vitro to 24 dinitrophenyl coupled to a d' d&apos and glutamic acid; d&apos lysine acid.
18	proliferation of b and t cells in mixed lymphocyte cultures	Cells b and t proliferate in mixed lymphocyte cultures.
18	functional heterogeneity of murine lymphoid cells v lymphocytes lacking detectable surface theta or immunoglobulin determinants	Detectable functional heterogeneity of murine lymphoid cells lacking surface theta or detectable immunoglobulin.
18	development of cellular and humoral immunity in the respiratory tract of rabbits to pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide	Development of l' cellular and humoral immunity in the respiratory tract of rabbits against pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide.
18	immunohistochemical demonstration of igg in reed sternberg and other cells in hodgkin s disease	Immunohistochemical demonstration of apos; igg in reed sternberg and dapos; other Hodgkin's disease cells.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocytes 3 h 2 linkage of a gene controlling the rate of appearance of complement receptor lymphocytes	The ontogeny of 3-h2 b lymphocytes; a gene controlling the level of apo; appearance of complement receptor lymphocytes.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to a thymus dependent antigen in the absence of thymus derived cells	Induction of immunological tolerance to a thymus-dependent antigen in the absence of thymus-derived cells.
18	twp populations of t lymphocytes immune to the lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Twp populations of lymphocytes immunized against the lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus.
18	evaluation of methods for isolating salmonella and arizona organisms from pet turtles	Evaluation of methods for the isolation of salmonellae and molluscs; Arizona from pet turtles.
18	chromosomal abnormalities in spleens of new zealand black mice a strain characterized by autoimmunity and malignancy	Chromosomal abnormalities in zealous black mouse spleen, a strain characterized by apos; auto-immunity and malignancy.
18	primate and murine type c viral nucleic acid association kinetics analysis of model systems and natural tissues	Kinetic analysis of viral nucleic acid association in primates and c-type mice from model systems and natural tissues.
18	highly purified papain solubilized hl a antigens contain beta2 microglobulin	The highly purified papain solubilized hl antigens contain beta2 microglobulin.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice ii functional properties in vitro	Identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice ii Functional properties in vitro.
18	isolation and characterization of c type viral gene products of virus negative mouse cells	Viral c-type gene products isolation and characterization of virus-negative mouse cells.
18	ultrastructural studies of a visna like syncytia producing virus from cattle with lymphocytosis	Ultrastructural studies of a visna, such as syncytia, producing virus in cattle with lymphocytosis.
18	oncogenicity of an endogenous c type virus chemically activated from mouse cells in culture	Oncogenicity of c-type endogenous virus, chemically activated from mouse cells in culture.
18	procainamide induced sle and lymphoreticular disorders	Sleeping disorders and lymphoreticular disorders were induced by procainamide.
18	simultaneous occurrence of acute myeloblastic leukaemia and multiple myeloma without previous chemotherapy	Simultaneous incidence of acute myeloblastic leukemia and dapos; multiple myeloma without prior chemotherapy.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny i commitment to immunoglobulin allotype	Limiting abs; gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny; allotype of abs; immunoglobulin.
18	roles of t and b lymphocytes in the termination of unresponsiveness to autologous thyroglobulin in mice	Both t and b lymphocytes play a role in the end of the non-@-@ response to autologous thyroglobulin in mice.
18	alloantiserum induced inhibition of immune response gene product function ii genetic analysis of target antigens	Inhibition of immune response gene product function ii genetic analysis of target antigens.
18	graft vs host reactions in reciprocal hybrid mice i dissociation of t cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte reaction and two graft vs host assays	Reactions graft vs. host in reciprocal hybrid mice i dissociation of t-cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte response and two graft vs. host trials.
18	autoradiographic studies on the proliferation of antibody producing cells in vitro	Autoradiographic studies on the proliferation of antibody-producing cells in vitro.
18	new third class of amyloid fibril protein	The new third class of amyloid fibrillar proteins.
18	inhibition of a t cell dependent immune response in vitro by thymoma cell immunoglobulin	In vitro, immunoglobulin of thymoma cells; inhibition of cells; an immune response dependent on t cells by apos.
18	identity of acid beta glucosidase and glucocerebrosidase in human spleen	The identity of beta-acid glucosidase and glucocerebrosidase in human spleen.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution from macromolecular components depends on acidic phospholipids	Glucocerebrosidase reconstitution from macromolecular components depends on acid phospholipids.
18	drug induced change in the distribution of sulfonamides in the mother rat and its fetus	This drug induced a change in the distribution of sulfonamides in the rat-mother and fetus.
18	immunological control of macrophage proliferation in vivo	Immunological control of macrophage proliferation in vivo.
18	the psoas sign hepatic angle normal patients and everyday practice	Psoas sign l'apos; hepatic angle of normal patients and daily practice.
18	action of ribonuclease t1 on 30s ribosomes of escherichia coli and its role in sequence studies on 16s ribonucleic acid	L' action of ribonuclease t1 on 30s dapos ribosomes; escherichia coli and its role in apos; 16s ribonucleic acid sequencing.
18	the life span of iga plasma cells from the mouse intestine	Lifespan of iga plasma cells in the intestine of mice.
18	hapten specific stimulation of secondary b cells independent of t cells	Specific stimulation of secondary b cells by haptene, independent of t cells.
18	induction of t lymphocytes from precursor cells in vitro by a product of the thymus	Induction of t lymphocytes from precursor cells in vitro by a thymus product.
18	comparison of the virulence for mice of salmonella typhimurium given by the intraperitoneal and subcutaneous routes	Comparison of the virulence to mice of Salmonella typhimurium given by the intraperitoneal route and by-skin.
18	a sequence of seventy three nucleotides from the coliphage r17 genome	Seventy-thirteen nucleotides from the genome of coliphage r17 were sequenced.
18	the sensitivity of cells in exponential and stationary phases of growth to bleomycin and to 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	The sensitivity of cells in the exponential and stationary phase of growth to bleomycin and to 1 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea.
18	the effect of irradiating a transplanted murine lymphosarcoma on the subsequent development of metastases	Effect of apo; radiation; mouse lymphosarcoma graft on subsequent development of metastasis.
18	effects of cyclic starvation feeding and of splenectomy on the development of hemosiderosis in rat livers	The effects of cyclic fasting and splenectomy on the development of apos; hemosiderosis in rat liver.
18	transplantation of autoimmune potential i development of antinuclear antibodies in h 2 histocompatible recipients of bone marrow from new zealand black mice	Transplantation of auto potential-immune development of anti-nuclear antibodies in novel, histocompatible h 2 bone marrow recipients of zeland black mice.
18	an antigen in hodgkin s disease tissue cultures fluorescent antibody studies	An antigen in Hodgkin's disease tissue cultures fluorescent antibodies in fluorescent antibody studies.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit evidence for synthesis of immunoglobulin by the transformed cells	The transformation by simian virus 40 of d&apos spleen cells in a hyperimmunized rabbit revealed the synthesis of d' immunoglobulin by the transformed cells.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit demonstration of production of specific antibody to the immunizing antigen	Transformation by simian virus 40 of cells from the spleen of d'apos; a hyperimmunized rabbit showing production of apo-specific antibodies; immunizing antigen.
18	immunostimulation with bacterial phospholipid extracts	Immunostimulation with bacterial phospholipid extracts.
18	first detection of tularaemia in domestic and wild mammals in iran	The first detection of tularemia in domestic and wild mammals in Iran.
18	biological and biochemical evidence for an interaction between marek s disease herpesvirus and avian leukosis virus in vivo	Biological and biochemical evidence of an interaction between whiting disease herpesvirus and avian leukosis virus in vivo.
18	pathogenesis and immunology of experimental gonococcal infection virulence of colony types of neisseria gonorrhoeae for chicken embryos	Pathogenesis and immunology of experimental virulence of gonococcal infections of neisseria gonorrhoeae colony types in chick embryos.
18	immunity to candida albicans induced by listeria monocytogenes	Immunity to candida albicans induced by listeria monocytogenes.
18	synergy among responding lymphoid cells in the one way mixed lymphocyte reaction interaction between two types of thymus dependent cells	Synergy between similarly reacting lymphoid cells mixed the apos; interaction of lymphocyte response between two types of thymus-dependent cells.
18	effector cell blockade a new mechanism of immune hyporeactivity induced by multivalent antigens	Effective cells are blocking a new mechanism of immune hyporesponsiveness induced by multivalent antigens.
18	antigenic differences between hemopoietic stem cells and myeloid progenitors	Antigenic differences between hematopoietic stem cells and myeloid progenitors.
18	the effect of sea star coelomocyte extract on cell mediated resistance to listeria monocytogenes in mice	The effect of sea star coelomocyte cell mediated resistance to Listeria monocytogenes in mice.
18	inhibition of specific cell mediated cytotoxicity by anti t cell receptor antibody	Cell-specific inhibition of cell-mediated cytotoxicity by t-cell receptor antibody; t-cell receptor antibody.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function i restricted heterogeneity of the antibody response of b lymphocytes from neonatal and fetal mice	Ontogenesis of b lymphocyte function has limited the apos; heterogeneity of the b lymphocyte response in newborn and fetal mice.
18	vi antigen from salmonella typhosa and immunity against typhoid fever i isolation and immunologic properties in animals	Antigenic virus of Salmonella typhosa and immunity against typhoid fever i isolation and immunological properties in animals.
18	effects of carbon dust inhalation on the cell mediated immune response in mice	Effects of carbon dust inhalation on cell-mediated immune response in mice.
18	development of specific cell dependent antibody during growth of a syngeneic rat sarcoma	The development of specific, cell-dependent antibodies during the growth of a syngenetic rat sarcoma.
18	the effect of preadministration of corynebacterium parvum on the protection afforded by heat killed and acetone killed vaccines against experimental mouse typhoid	The effect of apo; prior administration of corynebacterium parvum on the protection afforded by heat-killed vaccines and apo; acetone against experimental typhoid in mice.
18	sensitive in vivo assay for detection of murine leukemia viruses	Sensitive in vivo assay for detection of murine leukemia viruses.
18	reduced cell yields of mouse cell line cultures after exposure to homogenates of multiple sclerosis tissues	Following exposure to homogenates of multiple sclerosis tissue, the cell yield of mouse cell line cultures decreased.
18	immunological responses to candida albicans ii amyloidosis in mice induced by candidiasis	Immunological responses to candida albicans ii amyloidosis in mice induced by candidiasis.
18	studies on the extended active sites of acid proteinases	Studies of the extended active sites of acidic proteinases.
18	prostaglandins and the mechanism of analgesia produced by aspirin like drugs	Prostaglandins and the mechanism of analgesia produced by drugs similar to apos; aspirin.
18	selective toxicity of diphtheria toxin for malignant cells	Selective toxicity of diphtheria toxin to malignant cells.
18	a synthetic glycolipid with b cell mitogenic activity	A synthetic glycolipid with mitogenic activity on b cells.
18	studies on the heparin sulphamidase activity from rat spleen intracellular distribution and characterization of the enzyme	Apos studies; apos activity; heparin sulfamidase in rat spleen intracellular distribution and enzyme characterization.
18	restoration of immune competence in tolerant mice by parabiosis to normal mice	Re-establishment of immune competence in mice tolerant of parabiosis to normal mice.
18	the purification of bovine cathepsin b1 and its mode of action on bovine collagens	The purification of bovine cathepsin b1 and its mode of action on bovine collagen.
18	permissiveness of athymic nude mice towards congenic memory cells	The permissiveness of athymic naked mice to congenic memory cells.
18	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy a hyperimmune entity resembling hodgkin s disease	Immunoblastic lymphadenopathy (IML), a hyperimmune entity resembling Hodgkin's disease.
18	vinyl chloride induced liver disease from idiopathic portal hypertension banti s syndrome to angiosarcomas	Chlorinated vinyl chloride induced liver disease of the d'apos syndrome; high blood pressure is associated with angiosarcomas.
18	single and repeated infections of grivet monkeys with schistosoma mansoni parasitological and pathological observations over a 31 month period	One-time, repeated infestation of mountain monkeys with schistosoma mansoni parasitological and pathological observations over a 31-month period.
18	spontaneous regression of friend virus induced leukemia coinfection with regressing and conventional strains of virus	Fellow's spontaneous regression of the virus has induced a co-leukemic infection with regressive and conventional virus strains.
18	genetic control of responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides in mice i evidence for a single gene that influences mitogenic and immunogenic respones to lipopolysaccharides	Genetic control of responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides in mice shows the existence of a single gene that influences mitogenic and immunogenic responsibilities towards lipopolysaccharides.
18	pharmacology of a new triazine antifolate in mice rats dogs and monkeys	Pharmacology of apos; a new triazine antifolate in mouse, dog and monkey rats.
18	different hematological diseases induced by type c viruses chemically activated from embryo cells of different mouse strains	Different hematological diseases induced by chemically activated c-type viruses from embryonic cells of different mouse strains.
18	immune inhibition of allogeneic lymphoma cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice	L' immune inhibition of allogeneic lymphoma cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice.
18	alterations in ribonuclease activities in the plasma spleen and thymus of tumor bearing mice	Changes in ribonuclease activities in the spleen and thymus of tumor-carrying mice.
18	experimental cirrhosis of the liver obtained with simultaneous carbon tetrachloride and phenobarbital sodium	Experimental cirrhosis of the liver obtained simultaneously with carbon tetrachloride and phenobarbital sodium.
18	association of salmonella typhimurium with and its invasion of the ileal mucosa in mice	L' association of salmonella typhimurium with the ileal mucosa in mice and its invasion by this bacterium.
18	effect of local corticosteroids on antibody forming cells in the eye and draining lymph nodes	Effect of local corticosteroids on antibody formation in the eye and lymph node drainage.
18	concomitant changes in adenylate cyclase and cytolytic activities of lymphoid cells during graft versus host reaction	Concomitant changes in apo; adenylate cyclase and lapo activity; cytolytic activity of lymphoid cells during graft – host response.
18	a selective inhibitor of the elicitation of immune mediated reactions	This is a selective inhibitor of the stimulation of immune-mediated reactions.
18	accumulation of oxygenated steryl esters in wolman s disease	The accumulation of oxygenated steylic esters in wolf disease.
18	difference in kinetic properties between hexokinase type i isoenzymes from various rat tissues with reference to the effect of a thiol inhibitor	Difference in kinetic properties of sucrose isoenzymes; type I hexokinase from various rat tissues with respect to sucrose; a thiol-inhibitor effect.
18	immunogenic properties of modified antigen e ii ability of urea denatured antigen and alpha polypeptide chain to prime t cells specific for antigen e	Immunogenic properties of apos; modified antigen ability of apos; denatured antigen by apos; urea and alpha polypeptide chain to produce specific apos; antigen; e.
18	ir associated murine alloantigens demonstration of multiple ia specificities in h 2 alloantisera after selective absorptions	The murine alloantigens associated with l' ir show multiple specificities in both of the alloanties after selective removals.
18	relation of dna synthesis and suppression to development of memory by t cells	The relationship between the synthesis and suppression of DNA and the development of memory by t cells.
18	inhibition of proliferation of lymphoma cells and t lymphocytes by suppressor cells from spleens of tumor bearing mice	Lapses; inhibition of proliferation of lymphomas and t-cells by suppressive cells of tumor-carrying mouse spleens.
18	capacity of sensitized thymus derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocytic choriomeningitis is restricted by the h 2 gene complex	The ability of sensitized thymus-derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocytic choriomeningitis is limited by the h2 gene complex.
18	the selective action of poly a u on the electrophoretic mobility and surface charge of a subpopulation of b cells	L' selective action of poly a u on electrophoretic mobility and surface charge d' sub@-@ population of cells b.
18	radiocolloid scans in evaluating splenic response to external radiation	Radiocolloid scans; evaluation of splenic response to external radiation.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat ii subpopulations of virgin b lymphocytes in the spleen and thoracic duct lymph	Mature b lymphocytes in rat ii under-populations of virgin b lymphocytes in the spleen and lymph of the thoracic canal.
18	the adjuvant activity of mycobacterial rna preparations and synthetic polynucleotides for induction of delayed hypersensitivity to purified protein derivative in guinea pigs	L' adjuvant activity of synthetic mycobacterial rna and polynucleotide preparations for apos; induction of apos; delayed hypersensitivity to purified protein derivative in guinea pig.
18	complement mediated alteration of antibody specificity in vivo	Modification of antibody specificity in vivo by complement.
18	rabbit lymphocyte populations responding to haptenic and carrier determinants for dna synthesis	Positive rabbit lymphocyte populations with haptenic determinants and carriers for DNA synthesis.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation iv concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in mouse mixed lymphocyte reactions	Biological Expressions of the apos; iv lymphocyte activation concanavalin activated suppressor cells in mouse mixed lymphocyte reactions.
18	listeria cell wall fraction a b cell mitogen	Cell mitogen fractionation of the listeria cell wall b.
18	adult murine lymph node cells respond blastogenically to a new differentiation antigen on isologous and autologous b lymphocytes	Adult murine lymph node cells respond blastogenetically to a new differentiation antigen on isologous and autologous lymphocytes.
18	suppression of the immune response by alpha fetoprotein on the primary and secondary antibody response	The suppression of the immune response by the alpha fetoprotein on the primary and secondary immune response.
18	demonstration of an antibody mediated tolerance state and its effect on antibody affinity	Demonstration of an antibody-mediated tolerance state and its effect on antibody affinity.
18	sequential responses of mouse spleen t cells in mixed lymphocyte culture induced cytolysis	Sequential responses of mouse spleen t cells in mixed lymphocyte culture induced cytolysis.
18	an inhibitor of cell proliferation released by cultures of macrophages	An inhibitor of cell proliferation released by cultures of macrophages.
18	actin is the naturally occurring inhibitor of deoxyribonuclease i	Actin is the natural inhibitor of deoxyribonuclease i.
18	induction of endogenous virus and of thymidine kinase by bromodeoxyuridine in cell cultures transformed by friend virus	Induction of endogenous virus and thymidine kinase by bromodeoxyuridine in cell cultures transformed by friendly virus.
18	immunologic induction of malignant lymphoma identification of donor and host tumors in the graft versus host model	Immunologic induction of malignant lymphoma allows identification of donor and host tumours in the graft model.
18	some aspects of host response to levamisole after chemotherapy in a murine leukemia	Some aspects of the host response to levamisole after chemotherapy in murine leukemia.
18	inhibition of migration of murine spleen cells by rauscher leukemia virus infected syngeneic cells	The inhibition of migration of mouse spleen cells by leukemia virus infects syngenic cells.
18	friend leukemia rapid development of erythropoietin independent hematopoietic precursors	Ami rapid development of hematopoietic precursors independent of apos; erythropoietin.
18	isolation of a b tropic type c virus from reticulum cell neoplasms induced in balb c mice by sjl j type c virus	Isolation of tropical b virus type c from reticulum cell neoplasms induced in balb c mice by sjl j type c virus.
18	interaction between aromatic diamidines and nucleic acids possible implications for chemotherapy	Possible interactions between aromatic diamidines and nucleic acids for chemotherapy.
18	embryonic antigens shared between chemically induced lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas of the mouse	Embryonic antigens are common to chemically induced lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas in mice.
18	failure to detect chromosome damage in vivo in friend virus infected leukemic mice	Failure to detect chromosomal damage in vivo in leukemic mice infected with l'apos; friend.
18	genetic transmission of endogenous n and b tropic murine leukemia viruses in low leukemic strain c57bl 6	Genetic transmission of n and b tropic endogenous murine leukemia viruses in low leukemia c57bl 6.
18	inclusion body disease herpesvirus infection of falcons ibdf	Includes herpesvirus body disease infection of falcons ibdf.
18	inclusion body disease in a great horned owl	Inclusion of apos; body disease in a large horned owl.
18	virus initiated septic shock acute death of venezuelan encephalitis virus infected hamsters	The virus caused septic shock, the acute death of Venezuelan encephalitis infected hamsters.
18	inhibition of the prostaglandin synthetase systems in ocular tissues by indomethacin	Inhibition of prostaglandin synthetase systems in ocular tissues by indomethacin.
18	splenic mobility and its effect on estimates of splenic mass	Splenic mobility and its effect on splenic mass estimation.
18	a case of waldenstrom s macroglobulinemia complicated by diabetes insipidus	Waldenstrom's case of macroglobulinemia complicated by diabetes insipidus.
18	detection of nonspecific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in rabbits infected with treponema pallidum	Detection of nonspecific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in rabbits infected with treponema pallidum.
18	age dependence of viral expression comparative pathogenesis of two rodent adapted strains of measles virus in mice	Influence of age on comparative disease pathogenesis; viral expression of two adapted strains of measles virus in mice.
18	ammonium nitrogen in fetuses of urea treated sheep	Ammonium nitrogen in fetuses from urea-treated sheep.
18	marked prolongation of skin homograft survival with niridazole a first report	Marked prolongation of skin homograft survival with niridazole, an initial report.
18	studies on aryl phosphate hydrolysis by human acid phsophatases	Studies on apos; phosphate d&apos hydrolysis; aryl phosphate hydrolysis by human acid phsophatases.
18	testis antigens of man and some other primates	Testicular antigens of man and other primates.
18	frequency and gradient dispersion of viscosity of dna solutions	Dispersal frequency and gradient of viscosity of solutions of DNA.
18	monocytic leukaemia in the dog	Monocytic leukemia in the dog.
18	experimental polymer storage disease in rabbits an approach to the histogenesis of sphingolipidoses	"""Experimental polymer storage disease in rabbits"", an approach to apos; histogenesis of sphingolipidoses."
18	structural and hormonal alterations in the gastrointestinal tract of parenterally fed rats	Structural and hormonal changes in the intestinal-gastro tract of parenterally fed rats.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy i cell mediated immunity	Immunological implications of cell-mediated vasectomy i immunity.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy ii serum mediated immunity	Immunological implications of vasectomy ii serum-mediated immunity.
18	the mechanism of carcinogenic action of 1 2 dimethylhydrazine sdmh in rats	Molecular mechanisms; carcinogenic action of 12 dimethylhydrazine sdmh in the rat.
18	specific anti tumor responses by cultured immune spleen cells i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors which block immune cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro	Specific anti-tumour reactions of cultured splenic immune cells i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors that block immune cell-mediated cytotoxicity in vitro.
18	induction of malignant lymphomas in swiss mice by n nitroso compounds formed in vivo	Induction of malignant lymphomas in Swiss mice by compounds n-nitroso formed in vivo.
18	immunological phenomena in harmless mice during experimental carcinogenesis induced with long term topical application of 7 12 dimethylbenzanthracene dmba	Immunological phenomena in harmless mice during experimental carcinogenesis induced by etapos; long-term topical application of 712 dimethylbenzanthracene dmba.
18	inflammatory lymphocyte in cell mediated antibacterial immunity factors governing the accumulation of mediator t cells in peritoneal exudates	Inflammatory lymphocyte in apo factors; cell-mediated antibacterial immunity regulating apo; accumulation of mediating t cells in peritoneal exudates.
18	effect of synthetic disaccharide protein conjugate as an immunogen in salmonella infection in mice	Effect of the synthetic disaccharide protein conjugate as an immunogen in apos; Salmonella infection in mice.
18	naturally occurring double stranded rna and immune responses effects on plaque forming cells and antibody formation	The natural effects of double-stranded rna and immune responses on plaque-forming cells and antibody formation.
18	t cell dependent helper and suppressive influences in an adoptive igg antibody response	Help dependent t cells and suppressive influences in an adopted antibody response.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocyte activation during in vitro incubation before adoptive transfer	Block d&apos complexes; antigenic antibodies on apos; t lymphocyte activation during apos; in vitro incubation before adoption transfer.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocye surface identified with defined protein antigens ii lymphocyte activation during the in vitro response	Antigenic antibody on the lymphocyte surface identified at baseline; aid of apo; defined protein antigens ii lymphocyte activation during in vitro response.
18	permanent hapten specific tolerance in b lymphocytes	Permanently specific tolerance to haptene in b lymphocytes.
18	prolonged c3 depletion by cobra venom factor in thymus deprived mice and its implication for the role of c3 as an essential second signal for b cell triggering	Prolonged c3 depletion by cobra venom factor in thymus-deprived mice and its involvement in the role of c3 as the second essential cue for b cell initiation.
18	growth of typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli in intravenously infected mice	Growth of typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli in mice infected intravenously.
18	induction of disseminated virulent cytomegalovirus infection by immunosuppression of naturally chronically infected wild mice	Induction of apo; virulent cytomegalovirus infection by immunosuppression of naturally infected wild mice.
18	mast cells and myelofibrosis	Uh, mast cells and myelofibrosis.
18	antigen specific thymus cell factors in the genetic control of the immune response to poly tyrosyl glutamyl poly d l alanyl poly lysyl	Cellular thymus factors specific to the apo; antigen in the genetic control of the immune response to poly tyrosyl glutamyl poly d'alanyl poly lysyl.
18	the differentiation pathway of t lymphocytes evidence for two differentiated cell types	Two types of differentiated cells are revealed by the differentiation pathway of the t-cell.
18	concancvalin a binding proteins of lymphoid cell surface	Concancvaline is a lymphoid cell surface binding protein.
18	purification of terminal riboadenylate transferase from calf thymus gland	Purification of terminal riboadenylate transferase from calf thymus gland.
18	studies and sequences of escherichia coli 4 5 s rna	Studies and sequences; escherichia coli 4 s rna 5 s rna.
18	differences in subunit composition and iron content of isoferritins	Differences in sub-units composition and iron content of isoferritins.
18	nucleotide sequence studies of normal and genetically altered glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from escherichia coli	Lapses; nucleotide sequence studies of normal and genetically engineered glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from Escherichia coli.
18	the nucleotide sequence of a precursor to the glycine and threonine specific transfer ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli	The nucleotide sequence of d&apos, a precursor of the transfer ribonucleic acids specific for glycine and threonine d' escherichia coli.
18	cell mediated immune responses in vitro i suppression of the generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by concanavalin a and concanavalin a activated spleen cells	Cell-mediated immune responses in vitro i suppression of cytotoxic lymphocyte generation by activated spleen cell concanavalin a and concanavalin.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny ii commitment to immunoglobulin heavy chain isotype	Lapse restriction; gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny ii commitment to apos; isosome heavy chain; immunoglobulin.
18	quantitative studies on tumor enhancement in mice i enhancement of sarcoma i induced by igm igg1 and igg2	Quantitative mouse cancer studies; tumour increase in mice sarcoma i induced by igg1 and igg2.
18	regulation of spleen growth and portal pressure in hepatic shcistosomiasis	Hepatic shcistosomiasis is the regulation of spleen growth and pressure.
18	acceleration of amyloidosis by syngeneic spleen cells from normal donors	An increase in the rate of amyloidosis by the syngenic cells of normal donors.
18	demonstration by affinity chromatography of the cell free synthesis of ribonuclease specific immunoglobulin	Demonstration by chromatography of apos; affinity of cell-free synthesis of apos; ribonuclease-specific immunoglobulin.
18	size of the polyadenylic acid region of newly synthesized globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Size of the apos region; polyadenyl acid of the apos; newly synthesized globin messenger ribonucleic acid.
18	transmission of marble spleen disease in turkeys and pheasants	The transmission of marble spleen disease in turkeys and pheasants.
18	collimation and surface counting in haematology	Collimation and surface counting in hematology.
18	the effect of electromagnetic radiation on the hematopoietic stem cells of mice	The effect of electromagnetic radiation on the hematopoietic stem cells of mice.
18	segmental pancreatic lesions after partial or total splenectomy in rabbits	Segmental pancreatic lesion after partial or total splenectomy in rabbits.
18	operative choice and technique following pancreatic injury	Choice and technique following pancreatic lesion.
18	the viral envelope glycoprotein of murine leukemia virus and the pathogenesis of immune complex glomerulonephritis of new zealand mice	The glycoprotein of l' viral envelope of murine leukemia virus and the pathogenesis of glomerulonephritis immune complex in neo-Mice-zelandaises.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia viruses i induction of immunologic disease and lymphoma in balb c times nzb f1 mice by scripps leukemia virus	The following are the following: immunopathogenicity and immunogenicity; oncogenicity of murine leukemia viruses i induction of apo; immunologic disease and apo; lymphoma in mice infected with the flu leukemia virus.
18	blockage of amyloid induction by colchicine in an animal model	Amyloid Induction Blockage by Colchicine in an Animal Model.
18	isolation of antigen binding cells from unprimed mice demonstration of antibody forming cell precursor activity and correlation between precursor and secreted antibody avidities	Isolation of donor-binding cells; antigen from uninitiated mice demonstrates antibody precursor activity and a correlation between precursor and secreted antibody avidity.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny iii endogenous iga and igm on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors	Limiting l' gene expression in endogenous iii iga and igm b lymphocytes and their progeny on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors.
18	regulatory mechanisms in cell mediated immune responses i regulation of mixed lymphocyte reactions by alloantigen activated thymus derived lymphocytes	The regulatory mechanisms of cell-mediated immune responses i regulation of mixed lymphocyte responses by allogene-activated thymus-derived lymphocytes.
18	molecular relationship between private and public h 2 antigens as determined by antigen redistribution method	The molecular relationship between private and public h2 antigens was determined by antigen redistribution.
18	in vitro studies on allotype suppression iii compounds of antiallyotype serum active in release from allotype suppression	In vitro studies on the suppression of allotypes iii composed of antially-typical serum active in allotype suppression release.
18	the role of macrophages in the generation of t helper cells ii the genetic control of the macrophage t cell interaction for helper cell induction with soluble antigens	The role of macrophages in the generation of auxiliary t-cells ii the genetic control of the apos; interaction of macrophage t-cells for apo; induction of auxiliary cells with soluble antigens.
18	the lipoprotein of the outer membrane of escherichia coli a b lymphocyte mitogen	The lipoprotein of the outer membrane of d' escherichia coli a mitogen of the b lymphocytes.
18	feedback induction of suppressor t cell activity	Retroactive apos induction; suppressor t cell activity.
18	no evidence for particles encapsulating rna instructed dna polymerase and high molecular weight virus related rna in herpesvirus induced tumours of non human primates	No evidence of the presence of the encapsulating particles of DNA polymerase and high molecular weight virus-related rna in apo-induced tumours; herpesviruses in non-human primates.
18	abdominal lavage in blunt trauma	Abdominal lavage in blunt force trauma.
18	heterogeneity in tissue ferritins displayed by gel electrofocusing	Heterogeneity of tissue ferritins as demonstrated by gel electrofocusing.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes viii in vivo cooperative responses between lymphocytes are controlled by genes in the k end of the h 2 complex	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t lymphocytes and b viii lymphocytes in vivo are controlled by genes located at the apos; k end of the h2 complex.
18	effect of nonspecific stimulation on the defense mechanisms of inbred mice	Effect of non-specific stimulation on the defense mechanisms of inbred mice.
18	preventive effect of hapten reactive thymus derived helper lymphocytes on the tolerance induction in hapten specific precursors of antibody forming cells	Preventative effect of reactive thymus-derived auxiliary lymphocytes; hapten on apos; tolerance induction in specific precursors of apos; hapten of antibody-forming cells.
18	antibiotic combinations in the treatment of experimental staphylococcus aureus infection	Antibiotic combinations in the treatment of spinal cord infections; experimental staphylococcus aureus infection.
18	depressed immune response in the magnesium deficient rat	The immune response has decreased in the magnesium-deficient rat.
18	accumulation of gold in various organs of mice injected with gold thioglucose	Accumulation of gold in various organs of mice injected with gold thioglucose.
18	release of prostaglandin by mitogen and antigen stimulated leukocytes in culture	The release of prostaglandins by mitogen and l' antigen stimulates leukocytes in culture.
18	dna synthesis in tumor bearing rats	Synthesis of DNA synthesis in tumor-carrying rats.
18	treatment of an established graft versus host reaction in akr mice by adoptive immunotherapy	Treatment of apo; graft-to-bladder host reaction in mice by adopted immunotherapy.
18	graft versus leukemia without fatal graft versus host disease in akr mice	Anti-leukemia graft without fatal graft against lung disease; host in akr mice.
18	an experimental model for evaluation of factors in tumor escape from immunological attack	An experimental model for evaluation of factors in the avoidance of cancer; immunological attack.
18	benzo alpha pyrene effects on mouse epithelial cells in culture	Effects of benzo alpha pyrene on mouse epithelial cells in culture.
18	selection for high immunogenicity in drug resistant sublines of murine lymphomas demonstrated by plaque assay	Selection for high immunogenicity in drug resistant murine lymphoma lines demonstrated by plaque test.
18	genetical control of b cell responses iii requirement for functional mitogenicity of the antigen in thymus independent specific responses	Genetic control of cell responses b iii requires functional mitogenicity of the antigen in thymus-independent specific responses.
18	x linked b lymphocyte immune defect in cba hn mice i studies of the function and composition of spleen cells	Study of the function and composition of spleen cells in cba hn mice revealed x-linked b-cell immunodeficiency in these mice.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice iv identification and distribution in mouse spleen	Identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice iv identification and distribution in mouse spleen.
18	functional heterogeneity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus specfic t lymphocytes i identification of effector amd memory subsets	Functional heterogeneity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus t-cells i identification of sub-@-@sets of effector memory amd.
18	evidence for the clonal abortion theory of b lymphocyte tolerance	Evidence at baseline; support for theory of onset; clonal abortion on lymphocyte tolerance b.
18	the characterization fo the b cell repertoire specific for the 2 4 dinitrophenyl and 2 4 6 trinitrophenyl determinants in neonatal balb c mice	Characterization of the b-cell specific repertoire of 2,4-dinitrophenyl and 2,4-trinitrophenyl determinants in neonatal balb mice.
18	t cell migration into allografts	T cell migration in allografts.
18	the in vitro induction of immunological tolerance in the b lymphocyte by oligovalent thymus dependent antigens	In vitro induction of immunological tolerance in b lymphocyte by oligovalent thymus-dependent antigens.
18	tolerance induction in b lymphocytes but thymus dependent antigens t cells may abrogate b cell tolerance induction by prevent an antibody response	Tolerance induction in b lymphocytes, but thymus-dependent antigens may nullify tolerance in b lymphocytes by preventing an immune response.
18	clonal dominance i restricted nature of the igm antibody response to group a streptococcal carbohydrate in mice	Clonal dominance i limited the nature of the response of the antibody igme to group a streptococcal carbohydrate in mice.
18	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens i the generation of functionally distinct t cell subclasses is a differentiative process independent of antigen	Sub--functional classes of t lymphocytes carrying different antigens ly the generation of sub-functionally distinct t lymphocyte classes is a differentiative process independent of antigen.
18	h 2 compatability requirement for t cell mediated lysis of target cells infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus different cytotoxic t cell specificities are associated with structures coded for in h 2k or h 2d	L' h2 compatibility requirement for t-cell-mediated lysis of target cells infected with lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus is associated with different cytotoxic specificities of the t-cell in h2k or h2d-coded structures.
18	dissociation between mitogenicity and immunogenicity of tnp lipopolysaccharide a t independent antigen	Dissociation between mitogenicity and immunogenicity of tnp lipopolysaccharide, an independent t antigen.
18	pathobiological relationships between mycobacterium leprae and its primitive host	Pathobiological relationships between leprae mycobacterium and its primitive host.
18	cell surface antigen induced by friend murine leukemia virus is also in the virion	L' cell surface antigen induced by friendly murine leukemia virus is also present in virion.
18	reticuloendotheliosis virus nucleic acid sequences in cellular dna	Reticuloendotheliosis virus nucleic acid sequences in the apoecium; cell DNA.
18	type c rna virus gene expression in human tissue	A gene expression of the rna-like virus in human tissue.
18	clinical staging of malignant lymphoma in patients suspected to have hepato splenic schistosomiasis	Clinical stage of malignant lymphoma in patients suspected of hepatocellular splenic schistosomiasis.
18	ontogeny of mouse t lymphocyte function	Moose; ontogeny of mouse t-cell function.
18	development of b lymphocytes 1 2	The lymphocyte-mediated development of B1 cells.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function with respect to the heterogeneity of antibody affinity 1 2	Lapse; ontogeny of b lymphocyte function with respect to apos; heterogeneity of apos; antibody affinity.
18	casein induced experimental amyloidosis v the response of lymphoid organs to t and b mitogens	Casein induced experimental amyloidosis v the response of lymphoid organs to t and b mitogens.
18	marek s disease in immunosuppressed chickens growth of a transplantable lymphoma and development of the disease by natural exposure	Marek's disease in immunocompromised chickens has caused the growth of a transplantable lymphoma and the development of the disease by natural exposure.
18	inhibitory effect of interferon on multiplication of friend leukemia cells in vivo	An inhibitory effect of interferon on the proliferation of friendly leukemia cells in vivo.
18	transplantation behavior of allotransplantable tumor lines derived from immunologically modified hosts	Transplantation behaviour of allotransplantable tumor lines derived from immunologically modified host cells.
18	immunopotentiation with bcg dimensions of a specific antitumor response	Immunopotentiation with bcg d&apos dimensions; a specific anti-tumor response.
18	inhibition of bovine leukemia virus release	Inhibition of bovine leukemia virus release.
18	spontaneous delayed splenic rupture case report of a five year interval between trauma and diagnosis	Case of delayed spontaneous splenic rupture: five-year interval between trauma and diagnosis.
18	immunologic mimicry between mouse tissue and enterobacterial common antigen	Immunological mimicry between mouse tissue and common enterobacterial antigen.
18	localization of a protein antigen in the chicken spleen effect of various manipulative procedures on the morphogenesis of the germinal centre	The effect of various manipulations on the morphogenesis of the germ-center was found to be a protein antigen in the pig spleen.
18	the antagonistic action of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp on proliferation of b and t lymphocytes	L' antagonistic action of cyclic gmp and l' cyclic ampoule on proliferation of b and t lymphocytes.
18	the control of immune response in vitro by ca2 ii the ca2 dependent period during mitogenic stimulation	Control of immune response in vitro by ca2 ii the ca2-dependent period during mitogenic stimulation.
18	binding of normal human igg to myelin sheaths glia and neurons	Binding of normal human igg to myelin sheath is mediated by neurons and glia.
18	the relation between the t cells responsible for cell mediated cytotoxic killing of mastocytoma cells and the helper cell effect	The relationship between t cells responsible for cell-mediated cytotoxic mastocytoma destruction and l' effect of auxiliary cells.
18	delayed hypersensitivity and acquired cellular resistance in guinea pigs infected with listeria monocytogenes	Hypersensitivity was delayed and cellular resistance was acquired in guinea pigs infected with Listeria monocytogenes.
18	genital herpesvirus hominis infection in mice i development of an experimental model	Genital infection with hominis herpesvirus in mice; development of an experimental model.
18	defense mechanisms against infectious bovine rhinotracheitis virus inhibition of virus infection by murine macrophages	Mechanisms of defense against spinal cord injury; inhibition of spinal cord injury; infectious bovine rhinotracheitis virus infection by murine macrophages.
18	studies on the mechanism of macrophage mediated cytotoxicity	Studies on the mechanism of macrophage-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	cell mediated immunity in the uremic rat	Cell-mediated immunity in the uremic rat.
18	immunological abnormalities in splenic atrophy	Immunologic abnormalities in splenic atrophy.
18	splenectomy for haematological cytopenias in patients with malignant lymphomas	Hematological cytopenia splenectomy in patients with malignant lymphoma.
18	atypical spherocytosis a disease of spleen as well as of red blood cells	Atypical spherocytosis is a disease of red blood cells and the spleen.
18	observations on the induction of bone in soft tissues	Observations on induction of os; bone in soft tissue.
18	release of colony stimulating activity from thymus derived lymphocytes	Lymphocyte release; stimulatory activity of colonies of thymus-derived lymphocytes.
18	alloimmune cytotoxic t cells evidence that they recognize serologically defined antigens and bear clonally restricted receptors	Alloimmune cytotoxic t cells show that they recognize serologically defined antigens and qu*apos; they carry restricted clonal receptors.
18	a limited number of globin genes in human dna	A limited number of globin genes in human DNA.
18	activation of t and b lymphocytes in vitro ii biological and biochemical properties of an allogeneic effect factor aef active in triggering specific b lymphocytes	T-cell and b-cell activation in vitro ii biological and biochemical properties of dapos; a dapo factor; active allogeneic effect in the elicitation of specific b-cells.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro 3 tolerogenic properties of the terpolymer l glutamic acid 60 l alanine30 l tyrosine10 gat for spleen cells from nonresponder h 2s and h 2q mice	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro 3 tolerant properties of l' terpolymeric glutamic acid l 60 l alanine30 l tyrosine10 gat for spleen cells of unresponsive h2s and h2q mice.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro iv conditions for cooperative interactions between nonresponder parental b cells and primed responder plus nonresponder f1 t cells in the development of an antibody response under ir gene control in vitro	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro x conditions d' cooperative interactions between non-responding parental b cells and more non-responding t-responsive t cells initiated in the development of apo; immune response under ir gene control in vitro.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response x t cell dependent suppression in tolerant mice	Cell-to-cell interaction in immune response x t cell dependent suppression in tolerant mice.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response ii preferential suppression of high affinity antibody forming cells by carrier primed suppressor t cells	Selective roles of thymus-derived lymphocytes in the antibody response ii preferential suppression of high affinity antibody cells by carrier-initiated t-suppressor cells.
18	separable populations of activated thymus derived lymphocytes identified in two assays for cell mediated immunity to murine tumor allografts	Separable populations of activated thymus-derived lymphocytes were identified in two assays on cell-mediated immunity to murine tumor allografts.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes vi cooperative responses between lymphocytes derived from mouse donor strains differing at genes in the s and d regions of the h 2 complex	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t-lymphocytes and b-lymphocytes vi cooperative responses between lymphocytes derived from mouse donor strains that differ at the level of the genes in the s and d regions of the h2 complex.
18	enhancement of tumor growth by graft versus host reaction	Augment tumor growth by the graft-versus-host reaction.
18	cellular immunity against rous sarcomas of chickens preferential reactivity against autochthonous target cells as determined by lymphocyte adherence and cytotoxicity tests in vitro	Chicken cell immunity against rous sarcomas has preferential reactivity against autochthonous target cells as determined by lymphocyte adhesion and in vitro cytotoxicity tests.
18	induction of increased calcium uptake in mouse t lymphocytes by concanavalin a and its modulation by cyclic nucleotides	L' induction of apo; an increase in calcium uptake in mouse t lymphocytes by concanavalin a and its modulation by cyclic nucleotides.
18	thymic regeneration after lethal irradiation evidence for an intra thymic radioresistant t cell precursor	Thymus regeneration after lethal irradiation revealed the presence of an intrathymic radiation resistant precursor of t cells.
18	effect of cortisone on the disappearance kinetics and tissue localization of soluble immune complexes	The effect of cortisone on the disappearance kinetics and tissue localization of soluble immune complexes.
18	antibody mediated suppression of grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic function non thymus derived lymphocytes macrophages platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in syngeneic and allogeneic hosts	L' antibody suppresses grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic function of non-thymic thymus macrophage platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in both syngene and allogeneic hosts.
18	the role of macrophages in the production of lymphokines by t and b lymphocytes	The role of macrophages in the production of lymphokines by t and b lymphocytes.
18	the frequency of phosphorylcholine specific b cells in conventional and germfree balb c mice	The frequency of phosphorylcholine-specific b cells in traditional and germless bb c mice.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses i the effect of cell number on the response	Cellular cooperation during in vivo antibody-haptene responses i l' effect of cell number on response.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses ii the effect of in vivo and in vitro x irradiation on t and b cells	Cellular cooperation during in vivo antibody responses-haptene ii l&apos effect; x-radiation in vivo and in vitro on t and b cells.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses iii the helper cell activity of activated thymocytes of spleen cells treated with anti theta serum and of spleen cells from anti thymocyte serum treated or adult thymectomized donors	Cellular cooperation during anti-apos antibody responses; in vivo hapten iii lapos; thymocyte activated thymocyte auxiliary cell activity from antitheta serum treated spleen cells from thymocyte serum treated or adult thymectomized donors.
18	amyloid fibril protein related to immunoglobulin lambda chains	Amyloid fibrillar protein related to lambda chains of l' immunoglobulin.
18	comparison of scrapie and transmissible mink encephalopathy in hamsters ii clinical signs pathology and pathogenesis	Comparison of scrapie and scrapie; transmissible mink encephalopathy in hamsters ii Clinical signs Pathology and pathogenesis.
18	host control of endogenous murine leukemia virus gene expression concentrations of viral proteins in high and low leukemia mouse strains	Host of concentrations of viral proteins from endogenous murine leukemia virus in low- and high-leukemia strains of mice.
18	type c viral expression in primate tissues	C-type viral expression in primate tissues.
18	lymphomas clinical stages	These are clinical stages of lymphoma.
18	influence of dietary protein restriction on immune competence i effect on the capacity of cells from various lymphoid organs to induce graft vs host reactions	L' influence of dietary protein restriction on immune competence has an effect on the capacity of cells of various D&apos lymphoid organs; induce graft reactions-host.
18	heterogeneity of the balb c antiphosphorylcholine antibody response at the precursor cell level	Heterogeneity of the balb phosphorylcholine c antibody response in the precursor cells.
18	relationship between fc receptors antigen binding sites on t and b cells and h 2 complex associated determinants	Relationship between fc receptor binding sites on t and b cells and determinants associated with the h2 complex.
18	genetic regulation of the antibody response to h 2db alloantigens in mice i differences in activation of helper t cells in c57bl 10 and balb c congenic strains	Genetic regulation of the immune response to alloantigenic h 2db in mice; activation of helper cells in c57bl 10 and balb c congenic strains.
18	rosette forming ability of thymus derived lymphocytes in humoral and cell mediated immunity ii helper cell activity	The ability of thymus-derived lymphocytes to form rosettes in apo; humoral immunity and apo; cell-mediated immunity ii helps apo; cell activity.
18	extracardiac abnormalities in infants with congenital heart disease	Extracardiac abnormalities in infants with congenital heart disease.
18	evidence for identity or close association of the fc receptor of b lymphocytes and alloantigens determined by the ir region of the h 2 complex	Evidence of the identity or association of the fc receptor of b lymphocytes and alloantigens as determined by the ir region of the h2 complex.
18	immunological studies in the postsplenectomy syndrome	Immunological studies on the post-plenectomy syndrome.
18	islet cell tumors in childhood	Pancreatic islet cell tumours in childhood.
18	failure of lymphocytes to reexpress antigen receptors after brief interaction with a tolerogenic d amino acid copolymer	Failure of lymphocytes to reexpress antigen receptors after brief interaction with a d-copolymer of tolerant amino acids.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro i response of normal and immune mouse spleen cells in mixed leukocyte cultures	In vitro production of cytotoxic t-cells i response of normal and immune mouse spleen cells in mixed leukocyte cultures.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro ii effect of repeated exposure to alloantigens on the cytotoxic activity of long term mixed leukocyte cultures	Cytotoxic lymphocyte generation in vitro ii effect of os; repeated exposure to alloantigens on apos; cytotoxic activity of long-term mixed leukocyte cultures.
18	evaluation of carbon 11 labelled phenylglycine and phenylalanine for pancreas scintigraphy	Evaluation of carbon 11 labelled phenylglycine and phenylalanine for pancreatic scintigraphy.
18	incorporation of a 131 iodine deoxycytidine monophosphate protamine complex into the dna of tumor bearing rats following partial synchronization with hydroxyurea	Incorporation of a 131 iodine deoxycytidine monophosphate protamine complex in apo; DNA from tumor-carrying rats after partial synchronization with apo; hydroxyurea.
18	enzymatic synthesis of oligonucleotides of defined sequence addition of short blocks of nucleotide residues to oligonucleotide primers	Enzyme synthesis of apos; oligonucleotides; sequential defined addition of short blocks of nucleotide residues to oligonucleotide primers.
18	determination of the 3 terminal nucleotide of dna fragments	Terminal nucleotide 3 determination of the DNA fragments.
18	rna directed dna synthesis by the dna polymerase of rous sarcoma virus structural and functional identification of 4s primer rna in uninfected cells	Directed synthesis of DNA by sarcoma virus DNA polymerase allows follow-up; structural and functional identification of apos; priming 4s rna in uninfected cells.
18	human myeloma marrow cells in immunologically deficient mice	Human myeloma spinal cord cells in immunologically deficient mice.
18	rb86 uptake of various organs of the spontaneously hypertensive rats a preliminary note	The uptake of rb86 by various organs from the spontaneously hypertensive rats is a preliminary note.
18	protection of a he mice by a friend virus pseudotype against challenge with friend virus	Protect a mouse with a friendly virus pseudotype against challenge by a friendly virus.
18	combination chemotherapy of rauscher leukemia and ascites tumors by narcissus alkaloid with standard drugs and effect on cellular immunity	Combination of leukemia chemotherapy with d*apos tumors; ascites by narcissistic alkaloid with standard drugs and effect on cellular immunity.
18	separation of mouse spleen haematopoietic cell fractions for transplantation purposes in lethally irradiated mice	Separation of mouse spleen hematopoietic cell fractions for transplantation in fatally irradiated mice.
18	isolation of a low molecular weight serum component antigenically related to an amyloid fibril protein of unknown origin	Isolation of a low molecular weight serum component antigenically related to an amyloid fibrillar protein d' origin unknown.
18	evolutionary relationship between immunoglobulins and transplantation antigens	Evolutionary relationships between immunoglobulins and transplantation antigens.
18	elevated cyclic amp levels in mouse lymphoid tissue after stimulation by cholera enterotoxin in vitro 38468	Increases in mouse lymphoid tissue cyclic blisters following elicitation by apos; cholera enterotoxin in vitro 38468.
18	influence of rofenaid 40 feed medication on an experimental salmonella infection in chickens	Influence of rofenaid 40 feed drugs on experimental salmonella infection in chicken.
18	selective thymic localization of murine leukemia virus related antigens in c57bl ka mice after inoculation with radiation virus	Selective thymic localization of murine leukemia virus related antigens in c57bl ka mice after inoculation with the radiotherapy virus.
18	immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumours iv direct cellular cytolysis of 51cr labelled target cells in vitro and analysis of blocking factors which modulate cytotoxicity	Immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumours iv direct cellular cytolysis of 51cr-labelled target cells in vitro and in vitro; cytotoxicity-modifying blocking factors.
18	studies on mouse moloney virus induced tumours i the detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on murine moloney leukaemic spleen cells and on an in vitro moloney sarcoma line by antibody mediated cytotoxicity	Mouse moloney virus studies induced tumours i the detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on mouse moloney leukemic spleen cells and on an in vitro moloney sarcoma line by antibody-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	correction of a murine mammary tumor virus associated immunological depression by selective immunosuppression with cytosine arabinoside	Dapos-associated immunologic depression corrected; a murine breast tumour by selective immunosuppression with cytosine arabinoside.
18	resistance to infection with nocardia asteroides	Resistance to apos; nocardia asteroides infection.
18	inhibition and enhancement of friend leukemia virus by pyran copolymer	Inhibition and increase of amicidal leukemia virus by pyran copolymer.
18	mouse pancreas involvement in murine hepatitis virus infection	Implications of mouse pancreas in apos; hepatitis; hepatitis.
18	hemolytic anemia induced by murine erythroblastosis virus possible mechanisms of hemolysis and effects of an interferon inducer	Hemolytic anemia induced by E. coli; murine erythroblastosis possible mechanisms of apos; hemolysis and effects of apos; inducer; interferon.
18	target cell of the polycythemia inducing friend virus studies with myleran	Target cell of the polycythemia inducing studies on the viral apos; friend with the myler.
18	lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived epstein barr virus	Acute lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived epstein barr virus.
18	immunosuppression in vitro induced by leukemia virus infected splenocytes 38544	Immunosuppression in vitro induced by leukemia virus 38544 infected splenocytes.
18	murine leukaemia virus expression in the akr following thymectomy	Murine leukemia virus expression in apo; after thymectomy.
18	relationship of infectious murine leukemia virus and virus related antigens in genetic crosses between akr and the fv 1 compatible strain c57l	The relationship between the infectious murine leukemia virus and the virus-related antigens in genetic crosses between akr and the c57l compatible strain fv.
18	studies on the role of the host immune response in recovery from friend virus leukemia ii cell mediated immunity	Studies on the role of host immune response in immune recovery; friendly viral leukemia cell-mediated immunity ii.
18	the immune response to infection with vaccinia virus in mice i infection and the production of antibody neutralizing cell associated and cell free virus	The immune response to the vaccine virus infection in mice; infection and production of neutralizing antibodies associated with cells and acellular virus.
18	immunopathology of mouse hepatitis virus type 3 infection iii clinical and virologic observation of a persistent viral infection	Immunopathology of apo; hepatitis type 3 infection in mice; clinical and virological observation of apo; persistent viral infection.
18	properties of cell lines derived from tumors induced by friend virus in balb c and balb c h 2b mice	Properties of cell lines derived from tumours induced by the friendly virus in Berb c and Berb c h 2b mice.
18	a quantitative comparison between in vivo and in vitro derived friend leukemia virus	Quantitative comparison between in vivo and in vitro derived amoebic leukemia virus.
18	coenzyme q deficiency in mice following infection with friend leukemia virus	Coenzyme deficiency q in mice following infection with the amicus curiae leukemia virus.
18	enhanced mononuclear phagocytic activity during trypanosoma cruzi infection in mice	Increase in apos; mononuclear phagocytic activity in trypanosome-infected mice cruzi.
18	effects of newcastle disease virus ndv on infection of adult mice with the thogoto like ar 126 arbovirus	Effects of Newcastle disease virus ndv on apos; ar 126 arbovirus infection of adult mice with thogoto.
18	mechanism of immunologic resistance to herpes simplex virus 1 hsv 1 infection	Mechanisms of immunologic resistance to the virus; herpes simplex 1 hsv 1 infection.
18	diversity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus variation due to replication of the virus in the mouse	Variation of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus due to replication of the virus in the mouse.
18	protection of mice against friend leukemia by active and passive immunization with isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum respectively author s transl	Protection of mice against amicleukemia by active and passive immunization with isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum.
18	activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in spleen nuclei of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Rna polymerase activity dependent on apos; DNA a and b in the spleen nuclei of mice infected with leukemia virus.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from spleen of uninfected and rauscher murine leukemia virus infected nih swiss mice	Deoxyribonucleic acid dependent on apos; ribonucleic acid polymerases from the spleen of uninfected or infected murine leukemia swiss mice.
18	induction of endogenous and of spleen focus forming viruses during dimethylsulfoxide induced differentiation of mouse erythroleukemia cells transformed by spleen focus forming virus	L' induction of endogenous and splenic foci-forming viruses during dimethyl sulfoxide-induced differentiation of mouse erythroleukemia cells transformed by virus forming splenic foci.
18	adaptation to tissue culture of the murine leukemia asl1 a high producer of tl thymus leukemia antigen	Tissue adaptation to the culture of the murine leukemia asl1, a major producer of antigen of thymic leukemia tl.
18	the comparative sensitivity of sheep and chicken embryos to bluetongue virus and observations on viraemia in experimentally infected sheep	Comparison of the sensitivity of sheep and chicken embryos to bluetongue virus and observations on viraemia in experimentally infected sheep.
18	cytopathogenic xc assay for bone marrow from mice infected with murine leukemia viruses	Cytopathogenic xc test for bone marrow of mice infected with murine leukemia viruses.
18	combined phytohaemagglutinin and dianhydrodulcitol treatment of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection in mice	Combination therapy with apos phytohemagglutinin and dianhydrodulcitol; lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection in mice.
18	a live vaccine against tick borne encephalitis integrated studies h histopathology of mice peripherally immunized with e5 14 virus and challenged with virulent virus	A live vaccine against tick-borne encephalitis has been studied in integrated histopathological studies in mice peripherally immunized with the e5 virus and exposed to a virulent virus.
18	isolation of friend leukemia virus resistant line from non inbred mouse colony	Isolate amic leukemia virus resistant line from inbred mouse colony.
18	effect of rifamycin and tilorone derivatives on friend virus leukemia in mice	Effect of rifamycin and tilorone derivatives on oral leukemia; friend in mouse.
18	herpes simplex virus infection in guinea pigs an animal model for studying latent and recurrent herpes simplex virus infection	Fluenza virus infection; herpes simplex virus infection in guinea pig, animal model for apos; study of apos; latent and recurrent infection with apos virus; herpes simplex virus.
18	erythropoietin independent erythroid colony formation in vitro by hemopoietic cells of mice infected with friend virus	Formation of erythroid colonies independent of l' erythropoietin in vitro by hematopoietic cells of mice infected with the virus of l' friend.
18	transient impaired cell mediated tumor immunity after acute infection with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Transient altered cell-mediated tumor immunity after acute infection with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus.
18	granulocytic stem cells in friend leukemia	Granulocytic stem cells in friendly leukemia.
18	tumor colony formation by friend virus infected cells in immunosuppressed mice	Tumour colony formation by apovirus infected cells; friendly in immunocompromised mice.
18	diffusion chamber hematopoiesis in marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a	Dissemination chamber hematopoiesis in the marrow and spleen cells of mice infected with the rlv a russet leukemia virus.
18	cell medicated cytotoxicity against ectromelia virus infected target cells iii role of the h 2 gene complex	Drug-induced cell cytotoxicity against ectromelia virus infected target cells iii role of the h2 gene complex.
18	cell mediated immunity to moloney sarcoma virus in mice ii analysis of antigenic specificities involved in t lymphocyte mediated in vivo rejection of murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Cell-mediated immunity against moloney sarcoma virus in mice ii Analysis of antigenic specificities involved in lymphocyte t by etapos; intermediate for in vivo rejection of murine sarcoma virus induced tumours.
18	target cell dependent t cell mediated lysis of vaccinia virus infected cells	Vaccine virus virus infected cells target cell-dependent t-cell-mediated cellysis.
18	strain dependent expression of endogenous mouse tropic leukemia viruses in chemically induced murine leukemias	A strain-dependent expression of endogenous mouse tropical leukemia viruses in chemically induced murine leukemias.
18	immunological studies with hamster cells transformed by cytomegalovirus and herpes simplex virus type 1	Immunological studies in hamster cells transformed by cytomegalovirus and type 1 herpes simplex virus.
18	response of marmosets to experimental infection with epstein barr virus	Mosquito reactions to epstein virus; experimental infection with epstein barr virus.
18	continuous replication of friend virus complex spleen focus forming virus lymphatic leukemia inducing virus in mouse embryo fibroblasts retention of leukemogenicity and loss of immunosuppressive properties	The continued replication of the virus from the amicable complex of the spleen forming viral viral lymph leukemia inducing virus in mouse fibroblasts maintains leukemogenicity and loss of immunosuppressive properties.
18	the role of the spleen and immunity in the metastatic pattern of a murine reticulum cell sarcoma	The role of the spleen and the apos; immunity in the metastatic pattern of apos; a murine reticulum cell sarcoma.
18	characterization of an early cytotoxicity inducing factor in sera of japanese quails after inoculation with rous sarcoma virus	Characterization of an early induction of cytotoxicity in serum of Japanese quail after inoculation with sarcoma virus.
18	the relation between the proliferative activity and the differentiation pattern of bone marrow cells from rauscher leukemia virus infected balb c mice	The relationship between proliferative activity and the differentiation pattern of bone marrow cells from Balb c mice infected with retching leukemia virus.
18	splenocyte plaque assay for the detection of murine leukemia virus	Splenocyte plaque tests for the detection of murine leukemia virus.
18	stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in balb c mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in balb c mice infected with reuser leukemia virus.
18	reversal of leukemia virus induced immunosuppression in vitro by peritoneal macrophages	L' reversal of leukemia virus induced immunosuppression by peritoneal macrophages in vitro.
18	in vitro granulocytic stem cell clonogenic capacity of marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Clonogenic capacity of granulocyte stem cells in bone marrow and spleen cells from leukemia-infected mice in vitro.
18	the innate resistance of cba mice to endogenous murine leukaemia virus infection	The innate resistance of cba mice to endogenous infection with murine leukemia virus.
18	neuropathological effects of persistent infection of mice by mouse hepatitis virus	Neuropathological effects of apo; persistent infection of mice with apovirus; mouse hepatitis.
18	physiopathology of human and virus induced murine leukemias	Physiopathology of human and virus induced murine leukemias.
18	immune response to rauscher virus induced leukemia in dba mice i role of cellular and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression	The immune response to the Ruscher virus induced leukemia in mice that mediated cellular and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression.
18	mixed lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in a murine sarcoma virus moloney induced tumor system comparison between lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity	Mixed lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in a mouse sarcoma virus induced tumour system, comparison between lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
18	changes in hemopoiesis during the course of acute lcm virus infection in mice	Changes in apos; hemopoiesis during apos; acute lcm virus infection in mice.
18	replication of murine leukemia virus in bone marrow derived lymphocytes	Reproduction of murine leukemia virus in bone marrow derived lymphocytes.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes ii infections of b and t cells with friend virus complex indiffusion chambers and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens	Interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes ii infections of b and t cells with d&apos chambers; complex indialization of the friendly virus and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes iii alterations of splenic b and t cells in friend virus infected mice	Interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes iii alterations of splenic cells b and t from friendly virus infected mice.
18	analysis of the humoral immune response to influenza virus in vitro	An analysis of the humoral immune response to influenza virus in vitro.
18	mitogen induction of murine c type viruses i analysis of lymphoid cell subpopulations	Mitogen-induced murine virus type c i analysis of lymphoid cell populations.
18	cytotoxic t cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice infected with ectromelia virus	Cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice infected with ectromelia virus.
18	mechanisms of genetic resistance to friend virus leukemia iii susceptibility of mitogen responsive lymphocytes mediated by t cells	Mechanisms of genetic resistance to friendly viral leukemia iii susceptibility of t cell-mediated mitogen-sensitive lymphocytes.
18	modification of hemopoietic stem cells of balb c mice by rauscher leukemia virus	Modification of haematopoietic stem cells of balb c mice by leukemia virus.
18	type c rna viruses and leukemogenesis relation of type c virus infectivity and leukemogenesis induced by nitrosourea compounds in mice	C. rna-like viruses and leukemogenesis relationship between type c virus infectivity and leukogenesis induced by nitrosourea compounds in mice.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus induced immunosuppression a virus induced macrophage defect	The lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus caused immunosuppression of apos; a virus-induced macrophage abnormality.
18	histochemical study of the activity of several enzymes in the process of immunogenesis in monkeys orally infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Histochemical study of apo; activity of several enzymes in the process of apo; immunogenesis in monkeys orally infected with tick-borne apo-complex viruses.
18	effects of rauscher leukemia virus infection on balb c mouse embryos	Effects of apo; leukemia virus infection on balb c mouse embryos.
18	immune reactivity in the moloney strain of murine sarcoma virus oncogenesis requirement of thymus derived lymphocytes for in vivo protection	L' immunoreactivity of the moloney strain of murine sarcoma virus requires oncogenesis of thymus-derived lymphocytes for in vivo protection.
18	immunosuppression by moloney leukemia virus lack of correlation between virus replication and the immunosuppressive effect	Molar leukemia virus immunosuppression, lack of correlation between virus replication and the apos; immunosuppressive effect.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against murine cells infected with 6 94 virus a parainfluenza type 1 isolate from multiple sclerosis brain tissue	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against murine cells infected with 6,94-viruses, an isolate of parainfluenza type 1 from brain tissue with multiple sclerosis.
18	comparison of guinea pig cytomegalovirus and guinea pig herpes like virus pathogenesis and persistence in experimentally infected animals	Comparison of guinea pig cytomegalovirus and guinea pig herpes such as virus pathogenesis and persistence in experimentally infected animals.
18	studies on viremia and antibody formation in ducklings and goslings after experimental infection with lednice yaba 1 virus	Studies of viremia and antibody formation in ducklings and goslings after infection; experimental infection with lednice yaba virus 1.
18	quantitation of friend spleen focus forming virus by a nine day 59fe assay	Quantification of apo concentration; friend forming virus by a 9-day test.
18	cell mediated immunity to sendai virus infection in mice	Cell-mediated immunity to apos; sentai virus infection in mice.
18	transmission of murine leukemia virus scripps from parent to progeny mice a comparison of assay systems	Mother to offspring transmission of murine leukemia virus (scripps); comparison of d&apos systems; test.
18	friend spleen focus forming virus production in vitro by a nonerythroid cell line	Focused friend forming virus in vitro by a cell line not-erythroid.
18	the fv 2r resistance gene in mice its effect on spleen colony formation by friend virus transformed cells	In mice the fv 2r resistance gene has an effect on spleen colony formation by the friendly virus, which has transformed cells.
18	growth of a transplantable lymphoma and its modification in mice infected with the inducing virus	Dapos growth; a transplantable lymphoma and its modification in mice infected with the inductive lymphoma virus.
18	biological and biochemical properties of soluble tumor specific transplantation antigen of a simian virus 40 induced neoplasm	Biological and biochemical properties of the cell-specific soluble tumour transplant antigen of a simian virus 40 induced neoplasm.
18	rauscher leukemia virus related sequences in human dna presence in some tissues of some patients with hemotopoietic neoplasias and absence in dna from other tissues	Leukemia virus-related sequencing in the presence of apo; human DNA in some tissues of some patients with hemotopoietic neoplasia and absence of apo; DNA in other tissues.
18	role of macrophages in hepatitis induced by herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 in mice	Role of macrophages in hepatitis induced by herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 in mice.
18	cellular immunity in chronic theiler s virus central nervous system infection	Cellular immunity in apos; central nervous system infection caused by chronic plum pox virus.
18	two functionally distinct anti tumor effector cells isolated from primary murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Two functionally distinct tumor effector cells, isolated from primary murine sarcoma virus, induce tumors.
18	effect of friend leukemia virus on megakaryocytes and platelets in mice	The effect of friendly leukemia virus on megakaryocytes and mouse platelets.
18	action of different cell types in influenza antibody production 5 keeping the immunologic memory to influenza virus a serotype by b and t lymphocytes	The action of different cell types in influenza production; anti-influenza antibody 5 retains immunologic memory of the influenza virus; influenza a serotype by b and t lymphocytes.
18	replication of herpes simplex virus in mouse spleen cell cultures stimulated by lipopolysaccharide	Replication of herpes simplex virus in lipopolysaccharide-stimulated mouse spleen cell cultures.
18	pathogenesis of cytomegalovirus infection distribution of viral products immune complexes and autoimmunity during latent murine infection	Pathogenesis of apo; cytomegalovirus infection distribution of complex immune and auto products-immunity during apo; murine infection latent.
18	expression of endogenous murine leukemia viruses during the course of a protracted immunological disorder	The expression of endogenous murine leukemia viruses during apo; a prolonged immunological disorder.
18	mechanisms of suppression of cytotoxic t cell responses in murine lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection	Mechanisms of suppression of cytotoxic t cell responses in apo; murine choriomeningitis virus infection.
18	immunofluorescence and histologic studies of virus induced murine lymphocytic leukemias	Virus-induced immunofluorescence and histological studies of murine lymphocyte leukemias were performed.
18	genetic control of antinuclear antibodies in mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	The genetic control of anti-nuclear antibodies in mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus.
18	viral growth in splenic megakaryocytes of mice experimentally infected with mouse hepatitis virus mhv 2	Viral growth in splenic megakaryocytes of mice experimentally infected with LV; hepatitis in mice mhv 2.
18	nasoencephalopathy of mice infected intrananasally with a mouse hepatitis virus jhm strain	Nasoencephalopathic infection of mice infected with an intranasal strain of L. etapos virus; mouse hepatitis jhm.
18	changes in the cholesterol and phospholipid content of mouse spleen after raucscher leukemia virus infection	Changes in cholesterol and phospholipid content of mouse spleen after apos; Caucasian leukemia virus infection.
18	expression of an antigen associated with gross virus on the surfaces of murine cells producing an oncornavirus from the radioleukemia of c57bl 6 mice	An antigen associated with a macroscopic virus on the surfaces of murine cells producing an oncornavirus from the radiolukemia of c57bl 6 mice.
18	biosynthesis of subviral oncogenic particles virosomes in mitochondria of rous sarcoma and rauscher murine leukemia cells	Biosynthesis of oncogenic particle virosomes under @-@virales in rat sarcoma and rauscher murine leukemia cell mitochondria.
18	cytotoxic t cells specific for influenza virus infected target cells	Specific cytotoxic t-cells for potato virus infected target cells.
18	effects of lymphocytes from marek s disease infected chickens on mitogen responses of syngeneic normal chicken spleen cells	The effects of lymphocytes from Marek disease infected chickens on mitogenic responses of normal spleen cells of syngenic chickens were investigated.
18	the cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized lymphocytes from mouse strains of varying h 2 specificities on lcm virus infected l cells	Cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized lymphocytes from mouse strains with variable h2 specificities on lcm cells infected with lcm virus.
18	splenic erythroid response to friend polycythemia virus time course in vitro after infection in vivo	Splenic erythroid reaction to apos; friend polycythemia virus evolution in vitro after apos; in vivo infection.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia virus iii quantitation of spontaneous virus expression	Immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia virus iii quantification of spontaneous viral expression.
18	naturally occurring mouse hepatitis virus infection in the nude mouse	Natural infection with potato virus; mouse hepatitis in the naked mouse.
18	leucocyte migration inhibition test as an index of immunological response to measles virus i effect of the environment and measles virus on migration of monkey leucocytes	Dapos tests; inhibition of leukocyte migration as an index of immune response to measles virus; effect of environment and measles virus on migration of monkey leukocytes.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iii effects on spleen t cells	L' immunosuppressive effect of the friendly virus iii on spleen t cells.
18	virus expression in different tissues of normal and tumor bearing mice inoculated with a murine leukemia virus	Viral expression in different tissues of normal and tumour-carrying mice inoculated with a murine leukemia virus.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis in laboratory personnel exposed to hamsters inadvertently infected with lcm virus	Lymphocytic cheningitis in laboratory personnel exposed to hamsters inadvertently infected with lcm virus.
18	effect of silica on the pathogenic distinction between herpes simplex virus type 1 and 2 hepatitis in mice	Effect of silica on the pathogenic distinction between herpes simplex virus type 1 and type 2 hepatitis in mice.
18	general immunocompetence of rats bearing avian sarcoma virus induced intracranial tumors	L' general immunocompetence of rats carrying avian sarcoma virus induced intracranial tumours.
18	cellular immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumors as measured by macrophage migration inhibition assays	Cellular immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumours as measured by macrophage migration inhibition.
18	immunosuppression by spleen cells from moloney leukemia iii evidence for a suppressor cell that is not the leukemic virus producing cell	Molar leukemia spleen cell immunosuppression indicates the existence of a suppressive cell that is not the leukemic virus producing cell.
18	role of friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus in immunization against friend leukemia complex	Role of friend-associated lymphatic leukemia virus in apo; immunization against friend leukemia complex.
18	specifically immune mouse t cells can destroy h 2 compatible murine target cells infected with herpes simplex virus types 1 or 2	Specially immunized mouse t-cells can destroy compatible h2 murine target cells infected with herpes simplex virus types 1 or 2.
18	age distribution and serological reactivity of viral antigen in brains of mice infected congenitally with lmc virus	Age and serologic reactivity of viral antigen in brain of mouse congenitally infected with LCM virus.
18	in vitro mitogenic stimulation of murine spleen cells by herpes simplex virus	Mitogenic stimulation of mouse spleen cells by herpes simplex virus in vitro.
18	cell mediated cytotoxic response to cells bearing marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with marek s disease virus	Cell-mediated cytotoxic reaction to cell-carrying Marek disease tumor-associated surface antigen in chickens infected with Marek disease virus.
18	specificity studies on cytotoxic thymus derived lymphocytes reactive with influenza virus infected cells evidence for dual recognition of h 2 and viral hemagglutinin antigens	Specificity studies on thymus-derived cytotoxic lymphocytes reacting with L. influenzae virus infected cells demonstrate double recognition of h 2 and viral hemagglutinin antigens.
18	failure of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a to develop splenic colonies	Failure of mice infected with the rlv leukemia virus to develop splenic colonies.
18	the recovery of mice from influenza virus infection adoptive transfer of immunity with immune t lymphocytes	Recovery of mice infected with rabies virus; adopted influenza Transfer of abs; immunity with immune t lymphocytes.
18	requirements for stimulation of t cell responses against virus infected cells nature of ectromelia virus infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t cells in a secondary response in vitro	The need for stimulation of the responses of t-cells against naturally infected cells of ectromelia-infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t-cells in a secondary response in vitro.
18	protective activity of secondary effector t cells generated in vitro against ectromelia virus infection in vivo	Protective activity of ectomycorrhizal t-cells; secondary effector generated in vitro against ectromelia virus infection in vivo.
18	immunological tolerance to lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus in neonatally infected virus carrier mice evidence supporting a clonal inactivation mechanism	Immunological tolerance to lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus in newly infected mice infected with the virus, evidence of apos; a clonal dapos mechanism; inactivation.
18	effect of pseudotype on abelson virus and kirsten sarcoma virus induced leukemia	L' effect of pseudotype on Abelson virus and Kirsten sarcoma virus induced leukemia.
18	an analysis of the role of lymphatic leukemia virus in the immunodepression exerted by friend complex in leukaemia resistant c57bl 6 mice	An analysis of the role of lymphatic leukemia virus in immune suppression by the friendly complex in leukemia-resistant c57bl 6 mice.
18	comparative study of b lymphocyte activity in the spleen of mice infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Comparative study of apo; b lymphocyte activity in the spleen of mice infected with tick-borne spongiform viruses; encephalitis.
18	effect of phenylhydrazine pretreatment on splenectomized rauscher leukemia virus infected mice	Effect of phenylhydrazine pretreatment on splenectomized rausseous leukemia virus infected mice.
18	suppressor cells in mice with murine mammary tumor virus induced mammary tumors i inhibition of mitogen induced lymphocyte stimulation	Suppressant cells from mice with apothecia; a murine mammary tumour induces mammary tumors i inhibition of mitogen-induced lymphocyte stimulation.
18	the reticuloendothelium as the target in a virus infection pichinde virus pathogenesis in two strains of hamsters	Reticuloendothelium as a target in the pathogenesis of the apovirus; pichinde infection in two strains of hamsters.
18	characteristics of the cellular rna in viral leukemia	Characteristics of the cellular rna in viral leukemia.
18	the effect of rauscher murine leukemia virus infection on the hemopoietic system of balb c mice cell proliferation and cell loss	The effect of rauscher murine leukemia virus infection on the hemopoietic system of cell proliferation and cell loss.
18	helper independent mink cell focus inducing strains of friend murine type c virus potential relationship to the origin of replication defective spleen focus forming virus	Assisting independent mink cells to induce strains of type c friendly murine virus in potential association with apos; origin of defective replication of defective spleen focal virus.
18	effect of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg infection on the resistance of mice to ectromelia virus infection participation of interferon in enhanced resistance	Effect of apos; mycobacterium tuberculosis infection bcg on mouse resistance to participation of apos; interferon to apos; increased resistance to ectromelia virus infection.
18	innate cytotoxicity of cba mouse spleen cells to sendai virus infected l cells	Inborn cytotoxicity of cba mouse spleen cells to sendai virus infected l cells.
18	the detection of a spleen focus forming virus neoantigen by lymphocyte mediated cytolysis	Lymphocyte-mediated cytolysis is the detection of a novel viral antigen that forms a focal point in the spleen.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 1 description of the reaction	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by the avian sarcoma virus 1 description of the reaction.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 2 sensitivity of different subclones	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 2 sensitized by different-clones.
18	in vitro studies on cellular immunity in mice infected with influenza virus	In vitro studies on apo; cellular immunity in mice infected with influenza virus.
18	persistence and pathogenicity of defective friend spleen focus forming virus decreased transplantability of hemopoietic cells as a marker for preleukemic change	The persistence and pathogenicity of a dysfunctional splenic virus have decreased the transplantability of hematopoietic cells as markers for apo; a preleukemic change.
18	effect of infection of mice with friend leukemia complex viruses on background antibody forming cell production in vitro	Effect of apo; infection of mice with friendly leukemia viruses on production of in vitro cell-forming antibodies.
18	murine leukemia cell hybrids the quantity of tl antigens expressed by parental and hybrid cells fails to correlate with their sensitivity to tl antibody and complement	In murine leukemia cell hybrids the amount of tl antigens expressed by n&apos parental and hybrid cells is not correlated with their sensitivity to tl antibody and complement.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iv effects on spleen b lymphocytes	Immunosorbent therapy; immunosorbent effect of friend IV virus on spleen b lymphocytes.
18	density gradient separation of spleen cell subpopulations from marek s disease virus infected chickens	Separation of sub-spleen cell populations in Marek disease virus infected chickens along a density gradient.
18	antibody induced loss of friend virus leukemia cell surface antigens occurs during progression of erythroleukemia in f1 mice	Antibody-induced loss of leukemia cell surface antigens from human papillomavirus; friend occurs during progression of l*apos; erythroleukemia in f1 mice.
18	radiation leukemia in c57bl 6 mice iii correlation of altered expression of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase to induction of leukemia	RED LEUKEMA in mice c57bl 6 iii correlation between the apos; altered expression of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase and l' induction of leukemia.
18	activation of latent murine cytomegalovirus infection cocultivation cell transfer and the effect of immunosuppression	Cultivation cell transfer activation; latent murine cytomegalovirus infection and effect of apos; immunosuppression.
18	purification of rna directed dna polymerase from mouse spleen infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Purification of apos; directed DNA polymerase from mouse spleen infected with leukemia reuser virus.
18	effect of methotrexate on the activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in the spleen of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus and on the development of virus induced leukemia	Effect of methotrexate on apos; apos-dependent rna polymerase activity; DNA a and b in the spleen of mice infected with the russeus leukemia virus and on the development of virus-induced leukemia.
18	rous sarcoma virus transformed avian cells express four different cell surface antigens that are distinguishable by a cell mediated cytotoxicity blocking test	The rous sarcoma virus transformed avian cells express four different cell surface antigens that can be distinguished by a cell-mediated cytotoxicity blockade assay.
18	suppression and enhancement of mitogen response in chickens infected with marek s disease virus and the herpesvirus of turkeys	The suppression and enhancement of the mitogenic response in chickens infected with Marek disease and l'apos; turkey herpesviruses.
18	macrophage activation during experimental murine brucellosis a basis for chronic infection	Macrophage activation during experimental murine brucellosis is imminent; origin of chronic infections.
18	neuromorphological and immunofluorescence study of experimental infection caused by the attenuated strain of tick borne encephalitis virus	Neuromorphological and immunofluorescent study of lidos; experimental infection caused by the attenuated strain of lidos virus; encephalitis transmitted by the tick.
18	a role for elevated h 2 antigen expression in resistance to neoplasia caused by radiation induced leukemia virus enhancement of effective tumor surveillance by killer lymphocytes	Increased risk; Increased risk; Expression of risk; Antigen 2 in resistance to radiation-induced neoplasia increases risk; Effectiveness of tumour surveillance by killer lymphocytes.
18	demonstration of marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with nononcogenic marek s disease virus and herpesvirus of turkeys	Demonstration of surface antigens associated with horse disease in chickens infected with non-cancerous horse disease virus and herpesviruses of turkeys.
18	characterization of phosphatidylthreonine in polyoma virus transformed fibroblasts	Characterization of phosphatidylthreonine in polyoma virus-transformed fibroblasts transformed fibroblasts.
18	incapacity of hematopoietic stem cell deprived mice to produce tumor colonies induced by friend virus infected cells	L' inability of hematopoietic stem cells to produce tumor colonies induced by friendly virus infected cells deprives mice.
18	cell mediated immunity to antigens associated with murine sarcoma virus induced tumors augmentation of cytolytic t lymphocyte activity by successive specific and nonspecific stimulation in vitro	Cell-mediated immunity to the antigens associated with murine sarcoma virus caused seizures; tumour increase in seizures; cytolytic t lymphocyte activity by sequential specific and nonspecific stimulation in vitro.
18	suppression of in vitro antibody response by spleen cells of mice infected with friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus	Suppression of the antibody response in vitro by spleen cells of mice infected with a friend-associated lymphatic leukemia virus.
18	antigenic properties and molecular weights of murine leukemia virus binding proteins	Antigenic properties and molecular weights of murine leukemia virus binding proteins.
18	variations in expression of xenotropic murine leukemia virus genomes in lymphoid tissues of nzb mice	Variations in apo; expression of xenotropic murine leukemia virus genomes in lymphoid tissues of nzb mice.
18	murine antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity to herpes simplex virus infected target cells	Mouse antibody-dependent cell cytotoxicity for herpes simplex virus infected target cells.
18	friend erythroleukemia antigen a viral antigen specified by spleen focus forming virus and differentiation antigen controlled by the fv 2 locus	L' l&apos antigen; friendly erythroleukemia is a viral antigen specified by the spleen concentration virus and l' differentiation antigen controlled by the fv 2 locus.
18	listeria pneumonitis influence of route of immunization on resistance to airborne infection	Listeria pneumonitis influences the route of immunization on resistance to airborne infections.
18	absence of ecotropic or recombinant murine leukaemia virus in preleukaemic and leukaemic x irradiated nzb mice	Absence of ecotropic or recombinant murine leukemia virus in leukemic and preleukemic irradiated nzb mice x.
18	the timing of the immune response in relation to virus growth determines the outcome of the lcm infection	The timing of the immune response to viral growth determines the outcome of the infection.
18	effect of bordetella pertussis vaccine on the course of lymphocytic choriomeningitis lcm virus infection in suckling mice pretreated with dianhydrodulcitol dad	Effect of Bordetella pertussis vaccine on apos development; lymphocyte choriomeningitis lcm virus infection in lactating mice pretreated with dianhydrodulcitol, papa.
18	changes in hemopoiesis of mice of the c3h strain following transplantation of gardner lymphosarcoma and infection with ldh virus i circulating blood	Hemopoietic changes in mice of the c3h strain following transplantation of Gardner lymphosarcoma and l' infection with circulating blood ldhi virus.
18	antibody induced modulation of friend virus cell surface antigens decreases virus production by persistent erythroleukemia cells influence of the rfv 3 gene	Sympathetic antibody-induced antibody modulation of apovirus surface antigens decreases virus production by persistent erythroleukemia cells under the influence of rfv3 gene.
18	fv 2 locus controls expression of friend spleen focus forming virus specific sequences in normal and infected mice	The fv 2 locus controls l' expression of virus-specific spleen-focus sequences in normal and infected mice.
18	induction of virus specific and h 2 restricted cytotoxic t cells by uv inactivated murine cytomegalovirus	L' induction of virus-specific cytotoxic t cells and h2 cells by mouse cytomegalovirus inactivated by apos; uv limited cytotoxic t cell production.
18	quantitative changes in the cellular makeup of the spleen in mice infected with the rauscher leukemia virus and brucella abortus	Quantitative changes in the cellular composition of the spleen in mice infected with racer leukemia virus and brucella abortus.
18	the role of the spleen in tumor growth kinetics of the murine b cell leukemia bcl1	The role of the spleen in tumor growth kinetics of bcl1 murine leukemia.
18	expression of fv 4r allele in hematopoietic cells from g mice resistant to friend leukemia virus	Expression of apo; fv 4r allele in hematopoietic cells of g mice resistant to the amic leukemia virus.
18	further characterization of the polyoma virus y8e from a rauscher leukaemia virus producing mouse cell line and detection of partial sequence homology between polyoma virus y8edna and hamster papovavirus dna	Further characterization of y8e polyoma virus from dapos; a leukemia-producing mouse cell line and detection of apos; partial sequence homology between y8edna polyoma virus and hamster papovavirus DNA.
18	pathogenicity of mengo virus to mice iii potentiation of infection by immunosuppressants	Pathogenicity of mengo virus to mice iii potentiation of apos; immunosuppressive infection.
18	experimental infection of broiler and leghorn chickens with virulent and avirulent isolates of hemorrhagic enteritis virus	Experimental infection of broiler chickens and leghorn chickens with virulent and avirulent isolates of l'apos virus; hemorrhagic enteritis.
18	inhibition of in vitro friend murine leukemia virus infection of lipopolysaccharide activated b cells with concanavalin a	L' inhibition of apos; murine leukemia virus infection of concanavalin a lipopolysaccharide-activated cells in vitro.
18	properties of dna dependent rna polymerase from spleens of mice infected with rauscher leukemic virus	Properties of rna polymerase from leukemic virus infected mouse spleens.
18	characterization of a friend virus replicating target cell	Characterization of apos; a friendly virus replicating target cell.
19	inactivations of oxytocin suggesting peptide denaturation	Apos inactivations; oxytocin suggesting peptide denaturation.
19	inheritance of a serum protein in swine	Apos inheritance; a serum protein in pigs.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia i experimental transmission etiology and pathology	Contagious swine pleuropneumonia i experimental transmission etiology and pathology.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia ii studies of the pathogenicity of the etiological agent hemophilus pleuropneumoniae	Contagious pig pleuropneumonia ii studies of the pathogenicity of the etiologic agent hemophilus pleuropneumoniae.
19	the presence of renin activity in blood vessel walls	The presence of renin activity in blood vessel walls is indicative of the presence of apos; renin activity.
19	studies on human antibodies ii distribution of genetic factors	Studies on anti-anti-anti-anti-anti-anti-human anti-antibody antibodies, distribution of genetic factors.
19	parathion activation by livers of aquatic and terrestrial vertebrates	L' parathion activation by liver in aquatic and terrestrial vertebrates.
19	powassan virus summer infection cycle 1964	Powassan, cycle of apoes; summer infection 1964.
19	an attenuated mutant of japanese encephalitis virus	An attenuated mutant of the Japanese encephalitis virus.
19	research on ascariasis immunity and immunodiagnosis	Ascariasis immunity and immunodiagnosis research.
19	allosteric properties of glutamate dehydrogenases from different sources	Allosteric properties of glutamate dehydrogenases from different sources.
19	characteristics of clostridium perfringens strains associated with food and food borne disease	Characteristics of clostridium perfringens strains associated with potato diseases; food and food origin.
19	chemically defined medium for some microaerophilic vibrios	A chemically defined medium for some microaerophilic vibrios.
19	effect on the white rat uterus of a toxic substance isolated from fusarium	Effects on the white rat uterus, a toxic substance isolated from the fusarium.
19	serum fractions inhibitory to the growth of leptospires	Serum fractions inhibit the growth of the leptospires.
19	thyrocalcitonin hypocalcemic hypophosphatemic principle of the thyroid gland	Acute hypocalcemic hypophosphatemia of the thyroid gland.
19	comparison of the bactericidal activity of different vertebrate sera	Comparison of the bactericidal activity of different vertebrate sera.
19	inhibitors of histamine catabolism and the action of gastrin in the rat	Catabolism inhibitors of histamine and histamine; action of gastrin in the rat.
19	hog cholera v demonstration of the antigen in swine tissues by the fluorescent antibody technique	Cholera du porc v demonstration of the antigen in the porcine tissues by the technique of fluorescent antibodies.
19	the physiopathological changes in synovial fluid in arthritic swine	Physiopathological changes in synovial fluid in arthritic pigs.
19	observations on a swine herd health program	Comments on swine herd health program.
19	bone density measurements in vivo improvement of x ray densitometry	Bone density measurements in vivo enhance X-ray densitometry.
19	hog cholera iv detection of the virus in tissue culture preparations by the fluorescent antibody technique	Hog cholera iv detection of the virus in tissue culture preparations by the fluorescent antibody technique.
19	minor proteases in the stomach of the pig	Minor proteases in the stomach of the pig.
19	studies on human antibodies iv purification and properties of anti a and anti b obtained by absorption and elution from insoluble blood group substances	Human antibody studies iv purification and properties of anti a and b obtained by absorption and elution from insoluble blood-group materials.
19	characterization of the renin antirenin system	Characterization of the renin antirenin system.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs ii the immune response	Studies of l' Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs ii the immune response.
19	thyrocalcitonin cytological localization by immunofluorescence	Immunofluorescence cytological localization of thyrocalcitonin.
19	isolation of salmonellae by selective motility systems	The isolation of salmonellae by selective motility systems.
19	piglet birthweights and the order of farrowing	The weight of the piglets at birth and the order of the shoots.
19	plaque formation by teschen disease virus and the effect of certain associated factors	Plaque formation by the disease virus of the testes and apos; effect of certain associated factors.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine ii selected characteristics of a cytopathogenic virus common to five isolates from transmissible gastroenteritis	Porcine Transmissible Enteritis Studies ii Selected characteristics of a cytopathogenic virus common to five isolates of transmissible enteritis.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs i experimental reproduction of colibacillosis	Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs experimental reproduction of colibacillosis.
19	gel filtration applied to the study of lipases and other esterases	Gel filtration applied to the apos; study of lipases and other esterases.
19	an antiviral substance from penicillium funiculosum vi prevention of the establishment of passive immunity to semliki forest virus infection in mice by helenine	An antiviral substance of penicillium funiculosum vi prevents apos establishment; passive immunity to apos; semiliki forest virus infection in mice with apos; helenin.
19	metabolism of d glucuronolactone in mammalian systems inhibitory properties of the products of d glucuronolactone dehydrogenase action	Metabolism of glucuronolactone d in mammalian systems, inhibitory properties of the products of l' action of glucuronolactone dehydrogenase d.
19	mechanism of action and some properties of a tissue activator of plasminogen	Mechanism of action and some properties of a tissue activator of plasminogen.
19	autochthonous intestinal bacterial flora and cholesterol levels in specific pathogen free swine fed high lipid and high sucrose diets	The autochthonous intestinal bacterial flora and cholesterol levels in free-ranging swine; specific pathogens were fed high-fat and high-sucrose diets.
19	mycoplasma latex agglutination reaction	D&apos reaction; mycoplasma latex agglutination.
19	leptospiral selection growth and virulence in synthetic medium	Leptospiral selection growth and virulence in a synthetic medium.
19	role of differential air pressure zones in the control of aerosols in a large animal isolation facility	The role of air pressure zones in the control of aerosols in a PCB plant; the isolation of large animals.
19	movement of lipids into and out of the blood during hyperlipidemia induced in rabbits by pituitary extract and fraction h	Lipid movement in and out of the blood during apo; hyperlipidemia induced in rabbits by apo; pituitary extract and fraction h.
19	decarboxylation of 2 keto fatty acids by brain	Decarboxylation of 2 keto fatty acids by brain.
19	a soluble precipitating antigen hca from hog cholera virus propagated in tissue culture ii incidence of hca antibodies in sera of hog cholera immune and nonimmune swine	A soluble hca precipitating antigen of swine cholera virus is spread in tissue cultures ii incidence of hca antibodies in immune and nonimmune swine cholera sera.
19	some observations on the penetration of antibiotics through mucus in vitro	Some observations on the penetration of antibiotics into mucus in vitro.
19	studies on the content of antibodies for equine influenza viruses in human sera	Studies on the content of antibodies against equine influenza in human sera.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs clinical studies and preliminary transmission trials	Exudative epidermitis in porcine clinical studies and preliminary transmission trials.
19	some observations on the diagnosis and epidemiology of leptospirosis in swine	Some observations on the diagnosis and epidemiology of leptospirosis in swine.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs 3 evaluation of orally administered specific antisera	Dosage studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic swine 3 evaluation of specific oral antisera.
19	screening test of animal sera for the cultivation of leptospires	A test for the screening of serum from animals for the cultivation of leptospores.
19	leucine aminopeptidase in extracts of swine muscle	Leucine aminopeptidase in extracts of pig muscle.
19	the intestinal absorption of pig and bovine immune lactoglobulin and human serum albumin by the new born pig	L' intestinal absorption of lactoglobulin and d' swine and bovine human serum albumin by the new hog.
19	powassan virus persistence of virus activity during 1966	Powassan virus, persistence of viral activity in 1966.
19	the response of colostrum deprived specific pathogen free pigs to experimental infection with teschen disease virus	The response of colostrum deprived free pigs of testicular disease-specific pathogens, an experimental virus infection.
19	the isolation of hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulphate from kidneys and their reaction with urinary hyaluronidase	L' isolation of kidney hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulfate and their reaction with urinary hyaluronidase.
19	the immune response to a hybrid protein molecule specificity of secondary stimulation and of tolerance induction	The immune response to specificity of a hybrid protein molecule of secondary stimulation and d' tolerance induction.
19	toxicity to rats of corn invaded by chaetomium globosum	Toxicity to rats of corn that have been invaded by chaetomium globosum.
19	group q streptococci i ecology serology physiology and relationship to established enterococci	Serological group q streptococci i serological physiology and relationship to established enterococci.
19	alkaline and acid phosphatase activity ph and osmotic pressure of boar semen	Alkaline phosphatase and ph-acid activity and osmotic pressure of boar sperm.
19	a study of procine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area i isolation and serological grouping of viruses	A study of procinative enteroviruses isolated from swine in the Toronto area i isolation and serologic clustering of viruses.
19	positional distribution of isomers of monoenoic fatty acids in animal glycerolipids	The positional distribution of isomers of monoenoic fatty acids in animal glycerolipids.
19	pepsinogen c and pepsin c further purification and amino acid composition	Pepsinogen c and pepsin c further purification and amino acid composition.
19	the requirement for bivalent cations in formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by nicotinamide mononucleotide adenylyltransferase of pig liver nuclei	The requirement for divalent cations in the formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by nicotinamide mononucleotide adenyltransferase from pig liver nuclei.
19	histidine sequences in the active centres of some serine proteinases	D' histidine sequences in the active centers of certain serine proteinases.
19	kinetic studies with liver galactokinase	Kinetic studies with hepatic galactokinase.
19	further observations on the significance of a equine 2 63 antibodies in man	D' further observations on the significance of equine antibody 263 in men.
19	experimental sprue like small intestinal lesions in pigs	An experimental sprue like intestinal lesions in pigs.
19	water retention in the carcasses of pigs and lambs treated with diazoxide	Conservation of vegetables; water in the carcasses of pigs and sheep; diazoxide-treated lambs.
19	propagation of porcine cytomegalic inclusion disease virus in cell cultures preliminary report	D'apos virus spread; cytomegalic inclusion of porcine virus in cell cultures preliminary report.
19	boar semen studies i laboratory evaluation of processing phases	Boar semen studies i laboratory evaluation of treatment phases.
19	a study of porcine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area ii characterization of the viruses as members of the picornavirus group	Viruses were characterized as part of the picornavirus group by a study of porcine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the Toronto area.
19	the antigenic determinants of the protein polysaccharides of cartilage	The antigenic determinants of the protein polysaccharides of cartilage.
19	blood groups of the i system in pigs association with variants of serum amylase	In pigs, the blood groups of the system i are associated with variants of serum apos; amylase.
19	the reproductive tract of the porcine female a biometrical study	This is the first report of a biometric study of the reproductive tract of the female swine.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs etiological studies and pathology	Exudative epidermitis in porcine etiological and pathological studies.
19	thyrocalcitonin ultracentrifugation in gradients of sucrose	Ultra-centrifugation of thyrocalcitonin in gradients of sucrose.
19	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in normal bone in vitro	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in normal bone in vitro.
19	african swine fever i antiserum production	African swine fever and antiserum production.
19	malabsorption of hemoglobin iron in pernicious anemia correction with intrinsic factor containing substances	Iron deficiency in apo; hemoglobin in pernicious correction of apo; anemia with an intrinsic factor containing substances.
19	studies on the biosynthesis of 16 dehydro steroids the metabolism of 4 14c pregnenolone by boar adrenal and testis tissue in vitro	Studies on the biosynthesis of 16 steroids dehydrodegrading the metabolism of 4c pregnenolone by adrenal boar and testicular tissue in vitro.
19	african swine fever iv demonstration of the viral antigen by means of immunofluorescence	African swine fever iv demonstration of antigen; viral antigen by immunofluorescence.
19	african swine fever v cultivation of the virus in primary pig kidney cells	African swine fever infection against the culture of the virus in primary pig kidney cells.
19	isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from liver	Isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from liver.
19	boar semen studies ii laboratory and fertility results of a method for deep freezing	Boar semen studies ii Laboratory and fertility results; a deep freezing method.
19	comparison of pathogenicity of various isolates of bordetella bronchiseptica in young pigs	Comparison of the pathogenicity of various isolates of bordetella bronchiseptica in young pigs.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs bacteriological studies on the causative agent	Exudative epidermitis in pigs Bacteriological studies on the causative agent.
19	effect of heating cooling the hypothalamus on behavioral thermoregulation in the pig	Effect of cooling heat; hypothalamus on behavioral thermoregulation in the pig.
19	a simple method for the isolation of adrenal chromaffin granules on a large scale	A simple method for the isolation of the adrenal chromaffin granules on a large scale.
19	the proteins and protein bound carbohydrates of the serum of the developing pig	The proteins and carbohydrates that are bound to the proteins of the serum of the developing pig.
19	a viral gastroenteritis of ontario swine 1 clinical illness and recovery of the virus	Gastro-viral enteritis in the Ontario swine 1 clinical illness and recovery of the virus.
19	experimental hemorrhagic septicemia gross and microscopic lesions resulting from acute infections and from endotoxin administration	Experimental hemorrhagic septicaemia, macroscopic and microscopic lesions resulting from acute infections and endotoxins.
19	effect of urokinase antiserum on plasminogen activators demonstration of immunologic dissimilarity between plasma plasminogen activator and urokinase	L' effect of apos; antiserum urokinase on plasminogen activators demonstrates an immunological difference between the plasma plasminogen activator and urokinase.
19	hyperpyrexia during anaesthesia	It's called hyperpyrexia during anesthesia.
19	lectins in extracts of certain polygonaceae seed precipitate animal and human serums	The lectins in extracts of some polygonaceous seeds precipitate animal and human sera.
19	drug resistance of enteric bacteria 13 distribution of r factors in escherichia coli strains isolated from livestock	Enterobacterial drug resistance 13 distribution of r factors in cattle strains; escherichia coli isolates.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs iv comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic strains	Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs iv comparison of enteropathogenic and non-enteropathogenic strains iv.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs v evaluation of the effects of oral and parenteral administration of immune serum	Dosage studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs; evaluation of the effects of oral and parenteral administration of antibody.
19	further studies on the use of nicotine to promote leanness in pigs	Other studies on the use of nicotine to promote weight loss in pigs.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine 3 the effect of selective inhibitors of viral replication on a cytopathogenic virus from transmissible gastroenteritis	Study of gastroenteritis in pigs; effect of selective inhibitors of viral replication on a cytopathogenic virus of transmissible gastroenteritis.
19	evidence for the presence of 16 alpha hydroxypregn 4 ene 3 20 dione in adrenal venous blood of young pigs	Evidence for the presence of 16 alpha hydroxypregn 4 ene 320 dione in adrenal venous blood of young pigs.
19	the effect of acetylsalicyclic acid on platelet function	The effect of acetylsalicyclic acid on platelet function.
19	comparative studies of atherosclerosis in swine	Comparative studies of atherosclerosis in pigs.
19	purification of rabbit kidney cytokinase and a comparison of its properties with human urokinase	Purification of rabbit kidney cytokinase and comparison of its properties with human urokinase.
19	the purification of 3 3 dimethylallyl and geranyl transferase and of isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from pig liver	The purification of 3 dimethylallyl and geranyl transferase and l' isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from pig liver.
19	calcitonin from ultimobranchial glands of dogfish and chickens	Calcitonin from the ultimobranch glands of common cattle and chicken.
19	simplified presumptive tests for carbohydrate hydrolyzing enzymes	Simplified presumptive tests for carbohydrate hydrolyzing enzymes.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine i experimental infection of gnotobiotic pigs with vibrio coli	Pathogenicity of vibrio coli to swine i experimental infection of gnotobiotic swine with vibrio coli.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine ii experimental infection of conventional pigs with vibrio coli	Pathogenicity of vibrio coli to swine ii Experimental infection of conventional swine with vibrio coli.
19	enzootic pneumonia of pigs complement fixation tests for the detection of mycoplasma antibodies in the serum of immunized rabbits and infected swine	Enzootic pig pneumonia completes binding tests for the detection of mycoplasma antibodies in the serum of immunized rabbits and infected pigs.
19	diagnosis of transmissible gastroenteritis in pigs by means of immunofluorescence	Diagnosis of Gastro-Enteritis transmitted in pigs by immunofluorescence.
19	changes in erythrocyte sedimentation rate and serum proteins during experimentally produced erysipelatous arthritis in swine	Changes in erythrocyte sedimentation rate and serum protein during the experiment resulted in apos; erythrocyte erythrocyte and erythrocyte arthritis in the pig.
19	a serological survey for brucellosis in canadian swine	A serological study of brucellosis in Canadian swine.
19	the distribution of monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in pig brain	Distribution of monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in pig brain.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholear virus with electron micrographs a preliminary note	The purification and concentration of the swine cholear virus with electronic micrographs a preliminary note.
19	plaque morphology of teschen disease viruses and certain pig enteroviruses in primary pig kidney monolayer cultures	Morphology of the ranges of testis disease viruses and selected porcine enteroviruses in primary swine kidney monolayer cultures.
19	a serological survey of sera from domestic animals on easter island	A serological study of sera from domestic animals on the Isle of Lupos; East.
19	deoxycytidine and radiation response exceedingly high deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity in human liver	L' deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity in human liver is exceedingly high in response to deoxycytidine and radiation.
19	nicotine hydrogen tartrate effect on essential fatty acid deficiency in mature pigs	Effect of nicotine hydrogen tartrate on essential fatty acid deficiency in mature pigs.
19	experimental appraisal of factors involved in provision of donor livers	Evaluation; experimental evaluation; evaluation of results; evaluation of factors involved in donation; evolution of donor liver production.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharide generation of a factor chemotactic for polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharide production of d' a chemotactic factor for polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
19	vaccinia virus infection of synchronized pig kidney cells	Vaccine virus infection of synchronized pig kidney cells.
19	comparative studies of antigens from mycoplasma mycoides and escherichia coli	Comparative studies of antigens from mycoplasma mycoides and d' escherichia coli.
19	iron metabolism in copper deficient swine	Iron metabolism in copper deficient pigs.
19	adrenal secretion rates and adrenal tissue concentrations of pregnenolone progesterone 11 beta oh androstenedione and some other steroids in young pigs and dogs	Adrenal secretion rates and concentrations of pregnenolone progesterone 11 beta oh androstenedione and d' other steroids in adrenal tissues in young pigs and dogs.
19	the uptake of plasma constituents by the mammary gland of the sow	L' absorption of plasma components by the mammary gland of the sow.
19	the action of cyanate on human and pig kidney alkaline phosphatases	L' action of cyanate on human and pig kidney alkaline phosphatases.
19	beta d glucosidases and related enzymic activities in pig kidney	Beta of glucosidases and related enzymatic activities in pig kidney.
19	negligible release of cardiolipin during milk secretion by the ruminant	Negligible release of cardiolipin during milk secretion by the ruminant.
19	kinetics of the reaction of renin with nine synthetic peptide substrates	The kinetics of the reaction of renin with nine synthetic peptide substrates.
19	the pyrophosphatase activity of pig kidney alkaline phosphatase and its inhibition by magnesium ions and excess of pyrophosphate	L' pyrophosphatase activity of pig kidney alkaline phosphatase and its inhibition by magnesium ions and l' excess pyrophosphate.
19	enzootic pneumonia in pigs propagation of a causative mycoplasma in cell cultures and in artificial medium	Enzootic pneumonia in porcine propagation of a causal mycoplasma in cell cultures and in an artificial medium.
19	lesions of the gastrointestinal tract of pigs infected with transmissible gastroenteritis	Gastro tract damage-intestinal of pigs infected with transmissible gastro-enteritis.
19	the histopathological changes in the skin of pigs with dermatosis vegetans	The histopathological changes in the skin of pigs with dermatological dermatosis.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis of swine in ontario	Gastro-entérite transmissible from pork in Ontario.
19	an attempt to experimentally produce edema disease in swine by oral administration of escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	Tests for the production of oedemes in swine by oral administration of escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1 by the oral route.
19	attempts to produce experimental edema disease in swine by parenterally injecting escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	Experimental trials in swine by parenteral injection of vaccines; escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1.
19	synthesis of 10 11 dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 6 7 dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by prenyltransferase	A synthesis of 10 11 dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 67 dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by the prenyltransferase.
19	analogues of geranyl pyrophosphate as inhibitors of prenyltransferase	Analogs of geranyl pyrophosphate as inhibitors of prenyltransferase.
19	physiological and serological comparisons among strains of mycoplasma granularum and mycoplasma laidlawii	Physiological and serological comparisons between strains of mycoplasma granularum and mycoplasma laidlawii.
19	detection by hemagglutination of antibodies to group a and group e streptococci by the use of o stearoyl derivatives of their cell wall carbohydrate grouping antigens	The detection by hemagglutination of antibodies for group a and group e of streptococci by elapos; use of o stearoyl derivatives of their antigen-grouping cell carbohydrates.
19	trichinosis in south west ireland	Trichinose in the south region-west of l' Ireland.
19	virus of the 1918 influenza pandemic era new evidence about its antigenic character	The virus of the pandemic of the flu of 1918 and new evidence of its antigenic character.
19	the comparative structure of mammalian glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenases	The structure of the 3 phosphate dehydrogenases of mammalian glyceraldehyde was compared.
19	fauna of catal h y k evidence for early cattle domestication in anatolia	The fauna of catal h y k is lapos; index d' early domestication of cattle in anatolia.
19	triglyceride synthesis by the small intestinal epithelium of the pig sheep and chicken	Synthesis of triglycerides by epithelium of the epithelium; small intestine of pig sheep and chicken.
19	assay of the possible organization of particle bound enzymes with squalene synthetase and squalene oxidocyclase systems	Trial of l' possible organization of particle-bound enzymes with squalene synthetase and squalene oxidocyclase systems.
19	mycoplasma taxonomy studiedy electrophoresis of cell proteins	Mycoplasma taxonomy studied apos; electrophoresis of cellular proteins.
19	renal fructose metabolizing enzymes significance in hereditary fructose intolerance	The enzymes that metabolize renal fructose play an important role in hereditary fructose intolerance.
19	characterization of a human serum inhibitor of clostridium histolyticum proteinase s	Characterization of a human serum protease inhibitor of Clostridium histolyticum s.
19	the biosynthesis of some androst 16 enes from c21 and c19 steroids in boar testicular and adrenal tissue	Biosynthesis of selected androst 16 ene from c21 and c19 steroids in wild boar testicular and adrenal tissues.
19	porcine lactic dehydrogenase in the serum of patients treated by extracorporeal porcine liver perfusion	Swine lactic dehydrogenase in the serum of patients treated with swine liver extracorporeal infusion.
19	preparation and some properties of l 3 glycerophosphate dehydrogenase from pig brain mitochondria	Preparation and some properties of pig brain mitochondria glycerophosphate dehydrogenase l-3.
19	early stages of intestinal absorption of specific antibiodies in the newborn an ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in the pig rat and rabbit	The early stages of intestinal absorption d' specific antibiodies in the new-ne, an ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in porcine rat and rabbit.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs vi effects of feeding bacteria free filtrates of broth cultures	Study of l' Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs vi effects of l' feeding free filtrate bacteria cultures in broth.
19	glasser s disease of swine produced by the intracheal inoculation of haemophilus suis	Slippery disease in swine caused by apos; intracheal inoculation of apos; haemophilus suis.
19	arbovirus plaquing in a clonal line ps y 15 of porcine kidney	Arbovirus plated in a clonal lineage ps y 15 of pig kidney.
19	induction in vitro of microtubular crystals by vinca alkaloids	In vitro induction of microtubular crystals by vinca alkaloids.
19	vinblastine induced precipitation of microtubule protein	Vinblastine induced precipitation of microtubular protein.
19	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate the mechanism of inhibition of oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and aconitate hydratase	Control of the cycle of apo; citric acid by glyoxylate the mechanism of apo inhibition; oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and aconitate hydratase.
19	specificity in the assembly of multisubunit proteins	Specificity in the appos; assembly of multi-proteins under-units.
19	fractionation of phytohemagglutinin i purification of the rna and dna synthesis stimulating substances and evidence that they are not proteins	Fractionation of phytohemagglutinin i purification of rna and biosynthesis; DNA stimulant substances and evidence that they are not proteins.
19	incidence of salmonellae in meat and meat products	Salmonella incidence in meat and meat products.
19	artificial substrates for prenyltransferase	Artificial substrates for prenyltransferase inhibitors.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage heterogeneity fractionation and characterization	Protein polysaccharide studies from pig laryngeal cartilage heterogeneity and fractionation and characterization.
19	biosynthesis of the fungal estrogen f 2 and a naturally occurring derivative f 3 by fusarium moniliforme	Ecosystem biosynthesis; estrogen f 2 f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f f 3 f f f moniliform moniliform fusarium.
19	evaluation of culture media for the isolation of salmonellae from feces	Evaluation of the culture media for the isolation of salmonella from the faeces.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods 3 pork loin	Irradiation sterilization of apo prototypes; military foods 3 pork loin.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage extraction and purification	Studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage extraction and purification.
19	aflatoxin production in meats i stored meats	Production of aflatoxin in meats in storage.
19	country cured ham as a possible source of aflatoxin	Country dried ham could be a source of aflatoxin.
19	an immunological approach to the study of evolution of trypsins	An immunological approach to the study of trypsin evolution.
19	transferable drug resistance among enterobacteriaceae isolated from cases of neonatal diarrhea in calves and piglets	Transferable drug resistance in enterobacteria isolated from cases of neonatal diarrhea in calves and piglets.
19	the rate of molecular evolution considered from the standpoint of population genetics	The rate of death; molecular evolution of the speed of death; molecular evolution of death; molecular evolution, considered from the point of view of genetic genetic genetic genetics of the population of the population of the genetic genetic genetic genetic genetic population of the population of the population; the rate of death; molecular evolution of the population; molecular evolution of death; molecular evolution, considered from the point of view of the genetic genetic genetic genetic genetic genetic population of the population.
19	the assay of gastrin using the perfused rat stomach	Determination of gastrin with the help of the perfused rat stomach.
19	autolytic changes in the digestive system of germfree escherichia coli monocontaminated and conventional baby pigs	Autolytic changes in the digestive system of germfree escherichia coli monocontaminated and traditional baby pigs.
19	the electrocardiogram of conventional and miniature swine sus scrofa	L' electrocardiogram of the classical pork and miniature pork on scrofa.
19	strontium 90 effects of chronic ingestion on farrowing performance of miniature swine	Chronic ingestion of strontium 90 on the calving performance of miniature pigs.
19	scanning electron microscopy of cells	It's called scanning electron microscopy of cells.
19	esterolytic activity of elastase	The esterolytic activity of the apos; elastase.
19	the effects of in utero viral infection on embryonic fetal and neonatal survival a comparison of smedi porcine picorna viruses with hog cholera vaccinal virus	The effects of in utero viral infection on embryonic fetal and neonatal survival were compared between smedi porcine picorna virus and swine cholera vaccine virus.
19	the isolation of three neurophysins from porcine posterior pituitary lobes	L' isolation of three neurophysins from the posterior lobes of the pork pituitary.
19	the antibody response in pigs inoculated with attenuated african swine fever virus	Immune response in pigs inoculated with attenuated African swine fever virus.
19	antibody development in pigs inoculated with live or killed cultures of brucella abortus	Antibody developed in pigs inoculated with live or killed cultures of brucella abortus.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholera virus	The purification and concentration of the swine cholera virus.
19	experimental enteric colibacillosis in piglets	An experimental enteric colibacillosis in the piglets.
19	purification and properties of 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase from sheep liver	The purification and properties of 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase from sheep liver.
19	some properties of cytochrome b5 from liver microsomes of man monkey pig and chicken	Some properties of cytochrome b5 from human pig and monkey chicken liver microsomes.
19	vitamin a and carotenoids the enzymic conversion of beta carotene into retinal in hog intestinal mucosa	Vitamin a and carotenoids are the enzymatic conversion of beta carotene into retinal pig intestinal mucosa.
19	characterization of protein polysaccharides of articular cartilage from mature and immature pigs	Characterization of protein polysaccharides of articular cartilage of mature and immature pigs.
19	acid soluble phosphorus compounds in mammalian semen	"""Acid soluble phosphorus compounds in mammalian semen,"" Environ."
19	action of bacterial growth on the sarcoplasmic and urea soluble proteins from muscle i effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi	An action of bacterial growth on sarcoplasmic and soluble proteins; urea of the muscle effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi.
19	growth and development of competence in the group h streptococci	Growth and development of skills in the group of h streptococci.
19	studies on the 1967 8 foot and mouth disease epidemic the relation of weather to the spread of disease	The study of the relationship between meteorological conditions and the spread of the disease, as well as the outbreak of foot and mouth disease.
19	vibrio enterotoxin in miniature pigs	Vibrio enterotoxin in miniature pigs.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis tge of swine the possible role of dogs in the epizootiology of tge	Gastro-transmissible enteritis in pigs The possible role of dogs in the disease; Epizootiology of the gastro-transmissible enteritis in pigs.
19	immunological relationships between the neuraminidases of human and animal influenza viruses	Immunological relationships between neuraminidases of human and animal viruses.
19	correlation of bedrock type with the geography of leptospirosis	Correlation between rock type-mother and the geography of leptospirosis.
19	a stable l form of haemophilus pleuropneumoniae	A stable form of apos; hemophilus pleuropneumoniae.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin deficient sera	Interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin-deficient sera.
19	native human parathyroid hormone an immunochemical investigation	L' human parathyroid hormone is an immunochemical investigation.
19	proteins of the group b arbovirus kunjin	Proteins of the group b arbovirus kunjin kunjin.
19	coronary aortic and cerebral atherosclerosis in swine of 3 age groups implications	Lapses; coronary aorta and brain atherosclerosis in pigs of 3 groups; age involves implications.
19	the isolation identification and synthesis of two metabolites of guanethidine formed in pig and rabbit liver homogenates	Identification and synthesis of two metabolites of guanethidine formed in homogenates of porcine and rabbit liver.
19	a collaborative study of heparins from different sources	Joint study of heparins from different sources.
19	the biosynthesis of androst 16 enes in boar testis tissue	The 16-ene biosynthesis of androst in wild boar testicles.
19	preliminary report on the development of a diffusion in gel method for the diagnosis of ram epididymitis	A preliminary report on the development of a gel diffusion method for the diagnosis of sheep epididymitis.
19	effects of glucagon dibutyryl cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on calcitonin secretion in vitro	The effects of cyclic dibutyryl glucagon 3-5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on calcitonin secretion in vitro.
19	polymerizing equilibria in neurophysin	Polymerization of equilibria in neurophysin?
19	method for eliminating anticomplementary activity in animal sera	Procedure; elimination of anti-competing activity in animal sera.
19	crystalline 3 phosphoglycerate kinase from skeletal muscle	The 3 phosphoglycerate kinase from skeletal muscle.
19	some properties of the microsomal 2 3 oxidosqualene sterol cyclase	Some properties of the microsomal 2-3 oxidosqualene sterol cyclase.
19	r factor transmission in vivo	R factor transmission in vivo.
19	a reinvestigation of the substrate specificity of pig kidney diamine oxidase	A new study of the substrate specificity of pig kidney diamine oxidase.
19	the role of ceruloplasmin in iron metabolism	The role of ceruloplasmin in iron metabolism.
19	amino acid sequences around the disulphide bridges and methionine residues of porcine pepsin	Dapos sequences; amino acids around disulfide bridges and methionine residues of porcine pepsin.
19	variations in the ecology of glossina spp with special reference to nigerian populations of glossina tachinoides	Variations in the ecology of glossina spp., particularly in Nigerian populations of glossina tachinoides.
19	the absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the new born pig intestine	L' absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the new born pig intestine.
19	experimental immunization of sows with cell cultured tge virus	L' experimental immunization of sows with cell-cultured virus tge.
19	effect of rye ergot on growth and n retention in growing pigs	Effect of rye ergot on growth and retention in growing pigs.
19	response of gnotobiotic pigs to escherichia coli	Reaction of gnotobiotic pigs to apos; escherichia coli.
19	somatic antigens of streptococcus group e i comparison of extraction techniques	Antigenic somatic antigens of group Streptococcus spp. and comparison of extraction techniques.
19	carboxyl terminal residues of mammalian fibrinogen and fibrin	Carboxyl terminal residues of mammalian fibrinogen and fibrinogen.
19	number and types of peptide chains in thyroglobulin tryptic peptides of noniodinated hog thyroglobulin	Number and types of peptide chains in thyroglobulin tryptic peptides from noniodinated thyroglobulin pigs.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus i epidemiology and serological response	Experimental infection of weaned pigs with a swine influenza virus i epidemiology and serologic response.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus 3 immunity in piglets farrowed by antibody bearing dams experimentally infected a year earlier	Experimental infection of weanling piglets with swine influenza virus 3 immunity in swine piglets reared by pregnant mothers; antibody infected experimentally one year earlier.
19	purification and properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent isocitrate dehydrogenase from pig liver cytoplasm	The purification and properties of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate isos; isocitrate dehydrogenase from pig liver cytoplasm.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver i isolation procedure and general characterization	Nuclear membranes of mammalian liver, Dapos procedure; isolation and general characterization.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver ii lipid composition	Nuclear membranes in mammalian liver ii lipid composition.
19	oxychlordane animal metabolite of chlordane isolation and synthesis	Animal chlordane oxychlordane metabolite of chlordane isolation and synthesis.
19	the action of certain antibiotics and ether on swine enzootic pneumonia	The action of certain antibiotics and ether on swine enzootic pneumonia.
19	the effect of rotor velocity on sedimentation coefficients	L' effect of rotor velocity on sedimentation coefficients.
19	radioreceptor assay of adrenocorticotropic hormone new approach to assay of polypeptide hormones in plasma	Radioreceptor assay of l' new approach to adrenocorticotropic hormone; test of polypeptide hormones in plasma.
19	quantitation of the antigenicity and immunogenicity of purified foot and mouth disease virus vaccine for swine and steers	Quantification of apo; antigenicity and apo; immunogenicity of purified foot and mouth virus vaccine in swine and steers.
19	distribution of bacteria in feces of swine	Distribution of bacteria in the feces of pigs.
19	comparison of two plating media for detection of salmonella from swine tissues	Comparison of two media for detection of Salmonella in swine tissue.
19	a research standard for human serum immunoglobulins igg iga and igm	A research standard for human serum immunoglobulins igg iga and igm igg igm.
19	polypeptide with broad biological activity isolation from small intestine	Polypeptide with broad biological activity isolated from small intestine.
19	gonadotropin releasing hormone one polypeptide regulates secretion of luteinizing and follicle stimulating hormones	The gonadotropin-releasing hormone polypeptide 1 regulates the secretion of luteinizing and follicle-stimulating hormones.
19	a focus of rumenal cancer in kenyan cattle	An outbreak of rumen cancer in cattle in Kenya.
19	serum creatine phosphokinase levels in pigs reacting abnormally to halogenated anaesthetics	Serum creatine phosphokinase levels in pigs that respond abnormally to halogenated anesthetics.
19	the clinical and metabolic effects of porcine calcitonin on paget s disease of bone	Clinical and metabolic effects of porcine calcitonin on paget bone disease.
19	salmonella isolations in abattoirs in greece	Isolation of salmonella in slaughterhouses in Greece.
19	sewer and drain swabbing as a means of investigating salmonellosis	Sampling of sewers and sewers as a means of salmonellosis.
19	the excretion of two virulent strains of african swine fever virus by domestic pigs	L' excretion of two virulent strains of African swine fever virus by domestic pigs.
19	virulence and pathogenesis of yellow fever virus serially passaged in cell culture	The virulence and pathogenesis of yellow fever virus were serialized in cell cultures.
19	studies of the bulbo urethral cowper s gland mucin and seminal gel of the boar	Studies of the bulbo urethral cowper s gland mucin and the seminal gel of wild boar.
19	growth of the ib rs 2 pig kidney cell line in suspension culture and its susceptibility to foot and mouth disease virus	Growth of pig kidney cell line ib rs 2 in suspension culture and susceptibility to FMD virus.
19	effects of oxyamylose and polyacrylic acid on foot and mouth disease and hog cholera virus infections	Effects of oxyamylosis and polyacrylic acid on foot-and-mouth disease and cholera infections in swine.
19	relationship of the frequency of isolation of salmonellae to their resistance to drying and freezing	The relationship between the frequency of isolation of salmonellae and their resistance to drying and freezing.
19	iodination of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Iodization of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	comparison of microtiter procedures with the plaque technique for assay of vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of the microtitration procedures with the plate technique for vesicular stomatitis virus assay.
19	comparison of animal sera for suitability in coagulase testing	Comparison of animal sera for s' suitable for coagulation.
19	the relationship of arterial blood ph and pco2 to the viability of the newborn piglet	The relationship between ph and pco2 of the arterial blood and the viability of the newborn piglet.
19	experimental immunization of sows with inactivated transmissible gastroenteritis tge virus	Experimental immunization of sows against inactivated gastrovirus-transmissible tge.
19	steroidal free radicals as possible intermediates in the biosynthesis of c19 delta 16 steroids	Free steroid radicals are possible intermediates in the biosynthesis of delta 16 c19 steroids.
19	organic mercury identified as the cause of poisoning in humans and hogs	Mercury has been identified as the cause of poisoning in humans and swine.
19	ultrastructural localization of intracellular antigen using enzyme labeled antibody fragments	Ultrastructural localization of apos; intracellular antigen at apos; enzyme-labeled antibody.
19	ultrastructural localization of calcitonin in the parafollicular cells of pig thyroid gland with cytochrome c labeled antibody fragments	Ultrastructural localization of calcitonin in the parafollicular cells of the pig thyroid gland with cytochrome c labelled d&apos fragments.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs the role of milk in protective immunity to e coli enteritis	Immunity to escherichia coli in pigs the role of milk in apos; protective immunity against apos; enteritis to e coli.
19	studies on the bacterial floral of condemmed portions from arthritic hogs	Studies of the bacterial flora of condensed portions of arthritic pigs.
19	a study of escherichia coli strains isolated from pigs with gastro intestinal disease	A study of strains of apos; escherichia coli isolated from pigs with apos; gastro-@ intestinal illness.
19	dose response relationship of luteinizing hormone to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone in man	Dose ratio-response; luteinizing hormone to apos; hormone releasing hormone; luteinizing hormone in apos; man.
19	further investigations on the airborne excretion of foot and mouth disease virus	Continued research on apo; airborne excretion of the FMD virus.
19	ihalation persistence and dispersal f foot and mouth disease virus by man	Persistence and dispersal of foot-and-mouth disease; inhalation of the virus by humans.
19	anaesthetic induced malignant hyperpyrexia a suggested method of treatment	L' anaesthesia induced malignant hyperpyrexia, method of treatment suggested.
19	the growth and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in the bovine mammary gland	The growth and persistence of the foot-and-mouth disease (FMD) virus in the bovine mammary gland.
19	the purification and properties of the l serine o sulphate degrading system of pig liver	Purification and properties of the Serine/Sulfate degrading system of pig liver.
19	isolation and fractionation of glycopeptides from porcine thyroglobulin	Isolation and fractionation of glycopeptides of porcine thyroglobulin.
19	the structure of a glycopeptide purified from porcine thyroblobulin	A glycopeptide purified from porcine thyroblobulin.
19	the influence of deep body temperatures and skin temperatures on peripheral blood flow in the pig	L' influence of deep body temperatures and skin temperatures on peripheral blood flow in the pig.
19	vertebrate faunas and chronology of hominid bearing sediments east of lake rudolf kenya	Vertebrate fauna and chronology of sediment-bearing hominids at l'apos; eastern lake rudolf kenya.
19	competitive labelling a method for determining the reactivity of individual groups in proteins the amino groups of porcine elastase	A method to determine the reactivity of individual groups in proteins in the amino groups of the porcine elastase.
19	effect of ph changes on the binding of vitamin b12 by intrinsic factor	The effect of ph changes on the binding of vitamin b12 by an intrinsic factor.
19	adrenal medullary calcitonin like factor a key to multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2	Adrenal medullary calcitonin is a key factor in multiple endocrine type 2 neoplasia.
19	enzyme purification by electrodecantation	The enzyme purification by electro-decantation.
19	carbohydrate content of insoluble elastins prepared from adult bovine and calf ligamentum nuchae and tropoelastin isolated from copper deficient porcine aorta	Carbohydrate content of insoluble elastins prepared from adult bovine and calf ligamentum nuchae and tropoelastin isolated from copper-deficient porcine aorta.
19	transient kinetic studies of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase	Transient kinetic studies of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase activity.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the sequential extraction of chondroitin sulphate proteins with iso osmotic neutral sodium acetate	Heterogeneity of porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharides, sequential extraction of chondroitin sulphate proteins with isoosmotic l' neutral sodium acetate.
19	ultraviolet light a new stimulus for the induction of platelet aggregation	Ultraviolet rays are a new stimulus for the induction of the apos; platelet aggregation.
19	total synthesis of acetate from co 2 methyltetrahydrofolate an intermediate and a procedure for separation of the folates	The total synthesis of l' acetate from methyl 2-tetrahydrofolate is an intermediate and a folate separation method.
19	bile salts of germ free domestic fowl and pigs	Bile salts; domestic birds and hogs free of germs.
19	inhibition of the renin angiotensinogen reaction by pepstatin	Inhibition of the renin angiotensinogen reaction by pepstatin.
19	the metabolism of phosphatidylinositol in the thyroid gland of the pig	The metabolism of phosphatidylinositol in the thyroid gland of the pig.
19	an active site peptide from pepsin c	Peptide of the pepsin c active site.
19	role of the cytoplasmic membrane in the synthesis of ribonucleic acid by disrupted spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis	Role of the cytoplasmic membrane in the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid by broken spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis.
19	membranes of chromaffin granules isolation and partial characterization of two proteins	Chromaffin granule membranes, isolation and partial characterization of two proteins.
19	the reaction of glucagon with its receptor evidence for discrete regions of activity and binding in the glucagon molecule	The reaction of glucagon with its receptor demonstrates discrete regions of activity and binding in the glucagon molecule.
19	neurohypophyseal hormone responsive adenylate cyclase from mammalian kidney	Neurohypophysial adenylate cyclase reactive to apos; hormone in mammalian kidney.
19	starch gel electrophoresis of fructose 6 phosphate phophoketolase in the genus bifidobacterium	L' d&apos gel electrophoresis; starch of phophoketolase of fructose 6 phosphate of the genus bifidobacterium.
19	electrophoretic and immunological characterization of rat neurophysin	The electrophoretic and immunological characterization of rat neurophysin.
19	thyrocalcitonin stimulation of secretion by pentagastrin	Pentagastrin stimulates the secretion of thyrocalcitonin.
19	characteristics of antimicrobial resistance of escherichia coli from animals relationship to veterinary and management uses of antimicrobial agents	Antimicrobial resistance characteristics of escherichia coli arising from animal interactions with veterinary and management uses of antimicrobial agents.
19	inhibition by rifampin of african swine fever virus replication in tissue culture	The inhibition of African swine fever virus replication in tissue culture by rifampin.
19	classification of north american porcine enteroviruses a comparison with european and japanese strains	Classification of North American porcine enteroviruses in relation to European and Japanese enteroviruses.
19	nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity associated with pig kidney alkaline phosphatase	Nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity associated with pig kidney alkaline phosphatase activity.
19	bovine pepsinogens and pepsins the sequence around a reactive aspartyl residue	Bovine pepsinogens and pepsins the sequence around them; a reactive residue aspartyl.
19	coupling of glycosaminoglycans to agarose beads sepharose 4b	Coupling of glycosaminoglycans on d' Sepharose 4b agarose.
19	glycolytic enzymes in mammalian spermatozoa activities and stabilities of hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions from sperm homogenates	Glycolytic enzymes in the activities of mammalian spermatozoa and stability of hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions of spermatozoa.
19	tentative identification of a vasopressin neurophysin and an oxytocin neurophysin in the rat	Acute identification of a vasopressin and dapos neurophysin; a neurophysin d'apos; and oxytocin in the rat.
19	bacteriological survey of fresh pork sausage produced at establishments under federal inspection	Bacteriological study of fresh pork sausages produced at federally inspected establishments.
19	studies of the toxicity of helminthosporium maydis	Studies on the toxicity of l'apos; helminthosporium maydis.
19	identification and aflatoxin production of molds isolated from country cured hams	Identification and production of molds from hams cooked according to the traditional method.
19	effect on young swine of consumption of rations containing corn invaded by fusarium roseum	Effect on young pigs of the consumption of rations containing corn invaded by fusarium roseum.
19	antipeptic activity of antacids	Antipeptic activity of antacids.
19	on the identity of dopa decarboxylase and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase immunological titration aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine	On the apos; identity of dopa decarboxylase and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase aromatic amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine titration.
19	evolution of neurophysin proteins the partial sequence of bovine neurophysin i vasopressin oxytocin carrier proteins automated amino acid sequence analysis homology protein evolution	L' neurophysin protein evolution, the partial sequence of bovine neurophysin i vasopressin carrying proteins, automatizes l' amino acid sequence analysis and apos; d&apos protein evolution; homology.
19	plasminogen activator in bile during extracorporeal perfusion of pig liver	Plasminogen activator in bile during extracorporeal perfusion of pig liver.
19	heterogeneity of foot and mouth disease virus further studies on plaque formation by two plaque size variants	FMD virus heterogeneity has been the subject of further studies on beach formation by two beach size variants.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs serum gamma globulin levels indirect hemagglutinating antibody titres and bactericidal activity against e coli in pigs up to five weeks of age	Immunity to Escherichia coli in swine serum levels of indirect hemagglutinating gamma globulin; antibody and bactericidal activity against e coli in pigs up to 5 weeks of age.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs antibody secretion by the mammary gland after intramammary or intramuscular vaccination with an e coli vaccine	Immunity to Escherichia coli in pig secretion; antibody from the mammary gland following intramammary or intramuscular vaccination with an e coli vaccine.
19	the effect of medicated feed on the nasal microflora and weight gain of pigs	The effect of medicated feed on the nasal microflora and swine body weight gain.
19	influenza a of human swine equine and avian origin comparison of survival in aerosol form	Influenza a dapos; human and animal pig origin; avian origin, comparison of survival in dosage form; aerosol.
19	interaction of porcine mycoplasmas with fresh animal serum	Interaction of porcine mycoplasmas with fresh animal serum.
19	the comparative susceptibility of hysterectomy produced colostrum deprived pigs and naturally born enzootic pneumonia free pigs to enzootic pneumonia	The comparative sensitivity of hysterectomy produced colostrum-deprived pigs and enzootic-pneumonia-free pigs born naturally to enzootic pneumonia.
19	heterogeneity of tubulin subunits	Heterogeneity of tubulin sub-units.
19	pancreatin as a source of hospital acquired salmonellosis	Pancreatin, a source of hospital salmonellosis, has contracted salmonellosis.
19	comparison of the microtubule proteins of neuroblastoma cells brain and chlamydomonas flagella	Comparison of brain microtubule proteins of neuroblastoma cells and chlamydomonas flagella.
19	platelet interaction with polymerizing fibrin	You know, platelet interaction with polymerizing fibrin.
19	hypothalamic follicle stimulating hormone fsh and luteinizing hormone lh regulating hormone structure physiology and clinical studies	Hypothalamic follicles stimulating hormone fsh and luteinizing hormone regulating hormonal structure and clinical studies.
19	isolation of psychrophilic bacteriophage host systems from refrigerated food products	Isolate psychrophilic bacteriophage host systems from refrigerated food products.
19	action of pseudomonas fragi on the proteins of pig muscle	L' action of pseudomonas fragi on proteins of pig muscle.
19	dna constancy in heteroploidy and the stem line theory of tumors	DNA in the apo; heteroploidy and stem-line theory of tumours.
19	studies on the biochemistry of mitochondria and cell morphology in the neonatal swine hepatocyte	Studies of mitochondrial biochemistry and cell morphology in neonatal swine hepatocytes.
19	the kinetics of phenethylhydrazine oxidation by monoamine oxidase	The kinetics of phenethylhydrazine and its oxidation by monoamine oxidase.
19	isolation of normal immunoglobulin e by means of an immunoadsorbent	Isolate the normal immunoglobulin level by using an immunoadsorbent.
19	synthesis and oxidation of aminoalkyl onium compounds by pig kidney diamine oxidase	Synthesis and oxidation of aminoalkyl onium compounds by pig kidney diamine oxidase.
19	a distinctive cell contact in the rat adrenal cortex	Separate cellular contact in the rat adrenal cortex.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the chondroitin sulphate proteins associaterd with collagen	The collagen-associated chondroitin sulfate proteins of porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharides are heterogeneous.
19	vitamin d intoxication treated with porcine calcitonin	Vitamin d toxicity treated with porcine calcitonin.
19	enteritis due to salmonella panama from infected ham	Enteritis due to panama salmonella of infected ham.
19	salmonella in pigs and animal feeding stuffs in england and wales and in denmark	Salmonella in pigs and animal feed in England and Wales, and Denmark.
19	salmonellas on pig farms and in abattoirs	Salmonella in pig farms and in slaughterhouses.
19	an epidemiological study of the incidence of salmonellas in pigs	An epidemiological study of the incidence of salmonellas in swine.
19	comparative complement fixation studies with subtype strains of foot and mouth disease virus	Comparative complement fixation studies with strains under-types of FMD virus.
19	radio immunoassay of gastrin in human plasma	Radioimmunoassay of gastrin in human plasma.
19	m ssbauer studies of adrenodoxin the mechanism of electron transfer in a hydroxylase iron sulphur protein	L'apos; m'sbauer study of l'apos; adrenodoxine, the mechanism of transfer of d'apos; electrons in a sulfurous iron hydroxylase protein.
19	n terminal amino acid sequence of african lungfish immunoglobulin light chains	N sequence d' amino acid terminals of light chains d' African lungfish immunoglobulins.
19	susceptibility of gnotoibiotic swine to escherichia coli isolated from nonenteric human infections	Gnotiotic pig vulnerability to escherichia coli isolated from non-enteric human infections.
19	calcitonin receptors of kidney and bone	Calcitonin receptors from kidney and bone.
19	inhibition of pig kidney diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	Inhibition of pig kidney diamine oxidase by substrate analogs.
19	rapid detection of salmonella microcolonies by fluorescent antibody	Rapid detection of salmonella microcolonies by fluorescent antibodies.
19	observations by electron microscopy on pig muscle inoculated and incubated with pseudomonas fragi	Electron microscopic observations on pig muscle inoculated and incubated with the pseudomonas fragi.
19	an evaluation of the efficiency of cleaning methods in a bacon factory	Evaluation of the effectiveness of cleaning methods in a bacon plant.
19	the production of pneumonia with or without pleurisy in gnotobiotic piglets with pure cultures of strain tr 32 of mycoplasma hyorhinis	Production of pneumonia with or without pleurisy in gnotobiotic piglets in pure culture of strain tr 32 of mycoplasma hyorhinis.
19	investigation into rabbit infusion media for the growth of mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for inoculation into rabbits	Study of rabbit infusion media for growth of mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for rabbit inoculation.
19	natural selection of parental ability to vary the sex ratio of offspring	Natural selection of parental ability to vary the sex ratio of their progeny.
19	application of an improved system of electrophoresis in acrylamide gel to studies on the sera of different species	D&apos application; an improved system; gel electrophoresis; acrylamide at apos; study of the sera of different species.
19	etiology of hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during chronic hemodialysis 3 evaluation of parathyroid suppressibility	Etiology of apo; hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during apo; chronic hemodialysis 3 evaluation of parathyroid suppressibility.
19	further studies of porcine malignant hyperthermia	Other studies on porcine malignant hyperthermia were conducted.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate mechanism of the reaction	The mechanism of the reaction is enzymatic degradation of the serine o sulfate.
19	human parathyroid hormone amino acid sequence of the amino terminal residues 1 34	Apo sequence; apo amino acids; human parathyroid hormone amino residues.
19	nucleated assembly of microtubules in porcine brain extracts	L' nucleic assembly of microtubules in porcine brain extracts has been completed.
19	studies on the biosynthesis in vivo and excretion of 16 unsaturated c 19 steroids in the boar	In vivo biosynthetic and apo studies; excretion of 16 unsaturated c 19 steroids in wild boar.
19	a comparative study of the rabbit and pig gut loop systems for the assay of escherichia coli enterotoxin	A comparative study of the rabbit and porcine intestinal loop systems for the determination of the enterotoxin d' escherichia coli.
19	dietary induction of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs i nutritional aspects	Food induction of mulberry heart disease and liver disease; dietary hepatosis in pigs i nutritional aspects.
19	50 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from adult sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Fifty chrome-labeled erythrocytes disappear at mid-time; adult sinclair s 1 miniature pig.
19	effect of supplemental vitamin e and selenium in high moisture corn diets on the incidence of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs	Effect of vitamin and selenium supplementation on appetite; incidence of mulberry heart disease and liver loss; dietary hepatosis in swine.
19	vitamin e selenium and methionine supplementation of dystrophogenic diets for pigs	Vitamin e selenium and methionine supplementation of dystrophogenic diets for swine.
19	distribution of porcine fecal coliflora throughout a barn	Distribution of porcine fecal coliflora in barns.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs anti enterotoxins in colostrum and serum from vaccinated and non vaccinated sows	Immunization against Escherichia coli in pigs provides control of enterotoxins in colostrum and serum from vaccinated and unvaccinated pigs.
19	ecology of intestinal escherichia coli in pigs	Ecology of intestinal escherichia coli in swine.
19	mixed conformations of deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin a preliminary report	Preliminary report on mixed conformations of deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin.
19	electrophoretic separation and differentiation of enzymes from human and from porcine liver	Electrophoretic separation and differentiation of enzymes from human and porcine liver.
19	isolation of porcine immunoglobulins and determination of the immunoglobulin classes of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antibodies	Isolate porcine immunoglobulins and determine the classes of transmissible viral antibody immunoglobulins.
19	antigenic relationships between type a influenza viruses of human porcine equine and avian origin	Antigenic relationships between influenza viruses of human and animal origin; avian origin.
19	swine influenza epizootiological and serological studies	Swine flu epizootiological and serological studies.
19	hong kong influenza infection in swine experimental and field observations	Field and experimental observations of hong kong influenza infection in swine.
19	experimental infection of human volunteers with a swine influenzavirus antigenically related to the human a hong kong 68 virus	Infection of human volunteers with a swine influenzavirus antigenically related to human hong kong 68 viruses.
19	studies on the adsorption of certain medium proteins to mycoplasma gallisepticum and their influence on agglutination and haemagglutination reactions	Studies on the adsorption of certain medium proteins to mycoplasma gallisepticum and their influence on d&apos reactions; agglutination and d' hemagglutination.
19	the influence of deep body and skin temperatures on thermoregulatory responses to heating of the scrotum in pigs	L' influence of deep body and skin temperatures on the thermoregulatory responses to heating of the scrotum in pigs.
19	squamous metaplasia of the opening of bronchial glands	Squamous metaplasia of the apos; opening of bronchial glands.
19	saint louis encephalitis viral ribonucleic acid replication complex	L&apos replication complex; viral ribonucleic acid of l' St. Louis encephalitis.
19	51 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from miniature swine	Disappearance mi-time d' miniature swine chrome 51 labelled erythrocytes.
19	chronological development of mycoplasma hyorhinis and mycoplasma hyosynoviae infections in cultures of a swine synovial cell strain	Chronological development of mycoplasma hyorhinis and mycoplasma hyosynoviae infections in cultures of porcine synovial swine cells.
19	the significance of proliferation and enterotoxin production by escherichia coli in the intestine of gnotobiotic pigs	Extent of proliferation and production of escherichia coli; enterotoxins via escherichia coli in the intestine of gnotobiotic swine.
19	the effects of spraying on the amounts of airborne foot and mouth disease virus present in loose boxes	Effects of spraying on the amounts of foot-and-mouth disease virus present in the apos; air in loose cans.
19	serological relationships among herpesviruses cross reaction between marek s disease virus and pseudorabies virus as detected by immunogluorescence	The serological relationships between herpesviruses cross-reacted Marek disease virus and pseudorabies virus as detected by immunogluorescence.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products i bacteriological evaluation of comminuted heated products	Studies on the safety of ready-to-eat meat products-@-@ eat i bacteriological evaluation of co-heated products.
19	the vascular architecture of the porcine small intestine	L' vascular architecture of the intestine; pig's small intestine.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products ii chemical evaluation of comminuted heated products	Ready-to-eat meat safety studies-@-@ ii Food safety chemical evaluation of comminuted heated products.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on the antibiotic resistance of fecal coliforms of weaned pigs subjected to experimental salmonella infection	Effect of leprosy; food additive to chlortetracycline on antibiotic resistance in fecal coliforms of weaned pigs subjected to experimental infection with Salmonella.
19	bovine viral diarrhea virus in swine neutralizing antibody in naturally and experimentally infected swine	Bovine viral diarrhea virus virus in naturally and experimentally infected swine neutralizing antibodies.
19	evidence for the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic elastase	Evidence of the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic elastases.
19	the hampshire epidemic of foot and mouth disease 1967	L&apos was a 1967 outbreak of foot and mouth disease in Hampshire.
19	transmission of infectious drug resistance from animals to man	Transmission of infectious drug resistance from animals to humans.
19	correction of adverse response to suxamethonium of susceptible pigs	Correcting the adverse reaction to suxamethonium in sensitive pigs.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium i comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic porcine strains in pigs	The association of escherichia coli with intestines; small intestine; comparison of enteropathogenic and non-enteropathogenic pig strains in pigs.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium ii variations in association index and the relationship between association index and enterosorption in pigs	Associations; Escherichia coli with apos; epithelium of apos; small intestine ii variations of apos; association and relationship between apos; association and apos; pork enterocorption.
19	the role of a tyrosyl residue in the mechanism of action of carboxypeptidase b luminescence studies	The role of a tyrosyl residue in the mechanism of action of carboxypeptidase b is studied by means of luminescence.
19	the intramitochondrial location of the glutaminase isoenzymes of pig kidney	The intramitochondrial localization of the isoenzymes of pig kidney glutaminase.
19	transport of glutamine and glutamate in kidney mitochondria in relation to glutamine deamidation	The transport of glutamine and glutamate in renal mitochondria in relation to glutamine deamidation.
19	biosynthesis of proteoglycans in cartilage slices fractionation by gel chromatography and equilibrium density gradient centrifugation	Proteoglycan biosynthesis by cartilage slice fractionation by gel chromatography and density gradient centrifugation at l' equilibrium.
19	a catalytic mechanism for the enzyme benzylamine oxidase from pig plasma	Catalytic mechanisms of the enzymes benzylamine oxidase from pig plasma.
19	the characterization of two reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked aldehyde reductases from pig brain	The characterization of two aldehyde reductases of pig brain related to nicotinamide; adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced.
19	effects of some disinfectants on african swine fever virus	Effect of some African swine fever virus disinfectants.
19	the pathogenesis of potter s syndrome of renal agenesis	The pathogenesis of bowel movement syndrome; renal agenesis.
19	d myoinositol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphohydrolase	D myoinositol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphohydrolase.
19	phosphoric acid triester glutathione alkyltransferase a mechanism for the detoxification of dimethyl phosphate triesters	Triester d' glutathione phosphoric acid alkyltransferase, a mechanism for the detoxification of dimethyl phosphate triesters.
19	antibody responses in serum colostrum and milk of swine after infection or vaccination with transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Antibody reactions in serum colostrum and milk after infection or vaccination with transmissible gastrovirus.
19	the purification and properties of factor x from pig serum and its role in hypercoagulability in vivo	The purification and properties of the x-factor of pig serum and its role in in vivo hypercoagulation.
19	physiology and chemistry of the hypothalamic releasing factors for gonadotropins a new approach to fertility control	The physiology and chemistry of hypothalamic gonadotropin release factors constitute a new approach to fertility control.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus i whole cell agglutinin response	Reactions of humoral antibodies from experimentally infected pigs with whole cell agglutinin response to e streptococcus group i.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus ii antistreptokinase and antistreptodornase responses	Humoral antibody reactions of experimentally infected pigs with antistreptokinase and antistreptodornase responses of the e streptococcus group ii.
19	polyserositis and arthritis due to escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs	Polyserosis and arthritis due to apos; escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs.
19	the pattern of enteroviral infections in a herd of swine	A pattern of enteroviral infections in a herd of swine.
19	antigenic type specificity of swine isolates of streptococcus equisimilis	Specificity of the antigenic type of porcine isolates of streptococcus equisimilis.
19	swine interferon i induction in porcine cell cultures with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine interferon i induction in swine cell cultures with viral and synthetic inducers.
19	swine interferon ii induction in pigs with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine interferon ii induction in pigs with viral and synthetic inducers.
19	african swine fever application of immunoelectroosmophoresis for the detection of antibody	Application of anti-Hog Fever; immuno-electro-osmophoresis for the detection of antibodies.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 1 serological evidence of infection in swine in great britain with an influenza a virus antigenically like human hong kong 68 virus	Human-Swine Influenza Relationship Studies 1 Serological evidence of infection in swine in Grande-Brittany with an influenza virus antigenically similar to human hong kong virus 68 virus.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 2 immunological comparisons of human a hong kong 68 virus with influenza a viruses of porcine origin	Studies on the relationship between swine and human influenza 2 Immunologic comparisons between human a hong kong 68 virus and influenza a d'apos; swine origin.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes i phagocytic and bactericidal properties of polymorphonuclear leukocytes from swine	In vitro studies of group e streptococci in phagocyte swine leukocytes and bactericidal properties of polymorphonuclear leukocytes from swine.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of macrophages from immune and nonimmune swine	In vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of macrophages from both immune and nonimmune swine.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes 3 the migration inhibition test as an indication of delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcic lymphadenitis	In vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes, 3d; migration inhibition as an indication of streptococci; delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcal lymphadenitis.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on experimental salmonella infection of swine and antibiotic resistance transfer	Evidence; effect of apo; food additive to chlortetracycline on apo; experimental infection of swine with Salmonella and transfer of antibiotic resistance.
19	age dependent resistance to transmissible gastroenteritis of swine tge i clinical signs and some mucosal dimensions in small intestine	Dosage-dependent resistance; age to gastro-transmissible enteritis of clinical signs in pigs and certain dimensions of their mucosa; small intestine.
19	electron microscopy of intestinal epithelial cells of piglets infected with a transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Electron microscopy of intestinal epithelial cells from piglets infected with the transmissible gastrovirus @-@enteritis.
19	isolation of escherichia coli o157 from pigs with colibacillosis in canada and the united states	Isolation of escherichia coli o157 from swine with colibacillosis in Canada and U.S. states.
19	role of the k88 antigen in the pathogenesis of neonatal diarrhea caused by escherichia coli in piglets	The role of the antigen k88 in the pathogenesis of neonatal diarrhea caused by escherichia coli in piglets.
19	aggregation of human blood platelets by vasopressin	Aggregation of human blood platelets by vasopressin.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate by a specific system from pig liver studies on the mechanism of the reaction	Enzyme degradation of serine o sulfate by a specific system from apos; pig liver studies on the mechanism of the reaction.
19	subcellular organization of neurophysins oxytocin 8 lysine vasopressin and adenosine triphosphatase in porcine posterior pituitary lobes	Subcellular organization of neurophysins oxytocin 8, lysine vasopressin and adenosine triphosphatase in posterior pituitary lobes of pigs.
19	characterization of the coronary vascular adrenoceptor in the pig	Characterization of the coronary vascular adrenoceptor in swine.
19	changes in the protein polysaccharides of pig articular cartilage during prenatal life development and old age	Changes in the protein polysaccharides of pig articular cartilage during prenatal development and aging.
19	haemorrhage as a complication of extracorporeal pig liver perfusion studies on mechanism and prevention	Hemorrhage as a complication of extracorporeal hepatic perfusion studies on mechanisms and prevention.
19	lipogenic enzyme activities and cellularity of porcine adipose tissue from various anatomical locations	Lipogenic enzymatic activity and cellularity of porcine adipose tissue in various anatomical locations.
19	cholesterol turnover synthesis and retention in hypercholesterolemic growing swine	Cholesterol turnover synthesis and retention in hypercholesterolemic growing pigs.
19	inhibition of monoamine oxidase by substituted hydrazines	Inhibition of monoamine oxidase by substituted hydrazines.
19	16 unsaturated c 19 3 oxo steroids as metabolic intermediates in boar testis	Sixteen unsaturated c 19-3 oxo steroids as metabolic intermediates in wild boar testicles.
19	synthetic peptides in the diagnosis of exocrine pancreatic insufficiency in animals	The synthetic peptides in the diagnosis of the apos; exocrine pancreatic insufficiency in animals.
19	properties of the enterotoxic component in escherichia coli enteropathogenic for swine	Properties of the enterotoxic component of enteropathogenic Escherichia coli in swine.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens i serological identification of saint louis encephalitis virus soluble antigens	Group b arbovirus, structural and nonstructural antigens i serological identification of soluble LV antigens; St.-Louis encephalitis.
19	an antiphagocytic factor associated with group e streptococcus	Antiphagocytic factor associated with group e streptococcus.
19	the effect of vaccination with a live attenuated strain of japanese encephalitis virus on stillbirths in swine in taiwan	The effect of vaccination with a live attenuated strain of the Japanese encephalitis virus on stillbirths in pigs in Taiwan.
19	enhanced protein adsorption at the solid solution interface dependence on surface charge	Improvement of the apos; protein adsorption at apos; solid solution interface as a function of surface charge.
19	two morphologically distinct blood brain barriers preventing entry of cytochrome c into cerebrospinal fluid	There are two morphologically distinct blood barriers that prevent the entry of cytochrome c into the cerebrospinal fluid.
19	action of phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c on bacillus subtilis protoplasts	The action of phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c on bacillus subtilis protoplasts.
19	antibodies against human types a and b influenzaviruses in the sera of animals in spain	Antibodies against human influenzaviruses in the serum of animals in Spain.
19	liver preservation by single passage hypothermic squirt perfusion	Retention of the liver by infusion of hypothermic jets.
19	pour plate method for the detection of coagulase production by staphylococcus aureus	Pour the plate method for the detection of coagulase production by staphylococcus aureus.
19	observations on diseased pigs with high sulfate intake and normal tissue copper levels	Observations on diseased swine with high sulfate intake and normal tissue copper levels.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder swine clinical immunofluorescence and histopathological obervations	Transmissible gastroenteritis in swine; clinical immunofluorescence in swine; fattening and histopathological ovations.
19	viability and ultrastructural changes in group e streptococci after in vitro phagocytosis by swine macrophages	The viability and ultrastructural changes of group e streptococci following in vitro phagocytosis by swine macrophages.
19	experimental colibacillosis in gnotobiotic baby pigs i microbiological and clinical aspects	Experimental colibacillosis in gnotobiotic piglets i microbiological and clinical aspects of the disease.
19	production of ochratoxins a and b on country cured ham	Production of ochratoxins a and b from salted country ham.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda an in vitro model	The role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea delayed an in vitro model.
19	calcitonin resistance clinical and immunologic studies in subjects with paget s disease of bone treated with porcine and salmon calcitonins	Clinical and immunological studies on calcitonin resistance in patients with paget bone disease treated with porcine and salmon calcitonins.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods low temperature irradiation of codfish cake corned beef and pork sausage	Irradiation sterilization of cod cake prototypes; low temperature irradiation of corned beef and pork sausages.
19	comparison of three techniques for the total count of anaerobes from intestinal contents of pigs	Comparison of three techniques for the total enumeration of anaerobes from the intestinal contents of pigs.
19	the role of zinc ions in the transformation of lymphocytes by phytohaemagglutinin	The role of zinc ions in the transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin.
19	proteoglycans of the knee joint cartilage of young normal and lame pigs	Proteoglycans of the knee joint cartilage of young, normal, gimpy pigs.
19	thiopeptin a new feed additive antibiotic biological studies and field trials	Thiopeptine, a new feed antibiotic, biological studies and field trials.
19	the transfer of mannose from guanosine diphosphate mannose to dolichol phosphate and protein by pig liver endoplasmic reticulum	Transfer of mannose from guanosine diphosphate mannose to dolichol phosphate and proteins by pig liver endoplasmic reticulum.
19	identification and measurement of the folates in sheep liver	Identification and measurement of folates in sheep liver.
19	the role of superoxide anion radical in the reduction of ferritin iron by xanthine oxidase	The role of superoxide anion radical in the reduction of ferritin by xanthine oxidase.
19	secretory protein synthesis in the stimulated rat parotid gland temporal dissociation of the maximal response from secretion	Synthesis of secretory proteins in the stimulated rat parotid gland, temporal dissociation of the maximum response to secretion.
19	occurrence of the enzymes effecting the conversion of acetyl coa to squalene in homogenates of hog aorta	Presence of enzymes responsible for the conversion of acetyl coa to squalene in homogenates of pork aorta.
19	toxic metabolite produced by aspergillus wentii	Toxic metabolite produced by aspergillus wentii.
19	ammonium sulfate fractionation of sera mouse hamster guinea pig monkey chimpanzee swine chicken and cattle	Ammonium sulfate fractionation of serum mouse hamster guinea monkey chimpanzee swine chicken and cattle.
19	multiple forms of acetylcholinesterase from pig brain	Multiple forms of acetylcholinesterase from pig brain.
19	isolation of salmonellae from pork carcasses	To isolate salmonella from pork carcasses.
19	selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated material by incorporation of neomycin to culture media	Selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated material by incorporation of neomycin into culture media.
19	isolations of subgenus 3 salmonellas arizonas in cardiff 1959 1971	Isolation of under-genera 3 of salmonella arizonas in cardiff 1959 1971.
19	bacteriophage restriction in salmonella typhimurium by r factors and transfer factors	Bacteriophage limitation in Salmonella typhimurium by r factors and transfer factors.
19	cholesterol solubility in bile evidence that supersaturated bile is frequent in healthy man	The solubility of cholesterol in bile indicates that supersaturated bile is frequent in healthy men.
19	demonstration of r factors in bordetella bronchiseptica isolated from pigs	Evidence of r factors in bordetella bronchiseptica isolated from the pigs.
19	localization of spirochetes with the structural characteristics of treponema hyodysenteriae in the lesions of swine dysentery	Localization of spirochetes with the structural characteristics of treponema hyodysenteriae in lesions of porcine dysentery.
19	fecal bacterial beta glucuronidase control by diet	Control of fecal bacterial beta-glucuronidase activity by diet.
19	the kinetics of the interconversion of intermediates of the reaction of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate	The kinetics of the interconversion of intermediates from the reaction of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate.
19	von willebrand factor gene dosage relationships and transfusion response in bleeder swine a new bioassay	Relative assay of the willebrand factor gene and transfusion response in hemorrhagic swine, a new bioassay.
19	amino acid sequence of porcine pepsin	Amino acid sequence of porcine pepsin.
19	immunoelectrophoretic analysis of mycoplasma mycoides var mycoides	Immunoelectrophoretic analysis of mycoplasma mycoides var mycoides.
19	microtubule surface lattice and subunit structure and observations on reassembly	Structure of-unit and microtubule surface network and observations on reassembly.
19	amphibian pituitary growth hormone and prolactin immunochemical relatedness to rat growth hormone	Amphibian pituitary growth hormone and prolactin are immunochemically related to rat growth hormone.
19	characterization of ileal vitamin b12 binding using homogeneous human and hog intrinsic factors	Characterization of ileal vitamin b12 binding in humans and swine; aid of homogeneous intrinsic factors.
19	comparison of six methods for isolating mycobacteria from swine lymph nodes	Comparison of six methods for isolation of porcine lymph node mycobacteria.
19	pentapeptide pepstatin inhibition of brain acid proteinase	Pepstatin, pentapeptide, pepstatin inhibition of proteinase; brain acid.
19	titration and neutralization of rabies virus era strain following its replication in a pig fallopian tube cell line	Title and neutralization of rabies virus era strain after replication in a fallopian tube cell line.
19	glucocorticoid induced stress susceptibility in swine adrenocortical pathology	Glucocorticoids induced stress susceptibility in porcine adrenocortical pathology.
19	antigenic and biochemical characterization of the c type particle of the stable porcine kidney cell line pk 15	Antigenic and biochemical characterization of the c-type particle of the stable pk 15 kidney cell line.
19	paradoxical increase in rate of catabolism of low density lipoproteins after hepatectomy	Paradoxical increase in the rate of catabolism of low density lipoproteins after hepatectomy.
19	quantitative study of the bacterial flora of the large intestine of dysenteric swine	A quantitative study of the bacterial flora of the large intestine of the dysenteric pig.
19	observations of cattle goats and pigs after administration of synthetic interferon inducers and subsequent exposure to foot and mouth disease virus	Post-fetal observations of goats and swine; administration of synthetic inducers; interferon and subsequent exposure to the FMD virus.
19	a preliminary study on the intestinal flora of cecum and colon of eight ten and 12 week old swine	A preliminary study of the intestinal flora of caecum and colon of eight 10- and 12-week-old pigs.
19	concentration of igg in serum and large intestine of dysenteric swine	Dapos concentration; igg in serum and large intestine of dysenteric swine.
19	bordetella agglutinating antibody in swine a herd survey	Bordetella agglutinating antibody in swine a herd survey.
19	use of mailed questionnaire data in a study of swine congenital malformations	Use of mailed questionnaire data in a study of swine congenital malformations.
19	isolation of a glucagon containing peptide primary structure of a possible fragment of proglucagon	Isolation of apos; a glucagon containing the peptide primary structure of apos; a possible proglucagon fragment.
19	purification and some properties of cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase from sheep liver	Purification and certain properties of cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase from sheep liver.
19	kinetic studies of the acylation of pig muscle d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase by 1 3 diphosphoglycerate and of proton uptake and release in the overall enzyme mechanism	Glyceraldehyde acylation-3 phosphate dehydrogenase kinetic studies of porcine muscle by 13 diphosphoglycerate and l' proton uptake and release in the apos; whole enzyme mechanism.
19	conformation of the mucopolysaccharides x ray fibre diffraction of heparin	Conformation of the mucopolysaccharides x diffraction of the radius fibers of l' heparin.
19	binding of oligosaccharides of hyaluronic acid to proteoglycans	The binding of hyaluronic acid to proteoglycan oligosaccharides.
19	system for studying uninfected and virus infected cell cultures in hyperbaric chambers	Study of uninfected and virus-infected cell cultures in hyperbaric chambers.
19	comparison of brilliant green agar and hektoen enteric agar media in the isolation of salmonellae from food products	Comparison of brilliant green agar and hektoen enteric agar in apos; isolation of salmonellae from food products.
19	lytic activity of vibrio phages on strains of vibrio fetus isolated from man and animals	The lytic activity of vibrio phages on strains of vibrio fetuses isolated from humans and animals.
19	isolation of porcine parvovirus from commercial trypsin	Isolate porcine parvovirus from commercial trypsin.
19	susceptibility of the mouse intestine to heat stable enterotoxin produced by enteropathogenic escherichia coli of porcine origin	Mouse intestine to apo; heat stable enterotoxin produced by enteropathogenic escherichia coli to apo; porcine origin.
19	lead inclusion bodies in osteoclasts	Body d' lead inclusion in osteoclasts.
19	isolation of edwardsiella tarda from swine	Isolate the apos; Edwardsiella delayed from the pigs.
19	microbiology of the frankfurter process salmonella and natural aerobic flora	Microbiology of the process Frankfurter Salmonella and natural aerobic flora.
19	selective pancreatic enzyme secretion due to a new peptide called chymodenin	The selective secretion of pancreatic enzymes is due to a new peptide called chymodenin.
19	therapeutic effect of lincomycin and spectinomycin water medication on swine dysentery	The therapeutic effect of lincomycin and spectinomycin treatment on swine dysentery.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia i dectection and preparation of an active principle	Apos experimental illness; oedema caused by apos; swine E. coli enterotoxemia and preparation of apos; an active ingredient.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia 3 pathology and pathogenesis	Experimental disease of the intestine; oedema of the intestine; porcine e coli enterotoxemia 3 and pathology and pathogenesis.
19	experimental alkylmercurial poisoning in swine lesions in the peripheral and central nervous systems	Experimental alkylmercury poisoning in porcine lesions of the central and peripheral nervous systems.
19	clinical and pathological observations on the experimental passage of swine dysentery	Clinical and pathological observations on the experimental passage of porcine dysentery.
19	growth and lability of chaetopterus oocyte mitotic spindles isolated in the presence of porcine brain tubulin	Mitotic spindle growth and lability of chaetopterus oocytes isolated in the presence of porcine brain tubulin.
19	chemotherapy of experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii synergism between penicillin and streptomycin against penicillin sensitive streptococci	Chemotherapy of apos; experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii synergism between penicillin and streptomycin against penicillin-susceptible streptococci.
19	plasmin induced platelet aggregation and platelet release reaction effects on hemostasis	Plasmin induced platelet aggregation and platelet release effects on apos; hemostasis.
19	population changes in enteric bacteria and other microorganisms during aerobic thermophilic windrow composting	Changes in populations of enteric bacteria and other microorganisms during heat-labelled aerobic composting.
19	cellular localization of gastric inhibitory polypeptide in the duodenum and jejunum	Cellular localization of gastric inhibitory polypeptide in the duodenum and jejunum.
19	mycotoxic nephropathy in pigs	Acute mycotoxic nephropathy in pigs.
19	seasonal infection of culex mosquitos and swine with japanese encephalitis virus	Japanese encephalitis is a seasonal infection of culex mosquitoes and pigs.
19	sources of contamination of cooked ready to eat cured and uncured meats	Sources of contamination of cooked ready-to-eat meats, salted and uncooked.
19	endogenous phospholipids of swine liver effect of fat deprivation on molecular species of phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine	Effect of fat deprivation on molecular species of pig liver phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine on endogenous phospholipids.
19	the influence of body core temperature and peripheral temperatures on oxygen consumption in the pig	L' influence of core body temperature and peripheral temperatures on oxygen consumption in the pig.
19	the effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and hypothalamus on thermoregulatory behaviour in the pig	The effects of heating and cooling of the spinal cord and hypothalamus on thermoregulatory behaviour of swine.
19	gastric emptying in young pigs	It's gastric emptying in young pigs.
19	hyaluronic acid in cartilage and proteoglycan aggregation	Hyaluronic acid in cartilage and l' proteoglycan aggregation.
19	swine vesicular disease attempts to transmit infection to cattle and sheep	Hog bladder disease attempts to transmit infection to cattle and sheep.
19	swine vesicular disease comparative studies of viruses isolated from different countries	Hog vesicular disease Comparative studies of viruses isolated from different countries.
19	the site at which 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate reacts with glutamate dehydrogenases	The site at which 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate reacts with glutamate dehydrogenases.
19	the amino acid sequence of the amino terminal 37 residues of human parathyroid hormone	The amino acid sequence of the amino terminus 37 residues of human parathyroid hormone.
19	the effect of acetyl coenzyme a on phosphate activated glutaminase from pig kidney and brain	The effect of acetyl coenzyme a on phosphate activated glutaminase in the kidney and pig brain.
19	mycoplasma hyorhinis swine arthritis 3 modified disease in piney woods swine	Mycoplasma hyorhinis pig arthritis 3 modified disease in pine swine.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens ii purification of saint louis encephalitis virus intracellular antigens	Arbovirus group b structural and non-structural antigens ii purification of the intracellular antigens of the virus St.-Louis.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens 3 serological specificity of solubilized intracellular viral proteins	Group b arbovirus, structural and nonstructural antigens 3 serological specificity of solubilized intracellular viral proteins.
19	involvement of the host cell nuclear envelope membranes in the replication of japanese encephalitis virus	L' involvement of apos membranes; host cell nuclear envelope in the replication of apos virus; Japanese encephalitis.
19	enterovirus neutralizing activity in the gastrointestinal tract of piglets	Enterovirus neutralizing activity in the gastro-intestinal tract of piglets.
19	the transporting proteins of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol in serum of chicks and other species partial purification and characterization of the chick proteins	The proteins for the transport of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol in the serum of chicks and d' other species purify and partially characterize chicken proteins.
19	immunological study of the heat labile enterotoxins of escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae	Immunological study of the heat-labile enterotoxins of escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae.
19	swine vesicular disease virological studies of experimental infections produced by the england 72 virus	Vesicular disease of pigs Virological studies of animals; experimental infections produced by the virus 72 of l'apos; England.
19	cellular localization of a vasoactive intestinal peptide in the mammalian and avian gastrointestinal tract	Cellular localization of d' a vasoactive intestinal peptide in the mammalian and avian gastrointestinal tract.
19	the isolation of escherichia coli from a poultry packing station and an abattoir	Isolation of plants; escherichia coli in a slaughterhouse and poultry packing plant.
19	protection against gram negative infections with antiserum to lipid a from salmonella minnesota r595	Protection against Gram-negative infection with antibody to lipid a from Salmonella minnesota r595.
19	mechanism of lysergic acid diethylamide interference with rabbit antibody biosynthesis	Mechanisms; interference of diethylamide; lysergic acid with rabbit antibody biosynthesis.
19	restraint of cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with drastic short term lowering of serum cholesterol levels by clofibrate or cholestyramine in hypercholesterolemic swine	Limitation of cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with dramatic short-term reduction of serum cholesterol levels by clofibrate or cholestyramine in hypercholesterolemic swine.
19	incompatibility reactions of r plasmids isolated from escherichia coli of animal origin	Responses; incompatibility of plasmids isolated from animals; escherichia coli; animal origin.
19	attemps to infect pigs with coxsackie virus type b5	Time to infect pigs with coxsackie virus type b5.
19	the significance of deep body temperature in regulating the concentration of thyroxine in the plasma of the pig	L' importance of deep body temperature in the regulation of the concentration of thyroxine in pig plasma.
19	isolation and characterization of luminal membranes from urinary bladder	Isolation and characterization of luminal membranes of the urinary bladder.
19	ecological studies on culex tritaeniorhynchus as a vector of japanese encephalitis	Ecological studies on culex tritaeniorhynchus as a vector of Japanese l' encephalitis.
19	radioimmunoassay of somatomedin b application to clinical and physiologic studies	Application of radioimmunoassay of somatomedin b to clinical and physiological studies.
19	recent trends in human salmonellosis in england and wales the epidemiology of prevalent serotypes other than salmonella typhimurium	Recent trends in human salmonellosis in England and disease mitigation; epidemiology of prevalent serotypes other than Salmonella typhimurium.
19	continuous non therapeutic use of antibacterial drugs in feed and drug resistance of the gram negative enteric florae of food producing animals	Continued non-therapeutic use of antibacterial drugs in feed and drug resistance in enteric flora @ gram-@ negative in food producing animals.
19	intramammary infections in the sow during the peripartum period	Intramammary infections in the sow during the perinatal period.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder pigs observations on the jejunal epithelium of normal feeder pigs and feeder pigs infected with tge virus	Gastro-transmissible in swine; fattening Comments on the status; jejunal epithelium of swine; normal and feeder swine; swine feeding infected with the virus tge.
19	aromatic amino acid hydroxylase inhibitors 4 3 substituted alpha methyltyrosines	Apos inhibitors; aromatic amino acid hydroxylase 4 substituted alpha methyltyrosines 3.
19	distribution of prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in swine kidney medulla and cortex	Distribution of prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in porcine medulla and renal cortex.
19	purification characterization and radioimmunoassay of thyrocalcitonin from rat thyroid glands	Characterization and radioimmunoassay of thyrocalcitonin from rat thyroid glands.
19	the properties of muscarinic receptors in mammalian cerebral cortex	The properties of muscarinic receptors in mammalian cerebral cortex.
19	the demonstration of plasma cells and other immunoglobulin containing cells in formalin fixed paraffin embedded tissues using peroxidase labelled antibody	The demonstration of plasma cells and other cells containing apo; immunoglobulin in paraffin-coated tissues fixed to the formalin at the apo; assistance; antibody labeled to the peroxidase.
19	synergism between trichuris suis and the microbial flora of the large intestine causing dysentery in pigs	The synergism between trichuris suis and the microbial flora of the large intestine causes dysentery in pigs.
19	anionic and cationic dog trypsin isolation and partial characterization	Anionic and cationic dog trypsin isolation and partial characterization.
19	purification of 125i labelled lysine vasopressin by affinity chromatography on sepharose bound neurophysins	The purification of 125i-labelled lysine vasopressin by affinity chromatography on Sepharose-linked neurophysins.
19	fluorescence studies on the active sites of porcine pepsin and rhizopus pepsin	Fluorescence studies on the active sites of porcine pepsin and pepsin rhizopus.
19	fluorescent and spin label probes of the environments of the sulfhydryl groups of porcine muscle adenylate kinase	Fluorescent probes and spin labels of porcine muscle adenylate kinase sulfhydryl group environments.
19	purification and partial characterization of human and porcine c3a anaphylatoxin	Purification and partial characterization of human and porcine anaphylatoxin.
19	circular dichroism of c3a anaphylatoxin effects of ph heat guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol on conformation and function	Circular dichroism of the anaphylatoxin c3a effects of guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol on conformation and function.
19	a comparison of ventricular weights and geometry in newborn young and adult mammals	Newborn young and adult mammals: a comparison of ventricular weight and geometry.
19	in vitro labeling of beta apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c and preliminary application to turnover studies	In vitro labeling of apos; beta apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c and preliminary application to the renewal studies.
19	characterization of metabolites in domestic sow urine after intravenous administration of radioactive estrogen and corticosteroids	Characterization of metabolites in domestic sow urine after dosage; intravenous administration of estrogen and radioactive corticosteroids.
19	distribution of sulphate and iduronic acid residues in heparin and heparan sulphate	Distribution of sulfate and d*apos residues; iduronic acid in heparin and heparan sulphate.
19	platelets fixed with paraformaldehyde a new reagent for assay of von willebrand factor and platelet aggregating factor	Platelets have fixed with paraformaldehyde a new reagent for von willebrand factor and d&apos factor; platelet aggregation.
19	an attempt to identify the intestinal receptor for the k88 adhesin by means of a haemagglutination inhibition test using glycoproteins and fractions from sow colostrum	Tent d' identification of intestinal receptor; adhesin k88 by means of apos; a d&apos test; inhibition of apos; hemagglutination using glycoproteins and fractions of sow colostrum.
19	influence of dietary 1 3 butanediol on wieght gain blood and liver metabolites and lipogenesis in the pig and chick	L' influence of dietary butanediol 13 on blood gain and liver metabolites and lipogenesis in pigs and chickens.
19	the granulovesicular bodies of the arterial wall	The granulovesicular bodies of the arterial wall.
19	minor calyces as primary pacemaker sites for ureteral activity in man	Calice as the main site of the pacemaker for ureteral activity in men.
19	cytological cytochemical and immuno fluorescence studies with dugbe virus a new nigerian tick borne virus	Cytochemical and immunofluorescence studies with dugbe virus, a new virus transmitted by Nigerian tick.
19	immune mediated emigration of neutrophils into the lumen of the small intestine	L' emigration of neutrophils into the lumen of the small intestine is immune mediated.
19	the efficiency of operatnt thermoregulatory behavior in pigs as determined from the rate of oxygen consumption	The efficiency of the pork thermoregulatory behaviour as determined by the rate of oxygen consumption.
19	evaluation of a bovine viral diarrhea vaccine produced in a porcine kidney cell line	Evaluation of a bovine viral diarrhea vaccine produced in a swine kidney cell line.
19	cadmium its in vivo detection in man	Cadmium, its detection in vivo in humans.
19	separation of two new trypsin inhibiting fractions from human serum	Separation of two new trypsin inhibitory fractions from human serum.
19	d asparatate oxidase in the thyroid gland	Acute asparatate oxidase in the thyroid gland.
19	effect of prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact dog swine and lamb	The effect of prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact swine and lambs.
19	properties of the stable aerobic and anaerobic half reduced states of nadph cytochrome c reductase	The properties of the stable aerobic and anaerobic half reduced the states of nadph cytochrome c reductase.
19	oxidation of methionine residues of porcine and bovine pepsins	Oxidation of methionic residues of porcine and bovine pepsins.
19	phosphorylation of purified thyroid plasma membranes incubated with 32 p atp	Phosphorylation of purified thyroid plasma membranes incubated with 32 p atp.
19	the effect of alcohols on mitochondrial monoamine oxidase activity	L' effect of alcohols on mitochondrial monoamine oxidase activity.
19	the induction persistence and loss of framycetin sulphate resistance in enteric e coli of pigs	Persistence of induction and loss of framycetin sulfate resistance in enteric e coli from swine.
19	adenoviruses of man and animals	Adenovirus of humans and animals.
19	studies on immunity to aujeszky s disease pseudorabies virus infection in pigs	Apos studies; immunity to apos; pseudorabies virus infection of apos; Aujeszky in swine.
19	protection by natural infection and vaccination against respiratory diseases caused by mycoplasmas	Protection by natural infection and vaccination against respiratory diseases caused by mycoplasmas.
19	the importance of picornavirus infections in respiratory disease of man and other mammals	The importance of picornavirus infections in respiratory diseases of humans and other mammals.
19	the importance of mycoplasmas in respiratory infections	L' importance of mycoplasmas in respiratory infections.
19	radioimmunoassay for motilin	I'm taking a radioimmunoassay of motilin.
19	5alpha androstenone in peripheral plasma of pigs diurnal variation in boars effects of intravenous hcg administration and castration	Alpha androstenone in peripheral plasma of pigs diurnal variation of wild boar effects of apos; intravenous administration of hcg and castration.
19	determination of sensitivity of mycoplasma hyosynoviae to tylosin and selected antibacterial drugs by a microtiter technique	Determination of the sensitivity of mycoplasma hyosynoviae to tylosin and selected antibacterial drugs by microtitration.
19	protective effect of immunoglobulins in serum and milk of sows exposed to transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Protective effect of immunoglobulins in serum and milk of sows exposed to transmissible gastrovirus @-@enteritis.
19	the effect of antisera on porcine enteropathogenic escherichia coli in ligated segments of pig intestine	L' effect of antisera on porcine enteropathogenic escherichia coli in ligated segments of the intestine.
19	antibacterial activity of antisera against homologous and heterologous escherichia coli of porcine origin	Antibacterial activity of antisera against homologous and heterologous Escherichia coli of porcine origin.
19	the detection of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunodiffusion	The detection of viral antigens in the gastrointestinal tract-enteritis that can be transmitted by immunodiffusion.
19	a study of articular surfaces and synovial fossae of the pectoral limb of swine	A study of the articular surfaces and synovial pits of the pectoral limb of the pig.
19	pharmacokinetics of phenylbutazone and oxyphenabutazone in the pig	Pharmacokinetics of phenylbutazone and oxyphenabutazone in swine.
19	immunocytochemical localization of substance p in mammalian intestine	Immunocytochemical localization of substance p in the mammalian intestine.
19	porcine parvovirus natural and experimental infections of the porcine fetus and prevalence in mature swine	Swine parvovirus natural and experimental infections in swine fetus and prevalence in mature swine.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs adhesion of enteropathogenic escherichia coli to isolated intestinal epithelial cells	Immunity to escherichia coli in pigs, adhesion of enteropathogenic escherichia coli to isolated intestinal epithelial cells.
19	bifunctional reagents as vapour and liquid phase fixatives for immunohistochemistry	Vapour phase bifunctional reagents and liquid phase fixatives for immunohistochemistry.
19	microspectrophotometric detection of heparin in mast cells and basophilic granulocytes stained metachromatically with toluidine blue o	Microspectrophotometric detection of apos; heparin in mast cells and basophilic granulocytes stained metachromatically with toluidine blue o.
19	immunofluorescent localization of the female sex steroids in the porcine ovary	Location of female sex steroids in the porcine ovary by immunofluorescence.
19	reproductive failure in swine associated with maternal seroconversion for porcine parvovirus	Reproductive failure in swine associated with maternal seroconversion of parvovirus pig.
19	experimental scoliosis in primates failure of a technique	A technique for experimental scoliosis in failed primates.
19	lung vascular smooth muscle as a determinant of pulmonary hypertension at high altitude	Lung vascular smooth muscle as a determinant of lacidosis; pulmonary hypertension at high altitudes.
19	denaturation and proteolytic digestion of porcine low density lipoprotein in aqueous guanidine hydrochloride solutions	Denaturation and proteolytic digestion of low density porcine lipoprotein in aqueous guanidine hydrochloride solutions.
19	porcine malignant hyperthermia effects of halothane on mitochondrial respiration and calcium accumulation	Effects of apo; swine malignant hyperthermia of apo; halothane on mitochondrial respiration and calcium accumulation.
19	prevention of porcine malignant hyperthermia by epidural block	Dosage prevention; malignant porcine hyperthermia by epidural blockade.
19	a vascular catheter implanting device	This device is called a vascular catheter implant.
19	surveillance of iowa swine herds for influenza like illness combined serologic and virus isolation method	Surveillance of swine herds in Iowa for influenza and illness combined serologic and viral isolation.
19	electron microscopic evaluation of bone cells in pigs with experimentally induced bordetella rhinitis turbinate osteoporosis	Electron microscopic evaluation of bone cells from pigs with osteoporosis turbinate induced experimentally by bordetella rhinitis.
19	effects of prednisone on gastric secretion and development of stomach lesions in swine	The effects of prednisone on gastric secretion and development of gastric lesions in pigs.
19	porcine parvovirus frequency of naturally occurring transplacental infection and viral contamination of fetal porcine kidney cell cultures	Prevalence of swine parvovirus infections; natural transplacental origin and viral contamination of fetal swine kidney cell cultures.
19	influence of antibody mediated immune suppression on clinical viral and immune responses to swine influenza infection	Influence of apo; antibody-mediated immunosuppression of clinical viral and immune responses to swine influenza infection.
19	cannulation of ductus deferens of the boar a surgical technique	Canulation of the boar vas deferens by a surgical technique.
19	frequency of sarcocystis spp in detroit metropolitan area michigan	Frequency of sarcocystis spp in metropolitan Detroit, Michigan.
19	an immunoperoxidase technique for the identification of gastrin producing cells	An immunoperoxidase technique for the identification of gastrin-producing cells.
19	serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase reactions on antigen coupled agarose beads	Serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase reactions on beads; agarose with antigen.
19	brain cells in culture morphological transformation by a protein	Morphological transformation of brain cells in culture by a protein.
19	radioligand receptor assay for urinary and serum hcg	Radioligand receptor assay for urinary and serum hcg hg.
19	binding of bile salts to pancreatic colipase and lipase	The bile salts bind to pancreatic colipase and lipase.
19	nutritional studies on east african herbivores 2 losses of nitrogen in the faeces	Nutritional studies on herbivores in Africa; 2 losses of nitrogen in the faeces.
19	nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide an analog of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide synthesis and enzyme studies	Nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide analog of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide synthesis and enzyme studies.
19	further characterization of bovine pancreatic lipase	Further characterization of bovine pancreatic lipase activity.
19	thyroid microsomal membrane proteins effects of solubilization on molecular size	Effects of solubilization on molecular size of thyroid microsomal membrane proteins.
19	kinetics of alkaline phosphatase from pig kidney mechanism of activation by magnesium ions	The kinetics of alkaline phosphatase of the d&apos mechanism; activation by magnesium ions in pig kidney.
19	the calcium induced dissociation of human plasma clotting factor xiii	Calcium induced dissociation of human plasma clotting factor xiii.
19	type c virus production by a continuous line of pig oviduct cells pft	Production of c-type virus by a continuous line of pft pig oviducal cells.
19	the proteins of murray valley encephalitis virus	Proteins of murray valley encephalitis.
19	antigenic and antiheparin properties of human platelet factor 4 pf4	Antigenic and antihepin properties of human platelet factor 4 pf4.
19	a convenient spectrophotometric assay for the determination of l ergothioneine in blood	This is a convenient spectrophotometric test for the determination of ergothionein in blood.
19	characterization of gastric mucoproteins isolated by equilibrium density gradient centrifugation in caesium chloride	Characterization of gastric mucoproteins isolated by cesium chloride equilibrium density gradient centrifugation.
19	conformational changes in gastric mucoproteins induced by caesium chloride and guanidinium chloride	Conformational changes in gastric mucoproteins induced by caesium chloride and guanidinium chloride.
19	x ray fibre diffraction of cartilage proteoglycan aggregates containing hyaluronic acid	X X-ray fiber diffraction of cartilage proteoglycan aggregates containing hyaluronic acid.
19	study of rickettsioses in slovakia i coxiella burneti and rickettsiae of the spotted fever sf group in ticks and serological surveys in animals and humans in certain selected localities in the lucenec and v krt s districts	Studies of tick rickettsia in Slovenia i coxiella burneti and rickettsia in the sf spotted fever group and serological studies in animals and humans at selected localities in the lucenec and v krt s districts.
19	sites of organic acid production and pattern of digesta movement in the gastrointestinal tract of swine	Sites of production; organic acids and pattern of digesta movements in the gastro-intestinal tract of pigs.
19	changes in the intestinal lactase activity in the small intestine of two breeds of swine from birth to 6 weeks of age	Changes in the intestinal lactase activity in the intestines; small intestine of two strains of pigs, from birth to age; age of 6 weeks.
19	pure human big gastrin immunochemical properties disappearance half time and acid stimulating action in dogs	In dogs, the immunochemical properties of large pure human gastrin are lost at mid@-@ time and stimulate the action of l' acid.
19	comparison of three methods for the detection of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by five european laboratories	Comparison of three methods for the detection of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by five European laboratories.
19	serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by enzyme linked immunosorbent assays	Serodiagnosis of apo; trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by enzyme-linked immuno-@ tests.
19	effect of follicular fluid and oestradiol on the luteinization of rat granulosa cells in vitro	Effect of follicular fluid and estradiol on the luteinization of rat granulosa cells in vitro.
19	development of ceruloplasmin in pigs during the neonatal period	The development of ceruloplasmin in pigs during the neonatal period.
19	leptospirosis in ethiopia a serological survey in domestic and wild animals	Ethiopian leptospirosis is a serological study in domestic and wild animals.
19	effects of estradiol 17beta on lh rh fsh rh induced and spontaneous lh release in prepubertal female pigs	The effects of l' estradiol 17beta on lh rh fsh rh induced and spontaneous release of lh in prepubertal female pigs.
19	acute and chronic estradiol 17beta inhibition of lh release in prepubertal female pigs time course and site of action	Acute and chronic estradiol 17beta inhibition of lh release in prepubescent female pigs chronologically and at the d&apos site; action.
19	serologic evidence of venezuelan equine encephalitis in some wild and domestic populations of southern texas	Serological evidence of Venezuelan equine encephalitis in some wild and domestic populations in southern Texas.
19	chemical debridement of burns	Chemical debridement of burns.
19	investigation of choriocarcinoma clonal cell lines in vitro and choriocarcinoma transplants in the hamster for the secretion of a thyroid stimulating factor	Examination of clonal choriocarcinoma cell lines in vitro and choriocarcinoma transplants in hamster rats for d&apos secretion, a thyroid-stimulating factor.
19	the removal of the seminal vesicles from the boar and the effects on the semen characteristics	L' removal of the seminal vesicles of wild boar and the effects on the characteristics of the sperm.
19	drug and chemical residues in domestic animals	Drug and chemical residues in domestic animals.
19	passive immunity in transmissible gastroenteritis of swine immunoglobulin characteristics of antibodies in milk after inoculating virus by different routes	Passive immunity in gastro transmissible enteritis; porcine immunoglobulin of antibodies in milk after inoculation of the virus by different routes.
19	pharmacologic endocrinological findings in animal experiments with turisynchron and suisynchron 4 analysis of residuals in pig carcasses	Pharmacological endocrinological results obtained from animal experiments with apo; residue analysis in pig carcasses by turisynchron and estynchron 4.
19	synchronization of estrus by the use of turisynchron premix and insemination time in young gilts	It is important to note that the use of a turisynchronous premix and time interval for insemination in young children.
19	behavior of neutral 17 ketosteroids in the urine of female pigs	Behaviour of 17 neutral ketosteroids in the urine of female pigs.
19	onset of puberty in young gilts kept under conditions of intensive husbandry	The onset of puberty in young gilts kept under intensive rearing conditions.
19	some effects of growth medium composition on the antigenicity of a t strain mycoplasma	Some effects of growth medium composition on apos antigenicity; mycoplasma strain t. mycoplasma.
19	prevention by methylprednisolone of the endothelial lesions in rabbits on a hypercholesterolic diet or submitted to immunologic injury	Prevention by methylprednisolone of endothelial lesions in rabbits on hypercholesteric or immunologically damaged diets.
19	identification of a folate binder in hog kidney	Identification of a folate binder in swine kidney.
19	uptake of dopamine into fractions of pig caudate nucleus homogenates	Capture of dopamine in fractions of pork caudate nuclei.
19	distribution of the dental lamina and deciduous tooth development in the mandible of the domestic pig	Distribution of the dental lamina and deciduous tooth development in the domestic pig mandible.
19	diagnostic and therapeutic use of lh releasing hormone	Diagnostic and therapeutic use of lh release hormone.
19	calcium antagonism a new principle in coronary vasodilation	Calcium antagonism is a new principle in coronary vasodilation.
19	oestrogen progesterone and corticosteroid concentrations in peripheral plasma of sows during pregnancy parturition lactation and after weaning	Concentrations of progesterone and estrogenic corticosteroids in peripheral plasma of sows during lactation of gestational parturition and postweaning.
19	superfusion in vitro in the study of ovarian steroidogenesis	In vitro superfusion in the apos; study of ovarian steroidogenesis.
19	the lethal effect of mebendazole on secondary echinococcus granulosus cysticerci of taenia pisiformis and tetrathyridia of mesocestoides corti	L' lethal effect of mebendazole on secondary echinococcus granulosus cysticerci of taenia pisiformis and tetrathyridia of corti mesocestoids.
19	laryngeal chemosensitivity a possible mechanism for sudden infant death	Laryngeal chemosensitivity is a possible mechanism for SIDS.
19	experimental intracerebral movement of electron microscopic tracers of various molecular sizes	Experimental intracerebral movement of electron microscopic tracers of various molecular sizes.
19	ultrastructural changes in ascaris suum intestine after mebendazole treatment in vivo	Ultrastructural changes in the intestine; ascaris suum after mebendazole treatment in vivo.
19	treatment of gastroschisis and omphalocele with biological dressings	The treatment of gastroschisis and apos; general with biological dressings.
19	microtubule macrotubule transitions intermediates after exposure to the mitotic inhibitor vinblastine	The microtubule macrotubule transitions were intermediate after exposure to the mitotic inhibitor vinblastine.
19	growth of nosema algerae in pig kidney cell cultures	Growth of nosema algerae in pig kidney cell cultures.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine i investigations with the tube test author s transl	Immunofluorescence technique for diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine surveys with apo; translator air tube test author.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine ii comparative investigations with the tube test and the cryostate method author s transl	Immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinella in swine ii comparative studies with tube test and cryostate method; transl.
19	hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus hev infections in swine serologic indication for infectional occurrence in denmark	Hepatic infections with LV; hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis in swine serological indications for onset of lupus; infection in denmark.
19	radioimmunoassay of serum pancreatic amylase in normal and pancreatectomized pigs 38504	Radioimmunoassay of serum pancreatic amylase in normal and pancreatectomized swine 38504.
19	failure of free fatty acids to influence degree of myocardial injury following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Inability of free fatty acids; to influence degree of myocardial injury following acute occlusion of the porcine coronary artery.
19	radioimmunoassay for gh release inhibiting hormone	Radioimmunoassay of apos; gh release inhibitory hormone.
19	effect of chronic ethanol ingestion on mitochondrial protein synthesis in sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Effect of chronic ethanol ingestion on mitochondrial protein synthesis in sinclair s 1 miniature swine.
19	drug metabolism in early life	You know, drug metabolism in early life.
19	the influence of route of vaccination on the systemic and local immune response in the pig	L' influence of the vaccination route on the systemic and local immune response in the pig.
19	histochemical development of myofibres in neonatal piglets	Histochemical development of myofibres in newborn-piglets.
19	growth of motor end plates and histochemistry of intrafusal myofibres in neonatal piglets	End-plate growth and histochemistry of intrafusal myofibres in newborn piglets @-@.
19	intestinal adenomatosis in the pig a possible relationship with a haemorrhagic enteropathy	Intestinal adenomatosis in the pig a possible relationship with hemorrhagic enteropathy.
19	plasma scalpel excision of burns an experimental study	Scalpel of plasma excised burns an experimental study.
19	villous atrophy in pigs orally infected with salmonella cholerae suis	Villositary wasting in pigs orally infected with Salmonella cholerae suis.
19	cultures of pig macrophages	Crops of pig macrophages.
19	the characterisation of campylobacter sputorum subspecies mucosalis isolated from pigs	Characterization of campylobacter sputorum under-species mucosalis isolated from pigs.
19	the experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic purpura in piglets	The experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic purpura in piglets.
19	studies on influencing gonadal function sexual behavior and growth in the pig by prenatal treatment with testosterone enanthate or estradiol benzoate	Dosage studies; influence of prenatal treatment with testosterone enanthate or d*apos benzoate; estradiol on sexual behaviour and gonadal growth in pigs.
19	effect of glucocorticoids on release of lysosomal enzymes in liver ischemia and hemorrhagic shock in pigs	Effect of glucocorticoids on release of glycosides; lysosomal enzymes in appetite; hepatic ischemia and hemorrhagic shock in swine.
19	sequence of heme decomposition by the coupled oxidation of myoglobin with ascorbic acid	Decomposition sequence of apos; heme by apos; coupled oxidation of myoglobin with ascorbic acid.
19	identification of a calcium binding protein as a calcium dependent regulator of brain adenylate cyclase	Identification of calcium binding protein as a calcium-dependent regulator of the brain's apos; adenylate cyclase.
19	increased parathyroid hormone secretion and hypocalcemia in experimental pancreatitis necessity for an intact thyroid gland	Increased apo secretion; parathyroid hormone and apo; hypocalcemia in experimental pancreatitis necessary for an intact thyroid gland.
19	use of neuroleptic agents in modern pig farming author s transl	Use of neuroleptic agents in modern pig farming.
19	problems of resistance author s transl	Resistance problems authors translate of resistance problems.
19	efficacy of different phosphorus supplements for sows during gestation and lactation	Efficiency of different phosphorus supplements for sows during pregnancy and lactation.
19	intestinal intubation in the unanaesthetised miniature pig technique for sampling and measurement of gut length per fistulam	Intestinal intubation in unanaesthetized miniature swine technique; sampling and measurement of gut length by fistulam.
19	an immunologic study of hyaluronidase of different animal origin	Immunological studies of the immune system; the hyaluronidase of different animal origin.
19	a comparative study of the anti anemic effect of new bulgarian iron dextran complexes with miofer 100 and ferroglucin 75 in rats and swine	A comparative study of the anti-anemic effect of new Bulgarian iron dextran complexes with miofer 100 and ferroglucin 75 in rats and pigs.
19	the pathogenesis of swine plague the hepato cerebral syndrome	The origin of the disease is the pathogenesis of swine fever, the cerebral liver syndrome.
19	escherichia coli serotype distribution in man and animals	Serotype distribution of escherichia coli in humans and animals.
19	primary pathological changes in cells infected with tick borne encephalitis virus	Tick-borne encephalitis: primary pathological changes in cells infected with the tick-borne virus.
19	use of procine zenografts in treatment of fournier s gangrene	Use of procin zenografts in treatment of gangrene in furnaces.
19	occurrence of k88 negative escherichia coli serotypes in pigs with post weaning diarrhoea	Serotypes of apos; k88 negative escherichia coli in post-weaning diarrhea swine.
19	experimental transmission of japanese encephalitis virus by culex tritaeniorhynchus and c fuscocephalus	Infection with the Japanese encephalitis virus by culex tritaeniorhynchus and c fuscocephalus.
19	force generating capacity and contractile protein content of arterial smooth muscle	Force-producing capacity and contractile protein content of arterial smooth muscle.
19	development of skin interfacing cannula	Canule development of d' skin interface.
19	assessment of gh releasing hormone activity in sephadex separated fractions of porcine hypothalamic extracts by hypophyseal portal vessel infusion in the rat	Evaluation of apo; activity of apo; gh-releasing hormone in sephadex separated fractions of apo; porcine hypothalamic extracts by infusion of pituitary portal vessels in rat.
19	rabbit beta glucuronidase subcellular distribution and immunochemical properties	Rabbit beta glucuronidase subcellular distribution and immunochemical properties.
19	the effects of acetylcolletotrichin on the mitochondrial respiratory chain	The effects of acetylcolletotrichine on the mitochondrial respiratory chain.
19	comparison of the sensitivity of laboratory animals and tissue cultures to infection with aujeszky s disease virus	Comparison of the sensitivity of laboratory animals and tissue cultures to apos disease virus; Aujesky s.
19	samonellosis and meat hygiene red meat	Samonellosis and meat hygiene Red meat.
19	the effect of species and organ specific features of tissue systems on the reactogenic and immunogenic properties of influenza virus	Effect of species- and organ-specific characteristics of tissue systems on the reactogenic and immunogenic properties of influenza virus.
19	the zoonoses order 1975	This is the order of zoonoses, 1975.
19	problem of homologization of the cerebral neocortex in cetaceans	Problem with the registration of cerebral neocortex in cetaceans.
19	observations on the histomorphology of sarcosporidian cysts of some east african game animals artiodactyla	Observations on the apos; histomorphology of sarcosporidian cysts of certain hunting animals; Africa; East, artiodactyla.
19	evaluation of prosthetic grafts of different porosity for arterial reconstruction	Evaluation of prosthesis grafts of different porosity for arterial reconstruction.
19	sites of organic acid production and absorption in gastrointestinal tract of the pig	Production and storage sites; absorption of organic acids in the gastrointestinal tract of the pig.
19	arsenic residues in livers of swine lamb and poultry and in eggs	Residues; arsenic in the liver of pork and poultry and in eggs.
19	frequency distribution of s typhi murium phage types in various countries	Frequency of distribution of typhi murium phage types in various countries.
19	on the sugar content of the lipopolysaccharides of the various strains known as yersinia enterocolitica	On the sugar content of the lipopolysaccharides of the various strains known as yersinia enterocolitica.
19	investigations on toxic fractions of swine erysipelas bacteria erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 1 communication toxicity investigation on a phenol water extract in chicken embryos author s transl	Studies of toxic fractions of the pig erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 1 Toxicity study of phenol extract in translative chick embryos for communication.
19	the differenziation of swine mycoplasma by acrylamide gel electrophoresis author s transl	The differentiation of swine mycoplasma by acrylamide gel electrophoresis author s.
19	pasteurella multocida serotyping results 1971 1973	Results of pasteurella multocida serotyping 1973.
19	bone canaliculus endings in the area of the osteocyte lacuna electron microscopic studies	Bone canalicular endings in the apos region; electron microscopic study of lacunar osteocytes.
19	a comparsion of glycopeptides from the transferrins of several species	Comparison of glycopeptides from the transferrins of several species.
19	active sitve titration of pig plasma benzylamine oxidase with phenylhydrazine	Active seat titration of pig plasma benzylamine oxidase with phenylhydrazine.
19	lidocaine effects on brain mitochondrial metabolism in vitro	Effects of lidocaine on cerebral mitochondrial metabolism in vitro.
19	purification and heterogeneity of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Purification and heterogeneity of inorganic pyrophosphatase from cartilage of pork shoulder blades.
19	properties of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Properties of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pork cartilage.
19	observations on the lipolytic and melanotropic properties of neurophysin proteins	Observations on the lipolytic and melanotropic properties of neurophysins.
19	bacteriocinogeny in yersinia enterocolitica	Britiocinogenesis in yersinia enterocolitica.
19	the formation of mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives of dolichol diphosphate by pig liver microsomal fractions	The formation of mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives of dolichol diphosphate by microsomal fractions of pig liver.
19	chronic urticaria from isophane insulin therapy sensitivity associated with noninsulin components in commercial preparations	Chronic Uricaria; isophane insulin sensitivity; insulin therapy associated with non-insulin components in commercial preparations.
19	conduit reconstruction of right ventricular outflow tract experience with 17 patients	Rehabilitation of the right ventricular (RV) canal in 17 patients.
19	biotransformation of pregnenolone 7alpha 3h progesterone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by porcine fetal and maternal adrenal homogenate preparations	Biotransformation of pregnenolone 7alpha 3h progesterone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by porcine and maternal fetal adrenal homogenates.
19	temperature distribution produced in models by three microwave applicators at 433 92 megahertz	Temperature distribution produced in models by three micro @-@wave applicators at 433,92 megahertz.
19	some investigations on the adjuvant mechanism of deae dextran	Some research on the adjuvant mechanism of deae dextran.
19	inhibition spectra of the human pancreatic endopeptidases	D&apos spectrum; inhibition of human pancreatic endopeptidases.
19	simultaneous changes in pancreatic and gastric secretion induced by acute intravenous ethanol infusion effect of atropine and reserpine	Simultaneous changes in pancreatic and gastric secretion induced by apos; dapos effect; acute intravenous infusion of apos; ethanol dapos; atropine and reserpine.
19	lens cell growth in tissue culture	Lentil cell growth in tissue cultures.
19	tests on the bactericidal effectiveness of iodophor a in the halls of a pig fattening station	Tests on the bactericidal efficiency of pork-fattening; iodophor a in the halls of a hog-fatting station.
19	pharmacokinetic study of maleate acid of 2 n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and of n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 in animals	A pharmacokinetic study of 2-n n-dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and of n-dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 in animals.
19	the two domain structure of cytochrome b5 in deoxycholate solution	The two-domain structure of cytochrome b5 in deoxycholate solution.
19	activity values of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the serum of farm aminals	Isoenzyme activity of lactate dehydrogenase in the serum of farm aminals.
19	use of electron microscopy for the rapid diagnosis of poxvirus diseases smallpox in swine	The use of electron microscopy for the rapid diagnosis of poxvirus smallpox disease in swine.
19	evaluation of chromatin clumping and myelination of the spinal cord of pigs with congential tremor	Evaluation of the chromatin agglomeration and myelination of the spinal cord of pigs with congenital tremors.
19	the etiology of swine dysentery iii the role of selected gram negative obligate anaerobes	Etiology of porcine dysentery iii the role of some obligatory anaerobic negative gram @-@.
19	anthrax in england and wales 1963 1972	L' anthrax in England and Wales 1963.
19	investigation of suspected cases of mycotoxicosis in farm animals in britain	Investigation of suspected cases of mycotoxicosis in farm animals in Grande-Brittany.
19	activity of several serum enzymes in swine with acute plague	Activity of several serum enzymes in swine with acute plague.
19	phage typing of strains of s enteritidis isolated in bulgaria	Lysotyping of strains of s enteritidis isolated from Bulgarian.
19	partial purification and characterization of the antidiuretic hormone inactivating enzyme from renal plasma membranes	Partial purification and characterization of the enzyme d' inactivation of the antidiuretic hormone of renal plasma membranes.
19	coupled optical rate determinations of amino acid oxidase activity	Determination of coupled optical rates; amino acid oxidase activity.
19	a cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent histone kinase from pig brain purification and some properties of the enzyme	A cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-dependent histone kinase from purification of pig brain and certain properties of the enzyme.
19	organophosphate inhibitors the reactions of bis p nitrophenyl methyl phosphate with liver carboxylesterases and alpha chymotrypsin	Organophosphate inhibits the reactions of bis p-nitrophenyl methyl phosphate with hepatic carboxylesterases and l' alpha chymotrypsin.
19	isolation composition and functional properties of alpha lactalbumins from several species	Composition and functional properties of several species of alpha lactalbumins.
19	the porcine endothelial cell in tissue culture	The porcine endothelial cell in tissue culture.
19	distribution of fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by microsome cytosol preparations from adipose tissue	Distribution of fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by microsomal cytosolic preparations from adipose tissue.
19	pigs susceptible to energy metabolism in the fulminant hyperthermia stress syndrome	Pigs susceptible to energy metabolism in the fulminating hyperthermal stress syndrome.
19	microtubule formation from two components separated by gel filtration of a tubulin preparation	Microtubules formed from two components separated by gel filtration on a single tubulin preparation.
19	characterization and quantitation of the five major plasma protein fractions in seven day old piglets	Characterization and quantification of the five major plasma protein fractions in seven-day-old piglets.
19	diagnostic value of serum creatine phosphokinase activity for the porcine malignant hyperthermia syndrome	Diagnostic value of apo; serum creatine phosphokinase activity for swine malignant hyperthermia.
19	mechanics of the knee joint part ii the final rotation author s transl	Mechanical of the knee joint; joint of the knee joint part ii l' author of the final translation rotation.
19	protection against neonatal enteric colibacillosis in pigs suckling orally vaccinated sows	Epidemiology of colibacillosis in the United States, American Journal of Infectious Diseases, Vol.
19	enteric colibacillosis evaluation of strains of escherichia coli utilizing the ligated loop technique in gnotobiotic swine	Evaluation of enteric colibacillosis of strains of escherichia coli using the apos technique; ligated anse in gnotobiotic swine.
19	efficacy of two dichlorvos formulations against larval and adult hyostrongylus rubidus in swine	Effectiveness of two formulations of dichlorovos against larval and adult swine hyostrongylus rubidus.
19	effects of different concentrations of corn oil magnesium sulfate and oat hulls in a porcine ulcerogenic ration	The effects of different concentrations of magnesium sulphate in corn and potato hulls; oats in an ulcerable swine diet.
19	incidence of antibody for hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus in serums from swine in the united states	Impact of anti-lapo virus antibodies; hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis in swine sera in the United States.
19	joint changes in lameness of confined swine	In addition, there have been some joint changes in the limping of confined pigs.
19	swine dysentery pathogenicity of treponema hyodysenteriae	Treponema hyodysenteriae is a pig dysentery pathogen.
19	imprinting of domestic animals on man	L' footprint of domestic animals on apos; footprint of domestic animals on apos; footprint of man.
19	neuraminidase neutralizing antibodies in pigs with chronic erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae infection author s transl	Neuraminidase neutralizing antibodies in pigs with apos; errysipelothrix rhusiopathiae chronic author of apos; infection s transl.
19	the intestinal phase of gastric secretion	Uh, the intestinal phase of gastric secretion.
19	effects of hypoxia on the distribution of calcium in arterial smooth muscle cells of rats and swine	Effects of hypoxia on the distribution of calcium in arterial smooth muscle cells in rats and pigs.
19	ultrastructural study of crystalloids in sertoli cells of the normal intersex and experimental cryptorchid swine	Ultrastructural study of crystalloids in Servoli cells of normal intersex and experimental cryptorchid pigs.
19	nitrofurantoin test for the differentiation of bordetella bronchiseptica author s transl	Nitrofurantoin test for the differentiation of bordetella bronchiseptica translator s.
19	studies of the toxic components of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 communication detailed characterization of an extracted endotoxin author s transl	Studies of the toxic components of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 communication, detailed characterization of apoE, an apoE endotoxin extracted.
19	purification and characterisation of two porcine hypothalamic fractions with lh releasing activity evidence for a single lh and fsh releasing hormone	Purification and characterization of two porcine hypothalamic fractions with hemp release activity demonstrated the existence of a single hemp-releasing hormone.
19	induced synthesis of metallothionein by pig kidney cells in vitro in response to cadmium	Induced synthesis of metallothionein by pig kidney cells in vitro in response to cadmium.
19	sleep stage regulation of ventricular arrhythmias in the unanesthetized pig	Sleep regulation of ventricular arrhythmias in unanesthetized pigs.
19	functional evaluation of the porcine heterograft in the mitral position	Functional evaluation of apos; pig heterograft in the mitral position.
19	radioassay of serum folate with use of pig plasma folate binders	Radio-testing of serum folate with porcine plasma folate binders.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan suplhate characterization of d glucuronic acid containing oligosaccharides isolated after controlled degradation of oxydermatan sulphate	The copolymeric structure of pig dermatan under @-@plhate characterization of glucuronic acid containing oligosaccharides isolated after controlled degradation of sulfate d' oxidatane.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan sulphate isolation and characterization of l idurono sulphate containing oligosaccharides from copolymeric chains	Copolymer structure of l' isolation of pig skin dermatan sulfate and characterization of lidurono sulfate containing oligosaccharides from copolymer chains.
19	application of polyvinylpyrrolidone as a carrier for kallikrein	Application of polyvinylpyrrolidone as a carrier of kallikrein.
19	the effect of growth hormone on established cartilage lesions a presidential address to the association of bone and joint surgeons 1974	The effect of growth hormone on established cartilage lesions, a presidential speech at the Apos Association of bone and joint surgeons.
19	small angle x ray scattering of pig thyroglobulin in solution	Small angle x X-ray scattering of pig thyroglobulin in solution.
19	studies on the metabolism of 5alpha androst 16 en 3 one in boar tests in vivo	Studies of the metabolism of 5alpha androst 16 in 3 in in vivo boar tests.
19	severe hemolysis with a fabric worn cloth covered aortic valve prosthesis	The aortic valve prosthesis was covered by severe hemolysis with worn tissue.
19	purification properties and kinetics of sheep and human renin substrates	Purifying and kinetic properties of sheep renin and human renin substrates.
19	amino terminal residue heterogeneity of bovine and ovine growth hormones as revealed by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis revealed apos; terminal amino residue heterogeneity of bovine and ovine growth hormones.
19	an inhibitory influence of granulosa cells and follicular fluid upon porcine oocyte meiosis in vitro	The inhibitory influence of granulosa cells and follicular fluid on porcine oocyte meiosis in vitro.
19	development of a radioimmunoassay for porcine relaxin using 125i labeled polytyrosyl relaxin	Development of a radioimmunoassay of porcine relaxin at apos; 125i-labelled polytyrosyl relaxin.
19	the importance of the stomach in gastrin induced hypocalcemia in the rat	L'apos; importance of the stomach in the gastrin induced hypocalcemia in the rat.
19	cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate levels in separated bone cells	Apos cyclic rate; adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in separated bone cells.
19	ultrastructure of the early ovary and testis in pig embryos	Ultrastructure of the early ovary and testis in pig embryos.
19	relationship between enhanced turnover of phosphatidylinositol and lymphocyte activation by mitogens	Ratio between l' increase in turnover of phosphatidylinositol and l' activation of lymphocytes by mitogens.
19	ion pair formation as a source of enhanced reactivity of the essential thiol group of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Formation of d&apos pairs; ions as a source of increased reactivity of the essential thiol group of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	fetal ingestion and metabolism of amniotic fluid protein	Fetal ingestion and metabolism of amniotic fluid protein.
19	role of pyloric reflux in experimental stress ulceration during haemorrhagic shock	The role of pyloric reflux in experimental stress ulceration during hemorrhagic shock.
19	flat gel polyacrylamide electrophoresis of porcine mycoplasmas	Flat-gel polyacrylamide electrophoresis of porcine mycoplasmas.
19	total calcium content of skeletal muscle isolated from humans and pigs susceptible to malignant hyperthermia	The total calcium content of skeletal muscle isolated from human and swine susceptible to apos; malignant hyperthermia.
19	procaine in porcine malignant hyperthermia	Procaine in porcine malignant hyperthermia hyperthermia.
19	cellular characteristics of skeletal muscle in selected strains of pigs and mice and the unselected controls	Cellular characteristics of skeletal muscle in selected strains of swine and mice and unselected controls.
19	complete identification of endocrine cells in the gastrointestinal tract using semithin thin sections to identify motilin cells in human and animal intestine	Complete identification of endocrine cells in the gastrointestinal tract-intestinal tracts; help with semithin thin sections to identify motilin cells in the human and animal intestines.
19	swine lipoproteins and atherosclerosis changes in the plasma lipoproteins and apoproteins induced by cholesterol feeding	Pig lipoproteins and apos; atherosclerosis modify lipoproteins and apoproteins induced by apos; cholesterol ingestion.
19	gelbsilber rabbits a closed colony of high responders to the lactic dehydrogenase isoenzyme ldh h4 possible mechanisms controlling the response	Gelbsilber rabbits form a closed colony of highly lactose reactive individuals; lactic dehydrogenase isoenzyme ldh h4 as a possible response control mechanism.
19	use of the immune tolerance induction in the production of an antilymphocyte serum als free of antibodies against serum proteins	Apos use; induction of immune tolerance in the production of apos; anti-cellular serum without apos; antibodies against serum proteins.
19	fragments of bovine serum albumin produced by limited proteolysis isolation and characterization of tryptic fragments	D&apos fragments; bovine serum albumin produced by limited proteolysis isolation and tryptic fragment characterization.
19	survival of certain pathogenic organisms in swine lagoon effluent	Survival of selected pathogenic organisms in swine lagoon effluent.
19	on the relationship between tetracycline and the incremental lines in dentine	On the relationship between tetracycline and the increments in the dentine.
19	the ultrastructure of the sensory end organs baroreceptors in the atrial endocardium of young mini pigs	L' ultrastructure of the terminal sensory organs baroreceptors in the atrial endocardium of young mini-pigs.
19	elevated serum growth hormone in protein deprived rats and decreased liver rna after hypophysectomy	Increased serum growth hormone in protein-deprived rats and decreased liver function after apos; hypophysectomy.
19	physical parameters and chemical composition of porcine pancreatic elastase ii	Physical parameters and chemical composition of porcine pancreatic elastase ii.
19	application of immunofluorescence and immunoenzyme methods in the serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infection	Application of immunofluorescence and immunoblotting methods; immunoenzyme in diagnosis of apos; trichinella spiralis infection.
19	neutral glycosphingolipids containing mannose from the bivalve corbicula sandai	Neutral glycosphingolipids containing mannose from the bivalve corbicula sandai.
19	biological characterization of fusobacterium necrophorum cell fractions in preparation for toxin and immunization studies	Biological characterization of fusobacterium necrophorum cell fractions in preparation for toxin and immunization studies.
19	a rapid modified gas chromatographic assay for esterase activity	A rapid modified gas chromatographic assay for esterase activity.
19	microfluorometric evaluation of conjugate specificity with the defined antigen substrate spheres dass system	Microfluorometric evaluation of conjugate specificity with the defined antigen dass spherical substrate system of the system.
19	ultrastructure of the synaptic junctional lattice isolated from mammalian brain	Ultrastructure of the synaptic junctional network isolated from mammalian brain.
19	intracellular distribution of beta galactosidases in mucosal cells from hog small intestine	Intracellular distribution of beta galactosidases in mucosal cells of swine small intestine.
19	subcellular fractionation partial purification and characterization of neutral triacylglycerol lipase from pig liver	By subcellular fractionation, partial purification, and characterization of neutral triacylglycerol lipase from pig liver.
19	effects of various dietary levels of dried whey on the performance of growing pigs	The effects of various dietary levels of dried whey on the performance of growing swine.
19	effects of diets containing dried whey on the lactase activity of the small intestinal mucosa and the contents of the small intestine and cecum of the pig	The effects of diets containing dried whey on appetite; lactase activity of the mucosa of the intestines; small intestine and the contents of the intestine; swine small intestine and caecum.
19	differential responses of duroc hampshire and crossbred pigs to a superimposed experimental infection with the intestinal threadworm strongyloides ransomi	Differential responses of duroc hampshire and crossed pigs to a Strongyloides ransomi filamentous worm superimposed infection.
19	in vitro biology of corneal epithelium and endothelium	In vitro biology of the apos; corneal epithelium and apos; endothelium.
19	feed refusal factors in pure cultures of fusarium roseum graminearum	Food-refusal factors in pure cultures of fusarium roseum graminearum.
19	helminth parasitisms among intermingling insular populations of white tailed deer feral cattle and feral swine	Helminth parasitism among island populations interspersed with wild-tailed cattle and feral swine.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals purification of pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by nad agarose affinity chromatography	Metabolism of fucosis in mammalian pig liver purification 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by nad agarose affinity chromatography.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals kinetic studies on pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase	Metabolism of fucosis in mammals Kinetic studies in pig liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase.
19	guinea pig proinsulin primary structure of the c peptide isolated from pancreas	Guinea pig proinsulin primary structure of isolated pancreatic peptide c.
19	proinsulin a proposed three dimensional structure	Proinsulin is a proposed three-dimensional structure.
19	evidence for a factor in pig adipose tissue controlling the specificity of the acyltransferase s of triacylglycerol synthesis	A factor in porcine adipose tissue controlling the specificity of the apos; acyltransferase of triacylglycerol synthesis was demonstrated.
19	binding of 14 c salicylic acid and 14 c pentobarbital to plasma proteins of several species during the perinatal period	Binding of 14 c salicylic acid and 14 c pentobarbital to plasma proteins of several species during the perinatal period.
19	comparative study of immunity in swine vaccinated with foot and mouth disease vaccines prepared with various adjuvants	Comparative dosage study; immunity in swine vaccinated with foot-and-mouth disease vaccines prepared with various adjuvants.
19	influence of tissue emulsions on the phagocytic activity of the res	Influence of tissue emulsions on the phagocytic activity of the res.
19	effect of intramuscular and oral use of antianemic iron preparations in suckling pigs	Effect of apos; intramuscular and oral use of iron anemia preparations in suckling pigs.
19	porperties of a strain of herpesvirus suis isolated in cases with various epizootologic and clinical courses of the disease	The porosity of a strain of herpesviruses is isolated in cases with various epizootological and clinical progression of the disease.
19	use of the direct immunofluorescence method for determination of the tge viral antigen in swine	Use of direct immunofluorescent method for determination of viral antigen in pigs.
19	antibody formation in swine vaccinated with a lapinized k vaccine and serum against hog cholera	Antibody formation in pigs vaccinated with a rabbitized K vaccine and serum against swine cholera.
19	level of estrogens in the blood of swine during pregnancy	Level of estrogen in the blood of pigs during pregnancy.
19	immunoglobulin containing cells in pig mammary gland	L' immunoglobulin contains pig mammary gland cells.
19	a screening method for determining nitrofuran drug residues in animal tissues	Method for the detection of nitrofuran residues in animal tissues.
19	the carboxylic acid groups of bovine luteinizing hormone the effects of their modification on receptor site binding and subunit subunit interaction	The effects of their modification on receptor site binding and l' interaction at-unit level at-unit level.
19	proton magnetic resonance spectra or porcine muscle adenylate kinase and substrate complexes	Proton magnetic resonance spectra or porcine muscle substrate and d' adenylate kinase complexes.
19	sequence position of 3 hydroxyproline in basement membrane collagen isolation of glycyl 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline from swine kidney	Sequence position of 3 hydroxyproline in basement membrane collagen d' isolation of glycyl 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline from pig kidney.
19	formation and excretion of pyrrole 2 carboxylic acid whole animal and enzyme studies in the rat	Formation and excretion of apos; pyrrole acid-2 carboxylic acid in the whole animal and enzyme studies in the rat.
19	enzymatic arginylation of beta melanocyte stimulating hormone and of angiotensin ii	Enzyme arginylation of apos; beta and apo melanocyte stimulating hormone; angiotensin ii.
19	affinity labeling of d amino acid oxidase with an acetylenic substrate	Marking of apos; affinity of d amino acid oxidase with acetylene substrate.
19	use of 5 deazafad to study hydrogen transfer in the d amino acid oxidase reaction	Use of 5 deazafad to study hydrogen transfer in the oxidase reaction of amino acids d.
19	properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent aldehyde reductase from pig kidney amino acid composition reactivity of cysteinyl residues and stereochemistry of d glyceraldehyde reduction	Properties of the reactivity-dependent aldehyde reductase nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate cysteinyl residues of amino acid composition of pig kidney and stereochemistry of d glyceraldehyde reduction.
19	vasopressin sensitive kidney adenylate cyclase structural requirements for attachment to the receptor and enzyme activation studies with vasopressin analogues	Vasopressin-sensitive renal adenylate cyclase, structural requirements for the apos; receptor attachment and d&apos studies; enzyme activation with vasopressin analogs.
19	hodgkin s disease an epidemiological study on 140 children urban rural relation profession of parents domestic animal contact	Hodgkin's disease: an epidemiological study of 140 children living in rural areas whose parents had contact with domestic animals.
19	identification and differentiation of lens cells in tissue culture	Identification and differentiation of lens cells in tissue culture.
19	study of the tryptophan hydroxyproline coefficient of the meat of animals of different species	A study of the ratio of d' hydroxyproline of tryptophan in meat; animals of different species.
19	the purification and some properties of electron transfer flavoprotein and general fatty acyl coenzyme a dehydrogenase from pig liver mitochondria	Purification and certain properties of flavoprotein transfer d' electrons and l' general fatty acyl coenzyme a dehydrogenase from pig liver mitochondria.
19	rates of passage of digesta and water absorption along the larg intestines of sheep cows and pigs	Rates of passage of digesta and dapos; absorption of water along the large intestines of sheep, cows and pigs.
19	sequence variability and structure of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Sequence variation and structure of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	comparative characteristics of some products of decomposition of lactic protein and fat in cheeses produced with addition of boar pepsin	Comparative characteristics of certain lactic protein and fat decomposition products in cheese obtained from the addition of wild boar pepsin.
19	candida ingens as a potential fodder protein	Candida ing. is a potential protein in fodder.
19	chicken glucagon isolation and amino acid sequence studies	Chicken glucagon isolation and amino acid sequence studies.
19	orthotopic liver transplantation utilizing a vascular stapling instrument	Apo orthotopic liver transplants; help with vascular staples.
19	renal transplantation in the unimmunosuppressed pig an abnormal response	Renal transplants in the unimmunosuppressed swine; an abnormal response.
19	increase in numbers of gonadotropin receptors on granulosa cells during follicle maturation	Increased number of gonadotropin receptors on granulosa cells during follicle maturation.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda ii inhibition of uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase	The role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea was delayed; uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase was inhibited.
19	the microbial flora in the digestive tract of the monogastric and its effect on the nutritional metabolism of the host	The microbial flora in the gut of the monogastric and its effect on the nutritional metabolism of the host.
19	the sequences of the coenzyme binding peptide in the cytoplasmic and the mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferases from sheep liver	The sequences of the coenzyme-binding peptide in cytoplasmic and mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferases from sheep liver.
19	purification of porcine enterokinase by affinity chromatography	Purification of apos; porcine enterokinase by affinity chromatography.
19	pig liver pyruvate carboxylase purification properties and cation specificity	Pig liver pyruvate carboxylase purification properties and specificity for cations.
19	scanning electron microscopy and electron probe microanalysis of calcified alpha elastin coacervates	Microanalysis by scanning electron microscopy and electron probe of calcified coacervates; alpha-elastin.
19	effect of modifiers on the hydrolysis of basic and neutral peptides by carboxypeptidase b1	The effect of modifiers on the hydrolysis of basic and neutral peptides by carboxypeptidase b1.
19	progesterone synthesis of pig corpus luteum tissue during superfusion	Progesterone synthesis of pig corpus luteum tissue during superfusion.
19	the demonstration of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunoelectrophoresis and counterimmunoelectrophoresis	The demonstration of viral antigens from the gastro-enteritis transmitted by immunoelectrophoresis and against-immunoelectrophoresis.
19	kinetic study of the percutaneous absorption of 1 2 4 3h labelled flupamesone	Kinetic study of the apos; percutaneous absorption of 12.43 h of labelled flupamesone.
19	trends in salmonella food poisoning in england and wales 1941 72	Trends in food poisoning in England and Wales.
19	cleavage of the third complement component c3 and generation of the spasmogenic peptide c3a in human serum via the properdin pathway demonstration of inhibitory as well as enhancing effects of epsilon amino caproic acid	Cleavage of the third complement component c3 and production of the spasmogenic peptide c3a in human serum via the properdin pathway intermediate demonstrates the apos; inhibitory effect as well as the apos; stimulatory effect of the apos; caproic acid epsilon.
19	induction of histamine release and desensitization in human leukocytes effect of anaphylatoxin	Induction of histamine release and desensitization in apos; effect of apos; anaphylatoxin on human leukocytes.
19	light microscopical electron microscopical and clinical findings in orthotopic allogenic porcine liver homografts author s transl	Light microscopic electronics and clinical results in hepatic homografts of orthotopic allogenic pigs s translators.
19	trans chest ventricular defibrillation of heavy subjects using trapezoidal current waveforms	Trans thoracic ventricular defibrillation of heavy subjects at baseline; trapezoidal current waves.
19	studies on brain cytosol neuraminadase i isolation and partial characterization of two forms of the enzyme from pig brain	Apos studies; cytosol neuraminadase i isolation from brain and partial characterization of two forms of apos; enzyme from pig brain.
19	concanavalin a nsc 143504 its action on experimental tumor cells and possible use in cancer chemotherapy	Conanavalin nsc 143504 its action on experimental tumor cells and possible use in cancer chemotherapy.
19	the nadph dependent cytochrome p 450 reduction in liver microsomes of rats of different ages with and without phenobarbital pretreatment	Nadphically dependent reduction of cytochrome p 450 in hepatic microsomes from different ages with and without phenobarbital pretreatment.
19	histamine stimulated hydrogen ion secretion by in vitro piglet gastric mucosa	L' histamine stimulated hydrogen ion secretion from the piglet gastric mucosa in vitro.
19	growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in gastrointestinal and pancreatic d cells	Growing hormone inhibits release of the growth hormone in gastrointestinal and pancreatic cells.
19	inhibition by quinaldate of dehydrogenases	Inhibition of dehydrogenases by quinaldate.
19	evaluation of various protein sequences on the nutritional carry over from gestation to lactation with first litter sows	Evaluation of various protein sequences on the nutritional transfer from pregnancy to lactation with the first litter sows.
19	studies on the metabolism of beta hydroxy aspartic acid	Studies on the metabolism of l' ß-acid-hydroxyaspartic acid.
19	histochemical identification of glycoproteins in pig bronchial epithelium a normal and b hypertrophied from enzootic pneumonia	Histochemical identification of glycoproteins in normal and hypertrophied porcine bronchial epithelium following enzootic pneumonia.
19	porcine streptococci causing meningitis and septicaemia in man	Swine streptococci cause meningitis and sepsis in men.
19	changes with age in the occurrence of c19 steroids in the testis and submaxillary gland of the boar	The presence of c19 steroids in the testis and gland under the wild boar changes with age.
19	improvements in the technical conditions for the evaluation of an elastolytic activity the role of tryspin as an activator author s transl	Improvement of the technical conditions for the translation; evaluation of the elastolytic activity the role of tryspin as a translator activator.
19	estimation of seric and parietal inhibiting power of elastase its changes with experimental conditions	Estimation of the serum and parietal inhibitory power of elastase, its changes under experimental conditions.
19	relative competition of corticosterone cortisol cortisone 11 dexycortisol and prednisolone with 1 2 3h cortisol in various protein binding radioassay systems	Comparison of cortisone cortisol cortisone 11 dexycortisol and prednisolone with cortisol 1 2 h in various assays of radioactive protein binding.
19	the split ejaculate of the boar contributions of the epididymides and seminal vesicles	L' ejaculate divided from the bloody contributions of the epididymides and seminal vesicles.
19	the isolation and characterization of lactoferrin from sow milk and boar seminal plasma	Isolation and characterization of lactoferrin from sow's milk and boar seminal plasma.
19	on the interactions between pancreatic lipase and colipase and the substrate and the importance of bile salts	On the interactions between pancreatic lipase and colipase and the substrate and l' importance of bile salts.
19	clearance from the circulation of the rat and whole body autoradiography in the mouse of 125i labelled neurophysins	The clearance of the rat circulation and of the whole body autoradiography in the mouse of neurophysins labelled at 125i.
19	isoelectric focusing of boar spermatozoa	Isoelectric focusing of boar sperm.
19	physiological temperature response and embryonic mortality in stressed swine	Dietary allowance for infant mortality in Canada.
19	embryonic and placental development during prolonged inanition in the pig	The embryonic and placental development during prolonged starvation in pigs.
19	cross linking of hemoglobin haptoglobin and hemoglobin haptoglobin complex with bifunctional imidoesters	Hemoglobin, haptoglobin and haptoglobin complex cross-linking with bifunctional imidesters.
19	utilization of amino acids administered enterally or parenterally to young pigs	Use of enteral or parenteral amino acids administered to young pigs.
19	multiple vascular and gastric cannulation of swine for studies of gastrointestinal liver and peripheral tissue metabolism	Multiple vascular and gastric cannulation of swine for studies of gastro-liver metabolism-intestinal and peripheral tissues.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin i purification and placement of cyanogen bromide fragments and the amino acid sequence of fragment cb5	Primary structure of porcine pepsin purification and placement of cyanogen bromide fragments and the amino acid sequence of the cb5 fragment.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin ii amino acid sequence of two cyanogen bromide fragments cb3 and cb4	Primary structure of porcine pepsin II amino acid sequence of two cyanogen bromide cb3 and cb4 fragments.
19	effect of electronic cooking on fatty acids in meats	The effect of electronic cooking on fatty acids in meats.
19	action of growth hormone in vitro on the net uptake and incorporation in protein of amino acids in muscle from intact rabbits given protein deficient diets	The action of lipids; in vitro growth hormone on uptake and lipids; net incorporation of amino acids into muscle proteins of intact rabbits fed protein-deficient diets.
19	intestinal amino acid absorption in vitamin d dependent rickets	L' intestinal absorption d' amino acids in vitamin d dependent rickets.
19	boar acrosin ii amino acid composition amino terminal residue and molecular weight estimations by ultracentrifugation	Boar acrosin ii, amino acid composition, amino terminal residue and molecular weight estimation by ultracentrifugation.
19	porcine thyrotropin the amino acid sequence of the alpha and beta subunits	Swine Thyrotropin, amino acid sequence of alpha and beta units.
19	porcine proparathyroid hormone identification biosynthesis and partial amino acid sequence	Biosynthesis; porcine proparathyroid hormone identification and partial amino acid sequence.
19	amino acid transport by the helicoidal colon of the new born pig	Amino acid transport by the helical colon of the new-pig born.
19	secretion of endogenous amino acids in the gastrointestinal tract and amino acid resorption in the swine	The secretion of endogenous amino acids in the gastrointestinal tract and the resorption of amino acids in pigs.
19	the mechanism of action of d amino acid oxidase i evidence for a free radical mechanism of the reaction catalyzed b a dimeric form of the enzyme	The mechanism of action of amino acid oxidase i suggests the existence of a free radical mechanism in the reaction that catalyzes a dimer form of the enzyme.
19	studies on the additive character of amino acid absorption data obtained from pigs 2 studies using regression technic	Studies on the additive nature of the data; absorption of amino acids obtained from pigs 2 to 2; assistance in the development of regression techniques.
19	enhancement of antibody response to soluble hsa antigen of young rabbits pretreated with deoxyribonucleic acids from adult donors	Stimulation of immune response to soluble hsa antigen in young rabbits pretreated with deoxyribonucleic acids from adult donors.
19	phosphoric acid ester preparations used in cattle swine and sheep with special reference to cholinesterase activity 3 use of phosphoric acid ester preparations and their effect on acetylcholinesterase activity in swine	Preparations; esters; phosphoric acids used in swine and sheep, especially for apo; cholinesterase activity 3; use of apo preparations; phosphoric acids and their effect on apo; acetylcholinesterase activity in swine.
19	active site chlorination of d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Chlorination of the active site of acid oxidase by leucine n-chloro.
19	human pituitary lutropin isolation properties and the complete amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	The properties of human pituitary lutropin isolation and the complete amino acid sequence of beta-unit.
19	limiting amino acids of chickpeas cicer arietinum for chickens and pigs	Limiting the amino acids of chickpeas cicer arietinum for chickens and swine.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet 2 influence of fasting on plasma free amino acid concentration and in vivo oxidation of methionine isoleucine and threonine	Amino acid metabolism in piglet 2 affects plasma concentration of free amino acids and l' in vivo oxidation of methionine isoleucine and threonine.
19	vinylglycine and proparglyglycine complementary suicide substrates for l amino acid oxidase and d amino acid oxidase	Vinsylglycine and proparglycine are complementary suicide substrates for amino acid and acid oxidase and acid oxidase d.
19	influence of coronary effective substances on the concentration of nonesterified fatty acids in the serum of patients with angina pectoris	Effect of coronary substances on the concentration of nonesterified fat acids in the serum of patients with angina pectoris.
19	characterization of tryptic peptides from porcine haptoglobin light chain and an amino acid sequence	Characterization of tryptic light chain peptides of porcine and dapos haptoglobin; an amino acid sequence.
19	correlation of degradative rates of proteins with a parameter calculated from amino acid composition and subunit size	Correlation of rates of protein degradation with a parameter calculated from amino acid composition and sub@-@unit size.
19	the effect of halofenate or halofenate free acid on human rat and guinea pig platelet aggregation	Apos; effect of apos; free acid; halofenate or apos; halofenate on apos; human rat and guinea pig platelet aggregation.
19	studies on the true amino acid digestibility in pigs of various wheat varieties from the soviet union	Studies of true amino acid digestibility in swine of various wheat varieties from the Soviet Union.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 2 report utilization of the feed proteins in the use of soy bean extraction residue waste liquor yeast horse bean meal fish meal and maize gluten for a basic ration	L' use of protein from mixed diets in lactating pigs with respect to the essential amino acid content of dietary proteins 2 refers to l' use of food protein in l' use of residues of d' extraction of soybean liqueur from yeast bean flour and corn gluten for a basic ration.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 3 report correlation between the protein metabolism data and the amino acid content of the dietary protein	The utilization of mixed dietary dietary protein in lactating piglets relative to the essential amino acid content of dietary proteins 3 indicates a correlation between protein metabolism data and the amino acid content of the dietary protein.
19	conclusions about aminopeptidase in tissue sections from studies of amino acid naphthylamide hydrolysis	Studies on apos; naphthylamide hydrolysis of amino acids have led to conclusions about aminopeptidase in tissue sections.
19	effect of alcohols on the structure and function of d amino acid oxidase	Effect of alcohols on the structure and function of l' amino acid oxidase d.
19	determination of the true digestibility of amino acids in pigs	Determination of the true digestibility of amino acids in pigs.
19	constant level of intestinal amino acids as a function of the composition of same	A constant level of intestinal amino acids as a function of the composition of those same acids.
19	distribution of radioactivity in the body and rate of incorporation of radioactivity into the tissue proteins of monogastric animals following intravenous injection of tracer amino acids	Distribution of radioactivity in the organism and levels; incorporation of radioactivity into tissue proteins of monogastric animals following intravenous injection of tracer amino acids.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet influence of level of protein and of methionine in the diet on tissue uptake and in vivo oxidation	Amino acid metabolism in the piglet influences the level of protein and methionine in the diet on tissue absorption and l' in vivo oxidation.
19	oxidation of sarcosine and n alkyl derivatives of glycine by d amino acid oxidase	Oxidation of sarcosine and nalkyl derivatives of glycine by amino acid oxidase d.
19	amino acid sequence of penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii and staphylococcus aureus protease fragments and homology with pig pepsin and chymosin	Amino acid sequence of penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii and staphylococcus aureus protease fragments and homology with porcine pepsin and chymosin.
19	the composition of lipids in intestinal digesta of young pigs receiving diets containing tallow and tallow fatty acids	Fat composition in intestinal digestions of young pigs fed diets containing tallow and tallow fatty acids.
19	the amino terminal sequence of the vhiii subgroup of pooled porcine igg	The sequence of the amino end of the sub-group vhiii d&apos.
19	influence of amino acids on gastric emptying in young pigs	L' influence of amino acids on gastric emptying in young pigs.
19	ribonucleic acid stimulation of mammalian liver nuclear envelope nucleoside triphosphatase a possible enzymic marker for the nuclear envelope	Apos stimulation; nucleoside triphosphatase ribonucleic acid from the apos; mammalian liver nuclear envelope, a possible enzymatic marker for the apos; nuclear envelope.
19	free fatty acids and arrhythmias following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Free fatty acids and arrhythmias following acute occlusion of the porcine coronary artery.
19	some methodical problems in the determination of the true amino acid digestibility in swine	Some methodological problems in the determination of amino acid digestibility in pigs.
19	influence of dietary trans fatty acids on swine lipoprotein composition and structure	The influence of dietary trans fatty acids on pig lipoprotein composition and structure.
19	relationships between the apparent digestibility of crude protein and the amino acid balance of the swine digestive tract	Relationship between apparent digestibility of crude protein and lipid; amino acid balance of swine gut.
19	gas chromatographic separation of cholesteryl esters of fatty acids of different degrees of unsaturation	Gas chromatographic separation of cholesteryl esters d'apos; fatty acids of different degrees of unsaturation.
19	effect of hydrophobic probes on the higher structure of d amino acid oxidase	Effect of hydrophobic probes on the upper structure of amino acid oxidase d.
19	effect of halide anions on the binding of fad to d amino acid oxidase and the tryptophanyl fluorescence of the apoenzyme	Effect of halide anions on the binding of fad to apos; amino acid oxidase and on the tryptophanyl fluorescence of apos; apoenzyme.
19	interaction of steroids with d amino acid oxidase	Interaction of steroids with amino acid oxidase d.
19	potentiation of fmd vaccines with polycationic nucleic acid complexes	The potentiation of fmd vaccines by d*apos complexes; polycationic nucleic acids.
19	the effect of solids from pig manure as food components in rations for fat bulls heifers and calves on the crude nutrient and amino acid content of the longissimus dorsi muscle	The effect of pig manure solids as dietary components in the diets of both heifers and calves on the crude nutrient and amino acid content of the muscle longissimus dorsi.
19	comparison of various immunological methods for distinguishing among mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases of known amino acid sequence	Comparison of various immunological methods for distinguishing mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases with known amino acid sequences.
19	xiii sausages and luncheon meats comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods	Meat and sausages xiii Full evaluation of fatty acids in foods.
19	n terminal amino acid sequences of acid proteases acid proteases from penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis and alignment with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases	N sequences d' terminal amino acids of acid proteases of Penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis and alignment with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases.
19	studies on nitrogen and amino acid absorption in the swine part 2 the course of 15 n labeling in the chyme urine and blood	Studies on the absorption of nitrogen, nitrogen and amino acids in porcine 2 during 15 n labeling in urine and chyme blood.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow the dietary lysine requirement during pregnancy	The amino acid requirements of the reproductive sows correspond to the dietary requirements for lysine during pregnancy.
19	concentrations of cortisol glucose and free fatty acids in the blood plasma of swine in relation to age and in sows close to farrowing	Glucose concentrations of cortisol and d*apos; free fatty acids in the blood plasma of pigs as a function of age; age and in sows near delivery.
19	structural study of circulating thymic factor a peptide isolated from pig serum ii amino acid sequence	Structural study of circulating thymic factor, a peptide isolated from pig serum ii amino acid sequence.
19	lipase hydrolysis of mammalian long chain 1 2 alkanediol diesters nonrandom distribution of fatty acids	L' lipase hydrolysis of mammalian long chain 1 alkanediol diesters; does not result in a random distribution of fatty acids.
19	absorption of amino acids in isolated pig caecum in situ effect of concentration of enzymatic casein hydrolysate on absorption of amino acids	Absorption of amino acids in isolated swine caecum has an in situ effect of casein concentration; enzymatic hydrolysate of casein on apos; amino acid absorption.
19	isolation of gamma amino butyric acid from pig hypothalami and demonstration of its prolactin release inhibiting pif activity in vivo and in vitro	L' l&apos isolation; gamma acid-amino-butyric acid; pork hypothalami and demonstration of its prolactin release inhibitors; in vivo and in vitro peaks.
19	binding of fatty acids and tryptophan to alpha fetoprotein from fetal pigs	Binding of fatty acids and tryptophan to l' alpha-fetal fetoprotein.
19	estimation of rate of protein synthesis by constant infusion of labelled amino acids in pigs	Estimation of the rate of protein synthesis by constant infusion of labelled amino acids in swine.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow 2 the dietary lysine requirement of the lactating sow	Amino acid requirements of the breeding sow 2: dietary requirements of the feeder sow for lysine.
19	partial amino acid sequences of two proteins in developing porcine enamel	Partial amino acid sequences of two proteins in the developing pig enamel.
19	heterogeneity of amino acid sequence in hippopotamus cytochrome c	Heterogeneity of amino acid sequence in hippopotamus cytochrome c.
19	porcine follitropin the amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	Pig follitropin, amino acid sequence of the under-beta unit.
19	the optimal amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 1 response of nitrogen metabolism to progressive supplementation	The optimal amino acid supplementation of barley for the response of nitrogen metabolism of growing pig 1 to the progressive amino acid supplementation.
19	the amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 2 optimal additions of lysine and threonine for growth	The amino acid supplementation of the barley for porcine growth 2 optimal additions of lysine and threonine for growth.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 6 measurements of the flow of amino acids	Digestion and apo studies; absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 6 Measures of apo flow; amino acids.
19	performance dependent lysine requirement of fattening pigs 3 effect of amino acid and energy intake on fat protein and lysine deposition of swine	Effect of amino acids and l' energy intake on fat protein and lysine deposition in fattening pigs.
19	nitrogen and amino acid absorption in swine 3 endogenous secretion and absorption of nitrogen	Absorption of nitrogen and amino acids in pigs 3 endogenous secretion and absorption of nitrogen.
19	nitrogen and amino acid resorption by swine 4 amino acid resorption	Porcine nitrogen and amino acid resorption Four amino acids resorption.
19	performance related lysine requirement of fattening pigs 4 effect of energy and amino acid intakes on composition of gain and derivation of lysine requirement	Effect of lysine intake; energy and amino acid input on the composition of gain and derivation of lysine requirements in fattening swine.
19	studies on trypsin inhibitors part ix synthesis and trypsin inhibitory activity of the duopentacontapeptide corresponding to the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor ii kazal	Trypsin inhibitors studies, part ix synthesis, and trypsin inhibitory activity of duopentacontapeptide corresponding to the sequence d' amino acids of l' porcine pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor ii kazal.
19	de novo fatty acid synthesis and fatty acid elongation catalyzed by subcellular fractions from hog and human aorta	De novo fatty acid synthesis and fatty acid elongation catalyzed by subcellular fractions of pork aorta and human aorta.
19	lysine requirement of fattening boars in respect to their performance 1 influence of the consumption of energy and amino acids on the fattening performance	The lysine requirements of the wild boars; fattening relative to their performance 1 influence the consumption of energy and amino acids on their performance; fattening.
19	protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 5 results of the application of 35s methionine	Application of methionine 35s resulted in protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs.
19	reactions of cysteamine and other amine metabolites with glyoxylate and oxygen catalyzed by mammalian d amino acid oxidase	Reactions of cysteamine and d' other amino metabolites with glyoxylate and l' oxygen catalyzed by mammalian amino acid oxidase.
19	performance dependence of the lysine requirement of fattening sows 1 effect of energy and amino acid consumption on fattening performance	The effect of consumption of food, energy and amino acids on the performance of food; fattening depends on the performance of the lysine requirement of sows.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 3 results of the fractionation of ileum chyme after feeding various rations	The protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs3 result from fractionation of the chyme of the intestines; ileum after the intestines; feeding various diets.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 4 digestibility of crude protein and amino acids and rate of passage through the duodenum and ileum and the total digestive tract of growing pigs	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 4 digestibility of crude proteins and amino acids and rate of passage through the duodenum and l' ileum and the total digestive tract of growing pigs.
19	chlorination of an active site tyrosyl residue in d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Chlorination of an active site tyrosyl residue in amino acid oxidase by n-chloro-leucine.
19	free fatty acids as inhibitors of the respiratory chain in testicular homogenates	Free fatty acids as inhibitors of the respiratory chain in testicular homogenates.
19	appearance of 15n labeled intestinal microbial amino acids in the venous blood of the pig colon	L' appearance of 15n-labelled intestinal microbial amino acids in the venous blood of the pig colon.
19	structural study of the heme crevice in cytochrome b5 based on individual assignments of the 1h nmr lines of the heme group and selected amino acid residues	L' structural study of the crevice of l' heme in cytochrome b5 is based on the apos; individual assignment of 1h nmr lines of the heme group and a selection of amino acid residues.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 8 measurements of the flow of total lipid acid detergent fibre and volatile fatty acids	Digestion and apo studies; absorption in the intestine of growing pigs 8 Measures of total detergent fiber flow of lipidic acids and volatile fatty acids.
19	the amino acid sequence of porcine intestinal calcium binding protein	The amino acid sequence of porcine intestinal calcium binding protein.
19	protein digestibility and absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 2 protein and amino acid balances at the end of the small intestine and of the whole digestive tract apparent and true protein and amino acid digestibility	Protein digestibility and absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 2 balances proteins and amino acids at the end of the intestine; small intestine and intestines; whole digestive tract, apparent and true digestibility of proteins and amino acids.
19	porcine pancreatic lipase sequence of the first 234 amino acids of the peptide chain	Swine pancreatic lipase sequence of the first 234 amino acids of the peptide chain.
19	purification and n terminal amino acid sequence determination of anionic and cationic canine trypsinogens	Purification and end amino acid sequence determination of anionic and cationic canine trypsinogens.
19	amino acid transport by small and large intestine of newborn pig	Amino acid transport by small and large intestine of newborn pig-born.
19	gamma glutamyl transpeptidase mediated transport of amino acid in lecithin vesicles	Gamma glutamyl transpeptidase transport of amino acids in lecithin vesicles is amino acid mediated.
19	detection of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in an isolate of lactobacillus acidophilus	Detection of l' deoxyribonucleic plasmidic acid in an isolate of lactobacillus acidophilus.
19	in vitro effects of fatty acids on the actions of serum on rat and pig cartilage	In vitro effects of fatty acids on the action of serum on pig and rat cartilage.
19	messenger ribonucleic acids from pig intestinal mucosa direct synthesis of calcium binding protein in a cell free translation system	Messenger ribonucleic acids from pig intestinal mucosa directly synthesize the calcium-binding protein in a cell-free translation system.
19	the primary structure of mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from pig heart peptides obtained by cleavage at basic residues	The primary structure of mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from pork cardiac peptides obtained by basic cleavage.
19	studies of the spectrum of nonesterified fatty acids in blood and muscle tissue of swine 1 effect of genotype muscular substance	Studies of the spectrum of nonesterified fatty acids in pig blood and muscle tissue 1 effect of the muscular substance genotype.
19	addition of amino acids and oligopeptides to the diet of piglets ii effects on apparent digestion of some alimentary principles	The addition of amino acids and d*apos to the diet of piglets has effects on the apparent digestion of certain dietary principles.
19	porcine liver dihydrofolate reductase purification properties and amino acid sequence	Swine liver dihydrofolate reductase purification properties and amino acid sequence.
20	the effect of temperature on the direct muscle twitch response and the action of drugs on the isolated denervated rat diaphragm	The effect of temperature on the direct muscle response in twitches and aposes; the action of drugs on the isolated denervated rat diaphragm.
20	the maintenance of a colony of anopheles gambiae with observations on the effects of changes in temperature	The maintenance of a colony of anopheles with observations on the effects of changes in temperature.
20	effects of temperature on the generator and action potentials of a sense organ	The effects of temperature on the generator and potentials; action of a sensory organ.
20	ethylene oxide gaseous sterilization i concentration and temperature effects	Initial sterilization; environmental oxides; gaseous ethylene i concentration and temperature effects i.
20	a temperature gradient bar and its applications to the study of temperature effects on the growth of reiter s treponeme	A temperature gradient bar and its applications to the apos; study of the effects of temperature on the growth of repeated treponem.
20	the effect of temperature on the uptake of radiosulfate by rat renal tissue from radiosulfate containing solutions in vitro	L' effect of temperature on lipid; absorption of radiosulfate by rat renal tissue from radiosulfate-containing solutions in vitro.
20	effects of temperature and anions on titration curves of frog muscle	Effects of temperature and anions on titration curves of frog muscle.
20	temperature change the basic variable in the early handling phenomenon	Temperature will change the basic variable of the early-handling phenomenon.
20	celsius versus centigrade the nomenclature of the temperature scale of science	Celsius versus centigrade the nomenclature of the temperature scale of science.
20	cardiovascular responses of the chicken to seasonal and induced temperature changes	Cardiovascular responses of chicken to seasonal and induced temperature changes.
20	retardation of division of three ciliates by intermittent and continuous ultraviolet radiations at different temperatures	The division of three ciliates is retarded by intermittent and continuous ultraviolet radiation at different temperatures.
20	temperature and lambda phage reproduction	Lambda phage temperature and reproduction.
20	temperature and the reproduction of lambda phage mutants	Temperature and reproduction of lambda phage mutants.
20	effect of temperature on the potential and current thresholds of axon membrane	Effect of temperature on the potential and actual thresholds of the axonal membrane.
20	temperature effects on day old drosophila pupae	Temperature effects on fruit fly pupae one day.
20	actinomycin d suppression of recovery in x irradiated mammalian cells	Actinomycin suppression of recovery in irradiated mammalian cells x.
20	influence of moderate temperature on growth and malic dehydrogenase activity of a marine psychrophile	Influence d' moderate temperature on growth and temperature; dehydrogenase activity of malic acid; marine psychrophilic.
20	effect of environmental temperatures on infection with mycobacterium marinum balnei of mice and a number of poikilothermic species	Effect of ambient temperatures on infection by Mycobacterium marinum balnei of mice and dolphins; a number of poikilothermic species.
20	temperature sensitive dextransucrase synthesis by a lactobacillus	Temperature sensitive dextransucrase synthesis by a lactobacillus.
20	temperature sensitive hydrogenase and hydrogenase synthesis in a psychrophilic bacterium	Heat-sensitive hydrogenase synthesis in a psychrophilic bacterium.
20	airborne microorganisms in broiler processing plants	Airborne micro-organisms in broiler processing plants.
20	production of penicillin acylase	Production of penicillin acylase.
20	survival of shigella in sewage ii effect of glycerol on shigella flexneri and shigella bacteriophage	Survival of shigella in wastewater ii effect of glycerol on shigella flexneri and shigella bacteriophage.
20	response of clostridium perfringens spores and vegetative cells to temperature variation	Clostridium perfringens spores and vegetative cells respond to temperature variations.
20	characteristics of infectious pancreatic necrosis virus	Characteristics of infectious pancreatic necrosis virus.
20	temperature dependence of anesthesia in goldfish	Temperature-dependent anesthesia in the goldfish.
20	multiplication and therapy of toxoplasma gondii in tissue culture	Propagation and treatment of toxoplasma gondii in tissue cultures.
20	metabolism of mevalonic acid by lactobacillus plantarum	L&apos metabolism; mevalonic acid by lactobacillus plantarum.
20	effect of salinity and temperature on coccidioides immitis and three antagonistic soil saprophytes	Effect of salinity and temperature on coccidioides immitis and three antagonistic soil saprophytes.
20	effect of the temperature of growth of escherichia coli on the formation of beta galactosidase	Effect of temperature of growth of apos; escherichia coli on the formation of beta galactosidase.
20	continuous in vitro cultivation of spherules of coccidioides immitis	Continuous culture of spherules of coccidioides immitis in vitro.
20	selective destruction by pseudomonas aeruginosa of common antigen of enterobacteriaceae	The selective destruction by pseudomonas aeruginosa of the common antigen of enterobacteria.
20	attachment and growth of bacteria on surfaces of continuous culture vessels	L' attachment and growth of bacteria on surfaces of continuous vascular culture.
20	temperature dependence of the activity of the antitumor factor in the common clam	L' activity of the anti-tumour factor of soft-shelled clams depends on the temperature.
20	the effect of temperature on the formation of t1 and t2r bacteriophage	L' effect of temperature on the formation of t1 and t2r bacteriophages.
20	optimal conditions for the transformation of streptococci	Optimal conditions for the transformation of Streptococcus.
20	on the mechanism of some temperature effects on drosophila	About the mechanism of some of the effects of temperature on Drosophila.
20	purification and activity of proteinase of streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens	The purification and the proteinase activity of the proteinase of streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens.
20	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium perfringens from soil	Isolate toxigenic strains of clostridium perfringens from soil.
20	growth characteristics of the blue green algal virus lpp 1	The growth characteristics of the virus are not known, but are known to occur naturally.
20	some effects of carbon source aeration and temperature on growth of a psychrophilic strain of pseudomonas fluorescens	Some effects of carbon source aeration and temperature on growth of a psychrophilic strain of pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	thermally induced genital appendages on mosquitoes	Insulted thermally induced genital appendages on mosquitoes.
20	an electron microscope examination of urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with influenza virus	Electron microscopic examination of urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with influenza virus.
20	interrelationship between temperature and sodium chloride on growth of lactic acid bacteria isolated from meat curing brines	Relationship between temperature and sodium chloride on growth of lactic acid bacteria isolated from healing meats brines.
20	characterization of enterococcus bacteriophages from the small intestine of the rat	Characterization of potato bacteriophages; potato enterococci; small intestine of rat.
20	repression of staphylococcus aureus by food bacteria i effect of environmental factors on inhibition	The control of staphylococcus aureus by food bacteria has an effect of environmental factors on the organism; inhibition.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating system from pseudomonas indigofera	A cell-free amino acid incorporating the pseudomonas indigofera system.
20	studies on the mechanisms of hypersensitivity phenomena ix histamine release from human leukocytes by ragweed pollen antigen	Studies on the mechanisms of hypersensitivity; release of hepatitis; histamine from human leukocytes by hepatitis; pollen antigen; lice herb.
20	drug resistance of enteric bacteria v high frequency of transduction of r factors with bacteriophage epsilon	Drug resistance of enteric bacteria v high frequency of r factor transduction with epsilon bacteriophage.
20	temperature optimum of mycobacterium leprae in mice	Optimum temperature of leprae mycobacteria in mice.
20	stimulation of the salt receptor of the blowfly ii temperature	Stimulation of the salt receptor of the fly ii temperature.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirement in rats i choline deficiency in rats at various temperatures	Choline temperature, environment, and choline requirements in choline-deficient rats in rats at various temperatures.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirements in rats ii choline and methionine requirements for lipotropic activity	Room temperature and choline requirements in the rat ii choline and methionine are required for lipotropic activity.
20	further study of factors affecting amino acid incorporation into protein by isolated mitochondria	Further study of factors affecting amino acid incorporation into protein by isolated mitochondria.
20	stress and the toxicity of venoms	Stress and toxicity of venom are stress and toxicity factors.
20	factors in lysis and lysis inhibition by lambda bacteriophage	Factors affecting lysis and lysis by lambda bacteriophage.
20	kinetics of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid infection of escherichia coli	Apos kinetics; apos infection; deoxyribonucleic acid of bacteriophage lambda d'apos; escherichia coli.
20	temperature and frog eggs a reconsideration of metabolic control	Temperature and frog eggs a metabolic control re-examination.
20	zone centrifugation in a cesium chloride density gradient caused by temperature change	Zone centrifugation in a cesium chloride density gradient caused by a temperature change.
20	arginine metabolism in halobacterium salinarium an obligately halophilic bacterium	Metabolism of the halophilic halophilic bacterium halobacterium salinarium arginine.
20	interactions of human cytomegalovirus with human fibroblasts	Interactions of human cytomegalovirus with human fibroblasts.
20	antiviral action of mouse interferon in heterologous cells	Antiviral action of mouse interferon in heterologous cells.
20	effect of temperature on the rate of germination in bacillus cereus	The effect of temperature on the germination rate of the bacillus cereus.
20	histochemical studies on the uptake of horseradish peroxidase by rat kidney slices	Histochemical studies on the uptake of horseradish peroxidase by slices of rat kidney.
20	biological rhythms a new type in strains of a mutant of neurospora crassa	Rhythms; a new type in the strains; a mutant of neurospora crassa.
20	hela cells effects of temperature on the life cycle	The effects of temperature on the life cycle of helical cells.
20	the oxygen equilibrium of mammalian hemoglobin some old and new physicochemical studies	L' cell balance; oxygen in the cell; mammalian hemoglobin, some old and new chemical physico studies.
20	sequential gene action in the establishment of lysogeny	Sequential gene action in the establishment of lysogenesis.
20	induction and properties of a temperature bacteriophage from bacillus stearothermophilus	Induction and properties of a thermal bacteriophage of stearothermophilus bacillus.
20	photodynamic inactivation of enteroviruses	The photodynamic inactivation of enteroviruses.
20	effect of cholesterol on the sensitivity of mycoplasma laidlawii to the polyene antibiotic filipin	The effect of cholesterol on the sensitivity of mycoplasma laidlawii to the polyene antibiotic filipin.
20	temperature coefficients of the electrical thresholds of taste sensations	Temperature coefficients of electrical thresholds of taste sensations.
20	agrobacterium tumefaciens thermal inactivation of tumor inducing ability	Agrobacterium tumefaciens thermal inactivation of tumour-inducing ability.
20	thermal migration in biological transport	Thermal migration in biological transport systems.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid base composition of some members of the micrococcaceae	Deoxyribonucleic acid base composition of some members of micrococcaceae.
20	alterations in host specificity of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid after an increase in growth temperature of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Changes in host specificity of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid following an increase in growth temperature of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
20	polysaccharide depolymerase associated with bacteriophage infection	Polysaccharide depolymerase associated with bacteriophage infection.
20	storage stability of clostridium botulinum toxin and spores in processed cheese	Stability of pH; storage of Clostridium botulinum toxin and spores in processed cheese.
20	injury and growth of serratia marcescens studied in a thermal gradient incubator	Lesions and growth of serratia marcescens were studied in a thermal gradient incubator.
20	basis for the exclusion of escherichia coli from the rumen ecosystem	Rationale for apo; exclusion of apo; escherichia coli from apo; rumen ecosystem.
20	spectral studies of a chlorophyll pigment with fluorescence maximum at 698 mu	Spectral studies d' a chlorophyll pigment with 698 mu maximum fluorescence.
20	fluorescence quantum yield measurements vitamin b6 compounds	The fluorescence quantum yield measures the compounds of vitamin b6.
20	sterols and temperature tolerance in the fungus pythium	Sterols and temperature tolerance in the fungus pythium.
20	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 3 effect of water temperature on the ability of miracidia to infect snails	Effect of temperature on the ability of snails; Infection of snails by snails; effect of temperature of snails; effect of water on the parasitic relationship-host of bulinus truncatus and apos; hematobium of schistosoma in Iran.
20	temperature independence of an arbitrary temporal discrimination in the goldfish	Temperature independence d' arbitrary temporal discrimination in the goldfish.
20	an inducible system for the hydrolysis and transport of beta glucosides in yeast i characteristics of the beta glucosidase activity of intact and of lysed cells	Inducible system for the hydrolysis and transport of beta-glucosides in yeast, characteristic of the yeast; beta activity-glucosidase of intact and lysed cells.
20	structure of the red fluorescence band in chloroplasts	The structure of the red fluorescence band in chloroplasts.
20	clostridium perfringens in meat and meat products	Clostridium perfringens in meat and meat products.
20	influence of temperature on bacterial infection of the hen s egg	Temperature dependence of apo; bacterial infection of the apo; hen egg.
20	differential inhibitory effects of actinomycin d among strains of poliovirus	Distinctive inhibitory effects of actinomycin d among strains of poliovirus.
20	replication of mengovirus ii general properties of the viral induced ribonucleic acid polymerase	Replication of mengovirus ii general properties of the protein; ribonucleic acid polymerase induced by the virus.
20	model for the mechanism controlling the expression of competent state in pneumococcus cultures	Model for the mechanism controlling the expression of the apos; competent condition in cultures of pneumococcus.
20	effect of 3 percent hydrogen peroxide on the viability of serratia marcescens	The effect of hydrogen peroxide on the viability of Serratia marcescens.
20	antileptospiral activity of serum i normal and immune serum	Anti-leptospiral (leptospiral) activity of normal and immune serum.
20	induction of cellular morphogenesis in myxococcus xanthus i general description	Induction of cellular morphogenesis in myxococcus xanthus i general description.
20	filament formation in clostridium acidiurici under conditions of elevated temperatures	Filament formation in Clostridium acidiurici under conditions of high temperature.
20	effects of high incubation temperature upon the cell wall of escherichia coli	Effects of high temperature; high incubation on cell wall of escherichia coli.
20	uptake of griseofulvin by the sensitive dermatophyte microsporum gypseum	Sorption of griseofulvin by the sensitive dermatophyte microsporum gypseum.
20	genetic transformation of neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin resistance	The genetic transformation of Neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin resistance.
20	factors affecting the development of clostridium botulinum in whole milk	Factors affecting the development of clostridium botulinum in whole milk.
20	effect of temperature of liquid nitrogen on radiation resistance of spores of clostridium botulinum	Effect of temperature of apo; liquid nitrogen on radiation resistance of spores of Clostridium botulinum.
20	application of polarizing microscopy to medical mycology	Application of polarizing microscopy to medical mycology.
20	rapid technique for the enumeration of clostridium perfingens	A rapid technique for counting the number of clostridium perfingens.
20	relative stability of pertussis vaccine preserved with merthiolate benzethonium chloride or the parabens	Relative stability of pertussis vaccine preserved with benzethonium merthiolate chloride or parabens.
20	rapid methods of staining bacterial spores at room temperature	Rapid methods of staining bacterial spores at room temperature.
20	wind as an aversive stimulus	Like the wind as an aversive stimulus.
20	conversion of d biotin to biotin vitamers by lactobacillus arabinosus	Conversion of biotin d to biotin vitamins by lactobacillus arabinosus.
20	effects of temperature on growth rate of cultured mammalian cells l5178y	Effects of temperature on growth rate of cultured l5178y mammalian cells.
20	physical studies of phospholipids 3 electron microscope studies of some pure fully saturated 2 3 diacyl dl phosphatidyl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines	Physical studies of phospholipids 3 electron microscopic studies of some fully saturated diacyl dl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines 2 dl.
20	characteristics of the photoreactivation of pseudorabies virus	Characteristics of the photoreactivation of pseudorabies virus.
20	elevated temperature technique for the isolation of salmonella from streams	High temperature technique for the isolation of salmonella from streams; water.
20	effects of additives on the survival of lactic streptococci in frozen storage	Effects of additives on the survival of lactic streptococci in frozen storage.
20	improved motility medium	Better motility average.
20	some interactions between human platelets and glass von willebrand s disease compared with normal	Some interactions between human platelets and glass von willebrand disease compared to the normal.
20	flagella of salmonella typhimurium spheroplasts	The flagella of Salmonella typhimurium spheroplasts.
20	the inhibition of caeruloplasmin by azide	L' inhibition of caeruloplasmin by azide.
20	kinetic studies on the destructive action of oxygen on lyophilized serratia marcescens	Kinetic studies on the destructive action of oxygen on lyophilized Serratia marcescens.
20	oxidation of secondary alcohols by extracts of a corynebacterium	Oxidation of secondary alcohols by extracts of corynebacterium.
20	preparation and properties of a vi antigen degrading enzyme	Preparation and properties of a viral antigen-degrading enzyme.
20	nonphotoreactivating repair of ultraviolet light damaged micrococcus lysodeikticus cells	The nonphotoreactive repair of lysodeikticus cells damaged by ultraviolet light damaged micrococcus lysodeikticus.
20	induced rapid release and uptake of phosphate by microorganisms	The rapid release and uptake of phosphate by microorganisms was induced.
20	lethal action of ribonuclease for thermophilic bacilli	L' lethal action of ribonuclease on thermophilic bacilli.
20	the immunologic character of acquired inhibitors of antihemophilic globulin factor 8 and the kinetics of their interaction with factor 8	The immunological character of the 8-fold acquired inhibitors of antihemophilic globulins and the kinetics of their interaction with this factor.
20	formation of bacterial flagella i demonstration of a functional flagellin pool in spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis	Formation of bacterial flagella i demonstration of a functional flagellin pool in spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis.
20	temperature measurements from oxygen isotope ratios of fish otoliths	Temperature measured from isotope ratios of oxygen in fish otoliths.
20	effect of sodium chloride and ph on the outgrowth of spores of type e clostridium botulinum at optimal and suboptimal temperatures	Effect of sodium chloride and ph on growth of spores of the type e clostridium botulinum at optimum temperatures and under optimum @-@.
20	purification and properties of penicillin amidase from bacillus megaterium	The purification and properties of penicillin amidase from megaterium bacillus.
20	effect of temperature on the intracellular growth of histoplasma capsulatum	The effect of temperature on the intracellular growth of histoplasma capsulatum.
20	aflatoxin b 1 uptake by flavobacterium aurantiacum and resulting toxic effects	Absorption of aflatoxin b 1 by flavobacterium aurantiacum and resulting toxic effects.
20	factors influencing the photodynamic action of benzo a pyrene on escherichia coli	Factors influencing apo; photodynamic action of benzo a pyrene on escherichia coli.
20	permanent stained agar preparation of mycoplasma and of l forms of bacteria	Permanent stained agar preparation of mycoplasma and l-form bacteria.
20	platinum induced filamentous growth in escherichia coli	Platinum induced filamentous growth in escherichia coli.
20	the ultrastructural route of fluid transport in rabbit gall bladder	The ultrastructural pathway of fluid transport in rabbit gallbladder.
20	survival of bacteria on metal surfaces	The survival of bacteria on metal surfaces.
20	hydroxyapatite fractionation procedures in the study of the mammalian genome	Dos fractionation methods; hydroxyapatite in apo; study of the mammalian genome.
20	effect of temperature and relative humidity on survival of airborne columbia sk group viruses	The effect of temperature and temperature; relative humidity on survival of airborne columbia sk group viruses.
20	influence of food microorganisms on staphylococcal growth and enterotoxin production in meat	Influence of food microorganisms on staphylococcal growth and meat production of enterotoxins.
20	long term storage of bacteriophages of lactic streptococci	Long-term storage of bacteriophages of streptococci.
20	liquid nitrogen preservation of saccharomyces carlsbergensis and its use in a rapid biological assay of vitamin b6 pyridoxine	Preservation of liquid nitrogen from saccharomyces carlsbergensis and its use in a rapid bioassay of vitamin b6 pyridoxine.
20	a melting point for the birefringent component of muscle	A melting point for the birefringent component of muscle.
20	new high temperature chiorella	New high temperature chiorella.
20	low temperature partial alcoholysis of triglycerides	Low temperature partial alcoholysis of triglycerides.
20	phase equilibria and structure of dry and hydrated egg lecithin	Egg phase equilibria and structure of the lecithin d' dry and hydrated egg.
20	forces involved in chylomicron binding by isolated cells of rat liver	The forces involved in chylomicron binding by isolated cells of rat liver.
20	isolation of psychrophilic species of bacillus	Isolate psychrophilic species of bacilli.
20	pasteurella pestis growth temperature virulence and the graded response	Pasteurella pestis growth temperature virulence and the graded response.
20	method of temperature gradient incubation and its application to microbiological examinations	Thermal gradient incubation and its application to microbiological examinations.
20	temperature dependent anomalies in the growth of microorganims	Temperature-dependent abnormalities in the growth of micro@-@ organisms.
20	yaba tumor poxvirus synthesis in vitro ii adsorption inactivation and assay studies	Poxvirus tumour yaba synthesis in vitro ii apo inactivation; adsorption and assay studies.
20	the effects of adenosine triphosphate and related compounds on some hydrodynamic properties of glycerinated cilia	Effects of adenosine triphosphate and related compounds on certain hydrodynamic properties of glycerinated cilia.
20	the origin of the early receptor potential of the retina	L' origin of the early receptor potential of the retina.
20	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis ii reproducible infection by means of an inoculum preserved at 70 c	Infectious relations with the host in experimental airborne tuberculosis ii infection reproducible by means of apo; inoculum stored at 70 c.
20	induction of penicillinase with inorganic phosphate	Induction of penicillinase by inorganic phosphate.
20	regulation of amino acid transport across intestines of goldfish acclimatized to different environmental temperatures	The regulation of amino acid transport in the intestines of goldfish acclimated to different environmental temperatures.
20	a thermal component of excitation in the lateral eye of limulus	Thermal component, excitation in the lateral eye of the limulus.
20	characterization and stability of ribosomes from mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria	Characterization and stability of ribosomes from both mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria.
20	response of intracellular proteolysis to alteration of bacterial protein and the implications in metabolic regulation	The response of intracellular proteolysis to alteration of bacterial proteins and implications for metabolic regulation.
20	measurement of binding of chloramphenicol by intact cells	Measurement of binding of chloramphenicol by intact cells.
20	synergistic effects in sonochemical sterilization	The synergistic effects of sonochemical sterilization.
20	cell motility by labile association of molecules the nature of mitotic spindle fibers and their role in chromosome movement	Cell motility by labile association of molecules, nature of mitotic spindle fibers and their role in chromosome movement.
20	tryptophan transport in neurospora crassa i specificity and kinetics	Tryptophan transport in neurospora crassa i specificity and kinetics.
20	activation heat in frog sartorius muscle	Heat D'apos; activation in the muscle of frogs.
20	pyrimidine dimers effect of temperature on photoinduction	The effect of temperature on photoinduction by pyrimidine dimers.
20	factors influencing contraction and catch in mytilus smooth muscle	Factors influencing contraction and uptake in mytilus smooth muscle.
20	synthesis of macromolecules by escherichia coli near the minimal temperature for growth	Synthesis of macromolecules by escherichia coli near the minimum temperature of growth.
20	differentiation of pathogenic and saprophytic letospires i growth at low temperatures	The differentiation of pathogenic and saprophytic Letospires i increases at low temperatures.
20	sporicidal activity of peracetic acid and beta propiolactone at subzero temperatures	Sporicidal activity of peracetic acid and beta propiolactone at subzero temperatures.
20	protein and nucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli pressure and temperature effects	Protein and nucleic acid synthesis in pressure and temperature effects of d' Escherichia coli.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses ii persistence of poliomyelitis virus on cotton and wool fabrics	Quantitative studies of tissues as disseminators of virus ii persistence of polio virus on cotton and wool tissue.
20	effect of time and temperature in assessing microbial contamination on flat surfaces	Effect of time and temperature in isolation; assessment of microbial contamination on flat surfaces.
20	influence of salts on foot and mouth disease virus	The influence of salts on the FMD virus.
20	survival and recovery of enterovirus from foods	Dietary survival and recovery of enteroviruses.
20	microorganisms of the upper atmosphere 3 relationship between altitude and micropopulation	Micro-organisms in the upper atmosphere 3 relationship between altitude and micropopulation.
20	effect of lactic acid bacteria on growth of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of lactic acid bacteria on growth of staphylococcus aureus.
20	modified agglutination test for pasteurella tularensis	D&apos-testing; modified agglutination for pasteurella tularensis.
20	rapid quantitative serological assay of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Rapid quantitative serologic tests for staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
20	post mortem glycolysis in ox skeletal muscle effect of temperature on the concentrations of glycolytic intermediates and cofactors	The effect of temperature on the concentrations of glycolytic intermediates and cofactors was found to be postmortem glycolysis in bovine skeletal muscle.
20	studies of chloroplast development in euglena xiv sequential interactions of ultraviolet light and photoreactivating light in green colony formation	Studies of chloroplast development in euglena xiv, sequential interactions of ultraviolet light and photoreactive light in green colony formation.
20	environmental factors influencing the hyperfine structure of manganous low temperature electron paramagnetic resonance spectra	Environmental factors influencing the hyperfine structure of low temperature manganese electron magnetic resonance spectra.
20	survival of urinary leucocytes	The survival of urinary leukocytes.
20	the cytotoxic principle of the phytoflagellate prymnesium parvum	The cytotoxic principle of the phytoflagellate prymnesium parvum.
20	oxygen solubility in sea water thermodynamic influence of sea salt	L' thermodynamic influence of sea salt on the solubility of oxygen in sea water.
20	temperature characteristics of excitation in space clamped squid axons	Thermal characteristics of the stimulus; excitation in clamped squid axons in space.
20	severe impairment of heat induced saliva spreading in rats recovered from lateral hypothalamic lesions	A severe heat-induced alteration of saliva diffusion in rats recovered from lateral hypothalamic lesions.
20	studies on the permeability of calf thymus nuclei isolated in sucrose	Studies of the permeability of calf thymus nuclei isolated in sucrose.
20	acropetal movement of auxin dependence on temperature	Temperature-dependent acropetal movement of auxin.
20	glycogen metabolism in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	Glycogen metabolism in novikoff ascites hepatoma.
20	some conditions affecting the intracellular arrangement and concentration of tobacco mosaic virus particles in local lesions	Certain conditions affect the intracellular arrangement and concentration of tobacco mosaic virus particles in local lesions.
20	coliform behavior in frozen foods i rapid test for the recovery of escherichia coli from frozen foods	Coliform behaviour in frozen foods he rapid test for the recovery of escherichia coli from frozen foods.
20	thermal inactivation of type e botulinum toxin	Thermal inactivation of botulinum toxin type e botulinum.
20	survival of microorganisms in a simulated martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for germination of bacillus cereus and bacillus subtilis var niger spores	Survival of microorganisms in a simulated Martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for spore germination of bacillus cereus and bacillus subtilis var niger.
20	viral depuration of the northern quahaug	Acute viral depuration of the American clam.
20	pilot plant production of protease by alternaria tenuissima	Production of protease by a pilot plant of Alternaria tenuissima.
20	kinetics of the thermal inactivation of type e clostridium botulinum toxin	The kinetics of the protein; thermal inactivation of the toxin of type e clostridium botulinum.
20	some aspects of thermal injury in escherichia coli	Aspects of thermal injury in Escherichia coli.
20	release of inorganic phosphate from irradiated yeast radiation biodosimetry and evaluation of radioprotective compounds	Release of inorganic phosphate from yeast irradiation biodosimetry and evaluation of radiation protective compounds.
20	aflatoxins production of the toxins in vitro in relation to temperature	In vitro production of apos; aflatoxins of toxins in relation to temperature.
20	studies on amino acid decarboxylases in escherichia coli	Studies of amino acid decarboxylases in escherichia coli.
20	binding of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides to diphtheria toxin	The nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides binds to diphtheria toxin.
20	enzymic glucosylation of phenols	The enzymic glucosylation of phenols.
20	the equilibrium constants of the glutamate dehydrogenase systems	D&apos constants; equilibrium of the glutamate dehydrogenase systems.
20	citrate and the conversion of carbohydrate into fat the regulation of fatty acid synthesis by rat liver extracts	Citrate and conversion of carbohydrate to fat is the regulation of fatty acid synthesis by rat liver extracts.
20	effect of thrombin on the radioactive nucleotides of human washed platelets	The effect of thrombin on the radioactive nucleotides of washed human platelets.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of rat kidney slices on their subsequent respiration	L' effect of temperature and apos; anoxia of rat kidney slices on their subsequent respiration.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of kidney on the subsequent oxidative phosphorylation of mitochondria	The effect of temperature and kidney anoxia on the subsequent oxidative phosphorylation of the mitochondria.
20	temperature compensation in short duration time measurement by an intertidal amphipod	Temperature compensation by an intertidal amphipod for short duration measurements.
20	leaf temperatures of desert plants	Leaf temperature of desert plants.
20	oxygen isotope analysis of recent tropical pacific benthonic foraminifera	Isotope analysis of the Pacific tropical benthic foraminiferal oxygen content.
20	continuous production of clostridium tetani toxin	Continuous production of Clostridium tetani toxin.
20	antigenic modulation loss of tl antigen from cells exposed to tl antibody study of the phenomenon in vitro	Loss by antigenic modulation of cells exposed to the antigen tl; study of the phenomenon by the apos; antibody tl in vitro.
20	an examination of the effects of osmotic pressure changes upon transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	Examination of the effects of osmotic pressure changes on transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals.
20	salinity effect on the maximal growth temperature of some bacteria isolated from marine enviroments	Effect of salinity on the maximum growth temperature of some bacteria isolated from marine environments.
20	formation of filaments and synthesis of macromolecules at temperatures below the minimum for growth of escherichia coli	Formation of filaments and synthesis of macromolecules at temperatures below the minimum required for the growth of escherichia coli.
20	reduction of ribonuclease by glutathione at elevated temperatures the molecular mechanism	Reduction of ribonuclease by glutathione at high temperatures the molecular mechanism.
20	the influence of ph and temperature on the properties of myosin	L' influence of ph and temperature on the properties of myosin.
20	instrumental assay of microbial lipase at constant ph	An instrumental test of the microbial lipase at constant ph.
20	culture aeration in a polythermostat	Cultures aerated in a polythermostat.
20	effect of various gas atmospheres on destruction of microorganisms in dry heat	Effect of various gas atmospheres on destruction of micro@ organisms in dry heat.
20	influence of platen temperatures and relative humidity during storage on the survival of freeze dried salmonella typhimurium	Influence of platinum and apo temperatures; relative humidity during storage on survival of lyophilized Salmonella typhimurium.
20	lactobacilli in ensiled high moisture corn	Lactobacillus in corn with high moisture silage.
20	factors affecting the resistance of staphylococcus aureus to hydrogen peroxide treatments in milk	Factors affecting the resistance of staphylococcus aureus to peroxide d'apos; hydrogen in milk.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields i	Enzyme substrate reactions in very strong magnetic fields i.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields ii	Enzyme substrate reactions in very strong magnetic fields ii.
20	changes in intensity and spectral distribution of fluorescence effect of light treatment on normal and dcmu poisoned anacystis nidulans	Changes in intensity and spectral distribution of apos; fluorescence effect of light treatment on normal and poisoned apos; anacystis nidulans.
20	the relation between spontaneous activity metabolic rate and the 24 hour cycle in mice at different environmental temperatures	The relationship between spontaneous activity and the 24-hour cycle in mice at different ambient temperatures.
20	absorption of hemoglobin iron the role of a heme splitting substance in the intestinal mucosa	Lapos; absorption of apos; iron hemoglobin the role of apos; a substance separating apos; heme in the intestinal mucosa.
20	fate of free amino acids and nucleotides in spoiling beef	The fate of free amino acids and nucleotides in rotten beef.
20	behavior of the no beta d glucosiduronic acid of n acetyl n phenylhydroxylamine as a substrate for beta glucuronidase	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that can be used as a substrate for the beta glucuronidase.
20	phosphate uptake in an obligately marine fungus ii role of culture conditions energy sources and inhibitors	Phosphate uptake by a mandatory marine fungus ii role of culture conditions the sources of energy and inhibitors.
20	effect of abrupt temperature shift on the growth of mesophilic and psychrophilic yeasts	The effect of temperature change on the growth of mesophilic and psychrophilic yeasts.
20	effect of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid tris hydroxymethyl aminomethane on release of the acid soluble nucleotide pool and on breakdown of ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Effect of apo; ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid trishydroxymethylaminomethane on release of the apo-soluble nucleotide pool; acid and apo degradation; ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
20	onset of and recovery from diving bradycardia in ducks	Initiation and recovery of diving bradycardia in ducks and ducks.
20	effect of incubation temperature and serum content in agar overlay on plaque production by foot and mouth disease virus	The effect of agar temperature, incubation and serum content on plaque production by FMD virus.
20	the redox state of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in rat liver homogenates	L' redox state of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in rat liver homogenates.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the denaturation of deoxyribonucleic acid in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its relevance to the secondary structure of single stranded polynucleotides	Spectrophotometric study of the denaturation of deoxyribonucleic acid in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its importance in the secondary structure of mononuclear polynucleotides.
20	studies on the role of polyamines associated with the ribosomes from bacillus stearothermophilus	Studies of the role of polyamines associated with the ribosomes of the bacterium stearothermophilus.
20	measurement of growth hormone released by ox anterior pituitary slices in vitro	In vitro measurement of growth hormone released from slices of bovine anterior pituitary.
20	fluorimetric determination of d amino acid oxidase	Fluorimetric determination of amino acid residues; d-oxidase.
20	a study of the hydrolysis of unfractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid by pancreatic ribonuclease and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of the hydrolysis of reticulocyte ribonucleic ribosomal acid not fractionated by pancreatic ribonuclease and its relation to secondary structure.
20	reactivities of actin as a contractile protein	Reactivity of actin as a contractile protein.
20	applied studies on the viability of el tor vibrios	Applied studies on the viability of the life cycle; torque torque torque water; study of applied viability studies; seawater.
20	thermal stimulation of hypothalamic neurones in unanaesthetized rabbits	Thermal stimulation of hypothalamic nerve cells in unanaesthetized rabbits.
20	effect of temperature of aldehyde fixation on the radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in nucleoli of hela cells inhibition by puromycin and actinomycin d	Effect of temperature of fixation of apos; aldehyde on the radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in apos nucleoli; inhibition of helical cells by puromycin and apos; actinomycin d.
20	effect of some proteins on the yeast cell membrane	Effect of certain proteins on the yeast cell membrane.
20	comparison of the alpha amylase of bacillus subtilis and bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Comparison of the bacillus subtilis and the amylase amylase amylase.
20	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci ii role of membrane proteinase in cellular function	Enzymatic proteinase system of lactic streptococci ii role of membrane proteinase in cell function.
20	the effects of soaking the skin in water at various temperatures on the subsequent ability to sweat	The effects of skin immersion in water at various temperatures on the subsequent ability to sweat.
20	the renewal of photoreceptor cell outer segments	The renewal of outer segments of photoreceptor cells.
20	purification and properties of lysozyme produced by staphylococcus aureus	The purification and properties of lysozyme produced by staphylococcus aureus.
20	the surface coat of chylomicrons lipid chemistry	It's called the surface layer of the lipid chemistry of the chylomicrons.
20	temperature effects on pacemaker generation membrane potential and critical firing threshold in aplysia neurons	Temperature effects on pacemaker generation membrane potential and critical firing threshold in apo neurons; aplysia.
20	characterization of purified staphylococcal lipase	Characterization of purified staphylococcal lipase.
20	effects of a high magnetic field at different osmotic pressures and temperatures on multiplication of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of intense magnetic field at different osmotic pressures and temperatures on the multiplication of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
20	a study of the mechanism of quantal transmitter release at a chemical synapse	A study of the mechanism of release of a quantum transmitter at apos; chemical synapse.
20	multiple sensitivity of chordat typani fibres of the rat and hamster to gustatory and thermal stimuli	Multiple sensitivities of the rat and hamster typani chordate fibers to gustatory and thermal stimuli.
20	growth of bacillus coagulans in chemically defined media	Growth of bacillus coagulans in chemically defined media.
20	preliminary studies of some physiological properties of torula jeanselmei	Preliminary studies of some physiological properties of torula jeanselmei torula jeanselmei.
20	thermosensitive replication of a kanamycin resistance factor	Thermosensitive replication of a kanamycin resistance factor.
20	the electrical response of the planarian ocellus	This is the electrical response of the planar cell.
20	infectivity destroying effect of humidity for dried coliphage t1	Destructive effect of fog; infectivity of fog; humidity for dried t1 coliphage.
20	specificity of penicillin acylase of fusarium and of penicillium chrysogenum	Specificity of the penicillin acylase of fusarium and penicillium chrysogenum.
20	the characterization of scintillons bioluminescent particles from the marine dinoflagellate gonyaulax polyedra	Characterization of the bioluminescent scintillons of the marine dinoflagellate gonyaulax polyedra.
20	spontaneous activity in isolated somata of aplysia pacemaker naurons	Spontaneous activity in isolated somas of aplysia nauron pacemaker.
20	carbon dioxide exchange in cotton some anomalous fluctuations	Carbon dioxide exchange in cotton some abnormal fluctuations.
20	decay of influenza a viruses of human and avian origin	Influenza degeneration is a virus of human and avian origin.
20	effect of prostaglandins e1 and e2 on intestinal motility in the guinea pig and rat	Effect of prostaglandins e1 and e2 on intestinal motility in the guinea pig and rat.
20	cardiovascular response to localized heating of the anterior hypothalamus	Cardiovascular response to localized heating of the anterior hypothalamus.
20	effect of tryptophan and selected analogues on body temperatur of endotoxin poisoned mice	Endotoxin effect of tryptophan and some analogues on body temperature of poisoned mice.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid homology in bacterial taxonomy effect of incubation temperature on reaction specificity	Apos homology; deoxyribonucleic acid in bacterial taxonomy; effect of temperature; incubation on reaction specificity.
20	tiliqua scincoides temperature sensitive units in lizard brain	Tiliqua scincoides heat-sensitive units in lizard brain tissue.
20	a comparison of the killing of cultured mammalian cells induced by decay of incorporated tritiated molecules at 196 degrees c	A comparison of the destruction of cultured mammalian cells induced by decomposition of incorporated tritiated molecules at 196 degrees c.
20	vacuum ultraviolet studies on the nature of the radiation inactivation of trypsin	Vacuum ultraviolet studies on the nature of the apos; radiation inactivation of trypsin.
20	thermal depolarization of fluorescence from polytene chromosomes stained with acridine orange	Fluorescence thermal depolarization of polytene chromosomes stained with acridine orange.
20	inactivation of microorganisms by electrohydraulic shock	Inactivation of microorganisms by electrohydraulic shock treatment.
20	effect of cookery and holding on hams and turkey rolls contaminated with clostridium perfringens	Effect of cooking and handling on hams and turkey rolls contaminated with clostridium perfringens.
20	staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase purification and characterization studies	Staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase purification and characterization studies.
20	role of relative humidity in the survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	The role of the apo; relative humidity in the survival of airborne pneumonia mycoplasma.
20	proton magnetic resonance of transfer rna	Proton magnetic resonance of transfer rna.
20	some effects of pco2 and ph on nerve tissue	Well, some effects of pco2 and ph on nerve tissue.
20	use of capillary blood in measurement of arterial po2	Use of capillary blood for measuring arterial po2.
20	the effect of calcium depletion upon the tension independent component of cardiac heat production	L' effect of calcium depletion on the voltage independent component of cardiac heat production.
20	the catalase hydrogen peroxide system role of sub units in the thermal deactivation of bacterial catalase in the absence of substrate	The role of sub-units in catalase hydrogen peroxide system in thermal deactivation of bacterial catalase in the absence of substrate.
20	the effect of season on testicular weight and spermatogenesis in turkeys	L' effect of season on testicular weight and spermatogenesis in turkeys.
20	sensitivity of an enrichment culture procedure for detection of clostridium botulinum type e in raw and smoked whitefish chubs	Sensitivity of samples; a culture method; enrichment for detection of Clostridium botulinum type in raw and smoked whitefish minnows.
20	microbiological deterioration of frozen parfried potatoes upon holding after thawing	Microbiological deterioration of frozen scented potatoes preserved after thawing.
20	assessment of aerosol stability of yellow fever virus by fluorescent cell counting	Stability of aerosols of yellow fever virus by fluorescent cell counts.
20	influence of catalase activity on resistance of coagulase positive staphylococci to hydrogen peroxide	Influence of l' catalase activity on resistance of coagulase-positive staphylococci to peroxide d' hydrogen.
20	timing of the auxin response in coleoptiles and its implications regarding auxin action	Chronology of the reaction of apos; auxin in coleoptiles and its implications regarding apos; action of apos; auxin.
20	electrophysiological organization of the eye of aplysia	Electrophysiological organization of the eye of the aplysia.
20	sporicidal action of auto oxidized ascorbic acid for clostridium	Sporicidal action of l' ascorbic acid auto-oxidized for clostridium.
20	preservation of influenza virus infectivity by lyophilization	Apos preservation; influenza virus infectivity by freeze-drying.
20	methodological study and a recommended technique for determining the euglobulin lysis time	This is the recommended method and technique for determining the time of lysis of euglobulin.
20	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acid i annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Densation and renaturation of the apos; viral ribonucleic acid i anuit of the apos; r17 ribonucleic acid in the denatured replicative form or in the intermediate replicative denatured replicative form.
20	activation of the ephippial egg of daphnia pulex	Activation of the apos; ephippial egg of daphnia pulex.
20	the effect of hypertonic solution on the wet weight and contractions of rat uterus and vas deferens	An effect of hypertonic solution on the wet weight and contractions of the uterus and vas deferens of the rat.
20	effects of meat curing salts and temperature on production of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Effects of meat curing salts and temperature on production of staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
20	synthesis of protein and ribonucleic acid in a psychrophile at normal and restrictive growth temperatures	Protein synthesis and d' ribonucleic acid in a psychrophile at normal and restrictive growth temperatures.
20	esterase heterogeneity dynamics of a polymorphism	Dynamic d' heterogeneity of esterases d' a polymorphism.
20	lecithin aerosols generated ultrasonically above 25 degrees c	Ultrasonic lecithin aerosols were generated at-above 25 degrees c.
20	the relationship between caffeine contracture of intact muscle and the effect of caffeine on reticulum	The relationship between caffeine contracture of intact muscle and the effect of caffeine on reticulum.
20	the enzymatic nature of c 1r conversion of c 1s to c 1 esterase and digestion of amino acid esters by c 1r	The enzymatic nature of c1r conversion from c1s to c1 esterase and digestion of amino acid esters by c1r.
20	separation of mono and diglycerides by gas liquid chromatography	The separation of the mono- and diglycerides by gas chromatography in the liquid phase.
20	the effect of temperature on catalytic and regulatory functions of pyruvate kinases of the rainbow trout and the antarctic fish trematomus bernacchii	Effect of temperature on catalytic and regulatory functions of pyruvate kinases of rainbow trout-in-sky and Antarctic trematomus bernacchii.
20	temperature sensitive steps in the biosynthesis of venezuelan equine encephalitis virus	Temperature sensitive steps in the biosynthesis of Venezuelan equine encephalitis.
20	control of bacteriophage induced enzyme synthesis in cells infected with a temperature sensitive mutant	Bacteriophage control induced enzyme synthesis in cells infected by a heat-sensitive mutant.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase catalyzing synthesis of double stranded arbovirus ribonucleic acid	Ribonucleic acid polymerase catalyzing synthesis of a ribonucleic acid double-stranded arbovirus.
20	purification and properties of a thermophilic bacteriophage lytic enzyme	The purification and properties of a lytic enzyme of the thermophilic bacteriophage.
20	interference among group a arboviruses	Interference between a group of viruses; arbovirus.
20	factors affecting the translocation of oxaloacetate and l malate into rat liver mitochondria	Factors affecting the translocation of l' oxaloacetate and malate into rat liver mitochondria.
20	interaction of salt ph and temperature on the growth and survival of salmonellae in ground pork	Interaction of ph salt and temperature on the growth and survival of salmonellae in ground swine.
20	lipase of mucor pusillus	The lipase of pusillus mucorum.
20	effect of temperature on the coproduction of chlortetracycline and tetracycline by streptomyces aureofaciens	The effect of temperature on the coproduction of chlortetracycline and tetracycline by streptomyces aureofaciens.
20	rhinovirus plaque formation in wi 38 cells with methylcellulose overlay	Rhinovirus plaques formed in wi 38 cells coated with methylcellulose.
20	mechanism of resistance to enteroviruses of some primate cells in tissue culture	Mechanisms of resistance to enteroviruses in selected primate cells in tissue culture.
20	replication of western equine encephalomyelitis virus i some chemical and physical characteristics of viral ribonucleic acid	Apos virus replication; equine encephalomyelitis; western chemical and physical characteristics of apos; viral ribonucleic acid.
20	the inhibitory effects in vitro of phenothiazines and other drugs on lipid peroxidation systems in rat liver microsomes and their relationship to the liver necrosis produced by carbon tetrachloride	In vitro inhibitory effects of phenothiazines and d' other drugs on lipid peroxidation systems in rat liver microsomes and their relationship to carbon tetrachloride induced hepatic necrosis.
20	the relation between environmental temperature and oxygen consumption in the new born baby	The relationship between ambient temperature and oxygen consumption in the new @-@born.
20	evaporative water loss in the new born baby	D&apos loss; water loss by evaporation in the new-born.
20	purification and properties of an amine dehydrogenase from pseudomonas am1 and its role in growth on methylamine	Purification and properties of an amine dehydrogenase of Pseudomonas am1 and its role in growth on methylamine.
20	discrete conductance fluctuations in lipid bilayer protein membranes	Discrete conductance fluctuations in lipid bilayer protein membranes.
20	plasmolysis of escherichia coli b r with sucrose	Plasmolysis of apos; escherichia coli b r with sucrose.
20	sensitivity of pseudomonas aeruginosa to normal serum and to polymyxin	Sensitivity of pseudomonas aeruginosa to normal serum and polymyxin.
20	polynucleotide sequence relationships among members of enterobacteriaceae	Polynucleotide sequence relationships in the enterobacteria.
20	total synthesis of acetate from co2 ii purification and properties of formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase from clostridium thermoaceticum	Total synthesis of acetate from co2 purification ii and properties of formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase from clostridium thermoaceticum.
20	the effect of ambient temperature upon post natal changes in oxygen consumption of the guinea pig	Effects of ambient temperature on postnatal changes in oxygen consumption in the guinea pig.
20	evidence for separate monoglyceride hydrolase and triglyceride lipase in post heparin human plasma	Evidence of apo; existence of monoglyceride hydrolase and apo; separate triglyceride lipase in human plasma post-heparin.
20	intracellular transport of secretory proteins in the pancreatic exocrine cell iv metabolic requirements	The intracellular transport of secretory proteins in the metabolic requirements IV of exocrine pancreatic cells.
20	purification and properties of alpha d mannosidase from jack bean meal	The purification and properties of alpha mannosidase of gray bean flour.
20	survival of aerobic and anaerobic bacteria in chicken meat during freeze dehydration rehydration and storage	Survival of aerobic and anaerobic bacteria in chicken meat during cryodehydration rehydration and storage.
20	effect of low frequency ultrasound and elevated temperatures on isolation of bacteria from raw milk	Effect of low-frequency ultrasound and high temperatures on the isolation of bacteria from raw milk.
20	low temperature absorption spectra of chlorophyll a in polar and nonpolar solvents	Spectrum d' low temperature absorption of chlorophyll a in polar and nonpolar solvents.
20	chemical states of bacterial spores dry heat resistance	Chemical status of bacterial spores resistant to dry heat.
20	effect of temperature on growth of salmonella in rehydrated skim milk from a food poisoning outbreak	Effect of temperature on growth of Salmonella in rehydrated skimmed milk following food poisoning.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of rainbow trout fructose diphosphatase	Temperature and regulation of rainbow trout; enzymatic activity in the poikilothermic properties of rainbow trout fructose diphosphatase.
20	a comparison of the properties of the pyruvate kinases of the fat body and flight muscle of the adult male desert locust	Comparison of the properties of pyruvate kinases in the fat body and in flight muscle of adult male desert locusts.
20	cytochromes of aquatic fungi	Cyochromes of aquatic fungi and fungi.
20	variation in the fine structure of a marine achromobacter and a marine pseudomonad grown under selected nutritional and temperature regimes	Variation in the fine structure of a marine achromobacterium and a marine pseudomonad grown under selected nutritional and thermal regimes.
20	characteristics of rna degradation in the erythroid cell	Characteristics of rna degradation in the erythroid cells.
20	microincineration electron microscopy and electron diffraction of calcium phosphate loaded mitochondria	Microscopic electron microscopy-incineration and electron diffraction of calcium phosphate loaded mitochondria.
20	temperature dependence of resistance at an electrotonic synapse	The resistance to an electrotonic synapse is temperature dependent.
20	factors affecting the intracellular parasitic growth of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus developing within escherichia coli	Factors affecting the intracellular parasitic growth of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus developing in escherichia coli.
20	freezing tolerance in an adult insect	Frost tolerance in an adult insect.
20	the chemistry of flavines and flavorproteins photoreduction of flavines by amino acids	Chemistry of flavins and flavprotein photoreduction of flavins by amino acids.
20	shear and the melting of dna an especially sensitive portion of the e coli genome	A particularly sensitive part of the E. coli genome is the shear and fusion of DNA.
20	partial purification of the anti inflammatory factor s in inflammatory exudate	Partial purification of the anti-@-@ inflammatory factors in the body; exudate inflammatory.
20	replication and complementation of human adenoviruses and simian papovavirus at an elevated temperature	High temperature replication and complementation of human adenoviruses and simian papovaviruses.
20	production of enterotoxin a in milk	Dapos production; enterotoxin a in milk.
20	production of phosphatase by aspergillus awamori var kawachii in a low phosphate medium	Phosphatase production by aspergillus awamori var kawachii in a low phosphate medium.
20	effect of diurnal temperature cycles on the production of aflatoxin	The effect of diurnal temperature cycles on the production of aflatoxin.
20	a model of thyroxine metabolism based on the effects of environmental temperature	A model of thyroxine metabolism based on the effects of ambient temperature.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication 13 synthesis of virus specific ribonucleic acid during infection with human adenovirus type 12	Biochemical studies of adenovirus 13 multiplication synthesis, d' virus specific ribonucleic acid during apo; human adenovirus type 12 infection.
20	inhibition of arbovirus protein synthesis by interferon	Inhibition of arbovirus protein synthesis by interferon.
20	electron microscopic study of the morphogenesis of vesicular stomatitis virus	Electron microscopic study of the morphogenesis of vesicular stomatitis virus.
20	histamine release by sodium chloroplatinate	Apos release; histamine by sodium chloroplatinate.
20	inhibition of host cell protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis by newcastle disease virus	Inhibition of host cell ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis by Newcastle disease virus.
20	characteristics of bacteriophages attacking psychrophilic and mesophilic pseudomonads	Characteristics of bacteriophages attacking psychrophilic and mesophilic pseudomonads.
20	structure and leukemogenic activity of a murine leukemia virus	Structure and leukemogenic activity of murine leukemic virus.
20	deterioration of cycloserine in the tropics	Cycloserine in the tropics is deteriorating.
20	pyruvate kinase variants of the alaskan king crab evidence for a temprature depenet iterconversion between two forms having distinct and adaptive kinetic properties	Alaskan king crab pyruvate kinase variants demonstrate the existence of apos; an iteroconversion of temperature between two forms having distinct and adaptive kinetic properties.
20	bacteriophage release in a lysogenic strain of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Bacteriophage release in a lysogenic strain of agbacterium tumefaciens.
20	critical arginine residue for maintaining the bacteriophage tail structure	Residues; arginine essential for maintaining the structure of the bacteriophage tail.
20	specific reduction of carboxyl groups in peptides and proteins by diborane	Specific reduction of carboxyl groups in peptides and proteins by diborane.
20	cellulolytic enzymes during morphogenesis in dictyostelium discoideum	The cellulolytic enzymes during morphogenesis in dictyostelium discoideum.
20	effects on growth and toxin production of exposure of spores of clostridium botulinum type f to sublethal doses of gamma irradiation	Effects on growth and production of toxins; exposure of spores of Clostridium botulinum type f to sublethal doses of apos; gamma irradiation.
20	effect of cold temperatures on the viability of chromobacterium violaceum	The effect of cold on the viability of chromobacterium violaceum.
20	significance of 12s toxin of clostridium botulinum type e	Importance of Clostridium botulinum type 12s toxin e.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating systems from bacillus licheniformis and bacillus stearothermophilus 10	Acellular amino acid incorporating systems of bacillus licheniformis and stearothermophilus 10.
20	warm water strain of leucothrix mucor	Hot water strain of leucothrix mucor mucor.
20	recombination between a thermosensitive kanamycin resistance factor and a nonthermosensitive multiple drug resistant factor	Recombination between a heat-sensitive kanamycin resistance factor and a non-therapeutic multidrug resistant factor.
20	the permeation of non electrolytes through the single barnacle muscle cell	Permeation of non-electrolytes through the single barnacle muscle cell.
20	metabolism of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by epithelial cells of the toad bladder	Apos metabolism; adenosine 3,5 monophosphate by epithelial cells of toad bladder.
20	effects of temperature agitation and donor strain on chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k 12	Effects of heat agitation and donor strain on chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k 12.
20	the release of thyroxine from serum protein in the vessels of the liver	The release of thyroxine from serum proteins in the vessels of the liver.
20	light scattering and birefringence changes during activity in the electric organ of electrophorus electricus	The scattering of light and birefringence changes during the interval; activity in the interval; electrical organ of the interval; electrophore electricus.
20	a protein component of the cell surface of staphylococcus aureus	The protein component of the cell surface of staphylococcus aureus.
20	studies of copper ion induced mitochondrial swelling in vitro	In vitro studies of copper ion etapos-induced mitochondrial swelling.
20	studies on ferrochelatase the enzymic formation of haem in proplastids chloroplasts and plant mitochondria	Studies on ferrochelatase, hematoma in proplast chloroplasts and plant mitochondria, and the enzymatic formation of apos.
20	nucleoside triphosphate pools and the regulation of rna synthesis in e coli	Nucleoside triphosphate pools and the regulation of rna synthesis in e coli.
20	comparative hybridization of mitochondrial and cytoplasmic aminoacyl transfer rna with mitochondrial dna from rat liver	Comparison of apo; hybridization of mitochondrial and cytoplasmic aminoacyl transfer with rat liver mitochondrial DNA.
20	studies on collagenase from rheumatoid synovium in tissue culture	Collagenase studies of rheumatoid synovium in tissue culture.
20	replication of mengovirus in hela cells preinfected with nonreplicating poliovirus	The replication of mengovirus in helical cells pre-infected with non-replicating poliovirus.
20	enzymic degradation of heparin a sulphamidase and a sulphoesterase from flavobacterium heparinum	Deterioration of the enzymes; heparin a sulphamidase and of the sulphoesterase from flavobacterium heparinum.
20	effects of division synchronizing hypoxic and hyperthermic shocks upon tetrahymena a respiration and intracellular atp concentration	Effects of division synchronizing hypoxic and hyperthermic shocks on tetrahymena, respiration and intracellular atp.
20	direct bacterial count as a rapid freshness test for fish fillets	Direct bacterial count as a rapid freshness test for fish fillets.
20	survival of t3 coliphage in varied extracellular environments i viability of the coliphage during storage and in aerosols	Survival of t3 coliphage in various extracellular environments i viability of the coliphage during storage and in aerosols.
20	factors affecting the persistence of staphylococcus aureus on fabrics	Factors affecting the persistence of staphylococcus aureus on tissues.
20	growth stimulation of lactobacillus species by lactic streptococci	Stimulation of growth of lactobacillus species by streptococci.
20	effect of ph on growth and survival of three avian and one saprophytic mycoplasma species	Effect of ph on growth and survival of three avian and d&apos mycoplasma species; one saprophytic.
20	a study of the effects of hydrostatic pressure on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli	A study of the effects of hydrostatic pressure on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli.
20	electron spin resonance signals in injured nerve	Uh, electron spin resonance signals in the damaged nerve.
20	staphylococcal acid phosphatase preliminary physical and chemical characterization of the loosely bound enzyme	Preliminary physical and chemical characterization of the staphylococcal acid phosphatase.
20	physiological and biochemical changes in bacterial cells exposed to oxygen	Physiological and biochemical changes in bacterial cells exposed to oxygen.
20	ribosome synthesis in rhodopseudomonas capsulata cells growing in continuous and intermittent light	Ribosome synthesis in rhodopseudomonas capsulata cells grown in continuous and intermittent light.
20	thermal injury and recovery of streptococcus faecalis	Thermal lesion and recovery of streptococcus faecalis.
20	response of the mimeae to some physical and chemical agents	Response of imitations to some of the physical and chemical agents.
20	growth and destruction of salmonella typhimurium in egg white foam products cooked by microwaves	Growth and destruction of salmonella typhimurium in white foam products; egg cooked by micro@-@wave.
20	the equilibrium constant of the isocitrate dehydrogenase reaction	Constant d' equilibration of the isocitrate dehydrogenase reaction.
20	specificity and control of choline o sulfate transport in filamentous fungi	Specificity and control of choline o sulfate transport in filamentous fungi.
20	fate of recipient deoxyribonucleic acid during transformation in haemophilus influenzae	The fate of recipient deoxyribonucleic acid during transformation in the apos; haemophilus influenzae.
20	events occurring during the replication of bacteriophage t4 dna	Events occurring during the replication of bacteriophage t4 DNA.
20	solubilization of particulate proteins and nonelectrolytes by chaotropic agents	Solubilization of particulate proteins and nonelectrolytes by chaotropic agents.
20	spin labeled transfer rna	Spin transfer rna labeled.
20	radical transformation in irradiated dna and its constituents	Radical transformation in irradiated DNA and its components.
20	permeability of a cell membrane junction dependence on energy metabolism	The permeability of a cell membrane junction depends on energy metabolism.
20	stabilities of dried suspensions of influenza virus sealed in a vacuum or under different gases	Stabilization of dried suspensions of the virus de l'apos; influenza sealed in a vacuum or under different gases.
20	effect of incubation temperature on t agglutination typing of streptococcus pyogenes	Effect of temperature on agglutination typing of streptococcus pyogenes.
20	radiosensitivity of mammalian cells 3 effect of suboptimal growth temperatures on recovery from radiation induced division delay	Effect of radiosensitivity of mammalian cells 3 from growth temperatures at-optimal on recovery from radiation-induced division delay.
20	production of thermostable alkaline proteases by thermophilic streptomyces	Production of heat-stable alkaline proteases by thermophilic streptomyces.
20	interacting factors that influence long term storage of live pasteurella tularensis vaccine and rift valley fever virus	Factors influencing apo; long-term storage of live pasteurella tularensis vaccine and Rift Valley fever virus.
20	delay of poliovirus plaque formation with use of fresh bovine serum in the growth medium of host cells	Postulated poliovirus plaque formation by apo; use of fresh bovine serum in the growth medium of host cells.
20	foot and mouth disease virus stability of neutralizing antibody after freeze drying and air drying	FMD virus stability of neutralizing antibodies after freeze-drying and air drying.
20	immunofluorescent detection of enterotoxin b in food and a culture medium	Immunofluorescence detection of enterotoxin b in food and culture media.
20	changes in the patterns of synthesis of ribonucleic acid species in immature rat uterus in response to oestrdiol 17 beta	Changes in the patterns of synthesis of apos species; ribonucleic acid in immature rat uterus in response to apos; oestrdiol 17 beta.
20	experimental conditions affecting ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated rat liver nuclei effect of nucleoside triphosphate concentration temperature ammonium sulphate and heparin	Experimental conditions affecting apos; ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated rat liver nuclei, nucleoside triphosphate concentration temperature effect, d&apos sulfate; ammonia and heparin.
20	absorption of proteins and peptides in the far ultraviolet	Absorption of proteins and peptides in the Ultraviolet.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of lungfish fructose diphosphatase	Temperature and regulation of pH; enzyme activity in poikilothermic properties of lungfish fructose diphosphatase.
20	purification and general properties of delta aminolaevulate dehydratase from nicotiana tabacum l	The purification and general properties of delta aminolaevulate dehydratase from nicotiana tabacum l.
20	an artificial leucocyte control suspension	This is an artificial suspension of leukocyte control.
20	oscillation and repetitive firing in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	L' oscillation and repetitive discharge in squid axons; comparison of experiments with calculations.
20	role of isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in ribonucleic acid synthesis and enzyme repression in yeast	Role of apos; apos isoleucyltransfer; ribonucleic acid synthetase in apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid and enzyme repression in yeast.
20	dissimilation of methionine by a demethiolase of aspergillus species	Dissimulation of methionine by demethiolase of aspergillus species.
20	salmonella in wastes produced at commercial poultry farms	Salmonella in wastes produced on commercial poultry farms.
20	environmental and genetical contributions to class difference a model experiment	Contribution of environment and genetics to class difference, a model experience.
20	assay and properties of diaminopimelate epimerase from bacillus megaterium	Determination and properties of megaterium bacillus diaminopimelate epimerase.
20	rnase activity in erythroid cell lysates	A rnase activity in erythroid cell lysates.
20	stability of st louis encephalitis virus in the airborne state	The virus is stable; the St. Louis encephalitis is stable; the airborne state.
20	partial purification and characterization of dihydrodipicolinic acid synthetase from sporulating bacillus megaterium	Partial purification and characterization of dihydrodipicolinic acid synthetase from megaterium bacillus sporulation.
20	influence of bolus temperature on human esophageal motor function	L' influence of bolus temperature on human esophageal motor function.
20	biosynthesis of cytidine diphosphate diglyceride by human platelets	Biosynthesis of cytidine diphosphate diglyceride by human platelets.
20	effect of temperature on radiosensitivity of newcastle disease virus	Effect of temperature on radiosensitivity of the Newcastle disease virus.
20	motile nocardoid actinomycetales	Actinomycetales motile nocardoid.
20	partial purification of native rrna and trna cistrons from mycoplasma sp kid	Partial purification of native rrna and trna cistrons of mycoplasma sp kid.
20	synthesis of vaccinia viral proteins in cytoplasmic extracts i incorporation of radioactively labeled amino acids into polypeptides	Synthesis of viral vaccine proteins in cytoplasmic extracts and incorporation of radioactive amino acids into polypeptides.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication xvi transcription of the adenovirus genome during abortive infection of elevated temperatures	Biochemical studies of adenovirus xvi transcription multiplication in the adenovirus genome during high-temperature, aborted infection.
20	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in cells infected with lsc poliovirus at elevated temperatures	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in cells infected with lsc poliovirus at high temperatures.
20	phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis under primitive earth conditions	Phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis under primitive terrestrial conditions.
20	a new approach to isoelectric focusing and fractionation of proteins in a ph gradient	A novel approach to isoelectric focusing and fractionation of proteins in a ph gradient.
20	the clearance and antidiuretic potency of neurohypophysial hormones in man and their plasma binding and stability	The clearance and antidiuretic potency of neurohypophysial hormones in humans, as well as their plasma binding and stability.
20	correlation of melting temperature and cesium chloride buoyant density of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid	Correlation between melting temperature and cesium chloride flotation density of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	characterization of injury incurred by escherichia coli upon freeze drying	Characterization of the damage sustained by escherichia coli during lyophilization.
20	solution of fatty acids from monolayers spread at the air water interface identification of phase transformations and the estimation of surface charge	Fatty acid solution of monolayers spread at l' air interface-water identification of phase transformations and l' estimation of surface charge.
20	liquid gel chromatography on lipophilic hydrophobic sephadex derivatives	Lipophilic hydrophobic sephadex derivatives are liquid-gel chromatography.
20	an endogenous inhibitor of microsomal mixed function oxidases in homogenates of the southern armyworm prodenia eridania	An endogenous inhibitor of microsomal mixed-function oxidases in the homogenates of the southern legionnaire, the legionnaire prodenia eridania.
20	functional significance of isoenzymes in thermal acclimatization acetylcholinesterase from trout brain	Apos; functional importance of isoenzymes in apos; thermal acclimation of apos; trout brain acetylcholinesterase.
20	compartmentation of the inulin space in mouse brain slices	Comparison of inulin space in mouse brain slices.
20	the requirement of serine esterase function in complement dependent erythrophagocytosis	Serine esterase function is required in complement dependent erythrophagocytosis.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterization i experimental apparatus and methods	Microbiological aspects of chemical sputum sterilization; ethylene oxide; experimental apparatus and methods.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization ii microbial resistance to ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of sputum sterilization; dichloroethane; ethylene ii microbial resistance to sputum; dichloroethane; ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization 3 effects of humidity and water activity on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of sputum sterilization; sputum oxide; ethylene 3 effects of sputum; moisture and lipids; activity of sputum; sporicidal activity of sputum; oxides of sputum; ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization iv influence of thickness of polyethylene film on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of spoilage; oxides; ethylene iv influence spoilage; thickness of polyethylene film on spoilage; sporicidal activity of spoilage; spoilage oxides; ethylene.
20	behavior of salmonellae in sliced luncheon meats	Salmonella behaviour in sliced luncheon meats.
20	viral susceptibility range of the fathead minnow pimephales promelas poikilothermic cell line	Variation of viral sensitivity in the cell line promelas poikilothermal of the head-@-@ ball pimephales promelas.
20	studies on the effect of vitamin d on calcium absorption and transport	Studies on the effect of vitamin D on calcium absorption and transport.
20	the nature of the carbon dioxide substrate and equilibrium constant of the 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase reaction	The nature of the carbon dioxide substrate and the phosphogluconate dehydrogenase 6 equilibrium constant.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms fructose diphosphatase from migrating salmon	Temperature and regulation of enzyme activity in the fructose diphosphatase poikilotherms of migrating salmon.
20	the importance of life time changes in fluorescence depolarization	L' importance of life-time changes in fluorescence depolarization.
20	hydrolysis of penicillins and related compounds by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	L' hydrolysis of penicillins and related compounds by d&apos-bound penicillin acylase; escherichia coli.
20	factors affecting the synthesis of ampicillin and hydroxypenicillins by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	Factors affecting the synthesis of apos; ampicillin and hydroxypenicillins by penicillin acylase linked to d' escherichia coli.
20	the effect of low temperatures on fatty acid biosynthesis in plants	L' effect of low temperatures on fatty acid biosynthesis in plants.
20	the influence of stimulus parameters on contractions of isolated frog muscle fibres	L' influences the stimulus parameters on contractions of isolated frog muscle fibers.
20	limits of microbial existence temperature and ph	Limits; microbial existence temperature and ph.
20	purification and properties of proteolytic enzymes from thermophilic actinomycetes	The purification and properties of proteolytic enzymes from thermophilic actinomycetes.
20	temperature sensitive conjugation defective f factor in escherichia coli	Defective temperature sensitive conjugation factor in escherichia coli.
20	cell wall glucans of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	The cell wall glucans of yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis.
20	thermal reversal of ultraviolet irradiation damage in salmonella typhimurium	Thermal reversal of ultraviolet irradiation in Salmonella typhimurium.
20	proton magnetic resonance study of ferredoxin from clostridium pasteurianum	A proton magnetic resonance study of ferredoxin from clostridium pasteurianum.
20	the meyerhof quotient and the synthesis of glycogen from lactate in frog and rabbit muscle	The meyerhof quotient and the synthesis of glycogen from lactate in frog and rabbit muscle.
20	viability control for mildew testing of materials and equipment in tropical chambers	Viability testing for mold testing of materials and clothing; equipment in tropical rooms.
20	enzymatic removal of diacetyl from beer 3 enzyme protection and regeneration of cofactor	Enzymatic removal of diacetyl from beer 3 enzyme protection and regeneration of cofactor.
20	studies of laryngotracheitis virus in avian tissue cultures 3 enhancement of infectivity by diethylaminoethyl dextran	Studies of laryngotracheitis virus in avian tissue cultures; increases in apos; diethylaminoethyl dextran infectivity.
20	hydrogen sulfide production by bacteria and sulfmyoglobin formation in prepacked chilled beef	Dapos sulfide production; hydrogen by bacteria and sulfmyoglobin formation in pre-packaged, refrigerated beef.
20	occurrence of purple sulfur bacteria in a sewage treatment lagoon	Presence of purple sulfur bacteria in a wastewater treatment lagoon.
20	detection and incidence of escherichia coli on storage pen surfaces of fishing trawlers	Detection and incidence of escherichia coli on the surfaces of fishing trawl enclosures.
20	endocarpic microorganisms of two types of windrow dried peanut fruit arachis hypogaea l	Endocarp microorganisms of two types of dried peanut fruit dried with hypogaea peanut sprouts.
20	purification and properties of a glycerol ester hydrolase lipase from propionibacterium shermanii	The purification and properties of a glycerol ester hydrolase lipase from propionibacterium shermanii.
20	additional factors in chronic bronchitis	Other factors in chronic bronchitis.
20	effects of temperature on the irritability caused by ddt and ddt analogues in anopheline mosquitos	The effects of temperature on appetite; irritability caused by ddt and ddt analogues in anopheles mosquitoes.
20	the use of gamma radiation for the elimination of salmonella from frozen meat	The use of gamma rays to remove salmonella from frozen meat.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase induced in cells infected with sendai virus	L' ribonucleic acid polymerase is induced in cells infected with the virus sentai.
20	synthesis of cell constituents by methane grown methylococcus capsulatus and methanomonas methanooxidans	Methane-grown methylococcus capsulatus and methanomonas methanooxidans synthesize cell components.
20	depolarization of the intrinsic and extrinsic fluorescence of pepsinogen and pepsin	Depolarization of the intrinsic and extrinsic fluorescence of pepsinogen and pepsin.
20	substrate specificity and kinetic properties of alpha galactosidases from vicia faba	Substrate specificity and kinetic properties of alpha galactosidases of vicia faba.
20	differential stability of 28s and 18s rat liver ribosomal ribonucleic acids	Differential stability of 28s and 18s rat liver ribonucleic acids.
20	purification and characterization of bovine aorta ribonucleases	Purification and characterization of bovine aorta ribonucleases.
20	laboratory and clinical characteristics of attenuated strains of influenza virus	Laboratory and clinical characteristics of attenuated strains of the influenza virus.
20	shock synthesis of amino acids in simulated primitive environments	Acute shock synthesis of amino acids in simulated, primitive environments.
20	experimental control of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys by the dipping of eggs in tylosin and spiramycin	Experimental control of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys by immersing the eggs in tylosin and spiramycin.
20	naphthylamidase activity of leptospira	The naphthylamidase activity of leptospira.
20	production of amylase in liquid culture by a strain of aspergillus oryzae	D&apos production; amylase in liquid culture by a strain of aspergillus oryzae.
20	chromate transport in human leukocytes	Chromate transport in human leukocytes.
20	taxonomic implications of temperature dependence of the allosteric inhibition of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonate 7 phosphate synthetase in bacillus	Taxonomic implications of temperature dependence of allosteric inhibition of 3 deoxy arabino heptulosonate 7 phosphate synthetase in the bacillus.
20	intracytoplasmic membrane structures in vibrio marinus	Intracytoplasmic membrane structure in vibrio marinus marinus.
20	characteristics of a non complement dependent c3 reactive complex formed form factors in nephritic and normal serum	The d&apos characteristics; a noncomplement-dependent c3 reactive complex formed formation factors in nephritic and normal serum.
20	an extracellular agarase from a cytophaga species	An extracellular agarase from a cytophaga species.
20	factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and mg reactivation of bacillus megaterium km membrane nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase	Factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and reactivation of bacillus megaterium km nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide membrane in mg reduced the oxidase form.
20	fatty acid distribution in mesophilic and thermophilic strains of the genus bacillus	Fatty acid distribution in mesophilic and thermophilic strains of the genus bacillus.
20	growth kinetics of yaba tumor poxvirus after in vitro adaptation to cercopithecus kidney cells	Growth kinetics of yaba poxvirus tumour after in vitro adaptation to cercopithecal renal cells.
20	relationship between atmospheric temperature and survival of airborne bacteria	The relationship between atmospheric temperature and survival of airborne bacteria.
20	short term storage at 4 c of trypsinized tissues	Short-term storage at 4 c of trypsinized tissue.
20	alterations in the phospholipid composition of escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures	Alterations in phospholipid composition of escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures.
20	purification and characterization of beta glucosidase of alcaligenes faecalis	Beta-glucosidase purification and characterization of the alkaligenic faecalis.
20	microgermination of bacillus cereus spores	Micro-germination of bacillus cereus spores.
20	fine structure of vibrio cholerae during toxin production	The fine structure of vibrio cholerae during toxin production.
20	study of the thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by differential thermal analysis and susceptibility to proteolysis	Study of the thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by differential thermal analysis and susceptibility to proteolysis.
20	ribonucleic acid synthesis and transport in animal cells at 27 degrees c	Synthesis of ribonucleic acid and transport in animal cells at 27 degrees c.
20	protection antisera afford against death by endotoxin	The antisera protect against death by endotoxin.
20	occurrence of vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrios in marine environments of washington state	Presence of vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrios in marine environments of Washington State.
20	mycotoxin from a blue eye mold of corn	Mycotoxin from a blue mussel in the eyes.
20	methods used to monitor the microbial load of returned lunar material	The methods used to monitor the microbial load of returned lunar material are described below.
20	seasonal incidence of bacterial temperature types in louisiana soil and water	Seasonal incidence of bacterial temperature types in Louisiana soil and water.
20	biochemical characterization of sulfur assimilation by salmonella pullorum	Biochemical characterization of sulfur assimilation by salmonella pullorum.
20	formation and ultrastructure of extra membranes in escherichia coli	The formation and ultrastructure of additional membranes in escherichia coli.
20	reassociation of deoxyribonucleic acids from actinoplanes and other actinomycetes	Reassociation of deoxyribonucleic acids from actinoplanes and d' other actinomycetes.
20	amino acid transport in mycobacterium smegmatis	Amino acid transport in smegmatis mycobacterium.
20	mode of action of pectic enzymes ii further purification of exopolygalacturonate lyase and pectinesterase from clostridium multifermentans	Procedure; action of pectic enzymes ii further purification of exopolygalacturonate lyase and clostridium multifermentans pectinesterase.
20	comparative study of isoenzyme formation of bacterial beta galactosidase	Comparative study of formation of bacterial beta galactosidase isozymes.
20	calorimetric evidence for the liquid crystalline state of lipids in a biomembrane	Calorimetric evidence of apos; liquid crystalline state of lipids in a biomembrane.
20	prototrophic thermophilic bacillus isolation properties and kinetics of growth	Properties; isolation of prototrophic thermophilic bacilli and kinetics of growth.
20	intracellular protein breakdown in a thermophile	Dissolution of intracellular protein molecules in a thermophile.
20	effect of temperature on survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	Effect of temperature on survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae.
20	effect of bacteria on chemotaxis in the cellular slime molds	Effect of bacteria on chemotaxis in the cellular slime mold.
20	herpes type virus of the frog renal adenocarcinoma i virus development in tumor transplants maintained at low temperature	The herpes-like virus of the frog; renal adenocarcinoma of the frog develops in tumour transplants maintained at low temperature.
20	contribution of the excluded volume of bovine serum albumin for solute molecules to the aprent nonsolvent water	Contribution of the excluded volume of bovine serum albumin solute molecules to the non-soluble water of the apron.
20	the decomposition of soluble collagen by gamma irradiation	The decomposition of soluble collagen by gamma irradiation.
20	acetylcholine concentrations in rat brain diurnal oscillation	Acetylcholine concentration in rat brain diurnal oscillation.
20	nucleic acid similarities among pseudomonas pseudomallei pseudomonas multivorans and actinobacillus mallei	Comparison of pseudomonas pseudomallei pseudomonas multivorans and actinobacillus mallei nucleic acids.
20	base composition of deoxyribonucleic acid of the temperature sensitive kanamycin resistant r factor rts1	Deoxyribonucleic acid base composition of kanamycin-resistant rts1-thermosensitive rts1.
20	biochemical changes during fungal sporulation and spore germination i phenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride inhibition of macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum	Biochemical changes during fungal sporulation and spore germination of iphenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride spores that inhibit macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum.
20	aerobic heterotrophic bacteria indigenous to ph 2 8 acid mine water predominant slime producing bacteria in acid streamers	Aerobic heterotrophic bacteria indigenous to the environment; acid mine water ph 28 producing mainly bacterial slurry in acidic coils.
20	isolation and properties of lipoproteins from normal rat serum	Lipoprotein isolation and properties of normal rat serum.
20	relation of mitochondrial phospholipase a activity to mitochondrial swelling	Relationship of mitochondrial phospholipase a activity to mitochondrial swelling.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the secondary structure of ribonucleic acid isolated from the smaller and larger ribosomal subparticles of rabbit reticulocytes	A spectrophotometric study of the secondary structure of l' ribonucleic acid isolated from the smaller and larger sub-ribosomal particles of rabbit reticulocytes.
20	effect of temperature acclimatization on the fatty acid composition of goldfish intestinal lipids	Capos effect; temperature acclimation on the fatty acid composition of goldfish intestinal lipids.
20	release of vitamin b12 binding protein by human leukocytes in vitro	In vitro release of vitamin b12 binding protein from human leukocytes.
20	the biosynthesis of phosphatidylinositol in human platelets	The biosynthesis of phosphatidylinositol in human platelets.
20	partial purification and kinetics of oestriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Partial kinetic purification of estriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase from the cytosolic fraction of human liver.
20	salt effects on the denaturation of dna	Effects of salt on the denaturation of DNA.
20	effects of atmospheric humidity and temperature on the survival of airborne flavobacterium	Effects of fog; atmospheric humidity and temperature on the survival of airborne flavobacteria.
20	inhibitory action of tetrathionate enrichment broth	An inhibitory action of d&apos broth; tetrathionate enrichment.
20	replicate surveys of larval habitats of aedes aegypti in relation to dengue haemorrhagic fever in bangkok thailand	Repeat surveys of larval habitats of d' aedes aegypti related to dengue haemorrhagic fever in Bangkok, Thailand.
20	a generalized system for automation of enzyme assays	In addition, there is a generalized system for the automation of enzyme testing.
20	conditioned nalorphine induced abstinence changes persistence in post morphine dependent monkeys	Modifications to the persistence of nalorphin-induced abstinence after conditioning in monkeys that are dependent on morphine.
20	bacteriological and shelf life characteristics of canned pasteurized crab cake mix	Bacteriological characteristics and shelf life of canned pasteurized crab cake mix.
20	dengue virus plaque development in simian cell systems ii agar variables and effect of chemical additives	Dengue virus plaque development in simian cell systems ii agar variability and effect of chemical additives.
20	effects of moisture content and temperature on aflatoxin production in corn	The effects of moisture content and temperature on production of aflatoxin in corn.
20	thermoelectrically cooled temperature gradient apparatus for comparative cell and virus temperature studies	Thermoelectric temperature gradient apparatus for comparative cell and virus temperature studies.
20	nitrite and hydroxylamine reduction in higher plants fractionation electron donor and substrate specificity of leaf enzymes principally from vegetable marrow cucurbita pepo l	Nitrite and l&apos reduction; hydroxylamine in higher fractionation plants, donor d' electron and substrate specificity of leaf enzymes, mainly from cucurbita pepo l plant pith.
20	studies on a testosterone glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Studies of a testosterone glucuronyltransferase from the cytosolic fraction of human liver.
20	estimation of platelet adhesiveness on whole blood and platelet rich plasma	Apos estimation; platelet adhesion to whole blood and platelet rich plasma.
20	a simple diagnostic milk medium for pseudomonas aeruginosa	A simple diagnostic milk medium for Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
20	cytoplasmic filaments of amoeba proteus i the role of filaments in consistency changes and movement	Apos cytoplasmic filaments; amoeba proteus i the role of filaments in consistency changes and movements.
20	factors influencing the activity of succinate dehydrogenase in membrane preparations from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Factors influencing the apos; activity of succinate dehydrogenase in membrane preparations of micrococcus lysodeikticus lysodeikticus.
20	uncertainties in the determination of the cortisol binding capacity of plasma and their removal	Uncertainties in determining cortisol binding capacity in plasma and their elimination.
20	carbon monoxide association of community air pollution with mortality	L' association of carbon monoxide pollution and community air pollution with mortality.
20	antibody against western equine encephalitis virus occurring in the serum of garter snakes colubridae thamnophis in saskatchewan	Antibody to Epos Virus; equine encephalitis; West present in the serum of Saskatchewan ring-necked snake colubridae thamnophis.
20	preparation and properties of creatine kinase from the breast muscle of normal and dystrophic chicken gallus domesticus	Preparation and properties of creatine kinase from normal and dystrophic chicken gallus domesticus breast muscle.
20	penicillic acid production by blue eye fungi on various agricultural commodities	Production of penicillic acid by blue-eyed mushrooms on various agricultural products.
20	kinetic constants for aerobic growth of microbial populations selected with various single compounds and with municipal wastes as substrates	Kinetic constants for aerobic growth of microbial populations selected with various simple compounds and with municipal waste as substrates.
20	bacteriology of manganese nodules v effect of hydrostatic pressure on bacterial oxidation of mnii and reduction of mno2	Bacteriology of manganese nodules effects hydrostatic pressure on the apos; bacterial oxidation of mnii and reduction of mno2.
20	temperature dependent van der waals forces	Van der waals forces are temperature dependent.
20	flavin photosensitized reactions of retinol and stilbene	The reactions of retinol and stilbene are photosensitized by flavin.
20	determination of high affinity oestrogen receptor sites in uterine supernatant preparations	Determination of high affinity estrogen receptor sites in uterine supernatant preparations.
20	photodynamic action of proflavine on coliphage t3 i kinetics of inactivation	Photodynamic action of proflavine on the kinetics of inactivation of coliphage t3 i.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase in virions of newcastle disease virus comparison with the vesicular stomatitis virus polymerase	Comparison of Newcastle disease virus virion ribonucleic acid polymerase with vesicular stomatitis virus polymerase chain reaction.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of the ferredoxins from spinach and parsley	Ferredoxin proton magnetic resonance studies of spinach and parsley.
20	micro indirect hemagglutination test for cytomegalovirus	Micro-indirect d&apos test; hemagglutination for cytomegalovirus.
20	biochemical alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	Biochemical alterations of the bacillus megaterium produced by aflatoxin b1.
20	morphological alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	Morphological alterations of the bacillus megaterium produced by aflatoxin b1.
20	zonal centrifuge applied to the purification of herpesvirus in the luck frog kidney tumor	Zonal centrifuge applied to the purification of the herpes; herpesvirus in frog kidney tumor carries-happiness.
20	new technique for microscopic examination of the fouling community of submerged opaque surfaces	New technique for microscopic examination of the diving community; fouling of submerged opaque and opaque surfaces.
20	injury of bacteria by sanitizers	Bacterial injury caused by disinfectants.
20	labile serum factor and its effect on arbovirus neutralization	The labile serum factor and its effect on arbovirus neutralization.
20	effect of storage of mueller hinton agar plates on zone sizes for antimicrobial testing	Effect of pH; storage of agar plates; hinton mueller on area size for antimicrobial testing.
20	agar overlay plaquing technique for pseudomonas aeruginosa in hela monolayers	Plating agar technique for pseudomonas aeruginosa in apo monolayers; agar.
20	bacteriophage active against the lactic acid beverage producing bacterium lactobacillus casei	A bacteriophage active against the beverage at l'apos; lactic acid producing the bacterium lactobacillus casei.
20	use of acetone dried vaccines for preparing capsular antisera against the klebsiella group and the lyophilization of klebsiella cultures	Use of acetone to prepare capsular antisera against the klebsiella group and lyophilization of klebsiella cultures.
20	properties of caulobacter ribonucleic acid bacteriophage phi cb5	Properties of Caulobacter ribonucleic acid bacteriophage phi cb5.
20	stability of antibiotics and chemotherapeutics in agar plates	Plate stability of antibiotics and chemotherapeutic agents.
20	electrical characteristics of sphingomyelin bilayer membranes	Electrical characteristics of sphingomyelin bilayer membranes.
20	a male producing strain of the house fly	It's called a male strain of the housefly.
20	effect of injury on shivering thermogenesis in the rat	Effect of lesion on shivering thermogenesis in the rat.
20	the effect of semicarbazide on the nature and stability of collagen fibrils	The effect of semicarbazide on the nature and stability of collagen fibrils.
20	thermodynamic studies of the assembly in vitro of native collagen fibrils	Thermodynamic studies of the apos; assembly in vitro of native collagen fibrils.
20	the mechanism of uptake of cobalt ions by neurospora crassa	The mechanism of d' uptake of cobalt ions by neurospora crassa.
20	circular dichroism studies at variable temperature urobilinoid conformation	Variable-temperature circular dichroism studies of urobilinoide conformation are described.
20	hybridization properties of dna sequences directing the synthesis of messenger rna and heterogeneous nuclear rna	Properties d' hybridization of d&apos sequences; DNA directing the synthesis of messenger and heterogeneous nuclear rna.
20	rna metabolism in hela cells at reduced temperature i modified processing of 45s rna	Rna metabolism in helical cells at reduced temperature i modified the transformation of 45s rna.
20	physiological studies of methane and methanol oxidizing bacteria oxidation of c 1 compounds by methylococcus capsulatus	Physiological studies of methane and methanol oxidizing apos; methylococcus capsulatus oxidation of c1 compounds by bacteria.
20	ultrastructure of the cell wall of erwinia amylovora	Ultrastructural ultrastructure of the cell wall of E. amylovora.
20	observations on the rhodanese activity of desulfotomaculum nigrificans	Observations on the rhodanese activity of desulfotomaculum nigrificans.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization among strains of lactobacilli	Lipos hybridization; deoxyribonucleic acid between strains of lactobacilli.
20	effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the ribosomes of bacillus subtilis	The effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the ribosomes of the bacillus subtilis.
20	effect of hydroxyethylrutosides on blood oxygen levels and venous insufficiency symptoms in varicose veins	Effect of hydroxyethylrutosides on blood oxygen levels and symptoms; venous insufficiency in varicose veins.
20	natural causes of variations in the weight of sarcoma 180	Natural causes of changes in the weight of sarcoma 180.
20	the effects of varying concentrations of colchicine on the progression of grasshopper neuroblasts into metaphase	Effects of various concentrations of colchicine on the progression of grasshopper neuroblasts to metaphase.
20	accumulation and elimination of coliphage s 13 by the hard clam mercenaria mercenaria	Accumulation and elimination of coliphage s 13 by mercenary mercenary clam.
20	production of ochratoxins in different cereal products by aspergillus ochraceus	Production of ochratoxins in various cereal products by aspergillus ochraceus.
20	tremorgenic toxins from penicillia 3 tremortin production by penicillium species on various agricultural commodities	Tremorgenic toxins from penicillium 3 tremortin production by penicillium species on various agricultural products.
20	transient phases of the isometric tetanus in frog s striated muscle	Transient phases of isometric tetanus in frog striated muscle.
20	the temperature activity relationships of serum cholinesterases	The relationship between temperature and activity of serum cholinesterases.
20	molecular events in the growth inhibition of bacillus subtilis by d tyrosine	Molecular events in the growth inhibition of the subtilis bacillus by tyrosine d.
20	changes in membrane lipid composition in exponentially growing staphylococcus aureus during the shift from 37 to 25 c	Changes in membrane lipid composition of exponentially growing staphylococcus aureus from 37 to 25 c.
20	cytological studies of deoxyribonucleic acid replication in escherichia coli 15t replication at slow growth rates and after a shift up into rich medium	Cytological studies of deoxyribonucleic acid replication in replication of escherichia coli 15t at slow growth rates and after displacement to rich medium.
20	lysis of blue green algae by myxobacter	Lysis of green blue-green algae by myxobacteria.
20	properties of the amylase from halobacterium halobium	Properties of potato; amylase d' halobacterium halobium.
20	leakage of oxygen from blood and water samples stored in plastic and glass syringes	Leakage of oxygen from blood and urine samples; water stored in plastic and glass syringes.
20	vitamin b12 uptake by intestinal microorganisms mechanism and relevance to syndromes of intestinal bacterial overgrowth	Vitamin b12 uptake by intestinal microorganisms is a mechanism and a link to intestinal bacterial overgrowth syndromes.
20	miniculture plaquing technique for mouse cytomegalovirus	Mini-culture plating technique for mouse cytomegalovirus.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses v effect of laundering on poliovirus contaminated fabrics	Quantitative studies of tissues as disseminators of virus whitening effect on tissues infected with polioviruses.
20	new method of isolating salmonellae from milk	A new method for isolating salmonella from milk.
20	differential identification of mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum	Differential identification of mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum isolates.
20	the effect of temperature change upon transmitter release facilitation and post tetanic potentiation	L' effect of temperature change on transmitter release facilitation and post-tetanic potentiation.
20	ribosomes from xenopus laevis ovaries and the polyuridylic acid directed biosynthesis of polyphenylalanine	Polyphenylalanine biosynthesis was directed by ribosomes from xenopus laevis ovaries and polyuridylate.
20	effect of geometrical and chemical constraints on water flux across artificial membranes	Effect of geometrical and chemical constraints on water flow through artificial membranes.
20	oxygen 18 studies of recent planktonic foraminifera comparisons of phenotypes and of test parts	Oxygen 18 studies of recent planktonic comparisons of phenotypes and parts of foraminifera.
20	variant of penicillinase mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	A variant of the r-mediated penicillinase in escherichia coli.
20	cephaloglycin and its biologically active metabolite desacetylcephaloglycin	Cephaloglycine and its biologically active metabolite deacetylcephaloglycine.
20	microorganisms of the san francisco sour dough bread process ii isolation and characterization of undescribed bacterial species responsible for the souring activity	Micro-@ organisms of the San francisco salted bread process ii isolation and characterization of undescribed bacterial species responsible for the apo; activity d' origin.
20	incidence of infectious drug resistance among fecal coliforms isolated from raw sewage	The incidence of infectious drug resistance among fecal coliforms isolated from raw sewage.
20	spermidine requirement for bacillus thuringiensis ribosomes in cell free phenylalanine incorporation	Need spermidine for bacillus thuringiensis ribosomes in apos; cell-free phenylalanine incorporation.
20	roadrunners energy conservation by hypothermia and absorption of sunlight	Energy from hypothermia, hypothermia and apos; absorption of sunlight.
20	the development and the extinction of hyperthermia induced by conditioned avoidance behavior in rats	The development and extinction of the cells; hyperthermia induced by the behavior of animals; conditioned avoidance in rats.
20	in vitro stimulation of enzyme secretion and the synthesis of microsomal membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig	In vitro stimulation of enzyme secretion and synthesis of microsomal membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig.
20	an assay for intercellular adhesive specificity	Cell-to-cell adhesive specificity testing for cell-to-cell specificity; intercellular adhesive.
20	proteins of polyhedal cytoplasmic deoxyvirus ii nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity associated with frog virus 3	Proteins of polyhedral cytoplasmic deoxyvirus ii nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity associated with frog virus 3.
20	comparison of the ribonucleic acid polymerases of two rhabdoviruses kern canyon virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of the polymerases of kern canyon virus and vesicular stomatitis virus; ribonucleic acid of two rhabdoviruses.
20	a model of respiratory heat transfer in a small mammal	It's a model of respiratory heat transfer in a small mammal.
20	efeect of temperature on hospital admissions for myocardial infarction in a subarctic area	Effect of temperature on hospitalizations for myocardial infarction in a subarctic region.
20	factors influencing the inhibitory action of anti inflammatory drugs on carrageenin induced oedema	Factors that influence the inhibitory action of anti-@inflammatory drugs on carrageenan are associated with edema.
20	influence of temperature on the iron metabolism of a fluorescent pseudomonad	L' influence of temperature on the metabolism of d&apos iron; a fluorescent pseudomonad.
20	properties of aldolase from francisella tularensis	Properties of the francisella tularensis aldolase.
20	glucocorticoid induced alteration of the surface membrane of cultured hepatoma cells	Glucocorticoids induced alteration of the surface membrane of cultured hepatoma cells.
20	staphylococcal bacteriophage associated lysin a lytic agent active against staphylococcus aureus	Lysine-associated staphylococcal bacteriophage, a lytic agent active against Staphylococcus aureus.
20	growth and reproduction of mice cross fostered between parents reared at different temperatures	Parents reared at different temperatures promoted growth and reproduction of crossed mice.
20	a comparison of mitochondria from torulopsis utilis grown in continuous culture with glycerol iron ammonium magnesium or phosphate as the growth limiting nutrient	A comparison of mitochondria of torulopsis utilis grown in continuous culture with glycerol, iron, l' ammonium, magnesium, or phosphate as growth limiting nutrient.
20	protein and carbohydrate moieties of a preparation of lactamase ii	Proteins and carbohydrates; a preparation of lactamase ii.
20	inorganic particles in cigars and cigar smoke	Inorganic particles in cigars and cigar smoke.
20	characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast 5s ribosomal ribonucleic acid from broad bean leaves	Characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast 5s ribosomal ribonucleic acid from bean leaves.
20	purification and some kinetic properties of rat liver glucosamine synthetase	Purification and some kinetic properties of rat liver glucosamine synthetase.
20	binding of substrates and modifiers to glucosamine synthetase	Fixation of substrates and modifiers to glucosamine synthetase.
20	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage i the regulation of cholesterol exchange	Cholesterol metabolism in macrophage: the regulation of cholesterol exchange.
20	the kinetics of influx of calcium and strontium into rat intestine in vitro	Kinetics of apos; calcium and strontium influx into rat intestine in vitro.
20	nucleated sites for the assembly of cytoplasmic microtubules in the ectodermal cells of blastulae of arbacia punctulata	The nucleated sites for the apos; assembly of cytoplasmic microtubules in the ectodermal cells of blastulas d' arbacia punctulata.
20	ribonucleic acid transcriptase acitvity in purified wound tumor virus	Ribonucleic acid transcriptase acitvity in purified wound tumor virus.
20	mammary carcinoma a specific biochemical defect in autonomous tumors	Breast cancer is a specific biochemical anomaly in autonomous tumours.
20	disinfection of cystoscopes by subatmospheric steam and steam and formaldehyde at 80 degrees c	Disinfection of cystoscopes by subatmospheric vapour and vapour and formaldehyde at 80 degrees Celsius.
20	uptake of tetracycline by membrane preparations from escherichia coli	Absorption of tetracycline by membrane preparations of escherichia coli.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in platelet harvesting an in vitro study	Prostaglandin e 1 in platelets from an in vitro study.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in preparation and storage of platelet concentrates	Prostaglandin 1 is used for preparation and storage of platelet concentrates.
20	lytic enzyme from lysates of streptomyces venezuelae infected with actinophage msp2	L' lytic enzyme of the lysates of streptomyces venezuelae infected by the apos; actinophage msp2.
20	purification of bacteroides amylophilus protease	Purification of amylophilus protease bacterioides.
20	influence of temperature of incubation and type of growth medium on pigmentation in serratia marcescens	Temperature dependence of incubation and type of growth medium on pigmentation in serratia marcescens.
20	induction of pigmentation in nonproliferating cells of serratia marcescens by addition of single amino acids	Induction of pigmentation in nonproliferating serratia marcescens cells by addition of single amino acid.
20	temperature control of phospholipid biosynthesis in escherichia coli	The temperature control of phospholipid biosynthesis in escherichia coli.
20	extracellular transglucosylase and alpha amylase of streptococcus equinus	Extracellular streptococcus equinus extracellular transglucosylase and alpha-amylase.
20	mescaline induced changes of brain cortex ribosomes role of sperimidine in counteracting the destabilizing effect of mescaline of brain cortex ribosomes	Mescaline induced changes in the role of cerebral cortical ribosomes of sperimidine in the neutralization of mescaline, a destabilizing effect of mescaline on cerebral cortical ribosomes.
20	the arrangement of proteins on the deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin	L' the arrangement of proteins on the apos; the arrangement of deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin.
20	a laboratory study of spontaneous platelet aggregation	A laboratory study of spontaneous platelet aggregation.
20	the association in vitro of polyribosomes with ribonuclease treated derivatives of hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum characteristics of the membrane binding sites and factors influencing association	L' in vitro association of polyribosomes with the ribonuclease-treated derivatives of hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum characteristics of membrane-binding sites and factors influencing the association.
20	sugar transport effect of temperature on concentrative uptake of alpha methylglucoside by kidney cortex slices	L' effect of temperature on sugar transport on apos; concentrative absorption of apos; alpha-methylglucoside by renal cortical slices.
20	evidence of gene diminution during the formation of the macronucleus in the protozoan stylonychia dna density melting curves micronuclear dna polytene chromosomes	In addition, it is important to note that, during the formation of macronucleus in the protozoan stylonychia, the fusion density of the apos; DNA, micronuclear curves of polytene chromosomes of the apos; DNA.
20	studies on energy linked reactions energy linked reduction of oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by succinate in escherichia coli	Studies on reactions related to succinate; energy The reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidized by succinate in escherichia coli is related to energy.
20	rabies detection in road killed skunks mephitis mephitis	Detection of rabies on the road killed the mephitis mephitis skunks.
20	application of immunofluorescence to studies on the ecology of sphaerophorus necrophorus	Application of l' immunofluorescence to studies on l' sphaerophorus necrophorus ecology.
20	arylamidase of cephalosporium acremonium and its specificity for cephalosporin c	Arylamidase of cephalosporium acremonium and its specificity for cephalosporin c.
20	initiation of staphylococcal growth in laboratory media	The initiation of staphylococcal growth in laboratory media.
20	kinetics of the vaccinia virus plaque neutralization test	Kinetics of the plate-based vaccine virus neutralization test.
20	the total thermal insulation of the new born baby	L' total thermal insulation of the new-born.
20	circular dischroism of bradykinin and related peptides	Circular dischroism of bradykinin and related peptides.
20	polyribosomal attachment to rat liver and hepatoma endoplasmic reticulum in vitro a method for its study	L' polyribosomal attachment to rat liver and endoplasmic reticulum; in vitro hepatoma is a study method.
20	the amylase of the beetle callosobruchus chinensis properties	L' amylase of callosobruchus chinensis properties of beetle.
20	effects of hydrostatic pressure and temperature on the uptake and respiration of amino acids by a facultatively psychrophilic marine bacterium	Effects of hydrostatic pressure and temperature on the uptake and respiration of amino acids by facultatively psychrophilic marine bacteria.
20	fatty acid composition of bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains	Fatty acid composition of bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains.
20	structural changes during lysis of a psychorophilic marine bacterium	Structural changes during lysis of a psychorophilic marine bacterium.
20	sarcoplasmic reticulum and the temperature dependent contraction of smooth muscle in calcium free solutions	The sarcoplasmic reticulum and the temperature-dependent contraction of smooth muscle in calcium-free solutions.
20	basal bodies but not centrioles in naegleria	Basal bodies but not centrioles in naegleria.
20	the effect of light chloralose and pentobarbitone anaesthesia on the acid base state and oxygenation of arterial blood in dogs	Effect of apos; light chloralosis and pentobarbitone anesthesia on apos; basic acid and apos; oxygenation of arterial blood in dogs.
20	inward spread of activation in vertebrate muscle fibres	Internal apo release; activation in vertebrate muscle fibers.
20	factors influencing the uptake of 125 i polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the intestine of the young rat	Polyvinyl pyrrolidone 125 i absorption by the intestine of the young rat.
20	events occurring near the time of synapsis during transformation in diplococcus pneumoniae	Events occurring near the time of synapsis during transformation in diplococcus pneumoniae.
20	positive and negative control of r factor replication in proteus mirabilis	Both positive and negative control of r factor replication in proteus mirabilis.
20	genetic behavior of r factors in vibrio cholerae	Genetic behavior of r factors in vibrio cholerae.
20	effect of temperature on the fatty acid composition of the extreme thermophiles bacillus caldolyticus and bacillus caldotenax	The effect of temperature on the fatty acid composition of the extreme caldolyticus and caldotax.
20	separation of the primary dehydrogenase from the cytochromes of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase of bacillus megaterium	Separation of the primary dehydrogenase from the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide cytochromes reduces the oxidase form of the megaterium bacillus.
20	dihydroxyacetone phosphate its structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase and some possible metabolic implications	Dihydroxyacetone phosphate its structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase and some possible metabolic implications.
20	protein phospholinase reactions in mammalian testis stimulatory effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of basic proteins	Reactions of protein phospholinase in mammalian testes stimulatory effects of l' adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on phosphorylation of basic proteins.
20	nuclear magnetic resonance spectrum of lysine vasopressin and its structural implications	The nuclear magnetic resonance spectrum of lysine vasopressin and its structural implications.
20	concentration and purification of viruses by adsorption to and elution from insoluble polyelectrolytes	Concentration and purification of viruses by adsorption and elution from insoluble polyelectrolytes.
20	t 2 toxin production by fusarium tricinctum on solid substrate	Toxin t 2 production by fusarium tricinctum on solid substrate.
20	streptomycin uptake by mycobacterium tuberculosis	L' streptomycin absorption by tuberculous mycobacteria.
20	ultrafiltration as a method for concentrating rift valley fever virus grown in tissue culture	L' ultrafiltration as a method of concentrating the rift valley fever virus grown in tissue culture.
20	automated method for the determination of free formalin in biological products	An automated method for the determination of free formalin in biological products.
20	method for the preservation of diagnostic sera for field and laboratory work	Method for the preservation of diagnostic sera for field and laboratory work.
20	transport of vitamin b 12 in escherichia coli	Transport of vitamin b 12 in Escherichia coli.
20	synthesis of pyruvate carboxylase from its apoenzyme and biotin in bacillus stearothermophilus mechanism and control of the reaction	Synthesis and control of the reaction of pyruvate carboxylase from its apoenzyme and biotin in the mechanism of stearothermophilus bacillus.
20	dielectric dispersion in aqueous solutions of oxyhaemoglobin and carboxyhaemoglobin	Dielectric dispersion in aqueous solutions of oxyhemoglobin and carboxyhemoglobin.
20	flow dependence of transtubular potential difference in isolated perfused segments of rabbit proximal convoluted tubule	The transtubular potential difference depends on the flow rate in isolated and perfused segments of the proximal convoluted tubule of the rabbit.
20	simplified fluorometric method for the determination of plasma glycerol	A simplified fluorometric method for the determination of plasma glycerol.
20	polyoma tumor antigen an activator of chromosome replication	Polyoma tumor antigen, an activator of chromosome replication.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of chromatium high potential iron protein	High-potential ferric chromatium protein proton magnetic resonance study.
20	differential effect of phleomycin on the infectivity of poliovirus and poliovirus induced ribonucleic acids	The differential effect of phleomycin on the infectivity of poliovirus and poliovirus induces ribonucleic acids.
20	influence of polycations on the interaction between poliovirus multistranded ribonucleic acid and hela cells	The influence of polycations on the apos; interaction between the apos; multi-stranded ribonucleic acid of poliovirus and helical cells.
20	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection ii proposed mechanism	The increase in the number of apos; escherichia coli after apos; bacteriophage infection ii proposed a mechanism.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity ornithine and lysine decarboxylases	Rapid methods for determination of ornithine and lysine decarboxylase activity.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity arginine decarboxylase	Rapid methods for determination of arginine decarboxylase activity.
20	repair of injury in freeze dried salmonella anatum	Repair of lesions caused by salmonella anatum lyophilized.
20	transport media for herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2	Transport media for herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2.
20	formation of aerial hyphae in candida albicans	Formation of aerial hyphae in candida albicans.
20	channel catfish virus a new herpesvirus of ictalurid fish	The channel catfish virus is a new herpesvirus of ictalurid fishes.
20	binding of ddt to lecithin	The ddt's binding to lecithin.
20	the computed distribution of copper ii and zinc ii ions among seventeen amino acids present in human blood plasma	Calculated distribution of copper ii and zinc ii among the 17 amino acids present in human blood plasma.
20	the significance of changes in the temperature of the skin and body core of the chicken in the regulation of heat loss	L' importance of changes in the temperature of the skin and the body of the chicken in the regulation of heat loss.
20	mechanism of adsorption and eclipse of bacteriophage phi x174 i in vitro conformational change under conditions of eclipse	Absorption and eclipse of the bacteriophage phi x174 i in vitro conformational change under conditions of eclipse.
20	genetic polymorphisms in varied environments	Genetic polymorphisms in diverse environments.
20	incidence of prosthecate bacteria in a polluted stream	Incidence of prosthecate bacteria in a classroom; water pollution.
20	growth temperatures and temperature characteristics of aeromonas	Growth temperature and temperature characteristics of Aeromonas.
20	microagglutination procedures for febrile agglutination tests	Microagglutination methods for febrile ageing tests.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay i factors influencing variability and error	The disc plate method for dosage; antibiotic microbiological test i factors influencing variability and dosage; error.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay ii novel procedure offering improved accuracy	Disc Plate Method of Initiation; Antibiotic Microbiological Test ii new method of increased accuracy.
20	synthesis of l 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine from l tyrosine by microorganisms	Synthesis of the l4 dihydroxyphenylalanine from tyrosine l by microorganisms.
20	bactericidal antibody response in the pacific hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Pacific hagfish eptatretus stoutii bactericidal antibody reaction.
20	utilization of palmitic acid by mycobacterium avium	Use of palmitic acid by avium mycobacterium.
20	cell free passive transfer of delayed hypersensitivity to chemicals in guinea pigs	Cell-free passive transfer of cell-free tissues; delayed hypersensitivity to chemicals in guinea pigs.
20	antiviral immune cytolysis at an early stage of paramyxovirus infection	Antiviral immunocytolysis at an early stage of paramyxovirus infection.
20	experimental alteration of the relationship between the external calcium concentration and the contractile force generated by auricular trabeculae isolated from the heart of the frog rana pipiens	Experimental modification of the relationship between the external calcium concentration and the contractile force generated by fleshy atrial columns isolated from rana pipiens frog heart.
20	analysis of the potential dependent changes in optical retardation in the squid giant axon	Analysis of potential changes in the squid giant axon due to optical retardation.
20	replication of the r factor rts1 in proteus mirabilis	Reproduction of the rts1 factor in the Proteus mirabilis.
20	characteristics of s organism isolated from methanobacillus omelianskii	Characteristics of organism isolated from methanobacillus omelianskii.
20	germination of heat and alkali altered spores of clostridium perfringens type a by lysozyme and an initiation protein	Germination of heat and alkali altered spores of Clostridium perfringens type a per lysozyme and a protein d' initiation.
20	effect of temperature on the integrity of bacillus psychrophilus cell walls	The effect of temperature on the cell wall integrity of the psychrophilic bacillus.
20	studies on the induction and biosynthesis of vitellogenin an oestrogen induced glycolipophosphoprotein	Studies on the induction and biosynthesis of estrogen-induced glycolipophosphoprotein vitellogenin.
20	thermal and ph stability of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate	The thermal and ph stability of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
20	separation of molecular species of lipoprotein lipase from adipose tissue	Dissolution of lipases; molecular species of lipoprotein lipase from adipose tissue.
20	rapid recovery of escherichia coli from estuarine water	Rapid recovery of Escherichia coli in estuarine water.
20	bacterial cell production from hexadecane at high temperatures	Bacterial cell production from hexadecane at high temperature.
20	sporostatic and sporocidal properties of aqueous formaldehyde	The sporostatic and sporocidal properties of aqueous formaldehyde.
20	stability of live attenuated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccine	Stability of live attenuated Venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccine.
20	thyroxine binding globulin characterization of the binding site with a fluorescent dye as a probe	Characterization of the binding site of the thyroxine-binding globulin to apos; a fluorescent dye as a probe.
20	new pseudomonad utilizing methanol for growth	A new pseudomonad using methanol for growth.
20	isolation of mycoplasma membranes by digitonin	The isolation of mycoplasmic membranes by digitonin (digitonin) treatment.
20	interaction of l cells and chlamydia psittaci entry of the parasite and host responses to its development	Interaction of l cells and chlamydia psittaci parasite entry and reactions of the host to its development.
20	aerosol survival of pasteurella tularensis and the influence of relative humidity	The influence of aerosol survival of pasteurella tularensis and lapos; relative humidity.
20	growth of salmonella typhimurium in skim milk concentrates	Growth of Salmonella typhimurium in skim milk concentrates.
20	a ribosome dissociation factor from rabbit reticulocytes fluoride e coli ribosomes initiation factors	Ribosome dissociation factor from rabbit reticulocytes fluoride and coli ribosomes initiation factors.
20	detection of polyadenylic acid sequences in viral and eukaryotic rna polu u cellulose columns poly u filters fiberglass hela cells bacteriophage t4	Detection of d&apos sequences; polyadenylic acid in viral and eukaryotic polynuclear cellulose columns, poly u u filters, t4 bacteriophage of fiberglass helical cells.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo i chlorophyll a in algae at room and at liquid nitrogen temperatures rate constants of radiationless deactivation and trapping	The lifetime of the excited state in vivo i chlorophyll a in the algae, at room temperature and at the temperature of the liquid nitrogen, is constant in the rate of radiationless quenching and trapping.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at room temperature	Lifespan of apo; excited state in vivo ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at room temperature.
20	colorimetric determination of serum acid phosphatase activity using adenosine 3 monophosphate as substrate	Colorimetric determination of serum acid phosphatase activity using monophosphate d' adenosine 3 as substrate.
20	altered thermal sensitivity in injured and demyelinated nerve a possible model of temperature effects in multiple sclerosis	Changing thermal sensitivity in demyelinated damaged nerve, a possible model of temperature effects in multiple sclerosis.
20	some effects of temperature on the growth of f pili	Some effects of temperature on the growth of pili.
20	effect of temperature on the intra hepatic vasculature	The effect of temperature on hepatic intra-@ vascularization.
20	electron spin resonance of an irradiated single crystal of 5 chlorouridine	Electron paramagnetic resonance d' an irradiated single crystal of 5 chlorouridine.
20	lactamases of r factors derived from shigella and salmonella strains	R-factors lactamases derived from shigella and salmonella strains.
20	purification and properties of an polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase produced by bacillus pumilus	D&apos purification and properties; a trans polygalacturonic acid-eliminase produced by the pumilus bacillus.
20	in vivo and in vitro action of new antibiotics interfering with the utilization of n acetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide	L' in vivo and in vitro action of novel antibiotics interfering with n acetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide.
20	effect of growth temperature on the lipid composition of thermus aquaticus	Effect of growth temperature on the lipid composition of thermus aquaticus.
20	human senile cataractous lens protease isolation and some chemical characteristics	Human senile cataract lens protease isolation and certain chemical characteristics.
20	rna polymerases of maize partial purification and properties of the chloroplast enzyme	Rna polymerases of partial purification of maize and properties of the chloroplast enzyme.
20	isolation of a calcium sequestering protein from sarcoplasmic reticulum	Isolate a calcium-sequestring protein from sarcoplasmic reticulum.
20	cellulolytic activity of thermomonospora curvata optimal assay conditions partial purification and product of the cellulase	L' cellulolytic activity of thermomonospora curvata allows partial purification and product of cellulase.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial dna from drosophila melanogaster	Isolation and characterization of melanogaster fruit fly mitochondrial DNA.
20	aspartate transcarbamoylase from phaseolus aureus partial purification and properties	Aspartate transcarbamoylase from partially purified phaseolus aureus and properties.
20	isolation and identification of xanthotoxin 8 methoxypsoralen and bergapten 5 methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotinia sclerotiorum	Isolation and identification of xanthotoxin 8 methoxypsoralen and bergapten 5 methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotia.
20	properties of the refolding and unfolding reactions of ribonuclease a	Properties of the folding and unfolding reactions of ribonuclease a.
20	some properties of pyruvate and 2 oxoglutarate oxidation by blowfly flight muscle mitochondria	Pyruvate and 2 oxoglutarate oxidized by the muscle mitochondria of the flies.
20	synthesis characterization and properties of uridine 5 d apio d furanosyl pyrophosphate	Synthesis characterization and properties of uridine 5 d apio d furanosyl pyrophosphate.
20	partial purification and properties of the pyruvate uridine diphospho n acetylglucosamine transferase from staphylococcus epidermidis	Partial purification and properties of the pyruvate uridine diphospho n acetylglucosamine transferase of staphylococcus epidermidis.
20	purification and characterization of epizootic diarrhea of infant mice virus	Purification and characterization of epizootic diarrhea of childhood mouse virus.
20	physiochemical properties of the native zinc and manganese prepared metalloprotease of bacillus polymyxa	Physiochemical properties of metalloprotease from native zinc and manganese polymyxa bacillus.
20	production and purification of a staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin	Production and purification of a bacteriocin of staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin.
20	uric acid characterization of its interaction with human serum albumin	Characterization by uric acid of its interaction with human serum albumin.
20	isolation and properties of mesosomal membrane fractions from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Isolation and properties of mesosomal membrane fractions of micrococcus lysodeikticus.
20	platelet concentrates sterility of 400 single units stored at room temperature	Concentrated sterility of 400 single units stored at room temperature.
20	human placental cathepsin b1 isolation and some physical properties	Human placental cathepsin b1 isolation and some physical properties.
20	isolation of a specific enhancer for echovirus 6 from uninfected permissive host cells	Isolation of apos; a specific apo activator; echovirus 6 from uninfected permissive host cells.
20	proton magnetic resonance and magnetic susceptibility characterization of ferredoxin i from bacillus polymyxa	Characterization of ferredoxin i proton magnetic resonance and magnetic susceptibility of polymyxa bacillus.
20	characterization of the dominant aerobic microorganism in cattle feedlot waste	Characterization of the dominant aerobic organism in waste from cattle feedlot.
20	beta d phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase from streptococcus cremoris hp purification and enzyme properties	Beta of phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase from streptococcus cremoris hp purification and enzymatic properties.
20	inactivated rabies vaccine produced from the flury lep strain of virus grown in bhk 21 suspension cells	An inactivated rabies vaccine produced from the flurry strain of virus grown in suspension in 21-cell bhk.
20	the purification and properties of extracellular glycosidases of the cellular slime mould dictyostelium discoideum	Purification and properties of extracellular glycosidases of the cellular slime mold dictyostelium discoideum.
20	purification and properties of undecyl acetate esterase from pseudomonas cepacia grown on 2 tridecanone	The purification and properties of the esterase of l'apos; acetate d'apos; undecyl of pseudomonas cepacia grown on 2 tridecanones.
20	purification of polynucleotide phosphorylase by affinity chromatography and some properties of the purified enzymes	Polynucleotide phosphorylase purification by d&apos chromatography; affinity and some properties of the purified enzymes.
20	partial characterization and purification of a rabbit granulocyte factor that increases permeability of escherichia coli	Partial characterization and purification of a rabbit granulocyte factor that increases the permeability of escherichia coli.
20	cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bone characterization of the enzyme and studies of inhibition by thyroid hormones	Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bone characterization of the enzyme and d' thyroid hormone inhibition.
20	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formate dehydrogenase from clostridium thermoaceticum purification and properties	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formate dehydrogenase purification and thermoacetic clostridium properties.
20	progesterone binding components of chick oviduct viii receptor activation and hormone dependent binding to purified nuclei	L' chicken oviduct viii receptor activation and hormone-dependent binding to purified nuclei by progesterone are binding components.
20	purification properties and mode of action of hemicellulase i produced by ceratocystis paradoxa	Purification properties and mode; action of hemicellulase i produced by ceratocystis paradoxa.
20	on the fidelity of dna replication characterization of polynucleotides with errors in base pairing synthesized by avian myeloblastosis virus deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase	Reliability of characterization of replication of apo; polynucleotide DNA with errors in apo; base pairing synthesized by apo; avian myeloblastosis virus deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase.
20	purification and characterization of mouse kidney beta glucuronidase	Purification and characterization of the mouse kidney beta glucuronidase enzyme.
20	preparation and purification of polymerized actin from sea urchin egg extracts	Preparation and purification of polymerized actin from apo extracts; eggs; sea urchin.
20	purification and properties of homoserine transacetylase from bacillus polymyxa	The purification and properties of homoserine transacetylase from polymyxa bacillus.
20	poly 8 bromoadenylic acid synthesis and characterization of an all syn polynucleotide	Synthesis of l' bromoadenyl acid poly 8 and characterization of an all syn polynucleotide.
20	characterization of the genome of phycomyces blakesleeanus	Characterization of the genome of phycomyces blakesleeanus.
20	properties of a prolactin receptor from the rabbit mammary gland	Properties of a prolactin receptor from the rabbit mammary gland.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid of acanthamoeba castellanii	Isolation and characterization of apos; mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid of apos; acanthamoeba castellanii.
20	isolation of salt soluble elastin from ligamentum nuchae of copper deficient calf	Isolate copper deficient calf ligamentum nuchae salt soluble elastin.
20	properties of corynebacterium acnes bacteriophage and description of an interference phenomenon	Properties of the bacteriophage corynebacterium acnes and description of d' interference.
20	assay characterization and localization of an enterotoxin produced by salmonella	Characterization and localization of an enterotoxin produced by Salmonella.
20	virus isolation and titration at 33 degrees and 37 degrees c	Virus isolation and titration at 33 degrees and 37 degrees c.
20	purification and properties of a serine protease from pseudomonas matophilia	The purification and properties of a serine protease of pseudomonas matophilia.
20	hatching in the monogenean parasite dictyocotyle coeliaca from the body cavity of raja naevus	L' coeliaca dictyocotyl monogenean hatching occurs in the body cavity of raja naevus.
20	hansenula lynferdii sp nov	Hansenula lynferdii sp nov.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of bhk 21 c13 cells partial purification and characterization of the enzymes	Acid deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase from bhk 21 c13 cells Partial purification and characterization of enzymes.
20	purification and properties of the pyruvate kinase of sturgeon muscle	The purification and properties of the pyruvate kinase from the muscle of white sturgeon.
20	isolation characterization and stability of the 30s ribosomal rna complex from hela cells	Characterization and stability of the isolation of the 1930s ribosomal complex from helical cells.
20	purification and properties of a beta 1 6 clucosidase from flavobacterium	The purification and properties of a beta 16 flavobacterium clucosidase.
20	purification and properties of nucleic acids from an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the flagellate protozoan crithidia oncopelti	The purification and properties of nucleic acids d' an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the protozoan flagellate crithidia oncopelti.
20	platelet antiheparin activity the isolation and characterisation of platelet factor 4 released from thrombin aggregated washed human platelets and its dissociation into subunits and the isolation of membrane bound antiheparin activity	L' platelet anti-heparin activity, l' isolation and characterization of platelet factor 4 released from washed and aggregated human platelets by thrombin and its dissociation into @-@units and l' membrane-bound anti-hepine activity.
20	purification of a derepressible arylsulfatase from chlamydomonas reinhardti properties of the enzyme in intact cells and in purified state	Purification of apos; a derepressible arylsulfatase from the properties of the enzyme in Chlamydomonas reinhardti in intact and purified cells.
20	isolation of an extracellular neutral proteinase from pseudomonas fragi	Isolate an extracellular neutral proteinase from Pseudomonas fragi.
20	purification properties and induction of a specific benzoate 4 hydroxylase from aspergillus niger ubc 814	Purification properties and induction of apos; a specific benzoate 4 hydroxylase from apos; aspergillus niger 814 ubc.
20	partial purification and characterization of the lipase of a facultatively psychrophilic bacterium acinetobacter o16	Partial purification and characterization of the facultatively psychrophilic lipase d&apos, acinetobacter o 16.
20	an experimentally pathogenic bacillus species i description and characterization of the organism	An experimentally pathogenic bacillus species he description and characterization of the organism.
20	isolation of aeromonas sp atcc 29063 a phenol producing organism from fresh haddock	Isolating aeromonas sp atcc 29063, an organism that produces phenol, and fresh haddock.
20	the purification of cholinesterase from horse serum	The purification of the cholinesterase from horse serum.
20	purification and characterization of aspergillus niger exo 1 4 glucosidase	Purification and characterization of aspergillus niger exo 1 glucosidase 4 glucosidase.
20	the cytotoxins of cobra venoms isolation and partial characterization	The cytotoxins of cobra venom are isolated and partially characterized.
20	purification and properties of elastolytic enzyme from flavobacterium immotum	The purification and properties of the flavobacterium immotum elastolytic enzyme.
20	purification and properties of beta galactosidase from aspergillus oryzae	The purification and properties of beta galactosidase from aspergillus oryzae.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride ii purification and properties of two cellulases	Enzyme studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride ii purification and properties of two cellulases.
20	purification and some properties of alkaline pullulanase from a strain of bacillus no 202 1 an alkalophilic microorganism	The purification and some properties of the alkaline pullulanase d' a strain of bacillus no. 202 1 a micro@-@alkalophilic organism.
20	purification and characterization of two activities of the intracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Purification and characterization of two activities of the intracellular dextransucrase of leuconostoc mesenteroides nrl b 12999.
20	myosin from molluscan abalone haliotis discus isolation and enzymatic properties	Mollusca myosin haliotis disc d'apos; abalone and enzymatic properties.
20	isolation and purification of flavobacterium alpha 1 3 glucanase hydrolyzing insoluble sticky glucan of streptococcus mutans	Isolation and purification of flavobacterium alpha 1-3 glucanase hydrolyzing the insoluble sticky glucan of streptococcus mutans.
20	production purification and characterization of an extracellular chitosanase from streptomyces	Production, purification and characterization of an extracellular chitosanase of streptomyces.
20	colchicine binding protein of the liver its characterization and relation to microtubules	The colchicine binding protein of liver, its characterization and relationship to microtubules.
20	physicochemical properties of planorbis corneus erythrocruorin	Chemical properties of planorbis corneus erythrocruorin.
20	isolation and identification of rumen bacteria capable of anaerobic phloroglucinol degradation	Isolate and identify rumen bacteria capable of degrading anaerobic phloroglucinol.
20	staphylococcal micrococcins ii isolation purification and identification	Staphylococcal micrococcins ii isolation and identification.
20	the isolation and characterization of a temperate phage y46 e2 from erwinia herbicola y40	Isolation and characterization of a temperate phage y46 e2 from the plants; erwinia herbicola y40.
20	a rapid method for purification of human granulocyte cationic neutral proteases purification and characterization of human granulocyte chymotrypsin like enzyme	Rapid purification of human granulocyte cationic neutral proteases and characterization of human granulocyte chymotrypsin similar to the enzyme.
20	epizootic and enzootic aspects of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida disease in maryland oysters	Enzootic and epizootic aspects of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida disease in maryland oyster huters.
20	characterization of a specific transport system for arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles	Characterization of a specific transport system for arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles.
20	purification and properties of an exo cellulase component of novel type from trichoderma miride	The purification and properties of a new type from trichoderma miride, a component of the cellulase exo.
20	studies on phospholipases from streptomyces iii purification and properties of streptomyces hachijoensis phospholipase c	Phospholipases of streptomyces iii purification and properties of streptomyces hachijoensis phospholipase c.
20	isolation and characterization of a proteinase from the sarcocarp of melon fruit	Isolation and characterization of a proteinase from the fruit melon sarcocarp.
20	purification of herpesvirus saimiri and properties of the viral dna	Purification, herpesvirus saimiri and properties of viral DNA.
20	purification characterization and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dependent lactate dehydrogenase from actinomyces viscosus	Characterization and regulation of the purification of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide-dependent lactate dehydrogenase; actinomyces viscosus.
20	colchicine affects kinetics of concanavalin a mediated agglutination of hepatoma cells and plasma membranes from liver and hepatoma cells	Colchicine affects the kinetics of concanavalin, a mediated agglutination of hepatoma and liver and liver cell plasma membranes; hepatoma.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase from the brain of the silkworm bombyx mori	The purification and properties of the arylsulfatase from the brain of the silkworm bombyx mori.
20	purification and characterization of a streptomyces albus endo n acetylmuramidase lytic for group a and other beta haemolytic streptococci	The purification and characterization of a lytic acetylmuramidase of endogenous albus streptomyces for group a and d' other beta-hemolytic streptococci.
20	partial purification and properties of protease from torula thermophila	Partial purification and properties of torula thermophila protease.
20	a case of deficiency of the seventh component of complement in man biological properties of a c7 deficient serum and description of a c7 inactivating principle	A case of deficiency of the seventh component of complement in human biological properties; a c7-deficient serum and description of d' a d&apos principle; inactivation of c7.
20	characterization of primary reactants in bacterial photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of the light induced epr signal g 2 0026 and the optical absorbance changes at cryogenic temperatures	Characterization of primary reagents in bacterial photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of the esr signal induced by light g 2,0026 and changes in apo; optical absorbance at cryogenic temperatures.
20	15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase from human placenta 1 isolation and characterization	Hexoxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase from human placenta isolation and characterization.
20	purification and properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from parsely leaf	The purification and properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from scattered leaves.
20	correlations between physical and drug release characteristics of polyethylene glycol suppositories	Correlations between physical and release characteristics of polyethylene glycol suppositories.
20	a dna polymerase from embryos of drosophila melanogaster purification and properties	A purifying DNA polymerase from embryos of drosophila melanogaster with properties.
20	membranes of tetrahymena iv isolation and characterization of temperature responsive smooth and rough microsomal subfractions	Tetrahymena membranes iv, isolation and characterization of temperature sensitive smooth and rough microsomal fractions.
20	separation of cholinergic proteolipids from quenched rat cerebral cortex and resolution of properties at low temperature	Separation of cholinergic proteolipids from rat cerebral cortex and resolution of properties at low temperature.
20	increased reactivity of rat alpha foetoprotein with corresponding antiserum after 125i labelling	Increased reactivity of rat fetoprotein alpha with the corresponding antiserum after 125i labelling.
20	purification and properties of a yeast protein kinase	The purification and properties of a yeast protein kinase.
20	purification and characterization of two peroxidases from hard wheat	Purification and characterization of two peroxidases of durum wheat.
20	tryptophanase from sphaerophorus funduliformis purification molecular weight and subunit properties	Tryptophanase from sphaerophorus funduliformis, molecular mass of purification and properties of sub@-units.
20	purification and characterization of a glycosyltransferase complex from the culture broth of streptococcus mutans fa1	Purification and characterization of a glycosyltransferase complex from a streptococcus mutans fa1 culture broth.
20	purification and properties of myeloperoxidase from mice leukocytes	Purification and properties of myeloperoxidase from mouse leukocytes.
20	chemically induced temperature sensitive mutants of dengue virus type 2 i isolation and partial characterization	Temperature-sensitive mutants chemically induced for isolation and partial characterization of dengue virus type 2 i.
20	lh rh interactions with pituitary receptors properties and characterization	Rhh interactions with properties and characterization of pituitary receptors.
20	characterization of an inducible amidase from pseudomonas acidovorans ae1	Characterization of an inducible pseudomonas acidovorans ae1 amidase.
20	characterization of n ethylmaleimide reactive proteins from human tonsillar ribosomes by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Characterization of human tonsil ribosomal ethylmaleimide reactive proteins by two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
20	magnetic susceptibility measurements of deoxygenated hemoglobins and isolated chains	Magnetic susceptibility measurements of deoxygenated hemoglobins and isolated chains.
20	prolactin binding in rat mammary gland during pregnancy and lactation	Prolactin binding in rat mammary gland during pregnancy and lactation.
20	purification of sea urchin ribosomal rna genes with a single strand specific nuclease	Purification of sea urchin ribosomal genes by a single strand specific nuclease.
20	isolation and characterization of two alkaline ribonucleases from calf serum	The isolation and characterization of two alkaline ribonucleases from calf serum.
20	the glass point of elastin	The glass point of the elastin.
20	purification and characterization of an extracellular exo d galacturonanase of aspergillus niger	Purification and characterization of an extracellular exotic galacturonanase from aspergillus niger.
20	in vitro preparation and characterization of a 700 nm absorbing chlorophyll water adduct according to the proposed primary molecular unit in photosynthesis	In vitro preparation and characterization; an adsorbing chlorophyll adduct; 700 nm water according to apos; proposed primary molecular unit for photosynthesis.
20	an improved assay for bacterial methane mono oxygenase some properties of the enzyme from methylomonas methanica	An improved assay for bacterial methane monooxygenase, certain properties of the methylamine methanica enzyme.
20	oxygen uptake and blood respiratory properties of the caecilian boulengerula taitanus	Lapos; oxygen absorption and blood respiratory properties of caecilian boulengerula.
20	characterization of an extracellular dextranase from fusarium moniliforme	Characterization of an extracellular dextranase from the fusarium moniliforme.
20	kinetic studies on pantothenase from pseudomonas fluorescens effects of ph on substrate and inhibitor binding	Pantothenase kinetics studies of pseudomonas fluorescens effects of ph on substrate and binding of inhibitor.
20	transfer of heme from heme albumin to hemopexin	Apos transfer; apos heme; heme albumin to apos; hemopexin.
20	industrial preparation of poly vinyl chloride	An industrial preparation of polyvinyl chloride.
20	partial purification and characterization of alpha glucosidase from pseudomonas fluorescens w	Partial purification and characterization of alpha glucosidase of pseudomonas fluorescens w.
20	isolation of a moderate halophilic ammonia oxidizing bacterium nitrosococcus mobilis nov sp	Isolation of apo; moderately halophilic ammonia-oxidizing bacterium nitrosococcus mobilis sp. nov.
20	affinity chromatography on immobilised nucleotides some applications to the purification of thermophilic dehydrogenases and kinases	Chromatography on immobilized nucleotides, some applications for the purification of thermophilic dehydrogenases and kinases.
20	enzymic synthesis of an aromatic ring from acetate units partial purification and some properties of flavanone synthase from cell suspension cultures of petroselinum hortense	The enzymatic synthesis of an aromatic nucleus from apos; an acetate allows partial purification and some properties of flavanone synthase from suspension cultures of hydrangean petroselin.
20	isolation and characterization of active ribosomal subunits from human placenta	Isolation and characterization of sub-units of active ribosomal tissue in the human placenta.
20	oestrogen receptors in chick oviduct characterization and subcellular distribution	Estrogens in the characterization of apos; chicken oviduct and subcellular distribution.
20	purification and some properties of a novel maltohexaose producing exo amylase from aerobacter aerogenes	The purification and certain properties of a new maltohexaose producing exo amylase from apos; Aerobacter aerogenes.
20	further characterization of the androgen receptor in rat testis	Further characterization of the androgen receptor in rat testis.
20	purification and characterization of tonin	Purification and characterization of tonin.
20	some biological properties of herpesvirus saimiri from chronically infected monolayer and suspension cultures	Certain biological properties of saimiri herpesvirus from chronically infected monolayer and suspension cultures.
20	physico chemical properties of ribonuclease a modified with pyridoxal 5 phosphate	Chemical properties of ribonuclease modified by pyridoxal 5 phosphate.
20	human deoxythymidine kinase i purification and general properties of the cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from blast cells of acute myelocytic leukemia	The purification of human deoxythymidine kinase i and the general properties of the cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from blast cells of acute myelocytic leukemia.
20	bovine pancreatic lipase i isolation homogeneity and characterization	Bovine pancreatic lipase homogeneity and characterization i.
20	physiological and dna characterization of candida maltosa a hydrocarbon utilizing yeast	The physiological characterization and DNA of candida maltosa, a hydrocarbon using yeast.
20	effect of temperature salts ph and other factors on the development of peritrichous flagella in vibrio alginolyticus	Effect of temperature salts ph and other factors on the development of peritrichous flagella in vibrio alginolyticus.
20	dissolution rates of high energy sulfathiazole povidone coprecipitates ii characterization of form of drug controlling its dissolution rate via solubility studies	Dissolution rates of high energy povidone sulfathiazole ii. characterization of the form of the drug that controls its dissolution rate by solubility studies.
20	cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase in the soluble fraction of the cattle brain cortex purification and properties author s transl	Cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase in the soluble fraction of bovine cerebral cortical purification and properties of the peptide; transl.
20	the trypsin and chymotrypsin inhibitors in chick peas cicer arietinum l purification and properties of the inhibitors	Trypsin and chymotrypsin inhibitors in chickpeas cicer arietinum l purification and the properties of inhibitors.
20	purification of normal human urinary n acetyl beta hexosaminidase a by affinity chromatography	Purification of normal human urinary acetyl beta-hexosaminidase by d&apos chromatography; affinity.
20	physicochemical properties of two atypical cytochromes c crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558	Identity physico-chemicals of two atypical cytochromes c crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558.
20	biosynthesis of heparin solubilization and partial characterization of n and o sulphotransferases	Biosynthesis of solubilization; heparin and partial characterization of n and o sulfotransferases.
20	alcohol oxidases of kloeckera sp and hansenula polymorpha catalytic properties and subunit structures	Alcohols oxidases of kloeckera sp and hansenula polymorpha catalytic properties and structures of under-units.
20	i n vitro transcription of adenovirus 2 dna i characterization of promoters for e coli rna polymerase	In vitro transcription of apo; adenovirus 2 dna s characterization of e coli rna polymerase promoters.
20	preparation of the lectin b component from the hemagglutinin of lens culinaris	Preparation of the lectin b from the apos; culinaris lens hemagglutinin.
20	purification and properties of an enzyme catalyzing the splitting of carbon mercury linkages from mercury resistant pseudomonas k 62 strain i splitting enzyme 1	The purification and properties of a mercury-resistant pseudomonas i. strain k-62, an enzyme that catalyzes the separation of the mercury-mercury bonds from the apos.
20	partial purification and properties of microsomal phosphatidate phosphohydrolase from rat liver	The partial purification and properties of microsomal phosphatidate phosphohydrolase from rat liver.
20	purification and some enzymatic properties of the chitosanase from bacillus r 4 which lyses rhizopus cell walls	Purification and some enzymatic properties of the r4 bacillus chitosanase that lyses rhizopus cell walls.
20	some physicochemical properties of hemoglobin manitoba alpha2 102ser replaced by arg g9 beta2	Some physical properties-chemicals of l' hemoglobin manitoba alpha2 102ser replaced by arg g9 beta2.
20	laboratory procedures for the isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from the human genital tract	Laboratory procedures for the isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from the human genital tract.
20	characterization of the mannosyl and fucosyl transferases in the ovine anterior pituitary glands	Characterization of the mannosyl and fucosyl transferases in the anterior pituitary glands of the ovine.
20	polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in the osmotic shock fluid of erwinia rubrifaciens characterization of the purified enzyme and its effect on plant cells	The purified enzyme and its effect on plant cells are characterized by the polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in the osmotic shock fluid of apos; erwinia rubrifaciens.
20	purification of plasma membrane penicillinase from bacillus licheniformis 749 c and comparison with exoenzyme	Purification of penicillinase from the plasma membrane of bacillus licheniformis 749 c and comparison with exoenzyme etapos.
20	the hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of bacillus licheniformis 749 c characterization of the hydrophilic enzyme and phospholipopeptide produced by trypsin cleavage	The hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of the bacillus licheniformis 749 c characterization of the hydrophilic enzyme and phospholipopeptide produced by trypsin cleavage.
20	isolation and characterization of actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp nov an extremely halophilic actinomycete	Isolation and characterization of actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp nov, an extremely halophilic actinomycete.
20	factors affecting the sensitivity of replicating mccoy cells in the isolation and growth of chlamydia a tric agents	Factors affecting the sensitivity of the replication of McCoy cells in the isolation and growth of the tric agents of chlamydia.
20	partial characterization of prostaglandin synthetase in the reproductive tract of the male house cricket acheta domesticus	Partial characterization of prostaglandin synthetase in the reproductive tract of cricket purchased male domesticus.
20	classification of micrococci on the basis of deoxyribonucleic acid homology	Classification of micrococci based on apo; homology of apo; deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	circular dichroism and ethidium bromide binding capacity of chromatin from cells temperature sensitive for the transformed phenotype	Circular dichroism and bromide binding capacity of temperature-sensitive cell chromatin ethidium for the transformed phenotype.
20	iodination of dna studies of the reaction and iodination of papovavirus dna	Ionization of reaction DNA studies and iodination of papovavirus DNA.
20	purification and properties of two initiation factors from bacillus stearothermophilus	The purification and properties of two factors; initiation of stearothermophilus bacillus.
20	further characterization of yeast rna polymerases effect of subunits removal	Further characterization; effect of yeast rna polymerases on apos; removal of sub@-@ units.
20	effects of aureo s 700r on sporulation viability and infectivity of ovine coccidial oocysts	Effects of aureole 700r on sporulation viability and lapos; infectivity of ovine coccidian oocysts.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase a from rabbit testis	The purification and properties of arylsulfatase has rabbit testicles.
20	isolation and basic properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from brewing yeast	Isolation and basic properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from brewing yeast.
20	calorimetric and freeze fracture analysis of lipid phase transitions and lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes	Calorimetric and cryofracture analysis of lipid phase transitions and lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes.
20	physiology and characterization of a fungal milk clotting enzyme from aspergillus flavus	Physiology and characterization of a fungal milk coagulation enzyme from aspergillus flavus.
20	partial denaturation of mouse dna in preparative cscl density gradients at alkaline ph	Partial denaturation of apo; mouse DNA in cscl density gradients preparation to alkaline phalin.
20	characterization of agarose bound trypsin	Characterization of trypsin bound to l'apos; agarose.
20	purification and characterization of phosphodiesterase i from bothrops atrox	Purification and characterization of phosphodiesterase i from the two atrox strains.
20	paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin binding to escherichia coli ribosomes	Both paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin bind to d' Escherichia coli ribosomes.
20	characterization of the toromeric structure in drosophila lummei	Characterization of the toromeric structure in drosophila lummei.
20	soluble adenylate cyclase from the culture medium of bordetella pertussis purification and characterization	A soluble adenylate cyclase from the culture medium of purification and characterization of bordetella pertussis.
20	characterization of l asparagine transport systems in stemphylium botryosum	Characterization of asparagine l transport systems in botryosum dephylium stem.
20	purification and properties of an endo cellulase of avicelase type from irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae	The purification and properties of an endo cellulase avicelase from apos; irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Purification and properties of the extracellular dextransucrase of leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299.
20	steroidogenesis in the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal coretx i isolation and some properties of mitochondria from the zona glomerulosa of the bovine adrenal cortex	Steroidogenesis in the glomerulate zone of the epos; isolation of the adrenal cortex i and some properties of mitochondria of the glomerulate zone of the bovine adrenal cortex.
20	alkaline phosphatase of thiobacillus thioparus partial purification and properties of the enzyme	Partially purified thiobacillus thioparus alkaline phosphatase and properties of the enzyme.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase from mycobacterium phlei	The purification and properties of mycobacterium phlei l.-asparaginase.
20	exocytosis in secretory cells of rat lacrimal gland peroxidase release from lobules and isolated cells upon cholinergic stimulation	L' exocytosis in rat lacrimal gland peroxidase secretory cells releases lobules and isolated cells by cholinergic stimulation.
20	isolation and characterization of a microsomal arylaminopeptidase from rat kidney	Isolation and characterization of a microsomal rat kidney arylaminopeptidase.
20	isolation and characterization of dna dna and dna rna	Isolation and characterization of DNA, RNA, RNA, and RNA.
20	alpha mannosidase from phaseolus vulgaris composition and structural properties	Alpha mannosidase is derived from phaseolus vulgaris composition and structural properties.
20	simple isolation method and assay for t4 dna ligase and characterization of the purified enzyme	A simple method for isolation and quantitation of ligase; t4DNA and characterization of the protein; purified enzyme.
20	functional properties of fragments of the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the fast and slow muscles of rana ridibunda frogs	Functional properties of the sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments of fast and slow muscles of rana ridibunda frogs.
20	cytochrome c1 of bakers yeast i isolation and properties	The cytochrome c1 of baking yeast i isolation and properties.
20	purification and characterization of a repressible alkaline phosphatase from thermus aquaticus	Purification and characterization of a repressive alkaline phosphatase from thermus aquaticus.
20	properties of tubulin in unfertilized sea urchin eggs quantitation and characterization by the colchicine binding reaction	The properties of tubulin in unfertilized sea urchin eggs are quantified and characterized by the colchicine binding reaction.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride iv purification and properties of a less random type cellulase	Enzyme studies on a cellulase purification system of virid trichoderma iv and properties of a less random type cellulase.
20	the ovalbumin gene in vitro enzymatic synthesis and characterization	In vitro enzymatic synthesis and characterization of the ovalbumin gene.
20	solubilized nuclear receptors for thyroid hormones physical characteristics and binding properties evidence for multiple forms	Solubilized nuclear receptors for thyroid hormones physical characteristics and evidence binding properties of multiple forms.
20	isolation and properties of a thermostable restriction endonuclease endo r bst1503	Isolation and properties of a thermostable restriction endonuclease endo r bst1503 endo r.
20	isolation and characterization of an enzyme with esterase activity from micropolyspora faeni	Isolation and characterization of d' an enzyme with esterase activity from micropolyspora faeni.
20	mccarey kaufman technique of corneal storage before penetrating keratoplasties in rabbits an evaluation	Mccarey kaufman technique to store cornea before penetrating keratoplasties in rabbits an evaluation.
20	purification and characterization of a peripheral protein from the sheep erythrocyte membrane	Purification and characterization of a peripheral protein of the sheep erythrocyte membrane.
20	isolation and properties of the fibrinolytic enzyme from the actinomyces thermovulgaris cultural broth	Isolation and properties of the fibrinolytic enzyme of the culture broth d' actinomyces thermovulgaris.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase b from acinetobacter calcoaceticus	The purification and properties of the acinetobacter calcoaceticus asparaginase b.
20	nature and properties of c3hf natural antitumor cytotoxins directed against murine lymphosarcoma cells	Nature and properties of c3hf natural antitumor cytotoxins directed against murine lymphosarcoma cells.
20	partial purification of human intestinal alkaline phosphatase with affinity chromotography some properties and interaction of concanavalin a with alkaline phosphatase	Partial purification of human intestinal alkaline phosphatase with d&apos chromotography; affinity, properties and interaction of concanavalin a with alkaline phosphatase.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular metallo proteinases of chromobacterium lividum ncib 10926	The purification and properties of extracellular metalloproteinases of chromobacterium lividum ncib 10926 are described.
20	the extracellular metalloprotease of serratia marcescens i purification and characterization	The extracellular metalloprotease of serratia marcescens i purification and characterization.
20	influence of magnesium on chloride induced calcium release in skinned muscle fibers	L' influence of magnesium on chloride induced calcium release in denuded muscle fibers.
20	growth of spirillum lipoferum at constant partial pressures of oxygen and the properties of its nitrogenase in cell free extracts	Growth of spirillum lipoferum under constant partial pressures; oxygen and the properties of its nitrogenase in extracts.
20	extracellular nuclease produced by a marine bacterium ii purification and properties of extracellular nuclease from a marine vibrio sp	The extracellular nuclease produced by the purification of apos; a marine bacterium ii and the properties of extracellular nuclease d' a marine vibrio.
20	characterization of a strain of methanospirillum hungatti	Characterization of a strain of methanospirillum hungatti.
20	solubilization partial purification and radioassay for the intrinsic factor receptor from the ileal mucosa	Partial solubilization and radio-test for the intrinsic factor receptor of the ileal mucosa.
20	coupling of catecholamine receptor from one cell with adenylate cyclase from another cell by cell fusion	Catecholamine receptor coupling; one cell with apos; adenylate cyclase d' another cell by cell fusion.
20	membrane bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities from bacillus megaterium km at ph 7 general properties substrate specificity and inhibition by beta lactam antibiotics	Membrane-bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities of bacillus megaterium km at general ph 7 properties were substrate specific and inhibited by beta lactamic antibiotics.
20	purification and properties of pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon degrading bacteria	Purification and properties of pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon degrading bacteria.
20	properties of renin granules isolated from rat kidney	The properties of renin granules isolated from rat kidney.
20	studies on an alpha amylase from a thermophilic bacterium i purification and characterization	Studies on an alpha amylase from apos; a thermophilic bacterium i purification and characterization.
20	isolation and characterization of acid invertase inhibitor from sweet potato	Isolation and characterization of sweet potato acid invertase inhibitors.
20	structure of nuclear pre mrna viii isolation and characterization of complementary sequences	Structure of l' nuclear pre mrna viii isolation and complementary sequence characterization.
20	isolation and characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplastic ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas from the diatom cylindrotheca fusiformis	The isolation and characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas from the cylindrotheca fusiformis diatom.
20	synthesis of a disulfide affinity adsorbent for purification of estrogen receptor	D&apos Synthesis; an adsorbent; disulfide affinity for purification of the estrogen receptor.
20	high resolution proton nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the structural and dynamic properties of d c15a15 d t15g15	A high-resolution proton magnetic resonance study of the structural and dynamic properties of d c15a15 d t15g15 has been performed.
20	alkaline phosphatase of blastocladiella emersonii partial purification and characterization	The alkaline phosphatase from blastocladiella emersonii is partially purified and characterized.
20	characterization of porosity of isostatically pressed and sintered nickel base powdered metal	Characterization of porosity of isostatically pressed and sintered basic nickel powder.
20	characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated nuclei of regenerating rat liver in two different in vitro systems	Characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated nuclei of regenerating rat liver in two different in vitro systems.
20	isolation purification and investigation of physico chemical properties and specificity of leu gly gly amino peptidase	D&apos purification, isolation, and study of the chemical properties and specificity of leu gly amino peptidase.
20	purification and properties of two aromatic aminotransferases in bacillus subtilis	The purification and properties of two aromatic aminotransferases of bacillus subtilis.
20	a new oxygenase 2 nitropropane dioxygenase of hansenula mrakii enzymologic and spectrophotometric properties	A novel oxygenase 2 nitropropane dioxygenase of hansenula mrakii enzymological and spectrophotometric properties.
20	yersinia enterocolitica recovery and characterization of two unusual isolates from a case of acute enteritis	Yersinia enterocolitica recovery and characterization of two unusual isolates from dapos; one case; acute enteritis.
20	numerically dominant denitrifying bacteria from world soils	Digitally dominant denitrifying bacteria in soils all over the world.
20	morpholigic and physiologic repercussions of partial removal of brown adipose tissue in rats acclimated to different temperatures	Morphological and physiological effects of apos; partial removal of brown adipose tissue in rats acclimated to different temperatures.
20	production and properties of hemagglutinin of haemophilus gallinarum	Production and properties of haemophilus gallinarum; haemophilus gallinarum hemagglutinin.
20	characterization of microsomal choloyl coenzyme a synthetase	Characterization of microsomal choloyl coenzyme a synthetase.
20	l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase from the insect ceratitis capitata purfication physicochemical and enzymic properties	L glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase from l' insect ceratitis capitata purification physicochemical and enzymatic properties.
20	isolation and characterization of a bacteriocin produced by bacillus stearothermophilus strain nu 10	Isolation and characterization of a bacteriocin produced by stearothermophilus strain n.
20	characterization of single stranded viral dna sequences present during replication of adenovirus types 2 and 5	Characterization of single-stranded viral DNA sequences present during replication of types 2 and 5 d' adenovirus.
20	study of the conditions maintaining the synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus species	Study of the conditions that maintain the synthesis of alpha-amylase by bacillus species.
20	purification crystallization and properties of triacylglycerol lipase from pseudomonas fluorescens	Crystallization of purification and properties of triacylglycerol lipase from pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	intracellular nucleodepolymerase of bacteria representatives of the proteus and providencia groups its isolation and properties	The intracellular nucleodepolymerase of bacteria representative of both proteus and providence combines its isolation and properties.
20	electron spin resonance investigations of mitochondrial electron transport in neurospora crassa characterization of paramagnetic intermediates in a standard strain	Electron paramagnetic resonance (EMR) studies of d' electron transport in neurospora crassa have permitted the characterization of paramagnetic intermediates in a standard strain.
20	characterization and site of action of a soluble protein that stimulates peptide bond synthesis	D&apos characterization and site; action of a soluble protein that stimulates peptide bond synthesis.
20	prolyl 3 hydroxylase partial characterization of the enzyme from rat kidney cortex	Partial characterization of the rat kidney cortical enzyme by prolyl 3 hydroxylase.
20	studies on the toxin of aspergillus fumigatus vii purification and some properities of hemolytic toxin asp hemolysin from culture filtrates and mycelia	Toxin studies of aspergillus fumigatus vii and certain properties of the apos; hemolysin of the apos; aspe, a hemolytic toxin, from culture filtrates and mycelium.
20	partial characterization of epididymal 5 alpha reductase in the rat	Partial characterization of epididymal alpha reductase 5 in the rat.
20	studies on urinary kallikreins i purification and characterization of human urinary kallikreins	Studies of urinary kallikreins i purification and characterization of human urinary kallikreins.
20	o acetylserine and o acetylhomoserine sulfhydrylase of yeast further purification and characterization as a pyridoxal enzyme	Yeast acetylserine and yeast acetyl-homoserine sulfhydrylase are further purified and characterized as a pyridoxal enzyme.
20	purification and some properties of an extracellular alpha amylase from bacteroides amylophilus	The purification and certain properties of an extracellular alpha-amylase of bacteroids amylophilus.
20	purification of hyaluronidase from human placenta	The purification of human placental hyaluronidase.
20	purification and properties of trna adenine 1 methyltransferase from rat liver	Purification and properties of trna adenine 1 methyltransferase from rat liver.
20	hemoglobin switching in sheep and goats preparation and characterization of complementary dnas specific for the alpha beta and gamma globin messenger rnas of sheep	Change of apos; hemoglobin in sheep and goat, prepare and characterize specific complementary dnas for alpha beta and gamma globin messenger rnas in sheep.
20	isolation chemical characterization and biophysical properties of three different abnormal lipoproteins lp x1 lp x2 and lp x3	Chemical characterization of apos; isolation and biophysical properties of three different abnormal lipoproteins lp x1 lp x2 and lp x3 lp.
20	characterization of the integration protein of bacteriophage lambda as a site specific dna binding protein	Characterization of the protein d' integration of the bacteriophage lambda as a binding protein; DNA d' a specific site.
20	study of the equilibrium conditions for the extractive purification of oleandomycin	Study of the conditions; equilibrium for the extractive purification of l'apos; oleandomycin.
20	improved efficiency of mouse guinea pig and human c3b inactivator at low ionic strength and reproducible immune adherence with mouse complement	Improvement of protein; efficacy of protein; low ionic strength human and mouse guinea pig and human inactivator; reproducible immune adherence with mouse complement.
